BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
DEFINITIONS
Sec. 1 RCW 48.43.005 and 2011 c 315 s 2 and 2011 c 314 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless otherwise specifically provided, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adjusted community rate" means the rating method used to
establish the premium for health plans adjusted to reflect actuarially
demonstrated differences in utilization or cost attributable to
geographic region, age, family size, and use of wellness activities.
(2) "Adverse benefit determination" means a denial, reduction, or
termination of, or a failure to provide or make payment, in whole or in
part, for a benefit, including a denial, reduction, termination, or
failure to provide or make payment that is based on a determination of
an enrollee's or applicant's eligibility to participate in a plan, and
including, with respect to group health plans, a denial, reduction, or
termination of, or a failure to provide or make payment, in whole or in
part, for a benefit resulting from the application of any utilization
review, as well as a failure to cover an item or service for which
benefits are otherwise provided because it is determined to be
experimental or investigational or not medically necessary or
appropriate.
(3) "Applicant" means a person who applies for enrollment in an
individual health plan as the subscriber or an enrollee, or the
dependent or spouse of a subscriber or enrollee.
(4) "Basic health plan" means the plan described under chapter
70.47 RCW, as revised from time to time.
(5) "Basic health plan model plan" means a health plan as required
in RCW 70.47.060(2)(e).
(6) "Basic health plan services" means that schedule of covered
health services, including the description of how those benefits are to
be administered, that are required to be delivered to an enrollee under
the basic health plan, as revised from time to time.
(7) "Board" means the governing board of the Washington health
benefit exchange established in chapter 43.71 RCW.
(8)(a) For grandfathered health benefit plans issued before January
1, 2014, and renewed thereafter, "catastrophic health plan" means:
(((a))) (i) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy
covering a single enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar
year deductible of, at a minimum, one thousand seven hundred fifty
dollars and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under
the plan (other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least
three thousand five hundred dollars, both amounts to be adjusted
annually by the insurance commissioner; and
(((b))) (ii) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy
covering more than one enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a
calendar year deductible of, at a minimum, three thousand five hundred
dollars and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under
the plan (other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least six
thousand dollars, both amounts to be adjusted annually by the insurance
commissioner((; or
(c) Any health benefit plan that provides benefits for hospital
inpatient and outpatient services, professional and prescription drugs
provided in conjunction with such hospital inpatient and outpatient
services, and excludes or substantially limits outpatient physician
services and those services usually provided in an office setting)).
(b) In July 2008, and in each July thereafter, the insurance
commissioner shall adjust the minimum deductible and out-of-pocket
expense required for a plan to qualify as a catastrophic plan to
reflect the percentage change in the consumer price index for medical
care for a preceding twelve months, as determined by the United States
department of labor. The adjusted amount shall apply on the following
January 1st.
(c) For health benefit plans issued on or after January 1, 2014,
"catastrophic health plan" means:
(i) A health benefit plan that meets the definition of catastrophic
plan set forth in section 1302(e) of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended;
or
(ii) A health benefit plan offered outside the exchange marketplace
that requires a calendar year deductible or out-of-pocket expenses
under the plan, other than for premiums, for covered benefits, that
meets or exceeds the commissioner's annual adjustment under (b) of this
subsection.
(((8))) (9) "Certification" means a determination by a review
organization that an admission, extension of stay, or other health care
service or procedure has been reviewed and, based on the information
provided, meets the clinical requirements for medical necessity,
appropriateness, level of care, or effectiveness under the auspices of
the applicable health benefit plan.
(((9))) (10) "Concurrent review" means utilization review conducted
during a patient's hospital stay or course of treatment.
(((10))) (11) "Covered person" or "enrollee" means a person covered
by a health plan including an enrollee, subscriber, policyholder,
beneficiary of a group plan, or individual covered by any other health
plan.
(((11))) (12) "Dependent" means, at a minimum, the enrollee's legal
spouse and dependent children who qualify for coverage under the
enrollee's health benefit plan.
(((12))) (13) "Emergency medical condition" means a medical
condition manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity,
including severe pain, such that a prudent layperson, who possesses an
average knowledge of health and medicine, could reasonably expect the
absence of immediate medical attention to result in a condition (a)
placing the health of the individual, or with respect to a pregnant
woman, the health of the woman or her unborn child, in serious
jeopardy, (b) serious impairment to bodily functions, or (c) serious
dysfunction of any bodily organ or part.
(((13))) (14) "Emergency services" means a medical screening
examination, as required under section 1867 of the social security act
(42 U.S.C. 1395dd), that is within the capability of the emergency
department of a hospital, including ancillary services routinely
available to the emergency department to evaluate that emergency
medical condition, and further medical examination and treatment, to
the extent they are within the capabilities of the staff and facilities
available at the hospital, as are required under section 1867 of the
social security act (42 U.S.C. 1395dd) to stabilize the patient.
Stabilize, with respect to an emergency medical condition, has the
meaning given in section 1867(e)(3) of the social security act (42
U.S.C. 1395dd(e)(3)).
(((14))) (15) "Employee" has the same meaning given to the term, as
of January 1, 2008, under section 3(6) of the federal employee
retirement income security act of 1974.
(((15))) (16) "Enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing" means
amounts paid to health carriers directly providing services, health
care providers, or health care facilities by enrollees and may include
copayments, coinsurance, or deductibles.
(((16))) (17) "Exchange" means the Washington health benefit
exchange established under chapter 43.71 RCW.
(18) "Final external review decision" means a determination by an
independent review organization at the conclusion of an external
review.
(((17))) (19) "Final internal adverse benefit determination" means
an adverse benefit determination that has been upheld by a health plan
or carrier at the completion of the internal appeals process, or an
adverse benefit determination with respect to which the internal
appeals process has been exhausted under the exhaustion rules described
in RCW 48.43.530 and 48.43.535.
(((18))) (20) "Grandfathered health plan" means a group health plan
or an individual health plan that under section 1251 of the patient
protection and affordable care act, P.L. 111-148 (2010) and as amended
by the health care and education reconciliation act, P.L. 111-152
(2010) is not subject to subtitles A or C of the act as amended.
(((19))) (21) "Grievance" means a written complaint submitted by or
on behalf of a covered person regarding: (a) Denial of payment for
medical services or nonprovision of medical services included in the
covered person's health benefit plan, or (b) service delivery issues
other than denial of payment for medical services or nonprovision of
medical services, including dissatisfaction with medical care, waiting
time for medical services, provider or staff attitude or demeanor, or
dissatisfaction with service provided by the health carrier.
(((20))) (22) "Health care facility" or "facility" means hospices
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW, rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020,
psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental health centers
licensed under chapter 71.05 or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment
centers licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic,
treatment, or surgical facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW,
drug and alcohol treatment facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A
RCW, and home health agencies licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and
includes such facilities if owned and operated by a political
subdivision or instrumentality of the state and such other facilities
as required by federal law and implementing regulations.
(((21))) (23) "Health care provider" or "provider" means:
(a) A person regulated under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to
practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing
health care services in this state consistent with state law; or
(b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of this
subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or her employment.
(((22))) (24) "Health care service" means that service offered or
provided by health care facilities and health care providers relating
to the prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.
(((23))) (25) "Health carrier" or "carrier" means a disability
insurer regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care
service contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020, and includes "issuers" as
that term is used in the patient protection and affordable care act
(P.L. 111-148).
(((24))) (26) "Health plan" or "health benefit plan" means any
policy, contract, or agreement offered by a health carrier to provide,
arrange, reimburse, or pay for health care services except the
following:
(a) Long-term care insurance governed by chapter 48.84 or 48.83
RCW;
(b) Medicare supplemental health insurance governed by chapter
48.66 RCW;
(c) Coverage supplemental to the coverage provided under chapter
55, Title 10, United States Code;
(d) Limited health care services offered by limited health care
service contractors in accordance with RCW 48.44.035;
(e) Disability income;
(f) Coverage incidental to a property/casualty liability insurance
policy such as automobile personal injury protection coverage and
homeowner guest medical;
(g) Workers' compensation coverage;
(h) Accident only coverage;
(i) Specified disease or illness-triggered fixed payment insurance,
hospital confinement fixed payment insurance, or other fixed payment
insurance offered as an independent, noncoordinated benefit;
(j) Employer-sponsored self-funded health plans;
(k) Dental only and vision only coverage; and
(l) Plans deemed by the insurance commissioner to have a short-term
limited purpose or duration, or to be a student-only plan that is
guaranteed renewable while the covered person is enrolled as a regular
full-time undergraduate or graduate student at an accredited higher
education institution, after a written request for such classification
by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the insurance
commissioner.
(((25))) (27) "Material modification" means a change in the
actuarial value of the health plan as modified of more than five
percent but less than fifteen percent.
(((26))) (28) "Open enrollment" means a period of time as defined
in rule to be held at the same time each year, during which applicants
may enroll in a carrier's individual health benefit plan without being
subject to health screening or otherwise required to provide evidence
of insurability as a condition for enrollment.
(((27))) (29) "Preexisting condition" means any medical condition,
illness, or injury that existed any time prior to the effective date of
coverage.
(((28))) (30) "Premium" means all sums charged, received, or
deposited by a health carrier as consideration for a health plan or the
continuance of a health plan. Any assessment or any "membership,"
"policy," "contract," "service," or similar fee or charge made by a
health carrier in consideration for a health plan is deemed part of the
premium. "Premium" shall not include amounts paid as enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing.
(((29))) (31) "Review organization" means a disability insurer
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care service
contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020, and entities affiliated with,
under contract with, or acting on behalf of a health carrier to perform
a utilization review.
(((30))) (32) "Small employer" or "small group" means any person,
firm, corporation, partnership, association, political subdivision,
sole proprietor, or self-employed individual that is actively engaged
in business that employed an average of at least one but no more than
fifty employees, during the previous calendar year and employed at
least one employee on the first day of the plan year, is not formed
primarily for purposes of buying health insurance, and in which a bona
fide employer-employee relationship exists. In determining the number
of employees, companies that are affiliated companies, or that are
eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of taxation by this
state, shall be considered an employer. Subsequent to the issuance of
a health plan to a small employer and for the purpose of determining
eligibility, the size of a small employer shall be determined annually.
Except as otherwise specifically provided, a small employer shall
continue to be considered a small employer until the plan anniversary
following the date the small employer no longer meets the requirements
of this definition. A self-employed individual or sole proprietor who
is covered as a group of one must also: (a) Have been employed by the
same small employer or small group for at least twelve months prior to
application for small group coverage, and (b) verify that he or she
derived at least seventy-five percent of his or her income from a trade
or business through which the individual or sole proprietor has
attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she has filed the
appropriate internal revenue service form 1040, schedule C or F, for
the previous taxable year, except a self-employed individual or sole
proprietor in an agricultural trade or business, must have derived at
least fifty-one percent of his or her income from the trade or business
through which the individual or sole proprietor has attempted to earn
taxable income and for which he or she has filed the appropriate
internal revenue service form 1040, for the previous taxable year.
(((31))) (33) "Special enrollment" means a defined period of time
of not less than thirty-one days, triggered by a specific qualifying
event experienced by the applicant, during which applicants may enroll
in the carrier's individual health benefit plan without being subject
to health screening or otherwise required to provide evidence of
insurability as a condition for enrollment.
(((32))) (34) "Standard health questionnaire" means the standard
health questionnaire designated under chapter 48.41 RCW.
(((33))) (35) "Utilization review" means the prospective,
concurrent, or retrospective assessment of the necessity and
appropriateness of the allocation of health care resources and services
of a provider or facility, given or proposed to be given to an enrollee
or group of enrollees.
(((34))) (36) "Wellness activity" means an explicit program of an
activity consistent with department of health guidelines, such as,
smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol
misuse, appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and
motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition education
for the purpose of improving enrollee health status and reducing health
service costs.

PART II
THE WASHINGTON HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE
Sec. 2 RCW 43.71.020 and 2011 c 317 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington health benefit exchange is established and
constitutes a self-sustaining public-private partnership separate and
distinct from the state, exercising functions delineated in chapter
317, Laws of 2011. The exchange shall be known as the evergreen health
marketplace. By January 1, 2014, the exchange shall operate consistent
with the affordable care act subject to statutory authorization. The
exchange shall have a governing board consisting of persons with
expertise in the Washington health care system and private and public
health care coverage. The initial membership of the board shall be
appointed as follows:
(a) By October 1, 2011, each of the two largest caucuses in both
the house of representatives and the senate shall submit to the
governor a list of five nominees who are not legislators or employees
of the state or its political subdivisions, with no caucus submitting
the same nominee.
(i) The nominations from the largest caucus in the house of
representatives must include at least one employee benefit specialist;
(ii) The nominations from the second largest caucus in the house of
representatives must include at least one health economist or actuary;
(iii) The nominations from the largest caucus in the senate must
include at least one representative of health consumer advocates;
(iv) The nominations from the second largest caucus in the senate
must include at least one representative of small business;
(v) The remaining nominees must have demonstrated and acknowledged
expertise in at least one of the following areas: Individual health
care coverage, small employer health care coverage, health benefits
plan administration, health care finance and economics, actuarial
science, or administering a public or private health care delivery
system.
(b) By December 15, 2011, the governor shall appoint two members
from each list submitted by the caucuses under (a) of this subsection.
The appointments made under this subsection (1)(b) must include at
least one employee benefits specialist, one health economist or
actuary, one representative of small business, and one representative
of health consumer advocates. The remaining four members must have a
demonstrated and acknowledged expertise in at least one of the
following areas: Individual health care coverage, small employer
health care coverage, health benefits plan administration, health care
finance and economics, actuarial science, or administering a public or
private health care delivery system.
(c) By December 15, 2011, the governor shall appoint a ninth member
to serve as chair. The chair may not be an employee of the state or
its political subdivisions. The chair shall serve as a nonvoting
member except in the case of a tie. Beginning on December 1, 2013, the
chair shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.
(d) The following members shall serve as nonvoting, ex officio
members of the board:
(i) The insurance commissioner or his or her designee; and
(ii) The administrator of the health care authority, or his or her
designee.
(2) Initial members of the board shall serve staggered terms not to
exceed four years. Members appointed thereafter shall serve two-year
terms.
(3) A member of the board whose term has expired or who otherwise
leaves the board shall be replaced by gubernatorial appointment. When
the person leaving was nominated by one of the caucuses of the house of
representatives or the senate, his or her replacement shall be
appointed from a list of five nominees submitted by that caucus within
thirty days after the person leaves. If the member to be replaced is
the chair, the governor shall appoint a new chair within thirty days
after the vacancy occurs. A person appointed to replace a member who
leaves the board prior to the expiration of his or her term shall serve
only the duration of the unexpired term. Members of the board may be
reappointed to multiple terms.
(4)(a) No board member may be appointed if his or her participation
in the decisions of the board could benefit his or her own financial
interests or the financial interests of an entity he or she represents.
A board member who develops such a conflict of interest shall resign or
be removed from the board.
(b) A voting board member may lobby on issues related to the
exchange or the state's implementation of the affordable care act, but
only to: (i) Provide information or communicating on matters
pertaining to official board business to any elected official; or (ii)
advocate the official position or interests of the board to any elected
official. A voting board member may communicate with a member of the
legislature, on issues related to the exchange or the state's
implementation of the affordable care act, on the request of that
member or communicate to the legislature, through proper board-approved
channels, requests for legislative action or appropriations deemed
necessary for the efficient conduct of the exchange or actually made in
the proper performance of his or her duties as a voting board member.
For purposes of this subsection, "lobby" has the same meaning as in RCW
42.17A.005.
(5) Members of the board must be reimbursed for their travel
expenses while on official business in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060. The board shall prescribe rules for the conduct of its
business. Meetings of the board are at the call of the chair.
(6) The exchange and the board are subject only to the provisions
of chapter 42.30 RCW, the open public meetings act, and chapter 42.56
RCW, the public records act, and not to any other law or regulation
generally applicable to state agencies. Consistent with the open
public meetings act, the board may hold executive sessions to consider
proprietary or confidential nonpublished information.
(7)(a) The board shall establish an advisory committee to allow for
the views of the health care industry and other stakeholders to be
heard in the operation of the health benefit exchange.
(b) The board may establish technical advisory committees or seek
the advice of technical experts when necessary to execute the powers
and duties included in chapter 317, Laws of 2011.
(8) Members of the board are not civilly or criminally liable and
may not have any penalty or cause of action of any nature arise against
them for any action taken or not taken, including any discretionary
decision or failure to make a discretionary decision, when the action
or inaction is done in good faith and in the performance of the powers
and duties under chapter 317, Laws of 2011. Nothing in this section
prohibits legal actions against the board to enforce the board's
statutory or contractual duties or obligations.
(9) In recognition of the government-to-government relationship
between the state of Washington and the federally recognized tribes in
the state of Washington, the board shall consult with the American
Indian health commission.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.71.030 and 2011 c 317 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The exchange may, consistent with the purposes of this chapter:
(a) Sue and be sued in its own name; (b) make and execute agreements,
contracts, and other instruments, with any public or private person or
entity; (c) employ, contract with, or engage personnel; (d) pay
administrative costs; ((and)) (e) accept grants, donations, loans of
funds, and contributions in money, services, materials or otherwise,
from the United States or any of its agencies, from the state of
Washington and its agencies or from any other source, and use or expend
those moneys, services, materials, or other contributions; (f)
aggregate or delegate the aggregation of funds that comprise the
premium for a health plan; and (g) complete other duties necessary to
begin open enrollment in qualified health plans through the exchange
beginning October 2, 2013.
(2) ((The powers and duties of the exchange and the board are
limited to those necessary to apply for and administer grants,
establish information technology infrastructure, and undertake
additional administrative functions necessary to begin operation of the
exchange by January 1, 2014. Any actions relating to substantive
issues included in RCW 43.71.040 must be consistent with statutory
direction on those issues.)) The exchange may charge and equitably
apportion among participating carriers the administrative costs and
expenses incurred consistent with the provisions of this chapter, and
must develop the methodology to ensure the exchange is self-sustaining.
(3) The board shall establish rules or policies that permit city
and county governments, Indian tribes, tribal organizations, urban
Indian organizations, private foundations, and other entities to pay
premiums on behalf of qualified individuals.
(4) The exchange shall report its activities and status to the
governor and the legislature as requested, and no less often than
annually.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.71.060 and 2011 c 317 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The health benefit exchange account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from federal grants received
under the affordable care act shall be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for purposes consistent
with the grants. Until March 15, 2012, only the administrator of the
health care authority, or his or her designee, may authorize
expenditures from the account. ((Beginning March 15, 2012, only the
board of the Washington health benefit exchange may authorize
expenditures from the account.)) The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.
(2) This section expires January 1, 2014.

PART III
MARKET RULES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For plan or policy years beginning January 1, 2014, a carrier
must offer individual or small group health benefit plans outside the
exchange that meet the definition of silver and gold level plans in
section 1302 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended, if the carrier offers
an individual or small group plan outside the exchange that meets the
bronze level definition in section 1302 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as
amended.
(2) A health benefit plan meeting the definition of a catastrophic
plan in RCW 48.43.005(8)(c)(i) may only be sold through the exchange.
(3)(a) The commissioner shall adopt rules prohibiting a carrier
from offering outside the exchange a health benefit plan that meets the
definition of a bronze level qualified health plan under section 1302
of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended, unless the carrier offers the same
plan inside the exchange, if:
(i) The exchange is experiencing adverse selection or, based upon
current and projected health plan enrollment patterns, the exchange is
likely to experience adverse selection within the next twelve months;
or
(ii) Consumers do not have an adequate choice of health plan
options among the actuarial value tiers specified in section 1302 of
P.L. 111-148 in the exchange.
(b) Any rules adopted under this subsection (3) may not go into
effect until one full regular session of the legislature has passed
following their adoption.
(4) The commissioner shall evaluate plans offered at each actuarial
value defined in section 1302 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended, and
determine whether variation in prescription drug benefits, including
cost-sharing, both inside and outside the exchange in both the
individual and small group markets results in adverse selection. If
so, the commissioner may adopt rules to assure substantial equivalence
of prescription drug benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
All health plans, other than catastrophic health plans, offered
outside of the exchange must conform with the actuarial value tiers
specified in section 1302 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended, as
bronze, silver, gold, or platinum.

PART IV
QUALIFIED HEALTH PLANS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall certify a plan as a qualified health plan to be
offered through the exchange if the plan:
(a) Is determined by the insurance commissioner to meet the
requirements of Title 48 RCW and rules adopted by the commissioner
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW;
(b) Is determined by the board to meet the requirements of the
affordable care act for certification as a qualified health plan; and
(c) Is determined by the board to include tribal clinics and urban
Indian clinics as essential community providers in the plan's provider
network consistent with federal law. If consistent with federal law,
integrated delivery systems may be exempt from the requirement to
include all essential community providers in the provider network.
(2) Consistent with section 1311 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as
amended, the board shall allow stand-alone dental plans to offer
coverage in the exchange beginning January 1, 2014. Dental benefits
offered in the exchange must be offered and priced separately to assure
transparency for consumers.
(3) Upon request by the board, a state agency shall provide
information to the board for its use in determining if the requirements
under subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section have been met. Unless
the agency and the board agree to a later date, the agency shall
provide the information within sixty days of the request. The exchange
shall reimburse the agency for the cost of compiling and providing the
requested information within one hundred eighty days of its receipt.
(4) A decision by the board denying a request to certify or
recertify a plan as a qualified health plan may be appealed according
to procedures adopted by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.71 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall establish a rating system for qualified health
plans to assist consumers in evaluating plan choices in the exchange.
Rating factors established by the board must include, but are not
limited to:
(1) Affordability with respect to premiums, deductibles, and point-of-service cost-sharing;
(2) Enrollee satisfaction;
(3) Provider reimbursement methods that incentivize health homes or
chronic care management or care coordination for enrollees with
complex, high-cost, or multiple chronic conditions;
(4) Promotion of appropriate primary care and preventive services
utilization;
(5) High standards for provider network adequacy, including
consumer choice of providers and service locations and robust provider
participation intended to improve access to underserved populations
through participation of essential community providers, family planning
providers and pediatric providers;
(6) Protection of the privacy of patients' personal health
information;
(7) High standards for covered services, including languages spoken
or transportation assistance; and
(8) Coverage of benefits for spiritual care services that are
deductible under section 213(d) of the internal revenue code.

Sec. 9 RCW 48.42.010 and 1985 c 264 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except as
provided in this chapter, any person or other entity which provides
coverage in this state for life insurance, annuities, loss of time,
medical, surgical, chiropractic, physical therapy, speech pathology,
audiology, professional mental health, dental, hospital, or optometric
expenses, whether the coverage is by direct payment, reimbursement, the
providing of services, or otherwise, shall be subject to the authority
of the state insurance commissioner, unless the person or other entity
shows that while providing the services it is subject to the
jurisdiction and regulation of another agency of this state, any
subdivisions thereof, or the federal government.
(2) "Another agency of this state, any subdivision thereof, or the
federal government" does not include the Washington health benefit
exchange under chapter 43.71 RCW or P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended.

Sec. 10 RCW 48.42.020 and 1983 c 36 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person or entity may show that it is subject to the
jurisdiction and regulation of another agency of this state, any
subdivision thereof, or the federal government, by providing to the
insurance commissioner the appropriate certificate, license, or other
document issued by the other governmental agency which permits or
qualifies it to provide the coverage as defined in RCW 48.42.010.
(2) "Another agency of this state, any subdivision thereof, or the
federal government" does not include the Washington health benefit
exchange under chapter 43.71 RCW or P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
Certification by the Washington health benefit exchange of a plan
as a qualified health plan, or of a carrier as a qualified issuer, does
not exempt the plan or carrier from any of the requirements of this
title or rules adopted by the commissioner pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW.

PART V
ESSENTIAL HEALTH BENEFITS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Consistent with federal law, the commissioner, in consultation
with the board and the health care authority, shall, by rule, select
the largest small group plan in the state by enrollment as the
benchmark plan for purposes of establishing the essential health
benefits in Washington state under P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended.
(2) If the essential health benefits benchmark plan does not
include all of the ten benefit categories specified by section 1302 of
P.L. 111-148, as amended, the commissioner, in consultation with the
board and the health care authority, shall, by rule, supplement the
benchmark plan benefits as needed to meet the requirements of section
1302.
(3) A health plan required to offer the essential health benefits,
other than a health plan offered through the federal basic health
program or medicaid, under P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended, may not be
offered in the state unless the commissioner finds that it is
substantially equal to the benchmark plan. When making this
determination, the commissioner must ensure that the plan:
(a) Covers the ten essential health benefits categories specified
in section 1302 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended;
(b) Does not have a plan benefits design that would create a risk
of biased selection based on health status; and
(c) Contains meaningful scope and level of benefits in each of the
ten essential health benefits categories specified by section 1302 of
P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended.
(4) Beginning December 15, 2012, and every year thereafter, the
commissioner shall submit to the legislature a list of state-mandated
health benefits, the enforcement of which will result in federally
imposed costs to the state related to the plans sold through the
exchange because the benefits are not included in the essential health
benefits designated under federal law. The list must include the
anticipated costs to the state of each state-mandated health benefit on
the list. The commissioner may enforce a mandate on the list for the
entire market only if funds are appropriated in an omnibus
appropriations act specifically to pay for the identified costs.
During any period of time such funds are not appropriated, the mandate
must be suspended for the entire market and may not be enforced by the
commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Nothing in this act prohibits the offering
of benefits for spiritual care services deductible under section 213(d)
of the internal revenue code in health plans inside and outside of the
exchange.

PART VI
THE BASIC HEALTH OPTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director of the health care authority shall provide the
necessary certifications to the secretary of the federal department of
health and human services under section 1331 of P.L. 111-148 of 2010,
as amended, for the purposes of Washington state's adoption of the
federal basic health program option, unless, by September 1, 2012, the
governor finds that:
(a) Anticipated federal funding under section 1331 will be
insufficient, absent any additional funding from the state, to provide
at least the essential health benefits to eligible individuals under
section 1331 during the period of calendar years 2014 through 2019:
(i) At enrollee premium levels below the levels that would be
applicable to persons with income between one hundred thirty-four and
two hundred percent of the federal poverty level through the Washington
health benefits exchange;
(ii) Using health plan payment rates that exceed 2012 medicaid
payment rates for the same services and are sufficient to ensure access
to care for enrollees and incentivize an adequate provider network, in
conjunction with innovative payment methodologies and standard health
plan performance measures that will create incentives for the use of
effective cost containment and health care quality strategies; and
(iii) Assuming reasonable basic health program administrative costs
and the potential impact of federal basic health plan program funding
reconciliation under section 1331(d) of the affordable care act; and
(b) Sufficient funds are not available to support the design and
development work necessary for the program to begin providing health
coverage to enrollees beginning January 1, 2014.
(2) Prior to making this finding, the director shall:
(a) Actively consult with the board of the Washington health
benefit exchange, the office of the insurance commissioner, consumer
advocates, provider organizations, carriers, and other interested
organizations;
(b) Consider any available objective analysis specific to
Washington state, by an independent nationally recognized consultant
that has been actively engaged in analysis and economic modeling of the
federal basic health program option for multiple states.
(3) The director shall report any findings and supporting analysis
made under this section to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of
the legislature.
(4) If implemented, the federal basic health program must be guided
by the following principles:
(a) Meeting the minimum state certification standards in section
1331 of the federal patient protection and affordable care act;
(b) To the extent allowed by the federal department of health and
human services, twelve-month continuous eligibility for the basic
health program, and corresponding twelve-month continuous enrollment in
standard health plans by enrollees; or, in lieu of twelve-month
continuous eligibility, financing mechanisms that enable enrollees to
remain with a plan for the entire plan year;
(c) Achieving an appropriate balance between:
(i) Premiums and cost-sharing minimized to increase the
affordability of insurance coverage;
(ii) Standard health plan contracting requirements that minimize
plan and provider administrative costs, while holding standard health
plans accountable for performance and enrollee health outcomes, and
ensuring adequate enrollee notice and appeal rights; and
(iii) Health plan payment rates that exceed the 2012 medicaid
payment rates for the same services and are sufficient to ensure access
to care for enrollees and incentivize an adequate provider network, in
conjunction with innovative payment methodologies and standard health
plan performance measures that will create incentives for the use of
effective cost containment and health care quality; and
(d) Transparency in program administration, including active and
ongoing consultation with basic health program enrollees and interested
organizations.

PART VII
RISK ADJUSTMENT AND REINSURANCE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner, in consultation with the board, shall adopt
rules establishing the reinsurance and risk adjustment programs
required by P.L. 111-148 of 2010, as amended.
(2) Consistent with federal law, the rules for the reinsurance
program must, at a minimum, establish:
(a) A mechanism to collect reinsurance contribution funds;
(b) A reinsurance payment formula; and
(c) A mechanism to disburse reinsurance payments.
(3)(a) The rules for the reinsurance program may compensate
carriers offering health plans in the exchange for the possibility of
increased risk in the exchange and incentivize carrier participation in
the exchange by making any or all of the following modifications to the
reinsurance payment formula established by federal law:
(i) Establishing a lower attachment point inside the exchange than
outside the exchange;
(ii) Establishing a higher reinsurance cap inside the exchange than
outside the exchange or eliminating the reinsurance cap inside the
exchange; or
(iii) Establishing a higher coinsurance rate inside the exchange
than outside the exchange.
(b) The commissioner may adjust the rules adopted under this
subsection (3) as needed to preserve a healthy market both inside and
outside of the exchange.
(c) The rules for the reinsurance program may also include
requirements to encourage appropriate cost management measures by
carriers, such as care management or care coordination, for persons
with chronic illness or other health conditions that present a risk of
incurring high claims cost.
(4) The commissioner shall contract with one or more nonprofit
entities to administer the risk adjustment and reinsurance programs.
(5) The commissioner must identify by rule the data needed to
support operation of the reinsurance program established under this
section, the sources of the data, and other requirements related to
their collection, validation, interpretation, and retention.

PART VIII
THE WASHINGTON STATE HEALTH INSURANCE POOL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall evaluate the populations that may need ongoing
access to the pool coverage with specific attention to those persons
who may be excluded from coverage in 2014, such as persons with end-stage renal disease or HIV/AIDS, or persons not eligible for coverage
in the exchange.
(2) The board shall evaluate the eligibility requirements for the
purchase of health care coverage through the pool and submit
recommendations regarding any modifications to pool eligibility
requirements that might allow new enrollees on or after January 1,
2014. The recommendations must address any needed modifications to the
standard health questionnaire or other eligibility screening tool that
could be used in a manner consistent with federal law to determine
eligibility for enrollment in the pool.
(3) The board shall complete an analysis of the pool assessments in
relation to the assessments for the reinsurance program and recommend
changes for the assessment or any credits that may be considered for
the reinsurance program.
(4) The board shall report its recommendations to the governor and
the legislature by December 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW
to read as follows:
For policies renewed beginning January 1, 2014:
(1) Rates for pool coverage may be no more than the average
individual standard rate charged for coverage comparable to pool
coverage by the five largest members, measured in terms of individual
market enrollment, offering such coverages in the state. In the event
five members do not offer comparable coverage, rates for pool coverage
may be no more than the standard risk rate established using reasonable
actuarial techniques and must reflect anticipated experience and
expenses for such coverage in the individual market.
(2) The pool shall reduce the premium obligation of an enrollee in
the pool on or after January 1, 2014, as needed to provide the enrollee
with premium subsidies equivalent to what he or she would have received
in the exchange if the enrollee:
(a) Has a modified adjusted gross income below four hundred percent
of federal poverty level;
(b) Is not enrolled in medicare; and
(c) Does not have an offer of minimum essential coverage.
(3) Premium subsidies provided under this subsection shall be
funded through member assessments.

PART IX
EXCHANGE EMPLOYEES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Except for chapters 41.05 and 41.40 RCW, this title does not apply
to any position in or employee of the Washington health benefit
exchange established in chapter 43.71 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 43.01 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to any position in or employee of the
Washington health benefit exchange established in chapter 43.71 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 43.03 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to any position in or employee of the
Washington health benefit exchange established in chapter 43.71 RCW.

Sec. 21 RCW 41.05.011 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 54 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(2) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established
under RCW 41.05.055.
(3) "Dependent care assistance program" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may pay for certain employment
related dependent care with pretax dollars as provided in the salary
reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 129 or
other sections of the internal revenue code.
(4) "Director" means the director of the authority.
(5) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means
law enforcement officers and firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
members of the Washington state patrol retirement fund as defined in
RCW 43.43.120, and reserve officers and firefighters as defined in RCW
41.24.010 who die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of
employment as determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department
of labor and industries.
(6) "Employee" includes all employees of the state, whether or not
covered by civil service; elected and appointed officials of the
executive branch of government, including full-time members of boards,
commissions, or committees; justices of the supreme court and judges of
the court of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state
legislature. Pursuant to contractual agreement with the authority,
"employee" may also include: (a) Employees of a county, municipality,
or other political subdivision of the state and members of the
legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to
office after February 20, 1970, if the legislative authority of the
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state seeks
and receives the approval of the authority to provide any of its
insurance programs by contract with the authority, as provided in RCW
41.04.205 and 41.05.021(1)(g); (b) employees of employee organizations
representing state civil service employees, at the option of each such
employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees of
employee organizations currently pooled with employees of school
districts for the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at the
option of each such employee organization; (c) employees of a school
district if the authority agrees to provide any of the school
districts' insurance programs by contract with the authority as
provided in RCW 28A.400.350; ((and)) (d) employees of a tribal
government, if the governing body of the tribal government seeks and
receives the approval of the authority to provide any of its insurance
programs by contract with the authority, as provided in RCW
41.05.021(1) (f) and (g); and (e) employees of the Washington health
benefit exchange if the governing board of the exchange established in
RCW 43.71.020 seeks and receives approval of the authority to provide
any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority, as
provided in RCW 41.05.021(1) (g) and (n). "Employee" does not include:
Adult family homeowners; unpaid volunteers; patients of state
hospitals; inmates; employees of the Washington state convention and
trade center as provided in RCW 41.05.110; students of institutions of
higher education as determined by their institution; and any others not
expressly defined as employees under this chapter or by the authority
under this chapter.
(7) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(8) "Employing agency" means a division, department, or separate
agency of state government, including an institution of higher
education; a county, municipality, school district, educational service
district, or other political subdivision; and a tribal government
covered by this chapter.
(9) "Faculty" means an academic employee of an institution of
higher education whose workload is not defined by work hours but whose
appointment, workload, and duties directly serve the institution's
academic mission, as determined under the authority of its enabling
statutes, its governing body, and any applicable collective bargaining
agreement.
(10) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows
employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the
amount of employee contributions from among a range of choices offered
by the authority.
(11) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01
RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW,
or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.
(12) "Medical flexible spending arrangement" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may reduce their salary before taxes
to pay for medical expenses not reimbursed by insurance as provided in
the salary reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec.
125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.
(13) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility
and enrollment requirements under the salary reduction plan.
(14) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.
(15) "Premium payment plan" means a benefit plan whereby state and
public employees may pay their share of group health plan premiums with
pretax dollars as provided in the salary reduction plan under this
chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the
internal revenue code.
(16) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or
educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district on or after October 1, 1993, and
immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;
(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district due to a total and permanent disability,
and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.
(17) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.
(18) "Salary reduction plan" means a benefit plan whereby state and
public employees may agree to a reduction of salary on a pretax basis
to participate in the dependent care assistance program, medical
flexible spending arrangement, or premium payment plan offered pursuant
to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.
(19) "Seasonal employee" means an employee hired to work during a
recurring, annual season with a duration of three months or more, and
anticipated to return each season to perform similar work.
(20) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:
(a) RCW 41.32.010(17) on or after July 1, 1996; or
(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or
(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(33), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan
3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.
(21) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical
and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state
health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the
department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and
local school districts.
(22) "Tribal government" means an Indian tribal government as
defined in section 3(32) of the employee retirement income security act
of 1974, as amended, or an agency or instrumentality of the tribal
government, that has government offices principally located in this
state.

Sec. 22 RCW 41.05.021 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 56 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state health care authority is created within
the executive branch. The authority shall have a director appointed by
the governor, with the consent of the senate. The director shall serve
at the pleasure of the governor. The director may employ a deputy
director, and such assistant directors and special assistants as may be
needed to administer the authority, who shall be exempt from chapter
41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are necessary to
administer this chapter. The director may delegate any power or duty
vested in him or her by law, including authority to make final
decisions and enter final orders in hearings conducted under chapter
34.05 RCW. The primary duties of the authority shall be to:
Administer state employees' insurance benefits and retired or disabled
school employees' insurance benefits; administer the basic health plan
pursuant to chapter 70.47 RCW; administer the children's health program
pursuant to chapter 74.09 RCW; study state-purchased health care
programs in order to maximize cost containment in these programs while
ensuring access to quality health care; implement state initiatives,
joint purchasing strategies, and techniques for efficient
administration that have potential application to all state-purchased
health services; and administer grants that further the mission and
goals of the authority. The authority's duties include, but are not
limited to, the following:
(a) To administer health care benefit programs for employees and
retired or disabled school employees as specifically authorized in RCW
41.05.065 and in accordance with the methods described in RCW
41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other provisions of this chapter;
(b) To analyze state-purchased health care programs and to explore
options for cost containment and delivery alternatives for those
programs that are consistent with the purposes of those programs,
including, but not limited to:
(i) Creation of economic incentives for the persons for whom the
state purchases health care to appropriately utilize and purchase
health care services, including the development of flexible benefit
plans to offset increases in individual financial responsibility;
(ii) Utilization of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems,
utilization review, and prospective payment methods, and that ensure
access to quality care, including assuring reasonable access to local
providers, especially for employees residing in rural areas;
(iii) Coordination of state agency efforts to purchase drugs
effectively as provided in RCW 70.14.050;
(iv) Development of recommendations and methods for purchasing
medical equipment and supporting services on a volume discount basis;
(v) Development of data systems to obtain utilization data from
state-purchased health care programs in order to identify cost centers,
utilization patterns, provider and hospital practice patterns, and
procedure costs, utilizing the information obtained pursuant to RCW
41.05.031; and
(vi) In collaboration with other state agencies that administer
state purchased health care programs, private health care purchasers,
health care facilities, providers, and carriers:
(A) Use evidence-based medicine principles to develop common
performance measures and implement financial incentives in contracts
with insuring entities, health care facilities, and providers that:
(I) Reward improvements in health outcomes for individuals with
chronic diseases, increased utilization of appropriate preventive
health services, and reductions in medical errors; and
(II) Increase, through appropriate incentives to insuring entities,
health care facilities, and providers, the adoption and use of
information technology that contributes to improved health outcomes,
better coordination of care, and decreased medical errors;
(B) Through state health purchasing, reimbursement, or pilot
strategies, promote and increase the adoption of health information
technology systems, including electronic medical records, by hospitals
as defined in RCW 70.41.020(4), integrated delivery systems, and
providers that:
(I) Facilitate diagnosis or treatment;
(II) Reduce unnecessary duplication of medical tests;
(III) Promote efficient electronic physician order entry;
(IV) Increase access to health information for consumers and their
providers; and
(V) Improve health outcomes;
(C) Coordinate a strategy for the adoption of health information
technology systems using the final health information technology report
and recommendations developed under chapter 261, Laws of 2005;
(c) To analyze areas of public and private health care interaction;
(d) To provide information and technical and administrative
assistance to the board;
(e) To review and approve or deny applications from counties,
municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state to
provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to their
employees in accordance with the provisions of RCW 41.04.205 and (g) of
this subsection, setting the premium contribution for approved groups
as outlined in RCW 41.05.050;
(f) To review and approve or deny the application when the
governing body of a tribal government applies to transfer their
employees to an insurance or self-insurance program administered under
this chapter. In the event of an employee transfer pursuant to this
subsection (1)(f), members of the governing body are eligible to be
included in such a transfer if the members are authorized by the tribal
government to participate in the insurance program being transferred
from and subject to payment by the members of all costs of insurance
for the members. The authority shall: (i) Establish the conditions
for participation; (ii) have the sole right to reject the application;
and (iii) set the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined
in RCW 41.05.050. Approval of the application by the authority
transfers the employees and dependents involved to the insurance,
self-insurance, or health care program approved by the authority;
(g) To ensure the continued status of the employee insurance or
self-insurance programs administered under this chapter as a
governmental plan under section 3(32) of the employee retirement income
security act of 1974, as amended, the authority shall limit the
participation of employees of a county, municipal, school district,
educational service district, or other political subdivision, the
Washington health benefit exchange, or a tribal government, including
providing for the participation of those employees whose services are
substantially all in the performance of essential governmental
functions, but not in the performance of commercial activities;
(h) To establish billing procedures and collect funds from school
districts in a way that minimizes the administrative burden on
districts;
(i) To publish and distribute to nonparticipating school districts
and educational service districts by October 1st of each year a
description of health care benefit plans available through the
authority and the estimated cost if school districts and educational
service district employees were enrolled;
(j) To apply for, receive, and accept grants, gifts, and other
payments, including property and service, from any governmental or
other public or private entity or person, and make arrangements as to
the use of these receipts to implement initiatives and strategies
developed under this section;
(k) To issue, distribute, and administer grants that further the
mission and goals of the authority;
(l) To adopt rules consistent with this chapter as described in RCW
41.05.160 including, but not limited to:
(i) Setting forth the criteria established by the board under RCW
41.05.065 for determining whether an employee is eligible for benefits;
(ii) Establishing an appeal process in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW by which an employee may appeal an eligibility determination;
(iii) Establishing a process to assure that the eligibility
determinations of an employing agency comply with the criteria under
this chapter, including the imposition of penalties as may be
authorized by the board;
(m)(i) To administer the medical services programs established
under chapter 74.09 RCW as the designated single state agency for
purposes of Title XIX of the federal social security act;
(ii) To administer the state children's health insurance program
under chapter 74.09 RCW for purposes of Title XXI of the federal social
security act;
(iii) To enter into agreements with the department of social and
health services for administration of medical care services programs
under Titles XIX and XXI of the social security act. The agreements
shall establish the division of responsibilities between the authority
and the department with respect to mental health, chemical dependency,
and long-term care services, including services for persons with
developmental disabilities. The agreements shall be revised as
necessary, to comply with the final implementation plan adopted under
section 116, chapter 15, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.;
(iv) To adopt rules to carry out the purposes of chapter 74.09 RCW;
(v) To appoint such advisory committees or councils as may be
required by any federal statute or regulation as a condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the authority. The director may appoint
statewide committees or councils in the following subject areas: (A)
Health facilities; (B) children and youth services; (C) blind services;
(D) medical and health care; (E) drug abuse and alcoholism; (F)
rehabilitative services; and (G) such other subject matters as are or
come within the authority's responsibilities. The statewide councils
shall have representation from both major political parties and shall
have substantial consumer representation. Such committees or councils
shall be constituted as required by federal law or as the director in
his or her discretion may determine. The members of the committees or
councils shall hold office for three years except in the case of a
vacancy, in which event appointment shall be only for the remainder of
the unexpired term for which the vacancy occurs. No member shall serve
more than two consecutive terms. Members of such state advisory
committees or councils may be paid their travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended;
(n) To review and approve or deny the application from the
governing board of the Washington health benefit exchange to provide
state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to employees of
the exchange. The authority shall (i) establish the conditions for
participation; (ii) have the sole right to reject an application; and
(iii) set the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined in
RCW 41.05.050.
(2) On and after January 1, 1996, the public employees' benefits
board may implement strategies to promote managed competition among
employee health benefit plans. Strategies may include but are not
limited to:
(a) Standardizing the benefit package;
(b) Soliciting competitive bids for the benefit package;
(c) Limiting the state's contribution to a percent of the lowest
priced qualified plan within a geographical area;
(d) Monitoring the impact of the approach under this subsection
with regards to: Efficiencies in health service delivery, cost shifts
to subscribers, access to and choice of managed care plans statewide,
and quality of health services. The health care authority shall also
advise on the value of administering a benchmark employer-managed plan
to promote competition among managed care plans.

PART X
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The health care authority shall pursue an
application for the state to participate in the individual market
wellness program demonstration as described in section 2705 of P.L.
111-148 of 2010, as amended. The health care authority shall pursue
activities that will prepare the state to apply for the demonstration
project once announced by the United States department of health and
human services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Section 3 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---