BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that prostitutes
eighteen to twenty-one years of age are often survivors of childhood
sexual exploitation and that their involvement in sex work is often a
by-product of that past. Consequently, it is a logical continuation of
the legislature's efforts to protect victims of sexual exploitation to
impose increased fees on those who patronize adult prostitutes to
facilitate the provision of transitional and supportive services for
youth and young adults seeking to evade prostitution, as well as the
enhanced prosecution of patronizing a prostitute.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.88.120 and 2007 c 368 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.010,
9A.88.030, and 9A.88.090, a person who is either convicted or given a
deferred sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a
statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest
for violating RCW 9A.88.010, 9A.88.030, 9A.88.090, or comparable county
or municipal ordinances shall be assessed a fifty dollar fee.
(b) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.110, a person
who is either convicted or given a deferred sentence or a deferred
prosecution or who has entered into a statutory or nonstatutory
diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for violating RCW
9A.88.110 or a comparable county or municipal ordinance shall be
assessed a one hundred fifty dollar fee.
(c) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.070 and
9A.88.080, a person who is either convicted or given a deferred
sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a statutory
or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for
violating RCW 9A.88.070, 9A.88.080, or comparable county or municipal
ordinances shall be assessed a three hundred dollar fee.
(2) The court may not suspend payment of all or part of the fee
unless it finds that the person does not have the ability to pay.
(3) When a minor has been adjudicated a juvenile offender or has
entered into a statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement for an
offense which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a violation
under this chapter or comparable county or municipal ordinances, the
court shall assess the fee as specified under subsection (1) of this
section. The court may not suspend payment of all or part of the fee
unless it finds that the minor does not have the ability to pay the
fee.
(4) Any fee assessed under subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this
section shall be collected by the clerk of the court and distributed
each month to the state treasurer for deposit in the prostitution
prevention and intervention account under RCW 43.63A.740 for the
purpose of funding prostitution prevention and intervention activities.
(5) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.110 and fees
set forth in subsection (1)(b) of this section, a person who is either
convicted or given a deferred sentence or a deferred prosecution or who
has entered into a statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a
result of an arrest for violating RCW 9A.88.110 or a comparable county
or municipal ordinance shall be assessed an additional fee.
(a) If the offense involved an individual, other than the offender,
under the age of twenty-one, the additional fee assessed is two
thousand dollars.
(b) If the offense involved an individual, other than the offender,
aged twenty-one years or over, the additional fee assessed is one
thousand dollars.
(c) Any fee assessed under this subsection shall be collected by
the clerk of court and distributed each month according to the
following terms:
(i) Fifty percent of the fee shall be directed to local law
enforcement, in the municipality or county in which the sentencing
court resides, for the purpose of increasing prosecution of patronizing
a prostitute and on the provision of diversionary programs directed
towards persons arrested for violating RCW 9A.88.110.
(ii) Fifty percent of the fee shall be distributed each month to
the state treasurer for deposit in the prostitution prevention and
intervention account under RCW 43.63A.740 for the purpose of funding
prostitution prevention and intervention activities.
(6) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement" means an
agreement under RCW 13.40.080 or any written agreement between a person
accused of an offense listed in subsection (1) of this section and a
court, county, or city prosecutor, or designee thereof, whereby the
person agrees to fulfill certain conditions in lieu of prosecution.
(b) "Deferred sentence" means a sentence that will not be carried
out if the defendant meets certain requirements, such as complying with
the conditions of probation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In a prosecution of RCW 9A.88.110, the prosecution may file a
special allegation that the offense of patronizing a prostitute
involved an individual, other than the offender, under the age of
twenty-one.
(2) The state has the burden of proving the special allegation made
under this section beyond a reasonable doubt. If a jury is had, the
jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty, also find a special
verdict as to whether the offense of patronizing a prostitute involved
an individual, other than the offender, under the age of twenty-one.
If no jury is had, the court shall make a finding of fact as to whether
the offense of patronizing a prostitute involved an individual, other
than the offender, under the age of twenty-one.

--- END ---