BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.08.150 and 2003 c 111 s 214 are each amended to
read as follows:
The expense of registration in all ((rural)) precincts ((must be
paid by)) in a county are the obligation of the county. The expense of
registration in all precincts lying wholly within a city or town
((must)) may be agreed to be paid by the city or town. Registration
expenses for this section include both active and inactive voters.

--- END ---