BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.09.090 and 2008 c 6 s 1012 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or domestic
partnership, legal separation, declaration of invalidity, or in a
proceeding for maintenance following dissolution of the marriage or
domestic partnership by a court which lacked personal jurisdiction over
the absent spouse or absent domestic partner, the court may grant a
maintenance order for either spouse or either domestic partner. The
maintenance order shall be in such amounts and for such periods of time
as the court deems just, without regard to misconduct except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, after considering all
relevant factors including but not limited to:
(a) The financial resources of the party seeking maintenance,
including separate or community property apportioned to him or her, and
his or her ability to meet his or her needs independently, including
the extent to which a provision for support of a child living with the
party includes a sum for that party;
(b) The time necessary to acquire sufficient education or training
to enable the party seeking maintenance to find employment appropriate
to his or her skill, interests, style of life, and other attendant
circumstances;
(c) The standard of living established during the marriage or
domestic partnership;
(d) The duration of the marriage or domestic partnership;
(e) The age, physical and emotional condition, and financial
obligations of the spouse or domestic partner seeking maintenance; and
(f) The ability of the spouse or domestic partner from whom
maintenance is sought to meet his or her needs and financial
obligations while meeting those of the spouse or domestic partner
seeking maintenance.
(2) When determining whether and to what extent maintenance is
just, the court shall also consider any documented evidence of any
history of domestic violence, as defined in RCW 26.50.010, between the
parties, including whether the party seeking maintenance committed acts
of domestic violence against the party from whom maintenance is sought.

--- END ---