BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.10.420 and 2009 c 75 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following public bodies are authorized to use the job order
contracting procedure:
(a) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services;
(b) The ((University of Washington)) state universities, regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College;
(c) ((Washington State University)) Sound transit (central Puget
Sound regional transit authority);
(d) Every city with a population greater than seventy thousand and
any public authority chartered by such city under RCW 35.21.730 through
35.21.755;
(e) Every county with a population greater than four hundred fifty
thousand;
(f) Every port district with total revenues greater than fifteen
million dollars per year;
(g) Every public utility district with revenues from energy sales
greater than twenty-three million dollars per year;
(h) Every school district; and
(i) The state ferry system.
(2)(a) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services may issue job order contract work orders for Washington state
parks department projects.
(b) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services, the University of Washington, and Washington State University
may issue job order contract work orders for the state regional
universities and The Evergreen State College.
(3) Public bodies may use a job order contract for public works
projects when a determination is made that the use of job order
contracts will benefit the public by providing an effective means of
reducing the total lead-time and cost for the construction of public
works projects for repair and renovation required at public facilities
through the use of unit price books and work orders by eliminating
time-consuming, costly aspects of the traditional public works process,
which require separate contracting actions for each small project.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.10.450 and 2007 c 494 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The maximum dollar amount for a work order is three hundred
fifty thousand dollars. ((For each job order contract, public bodies
shall not issue more than two work orders equal to or greater than
three hundred thousand dollars in a twelve-month contract period.))
(2) All work orders issued for the same project shall be treated as
a single work order for purposes of the dollar limit on work orders.
(3) No more than twenty percent of the dollar value of a work order
may consist of items of work not contained in the unit price book.
(4) Any new permanent, enclosed building space constructed under a
work order shall not exceed two thousand gross square feet.
(5) A public body may issue no work orders under a job order
contract until it has approved, in consultation with the office of
minority and women's business enterprises or the equivalent local
agency, a plan prepared by the job order contractor that equitably
spreads certified women and minority business enterprise subcontracting
opportunities, to the extent permitted by the Washington state civil
rights act, RCW 49.60.400, among the various subcontract disciplines.
(6) For purposes of chapters 39.08, 39.12, 39.76, and 60.28 RCW,
each work order issued shall be treated as a separate contract. The
alternate filing provisions of RCW 39.12.040(2) apply to each work
order that otherwise meets the eligibility requirements of RCW
39.12.040(2).
(7) The job order contract shall not be used for the procurement of
architectural or engineering services not associated with specific work
orders. Architectural and engineering services shall be procured in
accordance with RCW 39.80.040.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.10.460 and 2007 c 494 s 405 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each year, a public body shall provide to the board the following
information for each job order contract ((at the end of each contract
year)) for the period July 1st through June 30th:
(1) A list of work orders issued;
(2) The cost of each work order;
(3) A list of subcontractors hired under each work order;
(4) If requested by the board, a copy of the intent to pay
prevailing wage and the affidavit of wages paid for each work order
subcontract; and
(5) Any other information requested by the board.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.131.408 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2014:
(1) RCW 39.10.200 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 2, 2007 c 494 s 1, &
1994 c 132 s 1;
(2) RCW 39.10.210 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6014, 2007 c 494 s 101,
& 2005 c 469 s 3;
(3) RCW 39.10.220 and 2007 c 494 s 102 & 2005 c 377 s 1;
(4) RCW 39.10.230 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 3, 2009 c 75 s 1, 2007
c 494 s 103, & 2005 c 377 s 2;
(5) RCW 39.10.240 and 2007 c 494 s 104;
(6) RCW 39.10.250 and 2009 c 75 s 2 & 2007 c 494 s 105;
(7) RCW 39.10.260 and 2007 c 494 s 106;
(8) RCW 39.10.270 and 2009 c 75 s 3 & 2007 c 494 s 107;
(9) RCW 39.10.280 and 2007 c 494 s 108;
(10) RCW 39.10.290 and 2007 c 494 s 109;
(11) RCW 39.10.300 and 2009 c 75 s 4 & 2007 c 494 s 201((, 2003 c
352 s 2, 2003 c 300 s 4, 2002 c 46 s 1, & 2001 c 328 s 2));
(12) RCW 39.10.320 and 2007 c 494 s 203 & 1994 c 132 s 7;
(13) RCW 39.10.330 and 2009 c 75 s 5 & 2007 c 494 s 204;
(14) RCW 39.10.340 and 2007 c 494 s 301((, 2003 c 352 s 3, 2003 c
300 s 5, 2002 c 46 s 2, & 2001 c 328 s 3));
(15) RCW 39.10.350 and 2007 c 494 s 302;
(16) RCW 39.10.360 and 2009 c 75 s 6 & 2007 c 494 s 303;
(17) RCW 39.10.370 and 2007 c 494 s 304;
(18) RCW 39.10.380 and 2007 c 494 s 305;
(19) RCW 39.10.385 and 2010 c 163 s 1;
(20) RCW 39.10.390 and 2007 c 494 s 306;
(((20))) (21) RCW 39.10.400 and 2007 c 494 s 307;
(((21))) (22) RCW 39.10.410 and 2007 c 494 s 308;
(((22))) (23) RCW 39.10.420 and 2012 c ... s 1 (section 1 of this
act), 2009 c 75 s 7, 2007 c 494 s 401, & 2003 c 301 s 1;
(((23))) (24) RCW 39.10.430 and 2007 c 494 s 402;
(((24))) (25) RCW 39.10.440 and 2007 c 494 s 403;
(((25))) (26) RCW 39.10.450 and 2012 c ... s 2 (section 2 of this
act) & 2007 c 494 s 404;
(((26))) (27) RCW 39.10.460 and 2012 c ... s 3 (section 3 of this
act) & 2007 c 494 s 405;
(((27))) (28) RCW 39.10.470 and 2005 c 274 s 275 & 1994 c 132 s 10;
(((28))) (29) RCW 39.10.480 and 1994 c 132 s 9;
(((29))) (30) RCW 39.10.490 and 2007 c 494 s 501 & 2001 c 328 s 5;
(((30))) (31) RCW 39.10.500 and 2007 c 494 s 502;
(((31))) (32) RCW 39.10.510 and 2007 c 494 s 503;
(((32))) (33) RCW 39.10.900 and 1994 c 132 s 13;
(((33))) (34) RCW 39.10.901 and 1994 c 132 s 14; ((and
(34))) (35) RCW 39.10.903 and 2007 c 494 s 510((.));
(36) RCW 39.10.904 and 2007 c 494 s 512; and
(37) RCW 39.10.905 and 2007 c 494 s 513.

--- END ---