BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.05 RCW
to read as follows:
A local board of health may adopt and manage an on-site sewage
program management plan required pursuant to RCW 70.118A.030 or
otherwise required by the state board of health, and impose and collect
rates or charges necessary to implement the plan. A local board of
health may contract with the county treasurer to collect the rates or
charges imposed under this section in accordance with RCW 84.56.035.

--- END ---