BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.165.025 and 2009 c 556 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A participating school district shall submit the district's
plan for using learning assistance funds to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for approval, to the extent
required under subsection (2) of this section. The program plan must
identify the program activities to be implemented from RCW 28A.165.035
and implement all of the elements in (a) through (h) of this
subsection. The school district plan shall include the following:
(a) District and school-level data on reading((, writing,)) and
mathematics achievement as reported pursuant to chapter 28A.655 RCW and
relevant federal law;
(b) Processes used for identifying the underachieving students to
be served by the program, including the identification of school or
program sites providing program activities;
(c) How accelerated learning plans are developed and implemented
for participating students. Accelerated learning plans may be
developed as part of existing student achievement plan process such as
student plans for achieving state high school graduation standards,
individual student academic plans, or the achievement plans for groups
of students. Accelerated learning plans shall include:
(i) Achievement goals for the students;
(ii) Roles of the student, parents, or guardians and teachers in
the plan;
(iii) Communication procedures regarding student accomplishment;
and
(iv) Plan reviews and adjustments processes;
(d) How state level and classroom assessments are used to inform
instruction;
(e) How focused and intentional instructional strategies have been
identified and implemented;
(f) How highly qualified instructional staff are developed and
supported in the program and in participating schools;
(g) How other federal, state, district, and school resources are
coordinated with school improvement plans and the district's strategic
plan to support underachieving students; and
(h) How a program evaluation will be conducted to determine
direction for the following school year.
(2) If a school district has received approval of its plan once, it
is not required to submit a plan for approval under RCW 28A.165.045 or
this section unless the district has made a significant change to the
plan. If a district has made a significant change to only a portion of
the plan the district need only submit a description of the changes
made and not the entire plan. Plans or descriptions of changes to the
plan must be submitted by July 1st as required under this section. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish
guidelines for what a "significant change" is.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.305.130 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 6 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
The purpose of the state board of education is to provide advocacy
and strategic oversight of public education; implement a standards-based accountability framework that creates a unified system of
increasing levels of support for schools in order to improve student
academic achievement; provide leadership in the creation of a system
that personalizes education for each student and respects diverse
cultures, abilities, and learning styles; and promote achievement of
the goals of RCW 28A.150.210. In addition to any other powers and
duties as provided by law, the state board of education shall:
(1) Hold regularly scheduled meetings at such time and place within
the state as the board shall determine and may hold such special
meetings as may be deemed necessary for the transaction of public
business;
(2) Form committees as necessary to effectively and efficiently
conduct the work of the board;
(3) Seek advice from the public and interested parties regarding
the work of the board;
(4) For purposes of statewide accountability:
(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading,
((writing,)) science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once
assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and
technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical
education programs; and student attendance, as the board deems
appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent
with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and
shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the
federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the
requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998,
each as amended. The goals may be established for all students,
economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient
students, students with disabilities, and students from
disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic
backgrounds. The board may establish school and school district goals
addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for
students in grades seven through twelve. The board shall adopt the
goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the board
shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment
in a time frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory
action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the
legislature;
(b) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the
standard on the statewide student assessment and, for high school
students, to obtain a certificate of academic achievement. The board
shall also determine student scores that identify levels of student
performance below and beyond the standard. The board shall consider
the incorporation of the standard error of measurement into the
decision regarding the award of the certificates. The board shall set
such performance standards and levels in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and after consideration of any
recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that
may be established for this purpose. The legislature shall be advised
of the initial performance standards for the high school statewide
student assessment. Any changes recommended by the board in the
performance standards for the high school assessment shall be presented
to the education committees of the house of representatives and the
senate by November 30th of the school year in which the changes will
take place to permit the legislature to take statutory action before
the changes are implemented if such action is deemed warranted by the
legislature. The legislature shall be advised of the initial
performance standards and any changes made to the elementary level
performance standards and the middle school level performance
standards. The board must provide an explanation of and rationale for
all initial performance standards and any changes, for all grade levels
of the statewide student assessment. If the board changes the
performance standards for any grade level or subject, the
superintendent of public instruction must recalculate the results from
the previous ten years of administering that assessment regarding
students below, meeting, and beyond the state standard, to the extent
that this data is available, and post a comparison of the original and
recalculated results on the superintendent's web site;
(c) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure
fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially
with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique
populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of
public instruction of any improvements needed to the system; and
(d) Include in the biennial report required under RCW 28A.305.035,
information on the progress that has been made in achieving goals
adopted by the board;
(5) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and
procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all
private schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to
the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a
program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve.
However, no private school may be approved that operates a kindergarten
program only and no private school shall be placed upon the list of
accredited schools so long as secret societies are knowingly allowed to
exist among its students by school officials;
(6) Articulate with the institutions of higher education, workforce
representatives, and early learning policymakers and providers to
coordinate and unify the work of the public school system;
(7) Hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to
reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
administrative purposes. Any other personnel of the board shall be
appointed as provided by RCW 28A.300.020. The board may delegate to
the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to
efficiently carry on the business of the board including, but not
limited to, the authority to employ necessary personnel and the
authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of
the board. The executive director, administrative assistant, and all
but one of the other personnel of the board are exempt from civil
service, together with other staff as now or hereafter designated as
exempt in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW; and
(8) Adopt a seal that shall be kept in the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 22 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the statewide student assessment, opportunities for a
student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which the
student was not successful, and, if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for
each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the statewide student
assessment for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045 or 28A.655.0611, acquisition of the certificate is required
for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading((, writing,)) and mathematics
content areas of the high school statewide student assessment shall
earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a student does not
successfully meet the state standards in one or more content areas
required for the certificate of academic achievement, then the student
may retake the assessment in the content area up to four times at no
cost to the student. If the student successfully meets the state
standards on a retake of the assessment then the student shall earn a
certificate of academic achievement. Once objective alternative
assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection (10) of this section,
a student may use the objective alternative assessments to demonstrate
that the student successfully meets the state standards for that
content area if the student has taken the statewide student assessment
at least once. If the student successfully meets the state standards
on the objective alternative assessments then the student shall earn a
certificate of academic achievement.
(4) Beginning with the graduating class of 2015, a student must
meet the state standards in science in addition to the other content
areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the statewide
student assessment or the objective alternative assessments in order to
earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) School districts must make available to students the following
options:
(a) To retake the statewide student assessment up to four times in
the content areas in which the student did not meet the state standards
if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the statewide student assessment up to four times in
the content areas in which the student did not meet the state standards
if the student is enrolled in a high school completion program at a
community or technical college. The superintendent of public
instruction and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall jointly identify means by which students in these programs can be
assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year
shall be available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process for students' scores,
for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic
standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable
in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate
on the statewide student assessment and be objective in its
determination of student achievement of the state standards. Before
any objective alternative assessments in addition to those authorized
in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a student to
demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in a content
area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall formally
approve the use of any objective alternative assessments through the
omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution.
(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics((,)) or reading or
English((, or writing)) portion of the SAT or the ACT may be used as an
objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating
that a student has met or exceeded the state standards for the
certificate of academic achievement. The state board of education
shall identify the scores students must achieve on the relevant portion
of the SAT or ACT to meet or exceed the state standard in the relevant
content area on the statewide student assessment. A student's score on
the science portion of the ACT or the science subject area tests of the
SAT may be used as an objective alternative assessment under this
section as soon as the state board of education determines that
sufficient data is available to identify reliable equivalent scores for
the science content area of the statewide student assessment. After
the first scores are established, the state board may increase but not
decrease the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state
standards.
(ii) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale of
one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an
objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating
that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate
of academic achievement. ((A score of three on the AP examinations in
calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the
mathematics portion of the statewide student assessment.)) A score of
three on the AP examinations in English language and composition may be
used as an alternative assessment for the writing portion of the
statewide student assessment. A score of three on the AP examinations
in English literature and composition, macroeconomics, microeconomics,
psychology, United States history, world history, United States
government and politics, or comparative government and politics may be
used as an alternative assessment for the reading portion of the
statewide student assessment. A score of three on the AP examination
in biology, physics, chemistry, or environmental science may be used as
an alternative assessment for the science portion of the statewide
student assessment.
(11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(12) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for and notify students and their parents or legal guardians as
provided in this subsection. Student learning plans are required for
eighth grade students who were not successful on any or all of the
content areas of the state assessment during the previous school year
or who may not be on track to graduate due to credit deficiencies or
absences. The parent or legal guardian shall be notified about the
information in the student learning plan, preferably through a parent
conference and at least annually. To the extent feasible, schools
serving English language learner students and their parents shall
translate the plan into the primary language of the family. The plan
shall include the following information as applicable:
(a) The student's results on the state assessment;
(b) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the
score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;
(c) Any credit deficiencies;
(d) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;
(e) The student's progress toward meeting state and local
graduation requirements;
(f) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken
by the student to meet state academic standards and stay on track for
graduation;
(g) Remediation strategies and alternative education options
available to students, including informing students of the option to
continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until
the age of twenty-one;
(h) The alternative assessment options available to students under
this section and RCW 28A.655.065;
(i) School district programs, high school courses, and career and
technical education options available for students to meet graduation
requirements; and
(j) Available programs offered through skill centers or community
and technical colleges, including the college high school diploma
options under RCW 28B.50.535.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.655.185 and 2005 c 495 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature, through the creation of
the apple award, to honor and reward students in Washington's public
elementary schools who have shown significant improvement in their
school's results on the ((Washington)) statewide student assessment
((of student learning)).
(2) The apple award program is created to honor and reward public
elementary schools that have the greatest combined average increase in
the percentage of students meeting the fourth grade reading((,)) and
mathematics((, and writing)) standards on the ((Washington)) statewide
student assessment ((of student learning)) each school year. The
program shall be administered by the state board of education.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated for this purpose, each school
that receives an apple award shall be provided with a twenty-five
thousand dollar grant to be used for capital construction purposes that
have been selected by students in the school and approved by the
district's school directors. The funds may be used exclusively for
capital construction projects on school property or on other public
property in the community, city, or county in which the school is
located.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.655.200 and 2009 c 539 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature intends to permit school districts to offer
norm-referenced assessments, make diagnostic tools available to school
districts, and provide funding for diagnostic assessments to enhance
student learning at all grade levels and provide early intervention
before the high school ((Washington)) statewide student assessment ((of
student learning)).
(2) In addition to the diagnostic assessments provided under this
section, school districts may, at their own expense, administer norm-referenced assessments to students.
(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
post on its web site for voluntary use by school districts, a guide of
diagnostic assessments. The assessments in the guide, to the extent
possible, shall include the characteristics listed in subsection (4) of
this section.
(4) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
purpose, beginning September 1, 2007, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall make diagnostic assessments in reading,
((writing,)) mathematics, and science in elementary, middle, and high
school grades available to school districts. Subject to funds
appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall also provide funding to school districts for
administration of diagnostic assessments to help improve student
learning, identify academic weaknesses, enhance student planning and
guidance, and develop targeted instructional strategies to assist
students before the high school ((Washington)) statewide student
assessment ((of student learning)). To the greatest extent possible,
the assessments shall be:
(a) Aligned to the state's grade level expectations;
(b) Individualized to each student's performance level;
(c) Administered efficiently to provide results either immediately
or within two weeks;
(d) Capable of measuring individual student growth over time and
allowing student progress to be compared to other students across the
country;
(e) Readily available to parents; and
(f) Cost-effective.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
offer training at statewide and regional staff development activities
in:
(a) The interpretation of diagnostic assessments; and
(b) Application of instructional strategies that will increase
student learning based on diagnostic assessment data.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.655.070 and 2008 c 163 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
essential academic learning requirements that identify the knowledge
and skills all public school students need to know and be able to do
based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, develop student
assessments, and implement the accountability recommendations and
requests regarding assistance, rewards, and recognition of the state
board of education.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Periodically revise the essential academic learning
requirements, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the
maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four
and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the essential
academic learning requirements; and
(b) Review and prioritize the essential academic learning
requirements and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the
grade level content expectations to be assessed on the ((Washington))
statewide student assessment ((of student learning)) and used for state
or federal accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and
identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an
emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content
expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content
expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of
expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing
depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and
reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven
working days, shall post on its web site any grade level content
expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing
the ((Washington)) statewide student assessment ((of student
learning)).
(3)(a) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to
develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the
content areas of reading, ((writing,)) mathematics, and science for use
in the elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine
if each student has mastered the essential academic learning
requirements identified in subsection (1) of this section. School
districts shall administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by
the superintendent of public instruction. The academic assessment
system may include a variety of assessment methods, including
criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.
(b) Effective with the 2009 administration of the ((Washington))
statewide student assessment ((of student learning)), the
superintendent shall redesign the assessment in the content areas of
reading, mathematics, and science in all grades except high school by
shortening test administration and reducing the number of short answer
and extended response questions.
(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the
essential academic learning requirements or the statewide assessments,
then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential
academic learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.
(5) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results
under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate
instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational
support for students who have not mastered the essential academic
learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.
(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics
shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to
determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content
areas from one school year to the next.
(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide
educational support to individual students, the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance
information as possible within the constraints of the assessment
system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school
districts:
(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may
provide additional achievement information for individual students; and
(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to
evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall
be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and
easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily
shared with parents and students.
(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(11) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of special education students when developing the
assessments under this section.
(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(13) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site
lists of resources and model assessments in writing, social studies,
the arts, and health and fitness.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.655.065 and 2009 c 556 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature has made a commitment to rigorous academic
standards for receipt of a high school diploma. The primary way that
students will demonstrate that they meet the standards in reading,
((writing,)) mathematics, and science is through the ((Washington))
statewide student assessment ((of student learning)). Only objective
assessments that are comparable in rigor to the state assessment are
authorized as an alternative assessment. Before seeking an alternative
assessment, the legislature expects students to make a genuine effort
to meet state standards, through regular and consistent attendance at
school and participation in extended learning and other assistance
programs.
(2) Under RCW 28A.655.061, beginning in the 2006-07 school year,
the superintendent of public instruction shall implement objective
alternative assessment methods as provided in this section for students
to demonstrate achievement of the state standards in content areas in
which the student has not yet met the standard on the high school
((Washington)) statewide student assessment ((of student learning)).
A student may access an alternative if the student meets applicable
eligibility criteria in RCW 28A.655.061 and this section and other
eligibility criteria established by the superintendent of public
instruction, including but not limited to attendance criteria and
participation in the remediation or supplemental instruction contained
in the student learning plan developed under RCW 28A.655.061. A school
district may waive attendance and/or remediation criteria for special,
unavoidable circumstances.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "applicant" means a student
seeking to use one of the alternative assessment methods in this
section.
(4) One alternative assessment method shall be a combination of the
applicant's grades in applicable courses and the applicant's highest
score on the high school ((Washington)) statewide student assessment
((of student learning)), as provided in this subsection. A student is
eligible to apply for the alternative assessment method under this
subsection (4) if the student has a cumulative grade point average of
at least 3.2 on a four point grading scale. The superintendent of
public instruction shall determine which high school courses are
applicable to the alternative assessment method and shall issue
guidelines to school districts.
(a) Using guidelines prepared by the superintendent of public
instruction, a school district shall identify the group of students in
the same school as the applicant who took the same high school courses
as the applicant in the applicable content area. From the group of
students identified in this manner, the district shall select the
comparison cohort that shall be those students who met or slightly
exceeded the state standard on the ((Washington)) statewide student
assessment ((of student learning)).
(b) The district shall compare the applicant's grades in high
school courses in the applicable content area to the grades of students
in the comparison cohort for the same high school courses. If the
applicant's grades are equal to or above the mean grades of the
comparison cohort, the applicant shall be deemed to have met the state
standard on the alternative assessment.
(c) An applicant may not use the alternative assessment under this
subsection (4) if there are fewer than six students in the comparison
cohort.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop an
alternative assessment method that shall be an evaluation of a
collection of work samples prepared and submitted by the applicant.
Effective September 1, 2009, collection of work samples may be
submitted only in content areas where meeting the state standard on the
high school assessment is required for purposes of graduation.
(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
guidelines for the types and number of work samples in each content
area that may be submitted as a collection of evidence that the
applicant has met the state standard in that content area. Work
samples may be collected from academic, career and technical, or
remedial courses and may include performance tasks as well as written
products. The superintendent shall submit the guidelines for approval
by the state board of education.
(b) The superintendent shall develop protocols for submission of
the collection of work samples that include affidavits from the
applicant's teachers and school district that the samples are the work
of the applicant and a requirement that a portion of the samples be
prepared under the direct supervision of a classroom teacher. The
superintendent shall submit the protocols for approval by the state
board of education.
(c) The superintendent shall develop uniform scoring criteria for
evaluating the collection of work samples and submit the scoring
criteria for approval by the state board of education. Collections
shall be scored at the state level or regionally by a panel of
educators selected and trained by the superintendent to ensure
objectivity, reliability, and rigor in the evaluation. An educator may
not score work samples submitted by applicants from the educator's
school district. If the panel awards an applicant's collection of work
samples the minimum required score, the applicant shall be deemed to
have met the state standard on the alternative assessment.
(d) Using an open and public process that includes consultation
with district superintendents, school principals, and other educators,
the state board of education shall consider the guidelines, protocols,
scoring criteria, and other information regarding the collection of
work samples submitted by the superintendent of public instruction.
The collection of work samples may be implemented as an alternative
assessment after the state board of education has approved the
guidelines, protocols, and scoring criteria and determined that the
collection of work samples: (i) Will meet professionally accepted
standards for a valid and reliable measure of the grade level
expectations and the essential academic learning requirements; and (ii)
is comparable to or exceeds the rigor of the skills and knowledge that
a student must demonstrate on the ((Washington)) statewide student
assessment ((of student learning)) in the applicable content area. The
state board shall make an approval decision and determination no later
than December 1, 2006, and thereafter may increase the required rigor
of the collection of work samples.
(e) By September of 2006, the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop informational materials for parents, teachers, and
students regarding the collection of work samples and the status of its
development as an alternative assessment method. The materials shall
provide specific guidance regarding the type and number of work samples
likely to be required, include examples of work that meets the state
learning standards, and describe the scoring criteria and process for
the collection. The materials shall also encourage students in the
graduating class of 2008 to begin creating a collection if they believe
they may seek to use the collection once it is implemented as an
alternative assessment.
(6)(a) For students enrolled in a career and technical education
program approved under RCW 28A.700.030, the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop additional guidelines for collections of work
samples that are tailored to different career and technical programs.
The additional guidelines shall:
(i) Provide multiple examples of work samples that are related to
the particular career and technical program;
(ii) Permit work samples based on completed activities or projects
where demonstration of academic knowledge is inferred; and
(iii) Provide multiple examples of work samples drawn from career
and technical courses.
(b) The purpose of the additional guidelines is to provide a clear
pathway toward a certificate of academic achievement for career and
technical students by showing them applied and relevant opportunities
to demonstrate their knowledge and skills, and to provide guidance to
teachers in integrating academic and career and technical instruction
and assessment and assisting career and technical students in compiling
a collection. The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
and disseminate additional guidelines for no fewer than ten career and
technical education programs representing a variety of program
offerings by no later than September 1, 2008. Guidelines for ten
additional programs shall be developed and disseminated no later than
June 1, 2009.
(c) The superintendent shall consult with community and technical
colleges, employers, the workforce training and education coordinating
board, apprenticeship programs, and other regional and national experts
in career and technical education to create appropriate guidelines and
examples of work samples and other evidence of a career and technical
student's knowledge and skills on the state academic standards.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall study the
feasibility of using existing mathematics assessments in languages
other than English as an additional alternative assessment option. The
study shall include an estimation of the cost of translating the tenth
grade mathematics assessment into other languages and scoring the
assessments should they be implemented.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction shall implement:
(a) By June 1, 2006, a process for students to appeal the score
they received on the high school assessments; and
(b) By January 1, 2007, guidelines and appeal processes for waiving
specific requirements in RCW 28A.655.061 pertaining to the certificate
of academic achievement and to the certificate of individual
achievement for students who: (i) Transfer to a Washington public
school in their junior or senior year with the intent of obtaining a
public high school diploma, or (ii) have special, unavoidable
circumstances.
(9) The state board of education shall examine opportunities for
additional alternative assessments, including the possible use of one
or more standardized norm-referenced student achievement tests and the
possible use of the reading((, writing,)) or mathematics portions of
the ACT ASSET and ACT COMPASS test instruments as objective alternative
assessments for demonstrating that a student has met the state
standards for the certificate of academic achievement. The state board
shall submit its findings and recommendations to the education
committees of the legislature by January 10, 2008.
(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
implement this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.230.095 and 2011 c 185 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By the end of the ((2008-09)) 2015-16 school year, school
districts shall have in place in elementary schools, middle schools,
and high schools assessments or other strategies chosen by the district
to assure that students have an opportunity to learn the essential
academic learning requirements in writing, social studies, the arts,
and health and fitness. Social studies includes history, geography,
civics, economics, and social studies skills. Health and fitness
includes, but is not limited to, mental health and suicide prevention
education. Beginning with the ((2008-09)) 2015-16 school year, school
districts shall annually submit an implementation verification report
to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office
of the superintendent of public instruction may not require school
districts to use a classroom-based assessment in writing, social
studies, the arts, and health and fitness to meet the requirements of
this section and shall clearly communicate to districts their option to
use other strategies chosen by the district.
(2) Beginning with the ((2008-09)) 2015-16 school year, school
districts shall require students in the seventh or eighth grade, and
the eleventh or twelfth grade to each complete at least one classroom-based assessment in civics. Beginning with the ((2010-11)) 2015-16
school year, school districts shall require students in the fourth or
fifth grade to complete at least one classroom-based assessment in
civics. The civics assessment may be selected from a list of
classroom-based assessments approved by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. Beginning with the ((2008-09))
2015-16 school year, school districts shall annually submit
implementation verification reports to the office of the superintendent
of public instruction documenting the use of the classroom-based
assessments in civics.
(3) Verification reports shall require school districts to report
only the information necessary to comply with this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2011 c 203 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except as
provided in RCW 28A.230.122 and except those equivalencies established
by local high schools or school districts under RCW 28A.230.097. The
purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a student is ready
for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and
citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) The state board may not adopt a requirement for completion of
a culminating project. The state board may adopt a requirement for
completion of a high school and beyond plan, but must allow students to
substitute enrollment in the following courses or programs for
completion of the plan: The running start program, the advancement via
individual determination program, the international baccalaureate
program, AP courses, or preparatory career and technical education
courses. Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board
of education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements
for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and
technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to
a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized.
The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in
these programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of
academic achievement, complete the program and earn the program's
certificate or credential, and complete other state and local
graduation requirements.
(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high
school graduation requirements to the education committees of the
legislature for review and to the quality education council established
under RCW 28A.290.010. The legislature shall have the opportunity to
act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted
through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a
fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the
legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted
legislation.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.09.260 and 2009 c 564 s 927 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The examination of the financial affairs of all local
governments shall be made at such reasonable, periodic intervals as the
state auditor shall determine. However, an examination of the
financial affairs of all local governments shall be made at least once
in every three years, and an examination of individual local government
health and welfare benefit plans and local government self-insurance
programs shall be made at least once every two years.
(2) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the state auditor shall
conduct audits no more often than once every two years of local
governments with annual general fund revenues of ten million dollars or
less and no findings of impropriety for the three-year period
immediately preceding the audit period. This subsection does not
prohibit the state auditor from conducting audits: (a) To address
suspected fraud or irregular conduct; (b) at the request of the local
government governing body; or (c) as required by federal laws or
regulations.
(3) After the effective date of this section, the state auditor
shall conduct audits no more often than once every three years of
school districts that have no findings of impropriety for the three-year period immediately preceding the audit period, including financial
audits and accountability audits. This subsection does not prohibit
the state auditor from conducting audits: (a) To address suspected
fraud or irregular conduct; (b) at the request of the district board of
directors; or (c) as required by federal laws or regulations or as a
condition of receipt of federal funds.
(4) The term local governments for purposes of this chapter
includes but is not limited to all counties, cities, and other
political subdivisions, municipal corporations, and quasi-municipal
corporations, however denominated.
(((4))) (5) The state auditor shall establish a schedule to govern
the auditing of local governments which shall include: A designation
of the various classifications of local governments; a designation of
the frequency for auditing each type of local government; and a
description of events which cause a more frequent audit to be
conducted.
(((5))) (6) On every such examination, inquiry shall be made as to
the financial condition and resources of the local government; whether
the Constitution and laws of the state, the ordinances and orders of
the local government, and the requirements of the state auditor have
been properly complied with; and into the methods and accuracy of the
accounts and reports.
(((6))) (7) A report of such examination shall be made and filed in
the office of state auditor, and one copy shall be transmitted to the
local government. A copy of any report containing findings of
noncompliance with state law shall be transmitted to the attorney
general. If any such report discloses malfeasance, misfeasance, or
nonfeasance in office on the part of any public officer or employee,
within thirty days from the receipt of his or her copy of the report,
the attorney general shall institute, in the proper county, such legal
action as is proper in the premises by civil process and prosecute the
same to final determination to carry into effect the findings of the
examination.
(((7))) (8) It shall be unlawful for any local government or the
responsible head thereof, to make a settlement or compromise of any
claim arising out of such malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance, or
any action commenced therefor, or for any court to enter upon any
compromise or settlement of such action, without the written approval
and consent of the attorney general and the state auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 8 of this act takes effect July 1,
2012.

--- END ---