BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds the state's recent
adoption of common core K-12 standards provides an opportunity to
develop high-quality, openly licensed K-12 courseware that is aligned
with these standards. By developing this library of openly licensed
courseware and making it available to school districts free of charge,
the state and school districts will be able to provide students with
curricula and texts while substantially reducing the expenses that
districts would otherwise incur in purchasing these materials. In
addition, this library of openly licensed courseware will provide
districts and students with a broader selection of materials, and
materials that are more up-to-date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the superintendent of public instruction shall take
the lead in developing openly licensed courseware aligned with the
common core state standards and placed under an attribution license,
registered by a nonprofit organization with domain expertise in open
courseware, that allows others to use, distribute, and create
derivative works based upon the digital material, while still allowing
the authors or creators to retain the copyright and to receive credit
for their efforts.
(b) During the course of development, the superintendent:
(i) May contract with third parties for all or part of the
development;
(ii) May adopt or adapt existing high quality openly licensed K-12
courseware aligned with the common core state standards;
(iii) Must use best efforts to seek additional outside funding by
actively partnering with private organizations;
(iv) Must work collaboratively with other states that have adopted
the common core state standards and collectively share results; and
(v) Must include input from classroom practitioners, including
librarians, in the results reported under subsection (2)(d) of this
section.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction must also:
(a) Advertise to school districts the availability of openly
licensed courseware, with an emphasis on the fact that the courseware
is available at no cost to the districts;
(b) Identify an open courseware repository to which openly licensed
courseware developed under this section may be submitted, in which
openly licensed courseware may be housed, and from which openly
licensed courseware may be easily accessed, all at no cost to school
districts;
(c) Provide professional development programs that offer support,
guidance, and instruction regarding the creation, use, and continuous
improvement of open courseware; and
(d) Report to the governor and the education committees of the
legislature on a biennial basis, beginning December 1, 2013, and ending
December 1, 2017, regarding development of openly licensed courseware
aligned with the common core state standards and placed under an
attribution license, use by school districts of openly licensed
courseware, and professional development programs provided.
(3) School districts may, but are not required to, use any of the
openly licensed courseware.
(4) As used in this section, "courseware" includes the course
syllabus, scope and sequence, instructional materials, modules,
textbooks, including the teacher's edition, student guides,
supplemental materials, formative and summative assessment supports,
research articles, research data, laboratory activities, simulations,
videos, open-ended inquiry activities, and any other educationally
useful materials.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2018.

--- END ---