BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.29.021 and 2011 c 4 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies to benefits charged to the experience
rating accounts of employers for claims that have an effective date on
or after January 4, 2004.
(2)(a) An experience rating account shall be established and
maintained for each employer, except employers as described in RCW
50.44.010, 50.44.030, and 50.50.030 who have properly elected to make
payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers
as described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to
make payments in lieu of contributions, based on existing records of
the employment security department.
(b) Benefits paid to an eligible individual shall be charged to the
experience rating accounts of each of such individual's employers
during the individual's base year in the same ratio that the wages paid
by each employer to the individual during the base year bear to the
wages paid by all employers to that individual during that base year,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(c) When the eligible individual's separating employer is a covered
contribution paying base year employer, benefits paid to the eligible
individual shall be charged to the experience rating account of only
the individual's separating employer if the individual qualifies for
benefits under:
(i) RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b)(i) or (2)(b)(i), as applicable, and became
unemployed after having worked and earned wages in the bona fide work;
or
(ii) RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b) (v) through (x) or (2)(b) (v) through
(x).
(3) The legislature finds that certain benefit payments, in whole
or in part, should not be charged to the experience rating accounts of
employers except those employers described in RCW 50.44.010, 50.44.030,
and 50.50.030 who have properly elected to make payments in lieu of
contributions, taxable local government employers described in RCW
50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make payments in
lieu of contributions, as follows:
(a) Benefits paid to any individual later determined to be
ineligible shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer. However, when a benefit claim becomes
invalid due to an amendment or adjustment of a report where the
employer failed to report or inaccurately reported hours worked or
remuneration paid, or both, all benefits paid will be charged to the
experience rating account of the contribution paying employer or
employers that originally filed the incomplete or inaccurate report or
reports. An employer who reimburses the trust fund for benefits paid
to workers and who fails to report or inaccurately reported hours
worked or remuneration paid, or both, shall reimburse the trust fund
for all benefits paid that are based on the originally filed incomplete
or inaccurate report or reports.
(b) Benefits paid to an individual filing under the provisions of
chapter 50.06 RCW shall not be charged to the experience rating account
of any contribution paying employer only if:
(i) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(1) after receiving
crime victims' compensation for a disability resulting from a nonwork-related occurrence; or
(ii) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(2).
(c) Benefits paid which represent the state's share of benefits
payable as extended benefits defined under RCW 50.22.010(6) shall not
be charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.
(d) In the case of individuals who requalify for benefits under RCW
50.20.050 or 50.20.060, benefits based on wage credits earned prior to
the disqualifying separation shall not be charged to the experience
rating account of the contribution paying employer from whom that
separation took place.
(e) Benefits paid to an individual who qualifies for benefits under
RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b) (iv) or (xi) or (2)(b) (iv) or (xi), as
applicable, shall not be charged to the experience rating account of
any contribution paying employer.
(f) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after the
first Sunday following April 22, 2005, benefits paid that exceed the
benefits that would have been paid if the weekly benefit amount for the
claim had been determined as one percent of the total wages paid in the
individual's base year shall not be charged to the experience rating
account of any contribution paying employer. This subsection (3)(f)
does not apply to the calculation of contribution rates under RCW
50.29.025 for rate year 2010 and thereafter.
(g) The forty-five dollar increase paid as part of an individual's
weekly benefit amount as provided in RCW 50.20.1201 and the twenty-five
dollar increase paid as part of an individual's weekly benefit amount
as provided in RCW 50.20.1202 shall not be charged to the experience
rating account of any contribution paying employer.
(h) With respect to claims where the minimum amount payable weekly
is increased to one hundred fifty-five dollars pursuant to RCW
50.20.1201(3), benefits paid that exceed the benefits that would have
been paid if the minimum amount payable weekly had been calculated
pursuant to RCW 50.20.120 shall not be charged to the experience rating
account of any contribution paying employer.
(i) Upon approval of an individual's training benefits plan
submitted in accordance with RCW 50.22.155(2), an individual is
considered enrolled in training, and regular benefits beginning with
the week of approval shall not be charged to the experience rating
account of any contribution paying employer.
(j) Training benefits paid to an individual under RCW 50.22.155
shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer.
(4)(a) A contribution paying base year employer, not otherwise
eligible for relief of charges for benefits under this section, may
receive such relief if the benefit charges result from payment to an
individual who:
(i) Last left the employ of such employer voluntarily for reasons
not attributable to the employer;
(ii) Was discharged for misconduct or gross misconduct connected
with his or her work not a result of inability to meet the minimum job
requirements;
(iii) Is unemployed as a result of closure or severe curtailment of
operation at the employer's plant, building, worksite, or other
facility. This closure must be for reasons directly attributable to a
catastrophic occurrence such as fire, flood, or other natural disaster;
(iv) Continues to be employed on a regularly scheduled permanent
part-time basis by a base year employer and who at some time during the
base year was concurrently employed and subsequently separated from at
least one other base year employer. Benefit charge relief ceases when
the employment relationship between the employer requesting relief and
the claimant is terminated. This subsection does not apply to shared
work employers under chapter ((50.06)) 50.60 RCW; ((or))
(v) Continues to be employed on a regularly scheduled permanent
part-time basis by a base year employer and who qualified for two
consecutive unemployment claims where wages were attributable to at
least one employer who employed the individual in both base years.
Benefit charge relief ceases when the employment relationship between
the employer requesting relief and the claimant is terminated. This
subsection does not apply to shared work employers under chapter 50.60
RCW; or
(vi) Was hired to replace an employee who is a member of the
military reserves or National Guard and was called to federal active
military service by the president of the United States and is
subsequently laid off when that employee is reemployed by their
employer upon release from active duty within the time provided for
reemployment in RCW 73.16.035.
(b) The employer requesting relief of charges under this subsection
must request relief in writing within thirty days following mailing to
the last known address of the notification of the valid initial
determination of such claim, stating the date and reason for the
separation or the circumstances of continued employment. The
commissioner, upon investigation of the request, shall determine
whether relief should be granted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2013.

--- END ---