BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the public
records act is intended to allow the citizens of Washington full access
to the records of the governmental agencies that serve them. The
fundamental purpose of such access is to ensure that the activities and
processes of state government are conducted in an open and transparent
manner and that citizens can obtain the information necessary for
meaningful participation in the democratic process. However, the
legislature has also recognized that in order to safeguard against
records requests that are unduly burdensome, or where the records are
sought for commercial or other purposes unrelated to the goals of the
act, reasonable restrictions may be placed on the number and types of
records that may be obtained.
The legislature also finds that there are an increasing number of
records requests whose sole purpose is to seek information for
commercial or other profit-making purposes and that do not serve to
promote the goals of transparency and openness in the operation of our
state and local governments. Specifically, the legislature finds that
some commercial entities and individuals have been misusing the act by
making extensive and burdensome records requests in order to obtain
data that is used solely for competitive advantage or for later resale.
Such "data mining" is wholly unrelated to the purposes of the public
records act and, in fact, serves to undermine the act by overburdening
affected public agencies and thus impede the ability of such agencies
to respond to legitimate requests for public records.
The intent of this act is to strengthen and clarify existing
restrictions on the use of public records requests for commercial and
profit-making purposes, so as to reduce the misuse of the public
records act and ensure that the act can continue to be focused on the
goal of promoting governmental transparency and openness.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.030 and 2007 c 197 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The people of this state do not yield their sovereignty to the
agencies that serve them. The people, in delegating authority, do not
give their public servants the right to decide what is good for the
people to know and what is not good for them to know. The people
insist on remaining informed so that they may maintain control over the
instruments that they have created. This chapter shall be liberally
construed and its exemptions narrowly construed to promote this public
policy and to assure that the public interest will be fully protected.
In the event of conflict between the provisions of this chapter and any
other act, the provisions of this chapter shall govern.
The provisions of this chapter are not intended to facilitate the
gathering of information for purely commercial or profit-making
purposes unrelated to the promotion of transparency and openness in the
operation of state and local governments.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.56.070 and 2005 c 274 s 284 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each agency, in accordance with published rules, shall make
available for public inspection and copying all public records, unless
the record falls within the specific exemptions of subsection (((6)))
(9) of this section, this chapter, or other statute which exempts or
prohibits disclosure of specific information or records. To the extent
required to prevent an unreasonable invasion of personal privacy
interests protected by this chapter, an agency shall delete identifying
details in a manner consistent with this chapter when it makes
available or publishes any public record; however, in each case, the
justification for the deletion shall be explained fully in writing.
(2) For informational purposes, each agency shall publish and
maintain a current list containing every law, other than those listed
in this chapter, that the agency believes exempts or prohibits
disclosure of specific information or records of the agency. An
agency's failure to list an exemption shall not affect the efficacy of
any exemption.
(3) Each local agency shall maintain and make available for public
inspection and copying a current index providing identifying
information as to the following records issued, adopted, or promulgated
after January 1, 1973:
(a) Final opinions, including concurring and dissenting opinions,
as well as orders, made in the adjudication of cases;
(b) Those statements of policy and interpretations of policy,
statute, and the Constitution which have been adopted by the agency;
(c) Administrative staff manuals and instructions to staff that
affect a member of the public;
(d) Planning policies and goals, and interim and final planning
decisions;
(e) Factual staff reports and studies, factual consultant's reports
and studies, scientific reports and studies, and any other factual
information derived from tests, studies, reports, or surveys, whether
conducted by public employees or others; and
(f) Correspondence, and materials referred to therein, by and with
the agency relating to any regulatory, supervisory, or enforcement
responsibilities of the agency, whereby the agency determines, or
opines upon, or is asked to determine or opine upon, the rights of the
state, the public, a subdivision of state government, or of any private
party.
(4) A local agency need not maintain such an index, if to do so
would be unduly burdensome, but it shall in that event:
(a) Issue and publish a formal order specifying the reasons why and
the extent to which compliance would unduly burden or interfere with
agency operations; and
(b) Make available for public inspection and copying all indexes
maintained for agency use.
(5) Each state agency shall, by rule, establish and implement a
system of indexing for the identification and location of the following
records:
(a) All records issued before July 1, 1990, for which the agency
has maintained an index;
(b) Final orders entered after June 30, 1990, that are issued in
adjudicative proceedings as defined in RCW 34.05.010 and that contain
an analysis or decision of substantial importance to the agency in
carrying out its duties;
(c) Declaratory orders entered after June 30, 1990, that are issued
pursuant to RCW 34.05.240 and that contain an analysis or decision of
substantial importance to the agency in carrying out its duties;
(d) Interpretive statements as defined in RCW 34.05.010 that were
entered after June 30, 1990; and
(e) Policy statements as defined in RCW 34.05.010 that were entered
after June 30, 1990.
Rules establishing systems of indexing shall include, but not be
limited to, requirements for the form and content of the index, its
location and availability to the public, and the schedule for revising
or updating the index. State agencies that have maintained indexes for
records issued before July 1, 1990, shall continue to make such indexes
available for public inspection and copying. Information in such
indexes may be incorporated into indexes prepared pursuant to this
subsection. State agencies may satisfy the requirements of this
subsection by making available to the public indexes prepared by other
parties but actually used by the agency in its operations. State
agencies shall make indexes available for public inspection and
copying. State agencies may charge a fee to cover the actual costs of
providing individual mailed copies of indexes.
(6) A public record may be relied on, used, or cited as precedent
by an agency against a party other than an agency and it may be invoked
by the agency for any other purpose only if:
(a) It has been indexed in an index available to the public; or
(b) Parties affected have timely notice (actual or constructive) of
the terms thereof.
(7) Each agency shall establish, maintain, and make available for
public inspection and copying a statement of the actual per page cost
or other costs, if any, that it charges for providing photocopies of
public records and a statement of the factors and manner used to
determine the actual per page cost or other costs, if any.
(a) In determining the actual per page cost for providing
photocopies of public records, an agency may include all costs directly
incident to copying such public records including the actual cost of
the paper and the per page cost for use of agency copying equipment.
In determining other actual costs for providing photocopies of public
records, an agency may include all costs directly incident to shipping
such public records, including the cost of postage or delivery charges
and the cost of any container or envelope used.
(b) In determining the actual per page cost or other costs for
providing copies of public records, an agency may not include staff
salaries, benefits, or other general administrative or overhead
charges, unless those costs are directly related to the actual cost of
copying the public records. Staff time to copy and mail the requested
public records may be included in an agency's costs.
(8) An agency need not calculate the actual per page cost or other
costs it charges for providing photocopies of public records if to do
so would be unduly burdensome, but in that event: The agency may not
charge in excess of fifteen cents per page for photocopies of public
records or for the use of agency equipment to photocopy public records
and the actual postage or delivery charge and the cost of any container
or envelope used to mail the public records to the requestor.
(9) This chapter shall not be construed as giving authority to any
agency, the office of the secretary of the senate, or the office of the
chief clerk of the house of representatives to give, sell or provide
access to ((lists of)) information about individuals or entities
requested for commercial purposes, and agencies, the office of the
secretary of the senate, and the office of the chief clerk of the house
of representatives shall not do so unless specifically authorized or
directed by law: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That lists of applicants for
professional licenses and of professional licensees shall be made
available to those professional associations or educational
organizations recognized by their professional licensing or examination
board, upon payment of a reasonable charge therefor: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That such recognition may be refused only for a good cause pursuant to
a hearing under the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative
procedure act.

--- END ---