BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As of January 1, 2013, each hospital that is recognized by the
internal revenue service as a 501(c)(3) nonprofit entity must make its
federally required community health needs assessment widely available
to the public within fifteen days of submission to the internal revenue
service. Following completion of the initial community health needs
assessment, each hospital in accordance with the internal revenue
service, shall complete and make widely available to the public an
assessment once every three years.
(2) Unless contained in the community health needs assessment under
subsection (1) of this section, a hospital subject to the requirements
under subsection (1) of this section shall make public a description of
the community served by the hospital, including both a geographic
description and a description of the general population served by the
hospital; and demographic information such as leading causes of death,
levels of chronic illness, and descriptions of the medically
underserved, low-income, and minority, or chronically ill populations
in the community.
(3)(a) Each hospital subject to the requirements of subsection (1)
of this section shall make widely available to the public a community
benefit implementation strategy within one year of completing its
community health needs assessment. In developing the implementation
strategy, hospitals shall consult with community-based organizations
and stakeholders, and local public health jurisdictions, as well as any
additional consultations the hospital decides to undertake. Unless
contained in the implementation strategy under this subsection (3)(a),
the hospital must provide a brief explanation for not accepting
recommendations for community benefit proposals identified in the
assessment through the stakeholder consultation process, such as
excessive expense to implement or infeasibility of implementation of
the proposal.
(b) Implementation strategies must be evidence-based, when
available; or development and implementation of innovative programs and
practices should be supported by evaluation measures.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the term "widely available to
the public" has the same meaning as in the internal revenue service
guidelines.

--- END ---