BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.04.310 and 2007 c 146 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An individual:
(a) Is "unemployed" in any week during which the individual
performs no services and with respect to which no remuneration is
payable to the individual, or in any week of less than full time work,
if the remuneration payable to the individual with respect to such week
is less than one and one-third times the individual's weekly benefit
amount plus five dollars. The commissioner shall prescribe regulations
applicable to unemployed individuals making such distinctions in the
procedures as to such types of unemployment as the commissioner deems
necessary.
(((2) An individual)) (b) Is not "unemployed" ((during)) in any
week which falls totally within a period during which the individual,
pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement or individual employment
contract, is employed full time in accordance with a definition of full
time contained in the agreement or contract, and for which compensation
for full time work is payable. This subsection may not be applied
retroactively to an individual who had no guarantee of work at the
start of such period and subsequently is provided additional work by
the employer.
(((3))) (2)(a) An officer of a corporation who owns ten percent or
more of the outstanding stock of the corporation, or a corporate
officer who is a family member of an officer who owns ten percent or
more of the outstanding stock of the corporation, whose claim for
benefits is based on any wages with that corporation((, is)):
(((a))) (i) Is not "unemployed" in any week during the individual's
term of office or ownership in the corporation, even if wages are not
being paid((;)), unless the corporate officer's covered base year wages
with that corporation are less than twenty-five percent of his or her
total covered base year wages.
(((b))) (ii) Is "unemployed" in any week upon dissolution of the
corporation or if the officer permanently resigns or is permanently
removed from their appointment and responsibilities with that
corporation in accordance with its articles of incorporation or bylaws
or if the corporate officer's covered base year wages with that
corporation are less than twenty-five percent of his or her total
covered base year wages.
(b) As used in this subsection (2), "family member" means persons
who are members of a family by blood or marriage as parents,
stepparents, grandparents, spouses, children, brothers, sisters,
stepchildren, adopted children, or grandchildren.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect October 28, 2012.

--- END ---