BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.19.534 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 227 and 2011 c 367
s 707 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) State agencies, the legislature, and departments shall purchase
for their use all goods and services required by the legislature,
agencies, or departments that are produced or provided in whole or in
part from class II inmate work programs operated by the department of
corrections through state contract. These goods and services shall not
be purchased from any other source unless, upon application by the
department or agency: (a) The department finds that the articles or
products do not meet the reasonable requirements of the agency or
department, (b) are not of equal or better quality, or (c) the price of
the product or service is higher than that produced by the private
sector. However, the criteria contained in (a), (b), and (c) of this
subsection for purchasing goods and services from sources other than
correctional industries do not apply to goods and services produced by
correctional industries that primarily replace goods manufactured or
services obtained from outside the state. The department of
corrections and department shall adopt administrative rules that
implement this section.
(2) During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, and in
conformance with section 223(11), chapter 470, Laws of 2009 and section
221(2), chapter 367, Laws of 2011, this section does not apply to the
purchase of uniforms by the Washington state ferries.
(3) Pursuant to section 2 of this act, the department of enterprise
services in conjunction with the department of corrections shall issue
a request for proposal for correctional officer uniforms. The request
for proposal process shall include the following criteria:
(a) Any contract for the procurement of uniforms for employees of
the state department of corrections shall be awarded or issued as a
result of an open and competitive bidding or selection process that
does not exceed current annual funding levels as of the 2011 fiscal
year for the department of corrections.
(b) The department must ensure that the product is manufactured
within the United States of America.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of corrections shall adopt by rule a quality control
and quality assurance system that establishes a policy and procedure to
identify each inmate's role in the manufacture of each uniform. The
quality control and quality assurance system shall also include
measurable standards for producing uniforms of correct size, fit, and
quality.
(1) Upon the identification of numerous workmanship quality
problems traceable to a certain inmate, the respective correctional
industries' inmate shall be removed from the industrial sewing class II
correctional industry program that manufactures uniforms for the
department of corrections and its employees. "Workmanship quality
problems" as used in this section includes, but is not limited to,
sewing or sizing defects relating to the uniform garments.
(2) The department shall, in consultation with state correctional
officers, report to the legislature on the policy and quality assurance
procedures established in this section. The department shall provide
a written report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 31, 2013. If the report concludes that the industrial sewing
class II industry program that manufactures uniforms for department of
corrections personnel continues to produce substandard products then
the department of corrections shall issue a request for proposal for
the uniforms pursuant to RCW 43.19.534(3) by March 1, 2013.
(3) If the department concludes before January 31, 2013, that the
uniform garments do not satisfy officers' requirements, contain
workmanship quality problems, and are of substandard quality then the
department of corrections may begin the request for proposal process
under RCW 43.19.534(3) immediately.

--- END ---