BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the workforce
development system may be strengthened by focusing on the key roles and
responsibilities of state partners, ensuring cohesive governance and
management, improving accountability and performance, and eliminating
possible conflicts of interest. The legislature recognizes the core
businesses of state partners, and intends to align their powers,
functions, and duties with their core businesses. The legislature
intends that greater focus and better alignment will strengthen the
ability of state partners to: Develop a workforce with the skills most
needed by top industries targeted for growth and recruitment including,
but not limited to, aerospace, biotechnology, and information
technology; and increase the percentage of Washington households living
in the middle-income bracket or higher.
(2) The legislature intends that policy, planning, and performance
shall continue to be the core business of the workforce training and
education coordinating board and that the board shall continue to
coordinate policy and planning for the workforce development system,
evaluate results, and facilitate demonstration projects testing new
ideas. The legislature further intends that the board shall assume
administrative and operational responsibility for funds received under
title I-B of the workforce investment act. In continuing its core
business and assuming this responsibility, the legislature intends that
the board shall develop relevant policy, provide title I-B funds to
carry out rapid response and other statewide activities, allocate title
I-B funds to local workforce development councils to designate and
contract with eligible entities to serve as one-stop operators and
carry out other local activities, manage grants and contracts, and
measure performance and outcomes.
(3) The legislature intends that employment services and
unemployment insurance shall continue to be the core business of the
employment security department. The legislature intends that the
department shall continue to fill employer job openings with well-qualified job seekers, and mitigate the negative consequences of
unemployment and that the department shall also continue to serve as
the primary labor exchange service provider in worksource centers, and,
if designated by local workforce development councils, contract to
serve as one-stop operators of worksource centers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 50.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All powers, functions, and duties of the employment security
department's worksource standards and integration division pertaining
to the administration of title I-B of the workforce investment act,
P.L. 105-220, or its successor are transferred to the workforce
training and education coordinating board. These powers, functions,
and duties include, but are not limited to: Compliance, assistance,
research, and grant origination; related technical assistance,
education, and support; related quality assurance and compliance; and
related system performance. All references to the employment security
department or the commissioner of the department in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the workforce training and
education coordinating board or the director of the board when
referring to the powers, functions, and duties transferred under this
section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material, including electronic records and files, in
the possession of the employment security department pertaining to the
powers, functions, and duties transferred to the workforce training and
education coordinating board under this section shall be delivered to
the custody of the workforce training and education coordinating board.
All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other
tangible property employed by the employment security department in
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
made available to the workforce training and education coordinating
board. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the
powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the
workforce training and education coordinating board.
(b) Any appropriations made to the employment security department
for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall,
on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to
the workforce training and education coordinating board.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the functions and duties transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the employment security department engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the workforce training and education
coordinating board. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW,
the state civil service law, are assigned to the workforce training and
education coordinating board to perform their usual duties upon the
same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any
action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws
and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the employment
security department pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the workforce training
and education coordinating board. All existing contracts and
obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the
workforce training and education coordinating board.
(5) The transfer of the powers, functions, and duties and personnel
of the employment security department shall not affect the validity of
any act performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees of the employment security department
assigned to the workforce training and education coordinating board
under this section whose positions are within an existing bargaining
unit description at the workforce training and education coordinating
board shall become a part of the existing bargaining unit at the
workforce training and education coordinating board and shall be
considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing
bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 28C.18.060 and 2009 c 151 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board, in cooperation with the operating agencies of the state
training system and private career schools and colleges, shall:
(1) Concentrate its major efforts on planning, coordination
evaluation, policy analysis, and recommending improvements to the
state's training system;
(2) Establish as its primary mission: (a) Developing a workforce
with the skills most needed by top industries targeted for growth and
recruitment including, but not limited to, aerospace, biotechnology,
and information technology; and (b) increasing the percentage of
Washington households living in the middle-income bracket or higher;
(3) Implement strategies to: (a) Meet market demands for a
knowledge-based economy while filling middle-income jobs with a
sufficient supply of skilled workers; and (b) increase the percentage
of Washington households living in the middle-income bracket or higher;
(4) Advocate for the state training system and for meeting the
needs of employers and the workforce for workforce education and
training;
(((3))) (5) Establish and maintain an inventory of the programs of
the state training system, and related state programs, and perform a
biennial assessment of the vocational education, training, and adult
basic education and literacy needs of the state; identify ongoing and
strategic education needs; and assess the extent to which employment,
training, vocational and basic education, rehabilitation services, and
public assistance services represent a consistent, integrated approach
to meet such needs;
(((4))) (6) Develop and maintain a state comprehensive plan for
workforce training and education, including but not limited to, goals,
objectives, and priorities for the state training system, and review
the state training system for consistency with the state comprehensive
plan. In developing the state comprehensive plan for workforce
training and education, the board shall use, but shall not be limited
to: Economic, labor market, and populations trends reports in office
of financial management forecasts; joint office of financial management
and employment security department labor force, industry employment,
and occupational forecasts; the results of scientifically based
outcome, net-impact and cost-benefit evaluations; the needs of
employers as evidenced in formal employer surveys and other employer
input; and the needs of program participants and workers as evidenced
in formal surveys and other input from program participants and the
labor community;
(((5))) (7) In consultation with the higher education coordinating
board or its successor, review and make recommendations to the office
of financial management and the legislature on operating and capital
facilities budget requests for operating agencies of the state training
system for purposes of consistency with the state comprehensive plan
for workforce training and education;
(((6))) (8) Provide for coordination among the different operating
agencies and components of the state training system at the state level
and at the regional level;
(((7))) (9) Develop a consistent and reliable database on
vocational education enrollments, costs, program activities, and job
placements from publicly funded vocational education programs in this
state;
(((8))) (10)(a) Establish standards for data collection and
maintenance for the operating agencies of the state training system in
a format that is accessible to use by the board. The board shall
require a minimum of common core data to be collected by each operating
agency of the state training system;
(b) Develop requirements for minimum common core data in
consultation with the office of financial management and the operating
agencies of the training system;
(((9))) (11) Establish minimum standards for program evaluation for
the operating agencies of the state training system, including, but not
limited to, the use of common survey instruments and procedures for
measuring perceptions of program participants and employers of program
participants, and monitor such program evaluation;
(((10))) (12) Every two years administer scientifically based
outcome evaluations of the state training system, including, but not
limited to, surveys of program participants, surveys of employers of
program participants, and matches with employment security department
payroll and wage files. Every five years administer scientifically
based net-impact and cost-benefit evaluations of the state training
system;
(((11))) (13) In cooperation with the employment security
department, provide for the improvement and maintenance of quality and
utility in occupational information and forecasts for use in training
system planning and evaluation. Improvements shall include, but not be
limited to, development of state-based occupational change factors
involving input by employers and employees, and delineation of skill
and training requirements by education level associated with current
and forecasted occupations;
(((12))) (14) Provide for the development of common course
description formats, common reporting requirements, and common
definitions for operating agencies of the training system;
(((13))) (15) Provide for effectiveness and efficiency reviews of
the state training system;
(((14))) (16) In cooperation with the higher education coordinating
board or its successor, facilitate transfer of credit policies and
agreements between institutions of the state training system, and
encourage articulation agreements for programs encompassing two years
of secondary workforce education and two years of postsecondary
workforce education;
(((15))) (17) In cooperation with the higher education coordinating
board or its successor, facilitate transfer of credit policies and
agreements between private training institutions and institutions of
the state training system;
(((16))) (18) Develop policy objectives for the workforce
investment act, P.L. 105-220, or its successor; develop coordination
criteria for activities under the act with related programs and
services provided by state and local education and training agencies;
((and)) ensure that entrepreneurial training opportunities are
available through programs of each local workforce investment board in
the state; and develop strategies to expand cohort training in fields
with critical skill shortages;
(19) Assume the administrative lead for title I-B of the workforce
investment act, P.L. 105-220, or its successor; and oversee the
worksource service delivery system, including the technological and
self-service infrastructures;
(((17))) (20) Make recommendations to the commission of student
assessment, the state board of education, and the superintendent of
public instruction, concerning basic skill competencies and essential
core competencies for K-12 education. Basic skills for this purpose
shall be reading, writing, computation, speaking, and critical
thinking, essential core competencies for this purpose shall be
English, math, science/technology, history, geography, and critical
thinking. The board shall monitor the development of and provide
advice concerning secondary curriculum which integrates vocational and
academic education;
(((18))) (21) Establish and administer programs for marketing and
outreach to businesses and potential program participants;
(((19))) (22) Facilitate the location of support services,
including but not limited to, child care, financial aid, career
counseling, and job placement services, for students and trainees at
institutions in the state training system, and advocate for support
services for trainees and students in the state training system;
(((20))) (23) Facilitate private sector assistance for the state
training system, including but not limited to: Financial assistance,
rotation of private and public personnel, and vocational counseling;
(((21))) (24) Facilitate the development of programs for school-to-work transition that combine classroom education and on-the-job
training, including entrepreneurial education and training, in
industries and occupations without a significant number of
apprenticeship programs;
(((22))) (25) Include in the planning requirements for local
workforce investment boards a requirement that the local workforce
investment boards specify how entrepreneurial training is to be offered
through the one-stop system required under the workforce investment
act, P.L. 105-220, or its successor;
(((23))) (26) Encourage and assess progress for the equitable
representation of racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with
disabilities among the students, teachers, and administrators of the
state training system. Equitable, for this purpose, shall mean
substantially proportional to their percentage of the state population
in the geographic area served. This function of the board shall in no
way lessen more stringent state or federal requirements for
representation of racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with
disabilities;
(((24))) (27) Participate in the planning and policy development of
governor set-aside grants under P.L. 97-300, as amended;
(((25))) (28) Administer veterans' programs, licensure of private
vocational schools, the job skills program, and the Washington award
for vocational excellence;
(((26))) (29) Allocate funding from the state job training trust
fund;
(((27))) (30) Work with the director of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce and the economic development commission
to ensure coordination among workforce training priorities, the long-term economic development strategy of the economic development
commission, and economic development and entrepreneurial development
efforts, including but not limited to assistance to industry clusters;
(((28))) (31) Conduct research into workforce development programs
designed to reduce the high unemployment rate among young people
between approximately eighteen and twenty-four years of age. In
consultation with the operating agencies, the board shall advise the
governor and legislature on policies and programs to alleviate the high
unemployment rate among young people. The research shall include
disaggregated demographic information and, to the extent possible,
income data for adult youth. The research shall also include a
comparison of the effectiveness of programs examined as a part of the
research conducted in this subsection in relation to the public
investment made in these programs in reducing unemployment of young
adults. The board shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by November 15, 2008, and every two years thereafter.
Where possible, the data reported to the legislative committees should
be reported in numbers and in percentages;
(((29))) (32) Adopt rules as necessary to implement this chapter.
The board may delegate to the director any of the functions of this
section.

Sec. 4 RCW 28C.18.150 and 2009 c 151 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Workforce development councils shall establish as their primary
missions: (a) Developing a workforce with the skills most needed by
top industries targeted for growth and recruitment including, but not
limited to, aerospace, biotechnology, and information technology; and
(b) increasing the percentage of Washington households living in the
middle-income bracket or higher.
(2) Workforce development councils, in partnership with local
elected officials, shall develop and maintain a local unified plan for
the workforce development system including, but not limited to, the
local plan required by P.L. 105-220, Title I. The unified plan shall
include a strategic plan that assesses local employment opportunities
and skill needs, the present and future workforce, the current
workforce development system, information on financial resources,
diversity, goals, objectives, and strategies for the local workforce
development system, and a system-wide financial strategy for
implementing the plan. Local workforce development councils shall
submit their strategic plans to the board for review and to the
governor for approval.
(((2))) (3) The strategic plan shall clearly articulate the
connection between workforce and economic development efforts in the
local area including the area industry clusters and the strategic
clusters the community is targeting for growth. The plan shall
include, but is not limited to:
(a) Data on current and projected employment opportunities in the
local area;
(b) Identification of workforce investment needs of existing
businesses and businesses considering location in the region, with
special attention to industry clusters;
(c) Identification of educational, training, employment, and
support service needs of job seekers and workers in the local area,
including individuals with disabilities and other underrepresented
talent sources;
(d) Analysis of the industry demand, potential labor force supply,
and educational, employment, and workforce support available to
businesses and job seekers in the region; and
(e) Collaboration with associate development organizations in
regional planning efforts involving combined strategies around
workforce development and economic development policies and programs.
Combined planning efforts shall include, but not be limited to,
assistance to industry clusters in the area.
(((3))) (4) The board shall work with workforce development
councils to develop implementation and funding strategies for purposes
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect October 1, 2012.

--- END ---