BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that beavers have
historically played a significant role in maintaining the health of
watersheds in the Pacific Northwest and act as key agents in riparian
ecology. The live trapping and relocating of beavers has long been
recognized as a beneficial wildlife management practice, and has been
successfully utilized to restore and maintain stream ecosystems for
over fifty years. The benefits of active beaver populations include
reduced stream sedimentation, stream temperature moderation, higher
dissolved oxygen levels, overall improved water quality, increased
natural water storage capabilities within watersheds, and reduced
stream velocities. These benefits improve and create habitat for many
other species, including endangered salmon, river otters, sandhill
cranes, trumpeter swans, and other riparian and aquatic species.
Relocating beavers into their historic habitat provides a natural
mechanism for improving the environmental conditions in Washington's
riparian ecosystems without having to resort to governmental regulation
or expensive publicly funded engineering projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall permit the release of wild beavers on
public and private lands with agreement from the property owner.
(2) The department may limit the release of wild beavers to areas
of the state where:
(a) There is a low probability of released beavers becoming a
nuisance or causing damage;
(b) Conditions exist for released beavers to improve, maintain, or
manage stream or riparian ecosystem functions; and
(c) There is evidence of historic endemic beaver populations.
(3) The department may condition the release of beaver to maximize
the relocation's success and minimize risk. Factors that the
department may condition include:
(a) Stream gradient;
(b) Sufficiency of the water supply;
(c) Stream geomorphology;
(d) Adequacy of a food source;
(e) Proper site elevation and valley width;
(f) Age of the beavers relocated;
(g) Times of year for capture and relocation;
(h) Requirements for the capture, handling, and transport of the
live beavers;
(i) Minimum and maximum numbers of beavers that can be relocated in
one area; and
(j) Requirements for the permit holder to initially provide
supplemental food and lodge building materials.
(4) The department may require specific training for those involved
with capture, handling, and release of beavers.
(5) Nothing in this section creates any liability against the state
or those releasing beavers nor authorizes any private right of action
for any damages subsequently caused by beavers released pursuant to
this section.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "beaver" means the American
beaver (Castor canadensis).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the department receives a request for relocating
beaver, the department must inform the requesting party of locations,
if available, of surplus beaver available for capture and relocation.
The department may identify nuisance beaver or areas with thriving
beaver populations as a source population for capturing and relocating
beaver.
(2) The department shall post on the agency's web site quarterly
reports of nuisance beaver activity, beaver trapping, and beaver
relocations reported to the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department of fish and wildlife must
initiate a beaver management stakeholder's forum by January 1, 2013,
and report the outcomes of the forum to the legislature consistent with
RCW 43.01.036.
(2) This section expires July 31, 2014.

--- END ---