BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The contribution rates charged to law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 members, employers, and
the state for July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2013, shall be as follows:

Member . . . . . . . . . . . . 8.46%

Employer . . . . . . . . . . . . 5.08%

State . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.00%

(2) The rates in this section shall be increased to reflect the
cost of any additional benefits as provided for in RCW 41.45.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act is added to chapter
41.26 RCW, but because of its temporary nature, shall not be codified.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.26.080 and 2007 c 492 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as set forth under subsection (2) of this section, the
total liability of the plan 1 system shall be funded as follows:
(a) Every plan 1 member shall have deducted from each payroll a sum
equal to six percent of his or her basic salary for each pay period.
(b) Every employer shall contribute monthly a sum equal to six
percent of the basic salary of each plan 1 employee who is a member of
this retirement system. The employer shall transmit the employee and
employer contributions with a copy of the payroll to the retirement
system monthly.
(c) The remaining liabilities of the plan 1 system shall be funded
as provided in chapter 41.45 RCW.
(d) Every member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the
contribution made and provided for herein, and shall receipt in full
for his or her salary or compensation. Payment less said contributions
shall be a complete discharge of all claims and demands whatsoever for
the services rendered by such person during the period covered by such
payments, except his or her claim to the benefits to which he or she
may be entitled under the provisions of this chapter.
(2) No employer or member contribution is required after June 30,
2000, unless the most recent valuation study for law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 indicates the plan
has unfunded liabilities. The legislature clarifies the enactment of
section 907, chapter 1, Laws of 2000 2nd sp. sess. and affirms the
suspension of employer and member contributions to plan 1 of the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, effective
June 30, 2000, as provided in this subsection. The legislature intends
this 2007 amendment of this subsection to be curative, remedial, and
retrospectively applicable to June 30, 2000. Contributions for the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 1 shall be established by
the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement board
beginning July 1, 2013, as provided in this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.50.075 and 2004 c 242 s 44 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Two funds are hereby created and)) There is hereby
established in the state treasury ((to be known as)) the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system ((plan 1)) retirement
fund((, and the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement fund)) which shall consist of all moneys paid
((into them)) in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and
chapter 41.26 RCW, whether such moneys take the form of cash,
securities, or other assets((. The plan 1 fund shall consist of all
moneys paid)) to finance the benefits provided to members of the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1((, and
the plan 2 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance)) and the
benefits provided to members of the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system plan 2.
(2) All of the assets of the Washington state teachers' retirement
system shall be credited according to the purposes for which they are
held, to two funds to be maintained in the state treasury, namely, the
teachers' retirement system plan 1 fund and the teachers' retirement
system combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The plan 1 fund shall consist of
all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the
Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 1, and the combined
plan 2 and 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the
benefits provided to members of the Washington state teachers'
retirement system plan 2 and 3.
(3) There is hereby established in the state treasury two separate
funds, namely the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and
the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3
fund. The plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the
benefits provided to members of the public employees' retirement system
plan 1, and the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund shall consist of all
moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the public
employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3.
(4) There is hereby established in the state treasury the school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The combined
plan 2 and 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the
benefits provided to members of the school employees' retirement system
plan 2 and plan 3.
(5) There is hereby established in the state treasury the public
safety employees' retirement system plan 2 fund. The plan 2 fund shall
consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members
of the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 After the merger of the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 into the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2, each
participant in the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 1
or the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 is entitled
to the same benefits immediately after the merger as immediately prior
to the merger including, but not limited to, any benefits provided to
active or retired members of the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system plan 1 by city or county disability
boards pursuant to RCW 41.26.150. This protection is in addition to
any other protections provided by law.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.26.710 and 2003 c 2 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Member" or "beneficiary" means:
(a) Current and future law enforcement officers and firefighters
who are contributing to the plan;
(b) Retired employees or their named beneficiaries who receive
benefits from the plan; and
(c) Separated vested members of the plan who are not currently
receiving benefits.
(2) "Plan" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system plan 1 or plan 2.
(3) "Actuary" means the actuary employed by the board of trustees.
(4) "State actuary" means the actuary employed by the department.
(5) "Board" means the board of trustees.
(6) "Board member" means a member of the board of trustees.
(7) "Department" means the department of retirement systems.
(8) "Minimum benefits" means those benefits provided for in chapter
41.26 RCW as of July 1, 2003.
(9) "Employer" means the same as under RCW 41.26.030(((2)))
(14)(b).
(10) "Enrolled actuary" means an actuary who is enrolled under the
employee retirement income security act of 1974 (Subtitle C of Title
III) and who is a member of the society of actuaries or the American
academy of actuaries.
(11) "Increased benefit" means a benefit in addition to the minimum
benefits.
(12) "Trust" means the assets of the ((plan)) system.
(13) "Benefits" means the age or service or combination thereof
required for retirement, the level of service and disability retirement
benefits, survivorship benefits, payment options including a deferred
retirement option plan, average final compensation, postretirement
cost-of-living adjustments, including health care and the elements of
compensation. Benefits shall not include the classifications of
employment eligible to participate in the plan.
(14) "Actuarially sound" means the ((plan)) system is sufficiently
funded to meet its projected liabilities and to defray the reasonable
expenses of its operation based upon commonly accepted, sound actuarial
principles.
(15) "System" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system established in RCW 41.50.075.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.26.715 and 2007 c 303 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An eleven member board of trustees is hereby created.
(a) Before January 1, 2007, three of the board members shall be
active law enforcement officers who are participants in the plan.
Beginning with the first vacancy on or after January 1, 2007, two board
members shall be active law enforcement officers who are participants
in the plan and one board member shall be either an active or a retired
law enforcement officer who is a participant of the plan. The law
enforcement officer board members shall be appointed by the governor
from a list provided by a recognized statewide council whose membership
consists exclusively of guilds, associations, and unions representing
state and local government police officers, deputies, and sheriffs and
excludes federal law enforcement officers.
(b) Before January 1, 2007, three of the board members shall be
active firefighters who are participants in the plan. Beginning with
the first vacancy on or after January 1, 2007, two board members shall
be active firefighters who are participants in the plan and one board
member shall be either an active or a retired firefighter who is a
participant of the plan. The firefighter board members shall be
appointed by the governor from a list provided by a recognized
statewide council, affiliated with an international association
representing the interests of firefighters.
(c) Three of the board members shall be representatives of
employers and shall be appointed by the governor.
(d) One board member shall be a member of the house of
representatives who is appointed by the governor based on the
recommendation of the speaker of the house of representatives.
(e) One board member shall be a member of the senate who is
appointed by the governor based on the recommendation of the majority
leader of the senate.
(f) After January 1, 2008, at least one board member must be a
retired participant of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system ((plan 2)). This member may be appointed under (a)
through (e) of this subsection.
(2) The initial law enforcement officer and firefighter board
members shall serve terms of six, four, and two years, respectively.
Thereafter, law enforcement officer and firefighter board members serve
terms of six years. The initial employer representative board members
shall serve terms of four, five, and six years, respectively.
Thereafter, employer representative board members serve terms of four
years. The initial legislative board members shall serve terms of five
years and six months. Thereafter, legislative board members serve
terms of two years, which begin on January 1st of odd-numbered years.
Board members may be reappointed to succeeding terms without
limitation. Board members shall serve until their successors are
appointed and seated.
(3) In the event of a vacancy on the board, the vacancy shall be
filled in the same manner as prescribed for an initial appointment.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.26.717 and 2003 c 92 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The law enforcement officers' and firefighters' ((plan 2))
retirement board established in section 4, chapter 2, Laws of 2003 has
the following duties and powers in addition to any other duties or
powers authorized or required by law. The board:
(1) Shall employ staff as necessary to implement the purposes of
chapter 2, Laws of 2003 and this act. Staff must be state employees
under Title 41 RCW;
(2) Shall adopt an annual budget as provided in section 5, chapter
2, Laws of 2003. Expenses of the board are paid from the expense fund
created in RCW 41.26.732;
(3) May make, execute, and deliver contracts, conveyances, and
other instruments necessary to exercise and discharge its powers and
duties;
(4) May contract for all or part of the services necessary for the
management and operation of the board with other state or nonstate
entities authorized to do business in the state; and
(5) May contract with actuaries, auditors, and other consultants as
necessary to carry out its responsibilities.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.26.720 and 2008 c 99 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of trustees have the following powers and duties and
shall:
(a) Adopt actuarial tables, assumptions, and cost methodologies in
consultation with an enrolled actuary retained by the board. These
actions shall not be subject to legislative revision if they are
certified as being reasonable by the state actuary. The state actuary
shall provide assistance when the board requests. The actuary retained
by the board shall utilize the aggregate actuarial cost method, or
other recognized actuarial cost method based on a level percentage of
payroll, as that term is employed by the American academy of actuaries.
The actuary retained by the board shall adjust the actuarial cost
method to recognize the actuarial present value of future revenue that
will be included in the calculation of the market value of assets
pursuant to RCW 41.26.805(2), using the methods and assumptions
employed by the state actuary in RCW 41.26.805(9). In determining the
reasonableness of actuarial valuations, assumptions, and cost
methodologies, the actuary retained by the board shall provide a copy
of all such calculations to the state actuary. If the two actuaries
concur on the calculations, contributions shall be made as set forth in
the report of the board's actuary. If the two actuaries cannot agree,
they shall appoint a third, independent, enrolled actuary who shall
review the calculations of the actuary retained by the board and the
state actuary. Thereafter, contributions shall be based on the
methodology most closely following that of the third actuary;
(b)(i) Provide for the design and implementation of increased
benefits for members and beneficiaries of the plan, subject to the
contribution limitations under RCW 41.26.725. An increased benefit may
not be approved by the board until an actuarial cost of the benefit has
been determined by the actuary and contribution rates adjusted as may
be required to maintain the plan on a sound actuarial basis. Increased
benefits as approved by the board shall be presented to the legislature
on January 1st of each year. The increased benefits as approved by the
board shall become effective within ninety days unless a bill is
enacted in the next ensuing session of the legislature, by majority
vote of each house of the legislature, repealing the action of the
board;
(ii) As an alternative to the procedure in (b)(i) of this
subsection, recommend to the legislature changes in the benefits for
members and beneficiaries, without regard to the cost limitations in
RCW 41.26.725(3). Benefits adopted in this manner shall have the same
contractual protections as the minimum benefits in the plan. The
recommendations of the board shall be presented to the legislature on
January 1st of each year. These measures shall take precedence over
all other measures in the legislature, except appropriations bills, and
shall be either enacted or rejected without change or amendment by the
legislature before the end of such regular session;
(c) Retain professional and technical advisors necessary for the
accomplishment of its duties. The cost of these services may be
withdrawn from the trust;
(d) Consult with the department for the purpose of improving
benefit administration and member services;
(e) Provide an annual report to the governor and the legislature
setting forth the actuarial funding status of the plan and making
recommendations for improvements in those aspects of retirement
administration directed by the legislature or administered by the
department;
(f) Establish uniform administrative rules and operating policies
in the manner prescribed by law;
(g) Engage administrative staff and acquire office space
independent of, or in conjunction with, the department. The department
shall provide funding from its budget for these purposes;
(h) Publish on an annual basis a schedule of increased benefits
together with a summary of the minimum benefits as established by the
legislature which shall constitute the official plan document; and
(i) Be the fiduciary of the plan and discharge the board's duties
solely in the interest of the members and beneficiaries of the plan.
(2) Meetings of the board of trustees shall be conducted as
follows:
(a) All board meetings are open to the public, preceded by timely
public notice;
(b) All actions of the board shall be taken in open public session,
except for those matters which may be considered in executive session
as provided by law;
(c) The board shall retain minutes of each meeting setting forth
the names of those board members present and absent, and their voting
record on any voted issue; and
(d) The board may establish, with the assistance of the appropriate
office of state government, an internet web site providing for
interactive communication with state government, members and
beneficiaries of the plan, and the public.
(3) A quorum of the board is six board members. All board actions
require six concurring votes.
(4) The decisions of the board shall be made in good faith and are
final, binding, and conclusive on all parties. The decisions of the
board shall be subject to judicial review as provided by law.
(5) A law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system
((plan 2)) expense fund is established for the purpose of defraying the
expenses of the board. The board shall cause an annual budget to be
prepared consistent with the requirements of chapter 43.88 RCW and
shall draw the funding for the budget from the investment income of the
trust. Board members shall be reimbursed for travel and education
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board shall
make an annual report to the governor, legislature, and state auditor
setting forth a summary of the costs and expenditures of the plan for
the preceding year. The board shall also retain the services of an
independent, certified public accountant who shall annually audit the
expenses of the fund and whose report shall be included in the board's
annual report.

Sec. 10 RCW 41.26.725 and 2003 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of trustees shall establish contributions as set
forth in this section. The cost of the ((minimum benefits as defined
in this plan)) combined plan 1 and plan 2 benefits shall be funded on
the following ratio:

Employee contributions 50%
Employer contributions 30%
State contributions 20%

(2) The minimum benefits shall constitute a contractual obligation
of the state and the contributing employers and may not be reduced
below the levels in effect on July 1, 2003. The state and the
contributing employers shall maintain the minimum benefits on a sound
actuarial basis in accordance with the actuarial standards adopted by
the board.
(3) Increased benefits created as provided for in RCW 41.26.720 are
granted on a basis not to exceed the contributions provided for in this
section. In addition to the contributions necessary to maintain the
minimum benefits, for any increased benefits provided for by the board,
the employee contribution shall not exceed fifty percent of the
actuarial cost of the benefit. In no instance shall the employee cost
exceed ten percent of covered payroll without the consent of a majority
of the affected employees. Employer contributions shall not exceed
thirty percent of the cost, but in no instance shall the employer
contribution exceed six percent of covered payroll. State
contributions shall not exceed twenty percent of the cost, but in no
instance shall the state contribution exceed four percent of covered
payroll. Employer contributions may not be increased above the maximum
under this section without the consent of the governing body of the
employer. State contributions may not be increased above the maximum
provided for in this section without the consent of the legislature.
In the event that the cost of maintaining the increased benefits on a
sound actuarial basis exceeds the aggregate contributions provided for
in this section, the board shall submit to the affected members of the
plan the option of paying the increased costs or of having the
increased benefits reduced to a level sufficient to be maintained by
the aggregate contributions. The reduction of benefits in accordance
with this section shall not be deemed a violation of the contractual
rights of the members, provided that no reduction may result in
benefits being lower than the level of the minimum benefits.
(4) The board shall manage the trust in a manner that maintains
reasonable contributions and administrative costs. Providing
additional benefits to members and beneficiaries is the board's
priority.

Sec. 11 RCW 41.26.732 and 2003 c 92 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system
((plan 2)) expense fund is created within the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' retirement system ((plan 2)) fund.
(2) The state investment board has the full power to invest,
reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investment money in the
expense fund. The state investment board is authorized to adopt
investment policies for the money in the expense fund. All investment
and operating costs associated with the investment of money shall be
paid pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the exception of
these expenses, the earnings from the investment of the money shall be
retained by the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement
system plan 2 fund.
(3) All investments made by the investment board shall be made with
the exercise of that degree of judgment and care pursuant to RCW
43.33A.140 and the investment policy established by the state
investment board.
(4) When appropriate for investment purposes, the state investment
board may commingle money in the expense fund with other funds.
(5) The authority to establish all policies relating to the expense
fund, other than the investment policies as set forth in subsections
(2) through (4) of this section, resides with the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' ((plan 2)) retirement board. With the
exception of investments by, and expenses of, the state investment
board set forth in subsection (2) of this section, disbursements from
this expense fund may be made only on the authorization of the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' ((plan 2)) retirement board,
and money in the expense fund may be spent only for the purposes of
defraying the expenses of the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' ((plan 2)) retirement board as provided in ((section 5,
chapter 2, Laws of 2003)) RCW 41.26.720.
(6) The state investment board shall routinely consult and
communicate with the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' ((plan
2)) retirement board on the investment policy, earnings of the trust,
and related needs of the expense fund.
(7) The law enforcement officers' and firefighters' ((plan 2))
retirement board shall administer the expense fund in a manner
reasonably designed to be actuarially sound. The assets of the expense
fund must be sufficient to defray the obligations of the account
including the costs of administration. Money used for administrative
expenses is not subject to the allotment of all expenditures pursuant
to chapter 43.88 RCW. ((However,)) An appropriation is not required
for expenditures. Administrative expenses include, but are not limited
to, the salaries and expenses of law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' ((plan 2)) retirement board personnel including lease
payments, travel, and goods and services necessary for operation of the
board, audits, and other general costs of conducting the business of
the board.
(8) The state investment board shall allocate from the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system ((plan 2))
fund to the expense fund the amount necessary to cover the expenses of
the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' ((plan 2)) retirement
board.

Sec. 12 RCW 41.45.010 and 2009 c 561 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to provide a dependable and
systematic process for funding the benefits provided to members and
retirees of the public employees' retirement system, chapter 41.40 RCW;
the teachers' retirement system, chapter 41.32 RCW; the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement systems, chapter 41.26 RCW; the
school employees' retirement system, chapter 41.35 RCW; the public
safety employees' retirement system, chapter 41.37 RCW; and the
Washington state patrol retirement system, chapter 43.43 RCW.
The funding process established by this chapter is intended to
achieve the following goals:
(1) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2
and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the school
employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the public safety
employees' retirement system plan 2, and the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' retirement system ((plan 2)) as provided by law;
(2) ((To fully amortize the total costs of the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1, not later than
June 30, 2024;
(3))) To fully amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 within a rolling ten-year period, using
methods and assumptions that balance needs for increased benefit
security, decreased contribution rate volatility, and affordability of
pension contribution rates;
(((4))) (3) To establish long-term employer contribution rates
which will remain a relatively predictable proportion of the future
state budgets; and
(((5))) (4) To fund, to the extent feasible, all benefits for plan
2 and 3 members over the working lives of those members so that the
cost of those benefits are paid by the taxpayers who receive the
benefit of those members' service.

Sec. 13 RCW 41.45.035 and 2009 c 561 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2001, the following long-term economic
assumptions shall be used by the state actuary for the purposes of RCW
41.45.030:
(a) The growth in inflation assumption shall be 3.5 percent;
(b) The growth in salaries assumption, exclusive of merit or
longevity increases, shall be 4.5 percent;
(c) The investment rate of return assumption shall be 8 percent;
and
(d) The growth in system membership assumption shall be 1.25
percent for the public employees' retirement system, the public safety
employees' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system,
and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system.
The assumption shall be .90 percent for the teachers' retirement
system.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2009, the growth in salaries assumption for
the public employees' retirement system, the public safety employees'
retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school
employees' retirement system, ((plan 1 of the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' retirement system,)) and the Washington state patrol
retirement system, exclusive of merit or longevity increases, shall be
the sum of:
(a) The growth in inflation assumption in subsection (1)(a) of this
section; and
(b) The productivity growth assumption of 0.5 percent.
(3)(a) Beginning with actuarial studies done after July 1, 2003,
changes to plan asset values that vary from the long-term investment
rate of return assumption shall be recognized in the actuarial value of
assets over a period that varies up to eight years depending on the
magnitude of the deviation of each year's investment rate of return
relative to the long-term rate of return assumption. Beginning with
actuarial studies performed after July 1, 2004, the actuarial value of
assets shall not be greater than one hundred thirty percent of the
market value of assets as of the valuation date or less than seventy
percent of the market value of assets as of the valuation date.
Beginning April 1, 2004, the council, by affirmative vote of four
councilmembers, may adopt changes to this asset value smoothing
technique. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature.
(b) The state actuary shall periodically review the appropriateness
of the asset smoothing method in this section and recommend changes to
the council as necessary. Any changes adopted by the council shall be
subject to revision by the legislature.
(4) Changes in the long-term economic assumptions, recognition of
asset values that vary from the long-term investment rate of
assumption, or limits on the extent to which the market value of assets
can deviate from the actuarial value of assets used in actuarial
studies on the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement
system shall be adopted by the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement board pursuant to RCW 41.26.720. Any changes
adopted by the board shall not be subject to revision by the
legislature if they are certified as being reasonable by the state
actuary.

Sec. 14 RCW 41.45.050 and 2004 c 242 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Employers of members of the public employees' retirement
system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees'
retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, and
the Washington state patrol retirement system shall make contributions
to those systems based on the rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and
41.45.070.
(2) The state shall make contributions to the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system ((plan 2)) based on the
rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070. The state treasurer
shall transfer the required contributions each month on the basis of
salary data provided by the department.
(3) The department shall bill employers, and the state shall make
contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system ((plan 2)), using the combined rates established in
RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070 regardless of the level of appropriation
provided in the biennial budget. Any member of an affected retirement
system may, by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding, require the
transfer and payment of funds as directed in this section.
(4) The contributions received for the public employees' retirement
system shall be allocated between the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 fund and the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to
fully fund the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the public
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. All
remaining public employees' retirement system employer contributions
shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system plan 1
fund.
(5) The contributions received for the teachers' retirement system
shall be allocated between the plan 1 fund and the combined plan 2 and
plan 3 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the
combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer contribution shall first be
deposited in the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. All remaining
teachers' retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited
in the plan 1 fund.
(6) The contributions received for the school employees' retirement
system shall be allocated between the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 fund and the school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to
fully fund the combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer contribution shall
first be deposited in the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. All
remaining school employees' retirement system employer contributions
shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system plan 1
fund.
(7) The contributions received for the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' retirement system ((plan 2)) shall be deposited in
the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system
((plan 2)) fund.
(8) The contributions received for the public safety employees'
retirement system shall be allocated between the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 fund and the public safety employees'
retirement system plan 2 fund as follows: The contributions necessary
to fully fund the plan 2 employer contribution shall first be deposited
in the plan 2 fund. All remaining public safety employees' retirement
system employer contributions shall be deposited in the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 fund.

Sec. 15 RCW 41.45.060 and 2009 c 561 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state actuary shall provide preliminary actuarial valuation
results based on the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing
technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW 41.45.030 or
41.45.035.
(2) Not later than July 31, 2008, and every two years thereafter,
consistent with the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing
technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW 41.45.030 or
41.45.035, the council shall adopt and may make changes to:
(a) ((A basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1;
(b))) Basic employer contribution rates for the public employees'
retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, and the Washington
state patrol retirement system; and
(((c))) (b) Basic employer contribution rates for the school
employees' retirement system and the public safety employees'
retirement system for funding both those systems and the public
employees' retirement system plan 1.
The council may adopt annual rate changes for any plan for any
rate-setting period. The contribution rates adopted by the council
shall be subject to revision by the legislature.
(3) The employer and state contribution rates adopted by the
council shall be the level percentages of pay that are needed:
(a) ((To fully amortize the total costs of the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 not later than
June 30, 2024;
(b))) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans
2 and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the public
safety employees' retirement system plan 2, and the school employees'
retirement system plans 2 and 3 in accordance with RCW 41.45.061,
41.45.067, and this section; and
(((c))) (b) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system
plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1 in accordance with
RCW 41.45.070, 41.45.150, and this section.
(4) The aggregate actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate
a combined plan 2 and 3 normal cost, a Washington state patrol
retirement system normal cost, and a public safety employees'
retirement system normal cost.
(5) A modified entry age normal cost method, as set forth in this
chapter, shall be used to calculate employer contributions to the
public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement
system plan 1.
(6) The employer contribution rate for the public employees'
retirement system and the school employees' retirement system shall
equal the sum of:
(a) The amount required to pay the combined plan 2 and plan 3
normal cost for the system, subject to any minimum rates applied
pursuant to RCW 41.45.155; plus
(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system over a
rolling ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth
in system membership, and subject to any minimum or maximum rates
applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus
(c) The amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit
improvements in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system that
become effective after June 30, 2009. The cost of each benefit
improvement shall be amortized over a fixed ten-year period using
projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The
amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are
collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant
to RCW 41.45.150.
(7) The employer contribution rate for the public safety employees'
retirement system shall equal the sum of:
(a) The amount required to pay the normal cost for the system,
subject to any minimum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.155; plus
(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system over a
rolling ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth
in system membership, and subject to any minimum or maximum rates
applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus
(c) The amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit
improvements in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system that
become effective after June 30, 2009. The cost of each benefit
improvement shall be amortized over a fixed ten-year period using
projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The
amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are
collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant
to RCW 41.45.150.
(8) The employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement
system shall equal the sum of:
(a) The amount required to pay the combined plan 2 and plan 3
normal cost for the system, subject to any minimum rates applied
pursuant to RCW 41.45.155; plus
(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability in plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system over a rolling
ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in
system membership, and subject to any minimum or maximum rates applied
pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus
(c) The amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit
improvements in plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system that become
effective after June 30, 2009. The cost of each benefit improvement
shall be amortized over a fixed ten-year period using projected future
salary growth and growth in system membership. The amounts required
under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition
to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150.
(9) The council shall immediately notify the directors of the
office of financial management and department of retirement systems of
the state and employer contribution rates adopted. The rates shall be
effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative
modifications.
(10) The director shall collect those rates adopted by the council.
The rates established in RCW 41.45.062, or by the council, shall be
subject to revision by the legislature.
(11) The state actuary shall prepare final actuarial valuation
results based on the economic assumptions, asset value smoothing
technique, and contribution rates included in or adopted under RCW
41.45.030, 41.45.035, and this section.

Sec. 16 RCW 41.45.0604 and 2007 c 280 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Not later than July 31, ((2008)) 2012, and every even-numbered
year thereafter, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' ((plan
2)) retirement board shall adopt contribution rates for the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 and
plan 2 as provided in RCW 41.26.720(1)(a).
(2) The law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2
retirement board shall immediately notify the directors of the office
of financial management and department of retirement systems of the
state, employer, and employee rates adopted. Thereafter, the director
shall collect those rates adopted by the board. The rates shall be
effective for the ensuing biennial period, and are not subject to any
legislative modifications if they are certified as being reasonable by
the state actuary.

Sec. 17 RCW 41.45.067 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 14 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any increase in the contribution rate required as the result of
a failure of the state or of an employer to make any contribution
required by this section shall be borne in full by the state or by that
employer not making the contribution.
(2) The director shall notify all employers of any pending
adjustment in the required contribution rate and such pending
adjustment in the required contribution rate and any increase shall be
announced at least thirty days prior to the effective date of the
change.
(3) Members' contributions required by RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.061
shall be deducted from the members' compensation each payroll period.
The members' contribution and the employers' contribution shall be
remitted directly to the department within fifteen days following the
end of the calendar month during which the payroll period ends.
(4) The state's contribution required for the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1 or plan 2 shall be
transferred to the appropriate fund from the total contributions
transferred by the state treasurer under RCW 41.45.050.

Sec. 18 RCW 41.45.070 and 2009 c 561 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the basic employer contribution rate established
in RCW 41.45.060 ((or 41.45.054)), the department shall also charge
employers of public employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement
system, school employees' retirement system, public safety employees'
retirement system, or Washington state patrol retirement system members
an additional supplemental rate to pay for the cost of additional
benefits, if any, granted to members of those systems. Except as
provided in subsections (6), (7), and (9) of this section, the
supplemental contribution rates required by this section shall be
calculated by the state actuary and shall be charged regardless of
language to the contrary contained in the statute which authorizes
additional benefits.
(2) In addition to the basic member, employer, and state
contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.0604 for the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system ((plan 2)), the
department shall also establish supplemental rates to pay for the cost
of additional benefits, if any, granted to members of the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system ((plan 2)).
Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, these
supplemental rates shall be calculated by the actuary retained by the
law enforcement officers' and firefighters' board and the state actuary
through the process provided in RCW 41.26.720(1)(a) and the state
treasurer shall transfer the additional required contributions
regardless of language to the contrary contained in the statute which
authorizes the additional benefits.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2009, the supplemental rate charged under
this section to fund benefit increases provided to active members of
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 shall be calculated as the level percentage of
all system pay needed to fund the cost of the benefit over a fixed ten-year period, using projected future salary growth and growth in system
membership. The supplemental rate to fund benefit increases provided
to active members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1
shall be charged to all system employers in the public employees'
retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, and the
public safety employees' retirement system. The supplemental rate to
fund benefit increases provided to active members of the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 shall be charged to all system employers in
the teachers' retirement system.
(4) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
benefit increases provided to active and retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the teachers'
retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the public safety employees'
retirement system plan 2, the school employees' retirement system plan
2 and plan 3, or the Washington state patrol retirement system shall be
calculated as the level percentage of all members' pay needed to fund
the cost of the benefit, as calculated under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061,
41.45.0631, or 41.45.067.
(5) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
postretirement adjustments which are provided on a nonautomatic basis
to current retirees shall be calculated as the percentage of pay needed
to fund the adjustments as they are paid to the retirees. Beginning
July 1, 2009, the supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
increases in the automatic postretirement adjustments for active or
retired members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and
the teachers' retirement system plan 1 shall be calculated as the level
percentage of pay needed to fund the cost of the automatic adjustments
over a fixed ten-year period, using projected future salary growth and
growth in system membership. The supplemental rate to fund increases
in the automatic postretirement adjustments for active members or
retired members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 shall
be charged to all system employers in the public employees' retirement
system, the school employees' retirement system, and the public safety
employees' retirement system. The supplemental rate to fund increases
in automatic postretirement adjustments for active members or retired
members of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 shall be charged to
all system employers in the teachers' retirement system.
(6) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 340, Laws of
1998.
(7) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW;
section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998; or section 701, chapter 341,
Laws of 1998.
(8) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members and survivors pursuant to
chapter 94, Laws of 2006.
(9) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
the additional benefits granted to members of the teachers' retirement
system and the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3 in
sections 2, 4, 6, and 8, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 until September 1,
2008. A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
the additional benefits granted to members of the public employees'
retirement system plans 2 and 3 under sections 9 and 10, chapter 491,
Laws of 2007 until July 1, 2008.

Sec. 19 RCW 41.04.278 and 2006 c 309 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The select committee on pension policy may form three function-specific subcommittees, as set forth under subsection (2) of this
section, from the members under RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e), as
follows:
(a) A public safety subcommittee with one member from each group
under RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e);
(b) An education subcommittee with one member from each group under
RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e); and
(c) A state and local government subcommittee, with one retiree
member under RCW 41.04.276(1)(d) and two members from each group under
RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (c) and (e).
The retiree members may serve on more than one subcommittee to
ensure representation on each subcommittee.
(2)(a) The public safety subcommittee shall focus on pension issues
affecting public safety employees who are members of the ((law
enforcement officers' and firefighters',)) public safety
employees'((,)) and Washington state patrol retirement systems.
(b) The education subcommittee shall focus on pension issues
affecting educational employees who are members of the public
employees', teachers', and school employees' retirement systems.
(c) The state and local government subcommittee shall focus on
pension issues affecting state and local government employees who are
members of the public employees' retirement system.

Sec. 20 RCW 41.50.255 and 2004 c 242 s 49 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director is authorized to pay from the interest earnings of
the trust funds of the public employees' retirement system, the
teachers' retirement system, the Washington state patrol retirement
system, the Washington judicial retirement system, the judges'
retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, the public
safety employees' retirement system, or the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' retirement system lawful obligations of the
appropriate system for legal expenses and medical expenses which
expenses are primarily incurred for the purpose of protecting the
appropriate trust fund or are incurred in compliance with statutes
governing such funds.
The term "legal expense" includes, but is not limited to, legal
services provided through the legal services revolving fund, fees for
expert witnesses, travel expenses, fees for court reporters, cost of
transcript preparation, and reproduction of documents.
The term "medical costs" includes, but is not limited to, expenses
for the medical examination or reexamination of members or retirees,
the costs of preparation of medical reports, and fees charged by
medical professionals for attendance at discovery proceedings or
hearings.
The director may also pay from the interest earnings of the trust
funds specified in this section costs incurred in investigating fraud
and collecting overpayments, including expenses incurred to review and
investigate cases of possible fraud against the trust funds and
collection agency fees and other costs incurred in recovering
overpayments. Recovered funds must be returned to the appropriate
trust funds.
(2) The law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement
board is authorized to pay from the interest earnings of the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system trust fund
lawful obligations for legal expenses that are primarily incurred for
the purpose of protecting the trust fund or incurred in compliance with
statutes governing the fund.

Sec. 21 RCW 43.84.092 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 6, 2011 1st sp.s.
c 7 s 22, 2011 c 369 s 6, 2011 c 339 s 1, 2011 c 311 s 9, 2011 c 272 s
3, 2011 c 120 s 3, and 2011 c 83 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the budget stabilization account,
the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin
taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin
water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction
fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the Interstate 405
express toll lanes operations account, the education construction fund,
the education legacy trust account, the election account, the energy
freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail
assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the freight
mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account,
the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account,
the health system capacity account, the high capacity transportation
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher
education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the
highway infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high
occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital safety net
assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the
judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold
excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local
sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust
account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
multiagency permitting team account, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public
transportation systems account, the public works assistance account,
the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry
operations account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account,
the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management
cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility
grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the site closure
account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small
city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the
special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the
state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route number 520
civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account,
the state wildlife account, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account),
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain
injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement
system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system ((plan 1)) retirement account, ((the Washington
law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement
account,)) the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state economic development
commission account, the Washington state health insurance pool account,
the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Section 1 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---