BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.36.010 and 2009 c 521 s 184 and 2009 c 333 s 54 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agriculture or wildlife professional" means a person who is,
by virtue of academic or professional training, able to identify
wildlife interactions and identify the loss of value to commercial
crops or commercial livestock due to wildlife interactions.
(2) "Claim" means an application to the department for compensation
under this chapter.
(((2))) (3) "Commercial crop" means a horticultural or agricultural
product, including the growing or harvested product. For the purposes
of this chapter all parts of horticultural trees shall be considered a
commercial crop and shall be eligible for claims.
(((3))) (4) "Commercial livestock" means cattle, sheep, and horses
held or raised by a person for sale.
(((4))) (5) "Compensation" means a cash payment, materials, or
service.
(((5))) (6) "Damage" means economic losses caused by wildlife
interactions.
(((6))) (7) "Immediate family member" means spouse, state
registered domestic partner, brother, sister, grandparent, parent,
child, or grandchild.
(((7))) (8) "Owner" means a person who has a legal right to
commercial crops, commercial livestock, or other property that was
damaged during a wildlife interaction.
(((8))) (9) "Wildlife interaction" means the negative interaction
and the resultant damage between wildlife and commercial crops,
commercial livestock, or other property.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.36.100 and 2009 c 333 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) ((Except as limited by RCW 77.36.070 and 77.36.080,)) The
department shall ((offer to)) distribute money ((appropriated)) to pay
claims to the owner of commercial crops for damage caused by wild deer
or elk or to the owners of commercial livestock that has been killed by
bears, wolves, or cougars, or injured by bears, wolves, or cougars to
such a degree that the market value of the commercial livestock has
been diminished. ((Payments for claims for damage to commercial
livestock are not subject to the limitations of RCW 77.36.070 and
77.36.080, but may not exceed the total amount specifically
appropriated therefor.)) The department shall pay all valid claims made
by owners without the ability to deny or condition the claim and
without requiring documentation beyond the claim filed by the owner.
However, all claims valued by the owner at greater than one thousand
dollars must be accompanied by a third-party damage assessment produced
and attested to by an agriculture or wildlife professional hired by the
owner.
(b) Owners of commercial crops or commercial livestock are only
eligible for a claim under this subsection if((:
(i))) the owner satisfies the definition of "eligible farmer" in
RCW 82.08.855((;
(ii))) and the conditions of RCW 77.36.110 have been satisfied((;
and
(iii) The damage caused to the commercial crop or commercial
livestock satisfies the criteria for damage established by the
commission under this subsection.
(c) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria that
clarifies the damage to commercial crops and commercial livestock
qualifying for compensation under this subsection. An owner of a
commercial crop or commercial livestock must satisfy the criteria prior
to receiving compensation under this subsection. The criteria for
damage adopted under this subsection must include, but not be limited
to, a required minimum economic loss to the owner of the commercial
crop or commercial livestock, which may not be set at a value of less
than five hundred dollars)).
(2)(a) The department may offer to provide noncash compensation
only to offset wildlife interactions to a person who applies to the
department for compensation for damage to property other than
commercial crops or commercial livestock that is the result of a
mammalian or avian species of wildlife on a case-specific basis if the
conditions of RCW 77.36.110 have been satisfied and if the damage
satisfies the criteria for damage established by the commission under
this subsection.
(b) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria for
damage to property other than a commercial crop or commercial livestock
that is damaged by wildlife and may be eligible for compensation under
this subsection, including criteria for filing a claim for compensation
under this subsection.
(3)(a) To prevent or offset wildlife interactions, the department
may offer materials or services to a person who applies to the
department for assistance in providing mitigating actions designed to
reduce wildlife interactions if the actions are designed to address
damage that satisfies the criteria for damage established by the
commission under this subsection.
(b) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria for
mitigating actions designed to address wildlife interactions that may
be eligible for materials and services under this section, including
criteria for submitting an application under this section.
(((4) An owner who files a claim under this section may appeal the
decision of the department pursuant to rules adopted by the commission
if the claim:
(a) Is denied; or
(b) Is disputed by the owner and the owner disagrees with the
amount of compensation determined by the department.))

Sec. 3 RCW 77.36.120 and 2009 c 333 s 57 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall establish:
(1) The form ((of affidavits or proof required to accompany all))
for claims under this chapter, which must be made available for
download on the department internet web site;
(2) ((The process, time, and methods used to identify and assess
damage, including the anticipated timeline for the initiation and
conclusion of department action;
(3))) How claims will be prioritized when available funds for
reimbursement are limited; and
(((4))) (3) Timelines after the discovery of damage by which an
owner must file a claim or notify the department((;
(5) Protocols for an owner to follow if the owner wishes to
undertake activities that would complicate the determination of
damages, such as harvesting damaged crops;
(6) The process for determining damage assessments, including the
role and selection of professional damage assessors and the
responsibility for reimbursing third-party assessors for their
services;
(7) Timelines for a claimant to accept, reject, or appeal a
determination made by the department;
(8) The identification of instances when an owner would be
ineligible for compensation;
(9) An appeals process for an owner eligible for compensation under
RCW 77.36.100 who is denied a claim or feels the compensation is
insufficient; and
(10) Other policies necessary for administering this chapter)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 77.36.070 (Limit on total claims from wildlife account per
fiscal year) and 2009 c 333 s 59 & 1996 c 54 s 8;
(2) RCW 77.36.080 (Limit on total claims from general fund per
fiscal year -- Emergency exceptions) and 2009 c 333 s 60 & 1996 c 54 s 9;
(3) RCW 77.36.130 (Limit on cash compensation -- Burden of proof) and
2009 c 333 s 58; and
(4) RCW 77.36.150 (Review of rules and policies) and 2009 c 333 s
64.

--- END ---