BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.55.060 and 1989 c 111 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The address that the tow truck operator lists on his or her
application shall be the business location of the firm where its files
are kept. Each separate business location requires a separate
registration under this chapter. The application shall also list all
locations of secure areas for vehicle storage and redemption.
(2) Before an additional lot may be used for vehicle storage, it
must be inspected and approved by the state patrol. The lot must also
be inspected and approved on an annual basis for continued use.
(3) Each business location must have a sign displaying the firm's
name that is readable from the street.
(4) At the business locations listed where vehicles may be
redeemed, the registered operator shall post in a conspicuous and
accessible location:
(a) All pertinent licenses and permits to operate as a registered
tow truck operator;
(b) The current towing and storage charges itemized on a form
approved by the department;
(c) The vehicle redemption procedure and rights;
(d) Information supplied by the department as to where complaints
regarding either equipment or service are to be directed;
(e) Information concerning the acceptance of commercially
reasonable tender as defined in RCW 46.55.120(1)(((b))) (e).
(5) The department shall adopt rules concerning fencing and
security requirements of storage areas, which may provide for
modifications or exemptions where needed to achieve compliance with
local zoning laws.
(6) On any day when the registered tow truck operator holds the
towing services open for business, the business office shall remain
open with personnel present who are able to release impounded vehicles
in accordance with this chapter and the rules adopted under it. The
normal business hours of a towing service shall be from 8:00 a.m. to
5:00 p.m. on weekdays, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. A
registered tow truck operator may close the business office for a lunch
break not to exceed one hour if a notice is posted visible from the
outside providing a telephone number at which personnel that is able to
release impounded vehicles may be contacted to respond in a reasonable
time.
(7) A registered tow truck operator shall maintain personnel who
can be contacted twenty-four hours a day to release impounded vehicles
within a reasonable time.
(8) A registered operator shall provide access to a telephone for
any person redeeming a vehicle, at the time of redemption.

--- END ---