BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.76.100 and 1961 c 61 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is hereby declared that it is in the public interest to hold
agricultural fairs, including the exhibition of livestock and
agricultural produce of all kinds, as well as related arts and
manufactures; including products of the farm home and educational
contest, displays, and demonstrations designed to train youth and to
promote the welfare of farm people and rural living. Fairs qualifying
hereunder shall be eligible for allocations from the state fair fund
and for capital funding when appropriated to the department of
agriculture, as provided in this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.76.110 and 1961 c 61 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Agricultural fair" means a fair or exhibition which is
intended to promote agriculture by including a balanced variety of
exhibits of livestock and agricultural products, as well as related
arts and manufactures; including products of the farm home, and
educational contests, displays, and demonstrations designed to train
youth and to promote the welfare of farm people and rural living.
(2) "Department" means the state department of agriculture.
(3) "Director" ((shall)) means the director of agriculture.
(4) "Commission" ((shall)) means the fairs commission created by
this chapter.
(5) "State allocations" ((shall)) means allocations from the state
fair fund.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.76.165 and 2005 c 443 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Any county which owns or leases property from another
governmental agency and provides such property for area or county and
district agricultural fair purposes may apply to the director for
special assistance in carrying out necessary capital improvements to
such property and maintenance of the appurtenances thereto.)) (1)
Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific
purpose, the department may provide capital funding to local
governments and nonprofit organizations, on a competitive basis, to
support capital projects that make health or safety improvements to
agricultural fair grounds or fair facilities in order to benefit
participants and the fair-going public.
(2) The department shall develop and manage appropriate contracts
with the selected applicants, monitor project expenditures and grantee
performance, report project and contract information, and exercise due
diligence and other contract management responsibilities.
(a) The department shall include provisions in the contracts which
require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a
specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and
that facilities must be used for the express purpose of the grant.
(b) If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions
of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

--- END ---