BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An applicant for a journeyman certificate of competency under
RCW 19.28.191(1)(f) or a specialty electrician certificate of
competency under RCW 19.28.191(1)(g) must demonstrate to the
satisfaction of the department completion of in-class education as
follows:
(a) Twenty-four hours of in-class education if two thousand hours
or more but less than four thousand hours of work are required for the
certificate;
(b) Forty-eight hours of in-class education if four thousand or
more but less than six thousand hours of work are required for the
certificate;
(c) Seventy-two hours of in-class education if six thousand or more
but less than eight thousand hours of work are required for the
certificate;
(d) Ninety-six hours of in-class education if eight thousand or
more hours of work are required for the certificate.
(2) For purposes of this section, "in-class education" means
approved classroom training covering this chapter, the national
electric code, or electrical theory; or equivalent classroom training
taken as part of an approved apprenticeship program under chapter 49.04
RCW or an approved electrical training program under RCW
19.28.191(1)(h).
(3) Classroom training taken to qualify for trainee certificate
renewal under RCW 19.28.161 qualifies as in-class education under this
section.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.28.181 and 2001 c 211 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person desiring to be issued a certificate of competency as
provided in this chapter shall deliver evidence in a form prescribed by
the department affirming that said person has met the qualifications
required under RCW 19.28.191 and section 1 of this act. An electrician
from another jurisdiction applying for a certificate of competency must
provide evidence in a form prescribed by the department affirming that
the person has the equivalent qualifications to those required under
RCW 19.28.191.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.28.211 and 2009 c 36 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a certificate of competency to all
applicants who have passed the examination provided in RCW 19.28.201,
met the in-class education requirements of section 1 of this act if
applicable, and who have complied with RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271
and the rules adopted under this chapter. The certificate may include
a photograph of the holder. The certificate shall bear the date of
issuance, and shall expire on the holder's birthday. The certificate
shall be renewed every three years, upon application, on or before the
holder's birthdate. A fee shall be assessed for each certificate and
for each annual renewal.
(2) If the certificate holder demonstrates to the department that
he or she has satisfactorily completed an annual eight-hour continuing
education course, the certificate may be renewed without examination by
appropriate application unless the certificate has been revoked,
suspended, or not renewed within ninety days after the expiration date.
For pump and irrigation or domestic pump specialty electricians, the
continuing education course may combine both electrical and plumbing
education provided that there is a minimum of four hours of electrical
training in the course.
(a) The contents and requirements for satisfactory completion of
the continuing education course shall be determined by the director and
approved by the board.
(b) The department shall accept proof of a certificate holder's
satisfactory completion of a continuing education course offered in
another state as meeting the requirements for maintaining a current
Washington state certificate of competency if the department is
satisfied the course is comparable in nature to that required in
Washington state for maintaining a current certificate of competency.
(3) If the certificate is not renewed before the expiration date,
the individual shall pay twice the usual fee. The department shall set
the fees by rule for issuance and renewal of a certificate of
competency. The fees shall cover but not exceed the costs of issuing
the certificates and of administering and enforcing the electrician
certification requirements of this chapter.
(4) The certificates of competency and temporary permits provided
for in this chapter grant the holder the right to work in the
electrical construction trade as a master electrician, journeyman
electrician, or specialty electrician in accordance with their
provisions throughout the state and within any of its political
subdivisions without additional proof of competency or any other
license, permit, or fee to engage in such work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2013.

--- END ---