BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.19.760 and 1985 c 188 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the policy of the state for the management of risks to which
it is exposed to apply the following principles consistently in a state
program of risk management:
(1) To identify those liability and property risks which may have
a significant economic impact on the state;
(2) To identify trends and developments in individual agencies'
risks and liabilities in order to minimize the state's fiscal exposure;
(3) To evaluate risk in terms of the state's ability to fund
potential loss rather than the ability of an individual agency to fund
potential loss;
(((3))) (4) To eliminate or improve conditions and practices which
contribute to loss whenever practical;
(((4))) (5) To assume risks to the maximum extent practical;
(((5))) (6) To provide flexibility within the state program to meet
the unique requirements of any state agency for insurance coverage or
service;
(((6))) (7) To purchase commercial insurance:
(a) When the size and nature of the potential loss make it in the
best interest of the state to purchase commercial insurance; or
(b) When the fiduciary of encumbered property insists on commercial
insurance; or
(c) When the interest protected is not a state interest and an
insurance company is desirable as an intermediary; or
(d) When services provided by an insurance company are considered
necessary; or
(e) When services or coverages provided by an insurance company are
cost-effective; or
(f) When otherwise required by statute; and
(((7))) (8) To develop plans for the management and protection of
the revenues and assets of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The risk management review process is established. The purpose
of the risk management review process is to evaluate claims information
of state agencies with relatively high claim payments in order to
identify claim trends and patterns, and opportunities for corrective
action.
(2) If in any fiscal year payments from the liability account under
RCW 4.92.130 attributable to any single state agency exceed one million
dollars, exclusive of defense costs, then by December 31st of the
following fiscal year a risk management review team shall conduct a
risk management review of that agency and prepare a report as required
by this section. For purposes of this section, "state agency" means
"state agency" as defined in RCW 43.19.763.
(3) The risk management review team for an agency consists of:
(a) The agency head, or his or her designee;
(b) The agency risk manager;
(c) The director of the office of financial management's risk
management division, or his or her designee; and
(d) An assistant attorney general designated by the office of the
attorney general.
(4) In conducting the risk management review, the risk management
team must analyze factors that resulted in indemnity payments
attributable to the agency. The analysis must include, but is not
limited to:
(a) A review of data on agency claims and payments from the
liability account as prepared by the risk management division and the
agency;
(b) Identification of patterns and trends in the claims that
resulted in indemnity payments attributable to the agency;
(c) Analysis of the extent to which the actions of third parties
resulted in indemnity payments attributable to the agency;
(d) Analysis of the role of agency rules and policies in the
agency's liability, and determining whether these rules and policies,
or the absence thereof, affects risks that resulted in indemnity
payments;
(e) Evaluation of the role of statutory and common law in
establishing the risks that resulted in indemnity payments;
(f) Where certain activities are identified as posing particular
risks, evaluation of the benefit of providing the service to the public
in light of the risk posed to state resources and to the public; and
(g) Identification of a risk management action plan. The action
plan must identify (i) tangible, discrete actions to be taken to reduce
liability resulting from the identified risks; and (ii) any barriers to
these actions. The plan must include actions that may be taken within
the agency's existing resources and statutory authority, and it may
include actions that require additional resources or changes to
statutory authority.
(5) The risk management review team shall prepare a report
summarizing the risk team's analyses and risk management action plan as
required in subsection (4) of this section, along with any other
relevant information, analysis, or recommendations. The report must be
filed with the office of financial management's risk management
division, the attorney general, and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature by the following March 1st.
(6) Documents prepared during the course of a risk management
review are subject to the same restrictions on disclosure and
admissibility as are final reports of a loss prevention review team
under RCW 43.41.380.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.19.781 and 1989 c 419 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office of risk management shall establish a coordinated
safety and loss control program to reduce liability exposure, safeguard
state assets, and reduce costs associated with state liability and
property losses.
(2) State agencies shall provide top management support and
commitment to safety and loss control, and develop awareness through
education, training, and information sharing.
(3) The office of risk management shall develop and maintain
centralized loss history information for the purpose of identifying and
analyzing risk exposures. Loss history information shall be privileged
and confidential and reported only to appropriate agencies.
(4) The office of risk management shall develop methods of
statistically monitoring agency and statewide effectiveness in
controlling losses.
(5) The office of risk management will routinely review agency loss
control programs as appropriate to suggest improvements, and observe
and recognize successful safety policies and procedures.
(6) The office of risk management shall provide direct assistance
to smaller state agencies in technical aspects of proper safety and
loss control procedures, upon request.
(7) The office of risk management shall participate in and provide
data and administrative support for risk management reviews conducted
by risk management review teams as provided in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of the attorney general shall designate assistant
attorneys general to participate in risk management reviews as provided
in section 2 of this act.

--- END ---