BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is important
for the public to know what the charges and fees will be for the
private impound of cars and other vehicles parked on private property,
and that those charges should be uniform and reasonable throughout the
state.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.55.030 and 2010 c 8 s 9061 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for licensing as a registered tow truck operator
shall be made on forms furnished by the department, shall be
accompanied by an inspection certification from the Washington state
patrol, shall be signed by the applicant or an agent, and shall include
the following information:
(a) The name and address of the person, firm, partnership,
association, or corporation under whose name the business is to be
conducted;
(b) The names and addresses of all persons having an interest in
the business, or if the owner is a corporation, the names and addresses
of the officers of the corporation;
(c) The names and addresses of all employees who serve as tow truck
drivers;
(d) Proof of minimum insurance required by subsection (((3))) (4)
of this section;
(e) The vehicle license and vehicle identification numbers of all
tow trucks of which the applicant is the registered owner;
(f) Any other information the department may require; and
(g) A certificate of approval from the Washington state patrol
certifying that:
(i) The applicant has an established place of business and that
mail is received at the address shown on the application;
(ii) The address of any storage locations where vehicles may be
stored is correctly stated on the application;
(iii) The place of business has an office area that is accessible
to the public without entering the storage area; ((and))
(iv) The place of business has adequate and secure storage
facilities, as defined in this chapter and the rules of the department,
where vehicles and their contents can be properly stored and protected;
and
(v) All persons having an interest in the business, or if the owner
is a corporation all officers of the corporation, and all employees who
serve as tow truck drivers meet the criminal background requirements
set by rule by the Washington state patrol for the issuance of a letter
of appointment to provide towing services.
(2) If the applicant is granted a registration certificate, the
operator shall notify the Washington state patrol and the department of
any changes in ownership or corporate officers and notify the
Washington state patrol of any new employee hires who serve as tow
truck drivers within three days of hiring. The new owners or officers
of the company or new employees who serve as tow truck drivers must
meet the same criminal background requirements required under
subsection (1)(g)(v) of this section.
(3) Before issuing a registration certificate to an applicant the
department shall require the applicant to file with the department a
surety bond in the amount of five thousand dollars running to the state
and executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this
state. The bond shall be approved as to form by the attorney general
and conditioned that the operator shall conduct his or her business in
conformity with the provisions of this chapter pertaining to abandoned
or unauthorized vehicles, and to compensate any person, company, or the
state for failure to comply with this chapter or the rules adopted
hereunder, or for fraud, negligence, or misrepresentation in the
handling of these vehicles. Any person injured by the tow truck
operator's failure to fully perform duties imposed by this chapter and
the rules adopted hereunder, or an ordinance or resolution adopted by
a city, town, or county is entitled to recover actual damages,
including reasonable attorney's fees against the surety and the tow
truck operator. Successive recoveries against the bond shall be
permitted, but the aggregate liability of the surety to all persons
shall not exceed the amount of the bond. As a condition of authority
to do business, the operator shall keep the bond in full force and
effect. Failure to maintain the penalty value of the bond or
cancellation of the bond by the surety automatically cancels the
operator's registration.
(((3))) (4) Before the department may issue a registration
certificate to an applicant, the applicant shall provide proof of
minimum insurance requirements of:
(a) One hundred thousand dollars for liability for bodily injury or
property damage per occurrence; and
(b) Fifty thousand dollars of legal liability per occurrence, to
protect against vehicle damage, including but not limited to fire and
theft, from the time a vehicle comes into the custody of an operator
until it is redeemed or sold.
Cancellation of or failure to maintain the insurance required by
(a) and (b) of this subsection automatically cancels the operator's
registration.
(((4))) (5) The fee for each original registration and annual
renewal is one hundred dollars per company, plus fifty dollars per
truck. The department shall forward the registration fee to the state
treasurer for deposit in the motor vehicle fund.
(((5))) (6) The applicant must submit an inspection certificate
from the state patrol before the department may issue or renew an
operator's registration certificate or tow truck permits.
(((6))) (7) Upon approval of the application, the department shall
issue a registration certificate to the registered operator to be
displayed prominently at the operator's place of business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For a private impound performed by any registered tow truck
operator using tow trucks classified by the Washington state patrol by
rule pursuant to RCW 46.55.050(1) as class A, class E, or class D only,
the following limitations apply:
(a) The maximum towing hourly rate listed on the fee schedule filed
with the department pursuant to RCW 46.55.063(1) may be no more than
one hundred fifty percent of the maximum hourly rate for a class A tow
truck at the time of filing as negotiated by the Washington state
patrol, pursuant to rule, and contained in the letter of contractual
agreement and letter of appointment authorizing a registered tow truck
operator to respond to state patrol-originated calls.
(b) The maximum daily storage rate listed on the fee schedule filed
with the department pursuant to RCW 46.55.063(1) may be no more than
one hundred fifty percent of the maximum daily storage rate for an
impound at the time of filing as negotiated by the Washington state
patrol, pursuant to rule, and contained in the letter of contractual
agreement and letter of appointment authorizing a registered tow truck
operator to respond to state patrol-originated calls.
(c) The maximum after hours release fee listed on the fee schedule
filed with the department pursuant to RCW 46.55.063(1) may be no more
than one hundred percent of the maximum after hours release fee for an
impound at the time of filing as negotiated by the Washington state
patrol, pursuant to rule, and contained in the letter of contractual
agreement and letter of appointment authorizing a registered tow truck
operator to respond to state patrol-originated calls.
(2) The limitations set out in subsection (1) of this section apply
to all registered tow truck operators whether or not they hold, have
applied for, or received letters of appointment from the Washington
state patrol to respond to state patrol-originated calls.
(3) The limitations set out in subsection (1) of this section do
not apply to:
(a) Any other classes of tow trucks classified by the Washington
state patrol by rule pursuant to RCW 46.55.050(1); or
(b) Law enforcement impounds or private voluntary towing.
(4) The limitations set out in subsection (1) of this section only
apply if the vehicle is parked and upright, has all its wheels and
tires attached, does not have a broken axle, and has not been involved
in an accident at the location from which it is being impounded.

--- END ---