BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Ceremonially or religiously prepared food" means a food
product that has been prepared, processed, manufactured, maintained, or
sold in accordance with the requisites of traditional ceremonial or
religious dietary laws or practices, such as halal or kosher products.
(2) "Food product" includes any article other than drugs, whether
in raw or prepared form, liquid or solid, or packaged or unpackaged,
and that is used for human consumption.
(3) "Person" includes individuals, partnerships, corporations, and
associations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) No person may knowingly sell or offer
for sale any ceremonially or religiously prepared food unless the food
is conspicuously labeled as a ceremonially or religiously prepared
food, including the name of the practice followed in its production.
(2) A person violating this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 69 RCW.

--- END ---