BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.210 and 2011 c 280 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
A basic education is ((an evolving)) a program of instruction that
is intended to provide students with the opportunity to ((become
responsible and respectful global citizens, to)) gain knowledge and
skills to become globally competitive citizens. A basic education
should contribute to their economic well-being and that of their
families and communities, ((to explore and understand different
perspectives,)) and to enhance their opportunity to enjoy productive
and satisfying lives. Additionally, the state of Washington intends to
provide for a public school system that ((is able to evolve and adapt
in order to better focus on strengthening)) will strengthen the
educational achievement of all students, which includes high
expectations for all students and gives all students the opportunity to
achieve personal and academic success. To these ends, the goals of
each school district, with the involvement of parents and community
members, shall be to provide opportunities for every student to develop
the knowledge and skills essential to:
(1) Read with comprehension, write effectively, and communicate
successfully in a variety of ways and settings and with a variety of
audiences;
(2) Know and apply the core concepts and principles of mathematics;
social, physical, and life sciences; civics and history, ((including
different cultures and participation in representative)) emphasizing
the foundations of our constitutional republic form of government in
this sovereign state and country; geography; arts; ((and)) health and
fitness; and a focus on academic accuracy and a sound understanding of
mathematical and scientific facts;
(3) Think analytically, independently, logically, and creatively,
and to integrate technology literacy and fluency as well as different
experiences and knowledge to form reasoned judgments and solve
problems; and
(4) Understand the importance of work and finance and how
performance, effort, and decisions directly affect future career and
educational opportunities.

--- END ---