BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.320.230 and 1989 c 371 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every school district board of directors, unless otherwise
specifically provided by law, shall:
(1) Prepare, negotiate, set forth in writing and adopt, policy
relative to the selection or deletion of instructional materials. Such
policy shall:
(a) State the school district's goals and principles relative to
instructional materials;
(b) Delegate responsibility for the preparation and recommendation
of teachers' reading lists and specify the procedures to be followed in
the selection of all instructional materials including text books;
(c) Establish an instructional materials committee to be appointed,
with the approval of the school board, by the school district's chief
administrative officer. This committee shall consist of representative
members of the district's professional staff, including representation
from the district's curriculum development committees, and, in the case
of districts which operate elementary school(s) only, the educational
service district superintendent, one of whose responsibilities shall be
to assure the correlation of those elementary district adoptions with
those of the high school district(s) which serve their children. The
committee may include parents at the school board's discretion:
PROVIDED, That parent members shall make up less than one-half of the
total membership of the committee;
(d) Provide for reasonable notice to parents of the opportunity to
serve on the committee and for terms of office for members of the
instructional materials committee;
(e) Provide a system for receiving, considering and acting upon
written complaints regarding instructional materials used by the school
district;
(f) Provide free text books, supplies and other instructional
materials to be loaned to the pupils of the school, when, in its
judgment, the best interests of the district will be subserved thereby
and prescribe rules and regulations to preserve such books, supplies
and other instructional materials from unnecessary damage.
Recommendation of instructional materials shall be by the
district's instructional materials committee in accordance with
district policy. Approval or disapproval shall be by the local school
district's board of directors.
Districts may pay the necessary travel and subsistence expenses for
expert counsel from outside the district. In addition, the committee's
expenses incidental to visits to observe other districts' selection
procedures may be reimbursed by the school district.
Districts may, within limitations stated in board policy, use and
experiment with instructional materials for a period of time before
general adoption is formalized.
Within the limitations of board policy, a school district's chief
administrator may purchase instructional materials to meet deviant
needs or rapidly changing circumstances.
(2) Establish a depreciation scale for determining the value of
texts which students wish to purchase.
(3) Make available to the public in a single location determined by
the board, such as a school library, a complete set of the textbooks,
pamphlets, workbooks, and other instructional materials, including
online materials, used for instruction in each classroom in each school
in the district. The board of directors must also list each of the
names and publishers of textbooks and other instructional materials
used in the schools on the district web site. The hours of
availability and location of the collection must be clearly displayed
on the web site. It is the intent of the legislature that a copy of
all instructional materials be available for viewing by the public
during regular school hours, and therefore materials may be restricted
to on-site inspection only.

--- END ---