BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.28.010 and 1999 c 151 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the
following words and phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter shall
have the following meanings:
(1) "Debt adjusting" means the managing, counseling, settling,
adjusting, prorating, or liquidating of the indebtedness of a debtor,
or receiving funds for the purpose of distributing said funds among
creditors in payment or partial payment of obligations of a debtor.
(2) "Debt adjuster", which includes any person known as a debt
pooler, debt manager, debt consolidator, debt prorater, or credit
counselor, is any person engaging in or holding himself or herself out
as engaging in the business of debt adjusting for compensation. The
term shall not include:
(a) Attorneys-at-law, escrow agents, accountants, broker-dealers in
securities, or investment advisors in securities, while performing
services solely incidental to the practice of their professions;
(b) Any person, partnership, association, or corporation doing
business under and as permitted by any law of this state or of the
United States relating to banks, consumer finance businesses, consumer
loan companies, trust companies, mutual savings banks, savings and loan
associations, building and loan associations, credit unions, crop
credit associations, development credit corporations, industrial
development corporations, title insurance companies, ((or)) insurance
companies, or third-party account administrators that provide payment
processing;
(c) Persons who, as employees on a regular salary or wage of an
employer not engaged in the business of debt adjusting, perform credit
services for their employer;
(d) Public officers while acting in their official capacities and
persons acting under court order;
(e) Any person while performing services incidental to the
dissolution, winding up or liquidation of a partnership, corporation,
or other business enterprise;
(f) Nonprofit organizations dealing exclusively with debts owing
from commercial enterprises to business creditors;
(g) Nonprofit organizations engaged in debt adjusting and which do
not assess against the debtor a service charge in excess of fifteen
dollars per month.
(3) "Debt adjusting agency" is any partnership, corporation, or
association engaging in or holding itself out as engaging in the
business of debt adjusting.
(4) "Financial institution" means any person doing business under
the laws of any state or the United States relating to commercial
banks, bank holding companies, savings banks, savings and loan
associations, trust companies, or credit unions.
(5) "Third-party account administrator" means an entity that holds
or administers a dedicated bank account for fees and payments to
creditors or debt collectors in connection with the renegotiation,
settlement, reduction, or other alteration of the terms of payment or
other terms of a debt.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.28.080 and 1999 c 151 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By contract a debt adjuster may charge a reasonable fee for
debt adjusting services. The total fee for debt adjusting services,
including any fee charged by a financial institution or a third-party
account administrator that provides payment processing, may not exceed
fifteen percent of the total debt listed by the debtor on the contract.
The fee retained by the debt adjuster from any one payment made by or
on behalf of the debtor may not exceed fifteen percent of the payment.
The debt adjuster may make an initial charge of up to twenty-five
dollars which shall be considered part of the total fee. If an initial
charge is made, no additional fee may be retained which will bring the
total fee retained to date to more than fifteen percent of the total
payments made to date. No fee whatsoever shall be applied against rent
and utility payments for housing.
In the event of cancellation or default on performance of the
contract by the debtor prior to its successful completion, the debt
adjuster may collect in addition to fees previously received, six
percent of that portion of the remaining indebtedness listed on said
contract which was due when the contract was entered into, but not to
exceed twenty-five dollars.
(2) A debt adjuster shall not be entitled to retain any fee until
notifying all creditors listed by the debtor that the debtor has
engaged the debt adjuster in a program of debt adjusting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.230 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A third-party account administrator that provides payment
processing must be licensed as a money transmitter under this chapter
and comply with the following additional requirements:
(a) A debtor's funds must be held in an account at an insured
financial institution;
(b) A debtor owns the funds held in the account and must be paid
accrued interest on the account, if any;
(c) A third-party account administrator may not be owned or
controlled by, or in any way affiliated with, a debt adjuster;
(d) A third-party account administrator may not give or accept any
money or other compensation in exchange for referrals of business
involving a debt adjuster;
(e) A debtor may withdraw from the service provided by a third-party account administrator at any time without penalty and must
receive all funds in the account, other than funds earned by a debt
adjuster in compliance with chapter 18.28 RCW, within seven business
days of the debtor's request;
(f) A contract between a third-party account administrator and a
debtor must disclose in precise terms the rate and amount of all
charges and fees;
(g) The total fee for debt adjusting services, including any fee
charged by a financial institution or a third-party account
administrator, may not exceed fifteen percent of the total debt listed
by the debtor on the contract with the debt adjuster;
(h) A financial institution and third-party account administrator
shall distribute to the creditors of the debtor at least once each
forty days after receipt of payment at least eighty-five percent of the
payment received from the debtor;
(i) A financial institution or third-party account administrator
may only charge the debtor a fee after the debtor has made at least one
payment pursuant to a settlement agreement, debt management plan, or
other valid contractual agreement between the debtor and a debt
adjuster.
(2) A violation of this section constitutes an unfair or deceptive
act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce under chapter 19.86
RCW.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Debt adjuster" has the same meaning as that term is defined in
RCW 18.28.010;
(b) "Third-party account administrator" means an entity that holds
or administers a dedicated bank account for fees and payments to
creditors or debt collectors in connection with the renegotiation,
settlement, reduction, or other alteration of the terms of payment or
other terms of a debt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---