BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
The requirements of RCW 77.55.021 are to be considered satisfied
for any project that is required under chapter 76.09 RCW to submit a
forest practices application, or that is associated with any project
that is required under chapter 76.09 RCW to submit a forest practices
application, as long as the project is limited to one of the following:
(1) Felling and yarding of timber;
(2) Bridge redecking or decking repair;
(3) Bridge curbing or railing repair;
(4) Bridge painting;
(5) Other routine bridge repair above the high water line;
(6) Water ford construction;
(7) Water ford repair with equipment;
(8) Removal of woody debris from culverts and culvert openings;
(9) Removal of woody debris not imbedded in the stream bed or
stream banks from upstream bridge openings;
(10) Beaver dam and beaver removal affecting road drainage and
water crossings; or
(11) Single lane forestry road water crossing structures installed
on waters designated in the Washington Administrative Code as "Type F"
in the forest practices rules adopted under the authority of chapter
76.09 RCW, including bridges, temporary culvert installation, and
permanent culvert installation.

--- END ---