BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.33.020 and 2005 c 319 s 137 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Four times each year the supervisor ((shall)) must prepare,
subject to the approval of the economic and revenue forecast council
under RCW 82.33.010:
(a) An official state economic and revenue forecast;
(b) An unofficial state economic and revenue forecast based on
optimistic economic and revenue projections; and
(c) An unofficial state economic and revenue forecast based on
pessimistic economic and revenue projections.
(2) The supervisor ((shall)) must submit forecasts prepared under
this section, along with any unofficial forecasts provided under RCW
82.33.010, to the governor and the members of the committees on ways
and means and the chairs of the committees on transportation of the
senate and house of representatives, including one copy to the staff of
each of the committees, on or before November 20th, February 20th in
the even-numbered years, March 20th in the odd-numbered years, June
((20th)) 27th, and September ((20th)) 27th. All forecasts ((shall))
must include both estimated receipts and estimated revenues in
conformance with generally accepted accounting principles as provided
by RCW 43.88.037.
(3) All agencies of state government ((shall)) must provide to the
supervisor immediate access to all information relating to economic and
revenue forecasts. Revenue collection information ((shall)) must be
available to the supervisor the first business day following the
conclusion of each collection period.
(4) The economic and revenue forecast supervisor and staff
((shall)) must co-locate and share information, data, and files with
the tax research section of the department of revenue but ((shall)) may
not duplicate the duties and functions of one another.
(5) As part of its forecasts under subsection (1) of this section,
the supervisor ((shall)) must provide estimated revenue from tuition
fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect October 1, 2012.

--- END ---