BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.09.004 and 2009 c 502 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Military duties potentially impacting parenting functions"
means those obligations imposed, voluntarily or involuntarily, on a
parent serving in the armed forces that may interfere with that
parent's abilities to perform his or her parenting functions under a
temporary or permanent parenting plan. Military duties potentially
impacting parenting functions include, but are not limited to:
(a) "Deployment," which means the temporary transfer of a service
member serving in an active-duty status to another location in support
of a military operation, to include any tour of duty classified by the
member's branch of the armed forces as "remote" or "unaccompanied";
(b) "Activation" or "mobilization," which means the call-up of a
national guard or reserve service member to extended active-duty
status. For purposes of this definition, "mobilization" does not
include national guard or reserve annual training, inactive duty days,
or drill weekends; or
(c) "Temporary duty," which means the transfer of a service member
from one military base or the service member's home to a different
location, usually another base, for a limited period of time to
accomplish training or to assist in the performance of a noncombat
mission.
(2) "Parenting functions" means those aspects of the parent-child
relationship in which the parent makes decisions and performs functions
necessary for the care and growth of the child. Parenting functions
include:
(a) Maintaining a loving, stable, consistent, and nurturing
relationship with the child;
(b) Attending to the daily needs of the child, such as feeding,
clothing, physical care and grooming, supervision, health care, and day
care, and engaging in other activities which are appropriate to the
developmental level of the child and that are within the social and
economic circumstances of the particular family;
(c) Attending to adequate education for the child, including
remedial or other education essential to the best interests of the
child;
(d) Assisting the child in developing and maintaining appropriate
interpersonal relationships;
(e) Exercising appropriate judgment regarding the child's welfare,
consistent with the child's developmental level and the family's social
and economic circumstances; and
(f) Providing for the financial support of the child.
(3) "Permanent parenting plan" means a plan for parenting the
child, including allocation of parenting functions, which plan is
incorporated in any final decree or decree of modification in an action
for dissolution of marriage or domestic partnership, declaration of
invalidity, or legal separation.
(4) "Shared parental responsibility" means shared residential time
and mutual decision-making authority.
(5) "Shared residential time" means an order awarding each of the
parents periods of time with the child that amounts to at least one-
third of a year and in which the child resides with or is under the
actual, direct, day-to-day care and supervision of the parent during
the period of time awarded.
(6) "Temporary parenting plan" means a plan for parenting of the
child pending final resolution of any action for dissolution of
marriage or domestic partnership, declaration of invalidity, or legal
separation which is incorporated in a temporary order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is a presumption that shared parental responsibility is
in the best interest of the child unless:
(a) The parents have agreed on a parenting plan that allocates
residential placement and decision-making authority to one parent; or
(b) The court finds that shared parental responsibility would be
detrimental to the child.
(2)(a) The presumption may be rebutted by a parent opposing shared
parental responsibility if the parent shows that shared parental
responsibility would be detrimental to the child.
(b) The court may order an investigation to be conducted under RCW
26.09.220.
(3) If the court does not enter a parenting plan providing for
shared parental responsibility, the court shall enter written findings
of fact and conclusions of law stating its reasons, including the facts
supporting any finding that shared parental responsibility is
detrimental to the child.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.09.187 and 2007 c 496 s 603 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESS. The court shall not order a
dispute resolution process, except court action, when it finds that any
limiting factor under RCW 26.09.191 applies, or when it finds that
either parent is unable to afford the cost of the proposed dispute
resolution process. If a dispute resolution process is not precluded
or limited, then in designating such a process the court shall consider
all relevant factors, including:
(a) Differences between the parents that would substantially
inhibit their effective participation in any designated process;
(b) The parents' wishes or agreements and, if the parents have
entered into agreements, whether the agreements were made knowingly and
voluntarily; and
(c) Differences in the parents' financial circumstances that may
affect their ability to participate fully in a given dispute resolution
process.
(2) ALLOCATION OF DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY.
(a) AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE PARTIES. The court shall approve
agreements of the parties allocating decision-making authority, or
specifying rules in the areas listed in RCW 26.09.184(5)(a), when it
finds that:
(i) The agreement is consistent with any limitations on a parent's
decision-making authority mandated by RCW 26.09.191; and
(ii) The agreement is knowing and voluntary.
(b) SOLE DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY. The court shall order sole
decision-making to one parent when it finds that:
(i) A limitation on the other parent's decision-making authority is
mandated by RCW 26.09.191;
(ii) Both parents are opposed to mutual decision making;
(iii) One parent is opposed to mutual decision making, and such
opposition is reasonable based on the criteria in (c) of this
subsection.
(c) MUTUAL DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY. Mutual decision-making
authority is part of shared parental responsibility. Except as
provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection, the court shall consider
the following criteria in allocating decision-making authority:
(i) Whether the presumption of shared parental responsibility has
been rebutted;
(ii) The existence of a limitation under RCW 26.09.191;
(((ii))) (iii) The history of participation of each parent in
decision making in each of the areas in RCW 26.09.184(5)(a);
(((iii))) (iv) Whether the parents have a demonstrated ability and
desire to cooperate with one another in decision making in each of the
areas in RCW 26.09.184(5)(a); and
(((iv))) (v) The parents' geographic proximity to one another, to
the extent that it affects their ability to make timely mutual
decisions.
(3) RESIDENTIAL PROVISIONS.
(a) The court shall make residential provisions for each child
which encourage each parent to maintain a loving, stable, and nurturing
relationship with the child, consistent with the child's developmental
level and the family's social and economic circumstances. ((The
child's residential schedule shall be)) The court shall make
residential provisions consistent with the presumption of shared
parental responsibility provided under section 2 of this act and
consistent with RCW 26.09.191. Where the limitations of RCW 26.09.191
are not dispositive of the child's residential schedule, the court
shall consider the following factors:
(i) The relative strength, nature, and stability of the child's
relationship with each parent;
(ii) The agreements of the parties, provided they were entered into
knowingly and voluntarily;
(iii) Each parent's past and potential for future performance of
parenting functions as defined in RCW 26.09.004(((3)))(2), including
whether a parent has taken greater responsibility for performing
parenting functions relating to the daily needs of the child;
(iv) The emotional needs and developmental level of the child;
(v) The child's relationship with siblings and with other
significant adults, as well as the child's involvement with his or her
physical surroundings, school, or other significant activities;
(vi) The wishes of the parents and the wishes of a child who is
sufficiently mature to express reasoned and independent preferences as
to his or her residential schedule; and
(vii) Each parent's employment schedule, and shall make
accommodations consistent with those schedules.
Factor (i) shall be given the greatest weight.
(b) Where the limitations of RCW 26.09.191 are not dispositive, the
court may order that a child frequently alternate his or her residence
between the households of the parents for brief and substantially equal
intervals of time if such provision is in the best interests of the
child. In determining whether such an arrangement is in the best
interests of the child, the court may consider the parties geographic
proximity to the extent necessary to ensure the ability to share
performance of the parenting functions. The presumption of shared
parental responsibility under section 2 of this act does not require a
court to order, or preclude a court from ordering, that a child
frequently alternate his or her residence between the households of the
parents for brief and substantially equal intervals of time.
(c) For any child, residential provisions may contain any
reasonable terms or conditions that facilitate the orderly and
meaningful exercise of residential time by a parent, including but not
limited to requirements of reasonable notice when residential time will
not occur.

--- END ---