BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that under applicable
legal standards, drayage truck operators are covered workers for
purposes of various employment protections. The legislature also finds
that employers of drayage truck operators nonetheless classify drayage
truck operators as uncovered independent contractors. In addition to
violating the law, this misclassification results in operators working
in unsafe conditions and without the benefit of such protections as
overtime wages and unemployment benefits. Misclassification is also
unfair to law-abiding businesses and results in lost revenue to the
state. The legislature further finds that current enforcement
mechanisms have proved inadequate and that most drayage truck operators
remain improperly classified. By defining drayage drivers as statutory
covered employees, the legislature intends to enforce current law,
avoid litigation, increase safety to drivers and the public, insure
drivers receive employment protections to which they are entitled, and
facilitate collection of taxes. The legislature intends that the
statutory inclusion of drayage drivers under the employment standards
in this act is not evidence of legislative intent to exclude drayage
drivers from the protection of other employment standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
A drayage truck operator is an employee and the motor carrier that
directly engages the services of the drayage truck operator is the
employer for purposes of this chapter. For purposes of this section,
"drayage truck operator" means the driver of any in-use on-road vehicle
with a gross vehicle weight rating greater than thirty-three thousand
pounds operating on or transgressing through a port that handles in
excess of one million twenty foot equivalent units of containerized
cargo or an intermodal rail yard property within fifty miles of such a
port, for the purpose of loading, unloading, or transporting
containerized cargo.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
A drayage truck operator is an employee and the motor carrier that
directly engages the services of the drayage truck operator is the
employer for purposes of this chapter. For purposes of this section,
"drayage truck operator" means the driver of any in-use on-road vehicle
with a gross vehicle weight rating greater than thirty-three thousand
pounds operating on or transgressing through a port that handles in
excess of one million twenty foot equivalent units of containerized
cargo or an intermodal rail yard property within fifty miles of such a
port, for the purpose of loading, unloading, or transporting
containerized cargo.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
A drayage truck operator is an employee and the motor carrier that
directly engages the services of the drayage truck operator is the
employer for purposes of this chapter. For purposes of this section,
"drayage truck operator" means the driver of any in-use on-road vehicle
with a gross vehicle weight rating greater than thirty-three thousand
pounds operating on or transgressing through a port that handles in
excess of one million twenty foot equivalent units of containerized
cargo or an intermodal rail yard property within fifty miles of such a
port, for the purpose of loading, unloading, or transporting
containerized cargo.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
A drayage truck operator is an employee and the motor carrier that
directly engages the services of the drayage truck operator is the
employer for purposes of this chapter. For purposes of this section,
"drayage truck operator" means the driver of any in-use on-road vehicle
with a gross vehicle weight rating greater than thirty-three thousand
pounds operating on or transgressing through a port that handles in
excess of one million twenty foot equivalent units of containerized
cargo or an intermodal rail yard property within fifty miles of such a
port, for the purpose of loading, unloading, or transporting
containerized cargo.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW
to read as follows:
A drayage truck operator is an employee and the motor carrier that
directly engages the services of the drayage truck operator is the
employer for purposes of this chapter. For purposes of this section,
"drayage truck operator" means the driver of any in-use on-road vehicle
with a gross vehicle weight rating greater than thirty-three thousand
pounds operating on or transgressing through a port that handles in
excess of one million twenty foot equivalent units of containerized
cargo or an intermodal rail yard property within fifty miles of such a
port, for the purpose of loading, unloading, or transporting
containerized cargo.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Services performed by a drayage truck operator are considered
services in employment, not subject to RCW 50.04.140. For purposes of
this section, "drayage truck operator" means the driver of any in-use
on-road vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating greater than thirty-three thousand pounds operating on or transgressing through a port that
handles in excess of one million twenty foot equivalent units of
containerized cargo or an intermodal rail yard property within fifty
miles of such a port, for the purpose of loading, unloading, or
transporting containerized cargo.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---