BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.07.128 and 2007 c 523 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to other required filing fees, the secretary of
state shall collect a fee of five dollars at the time of filing for:
(a) Articles of incorporation for domestic corporations or
applications for certificates of authority for foreign corporations
under Title 23B RCW;
(b) Certificates of formation for domestic limited liability
companies or registrations of foreign limited liability companies under
chapter 25.15 RCW;
(c) Registrations of foreign and domestic partnerships and limited
liability partnerships under chapter 25.05 RCW;
(d) Certificates of limited ((partnership[s])) partnerships and
((registration[s])) registrations of foreign limited partnerships under
chapter 25.10 RCW; and
(e) Registrations of trademarks under chapter 19.77 RCW.
(2) Moneys received under subsection (1) of this section must be
deposited into the Washington state heritage ((center)) account in RCW
43.07.129 (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 2 RCW 43.07.129 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 940 are each
amended to read as follows:
The Washington state heritage ((center)) account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received under RCW
36.18.010(11) and 43.07.128 must be deposited in the account.
Expenditures from the account may be made only for ((the following
purposes:
(1) Payment of the certificate of participation issued for the
Washington state heritage center;
(2) Capital maintenance of the Washington state heritage center;
and
(3))) program operations that serve the public, relate to the
collections and exhibits housed in the Washington state ((heritage
center)) historical societies, or fulfill the missions of the state
((archives, state library,)) historical societies and capital museum.
Only the ((secretary of state or the secretary of state's
designee)) directors of the state historical societies or their
designees may authorize expenditures from the account. An
appropriation is not required for expenditures, but the account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. During the
2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate from the
Washington state heritage ((center)) account for the purposes of state
arts, historical, and library programs.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.07.363 and 2008 c 222 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((secretary of state)) directors of the historical
societies shall jointly administer and conduct a program to record and
document oral histories of current and former members and staff of the
Washington state legislature, current and former state government
officials, and personnel of the executive and judicial branches, the
state's congressional delegation, and other citizens who have
participated in the political history of Washington state. The program
shall be called the Washington state legacy project. The ((secretary
of state)) historical society directors may contract with independent
oral historians or history departments of the state universities to
interview and record oral histories. The manuscripts and publications
shall be made available for research and reference through the state
((archives)) historical societies. The transcripts, together with
current and historical photographs, may be published for distribution
to libraries and the general public, and be posted on the ((secretary
of state's)) historical societies' web sites.
(2) The Washington state legacy project may act as a principal
repository for oral histories related to community, family, and other
various projects.
(3) ((The oral history of a person who occupied positions, or was
staff to a person who occupied positions, in more than one branch of
government shall be conducted by the entity authorized to conduct oral
histories of persons in the position last held by the person who is the
subject of the oral history. However, the person being interviewed may
select the entity he or she wishes to prepare his or her oral history.
(4) The secretary of state)) The directors of the historical
societies may create a Washington state legacy project advisory council
to provide advice and guidance on matters pertaining to operating the
legacy project. ((The secretary of state may not compensate)) Members
of the legacy project advisory council shall not be compensated but may
((provide)) receive reimbursement ((to members)) for expenses that are
incurred in the conduct of their official duties.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.07.365 and 2008 c 222 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary of state)) directors of the state historical
societies may fund Washington state legacy project activities through
donations ((as provided in RCW 43.07.037)). The activities may
include, but not be limited to, conducting interviews, preparing and
indexing transcripts, publishing transcripts and photographs, and
presenting displays and programs. Donations that do not meet the
criteria of the Washington state legacy project may not be accepted.
The ((secretary of state)) directors of the state historical societies
shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.07.370 and 2009 c 71 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of state may solicit and accept gifts, grants,
conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or personal property, or
both, in trust or otherwise, and sell, lease, exchange, invest, or
expend these donations or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income from
the donations except as limited by the donor's terms.
(2) Moneys received under this section may be used only for the
following purposes:
(a) ((Conducting the Washington state legacy project;
(b))) Archival activities;
(((c))) (b) Washington state library activities; and
(((d) Development, construction, and operation of the Washington
state heritage center; and
(e))) (c) Donation of Washington state flags.
(3)(((a) Moneys received under subsection (2)(a) through (c) of
this section must be deposited in the Washington state legacy project,
state library, and archives account established in RCW 43.07.380.
(b) Moneys received under subsection (2)(d) of this section must be
deposited in the Washington state heritage center account created in
RCW 43.07.129.
(c))) Moneys received under ((subsection (2)(e) of)) this section
must be deposited in the Washington state flag, library, and archives
account created in RCW 43.07.388.
(4) The secretary of state shall adopt rules to govern and protect
the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.07.380 and 2008 c 222 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state legacy project((, state library, and
archives)) account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All moneys received under RCW 43.07.370 must be deposited in the
account. Expenditures from the account may be made only for the
purposes of the Washington state legacy project under RCW 43.07.363((,
archives program under RCW 40.14.020, and the state library program
under chapter 27.04 RCW)) (as recodified by this act). Only the
((secretary of state or the secretary of state's designee)) directors
of the state historical societies or the directors' designees may
authorize expenditures from the account. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures, but the account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.07.388 and 2009 c 71 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state flag, library, and archives account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received under RCW
43.07.370(((2)(e))) must be deposited in the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for the purpose of donating
Washington state flags to Washington state military personnel and for
library and archival activities. Only the secretary of state or the
secretary of state's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 8 RCW 44.73.020 and 2007 c 453 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative gift center account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All moneys received by the gift center from
the sale of Washington state souvenirs, other Washington products, and
other products as approved shall be deposited in the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the operations and
maintenance of the gift center, including the purchase of inventory,
and for other purposes as provided in this section. Only the chief
clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate,
or the lead staff person designated by them to oversee management and
operation of the gift shop, may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2) Net profits, after expenses, from the sale of Washington state
souvenirs, other Washington products, and products approved by the
legislative gift center, shall be deposited as provided in this
subsection:
(a) Twenty-five percent in the ((legislative oral history account
in chapter 44.04 RCW (created in Substitute House Bill No. 1741)))
Washington state legacy project account created in RCW 43.07.380 (as
recodified by this act);
(b) Twenty-five percent in the ((oral history, state library, and
archives account created in RCW 43.07.380)) Washington state flag,
library, and archives account created in RCW 43.07.388; and
(c) Fifty percent in the capitol furnishings preservation committee
account created in RCW 27.48.040.
(3) Net profits, after expenses, from the sale of items bearing the
state seal by the legislative gift center shall be deposited in the
capitol furnishings preservation committee account created in RCW
27.48.040. A full accounting thereof shall be provided to the
secretary of state.
(4) The legislative gift center may designate special sales, the
proceeds of which shall go to an account specified at the time of
designation.

Sec. 9 RCW 27.34.020 and 2007 c 333 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter:
(1) (("Advisory council" means the advisory council on historic
preservation.
(2) "Department" means the department of archaeology and historic
preservation.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of archaeology
and historic preservation.
(4) "Federal act" means the national historic preservation act of
1966 (Public Law 89-655; 80 Stat. 915).
(5) "Heritage barn" means any large agricultural outbuilding used
to house animals, crops, or farm equipment, that is over fifty years
old and has been determined by the department to: (a) Be eligible for
listing on the Washington heritage register or the national register of
historic places; or (b) have been listed on a local historic register
and approved by the advisory council. In addition to barns, "heritage
barn" includes agricultural resources such as milk houses, sheds,
silos, or other outbuildings, that are historically associated with the
working life of the farm or ranch, if these outbuildings are on the
same property as a heritage barn.
(6) "Heritage council" means the Washington state heritage council.
(7) "Historic preservation" includes the protection,
rehabilitation, restoration, identification, scientific excavation, and
reconstruction of districts, sites, buildings, structures, and objects
significant in American and Washington state history, architecture,
archaeology, or culture.
(8) "Preservation officer" means the state historic preservation
officer as provided for in RCW 43.334.020.
(9) "Project" means programs leading to the preservation for public
benefit of historical properties, whether by state and local
governments or other public bodies, or private organizations or
individuals, including the acquisition of title or interests in, and
the development of, any district, site, building, structure, or object
that is significant in American and Washington state history,
architecture, archaeology, or culture, and property used in connection
therewith, or for its development.
(10))) "State historical agencies" means the state historical
societies and the ((department)) state capital historical museum.
(((11))) (2) "State historical societies" means the Washington
state historical society and the eastern Washington state historical
society.
(((12) "Cultural resource management plan" means a comprehensive
plan which identifies and organizes information on the state of
Washington's historic, archaeological, and architectural resources into
a set of management criteria, and which is to be used for producing
reliable decisions, recommendations, and advice relative to the
identification, evaluation, and protection of these resources.))

Sec. 10 RCW 43.334.010 and 2005 c 333 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created a department of state government to be known
as the department of archaeology and historic preservation. The
department is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under
this chapter and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by
law.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this ((section)) subsection apply throughout this chapter.
(a) "Advisory council" means the advisory council on historic
preservation.
(b) "Cultural resource management plan" means a comprehensive plan
that identifies and organizes information on the state of Washington's
historic, archaeological, and architectural resources into a set of
management criteria, and that is to be used for producing reliable
decisions, recommendations, and advice relative to the identification,
evaluation, and protection of these resources.
(c) "Department" means the department of archaeology and historic
preservation.
(((b))) (d) "Director" means the director of the department of
archaeology and historic preservation.
(e) "Federal act" means the national historic preservation act of
1966 (P.L. 89-655; 80 Stat. 915).
(f) "Heritage barn" means any large agricultural outbuilding used
to house animals, crops, or farm equipment, that is over fifty years
old and has been determined by the department to: (i) Be eligible for
listing on the Washington heritage register or the national register of
historic places; or (ii) have been listed on a local historic register
and approved by the advisory council. In addition to barns, "heritage
barn" includes agricultural resources such as milk houses, sheds,
silos, or other outbuildings, that are historically associated with the
working life of the farm or ranch, if these outbuildings are on the
same property as a heritage barn.
(g) "Heritage council" means the Washington state heritage council.
(h) "Historic preservation" includes the protection,
rehabilitation, restoration, identification, scientific excavation, and
reconstruction of districts, sites, buildings, structures, and objects
significant in American and Washington state history, architecture,
archaeology, or culture.
(i) "Preservation officer" means the state historic preservation
officer as provided for in RCW 43.334.020.
(j) "Project" means programs leading to the preservation for public
benefit of historical properties, whether by state and local
governments or other public bodies, or private organizations or
individuals, including the acquisition of title or interests in, and
the development of, any district, site, building, structure, or object
that is significant in American and Washington state history,
architecture, archaeology, or culture, and property used in connection
therewith, or for its development.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.15.020 and 2011 c 158 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The lieutenant governor serves as president of the senate and is
responsible for making appointments to, and serving on, the committees
and boards as set forth in this section.
(1) The lieutenant governor serves on the following boards and
committees:
(a) Capitol furnishings preservation committee, RCW 27.48.040;
(b) Washington higher education facilities authority, RCW
28B.07.030;
(c) Productivity board, also known as the employee involvement and
recognition board, RCW 41.60.015;
(d) State finance committee, RCW 43.33.010;
(e) State capitol committee, RCW 43.34.010;
(f) Washington health care facilities authority, RCW 70.37.030;
(g) State medal of merit nominating committee, RCW 1.40.020;
(h) Medal of valor committee, RCW 1.60.020; and
(i) Association of Washington generals, RCW 43.15.030.
(2) The lieutenant governor, and when serving as president of the
senate, appoints members to the following boards and committees:
(a) Civil legal aid oversight committee, RCW 2.53.010;
(b) Office of public defense advisory committee, RCW 2.70.030;
(c) Washington state gambling commission, RCW 9.46.040;
(d) Sentencing guidelines commission, RCW 9.94A.860;
(e) State building code council, RCW 19.27.070;
(f) Financial education public-private partnership, RCW
28A.300.450;
(g) Joint administrative rules review committee, RCW 34.05.610;
(h) Capital projects advisory review board, RCW 39.10.220;
(i) Select committee on pension policy, RCW 41.04.276;
(j) Legislative ethics board, RCW 42.52.310;
(k) Washington citizens' commission on salaries, RCW 43.03.305;
(l) ((Legislative oral history committee, RCW 44.04.325;
(m))) State council on aging, RCW 43.20A.685;
(((n))) (m) State investment board, RCW 43.33A.020;
(((o))) (n) Capitol campus design advisory committee, RCW
43.34.080;
(((p))) (o) Washington state arts commission, RCW 43.46.015;
(((q) Information services board, RCW 43.105.032;
(r) Council for children and families, RCW 43.121.020;
(s))) (p) PNWER-Net working subgroup under chapter 43.147 RCW;
(((t))) (q) Community economic revitalization board, RCW
43.160.030;
(((u))) (r) Washington economic development finance authority, RCW
43.163.020;
(((v))) (s) Life sciences discovery fund authority, RCW 43.350.020;
(((w))) (t) Legislative children's oversight committee, RCW
44.04.220;
(((x))) (u) Joint legislative audit and review committee, RCW
44.28.010;
(((y))) (v) Joint committee on energy supply and energy
conservation, RCW 44.39.015;
(((z))) (w) Legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee, RCW 44.48.010;
(((aa))) (x) Agency council on coordinated transportation, RCW
47.06B.020;
(((bb))) (y) Washington horse racing commission, RCW 67.16.014;
(((cc))) (z) Correctional industries board of directors, RCW
72.09.080;
(((dd))) (aa) Joint committee on veterans' and military affairs,
RCW 73.04.150;
(((ee))) (bb) Joint legislative committee on water supply during
drought, RCW 90.86.020;
(((ff))) (cc) Statute law committee, RCW 1.08.001; and
(((gg))) (dd) Joint legislative oversight committee on trade
policy, RCW 44.55.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 RCW 27.34.200, 27.34.220, 27.34.230,
27.34.240, 27.34.250, 27.34.260, 27.34.270, 27.34.280, 27.34.400,
27.34.410, 27.34.415, 43.07.129, 43.07.350, 43.07.363, and 43.07.380
are each recodified as sections in chapter 43.334 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.07.900 (Transfer of powers, duties, and functions--Legislative oral history program) and 2008 c 222 s 9;
(2) RCW 44.04.320 (Oral history program) and 2008 c 222 s 3 & 1991
c 237 s 1;
(3) RCW 44.04.325 (Legislative oral history committee -- Members) and
2008 c 222 s 4 & 1991 c 237 s 2;
(4) RCW 44.04.330 (Legislative oral history committee -- Duties) and
2008 c 222 s 5 & 1991 c 237 s 3;
(5) RCW 44.04.335 (Oral history activities-Funding-Joint rules) and
2008 c 222 s 6;
(6) RCW 44.04.340 (Oral history activities-Gifts, grants,
conveyances-Expenditures-Joint rules) and 2008 c 222 s 7; and
(7) RCW 44.04.345 (Legislative oral history account) and 2008 c 222
s 8.

--- END ---