BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 To maximize the benefits to the public,
state government should be operated in an efficient and effective
manner. The purpose of this act is to transfer the state library and
its responsibilities from the office of the secretary of state to the
University of Washington, which already operates numerous university
libraries in the state and offers a master of library and information
science program. This transfer will provide centralized leadership in
efficiently and cost-effectively managing state library resources and
has the potential to offer educational opportunities to students in the
master of library and information science program.

Sec. 2 RCW 27.04.010 and 2002 c 342 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a state library within the ((office of the
secretary of state)) University of Washington, and a state librarian to
serve as its chief executive officer.
(2) The ((secretary of state)) University of Washington board of
regents may make such rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary and
proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(3) The ((secretary of state)) University of Washington board of
regents shall appoint a state librarian who shall serve at the pleasure
of the ((secretary of state)) board of regents.

Sec. 3 RCW 27.04.045 and 2006 c 199 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state librarian shall be responsible and accountable for the
following functions:
(1) Establishing content-related standards for common formats and
agency indexes for state agency-produced information. In developing
these standards, the state librarian is encouraged to seek involvement
of, and comments from, public and private entities with an interest in
such standards;
(2) Managing and administering the state library;
(3) Exerting leadership in information access and the development
of library services;
(4) Acquiring library materials, equipment, and supplies by
purchase, exchange, gift, or otherwise; and, as appropriate, assisting
the legislature, other state agencies, and other libraries in the cost-effective purchase of information resources;
(5) Employing and terminating personnel in accordance with chapter
41.06 RCW as may be necessary to implement the purposes of this
chapter;
(6) Entering into agreements with other public or private entities
as a means of implementing the mission, goals, and objectives of the
state library and the entity with which it enters such agreements. In
agreements for services between the library and other state agencies,
the library may negotiate an exchange of services in lieu of monetary
reimbursement for the library's indirect or overhead costs, when such
an arrangement facilitates the delivery of library services;
(7) Maintaining ((a library)) access at the state capitol grounds
to effectively provide library and information services to members of
the legislature, state officials, and state employees in connection
with their official duties;
(8) Serving as the depository for newspapers published in the state
of Washington thus providing a central location for a valuable
historical record for scholarly, personal, and commercial reference and
circulation;
(9) Promoting and facilitating electronic access to public
information and services, including providing, or providing for, a
service that identifies, describes, and provides location information
for government information through electronic means, and that assists
government agencies in making their information more readily available
to the public;
(10) Collecting and distributing copies of state publications, as
defined in RCW 40.06.010, prepared by any state agency for
distribution. The state library shall maintain the state publications
distribution center, as provided in chapter 40.06 RCW to provide copies
of materials that are not available in electronic format to state
depository libraries;
(11) Providing for the sale of library material in accordance with
RCW 27.12.305;
(12) Providing advisory services to state agencies regarding their
information needs;
(13) Providing for library and information service to residents and
staff of state-supported residential institutions;
(14) Providing for library and information services to persons
throughout the state who are blind and/or ((physically handicapped))
have a physical disability;
(15) Assisting individuals and groups such as libraries, library
boards, governing bodies, and citizens throughout the state toward the
establishment and development of library services;
(16) Making studies and surveys of library needs in order to
provide, expand, enlarge, and otherwise improve access to library
facilities and services throughout the state;
(17) Serving as an interlibrary loan, information, reference, and
referral resource for all libraries in the state. The state library
may charge lending fees to other libraries that charge the state
library for similar services. Money paid as fees shall be retained by
the state library as a recovery of costs; and
(18) Accepting and expending in accordance with the terms thereof
grants of federal, state, local, or private funds. For the purpose of
qualifying to receive such grants, the state librarian is authorized to
make applications and reports required by the grantor.

Sec. 4 RCW 40.06.020 and 2006 c 199 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created as a division of the state library, and
under the direction of the state librarian, a state publications
distribution center. The center shall utilize the depository library
system to permit citizens economical and convenient access to state
publications, regardless of format. To this end the ((secretary of
state)) University of Washington board of regents shall make such rules
as may be deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 40.06.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 304 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Every state agency shall promptly submit to the state library
copies of published information that are state publications.
(a) For state publications available only in print format, each
state agency shall deposit, at a minimum, two copies of each of its
publications with the state library. For the purposes of broad public
access, state agencies may deposit additional copies with the state
library for distribution to additional depository libraries.
(b) For state publications available only in electronic format,
each state agency shall deposit one copy of each of its publications
with the state library.
(c) For state publications available in both print and electronic
format, each state agency shall deposit two print copies and one
electronic copy of the publication with the state library.
(2) Annually, each state agency shall provide the state library
with a listing of all its publications made available to state
government and the public during the preceding year, including those
published in electronic form. The ((secretary of state)) University of
Washington board of regents shall, by rule, establish the annual date
by which state agencies must provide the list of its publications to
the state library.
(3) In the interest of economy and efficiency, the state librarian
may specifically or by general rule exempt a given state publication or
class of publications from the requirements of this section in full or
in part.

Sec. 6 RCW 40.06.040 and 2006 c 199 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To provide economical public access to state publications, the
center may enter into depository contracts with any free public
library, The Evergreen State College, regional university, or state
university library, or, if needed, the library of any privately
incorporated college or university in this state. The requirements for
eligibility to contract as a depository library shall be established by
the ((secretary of state)) University of Washington board of regents
upon recommendations of the state librarian. The standards shall
include and take into consideration the type of library, available
housing and space for the publications, the number and qualifications
of personnel, and availability for public use. The center may also
contract with public, out-of-state libraries for the exchange of state
and other publications on a reciprocal basis. Any state publication to
be distributed to the public and the legislature shall be mailed at the
lowest available postal rate.
(2) The ((office of the secretary of state)) University of
Washington through the state librarian shall preserve and make
accessible state agency electronic publications deposited with the
state library through an electronic repository.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 27.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the office of the
secretary of state pertaining to the state library are transferred to
the University of Washington. All references to the state library
commission, or to the secretary of state or the office of the secretary
of state pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred,
shall be construed to mean the state library within the University of
Washington.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the office of the
secretary of state pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the state library
within the University of Washington. All cabinets, furniture, office
equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the
office of the secretary of state in carrying out the powers, functions,
and duties transferred shall be made available to the state library
within the University of Washington. All funds, credits, or other
assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be assigned to the state library within the
University of Washington.
(b) Any appropriations made to the office of the secretary of state
for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall,
on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to
the state library within the University of Washington.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the office of the secretary of state engaged
in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the University of Washington. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service
law, are assigned to the University of Washington to perform their
usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in
accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the office of the
secretary of state pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the University of
Washington. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in
full force and shall be performed by the University of Washington.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the office of the secretary of state shall not affect the validity of
any act performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---