BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The individual prosperity of the people of
Washington is dependent on their ability to attract, support and retain
private sector jobs that empower the economies of local communities.
The Constitutions of the United States and Washington explicitly
envision property owners being able to use their property in a manner
to provide such economic freedom and opportunity. It is essential to
the Washington state economy to encourage the location, operation, and
continuing business viability of manufacturing businesses statewide and
particularly in rural municipal jurisdictions. It is the intent of the
legislature to streamline the permitting process for manufacturing
businesses that will provide over one hundred jobs in rural communities
across the state. The location for new manufacturing business
opportunities will remain subject to applicable environmental
protections under federal, state, and local laws dealing with water,
air, flood control, historic preservation, zoning, and building codes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The requirements of this chapter do not apply to and may not
govern the siting and development of industrial development sites.
(2) For purposes of this section, "industrial development sites"
are sites for specific manufacturing, industrial, or commercial
businesses that will employ one hundred or more persons per site.
"Industrial development sites" may not be for the purpose of retail
commercial development or multitenant office parks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Industrial development sites and government actions related to
the siting and development of industrial development sites are exempted
from compliance with this chapter.
(2) For purposes of this section, "industrial development sites"
has the same meaning as in section 2(2) of this act.

--- END ---