BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that agriculture is a
cornerstone of Washington's economy, and that the long-term viability
of the state's agricultural economy must be protected. The legislature
also finds that there are seasonal shortages of labor in agriculture
from time to time, and that these shortages have a significant adverse
impact on Washington's berry and tree fruit sectors. The legislature
intends to provide options for addressing seasonal shortages of labor
in agriculture, including strategies for assisting certain persons to
work in agriculture and mechanisms for meeting the housing and
transportation needs of such workers.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.220 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the
basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school
districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality
and give students the opportunity to complete graduation requirements
that are intended to prepare them for postsecondary education, gainful
employment, and citizenship. The program established under this
section shall be the minimum instructional program of basic education
offered by school districts.
(2) Each school district shall make available to students the
following minimum instructional offering each school year:
(a) For students enrolled in grades one through twelve, at least a
district-wide annual average of one thousand hours, which shall be
increased to at least one thousand eighty instructional hours for
students enrolled in each of grades seven through twelve and at least
one thousand instructional hours for students in each of grades one
through six according to an implementation schedule adopted by the
legislature, but not before the 2014-15 school year; and
(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least four hundred
fifty instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least one
thousand instructional hours according to the implementation schedule
under RCW 28A.150.315.
(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each
school district shall include:
(a) Instruction in the essential academic learning requirements
under RCW 28A.655.070;
(b) Instruction that provides students the opportunity to complete
twenty-four credits for high school graduation, subject to a phased-in
implementation of the twenty-four credits as established by the
legislature. Course distribution requirements may be established by
the state board of education under RCW 28A.230.090;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages;
(d) Supplemental instruction and services for underachieving
students through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005
through 28A.165.065;
(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled
students whose primary language is other than English through the
transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010
through 28A.180.080;
(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense
as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with
disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; and
(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010
through 28A.185.030.
(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require
individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours
per day or to take any particular courses.
(5) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic
educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five
years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one
years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred eighty
school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school
district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or
equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of one
hundred eighty school days per school year according to the
implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315. However, effective May
1, 1979, a school district may schedule the last five school days of
the one hundred and eighty day school year for noninstructional
purposes in the case of students who are graduating from high school,
including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early
release from school upon the request of a student, and all such
students may be claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the extent
they could otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes a school district from
adopting a school calendar of one hundred eighty school days that
includes breaks to accommodate participation or employment in
agricultural activities, including the harvesting of farm or nursery
products and related activities.
(7) Nothing in this section precludes a school district from
enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as
offering additional instruction or providing additional services,
programs, or activities that the school district determines to be
appropriate for the education of the school district's students.
(((7))) (8) The state board of education shall adopt rules to
implement and ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed
by this section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related
supplemental program approval requirements as the state board may
establish.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this section precludes an institution of higher
education from adopting an academic calendar that includes breaks to
accommodate participation or employment in agricultural activities,
including the harvesting of farm or nursery products and related
activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this section precludes a community or technical college
from adopting an academic calendar that includes breaks to accommodate
participation or employment in agricultural activities, including the
harvesting of farm or nursery products and related activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In addition to waivers authorized under RCW 28A.305.140,
28A.305.141, and 28A.655.180, the state board of education may grant
waivers from the requirement for a one hundred eighty day school year
under RCW 28A.150.220 to school districts that propose to operate one
or more schools on a flexible calendar for purposes of accommodating
participation or employment in agricultural activities, including the
harvesting of farm or nursery products and related activities. The
requirement under RCW 28A.150.220 that school districts offer an annual
average instructional hour offering of at least one thousand hours
shall not be waived.
(2) A school district seeking a waiver under this section must
submit an application that includes:
(a) A proposed calendar for the school day and school year that
demonstrates how the instructional hour requirement will be maintained;
(b) A description of the need to accommodate participation or
employment in agricultural activities;
(c) A summary of comments received at one or more public hearings
on the proposal and how concerns will be addressed; and
(d) Other information that the state board of education may request
to assure that the proposed flexible calendar will not adversely affect
student learning.
(3) The state board of education shall adopt criteria to evaluate
waiver requests. Waivers may be granted for up to three years. After
each school year, the state board of education shall analyze empirical
evidence to determine whether the reduction is affecting student
learning. If the state board of education determines that student
learning is adversely affected, the school district shall discontinue
the flexible calendar as soon as possible but not later than the
beginning of the next school year after the determination has been
made.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.12.060 and 2009 c 172 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall adopt rules as may be
necessary or appropriate for effecting the provisions of this chapter,
and not in conflict with this chapter, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the state higher education
administrative procedure act. Such rules shall include provisions
designed to make employment under the work-study program reasonably
available, to the extent of available funds, to all eligible needy
students in eligible postsecondary institutions. The rules shall
include:
(1) Providing work under the state work-study program that will not
result in the displacement of employed workers or impair existing
contracts for services;
(2) Furnishing work only to a student who:
(a) Is capable, in the opinion of the eligible institution, of
maintaining good standing in such course of study while employed under
the program covered by the agreement; and
(b) Has been accepted for enrollment as at least a half-time
student at the eligible institution or, in the case of a student
already enrolled in and attending the eligible institution, is in good
standing and in at least half-time attendance there either as an
undergraduate, graduate or professional student; and
(c) Is not pursuing a degree in theology;
(3) Placing priority on providing:
(a) Work opportunities for students who are residents of the state
of Washington as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013, particularly
former foster youth as defined in RCW 28B.92.060;
(b) Job placements in fields related to each student's academic or
vocational pursuits, with an emphasis on off-campus job placements
whenever appropriate; and
(c) Off-campus community service placements;
(4) To the extent practicable, limiting the proportion of state
subsidy expended upon nonresident students to fifteen percent, or such
less amount as specified in the biennial appropriations act;
(5) Provisions to assure that in the state institutions of higher
education, utilization of this work-study program:
(a) Shall only supplement and not supplant classified positions
under jurisdiction of chapter 41.06 RCW;
(b) That all positions established which are comparable shall be
identified to a job classification under the director of personnel's
classification plan and shall receive equal compensation;
(c) Shall not take place in any manner that would replace
classified positions reduced due to lack of funds or work; and
(d) That work study positions shall only be established at entry
level positions of the classified service unless the overall scope and
responsibilities of the position indicate a higher level; ((and))
(6) Provisions to encourage job placements in high employer demand
occupations that meet Washington's economic development goals,
including those in international trade and international relations.
The board shall permit appropriate job placements in other states and
other countries; and
(7) Provisions to encourage job placements in agricultural
activities, including the harvesting of farm or nursery products and
related activities.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.12.060 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 146 are each
amended to read as follows:
The office of student financial assistance shall adopt rules as may
be necessary or appropriate for effecting the provisions of this
chapter, and not in conflict with this chapter, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.
Such rules shall include provisions designed to make employment under
the work-study program reasonably available, to the extent of available
funds, to all eligible needy students in eligible postsecondary
institutions. The rules shall include:
(1) Providing work under the state work-study program that will not
result in the displacement of employed workers or impair existing
contracts for services;
(2) Furnishing work only to a student who:
(a) Is capable, in the opinion of the eligible institution, of
maintaining good standing in such course of study while employed under
the program covered by the agreement; and
(b) Has been accepted for enrollment as at least a half-time
student at the eligible institution or, in the case of a student
already enrolled in and attending the eligible institution, is in good
standing and in at least half-time attendance there either as an
undergraduate, graduate or professional student; and
(c) Is not pursuing a degree in theology;
(3) Placing priority on providing:
(a) Work opportunities for students who are residents of the state
of Washington as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013, particularly
former foster youth as defined in RCW 28B.92.060;
(b) Job placements in fields related to each student's academic or
vocational pursuits, with an emphasis on off-campus job placements
whenever appropriate; and
(c) Off-campus community service placements;
(4) To the extent practicable, limiting the proportion of state
subsidy expended upon nonresident students to fifteen percent, or such
less amount as specified in the biennial appropriations act;
(5) Provisions to assure that in the state institutions of higher
education, utilization of this work-study program:
(a) Shall only supplement and not supplant classified positions
under jurisdiction of chapter 41.06 RCW;
(b) That all positions established which are comparable shall be
identified to a job classification under the director of personnel's
classification plan and shall receive equal compensation;
(c) Shall not take place in any manner that would replace
classified positions reduced due to lack of funds or work; and
(d) That work study positions shall only be established at entry
level positions of the classified service unless the overall scope and
responsibilities of the position indicate a higher level; ((and))
(6) Provisions to encourage job placements in high employer demand
occupations that meet Washington's economic development goals,
including those in international trade and international relations.
The office shall permit appropriate job placements in other states and
other countries; and
(7) Provisions to encourage job placements in agricultural
activities, including the harvesting of farm or nursery products and
related activities.

Sec. 8 RCW 72.09.100 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 37 and 2011 c 100
s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department the
power to provide for a comprehensive inmate work program and to remove
statutory and other restrictions which have limited work programs in
the past. It is also the intent of the legislature to ensure that the
department, in developing and selecting correctional industries work
programs, does not encourage the development of, or provide for
selection of or contracting for, or the significant expansion of, any
new or existing class I correctional industries work programs that
unfairly compete with Washington businesses. The legislature intends
that the requirements relating to fair competition in the correctional
industries work programs be liberally construed by the department to
protect Washington businesses from unfair competition. For purposes of
establishing such a comprehensive program, the legislature recommends
that the department consider adopting any or all, or any variation of,
the following classes of work programs:
(1) CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES.
(a) The employer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit organization
pursuant to an agreement between the organization and the department.
The organization shall produce goods or services for sale to both the
public and private sector, and may be engaged in agricultural
activities, such as the harvesting of farm or nursery products and
related activities.
(b) The customer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed by the department to provide Washington state manufacturers
or businesses with products or services currently produced or provided
by out-of-state or foreign suppliers.
(c) The department shall review these proposed industries,
including any potential new class I industries work program or the
significant expansion of an existing class I industries work program,
before the department contracts to provide such products or services.
The review shall include the analysis required under RCW 72.09.115 to
determine if the proposed correctional industries work program will
compete with any Washington business. An agreement for a new class I
correctional industries work program, or an agreement for a significant
expansion of an existing class I correctional industries work program,
that unfairly competes with any Washington business is prohibited.
(d) The department shall supply appropriate security and custody
services without charge to the participating firms.
(e) Inmates who work in free venture industries shall do so at
their own choice. They shall be paid a wage comparable to the wage
paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry
is located, as determined by the director of correctional industries.
If the director cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage, then
the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.
(f) An inmate who is employed in the class I program of
correctional industries shall not be eligible for unemployment
compensation benefits pursuant to any of the provisions of Title 50 RCW
until released on parole or discharged.
(2) CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be state-owned and operated
enterprises designed primarily to reduce the costs for goods and
services for tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations.
(b)(i) The industries selected for development within this class
shall, as much as possible, match the available pool of inmate work
skills and aptitudes with the work opportunities in the free community.
The industries shall be closely patterned after private sector
industries but with the objective of reducing public support costs
rather than making a profit.
(ii) The products and services of this industry, including
purchased products and services necessary for a complete product line,
may be sold to the following:
(A) Public agencies;
(B) Nonprofit organizations;
(C) Private contractors when the goods purchased will be ultimately
used by a public agency or a nonprofit organization;
(D) An employee and immediate family members of an employee of the
department;
(E) A person under the supervision of the department and his or her
immediate family members; and
(F) A licensed health professional for the sole purpose of
providing eyeglasses to enrollees of the state medical program at no
more than the health professional's cost of acquisition.
(iii) The department shall authorize the type and quantity of items
that may be purchased and sold under (b)(ii)(D) and (E) of this
subsection.
(iv) It is prohibited to purchase any item purchased under
(b)(ii)(D) and (E) of this subsection for the purpose of resale.
(v) Clothing manufactured by an industry in this class may be
donated to nonprofit organizations that provide clothing free of charge
to low-income persons.
(c)(i) Class II correctional industries products and services shall
be reviewed by the department before offering such products and
services for sale to private contractors.
(ii) The secretary shall conduct a yearly marketing review of the
products and services offered under this subsection. Such review shall
include an analysis of the potential impact of the proposed products
and services on the Washington state business community. To avoid
waste or spoilage and consequent loss to the state, when there is no
public sector market for such goods, by-products and surpluses of
timber, agricultural, and animal husbandry enterprises may be sold to
private persons, at private sale. Surplus by-products and surpluses of
timber, agricultural and animal husbandry enterprises that cannot be
sold to public agencies or to private persons may be donated to
nonprofit organizations. All sales of surplus products shall be
carried out in accordance with rules prescribed by the secretary.
(d) Security and custody services shall be provided without charge
by the department.
(e) Inmates working in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall be paid for their work on a gratuity scale
which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar nature in
the locality in which the industry is located and which is approved by
the director of correctional industries.
(f) Provisions of RCW 41.06.142 shall not apply to contracts with
Washington state businesses entered into by the department through
class II industries.
(3) CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department.
They shall be designed and managed to accomplish the following
objectives:
(i) Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and
experience so that the inmate will be able to qualify for better work
both within correctional industries and the free community. It is not
intended that an inmate's work within this class of industries should
be his or her final and total work experience as an inmate.
(ii) Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or work
training per week.
(iii) Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public support
costs.
(b) Class III correctional industries shall be reviewed by the
department to set policy for work crews. The department shall prepare
quarterly detail statements showing where work crews worked, what
correctional industry class, and the hours worked.
(c) Supervising, management, and custody staff shall be employees
of the department.
(d) All able and eligible inmates who are assigned work and who are
not working in other classes of industries shall work in this class.
(e) Except for inmates who work in work training programs, inmates
in this class shall be paid for their work in accordance with an inmate
gratuity scale. The scale shall be adopted by the secretary of
corrections.
(4) CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department.
They shall be designed and managed to provide services in the inmate's
resident community at a reduced cost. The services shall be provided
to public agencies, to persons who are poor or infirm, or to nonprofit
organizations.
(b) Class IV correctional industries shall be reviewed by the
department to set policy for work crews. The department shall prepare
quarterly detail statements showing where work crews worked, what
correctional industry class, and the hours worked. Class IV
correctional industries operated in work camps established pursuant to
RCW 72.64.050 are exempt from the requirements of this subsection
(4)(b).
(c) Inmates in this program shall reside in facilities owned by,
contracted for, or licensed by the department. A unit of local
government shall provide work supervision services without charge to
the state and shall pay the inmate's wage.
(d) The department shall reimburse participating units of local
government for liability and workers compensation insurance costs.
(e) Inmates who work in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall receive a gratuity which shall not exceed
the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the
industry is located.
(5) CLASS V: COMMUNITY RESTITUTION PROGRAMS.
(a) Programs in this class shall be subject to supervision by the
department. The purpose of this class of industries is to enable an
inmate, placed on community supervision, to work off all or part of a
community restitution order as ordered by the sentencing court.
(b) Employment shall be in a community restitution program operated
by the state, local units of government, or a nonprofit agency.
(c) To the extent that funds are specifically made available for
such purposes, the department shall reimburse nonprofit agencies for
workers compensation insurance costs.

Sec. 9 RCW 72.65.100 and 1986 c 125 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary is authorized to make rules and regulations for the
administration of the provisions of this chapter to administer the work
release program. In addition, the department shall:
(1) Supervise and consult with work release participants;
(2) Locate available employment or vocational training
opportunities for qualified work release participants. Employment
opportunities for work release participants may include work in
agricultural activities, such as the harvesting of farm or nursery
products and related activities;
(3) Effect placement of work release participants under the
program;
(4) Collect, account for and make disbursement from earnings of
work release participants under the provisions of this chapter,
including accounting for all inmate debt in the community services
revolving fund. RCW 9.95.370 applies to inmates assigned to
work/training release facilities who receive assistance as provided in
RCW 9.95.310, 9.95.320, 72.65.050, and 72.65.090;
(5) Promote public understanding and acceptance of the work release
program.
All state agencies shall cooperate with the department in the
administration of the work release program as provided by this chapter.

Sec. 10 RCW 72.09.280 and 2007 c 483 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall continue to establish community justice
centers throughout the state for the purpose of providing comprehensive
services and monitoring for offenders who are reentering the community.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter, "community justice center" is
defined as a nonresidential facility staffed primarily by the
department in which recently released offenders may access services
necessary to improve their successful reentry into the community. Such
services may include but are not limited to, those listed in the
individual reentry plan, mental health, chemical dependency, sex
offender treatment, anger management, parenting education, financial
literacy, housing assistance, and employment assistance.
(3) At a minimum, the community justice center shall include:
(a) A violator program to allow the department to utilize a range
of available sanctions for offenders who violate conditions of their
supervision;
(b) An employment opportunity program to assist an offender in
finding employment, which may include work in agricultural activities,
such as the harvesting of farm or nursery products and related
activities; and
(c) Resources for connecting offenders with services such as
treatment, transportation, training, family reunification, and
community services.
(4) In addition to any other programs or services offered by a
community justice center, the department shall designate a transition
coordinator to facilitate connections between the former offender and
the community. The department may designate transition coordination
services to be provided by a community transition coordination network
pursuant to RCW 72.78.030 if one has been established in the community
where the community justice center is located and the department has
entered into a memorandum of understanding with the county to share
resources.
(5) The transition coordinator shall provide information to former
offenders regarding services available to them in the community
regardless of the length of time since the offender's release from the
correctional facility. The transition coordinator shall, at a minimum,
be responsible for the following:
(a) Gathering and maintaining information regarding services
currently existing within the community that are available to offenders
including, but not limited to:
(i) Programs offered through the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the department of licensing,
housing authorities, local community and technical colleges, other
state or federal entities which provide public benefits, and nonprofit
entities;
(ii) Services such as housing assistance, employment assistance,
education, vocational training, parent education, financial literacy,
treatment for substance abuse, mental health, anger management, and any
other service or program that will assist the former offender to
successfully transition into the community;
(b) Coordinating access to the existing services with the community
providers and provide offenders with information regarding how to
access the various type of services and resources that are available in
the community.
(6)(a) A minimum of six community justice centers shall be
operational by December 1, 2009. The six community justice centers
include those in operation on July 22, 2007.
(b) By December 1, 2011, the department shall establish a minimum
of three additional community justice centers within the state.
(7) In locating new centers, the department shall:
(a) Give priority to the counties with the largest population of
offenders who were under the jurisdiction of the department of
corrections and that do not already have a community justice center;
(b) Ensure that at least two centers are operational in eastern
Washington; and
(c) Comply with RCW 72.09.290 and all applicable zoning laws and
regulations.
(8) Before beginning the siting or opening of the new community
justice center, the department shall:
(a) Notify the city, if applicable, and the county within which the
community justice center is proposed. Such notice shall occur at least
sixty days prior to selecting a specific location to provide the
services listed in this section;
(b) Consult with the community providers listed in subsection (5)
of this section to determine if they have the capacity to provide
services to offenders through the community justice center; and
(c) Give due consideration to all comments received in response to
the notice of the start of site selection and consultation with
community providers.
(9) The department shall make efforts to enter into memoranda of
understanding or agreements with the local community policing and
supervision programs as defined in RCW 72.78.010 in which the community
justice center is located to address:
(a) Efficiencies that may be gained by sharing space or resources
in the provision of reentry services to offenders, including services
provided through a community transition coordination network
established pursuant to RCW 72.78.030 if a network has been established
in the county;
(b) Mechanisms for communication of information about offenders,
including the feasibility of shared access to databases;
(c) Partnerships to establish neighborhood corrections initiatives
between the department of corrections and local police to supervise
offenders.
(i) A neighborhood corrections initiative includes shared
mechanisms to facilitate supervision of offenders which may include
activities such as joint emphasis patrols to monitor high-risk
offenders, service of bench and secretary warrants and detainers, joint
field visits, connecting offenders with services, and, where
appropriate, directing offenders into sanction alternatives in lieu of
incarceration.
(ii) The agreement must address:
(A) The roles and responsibilities of police officers and
corrections staff participating in the partnership; and
(B) The amount of corrections staff and police officer time that
will be dedicated to partnership efforts.

Sec. 11 RCW 50.62.030 and 1995 c 135 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Job service resources shall be used to assist with the reemployment
of unemployed workers using the most efficient and effective means of
service delivery. The job service program of the employment security
department may undertake any program or activity for which funds are
available and which furthers the goals of this chapter. These programs
and activities shall include, but are not limited to:
(1) Giving older unemployed workers and the long-term unemployed
the highest priority for all services made available under this
section. The employment security department shall make the services
provided under this chapter available to the older unemployed workers
and the long-term unemployed as soon as they register under the
employment assistance program;
(2) Supplementing basic employment services, with special job
search and claimant placement assistance designed to assist
unemployment insurance claimants to obtain employment;
(3) Providing employment services, such as recruitment, screening,
and referral of qualified workers, including refugees and asylees, to
agricultural areas where these services have in the past contributed to
positive economic conditions for the agricultural industry; and
(4) Providing otherwise unobtainable information and analysis to
the legislature and program managers about issues related to employment
and unemployment.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.70.335 and 1999 c 374 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person providing temporary worker housing consisting of
five or more dwelling units, or any combination of dwelling units,
dormitories, or spaces that house ten or more occupants, or any person
providing temporary worker housing who makes the election to comply
with the temporary worker building code under RCW 70.114A.081(1)(((g)))
(h), shall secure an ((annual)) operating license prior to occupancy
and shall pay a fee according to RCW 43.70.340. The term of all
licenses issued on or after July 23, 2011, shall be at least two years,
and shall be established, by rule, by the department. The license
shall be conspicuously displayed on site.
(2) Licenses issued under this chapter may be suspended or revoked
upon the failure or refusal of the person providing temporary worker
housing to comply with rules adopted under this section or chapter
70.114A RCW by the department. All such proceedings shall be governed
by the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) The department may assess a civil fine in accordance with RCW
43.70.095 for failure or refusal to obtain a license prior to occupancy
of temporary worker housing. The department may refund all or part of
the civil fine collected once the operator obtains a valid operating
license.
(4) Civil fines under this section shall not exceed twice the cost
of the license plus the cost of the initial on-site inspection for the
first violation of this section, and shall not exceed ten times the
cost of the license plus the cost of the initial on-site inspection for
second and subsequent violations within any five-year period. The
department may adopt rules as necessary to assure compliance with this
section.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.70.340 and 1998 c 37 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The temporary worker housing fund is established in the custody
of the state treasury. The department shall deposit all funds received
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section and from the legislature
to administer a temporary worker housing permitting, licensing, and
inspection program conducted by the department. Disbursement from the
fund shall be on authorization of the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee. The fund is subject to the allotment procedure
provided under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
disbursements.
(2) There is imposed a fee on each operating license issued by the
department to every operator of temporary worker housing that is
regulated by the state board of health. In establishing the fee to be
paid under this subsection the department shall consider the cost of
administering a license as well as enforcing applicable state board of
health rules on temporary worker housing.
(3) There is imposed a fee on each temporary worker housing
building permit issued by the department to every operator of temporary
worker housing as required by RCW 43.70.337. The fee shall include the
cost of administering a permit as well as enforcing the department's
temporary worker building code as adopted under RCW 70.114A.081.
(4) The department shall conduct a fee study for:
(a) A temporary worker housing operator's license;
(b) On-site inspections; and
(c) A plan review and building permit for new construction.
After completion of the study, the department shall adopt these
fees by rule by no later than December 31, 1998.
(5) The ((term of the operating license and the)) application
procedures shall be established, by rule, by the department.
(6) During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, the
department may not raise fees related to regulation and inspection of
farmworker housing.

Sec. 14 RCW 70.114A.081 and 1999 c 374 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt by rule a temporary worker building
code in conformance with the temporary worker housing standards
developed under the Washington industrial safety and health act,
chapter 49.17 RCW, and the following guidelines:
(a) The temporary worker building code shall provide construction
standards for shelter and associated facilities that are safe, secure,
and capable of withstanding the stresses and loads associated with
their designated use, and to which they are likely to be subjected by
the elements;
(b) The temporary worker building code shall permit and facilitate
designs and formats that allow for maximum affordability and
flexibility, consistent with the provision of decent, safe, and
sanitary housing;
(c) The temporary worker building code shall permit and encourage
multiple uses of structures, footings, and foundations, and shall also
permit all concrete footings and concrete foundations used for cherry
tents to also be used for other types of temporary housing, such as
mobile units;
(d) In developing the temporary worker building code the department
of health shall consider:
(i) The need for dormitory type housing for groups of unrelated
individuals; and
(ii) The need for housing to accommodate families;
(((d))) (e) The temporary worker building code shall incorporate
the opportunity for the use of construction alternatives and the use of
new technologies that meet the performance standards required by law;
(((e))) (f) The temporary worker building code shall include
standards for heating and insulation appropriate to the type of
structure and length and season of occupancy;
(((f))) (g) The temporary worker building code shall include
standards for temporary worker housing that are to be used only during
periods when no auxiliary heat is required; and
(((g))) (h) The temporary worker building code shall provide that
persons operating temporary worker housing consisting of four or fewer
dwelling units or combinations of dwelling units, dormitories, or
spaces that house nine or fewer occupants may elect to comply with the
provisions of the temporary worker building code, and that unless the
election is made, such housing is subject to the codes adopted under
RCW 19.27.031.
(2) In adopting the temporary worker building code, the department
shall make exceptions to the codes listed in RCW 19.27.031 and chapter
19.27A RCW, in keeping with the guidelines set forth in this section.
The initial temporary worker building code adopted by the department
shall be substantially equivalent ((with)) to the temporary worker
building code developed by the state building code council as directed
by section 8, chapter 220, Laws of 1995.
(3) The temporary worker building code authorized and required by
this section shall be enforced by the department.
The department shall have the authority to allow minor variations
from the temporary worker building code that do not compromise the
health or safety of workers. Procedures for requesting variations and
guidelines for granting such requests shall be included in the rules
adopted under this section.

Sec. 15 RCW 47.66.100 and 2011 c 272 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a rural mobility grant program.
The purpose of the grant program is to aid small cities and rural
areas, as identified in the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2008"
published by the department or subsequent versions published by the
department. Of the money appropriated for the rural mobility grant
program:
(a) Fifty percent ((of the money appropriated for the rural
mobility grant program)) must go to noncompetitive grants that must be
distributed to the transit systems serving small cities and rural areas
in a manner similar to past disparity equalization programs((.));
(b) ((Fifty)) No more than forty percent ((of the money
appropriated for the rural mobility grant program)) must go to
competitive grants to providers of rural mobility service in areas not
served or underserved by transit agencies; and
(c) At least ten percent must be used to provide agricultural
workers with enhanced transit opportunities through the establishment
of vanpool or other programs. Any vanpool program must, at a minimum,
provide appropriate vehicles, insurance, and maintenance, and may
charge an appropriate fee, as determined by the department, to the
riders in a vanpool.
(2) The department may establish an advisory committee to carry out
the mandates of this section.
(3) The department must report annually to the transportation
committees of the legislature on the status of any grants projects
funded by the program created under this section.
(((4) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the department shall,
with money appropriated for the competitive grants program under
subsection (1)(b) of this section, implement a pilot project to provide
agricultural workers with enhanced transit opportunities through the
establishment of one or more vanpool programs. The pilot project must,
at a minimum, provide appropriate vehicles, insurance, and maintenance,
and may charge an appropriate fee, as determined by the department, to
the riders in a vanpool.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Section 6 of this act expires July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Section 7 of this act takes effect July 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 12 and 13 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---