BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any entity that operates as a sperm bank shall:
(a) Require any donor to the bank to disclose how many times he has
donated semen to sperm banks; and
(b) Disclose to any recipient of semen:
(i) The number of times the donor has reported having donated semen
to any sperm banks;
(ii) The number of times the sperm bank has delivered semen from
the donor to any recipient; and
(iii) If known, the number of times that the semen from the donor
has resulted in successful insemination leading to a pregnancy.
(2) A sperm bank that violates subsection (1)(b) of this section
may be liable under RCW 7.70.050 for the failure to secure informed
consent if the recipient demonstrates that the information identified
in subsection (1)(b) of this section was a material fact relating to
the treatment and establishes all other necessary elements of proof
under RCW 7.70.050.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "sperm bank" means any
facility or program such as a person, hospital, clinic, corporation, or
partnership that is involved in procuring, furnishing, donating,
processing, storing, or distributing human semen for the purpose of
artificial insemination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2013.

--- END ---