BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.06.015 and 2011 c 200 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a transaction for the sale of unimproved residential real
property, the seller shall, unless the buyer has expressly waived the
right to receive the disclosure statement under RCW 64.06.010, or
unless the transfer is otherwise exempt under RCW 64.06.010, deliver to
the buyer a completed seller disclosure statement in the following
format and that contains, at a minimum, the following information:

INSTRUCTIONS TO THE SELLER
Please complete the following form. Do not leave any spaces blank. If
the question clearly does not apply to the property write "NA." If the
answer is "yes" to any * items, please explain on attached sheets.
Please refer to the line number(s) of the question(s) when you provide
your explanation(s). For your protection you must date and sign each
page of this disclosure statement and each attachment. Delivery of the
disclosure statement must occur not later than five business days,
unless otherwise agreed, after mutual acceptance of a written contract
to purchase between a buyer and a seller.

NOTICE TO THE BUYER
THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES ARE MADE BY SELLER ABOUT THE CONDITION OF THE
PROPERTY LOCATED AT . . . . . . . . . . . .
("THE PROPERTY"), OR AS LEGALLY DESCRIBED ON ATTACHED EXHIBIT A.

SELLER MAKES THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES OF EXISTING MATERIAL FACTS OR
MATERIAL DEFECTS TO BUYER BASED ON SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE
PROPERTY AT THE TIME SELLER COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT.
UNLESS YOU AND SELLER OTHERWISE AGREE IN WRITING, YOU HAVE THREE
BUSINESS DAYS FROM THE DAY SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT DELIVERS THIS
DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO YOU TO RESCIND THE AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING A
SEPARATELY SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO SELLER OR SELLER'S
AGENT. IF THE SELLER DOES NOT GIVE YOU A COMPLETED DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT, THEN YOU MAY WAIVE THE RIGHT TO RESCIND PRIOR TO OR AFTER
THE TIME YOU ENTER INTO A SALE AGREEMENT.

THE FOLLOWING ARE DISCLOSURES MADE BY SELLER AND ARE NOT THE
REPRESENTATIONS OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY. THIS
INFORMATION IS FOR DISCLOSURE ONLY AND IS NOT INTENDED TO BE A PART OF
ANY WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN BUYER AND SELLER.

FOR A MORE COMPREHENSIVE EXAMINATION OF THE SPECIFIC CONDITION OF THIS
PROPERTY YOU ARE ADVISED TO OBTAIN AND PAY FOR THE SERVICES OF
QUALIFIED EXPERTS TO INSPECT THE PROPERTY, WHICH MAY INCLUDE, WITHOUT
LIMITATION, ARCHITECTS, ENGINEERS, LAND SURVEYORS, PLUMBERS,
ELECTRICIANS, ROOFERS, BUILDING INSPECTORS, ON-SITE WASTEWATER
TREATMENT INSPECTORS, OR STRUCTURAL PEST INSPECTORS. THE PROSPECTIVE
BUYER AND SELLER MAY WISH TO OBTAIN PROFESSIONAL ADVICE OR INSPECTIONS
OF THE PROPERTY OR TO PROVIDE APPROPRIATE PROVISIONS IN A CONTRACT
BETWEEN THEM WITH RESPECT TO ANY ADVICE, INSPECTION, DEFECTS OR
WARRANTIES.

Seller . . . . is/ . . . . is not occupying the property.

I. SELLER'S DISCLOSURES:

*If you answer "Yes" to a question with an asterisk (*), please explain your answer
and attach documents, if available and not otherwise publicly recorded. If
necessary, use an attached sheet.

1. TITLE

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Do you have legal authority to sell
the property? If no, please explain.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Is title to the property subject to
any of the following?

(1) First right of refusal

(2) Option

(3) Lease or rental agreement

(4) Life estate?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any encroachments,
boundary agreements, or boundary
disputes?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Is there a private road or easement
agreement for access to the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any rights-of-way,
easements, or access limitations that
affect the Buyer's use of the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Are there any written agreements
for joint maintenance of an easement or
right-of-way?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Is there any study, survey project,
or notice that would adversely affect the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *H. Are there any pending or existing
assessments against the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *I. Are there any zoning violations,
nonconforming uses, or any unusual
restrictions on the property that affect
future construction or remodeling?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *J. Is there a boundary survey for the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *K. Are there any covenants,
conditions, or restrictions recorded
against title to the property?

2. WATER

A. Household Water

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Does the property have potable
water supply?

(2) If yes, the source of water for the
property is:

[ ] Private or publicly owned water
system

[ ] Private well serving only the
property

*[ ] Other water system

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *If shared, are there any written
agreements?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) Is there an easement (recorded or
unrecorded) for access to and/or
maintenance of the water source?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(4) Are there any problems or repairs
needed?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (5) Is there a connection or hook-up
charge payable before the property can
be connected to the water main?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (6) Have you obtained a certificate of
water availability from the water
purveyor serving the property? (If yes,
please attach a copy.)

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (7) Is there a water right permit,
certificate, or claim associated with
household water supply for the
property? (If yes, please attach a copy.)

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (a) If yes, has the water right permit,
certificate, or claim been assigned,
transferred, or changed?

*(b) If yes, has all or any portion of the
water right not been used for five or
more successive years?

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (c) If no or don't know, ((is the water
withdrawn from the water source less
than 5,000 gallons a day?)) does or will
a well drawing less than 5,000 gallons
per day supply water to the property?
(Check with county or city officials to
ensure that water is legally available for
a new well.)

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(8) Are there any defects in the
operation of the water system (e.g.,
pipes, tank, pump, etc.)?

B. Irrigation Water

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Are there any irrigation water rights
for the property, such as a water right
permit, certificate, or claim? (If yes,
please attach a copy.)

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (a) If yes, has all or any portion of the
water right not been used for five or
more successive years?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (b) If yes, has the water right permit,
certificate, or claim been assigned,
transferred, or changed?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(2) Does the property receive
irrigation water from a ditch company,
irrigation district, or other entity? If so,
please identify the entity that supplies
irrigation water to the property:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) Does or will the property receive
irrigation water from a well to irrigate a
lawn or noncommercial garden of less
than one-half acre in size? (Check with
county or city officials to ensure that
water is legally available for a new
well.)

. . . . . . . . . . . .

C. Outdoor Sprinkler System

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Is there an outdoor sprinkler system
for the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(2) If yes, are there any defects in the
system?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) If yes, is the sprinkler system
connected to irrigation water?

3. SEWER/SEPTIC SYSTEM

A. The property is served by:
[ ] Public sewer system
[ ] On-site sewage system (including
pipes, tanks, drainfields, and all other
component parts)
[ ] Other disposal system, please
describe:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. Is the property subject to any
sewage system fees or charges in
addition to those covered in your
regularly billed sewer or on-site sewage
system maintenance service?

C. If the property is connected to an
on-site sewage system:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(1) Was a permit issued for its
construction?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(2) Was it approved by the local
health department or district following
its construction?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (3) Is the septic system a pressurized
system?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (4) Is the septic system a gravity
system?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(5) Have there been any changes or
repairs to the on-site sewage system?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (6) Is the on-site sewage system,
including the drainfield, located entirely
within the boundaries of the property?
If no, please explain:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(7) Does the on-site sewage system
require monitoring and maintenance
services more frequently than once a
year?

. . . . . . . . . . . .

4. ELECTRICAL/GAS

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Is the property served by natural
gas?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. Is there a connection charge for gas?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know C. Is the property served by electricity?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know D. Is there a connection charge for
electricity?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any electrical problems
on the property?

. . . . . . . . . . . .

5. FLOODING

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Is the property located in a
government designated flood zone or
floodplain?

6. SOIL STABILITY

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Are there any settlement, earth
movement, slides, or similar soil
problems on the property?

. . . . . . . . . . . .

7. ENVIRONMENTAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Have there been any flooding,
standing water, or drainage problems on
the property that affect the property or
access to the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Does any part of the property
contain fill dirt, waste, or other fill
material?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Is there any material damage to the
property from fire, wind, floods, beach
movements, earthquake, expansive
soils, or landslides?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know D. Are there any shorelines, wetlands,
floodplains, or critical areas on the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any substances,
materials, or products in or on the
property that may be environmental
concerns, such as asbestos,
formaldehyde, radon gas, lead-based
paint, fuel or chemical storage tanks, or
contaminated soil or water?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Has the property been used for
commercial or industrial purposes?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Is there any soil or groundwater
contamination?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *H. Are there transmission poles or
other electrical utility equipment
installed, maintained, or buried on the
property that do not provide utility
service to the structures on the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *I. Has the property been used as a
legal or illegal dumping site?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *J. Has the property been used as an
illegal drug manufacturing site?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *K. Are there any radio towers that
cause interference with cellular
telephone reception?

8. HOMEOWNERS'
ASSOCIATION/COMMON
INTERESTS

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Is there a homeowners' association?
Name of association and contact
information for an officer, director,
employee, or other authorized agent, if
any, who may provide the association's
financial statements, minutes, bylaws,
fining policy, and other information that
is not publicly available:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. Are there regular periodic
assessments:

$. . . per [ ] Month [ ] Year

[ ] Other . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any pending special
assessments?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Are there any shared "common
areas" or any joint maintenance
agreements (facilities such as walls,
fences, landscaping, pools, tennis
courts, walkways, or other areas co-owned in undivided interest with
others)?

9. OTHER FACTS

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Are there any disagreements,
disputes, encroachments, or legal
actions concerning the property?

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Does the property have any plants
or wildlife that are designated as
species of concern, or listed as
threatened or endangered by the
government?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Is the property classified or
designated as forest land or open space?

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know D. Do you have a forest management
plan? If yes, attach.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Have any development-related
permit applications been submitted to
any government agencies?

. . . . . . . . . . . .

If the answer to E is "yes," what is the
status or outcome of those applications?

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know F. Is the property located within a city,
county, or district or within a
department of natural resources fire
protection zone that provides fire
protection services?

. . . . . . . . . . . .

10. FULL DISCLOSURE BY
SELLERS

A. Other conditions or defects:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *Are there any other existing material
defects affecting the property that a
prospective buyer should know about?

B. Verification:

The foregoing answers and attached
explanations (if any) are complete and
correct to the best of my/our knowledge
and I/we have received a copy hereof.
I/we authorize all of my/our real estate
licensees, if any, to deliver a copy of
this disclosure statement to other real
estate licensees and all prospective
buyers of the property.

DATE . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .

NOTICE TO BUYER

INFORMATION REGARDING REGISTERED SEX OFFENDERS MAY BE
OBTAINED FROM LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES. THIS NOTICE
IS INTENDED ONLY TO INFORM YOU OF WHERE TO OBTAIN THIS
INFORMATION AND IS NOT AN INDICATION OF THE PRESENCE OF
REGISTERED SEX OFFENDERS.

II. BUYER'S ACKNOWLEDGMENT

A. Buyer hereby acknowledges that: Buyer has a duty to pay
diligent attention to any material defects that are known to
Buyer or can be known to Buyer by utilizing diligent
attention and observation.

B. The disclosures set forth in this statement and in any
amendments to this statement are made only by the Seller
and not by any real estate licensee or other party.

C. Buyer acknowledges that, pursuant to RCW 64.06.050(2),
real estate licensees are not liable for inaccurate information
provided by Seller, except to the extent that real estate
licensees know of such inaccurate information.

D. This information is for disclosure only and is not intended to
be a part of the written agreement between the Buyer and
Seller.

E. Buyer (which term includes all persons signing the "Buyer's
acceptance" portion of this disclosure statement below) has
received a copy of this Disclosure Statement (including
attachments, if any) bearing Seller's signature.

DISCLOSURES CONTAINED IN THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT ARE PROVIDED BY
SELLER BASED ON SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME
SELLER COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT. UNLESS BUYER AND SELLER
OTHERWISE AGREE IN WRITING, BUYER SHALL HAVE THREE BUSINESS DAYS FROM
THE DAY SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT DELIVERS THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO
RESCIND THE AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING A SEPARATELY SIGNED WRITTEN
STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT. YOU MAY WAIVE THE
RIGHT TO RESCIND PRIOR TO OR AFTER THE TIME YOU ENTER INTO A SALE
AGREEMENT.
BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES RECEIPT OF A COPY OF THIS DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE DISCLOSURES MADE HEREIN ARE THOSE
OF THE SELLER ONLY, AND NOT OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY.
DATE . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . . . .

(2) The seller disclosure statement shall be for disclosure only,
and shall not be considered part of any written agreement between the
buyer and seller of residential property. The seller disclosure
statement shall be only a disclosure made by the seller, and not any
real estate licensee involved in the transaction, and shall not be
construed as a warranty of any kind by the seller or any real estate
licensee involved in the transaction.

Sec. 2 RCW 64.06.013 and 2010 c 64 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a transaction for the sale of commercial real estate, the
seller shall, unless the buyer has expressly waived the right to
receive the disclosure statement under RCW 64.06.010, or unless the
transfer is otherwise exempt under RCW 64.06.010, deliver to the buyer
a completed seller disclosure statement in the following format and
that contains, at a minimum, the following information:

INSTRUCTIONS TO THE SELLER
Please complete the following form. Do not leave any spaces blank. If
the question clearly does not apply to the property write "NA." If the
answer is "yes" to any * items, please explain on attached sheets.
Please refer to the line number(s) of the question(s) when you provide
your explanation(s). For your protection you must date and sign each
page of this disclosure statement and each attachment. Delivery of the
disclosure statement must occur not later than five business days,
unless otherwise agreed, after mutual acceptance of a written contract
to purchase between a buyer and a seller.

NOTICE TO THE BUYER
THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES ARE MADE BY SELLER ABOUT THE CONDITION OF THE
PROPERTY LOCATED AT . . . . . . . . . . . .
("THE PROPERTY"), OR AS LEGALLY DESCRIBED ON ATTACHED EXHIBIT A.

SELLER MAKES THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES OF EXISTING MATERIAL FACTS OR
MATERIAL DEFECTS TO BUYER BASED ON SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE
PROPERTY AT THE TIME SELLER COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT.
UNLESS YOU AND SELLER OTHERWISE AGREE IN WRITING, YOU HAVE THREE
BUSINESS DAYS FROM THE DAY SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT DELIVERS THIS
DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO YOU TO RESCIND THE AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING A
SEPARATELY SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO SELLER OR SELLER'S
AGENT. IF THE SELLER DOES NOT GIVE YOU A COMPLETED DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT, THEN YOU MAY WAIVE THE RIGHT TO RESCIND PRIOR TO OR AFTER
THE TIME YOU ENTER INTO A SALE AGREEMENT.

THE FOLLOWING ARE DISCLOSURES MADE BY SELLER AND ARE NOT THE
REPRESENTATIONS OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY. THIS
INFORMATION IS FOR DISCLOSURE ONLY AND IS NOT INTENDED TO BE A PART OF
ANY WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN BUYER AND SELLER.

FOR A MORE COMPREHENSIVE EXAMINATION OF THE SPECIFIC CONDITION OF THIS
PROPERTY YOU ARE ADVISED TO OBTAIN AND PAY FOR THE SERVICES OF
QUALIFIED EXPERTS TO INSPECT THE PROPERTY, WHICH MAY INCLUDE, WITHOUT
LIMITATION, ARCHITECTS, ENGINEERS, LAND SURVEYORS, PLUMBERS,
ELECTRICIANS, ROOFERS, BUILDING INSPECTORS, ON-SITE WASTEWATER
TREATMENT INSPECTORS, OR STRUCTURAL PEST INSPECTORS. THE PROSPECTIVE
BUYER AND SELLER MAY WISH TO OBTAIN PROFESSIONAL ADVICE OR INSPECTIONS
OF THE PROPERTY OR TO PROVIDE APPROPRIATE PROVISIONS IN A CONTRACT
BETWEEN THEM WITH RESPECT TO ANY ADVICE, INSPECTION, DEFECTS, OR
WARRANTIES.

Seller . . . . is/ . . . . is not occupying the property.

I. SELLER'S DISCLOSURES:

*If you answer "Yes" to a question with an asterisk (*), please explain your answer
and attach documents, if available and not otherwise publicly recorded. If
necessary, use an attached sheet.

1. TITLE AND LEGAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Do you have legal authority to sell
the property? If no, please explain.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Is title to the property subject to
any of the following?

(1) First right of refusal

(2) Option

(3) Lease or rental agreement

(4) Life estate?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any encroachments,
boundary agreements, or boundary
disputes?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Is there any leased parking?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Is there a private road or easement
agreement for access to the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Are there any rights-of-way,
easements, shared use agreements, or
access limitations?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Are there any written agreements
for joint maintenance of an easement or
right-of-way?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *H. Are there any zoning violations or
nonconforming uses?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *I. Is there a survey for the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *J. Are there any legal actions pending
or threatened that affect the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *K. Is the property in compliance with
the Americans with Disabilities Act?

2. WATER

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Are there any water rights for the
property, such as a water right permit,
certificate, or claim? If yes, please
attach a copy.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. Does or will the property receive
irrigation water from a well to irrigate a
lawn or noncommercial garden of less
than one-half acre in size? (Check with
county or city officials to ensure that
water is legally available for a new
well.)

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know C. If the property is unimproved but
intended for commercial or industrial
improvement, and not served by a public
water system, are there any water rights
for the property, such as a water right
permit, certificate, or claim? If yes,
please attach a copy.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know D. If no or don't know, does or will a
well drawing less than 5,000 gallons per
day supply water to the property?
(Check with county or city officials to
ensure that water is legally available for
a new well.)

3. SEWER/ON-SITE SEWAGE
SYSTEM

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *Is the property subject to any sewage
system fees or charges in addition to
those covered in your regularly billed
sewer or on-site sewage system
maintenance service?

4. STRUCTURAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Has the roof leaked within the last
five years?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Has any occupied subsurface
flooded or leaked within the last five
years?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Have there been any conversions,
additions, or remodeling?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(1) If yes, were all building permits
obtained?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(2) If yes, were all final inspections
obtained?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Has there been any settling,
slippage, or sliding of the property or its
improvements?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any defects with the
following: (If yes, please check
applicable items and explain.)

□ Foundations
□ Slab Floors

□ Doors □ Outbuildings

□ Ceilings □ Exterior Walls

□ Sidewalks □ Siding

□ Other

□ Interior Walls

□ Windows

5. SYSTEMS AND FIXTURES

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know * Are there any defects in the following
systems? If yes, please explain.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Electrical system

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (2) Plumbing system

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (3) Heating and cooling systems

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (4) Fire and security system

6. ENVIRONMENTAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Have there been any flooding,
standing water, or drainage problems on
the property that affect the property or
access to the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Is there any material damage to the
property from fire, wind, floods, beach
movements, earthquake, expansive soils,
or landslides?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any shorelines, wetlands,
floodplains, or critical areas on the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Are there any substances,
materials, or products in or on the
property that may be environmental
concerns, such as asbestos,
formaldehyde, radon gas, lead-based
paint, fuel or chemical storage tanks, or
contaminated soil or water?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Is there any soil or groundwater
contamination?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Has the property been used as a
legal or illegal dumping site?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Has the property been used as an
illegal drug manufacturing site?

7. FULL DISCLOSURE BY
SELLERS

A. Other conditions or defects:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *Are there any other existing material
defects affecting the property that a
prospective buyer should know about?

B. Verification:

The foregoing answers and attached
explanations (if any) are complete and
correct to the best of my/our knowledge
and I/we have received a copy hereof.
I/we authorize all of my/our real estate
licensees, if any, to deliver a copy of
this disclosure statement to other real
estate licensees and all prospective
buyers of the property.

DATE . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .

NOTICE TO BUYER

INFORMATION REGARDING REGISTERED SEX OFFENDERS MAY BE
OBTAINED FROM LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES. THIS NOTICE
IS INTENDED ONLY TO INFORM YOU OF WHERE TO OBTAIN THIS
INFORMATION AND IS NOT AN INDICATION OF THE PRESENCE OF
REGISTERED SEX OFFENDERS.

II. BUYER'S ACKNOWLEDGMENT

A. Buyer hereby acknowledges that: Buyer has a duty to pay
diligent attention to any material defects that are known to
Buyer or can be known to Buyer by utilizing diligent
attention and observation.

B. The disclosures set forth in this statement and in any
amendments to this statement are made only by the Seller
and not by any real estate licensee or other party.

C. Buyer acknowledges that, pursuant to RCW 64.06.050(2),
real estate licensees are not liable for inaccurate information
provided by Seller, except to the extent that real estate
licensees know of such inaccurate information.

D. This information is for disclosure only and is not intended to
be a part of the written agreement between the Buyer and
Seller.

E. Buyer (which term includes all persons signing the "Buyer's
acceptance" portion of this disclosure statement below) has
received a copy of this Disclosure Statement (including
attachments, if any) bearing Seller's signature.

DISCLOSURES CONTAINED IN THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT ARE PROVIDED BY
SELLER BASED ON SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME
SELLER COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT. UNLESS BUYER AND SELLER
OTHERWISE AGREE IN WRITING, BUYER SHALL HAVE THREE BUSINESS DAYS FROM
THE DAY SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT DELIVERS THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO
RESCIND THE AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING A SEPARATELY SIGNED WRITTEN
STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT. YOU MAY WAIVE THE
RIGHT TO RESCIND PRIOR TO OR AFTER THE TIME YOU ENTER INTO A SALE
AGREEMENT.
BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES RECEIPT OF A COPY OF THIS DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE DISCLOSURES MADE HEREIN ARE THOSE
OF THE SELLER ONLY, AND NOT OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY.
DATE . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . . . .

(2) The seller disclosure statement shall be for disclosure only,
and shall not be considered part of any written agreement between the
buyer and seller of residential property. The seller disclosure
statement shall be only a disclosure made by the seller, and not any
real estate licensee involved in the transaction, and shall not be
construed as a warranty of any kind by the seller or any real estate
licensee involved in the transaction.

--- END ---