BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature maintains its commitment
to ensure that all students have an equitable opportunity to complete
a meaningful high school diploma and graduate from high school ready
for career and college.
(2) The legislature also recognizes the importance and
responsibility of school boards to tailor graduation requirements to
local needs and goals. Furthermore, the legislature believes that
students should be encouraged and have sufficient flexibility to
explore their options and take courses in high school based on their
individual interests and plans.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to focus state high school
graduation requirements on the core, foundational knowledge and skills
that undergird career and college readiness, and leave decisions about
additional requirements and course selection to local communities,
parents, and students.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2011 c 203 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except as
provided in RCW 28A.230.122 and except those equivalencies established
by local high schools or school districts under RCW 28A.230.097.
Beginning with the graduating class of 2016, requirements established
by the state board may not exceed the provisions of this section. The
purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a student is ready
for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and
citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.
(a) The state board shall establish the following credit and course
distribution requirements beginning with the graduating class of 2016:
(i) Four English credits;
(ii) Three mathematics credits, where the content of the third
credit is chosen by the student based on the student's interests and
high school and beyond plan;
(iii) Three social studies credits;
(iv) Two science credits;
(v) Two credits in world languages;
(vi) One credit in the arts;
(vii) One credit in health and fitness; and
(viii) Two credits in a career concentration, which are courses
chosen by the student based on the student's interests and high school
and beyond plan, that may include career and technical education, and
are intended to provide a focus for the student's learning.
(b) The state board of education shall adopt rules consistent with
this section and other applicable state laws defining the minimum
content of the required credits and their alignment with the essential
academic learning requirements.
(c) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(((b))) (d) The certificate of academic achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement
requirements under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a
public high school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(((c))) (e) The state board may establish completion of a high
school and beyond plan as a graduation requirement. Any decision on
whether a student has met the state board's high school graduation
requirements for a high school and beyond plan shall remain at the
local level.
(((2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state
board of education to establish and enforce minimum high school
graduation requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate
the graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements
for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and
technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to
a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized.
The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in
these programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of
academic achievement, complete the program and earn the program's
certificate or credential, and complete other state and local
graduation requirements.
(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high
school graduation requirements to the education committees of the
legislature for review and to the quality education council established
under RCW 28A.290.010. The legislature shall have the opportunity to
act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted
through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a
fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the
legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted
legislation.
(3))) (f) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages
other than English established ((by the state board of education))
under this section or by a local school district, or both, for purposes
of high school graduation, students who receive instruction in American
sign language or one or more American Indian languages shall be
considered to have satisfied the state or local school district
graduation requirement for instruction in one or more languages other
than English.
(((4))) (2) If requested by the student and his or her family, a
student who has completed high school courses before attending high
school shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to
fulfilling high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(((5))) (3) Students who have taken and successfully completed high
school courses under the circumstances in subsection (((4))) (2) of
this section shall not be required to take an additional competency
examination or perform any other additional assignment to receive
credit.
(((6))) (4) At the college or university level, five quarter or
three semester hours equals one high school credit.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.220 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the
basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school
districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality
and give all students ((the)) an equitable opportunity to complete
graduation requirements that are intended to prepare them for
postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship. The
program established under this section shall be the minimum
instructional program of basic education offered by school districts.
(2) Each school district shall make available to students the
following minimum instructional offering each school year:
(a) For students enrolled in grades one through twelve, at least a
district-wide annual average of one thousand hours, which shall be
increased to at least one thousand eighty instructional hours for
students enrolled in each of grades seven through twelve and at least
one thousand instructional hours for students in each of grades one
through six according to an implementation schedule adopted by the
legislature, but not before the 2014-15 school year; and
(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least four hundred
fifty instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least one
thousand instructional hours according to the implementation schedule
under RCW 28A.150.315.
(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each
school district shall include:
(a) Instruction in the essential academic learning requirements
under RCW 28A.655.070;
(b) Instruction that provides all students ((the)) an equitable
opportunity to complete ((twenty-four credits for)) high school
graduation((, subject to a phased-in implementation of the twenty-four
credits as established by the legislature. Course distribution
requirements may be established by the state board of education))
requirements under RCW 28A.230.090;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages;
(d) Supplemental instruction and services for underachieving
students through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005
through 28A.165.065;
(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled
students whose primary language is other than English through the
transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010
through 28A.180.080;
(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense
as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with
disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; and
(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010
through 28A.185.030.
(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require
individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours
per day or to take any particular courses.
(5) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic
educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five
years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one
years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred eighty
school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school
district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or
equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of one
hundred eighty school days per school year according to the
implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315. However, effective May
1, 1979, a school district may schedule the last five school days of
the one hundred and eighty day school year for noninstructional
purposes in the case of students who are graduating from high school,
including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early
release from school upon the request of a student, and all such
students may be claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the extent
they could otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes a school district from
enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as
offering additional instruction or providing additional services,
programs, or activities that the school district determines to be
appropriate for the education of the school district's students.
(7) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

--- END ---