BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.17.160 and 2010 c 8 s 12013 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person shall discharge or in any manner discriminate against
any employee because such employee has filed any complaint or
instituted or caused to be instituted any proceeding under or related
to this chapter, or has testified or is about to testify in any such
proceeding or because of the exercise by such employee on behalf of
himself or herself or others of any right afforded by this chapter,
including reporting any injury, illness, or unsafe condition to the
employer, agent of the employer, safety and health committee involved,
or employee safety and health representative involved.
(2) Any employee who believes that he or she has been discharged or
otherwise discriminated against by any person in violation of this
section may, within ((thirty)) one hundred eighty days after such
violation occurs, file a complaint with the director alleging such
discrimination. Upon receipt of such complaint, the director shall
cause such investigation to be made as he or she deems appropriate. If
upon such investigation, the director determines that the provisions of
this section have been violated, he ((of [or])) or she shall bring an
action in the superior court of the county wherein the violation is
alleged to have occurred against the person or persons who is alleged
to have violated the provisions of this section. If the director
determines that the provisions of this section have not been violated,
the employee may institute the action on his or her own behalf within
thirty days of such determination. In any such action the superior
court shall have jurisdiction, for cause shown, to restrain violations
of subsection (1) of this section and order all appropriate relief
including rehiring or reinstatement of the employee to his or her
former position with back pay.
(3) Within ninety days of the receipt of the complaint filed under
this section, the director shall notify the complainant of his or her
determination under subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon request of a victim or victim's representative, the
director must:
(a) Meet with the victim or victim's representative regarding the
inspection or investigation conducted under this chapter concerning the
employee's injury or illness, including death. The meeting must take
place before the director decides whether to issue a citation.
(b) Provide to the victim or victim's representative:
(i) A copy of any citation or report issued as a result of the
inspection or investigation. The citation or report must be provided
at no cost and provided on the later of the date the citation or report
is received by the employer and the date of the request;
(ii) Notification of any appeal filed under RCW 49.17.140 regarding
a citation issued as a result of the inspection or investigation; and
(iii) An explanation of the rights of employees and employee
representatives to participate in the proceedings conducted under RCW
49.17.140.
(c) Provide to the victim or victim's representative an opportunity
to appear and make a statement before the parties conducting any
settlement negotiations during reassumption of jurisdiction by the
director or appeal before the board of industrial insurance appeals
regarding a citation issued as a result of an incident resulting in
death or serious injury. This opportunity must be provided before the
director enters an agreement to withdraw or modify a citation. For
purposes of this subsection, a "serious injury" is an injury or illness
requiring hospitalization or resulting in a loss of one or more days of
work.
(2) The director shall establish procedures to inform victims and
their representatives of their rights under this section and for the
informal review of any claim of a denial of such a right.
(3) For purposes of this section, "victim" means:
(a) An employee who has sustained a work-related injury or illness
that is the subject of an inspection or investigation conducted under
this chapter; or
(b) A family member of an employee, if as a result of a
work-related injury or illness that is the subject of an inspection or
investigation conducted under this chapter the employee is killed or
cannot reasonably exercise the employee's rights under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.17.180 and 2010 c 8 s 12015 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 43.05.090, any employer who willfully
or repeatedly violates the requirements of RCW 49.17.060, of any safety
or health standard promulgated under the authority of this chapter, of
any existing rule or regulation governing the conditions of employment
promulgated by the department, or of any order issued granting a
variance under RCW 49.17.080 or 49.17.090 may be assessed a civil
penalty not to exceed ((seventy)) one hundred twenty thousand dollars
for each violation. A minimum penalty of ((five)) eight thousand
dollars shall be assessed for a willful violation. If the violation
caused the death of an employee, the penalty may not exceed two hundred
fifty thousand dollars but may not be less than fifty thousand dollars.
(2) Any employer who has received a citation for a serious
violation of the requirements of RCW 49.17.060, of any safety or health
standard promulgated under the authority of this chapter, of any
existing rule or regulation governing the conditions of employment
promulgated by the department, or of any order issued granting a
variance under RCW 49.17.080 or 49.17.090 as determined in accordance
with subsection (6) of this section, shall be assessed a civil penalty
not to exceed ((seven)) twelve thousand dollars for each such
violation. If the violation caused the death of an employee, the
penalty may not exceed fifty thousand dollars but may not be less than
twenty thousand dollars, except that for an employer with twenty-five
or fewer employees the penalty may not be less than ten thousand
dollars.
(3) Any employer who has received a citation for a violation of the
requirements of RCW 49.17.060, of any safety or health standard
promulgated under this chapter, of any existing rule or regulation
governing the conditions of employment promulgated by the department,
or of any order issued granting a variance under RCW 49.17.080 or
49.17.090, where such violation is specifically determined not to be of
a serious nature as provided in subsection (6) of this section, may be
assessed a civil penalty not to exceed ((seven)) twelve thousand
dollars for each such violation, unless such violation is determined to
be de minimis. If the violation caused the death of an employee, the
penalty may not exceed fifty thousand dollars but may not be less than
twenty thousand dollars, except that for an employer with twenty-five
or fewer employees the penalty may not be less than ten thousand
dollars.
(4) Any employer who fails to correct a violation for which a
citation has been issued under RCW 49.17.120 or 49.17.130 within the
period permitted for its correction, which period shall not begin to
run until the date of the final order of the board of industrial
insurance appeals in the case of any review proceedings under this
chapter initiated by the employer in good faith and not solely for
delay or avoidance of penalties, may be assessed a civil penalty of not
more than ((seven)) twelve thousand dollars for each day during which
such failure or violation continues.
(5) Any employer who violates any of the posting requirements of
this chapter, or any of the posting requirements of rules promulgated
by the department pursuant to this chapter related to employee or
employee representative's rights to notice, including but not limited
to those employee rights to notice set forth in RCW 49.17.080,
49.17.090, 49.17.120, 49.17.130, 49.17.220(1), and 49.17.240(2), shall
be assessed a penalty not to exceed ((seven)) twelve thousand dollars
for each such violation. Any employer who violates any of the posting
requirements for the posting of informational, educational, or training
materials under the authority of RCW 49.17.050(7), may be assessed a
penalty not to exceed ((seven)) twelve thousand dollars for each such
violation.
(6) For the purposes of this section, a serious violation shall be
deemed to exist in a work place if there is a substantial probability
that death or serious physical harm could result from a condition which
exists, or from one or more practices, means, methods, operations, or
processes which have been adopted or are in use in such work place,
unless the employer did not, and could not with the exercise of
reasonable diligence, know of the presence of the violation.
(7) The director, or his or her authorized representatives, shall
have authority to assess all civil penalties provided in this section,
giving due consideration to the appropriateness of the penalty with
respect to the number of affected employees of the employer being
charged, the gravity of the violation, the size of the employer's
business, the good faith of the employer, and the history of previous
violations.
(8) Civil penalties imposed under this chapter shall be paid to the
director for deposit in the supplemental pension fund established by
RCW 51.44.033. Civil penalties may be recovered in a civil action in
the name of the department brought in the superior court of the county
where the violation is alleged to have occurred, or the department may
utilize the procedures for collection of civil penalties as set forth
in RCW 51.48.120 through 51.48.150.
(9) The director shall adjust the civil penalty amounts in this
section at least once every four years beginning on the effective date
of this section to account for the percentage increase or decrease in
the consumer price index for all urban wage earners compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor during
such period.

Sec. 4 RCW 49.17.190 and 2011 c 96 s 40 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who gives advance notice of any inspection to be
conducted under the authority of this chapter, without the consent of
the director or his or her authorized representative, shall, upon
conviction be guilty of a ((gross misdemeanor)) class C felony and be
punished by a fine of not more than ((one)) two hundred fifty thousand
dollars or by imprisonment for not more than ((six months)) two years,
or by both.
(2) Whoever knowingly makes any false statement, representation, or
certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other
document filed or required to be maintained pursuant to this chapter
shall, upon conviction be guilty of a ((gross misdemeanor)) class C
felony and be punished by a fine of not more than ((ten)) two hundred
fifty thousand dollars, or by imprisonment for not more than ((six
months)) five years or by both.
(3) Any employer who ((wilfully)) willfully and knowingly violates
the requirements of RCW 49.17.060, any safety or health standard
promulgated under this chapter, any existing rule or regulation
governing the safety or health conditions of employment and adopted by
the director, or any order issued granting a variance under RCW
49.17.080 or 49.17.090 and that violation caused death to any employee
shall, upon conviction be guilty of a ((gross misdemeanor)) class B
felony and be punished by a fine of not more than ((one)) two hundred
fifty thousand dollars or by imprisonment for not more than ((six
months)) ten years or by both; except, that if the conviction is for a
violation committed after a first conviction of such person,
((punishment shall be)) such person upon conviction shall be guilty of
a class A felony punishable by a fine of not more than two hundred
fifty thousand dollars or by imprisonment for not more than ((three
hundred sixty-four days)) twenty years, or by both.
(4) Any employer who willfully and knowingly violates the
requirements of RCW 49.17.060, any safety or health standard
promulgated under this chapter, any existing rule or regulation
governing the safety or health conditions of employment and adopted by
the director, or any order issued granting a variance under RCW
49.17.080 or 49.17.090 and that violation caused serious bodily injury
to any employee but did not cause death to any employee shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a class C felony and be punished by a fine of
not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars or by imprisonment for
not more than five years or by both; except, that if the conviction is
for a violation committed after a first conviction of such person, such
person upon conviction shall be guilty of a class B felony punishable
by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars or by
imprisonment for not more than ten years, or by both.
(5) Any employer who has been issued an order immediately
restraining a condition, practice, method, process, or means in the
work place, pursuant to RCW 49.17.130 or 49.17.170, and who
nevertheless continues such condition, practice, method, process, or
means, or who continues to use a machine or equipment or part thereof
to which a notice prohibiting such use has been attached, shall be
guilty of a ((gross misdemeanor)) class C felony, and upon conviction
shall be punished by a fine of not more than ((ten)) two hundred fifty
thousand dollars or by imprisonment for not more than ((six months))
five years, or by both.
(((5))) (6) Any employer who shall knowingly remove, displace,
damage, or destroy, or cause to be removed, displaced, damaged, or
destroyed any safety device or safeguard required to be present and
maintained by any safety or health standard, rule, or order promulgated
pursuant to this chapter, or pursuant to the authority vested in the
director under RCW 43.22.050 shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a
((misdemeanor)) class C felony and be punished by a fine of not more
than ((one)) two hundred fifty thousand dollars or by imprisonment for
not more than ((ninety days)) two years, or by both.
(((6))) (7) Whenever the director has reasonable cause to believe
that any provision of this section defining a crime has been violated
by an employer, the director shall cause a record of such alleged
violation to be prepared, a copy of which shall be referred to the
prosecuting attorney of the county wherein such alleged violation
occurred, and the prosecuting attorney of such county shall in writing
advise the director of the disposition he or she shall make of the
alleged violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 3 and 4 of this act apply to
violations committed after the effective date of this section.

--- END ---