BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that pesticide exposure in agricultural
communities results in lost wages and worker productivity, increased
industrial insurance costs, and acute and chronic health problems for
workers and other community members. Further, the legislature finds
that drift from pesticide spray applications poses significant risks to
workers and community members in the vicinity of the pesticide
application. The legislature therefore declares that workers and other
community members in agricultural communities have a right to be
protected from pesticide exposure and notified of certain pesticide
applications to prevent exposure. The legislature further declares its
policy and purpose to protect workers from hazardous exposure to
pesticides in accordance with the mandates of Article II, section 35 of
the state Constitution.
The legislature further finds that the issue of pesticide drift
exposure requires study to determine if additional restrictions,
education, and notification are needed to prevent exposure.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.70.020 and 1985 c 409 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(2) "Employee" means an employee of an employer who is employed in
the business of his or her employer whether by way of manual labor or
otherwise and every person in this state who is engaged in the
employment of or who is working under an independent contract the
essence of which is personal labor for an employer under this chapter
whether by way of manual labor or otherwise. However, for the purposes
of this chapter, employee shall not mean immediate family members of
the officers of any corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship or
other business entity or officers of any closely held corporation
engaged in agricultural production of crops or livestock.
(3) "Employer" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
business trust, legal representative, or other business entity that
engages in any business, industry, profession, or activity in this
state and employs one or more employees or who contract with one or
more persons, the essence of which is the personal labor of such person
or persons and includes the state, counties, cities, and all municipal
corporations, public corporations, political subdivisions of the state,
and charitable organizations.
(4) "Farm" means any operation engaged in the outdoor production of
plants destined in whole or in part for human or animal ingestion or
direct application to the body, seed crops for such plants, and cover
crops used in the production of such plants.
(5) "Person" includes any natural person, firm, partnership,
association, or corporation.
(6) "Pesticide" means, but is not limited to:
(a) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to prevent,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate any insect, rodent, nematode,
snail, slug, fungus, weed, and any other form of plant or animal life
or virus, except virus on or in a living human being or other animal,
which is normally considered to be a pest or which the director of
agriculture may declare to be a pest;
(b) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to be used as
a plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant;
(c) Any spray adjuvant, such as a wetting agent, spreading agent,
deposit builder, adhesive, emulsifying agent, deflocculating agent,
water modifier, or similar agent with or without toxic properties of
its own intended to be used with any other pesticide as an aid to the
application or effect thereof, and sold in a package or container
separate from that of the pesticide with which it is to be used; or
(d) Any fungicide, rodenticide, herbicide, insecticide, and
nematocide.
(7) "Restricted-entry interval" means the time after the end of a
pesticide application during which entry into the treated area is
restricted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any
person applying any pesticide on a farm by aircraft or air-blast
sprayer must provide written notice to properties adjacent to the
intended pesticide application area.
(a) The applicator must provide the written notice a minimum of
twenty-four hours before the earliest time of application listed on the
notice, but no sooner than forty-eight hours before the earliest time
of application listed on the notice. If the applicator is unable to
apply the pesticide within the time specified on the notice because of
conditions, the applicator must make a reasonable effort to contact
adjacent properties and provide updated information on the time of
intended application. Five days after the latest time specified on the
written notice, the notice expires and the applicator must provide new
written notice.
(b) Notice of the intended pesticide application must be provided
in person if feasible to owners or lessees, and if in-person notice is
not feasible, posted on the primary entrance of buildings. If neither
of these notice methods is feasible, the applicator must make
reasonable efforts to notify adjacent properties by other means.
(c) Notice must be translated into an appropriate language when the
applicator knows or a reasonable person would know that persons
entitled to notice do not speak English as their primary language.
(2) The notice must include:
(a) Date and location of the application;
(b) The time of application, which may be stated as a range of no
greater than twenty-four hours;
(c) Name, telephone number, and address of the person applying the
pesticide;
(d) Name, address, and telephone number of the person who contracts
for the application;
(e) A list of the common names and active ingredients of all
pesticides to be applied;
(f) Telephone number of the Washington poison control center;
(g) A list of the precautions related to drift that appear on the
label of the pesticide to be applied; and
(h) The restricted-entry interval on the pesticide label, and a
statement that if the pesticide lands in an area persons should stay
out of that area for the restricted-entry interval. When two or more
pesticides are applied at the same time, the restricted-entry interval
used in the notice is the longest of the applicable intervals.
(3) Employers who employ persons who work outdoors on a farm or
nursery within one-quarter mile of the intended application area must
provide their employees with copies of the notice provided by the
applicator. When employees entitled to notice under this subsection do
not speak English as their primary language, the employer must also
provide each employee written notice in an appropriate language for the
employee or give a full verbal translation of the notice to each
employee. The employer must give the notice to the employees at least
four hours before the earliest time listed on the notice for pesticide
application and must also give notice to employees of any updated time
of application provided by the applicator. Employers shall ensure that
employees remain at least one-quarter mile from the intended areas of
pesticide application or work in fully enclosed indoor work spaces
during application of pesticides. For purposes of this subsection,
"nursery" means any operation engaged in the outdoor production of
plants to produce cut flowers or ferns or plants that will be used in
their entirety in another location.
(4) A state or local government or its contractor applying
pesticide in compliance with a state-issued permit is exempt from
subsections (1) and (2) of this section if other notice to the public
is required by law or permitting processes.
(5) Compliance with this section does not limit the liability of
any person for pesticide exposure to other persons.
(6) RCW 49.70.180 does not apply to this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 49.70.110 and 1984 c 289 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
No employer may discharge, cause to be discharged, or otherwise
discipline, penalize, or discriminate against any employee because the
employee or the employee's representative has exercised any right
established in this chapter. The discrimination provisions of chapter
49.17 RCW apply to this chapter, except as provided in section 5 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 49.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any employer who discharges, causes to be discharged, or
otherwise disciplines, penalizes, changes the terms or conditions of
employment, intimidates, or discriminates against an employee who has
or whose representative has made or is planning to make any complaint,
participated in an investigation, or has been part of a lawsuit
regarding any provision of section 3 of this act is liable in a civil
action for actual damages or for statutory damages of five thousand
dollars, whichever is greater, including costs of litigation and
reasonable attorneys' fees.
(2) Any person who attempts to intimidate another person because
that person or that person's representative has made or plans to make
a complaint, participate in an investigation, or has been part of a
lawsuit regarding any provision of section 3 of this act is liable in
a civil action for actual damages or for statutory damages of five
thousand dollars, whichever is greater, including costs of litigation
and reasonable attorneys' fees.
(3) Subject to Title 51 RCW, any person exposed to pesticides by a
person willfully applying pesticides in violation of section 3 of this
act may bring a civil action for twice the amount of damages suffered
or statutory damages of five thousand dollars, whichever is greater.
(4) Any employee entitled to the protections of section 3(4) of
this act may bring a civil action against an employer who receives
notice of pesticide application and who acts willfully in violation of
section 3(3) of this act for statutory damages of five hundred dollars.
(5) The remedies in this section are in addition to, and do not
affect, any other remedy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The joint select committee on pesticide
drift exposure is established. The purpose of the committee is to
formulate a state policy to reduce exposure of workers and other
community members to pesticide drift while not adversely affecting the
agricultural and other economic sectors of this state that use
pesticides.
(2)(a) The joint select committee shall consist of the following
members:
(i) The chair and ranking minority member of the senate labor,
commerce and consumer protection committee or their designees; and
(ii) The chair and ranking minority member of the house of
representatives labor and workforce development committee or their
designees;
(b) The joint select committee shall choose its chair or cochairs
from among its legislative membership. The chairs of the senate labor,
commerce and consumer protection committee and the house of
representatives labor and workforce development committee shall convene
the initial meeting of the committee.
(3) The joint select committee shall consult with representatives
of workers, employers, agricultural interests, applicators,
environmental groups, and others, and may form advisory committees to
assist the committee. Members of such an advisory committee are not
entitled to expense reimbursement.
(4)(a) The joint select committee shall use legislative facilities
and staff support shall be provided by senate committee services and
the house of representatives office of program research.
(b) Legislative members of the joint select committee must be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(c) The expenses of the joint select committee must be paid jointly
by the senate and the house of representatives. Expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(5) The joint select committee shall report its findings and
recommendations to the legislature by January 1, 2013.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2013.

--- END ---