BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.215.005 and 1999 c 335 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The registration of surgical technologists is in the interest of
the public health, safety, and welfare.)) The legislature finds that it
is necessary to regulate the practice of surgical technologists in
order to protect the public health, safety, and welfare. It is the
intent of the legislature that only individuals who meet and maintain
minimum standards of competence and conduct be allowed to engage in the
practice of surgical technology.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.215.010 and 1999 c 335 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(3) "Surgical technologist" means ((a person, regardless of title,
who is supervised in the surgical setting under the delegation of
authority of a health care practitioner acting within the scope of his
or her license and under the laws of this state)) an individual who,
under the supervision of a licensed health practitioner, is authorized
to: (a) Maintain surgical instrument integrity from within the
surgical field during surgical procedures; (b) perform surgical support
tasks, including instrument and equipment transfers and counts, and
managing fluids, specimens, and supplies; (c) identify and correct
asepsis; and (d) perform other surgical tasks as directed.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.215.020 and 1999 c 335 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((No person may represent oneself as a surgical technologist by use
of any title or description without being registered by the department
under the provisions of this chapter.)) No individual may hold himself
or herself out to be a surgical technologist, nor may any individual
perform the functions of a surgical technologist, unless the secretary
or the secretary's designee certifies such individual as a surgical
technologist under the provisions of this chapter. Unless exempted by
RCW 18.215.030, applicants for certification as a surgical technologist
must submit evidence of holding a current credential as a certified
surgical technologist from the national board of surgical technology
and surgical assisting or its successor.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.215.030 and 1999 c 335 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice of an individual licensed, certified, or
registered under the laws of this state and performing services within
his or her authorized scope of practice;
(2) The practice by an individual employed by the government of the
United States while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by
the laws of the United States;
(3) The practice by a person who is a regular student in an
educational program approved by the secretary, and whose performance of
services is pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments
from an instructor and under the general supervision of the
instructor.))
(1) In lieu of the credentialing requirements in RCW 18.215.020,
applicants for certification as a surgical technologist may:
(a) Demonstrate successful completion of a surgical technology
training program during the individual's service as a member of any
branch of the armed forces of the United States; or
(b) Provide evidence that the individual was practicing surgical
technology in a health care facility at any time during the six months
immediately preceding the effective date of this section.
(2) An individual who successfully completes a surgical technology
training program within twelve months following the effective date of
this section may engage in the functions of a surgical technologist
during the twelve-month period immediately following completion of the
program. Thereafter, unless exempted by subsection (1) of this
section, such individual may not continue to function in the role of a
surgical technologist without meeting the credentialing requirements of
RCW 18.215.020.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, nothing
in this section prohibits a student from performing the functions of a
surgical technologist if the student is under the direct supervision of
an appropriately licensed health care practitioner and is functioning
within the scope of the student's training.
(4) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit a licensed
practitioner from engaging in the full scope of practice for which he
or she is licensed.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.215.040 and 1999 c 335 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary
has the authority to:
(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as required to implement
this chapter;
(2) Establish all ((registration)) certification and renewal fees
in accordance with RCW 43.70.250;
(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(4) ((Register)) Certify an applicant or deny ((registration))
certification based upon unprofessional conduct or impairment governed
by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;
(5) Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff
as needed to implement this chapter; and
(6) Maintain the official department record of all applicants and
persons with ((registrations)) certification.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.215.060 and 1999 c 335 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary shall ((register)) certify an applicant on forms
provided by the secretary. Each applicant shall pay a fee determined
by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The fee shall accompany the
application.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.215.070 and 1999 c 335 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary shall establish by rule the procedural requirements
and fees for renewal of ((registration)) certification. Failure to
renew shall invalidate the ((registration)) certification and all
privileges granted by the ((registration)) certification.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.215.080 and 1999 c 335 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
unregistered practice, the issuance and denial of ((registration))
certification, and the discipline of persons ((registered)) certified
under this chapter. The secretary shall be the disciplining authority
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The department of health shall recommend
adoption, amendment, and repeal of such rules as may be deemed
necessary to administer and enforce this act so long as the rules are
in accordance with, and not inconsistent with, the provisions of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 RCW 18.215.050 (Required applicant
information) and 1999 c 335 s 6 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---