BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the current
system for calculating annual consumptive quantity under the state
water code does not always function to fairly reward water conservation
both in the past and into the future. There have been significant
conversions in Washington from inefficient overhead irrigation to
microirrigation once microirrigation technology was perfected and
introduced to the area beginning in the mid-1980's. This conversion
has resulted in significant decreases in water use and related benefits
to instream resources. However, the reduced water use numbers function
in a punitive manner under the current annual consumptive quantity
calculation process because the calculation of the amount of water that
is available to transfer is drastically reduced by the reduction in
water use that accompanied the improvement in irrigation efficiency.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to base the annual
consumptive quantity determination in these cases on the five years of
water use that preceded the change to more efficient irrigation. This
change is consistent with the original intent of the annual consumptive
quantity process and will allow those who improved their irrigation
efficiency the opportunity to retain some of their water for
application to beneficial use.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.380 and 2011 c 112 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a
beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land
or place upon which the same is used((: PROVIDED,)). However,
((That)) the right may be transferred, consistent with this section and
section 4 of this act, to another or to others and become appurtenant
to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(b) A change in the place of use, point of diversion, and/or
purpose of use of a water right to enable irrigation of additional
acreage or the addition of new uses may be permitted if such change
results in no increase in the annual consumptive quantity of water used
under the water right. For purposes of this section, "annual
consumptive quantity" means, except as otherwise provided in (e) and
(f) of this subsection or section 4 of this act, the estimated or
actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the water right,
reduced by the estimated annual amount of return flows, averaged over
the two years of greatest use within the most recent five-year period
of continuous beneficial use of the water right.
(c) Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the
point of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made,
any person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a
written application therefor with the department, and the application
shall not be granted until notice of the application is published as
provided in RCW 90.03.280.
(d) If it ((shall)) appears that such transfer or such change may
be made without injury or detriment to existing rights, the department
shall issue to the applicant a certificate in duplicate granting the
right for such transfer or for such change of point of diversion or of
use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and be made a record
with the department and the duplicate certificate issued to the
applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner and with
the same effect as provided in the original certificate or permit to
divert water.
(e) The time period that the water right was banked under RCW
90.92.070, in an approved local water plan created under RCW 90.92.090,
or the water right was subject to an agreement to not divert under RCW
90.92.050 will not be included in the most recent five-year period of
continuous beneficial use for the purpose of determining the annual
consumptive quantity under this section.
(f) If the water right has not been used during the previous five
years but the nonuse of which qualifies for one or more of the
statutory good causes or exceptions to relinquishment in RCW 90.14.140
and 90.44.520, the period of nonuse is not included in the most recent
five-year period of continuous beneficial use for purposes of
determining the annual consumptive quantity of water under this
section.
(2) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights
from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before
publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation
districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the
ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial
integrity of either of the districts.
(3) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users
of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval
for the change from the board of directors of the district if the use
of water continues within the irrigation district, and when water is
provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint
control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received
from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(4) This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by
the state through the funding of water conservation projects under
chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.
(5)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled
to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application
relating to an existing surface or ground water right is considered.
(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of
processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.
(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process
applications, including but not limited to the authority to process
applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may
be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the
previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the
previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing
of the next application will begin. The previously filed application
does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by
the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall
be processed at that time. This subsection (5)(c) does not affect any
other existing authority to process applications.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (5) is intended to stop the
processing of applications for new water rights.
(6) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid
water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program,
or to other persons as a condition of processing the application.
(7) In revising the provisions of this section and adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.
(8) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring a change or
transfer of any existing water right to enable the holder of the right
to store water governed by the right.
(9) This section does not apply to a water right involved in an
approved local water plan created under RCW 90.92.090, a water right
that is subject to an agreement not to divert under RCW 90.92.050, or
a banked water right under RCW 90.92.070.
(10)(a) The department may only approve an application submitted
after July 22, 2011, for an interbasin water rights transfer after
providing notice electronically to the board of county commissioners in
the county of origin upon receipt of an application.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Interbasin water rights transfer" means a transfer of a water
right for which the proposed point of diversion is in a different basin
than the proposed place of beneficial use.
(ii) "County of origin" means the county from which a water right
is transferred or proposed to be transferred.
(c) This subsection applies to counties located east of the crest
of the Cascade mountains.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.03.380 and 2011 c 112 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a
beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land
or place upon which the same is used((: PROVIDED,)). However,
((That)) the right may be transferred, consistent with this section and
section 4 of this act, to another or to others and become appurtenant
to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(b) A change in the place of use, point of diversion, and/or
purpose of use of a water right to enable irrigation of additional
acreage or the addition of new uses may be permitted if such change
results in no increase in the annual consumptive quantity of water used
under the water right. For purposes of this section, "annual
consumptive quantity" means, except as otherwise provided in section 4
of this act, the estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted
pursuant to the water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of
return flows, averaged over the two years of greatest use within the
most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water
right.
(c) Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the
point of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made,
any person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a
written application therefor with the department, and the application
shall not be granted until notice of the application is published as
provided in RCW 90.03.280.
(d) If it ((shall)) appears that such transfer or such change may
be made without injury or detriment to existing rights, the department
shall issue to the applicant a certificate in duplicate granting the
right for such transfer or for such change of point of diversion or of
use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and be made a record
with the department and the duplicate certificate issued to the
applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner and with
the same effect as provided in the original certificate or permit to
divert water.
(2) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights
from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before
publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation
districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the
ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial
integrity of either of the districts.
(3) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users
of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval
for the change from the board of directors of the district if the use
of water continues within the irrigation district, and when water is
provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint
control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received
from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(4) This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by
the state through the funding of water conservation projects under
chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.
(5)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled
to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application
relating to an existing surface or ground water right is considered.
(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of
processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.
(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process
applications, including but not limited to the authority to process
applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may
be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the
previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the
previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing
of the next application will begin. The previously filed application
does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by
the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall
be processed at that time. This subsection (5)(c) does not affect any
other existing authority to process applications.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (5) is intended to stop the
processing of applications for new water rights.
(6) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid
water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program,
or to other persons as a condition of processing the application.
(7) In revising the provisions of this section and adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.
(8) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring a change or
transfer of any existing water right to enable the holder of the right
to store water governed by the right.
(9)(a) The department may only approve an application submitted
after June 30, 2019, for an interbasin water rights transfer after
providing notice electronically to the board of county commissioners in
the county of origin upon receipt of an application.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Interbasin water rights transfer" means a transfer of a water
right for which the proposed point of diversion is in a different basin
than the proposed place of beneficial use.
(ii) "County of origin" means the county from which a water right
is transferred or proposed to be transferred.
(c) This subsection applies to counties located east of the crest
of the Cascade mountains.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Applications for a change in the place of water use, point of
water diversion, and/or purpose of water right use under RCW 90.03.380
that occurred without the required prior approval from the department,
that were intended to enable the irrigation of additional acreage or
the addition of new uses, and that improved water use efficiency and
reduced direct impacts on instream resources must be submitted to the
department consistent with this section.
(2) All applications affected by this section must:
(a) Indicate the date or dates on which the actual changes in water
use occurred; and
(b) Identify the nature and extent of the changes, including any
improvements in water use efficiency or reductions in direct impact on
instream resources.
(3)(a) It is the responsibility of the applicant to provide
evidence of:
(i) Water use both before and after the de facto changes; and
(ii) The prechange and final points of diversion or withdrawal and
place of use.
(b) Evidence that may be submitted for a change may include crop
receipts, seed receipts, harvest-related receipts, aerial and other
photographs showing land in agricultural production or showing
irrigation facilities, irrigation equipment receipts, metering records,
or any other form of data acceptable to the department.
(4) In determining the amount of water diverted and withdrawn and
accurately assessing the quantity of water actually applied to
beneficial use, the applicant may submit, and the department must
consider, information related to the amount of land physically
contacted by irrigation water and the type of irrigation, row spacing,
and other variables.
(5) For the purposes of this section and an application submitted
under this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the estimated
or actual consumptive quantity for a water right, reduced by the
estimated annual amount of return flows in the years of greatest use
within the most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use of
the water right, immediately preceding the actual changes to water use
that occurred and which are documented in the water right change
application as required in this section.
(6) Except as otherwise provided by this section, the provisions of
RCW 90.03.380 apply to applications and transfers under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act expires June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 3 of this act takes effect June 30,
2019.

--- END ---