BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 61.24.031 and 2011 c 58 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent may not issue a
notice of default under RCW 61.24.030(8) until: (i) Thirty days after
((initial contact with the borrower was initiated as required under (b)
of this subsection or thirty days after)) satisfying the due diligence
requirements as described in subsection (5) of this section and the
borrower has not responded; or (ii) if the borrower responds to the
initial contact, ninety days after the initial contact with the
borrower was initiated.
(b) A beneficiary or authorized agent shall make initial contact
with the borrower by letter to provide the borrower with information
required under (c) of this subsection and by telephone as required
under subsection (5) of this section. The letter required under this
subsection must be mailed in accordance with subsection (5)(a) of this
section and must include the information described in (c) of this
subsection and subsection (5)(e)(i) through (iv) of this section.
(c) The letter required under this subsection, developed by the
department pursuant to RCW 61.24.033, at a minimum shall include:
(i) A paragraph printed in no less than twelve-point font and
bolded that reads:
"You must respond within thirty days of the date of this letter.
IF YOU DO NOT RESPOND within thirty days, a notice of default may be
issued and you may lose your home in foreclosure.
IF YOU DO RESPOND within thirty days of the date of this letter,
you will have an additional sixty days to meet with your lender before
a notice of default may be issued.
You should contact a housing counselor or attorney as soon as
possible. Failure to contact a housing counselor or attorney may
result in your losing certain opportunities, such as meeting with your
lender or participating in mediation in front of a neutral third party.
A housing counselor or attorney can help you work with your lender to
avoid foreclosure.
If you filed bankruptcy or have been discharged in bankruptcy, this
communication is not intended as an attempt to collect a debt from you
personally, but is notice of enforcement of the deed of trust lien
against the property. If you wish to avoid foreclosure and keep your
property, this notice sets forth your rights and options.";
(ii) The toll-free telephone number from the United States
department of housing and urban development to find a department-approved housing counseling agency, the toll-free numbers for the
statewide foreclosure hotline recommended by the housing finance
commission, and the statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance
and referrals to other housing counselors and attorneys;
(iii) A paragraph stating that a housing counselor may be available
at little or no cost to the borrower and that whether or not the
borrower contacts a housing counselor or attorney, the borrower has the
right to request a meeting with the beneficiary; and
(iv) A paragraph explaining how the borrower may respond to the
letter and stating that after responding the borrower will have an
opportunity to meet with his or her beneficiary in an attempt to
resolve and try to work out an alternative to the foreclosure and that,
after ninety days from the date of the letter, a notice of default may
be issued, which starts the foreclosure process.
(d) If the beneficiary has exercised due diligence as required
under subsection (5) of this section and the borrower does not respond
by contacting the beneficiary within thirty days of the initial
contact, the notice of default may be issued. "Initial contact" with
the borrower is considered made three days after the date the letter
required in (b) of this subsection is sent.
(e) If a meeting is requested by the borrower or the borrower's
housing counselor or attorney, the beneficiary or authorized agent
shall schedule the meeting to occur before the notice of default is
issued. An assessment of the borrower's financial ability to modify or
restructure the loan obligation and a discussion of options must occur
during the meeting scheduled for that purpose.
(f) The meeting scheduled to assess the borrower's financial
ability to modify or restructure the loan obligation and discuss
options to avoid foreclosure ((must be in person, unless the
requirement to meet in person is waived in writing by the borrower or
the borrower's representative. A person who is authorized to modify
the loan obligation or reach an alternative resolution to foreclosure
on behalf of the beneficiary may participate by telephone or video
conference, so long as a representative of the beneficiary is at the
meeting in person)) may be held telephonically, unless the borrower or
borrower's representative requests in writing that a meeting be held in
person. The written request for an in-person meeting must be made
within thirty days of the initial contact with the borrower. If the
meeting is requested to be held in person, the meeting must be held in
the county where the borrower resides. A person who is authorized to
agree to a resolution, including modifying or restructuring the loan
obligation or other alternative resolution to foreclosure on behalf of
the beneficiary, must be present either in person or on the telephone
or video conference during the meeting.
(2) A notice of default issued under RCW 61.24.030(8) must include
a declaration, as provided in subsection (9) of this section, from the
beneficiary or authorized agent that it has contacted the borrower as
provided in subsection (1) of this section, it has tried with due
diligence to contact the borrower under subsection (5) of this section,
or the borrower has surrendered the property to the trustee,
beneficiary, or authorized agent. Unless the trustee has violated his
or her duty under RCW 61.24.010(4), the trustee is entitled to rely on
the declaration as evidence that the requirements of this section have
been satisfied, and the trustee is not liable for the beneficiary's or
its authorized agent's failure to comply with the requirements of this
section.
(3) If, after the initial contact under subsection (1) of this
section, a borrower has designated a housing counseling agency, housing
counselor, or attorney to discuss with the beneficiary or authorized
agent, on the borrower's behalf, options for the borrower to avoid
foreclosure, the borrower shall inform the beneficiary or authorized
agent and provide the contact information to the beneficiary or
authorized agent. The beneficiary or authorized agent shall contact
the designated representative for the borrower to meet.
(4) The beneficiary or authorized agent and the borrower or the
borrower's representative shall attempt to reach a resolution for the
borrower within the ninety days from the time the initial contact is
sent and the notice of default is issued. A resolution may include,
but is not limited to, a loan modification, an agreement to conduct a
short sale, or a deed in lieu of foreclosure transaction, or some other
workout plan. Any modification or workout plan offered at the meeting
with the borrower's designated representative by the beneficiary or
authorized agent is subject to approval by the borrower.
(5) A notice of default may be issued under RCW 61.24.030(8) if a
beneficiary or authorized agent has initiated contact with the borrower
as required under subsection (1)(b) of this section and the failure to
meet with the borrower occurred despite the due diligence of the
beneficiary or authorized agent. Due diligence requires the following:
(a) A beneficiary or authorized agent shall first attempt to
contact a borrower by sending a first-class letter to the address in
the beneficiary's records for sending account statements to the
borrower and to the address of the property encumbered by the deed of
trust. The letter must be the letter described in subsection (1)(c) of
this section.
(b)(i) After the letter has been sent, the beneficiary or
authorized agent shall attempt to contact the borrower by telephone at
least three times at different hours and on different days. Telephone
calls must be made to the primary and secondary telephone numbers on
file with the beneficiary or authorized agent.
(ii) A beneficiary or authorized agent may attempt to contact a
borrower using an automated system to dial borrowers if the telephone
call, when answered, is connected to a live representative of the
beneficiary or authorized agent.
(iii) A beneficiary or authorized agent satisfies the telephone
contact requirements of this subsection (5)(b) if the beneficiary or
authorized agent determines, after attempting contact under this
subsection (5)(b), that the borrower's primary telephone number and
secondary telephone number or numbers on file, if any, have been
disconnected or are not good contact numbers for the borrower.
(iv) The telephonic contact under this subsection (5)(b) does not
constitute the meeting under subsection (1)(f) of this section.
(c) If the borrower does not respond within fourteen days after the
telephone call requirements of (b) of this subsection have been
satisfied, the beneficiary or authorized agent shall send a certified
letter, with return receipt requested, to the borrower at the address
in the beneficiary's records for sending account statements to the
borrower and to the address of the property encumbered by the deed of
trust. The letter must include the information described in (e)(i)
through (iv) of this subsection. The letter must also include a
paragraph stating: "Your failure to contact a housing counselor or
attorney may result in your losing certain opportunities, such as
meeting with your lender or participating in mediation in front of a
neutral third party."
(d) The beneficiary or authorized agent shall provide a means for
the borrower to contact the beneficiary or authorized agent in a timely
manner, including a toll-free telephone number or charge-free
equivalent that will provide access to a live representative during
business hours for the purpose of initiating and scheduling the meeting
under subsection (1)(f) of this section.
(e) The beneficiary or authorized agent shall post a link on the
home page of the beneficiary's or authorized agent's internet web site,
if any, to the following information:
(i) Options that may be available to borrowers who are unable to
afford their mortgage payments and who wish to avoid foreclosure, and
instructions to borrowers advising them on steps to take to explore
those options;
(ii) A list of financial documents borrowers should collect and be
prepared to present to the beneficiary or authorized agent when
discussing options for avoiding foreclosure;
(iii) A toll-free telephone number or charge-free equivalent for
borrowers who wish to discuss options for avoiding foreclosure with
their beneficiary or authorized agent; and
(iv) The toll-free telephone number or charge-free equivalent made
available by the department to find a department-approved housing
counseling agency.
(6) Subsections (1) and (5) of this section do not apply if ((any
of the following occurs:
(a))) the borrower has surrendered the property as evidenced by
either a letter confirming the surrender or delivery of the keys to the
property to the trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent((; or
(b) The borrower has filed for bankruptcy, and the bankruptcy stay
remains in place, or the borrower has filed for bankruptcy and the
bankruptcy court has granted relief from the bankruptcy stay allowing
enforcement of the deed of trust)).
(7)(a) This section applies only to deeds of trust that are
recorded against owner-occupied residential real property. This
section does not apply to deeds of trust: (i) Securing a commercial
loan; (ii) securing obligations of a grantor who is not the borrower or
a guarantor; or (iii) securing a purchaser's obligations under a
seller-financed sale.
(b) This section does not apply to association beneficiaries
subject to chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.38 RCW.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) "Department" means the United States department of housing and
urban development.
(b) "Seller-financed sale" means a residential real property
transaction where the seller finances all or part of the purchase
price, and that financed amount is secured by a deed of trust against
the subject residential real property.
(9) The form of declaration to be provided by the beneficiary or
authorized agent as required under subsection (2) of this section must
be in substantially the following form:

"FORECLOSURE LOSS MITIGATION FORM

Please select applicable option(s) below.

The undersigned beneficiary or authorized agent for the beneficiary
hereby represents and declares under the penalty of perjury that [check
the applicable box and fill in any blanks so that the trustee can
insert, on the beneficiary's behalf, the applicable declaration in the
notice of default required under chapter 61.24 RCW]:
(1) [ ] The beneficiary or beneficiary's authorized agent has
contacted the borrower under, and has complied with, RCW 61.24.031
(contact provision to "assess the borrower's financial ability to pay
the debt secured by the deed of trust and explore options for the
borrower to avoid foreclosure") and the borrower did not request a
meeting.
(2) [ ] The beneficiary or beneficiary's authorized agent has
contacted the borrower as required under RCW 61.24.031 and the borrower
or the borrower's designated representative requested a meeting. A
meeting was held in compliance with RCW 61.24.031.
(3) [ ] The beneficiary or beneficiary's authorized agent has
exercised due diligence to contact the borrower as required in RCW
61.24.031(5).
(4) [ ] The borrower has surrendered the secured property as
evidenced by either a letter confirming the surrender or by delivery of
the keys to the secured property to the beneficiary, the beneficiary's
authorized agent or to the trustee.
(((5) [ ] Under RCW 61.24.031, the beneficiary or the beneficiary's
authorized agent has verified information that, on or before the date
of this declaration, the borrower(s) has filed for bankruptcy, and the
bankruptcy stay remains in place, or the borrower has filed for
bankruptcy and the bankruptcy court has granted relief from the
bankruptcy stay allowing the enforcement of the deed of trust.))"

Sec. 2 RCW 61.24.160 and 2011 c 58 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A housing counselor who is contacted by a borrower under RCW
61.24.031 has a duty to act in good faith to attempt to reach a
resolution with the beneficiary on behalf of the borrower within the
ninety days provided from the date the beneficiary initiates contact
with the borrower and the date the notice of default is issued. A
resolution may include, but is not limited to, modification of the
loan, an agreement to conduct a short sale, a deed in lieu of
foreclosure transaction, or some other workout plan.
(b) Nothing in RCW 61.24.031 or this section precludes a meeting or
negotiations between the housing counselor, borrower, and beneficiary
at any time, including after the issuance of the notice of default.
(c) A borrower who is contacted under RCW 61.24.031 may seek the
assistance of a housing counselor or attorney at any time.
(2) Housing counselors have a duty to act in good faith to assist
borrowers by:
(a) Preparing the borrower for meetings with the beneficiary;
(b) Advising the borrower about what documents the borrower must
have to seek a loan modification or other resolution;
(c) Informing the borrower about the alternatives to foreclosure,
including loan modifications or other possible resolutions; and
(d) Providing other guidance, advice, and education as the housing
counselor considers necessary.
(3) A housing counselor or attorney assisting a borrower may refer
the borrower to ((a)) mediation ((program)), pursuant to RCW 61.24.163,
if((:
(a))) the housing counselor or attorney determines that mediation
is appropriate based on the individual circumstances((; and
(b) A notice of sale on the deed of trust has not been recorded.
(4))) and the borrower has received a notice of default. The
referral to mediation may be made any time after a notice of default
has been issued but no later than twenty days after the date a notice
of sale has been recorded.
(4) For borrowers who have received a letter under RCW 61.24.031
before the effective date of this section, a referral to mediation by
a housing counselor or attorney does not preclude a trustee issuing a
notice of default if the requirements of RCW 61.24.031 have been met.
(5) Housing counselors providing assistance to borrowers under RCW
61.24.031 are not liable for civil damages resulting from any acts or
omissions in providing assistance, unless the acts or omissions
constitute gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
(6) Housing counselors shall provide information to the department
to assist the department in its annual report to the legislature as
required under RCW 61.24.163(((15))) (18). The information provided to
the department by the housing counselors should include outcomes of
foreclosures and be similar to the information requested in the
national foreclosure mortgage counseling client level foreclosure
outcomes report form.

Sec. 3 RCW 61.24.163 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The foreclosure mediation program established in this section
applies only to borrowers who have been referred to mediation by a
housing counselor or attorney. The referral to mediation may be made
any time after a notice of default has been issued but no later than
twenty days after the date a notice of sale has been recorded. The
mediation program under this section is not governed by chapter 7.07
RCW and does not preclude mediation required by a court or other
provision of law.
(2) A housing counselor or attorney referring a borrower to
mediation shall send a notice to the borrower and the department,
stating that mediation is appropriate.
(3) Within ten days of receiving the notice, the department shall:
(a) Send a notice to the beneficiary, the borrower, the housing
counselor or attorney who referred the borrower, and the trustee
stating that the parties have been referred to mediation. The notice
must include the statements and list of documents and information
described in subsections (4) and (5)(((b)(i) through (iv))) of this
section and a statement explaining each party's responsibility to pay
the mediator's fee; and
(b) Select a mediator and notify the parties of the selection.
(4) Within ((forty-five)) twenty-three days of the department's
notice that the parties have been referred to mediation, the borrower
shall transmit the documents required for mediation to the mediator and
the beneficiary. The required documents include an initial Making Home
Affordable Application (HAMP) package or such other equivalent
homeowner financial information worksheet as required by the
department. In the event the department is required to create a
worksheet, the worksheet must include, at a minimum, the following
information:
(a) The borrower's current and future income;
(b) Debts and obligations;
(c) Assets;
(d) Expenses;
(e) Tax returns for the previous two years;
(f) Hardship information;
(g) Other applicable information commonly required by any
applicable federal mortgage relief program.
(5) Within twenty days of the beneficiary's receipt of the
borrower's documents, the beneficiary shall transmit the documents
required for mediation to the mediator and the borrower. The required
documents include:
(a) An accurate statement containing the balance of the loan within
thirty days of the date on which the beneficiary's documents are due to
the parties;
(b) Copies of the note and deed of trust;
(c) Proof that the entity claiming to be the beneficiary is the
owner of any promissory note or obligation secured by the deed of
trust. Sufficient proof may be a copy of the declaration described in
RCW 61.24.030(7)(a);
(d) The best estimate of any arrearage and an itemized statement of
the arrearages;
(e) An itemized list of the best estimate of fees and charges
outstanding;
(f) The payment history and schedule for the preceding twelve
months, or since default, whichever is longer, including a breakdown of
all fees and charges claimed;
(g) All borrower-related and mortgage-related input data used in
any net present values analysis. If no net present values analysis is
required by the applicable federal mortgage relief program, then the
input data required under the federal deposit insurance corporation and
published in the federal deposit insurance corporation loan
modification program guide, or if that calculation becomes unavailable,
substantially similar input data as determined by the department;
(h) An explanation regarding any denial for a loan modification,
forbearance, or other alternative to foreclosure in sufficient detail
for a reasonable person to understand why the decision was made;
(i) Appraisal or other broker price opinion most recently relied
upon by the beneficiary not more than ninety days old at the time of
the scheduled mediation; and
(j) The portion or excerpt of the pooling and servicing agreement
that prohibits the beneficiary from implementing a modification, if the
beneficiary claims it cannot implement a modification due solely to
limitations in a pooling and servicing agreement, and documentation or
a statement detailing the efforts of the beneficiary to obtain a waiver
of the pooling and servicing agreement provisions.
(6) Within seventy days of receiving the referral from the
department, the mediator shall convene a mediation session in the
county where the borrower resides, unless the parties agree on another
location. The parties may agree ((in writing)) to extend the time in
which to schedule the mediation session. If the parties agree to
extend the time, the beneficiary shall notify the trustee of the
extension and the date the mediator is expected to issue the mediator's
certification.
(((5))) (7)(a) The mediator may schedule phone conferences,
consultations with the parties individually, and other communications
to ensure that the parties have all the necessary information and
documents to engage in a productive mediation.
(b) The mediator must send written notice of the time, date, and
location of the mediation session to the borrower, the beneficiary, and
the department at least ((fifteen)) thirty days prior to the mediation
session. At a minimum, the notice must contain:
(i) A statement that the borrower may be represented in the
mediation session by an attorney or other advocate;
(ii) A statement that a person with authority to agree to a
resolution, including a proposed settlement, loan modification, or
dismissal or continuation of the foreclosure proceeding, must be
present either in person or on the telephone or video conference during
the mediation session; and
(iii) ((A complete list of documents and information required by
this section that the parties must provide to the mediator and the
deadlines for providing the documents and information; and
(iv))) A statement that the parties have a duty to mediate in good
faith and that failure to mediate in good faith may impair the
beneficiary's ability to foreclose on the property or the borrower's
ability to modify the loan or take advantage of other alternatives to
foreclosure.
(((6))) (8)(a) The borrower, the beneficiary or authorized agent,
and the mediator must meet in person for the mediation session.
However, a person with authority to agree to a resolution on behalf of
the beneficiary may be present over the telephone or video conference
during the mediation session.
(((7))) (b) After the mediation session commences, the mediator may
continue the mediation session once, and any further continuances must
be with the consent of the parties.
(9) The participants in mediation must address the issues of
foreclosure that may enable the borrower and the beneficiary to reach
a resolution, including but not limited to reinstatement, modification
of the loan, restructuring of the debt, or some other workout plan. To
assist the parties in addressing issues of foreclosure, the mediator
((must)) may require the participants to consider the following:
(a) The borrower's current and future economic circumstances,
including the borrower's current and future income, debts, and
obligations for the previous sixty days or greater time period as
determined by the mediator;
(b) The net present value of receiving payments pursuant to a
modified mortgage loan as compared to the anticipated net recovery
following foreclosure;
(c) Any affordable loan modification calculation and net present
value calculation when required under any federal mortgage relief
program, including the home affordable modification program (HAMP) as
applicable to government-sponsored enterprise and nongovernment-sponsored enterprise loans and any HAMP-related modification program
applicable to loans insured by the federal housing administration, the
veterans administration, and the rural housing service. If such a
calculation is not provided or required, then the beneficiary must
((use the current calculations, assumptions, and forms that are))
provide the net present value data inputs established by the federal
deposit insurance corporation and published in the federal deposit
insurance corporation loan modification program guide or other net
present value data inputs as designated by the department. The
mediator may run the calculation in order for a productive mediation to
occur and to comply with the mediator certification requirement; and
(d) Any other loss mitigation guidelines to loans insured by the
federal housing administration, the veterans administration, and the
rural housing service, if applicable.
(((8))) (10) A violation of the duty to mediate in good faith as
required under this section may include:
(a) Failure to timely participate in mediation without good cause;
(b) Failure of the borrower or the beneficiary to provide the
((following documentation to the borrower and mediator at least ten
days before the mediation or pursuant to the mediator's instructions:
(i) An accurate statement containing the balance of the loan as of
the first day of the month in which the mediation occurs;
(ii) Copies of the note and deed of trust;
(iii) Proof that the entity claiming to be the beneficiary is the
owner of any promissory note or obligation secured by the deed of
trust. Sufficient proof may be a copy of the declaration described in
RCW 61.24.030(7)(a);
(iv) The best estimate of any arrearage and an itemized statement
of the arrearages;
(v) An itemized list of the best estimate of fees and charges
outstanding;
(vi) The payment history and schedule for the preceding twelve
months, or since default, whichever is longer, including a breakdown of
all fees and charges claimed;
(vii) All borrower-related and mortgage-related input data used in
any net present value analysis;
(viii) An explanation regarding any denial for a loan modification,
forbearance, or other alternative to foreclosure in sufficient detail
for a reasonable person to understand why the decision was made;
(ix) The most recently available appraisal or other broker price
opinion most recently relied upon by the beneficiary; and
(x) The portion or excerpt of the pooling and servicing agreement
that prohibits the beneficiary from implementing a modification, if the
beneficiary claims it cannot implement a modification due solely to
limitations in a pooling and servicing agreement, and documentation or
a statement detailing the efforts of the beneficiary to obtain a waiver
of the pooling and servicing agreement provisions;
(c) Failure of the borrower to provide documentation to the
beneficiary and mediator, at least ten days before the mediation or
pursuant to the mediator's instruction, showing the borrower's current
and future income, debts and obligations, and tax returns for the past
two years;
(d) Failure of either party to pay the respective portion of the
mediation fee in advance of the mediation as required under this
section;
(e))) documentation required before mediation or pursuant to the
mediator's instructions;
(c) Failure of a party to designate representatives with adequate
authority to fully settle, compromise, or otherwise reach resolution
with the borrower in mediation; and
(((f))) (d) A request by a beneficiary that the borrower waive
future claims he or she may have in connection with the deed of trust,
as a condition of agreeing to a modification, except for rescission
claims under the federal truth in lending act. Nothing in this section
precludes a beneficiary from requesting that a borrower dismiss with
prejudice any pending claims against the beneficiary, its agents, loan
servicer, or trustee, arising from the underlying deed of trust, as a
condition of modification.
(((9))) (11) If the mediator reasonably believes a borrower will
not attend a mediation session based on the borrower's conduct, such as
the lack of response to the mediator's communications, the mediator may
cancel a scheduled mediation session and send a written cancellation to
the department and the trustee and send copies to the parties. The
beneficiary may proceed with the foreclosure after receipt of the
mediator's written confirmation of cancellation.
(12) Within seven business days after the conclusion of the
mediation session, the mediator must send a written certification to
the department and the trustee and send copies to the parties of:
(a) The date, time, and location of the mediation session;
(b) The names of all persons attending in person and by telephone
or video conference, at the mediation session;
(c) Whether a resolution was reached by the parties, including
whether the default was cured by reinstatement, modification, or
restructuring of the debt, or some other alternative to foreclosure was
agreed upon by the parties;
(d) Whether the parties participated in the mediation in good
faith; and
(e) If a written agreement was not reached, a description of
((the)) any net present value test used, along with a copy of the
inputs, including the result of ((the)) any net present value test
expressed in a dollar amount.
(((10))) (13) If the parties are unable to reach ((any agreement
and the mediator certifies that the parties acted in good faith, the
beneficiary may proceed with the foreclosure.
(11))) an agreement, the beneficiary may proceed with the
foreclosure after receipt of the mediator's written certification.
(14)(a) The mediator's certification that the beneficiary failed to
act in good faith in mediation constitutes a defense to the nonjudicial
foreclosure action that was the basis for initiating the mediation. In
any action to enjoin the foreclosure, the beneficiary ((shall be)) is
entitled to rebut the allegation that it failed to act in good faith.
(b) The mediator's certification that the beneficiary failed to act
in good faith during mediation does not constitute a defense to a
judicial foreclosure or a future nonjudicial foreclosure action if a
modification of the loan is agreed upon and the borrower subsequently
defaults.
(c) If an affordable loan modification is not offered in the
mediation or a written agreement was not reached and the mediator's
certification shows that the net present value of the modified loan
exceeds the anticipated net recovery at foreclosure, that showing in
the certification ((shall)) constitutes a basis for the borrower to
enjoin the foreclosure.
(((12))) (15) The mediator's certification that the borrower failed
to act in good faith in mediation authorizes the beneficiary to proceed
with the foreclosure.
(((13))) (16)(a) If a borrower has been referred to mediation
before a notice of trustee sale has been recorded, a trustee may not
record the notice of sale until the trustee receives the mediator's
certification stating that the mediation has been completed. (((b))) If
the trustee does not receive the mediator's certification, the trustee
may record the notice of sale after ten days from the date the
certification to the trustee was due. If ((the)), after a notice of
sale is recorded under this subsection (((13)(b) and)) (16)(a), the
mediator subsequently issues a certification ((alleging)) finding that
the beneficiary violated the duty of good faith, ((the trustee may not
proceed with the sale.
(14))) the certification constitutes a basis for the borrower to
enjoin the foreclosure.
(b) If a borrower has been referred to mediation after the notice
of sale was recorded, the sale may not occur until the trustee receives
the mediator's certification stating that the mediation has been
completed.
(17) A mediator may charge reasonable fees as authorized by this
subsection and by the department. Unless the fee is waived or the
parties agree otherwise, a foreclosure mediator's fee may not exceed
four hundred dollars for preparing, scheduling, and conducting a
mediation session lasting between one hour and three hours. For a
mediation session exceeding three hours, the foreclosure mediator may
charge a reasonable fee, as authorized by the department. The mediator
must provide an estimated fee before the mediation, and payment of the
mediator's fee must be divided equally between the beneficiary and the
borrower. The beneficiary and the borrower must tender the loan
mediator's fee ((seven)) within thirty calendar days ((before the
commencement of the)) from receipt of the department's letter referring
the parties to mediation or pursuant to the mediator's instructions.
(((15))) (18) Beginning December 1, 2012, and every year
thereafter, the department shall report annually to the legislature on:
(a) The performance of the program, including the numbers of
borrowers who are referred to mediation by a housing counselor or
attorney;
(b) The results of the mediation program, including the number of
mediations requested by housing counselors and attorneys, the number of
certifications of good faith issued, the number of borrowers and
beneficiaries who failed to mediate in good faith, and the reasons for
the failure to mediate in good faith, if known, the numbers of loans
restructured or modified, the change in the borrower's monthly payment
for principal and interest and the number of principal write-downs and
interest rate reductions, and, to the extent practical, the number of
borrowers who report a default within a year of restructuring or
modification;
(c) The information received by housing counselors regarding
outcomes of foreclosures; and
(d) Any recommendations for changes to the statutes regarding the
mediation program.

Sec. 4 RCW 61.24.169 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 61.24.163, the department must maintain
a list of approved foreclosure mediators. The department may approve
the following persons to serve as foreclosure mediators under this
section if the person has completed ten mediations and either a forty-hour mediation course and sixty hours of mediating or has two hundred
hours experience mediating:
(a) Attorneys who are active members of the Washington state bar
association;
(b) Employees of United States department of housing and urban
development-approved housing counseling agencies or approved by the
Washington state housing finance commission;
(c) Employees or volunteers of dispute resolution centers under
chapter 7.75 RCW; ((and))
(d) Retired judges of Washington courts; and
(e) Other experienced mediators.
(2) The department may establish a required training program for
foreclosure mediators and may require mediators to acquire training
before being approved. The mediators must be familiar with relevant
aspects of the law, have knowledge of community-based resources and
mortgage assistance programs, and refer borrowers to these programs
where appropriate.
(3) The department may remove any mediator from the approved list
of mediators.
(4)(a) A mediator under this section ((who is an employee or
volunteer of a dispute resolution center under chapter 7.75 RCW)) is
immune from suit in any civil action based on any proceedings or other
official acts performed in his or her capacity as a foreclosure
mediator, except in cases of willful or wanton misconduct.
(b) A mediator is not subject to discovery or compulsory process to
testify in any litigation pertaining to a foreclosure action between
the parties. However, the mediator's certification and all information
and material presented as part of the mediation process may be deemed
admissible evidence, subject to court rules, in any litigation
pertaining to a foreclosure action between the parties.

Sec. 5 RCW 61.24.174 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 24 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (((4))) (5) of this section,
beginning October 1, 2011, and every quarter thereafter, every
beneficiary issuing notices of default, or directing that a trustee or
authorized agent issue the notice of default, on owner-occupied
residential real property under this chapter must:
(a) Report to the department the number of owner-occupied
residential real properties for which the beneficiary has issued a
notice of default during the previous quarter; ((and))
(b) Remit the amount required under subsection (2) of this section;
and
(c) Report and update beneficiary contact information for the
person and work group responsible for the beneficiary's compliance with
the requirements of the foreclosure fairness act created in this
chapter.
(2) For each owner-occupied residential real property for which a
notice of default has been issued, the beneficiary issuing the notice
of default, or directing that a trustee or authorized agent issue the
notice of default, shall remit two hundred fifty dollars to the
department to be deposited, as provided under RCW 61.24.172, into the
foreclosure fairness account. The two hundred fifty dollar payment is
required per property and not per notice of default. The beneficiary
shall remit the total amount required in a lump sum each quarter.
(3) Reporting and payments under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section are due within forty-five days of the end of each quarter.
(4) No later than thirty days after April 14, 2011, the
beneficiaries required to report and remit to the department under this
section shall determine the number of owner-occupied residential real
properties for which notices of default were issued during the three
months prior to April 14, 2011. The beneficiary shall remit to the
department a one-time sum of two hundred fifty dollars multiplied by
the number of properties. In addition, by July 31, 2011, the
beneficiaries required to report and remit to the department under this
section shall remit to the department another one-time sum of two
hundred fifty dollars multiplied by the number of owner-occupied
residential real properties for which notices of default were issued
from April 14, 2011, through June 30, 2011. The department shall
deposit the funds into the foreclosure fairness account as provided
under RCW 61.24.172.
(((4))) (5) This section does not apply to any beneficiary or loan
servicer that is a federally insured depository institution, as defined
in 12 U.S.C. Sec. 461(b)(1)(A), and that certifies under penalty of
perjury that it has issued, or has directed a trustee or authorized
agent to issue, fewer than two hundred fifty notices of default in the
preceding year.
(((5))) (6) This section does not apply to association
beneficiaries subject to chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.38 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 61.24.030 and 2011 c 58 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be requisite to a trustee's sale:
(1) That the deed of trust contains a power of sale;
(2) That the deed of trust contains a statement that the real
property conveyed is not used principally for agricultural purposes;
provided, if the statement is false on the date the deed of trust was
granted or amended to include that statement, and false on the date of
the trustee's sale, then the deed of trust must be foreclosed
judicially. Real property is used for agricultural purposes if it is
used in an operation that produces crops, livestock, or aquatic goods;
(3) That a default has occurred in the obligation secured or a
covenant of the grantor, which by the terms of the deed of trust makes
operative the power to sell;
(4) That no action commenced by the beneficiary of the deed of
trust is now pending to seek satisfaction of an obligation secured by
the deed of trust in any court by reason of the grantor's default on
the obligation secured: PROVIDED, That (a) the seeking of the
appointment of a receiver shall not constitute an action for purposes
of this chapter; and (b) if a receiver is appointed, the grantor shall
be entitled to any rents or profits derived from property subject to a
homestead as defined in RCW 6.13.010. If the deed of trust was granted
to secure a commercial loan, this subsection shall not apply to actions
brought to enforce any other lien or security interest granted to
secure the obligation secured by the deed of trust being foreclosed;
(5) That the deed of trust has been recorded in each county in
which the land or some part thereof is situated;
(6) That prior to the date of the notice of trustee's sale and
continuing thereafter through the date of the trustee's sale, the
trustee must maintain a street address in this state where personal
service of process may be made, and the trustee must maintain a
physical presence and have telephone service at such address;
(7)(a) That, for residential real property, before the notice of
trustee's sale is recorded, transmitted, or served, the trustee shall
have proof that the beneficiary is the owner of any promissory note or
other obligation secured by the deed of trust. A declaration by the
beneficiary made under the penalty of perjury stating that the
beneficiary is the actual holder of the promissory note or other
obligation secured by the deed of trust shall be sufficient proof as
required under this subsection.
(b) Unless the trustee has violated his or her duty under RCW
61.24.010(4), the trustee is entitled to rely on the beneficiary's
declaration as evidence of proof required under this subsection.
(c) This subsection (7) does not apply to association beneficiaries
subject to chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.38 RCW;
(8) That at least thirty days before notice of sale shall be
recorded, transmitted or served, written notice of default shall be
transmitted by the beneficiary or trustee to the borrower and grantor
at their last known addresses by both first-class and either registered
or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the beneficiary or
trustee shall cause to be posted in a conspicuous place on the
premises, a copy of the notice, or personally served on the borrower
and grantor. This notice shall contain the following information:
(a) A description of the property which is then subject to the deed
of trust;
(b) A statement identifying each county in which the deed of trust
is recorded and the document number given to the deed of trust upon
recording by each county auditor or recording officer;
(c) A statement that the beneficiary has declared the borrower or
grantor to be in default, and a concise statement of the default
alleged;
(d) An itemized account of the amount or amounts in arrears if the
default alleged is failure to make payments;
(e) An itemized account of all other specific charges, costs, or
fees that the borrower, grantor, or any guarantor is or may be obliged
to pay to reinstate the deed of trust before the recording of the
notice of sale;
(f) A statement showing the total of (d) and (e) of this
subsection, designated clearly and conspicuously as the amount
necessary to reinstate the note and deed of trust before the recording
of the notice of sale;
(g) A statement that failure to cure the alleged default within
thirty days of the date of mailing of the notice, or if personally
served, within thirty days of the date of personal service thereof, may
lead to recordation, transmittal, and publication of a notice of sale,
and that the property described in (a) of this subsection may be sold
at public auction at a date no less than one hundred twenty days in the
future, or no less than one hundred fifty days in the future if the
borrower received a letter under RCW 61.24.031;
(h) A statement that the effect of the recordation, transmittal,
and publication of a notice of sale will be to (i) increase the costs
and fees and (ii) publicize the default and advertise the grantor's
property for sale;
(i) A statement that the effect of the sale of the grantor's
property by the trustee will be to deprive the grantor of all their
interest in the property described in (a) of this subsection;
(j) A statement that the borrower, grantor, and any guarantor has
recourse to the courts pursuant to RCW 61.24.130 to contest the alleged
default on any proper ground;
(k) In the event the property secured by the deed of trust is
owner-occupied residential real property, a statement, prominently set
out at the beginning of the notice, which shall state as follows:
(("You should take care to protect your interest in your home.
This notice of default (your failure to pay) is the first step in a
process that could result in you losing your home. You should
carefully review your options. For example:
Can you pay and stop the foreclosure process?
Do you dispute the failure to pay?
Can you sell your property to preserve your equity?
Are you able to refinance this loan or obligation with a new loan
or obligation from another lender with payments, terms, and fees that
are more affordable?
Do you qualify for any government or private homeowner assistance
programs?
Do you know if filing for bankruptcy is an option? What are the
pros and cons of doing so?
Do not ignore this notice; because if you do nothing, you could
lose your home at a foreclosure sale. (No foreclosure sale can be held
any sooner than ninety days after a notice of sale is issued and a
notice of sale cannot be issued until thirty days after this notice.)
Also, if you do nothing to pay what you owe, be careful of people who
claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses
that watch for the notices of sale in order to unfairly profit as a
result of borrowers' distress.
You may feel you need help understanding what to do. There are a
number of professional resources available, including home loan
counselors and attorneys, who may assist you. Many legal services are
lower-cost or even free, depending on your ability to pay. If you
desire legal help in understanding your options or handling this
default, you may obtain a referral (at no charge) by contacting the
county bar association in the county where your home is located. These
legal referral services also provide information about lower-cost or
free legal services for those who qualify. You may contact the
Department of Financial Institutions or the statewide civil legal aid
hotline for possible assistance or referrals"))

"THIS NOTICE IS ONE STEP IN A PROCESS THAT COULD RESULT IN YOUR
LOSING YOUR HOME.

You may be eligible for mediation in front of a neutral third party to
help save your home.

CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN WASHINGTON NOW
to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if you might
benefit. Mediation MUST be requested between the time you receive the
Notice of Default and no later than twenty days after the Notice of
Trustee Sale is recorded.

DO NOT DELAY. If you do nothing, a notice of sale may be issued as
soon as 30 days from the date of this notice of default. The notice of
sale will provide a minimum of 120 days' notice of the date of the
actual foreclosure sale.

BE CAREFUL of people who claim they can help you. There are many
individuals and businesses that prey upon borrowers in distress.

REFER TO THE CONTACTS BELOW for sources of assistance.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or
no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your
rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the
following:
The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to
housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission
Telephone: . . . . . . . Web site: . . . . . .
The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development
Telephone: . . . . . . . Web site: . . . . . . .
The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to
other housing counselors and attorneys
Telephone: . . . . . . . Web site: . . . . . ."
The beneficiary or trustee shall obtain the toll-free numbers and
web site information from the department for inclusion in the notice;
and
(l) In the event the property secured by the deed of trust is
residential real property, the name and address of the owner of any
promissory notes or other obligations secured by the deed of trust and
the name, address, and telephone number of a party acting as a servicer
of the obligations secured by the deed of trust; and
(9) That, for owner-occupied residential real property, before the
notice of the trustee's sale is recorded, transmitted, or served, the
beneficiary has complied with RCW 61.24.031 and, if applicable, RCW
61.24.163.

Sec. 7 RCW 61.24.040 and 2009 c 292 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
A deed of trust foreclosed under this chapter shall be foreclosed
as follows:
(1) At least ninety days before the sale, or if a letter under RCW
61.24.031 is required, at least one hundred twenty days before the
sale, the trustee shall:
(a) Record a notice in the form described in (f) of this subsection
in the office of the auditor in each county in which the deed of trust
is recorded;
(b) To the extent the trustee elects to foreclose its lien or
interest, or the beneficiary elects to preserve its right to seek a
deficiency judgment against a borrower or grantor under RCW
61.24.100(3)(a), and if their addresses are stated in a recorded
instrument evidencing their interest, lien, or claim of lien, or an
amendment thereto, or are otherwise known to the trustee, cause a copy
of the notice of sale described in (f) of this subsection to be
transmitted by both first-class and either certified or registered
mail, return receipt requested, to the following persons or their legal
representatives, if any, at such address:
(i) The borrower and grantor;
(ii) The beneficiary of any deed of trust or mortgagee of any
mortgage, or any person who has a lien or claim of lien against the
property, that was recorded subsequent to the recordation of the deed
of trust being foreclosed and before the recordation of the notice of
sale;
(iii) The vendee in any real estate contract, the lessee in any
lease, or the holder of any conveyances of any interest or estate in
any portion or all of the property described in such notice, if that
contract, lease, or conveyance of such interest or estate, or a
memorandum or other notice thereof, was recorded after the recordation
of the deed of trust being foreclosed and before the recordation of the
notice of sale;
(iv) The last holder of record of any other lien against or
interest in the property that is subject to a subordination to the deed
of trust being foreclosed that was recorded before the recordation of
the notice of sale;
(v) The last holder of record of the lien of any judgment
subordinate to the deed of trust being foreclosed; and
(vi) The occupants of property consisting solely of a single-family
residence, or a condominium, cooperative, or other dwelling unit in a
multiplex or other building containing fewer than five residential
units, whether or not the occupant's rental agreement is recorded,
which notice may be a single notice addressed to "occupants" for each
unit known to the trustee or beneficiary;
(c) Cause a copy of the notice of sale described in (f) of this
subsection to be transmitted by both first-class and either certified
or registered mail, return receipt requested, to the plaintiff or the
plaintiff's attorney of record, in any court action to foreclose a lien
or other encumbrance on all or any part of the property, provided a
court action is pending and a lis pendens in connection therewith is
recorded in the office of the auditor of any county in which all or
part of the property is located on the date the notice is recorded;
(d) Cause a copy of the notice of sale described in (f) of this
subsection to be transmitted by both first-class and either certified
or registered mail, return receipt requested, to any person who has
recorded a request for notice in accordance with RCW 61.24.045, at the
address specified in such person's most recently recorded request for
notice;
(e) Cause a copy of the notice of sale described in (f) of this
subsection to be posted in a conspicuous place on the property, or in
lieu of posting, cause a copy of said notice to be served upon any
occupant of the property;
(f) The notice shall be in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF TRUSTEE'S SALE

I.

NOTICE IS HEREBY GIVEN that the undersigned Trustee will on the . . . .
day of . . . . . ., . . ., at the hour of . . . . o'clock . . . . M. at
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . [street
address and location if inside a building] in the City of . . . . . .,
State of Washington, sell at public auction to the highest and best
bidder, payable at the time of sale, the following described real
property, situated in the County(ies) of . . . . . ., State of
Washington, to-wit:

[If any personal property is to be included in the trustee's
sale, include a description that reasonably identifies such
personal property]

which is subject to that certain Deed of Trust dated . . . . . .,
. . ., recorded . . . . . ., . . ., under Auditor's File No. . . . .,
records of . . . . . . County, Washington, from . . . . . . . . ., as
Grantor, to . . . . . . . . ., as Trustee, to secure an obligation in
favor of . . . . . . . . ., as Beneficiary, the beneficial interest in
which was assigned by . . . . . . . . ., under an Assignment recorded
under Auditor's File No. . . . . [Include recording information for
all counties if the Deed of Trust is recorded in more than one county.]

II.

No action commenced by the Beneficiary of the Deed of Trust is now
pending to seek satisfaction of the obligation in any Court by reason
of the Borrower's or Grantor's default on the obligation secured by the
Deed of Trust.

[If there is another action pending to foreclose other security
for all or part of the same debt, qualify the statement and
identify the action.]

III.

The default(s) for which this foreclosure is made is/are as follows:

[If default is for other than payment of money, set forth the
particulars]

Failure to pay when due the following amounts which are now in arrears:

IV.

The sum owing on the obligation secured by the Deed of Trust is:
Principal $ . . . . . ., together with interest as provided in the note
or other instrument secured from the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . .,
and such other costs and fees as are due under the note or other
instrument secured, and as are provided by statute.

V.

The above-described real property will be sold to satisfy the expense
of sale and the obligation secured by the Deed of Trust as provided by
statute. The sale will be made without warranty, express or implied,
regarding title, possession, or encumbrances on the . . . . day of
. . . . . ., . . . The default(s) referred to in paragraph III must be
cured by the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . (11 days before the sale
date), to cause a discontinuance of the sale. The sale will be
discontinued and terminated if at any time on or before the . . . . day
of . . . . . ., . . ., (11 days before the sale date), the default(s)
as set forth in paragraph III is/are cured and the Trustee's fees and
costs are paid. The sale may be terminated any time after the . . . .
day of . . . . . ., . . . (11 days before the sale date), and before
the sale by the Borrower, Grantor, any Guarantor, or the holder of any
recorded junior lien or encumbrance paying the entire principal and
interest secured by the Deed of Trust, plus costs, fees, and advances,
if any, made pursuant to the terms of the obligation and/or Deed of
Trust, and curing all other defaults.

VI.

A written notice of default was transmitted by the Beneficiary or
Trustee to the Borrower and Grantor at the following addresses:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

by both first-class and certified mail on the . . . . day of
. . . . . ., . . ., proof of which is in the possession of the Trustee;
and the Borrower and Grantor were personally served on the . . . . day
of . . . . . ., . . ., with said written notice of default or the
written notice of default was posted in a conspicuous place on the real
property described in paragraph I above, and the Trustee has possession
of proof of such service or posting.

VII.

The Trustee whose name and address are set forth below will provide in
writing to anyone requesting it, a statement of all costs and fees due
at any time prior to the sale.

VIII.

The effect of the sale will be to deprive the Grantor and all those who
hold by, through or under the Grantor of all their interest in the
above-described property.

IX.

Anyone having any objection to the sale on any grounds whatsoever will
be afforded an opportunity to be heard as to those objections if they
bring a lawsuit to restrain the sale pursuant to RCW 61.24.130.
Failure to bring such a lawsuit may result in a waiver of any proper
grounds for invalidating the Trustee's sale.

[Add Part X to this notice if applicable under RCW 61.24.040(9)]

[Acknowledgment]

(g) If the borrower received a letter under RCW 61.24.031, the
notice specified in subsection (1)(f) of this section shall also
include the following additional language:

"THIS NOTICE IS THE FINAL STEP BEFORE THE FORECLOSURE SALE OF YOUR
HOME.

You have only 20 DAYS from the recording date on this notice to pursue
mediation.

DO NOT DELAY. CONTACT A HOUSING COUNSELOR OR AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN
WASHINGTON NOW to assess your situation and refer you to mediation if
you are eligible and it may help you save your home. See below for
safe sources of help.

SEEKING ASSISTANCE

Housing counselors and legal assistance may be available at little or
no cost to you. If you would like assistance in determining your
rights and opportunities to keep your house, you may contact the
following:
The statewide foreclosure hotline for assistance and referral to
housing counselors recommended by the Housing Finance Commission
Telephone: . . . . . . . . Web site: . . . . . . . .
The United States Department of Housing and Urban Development
Telephone: . . . . . . . . Web site: . . . . . . . .
The statewide civil legal aid hotline for assistance and referrals to
other housing counselors and attorneys
Telephone: . . . . . . . . Web site: . . . . . . . ."
The beneficiary or trustee shall obtain the toll-free numbers and
web site information from the department for inclusion in the notice.
(2) In addition to providing the borrower and grantor the notice of
sale described in subsection (1)(f) of this section, the trustee shall
include with the copy of the notice which is mailed to the grantor, a
statement to the grantor in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF FORECLOSURE

Pursuant to the Revised Code of Washington,

Chapter 61.24 RCW

The attached Notice of Trustee's Sale is a consequence of
default(s) in the obligation to . . . . . ., the Beneficiary of your
Deed of Trust and owner of the obligation secured thereby. Unless the
default(s) is/are cured, your property will be sold at auction on the
. . . . day of . . . . . ., . . .
To cure the default(s), you must bring the payments current, cure
any other defaults, and pay accrued late charges and other costs,
advances, and attorneys' fees as set forth below by the . . . . day of
. . . . . ., . . . [11 days before the sale date]. To date, these
arrears and costs are as follows:

Estimated amount

Currently due that will be due

to reinstate to reinstate

on. . . . . on. . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

(11 days before

the date set

for sale)

Delinquent payments

from. . . . . . ,

. . . , in the

amount of

$. . . . /mo.: $. . . . $. . . .

Late charges in

the total

amount of: $. . . . $. . . .

Estimated

Amounts

Attorneys' fees: $. . . . $. . . .

Trustee's fee: $. . . . $. . . .

Trustee's expenses:

(Itemization)

Title report $. . . . $. . . .

Recording fees $. . . . $. . . .

Service/Posting
of Notices
$. . . .
$. . . .

Postage/Copying
expense
$. . . .
$. . . .

Publication $. . . . $. . . .

Telephone
charges
$. . . . $. . . .

Inspection fees $. . . . $. . . .

. . . . . . $. . . . $. . . .

. . . . . . $. . . . $. . . .

TOTALS $. . . . $. . . .

To pay off the entire obligation secured by your Deed of Trust as
of the . . . . . day of . . . . . . you must pay a total of $. . . . .
in principal, $. . . . . in interest, plus other costs and advances
estimated to date in the amount of $. . . . . . From and after the
date of this notice you must submit a written request to the Trustee to
obtain the total amount to pay off the entire obligation secured by
your Deed of Trust as of the payoff date.
As to the defaults which do not involve payment of money to the
Beneficiary of your Deed of Trust, you must cure each such default.
Listed below are the defaults which do not involve payment of money to
the Beneficiary of your Deed of Trust. Opposite each such listed
default is a brief description of the action necessary to cure the
default and a description of the documentation necessary to show that
the default has been cured.

You may reinstate your Deed of Trust and the obligation secured
thereby at any time up to and including the . . . . day of . . . . . .,
. . . [11 days before the sale date], by paying the amount set forth or
estimated above and by curing any other defaults described above. Of
course, as time passes other payments may become due, and any further
payments coming due and any additional late charges must be added to
your reinstating payment. Any new defaults not involving payment of
money that occur after the date of this notice must also be cured in
order to effect reinstatement. In addition, because some of the
charges can only be estimated at this time, and because the amount
necessary to reinstate or to pay off the entire indebtedness may
include presently unknown expenditures required to preserve the
property or to comply with state or local law, it will be necessary for
you to contact the Trustee before the time you tender reinstatement or
the payoff amount so that you may be advised of the exact amount you
will be required to pay. Tender of payment or performance must be made
to: . . . . . ., whose address is . . . . . ., telephone ( )
. . . . . . AFTER THE . . . . DAY OF . . . . . ., . . ., YOU MAY NOT
REINSTATE YOUR DEED OF TRUST BY PAYING THE BACK PAYMENTS AND COSTS AND
FEES AND CURING THE OTHER DEFAULTS AS OUTLINED ABOVE. The Trustee will
respond to any written request for current payoff or reinstatement
amounts within ten days of receipt of your written request. In such a
case, you will only be able to stop the sale by paying, before the
sale, the total principal balance ($ . . . . . .) plus accrued
interest, costs and advances, if any, made pursuant to the terms of the
documents and by curing the other defaults as outlined above.
You may contest this default by initiating court action in the
Superior Court of the county in which the sale is to be held. In such
action, you may raise any legitimate defenses you have to this default.
A copy of your Deed of Trust and documents evidencing the obligation
secured thereby are enclosed. You may wish to consult a lawyer. Legal
action on your part may prevent or restrain the sale, but only if you
persuade the court of the merits of your defense. You may contact the
Department of Financial Institutions or the statewide civil legal aid
hotline for possible assistance or referrals.
The court may grant a restraining order or injunction to restrain
a trustee's sale pursuant to RCW 61.24.130 upon five days notice to the
trustee of the time when, place where, and the judge before whom the
application for the restraining order or injunction is to be made.
This notice shall include copies of all pleadings and related documents
to be given to the judge. Notice and other process may be served on
the trustee at:

If you do not reinstate the secured obligation and your Deed of
Trust in the manner set forth above, or if you do not succeed in
restraining the sale by court action, your property will be sold. The
effect of such sale will be to deprive you and all those who hold by,
through or under you of all interest in the property;
(3) In addition, the trustee shall cause a copy of the notice of
sale described in subsection (1)(f) of this section (excluding the
acknowledgment) to be published in a legal newspaper in each county in
which the property or any part thereof is situated, once on or between
the thirty-fifth and twenty-eighth day before the date of sale, and
once on or between the fourteenth and seventh day before the date of
sale;
(4) On the date and at the time designated in the notice of sale,
the trustee or its authorized agent shall sell the property at public
auction to the highest bidder. The trustee may sell the property in
gross or in parcels as the trustee shall deem most advantageous;
(5) The place of sale shall be at any designated public place
within the county where the property is located and if the property is
in more than one county, the sale may be in any of the counties where
the property is located. The sale shall be on Friday, or if Friday is
a legal holiday on the following Monday, and during the hours set by
statute for the conduct of sales of real estate at execution;
(6) The trustee has no obligation to, but may, for any cause the
trustee deems advantageous, continue the sale for a period or periods
not exceeding a total of one hundred twenty days by (a) a public
proclamation at the time and place fixed for sale in the notice of sale
and if the continuance is beyond the date of sale, by giving notice of
the new time and place of the sale by both first class and either
certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, to the persons
specified in subsection (1)(b)(i) and (ii) of this section to be
deposited in the mail (i) not less than four days before the new date
fixed for the sale if the sale is continued for up to seven days; or
(ii) not more than three days after the date of the continuance by oral
proclamation if the sale is continued for more than seven days, or,
alternatively, (b) by giving notice of the time and place of the
postponed sale in the manner and to the persons specified in subsection
(1)(b), (c), (d), and (e) of this section and publishing a copy of such
notice once in the newspaper(s) described in subsection (3) of this
section, more than seven days before the date fixed for sale in the
notice of sale. No other notice of the postponed sale need be given;
(7) The purchaser shall forthwith pay the price bid and on payment
the trustee shall execute to the purchaser its deed; the deed shall
recite the facts showing that the sale was conducted in compliance with
all of the requirements of this chapter and of the deed of trust, which
recital shall be prima facie evidence of such compliance and conclusive
evidence thereof in favor of bona fide purchasers and encumbrancers for
value, except that these recitals shall not affect the lien or interest
of any person entitled to notice under subsection (1) of this section,
if the trustee fails to give the required notice to such person. In
such case, the lien or interest of such omitted person shall not be
affected by the sale and such omitted person shall be treated as if
such person was the holder of the same lien or interest and was omitted
as a party defendant in a judicial foreclosure proceeding;
(8) The sale as authorized under this chapter shall not take place
less than one hundred ninety days from the date of default in any of
the obligations secured;
(9) If the trustee elects to foreclose the interest of any occupant
or tenant of property comprised solely of a single-family residence, or
a condominium, cooperative, or other dwelling unit in a multiplex or
other building containing fewer than five residential units, the
following notice shall be included as Part X of the Notice of Trustee's
Sale:

X. NOTICE TO OCCUPANTS OR TENANTS

The purchaser at the trustee's sale is entitled to possession of the
property on the 20th day following the sale, as against the grantor
under the deed of trust (the owner) and anyone having an interest
junior to the deed of trust, including occupants who are not tenants.
After the 20th day following the sale the purchaser has the right to
evict occupants who are not tenants by summary proceedings under
chapter 59.12 RCW. For tenant-occupied property, the purchaser shall
provide a tenant with written notice in accordance with RCW 61.24.060;
(10) Only one copy of all notices required by this chapter need be
given to a person who is both the borrower and the grantor. All
notices required by this chapter that are given to a general
partnership are deemed given to each of its general partners, unless
otherwise agreed by the parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A borrower who has been referred to mediation before the
effective date of this section may continue through the mediation
process and does not lose his or her right to mediation.
(2) A borrower who has not been referred to mediation as of the
effective date of this section may only be referred to mediation after
a notice of default has been issued but no later than twenty days from
the date a notice of sale is recorded.
(3) A borrower who has not been referred to mediation as of the
effective date of this section and who has had a notice of sale
recorded may only be referred to mediation if the referral is made
before twenty days have passed from the date the notice of sale was
recorded.

Sec. 9 RCW 61.24.172 and 2011 c 58 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The foreclosure fairness account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts received under RCW 61.24.174 must be
deposited into the account. Only the director of the department of
commerce or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. Funding to agencies and organizations under this section must
be provided by the department through an interagency agreement or other
applicable contract instrument. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures. Expenditures from the account must be used
as follows: (1) No less than ((eighty)) seventy-six percent must be
used for the purposes of providing housing ((counselors for))
counseling activities to benefit borrowers, except that this amount may
be less than ((eighty)) seventy-six percent only if necessary to meet
the funding level specified for the office of the attorney general
under subsection (2) of this section and the department under
subsection (4) of this section; (2) up to six percent, or six hundred
fifty-five thousand dollars per biennium, whichever amount is greater,
to the office of the attorney general to be used by the consumer
protection division to enforce this chapter; (3) up to two percent to
the office of civil legal aid to be used for the purpose of contracting
with qualified legal aid programs for legal representation of
homeowners in matters relating to foreclosure. Funds provided under
this subsection (3) must be used to supplement, not supplant, other
federal, state, and local funds; (4) up to ((nine)) thirteen percent,
or ((four hundred fifty-one)) five hundred ninety thousand dollars per
biennium, whichever amount is greater, to the department to be used for
implementation and operation of the foreclosure fairness act; and (5)
up to three percent to the department of financial institutions to
conduct homeowner prepurchase and postpurchase outreach and education
programs as defined in RCW 43.320.150.
The department shall enter into interagency agreements to contract
with the Washington state housing finance commission and other
appropriate entities to implement the foreclosure fairness act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 9 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---