BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington is
becoming a leader in the development and commercialization of aviation
biofuels due to its strong tradition of market innovation, a
concentrated demand for sustainable aviation fuels, leading expertise
and research capacity, an established aviation manufacturing sector,
and the availability of a diverse range of feedstocks for the
production of biofuels. The legislature also finds that the
development of aviation biofuels has the potential to reduce dependence
on foreign sources of fossil fuels, reduce greenhouse gas emissions,
and promote economic development and jobs in Washington. The
legislature intends to support the development of commercial-scale
aviation biofuels production facilities in Washington by facilitating
and streamlining the permitting process for new facilities and the
expansion of existing facilities and by providing access to low-cost
financing through the issuance of revenue bonds.
The legislature finds that the 2012 Washington state energy
strategy calls for a targeted, strategic policy focus on sustainable
aviation biofuels to encourage the realization of Washington's
potential. The legislature also finds that a regional stakeholder
effort to explore the opportunities and challenges surrounding the
production of sustainable aviation fuels, known as sustainable aviation
biofuels northwest, urged policymakers in the Northwest to develop
supportive public policies that will jump start the industry, attract
investment, and accelerate industry growth. In order to provide focus
and develop policy recommendations to support the sustainable aviation
biofuels sector in Washington, the legislature intends to establish a
sustainable aviation biofuels work group. Additionally, the
legislature intends Innovate Washington, designated in 2011 as the lead
agency for coordinating clean energy-related initiatives targeted at
growing the clean energy sector, to convene the appropriate
stakeholders and facilitate the opportunity for the state to realize
the full economic growth impact to the state's economy.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.157.010 and 2009 c 565 s 34 and 2009 c 421 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
((For purposes of)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter and RCW 28A.525.166, 28B.76.210, 28C.18.080,
43.21A.350, and 90.58.100, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) ((A)) "Project of statewide significance ((is)) " means:
(i) A border crossing project that involves both private and public
investments carried out in conjunction with adjacent states or
provinces;
(ii) A development project that will provide a net environmental
benefit;
(iii) A development project in furtherance of the commercialization
of innovations; ((or))
(iv) A private industrial development with private capital
investment in manufacturing or research and development; or
(v) An aviation biofuels production facility.
(b) To qualify for designation under RCW 43.157.030 as a project of
statewide significance:
(i) The project must be completed after January 1, 2009;
(ii) The applicant must submit an application to the department for
designation as a project of statewide significance to the department of
commerce; and
(iii) Except for an aviation biofuels production facility, the
project must have:
(A) In counties with a population less than or equal to twenty
thousand, a capital investment of five million dollars;
(B) In counties with a population greater than twenty thousand but
no more than fifty thousand, a capital investment of ten million
dollars;
(C) In counties with a population greater than fifty thousand but
no more than one hundred thousand, a capital investment of fifteen
million dollars;
(D) In counties with a population greater than one hundred thousand
but no more than two hundred thousand, a capital investment of twenty
million dollars;
(E) In counties with a population greater than two hundred thousand
but no more than four hundred thousand, a capital investment of thirty
million dollars;
(F) In counties with a population greater than four hundred
thousand but no more than one million, a capital investment of forty
million dollars;
(G) In counties with a population greater than one million, a
capital investment of fifty million dollars;
(H) In rural counties as defined by RCW 82.14.370, projected full-time employment positions after completion of construction of fifty or
greater;
(I) In counties other than rural counties as defined by RCW
82.14.370, projected full-time employment positions after completion of
construction of one hundred or greater; or
(J) Been qualified by the director of the department as a project
of statewide significance either because:
(I) The economic circumstances of the county merit the additional
assistance such designation will bring;
(II) The impact on a region due to the size and complexity of the
project merits such designation;
(III) The project resulted from or is in furtherance of innovation
activities at a public research institution in the state or is in or
resulted from innovation activities within an innovation partnership
zone; or
(IV) The project will provide a net environmental benefit as
evidenced by plans for design and construction under green building
standards or for the creation of renewable energy technology or
components or under other environmental criteria established by the
director in consultation with the director of the department of
ecology.
A project may be qualified under this subsection (1)(b)(iii)(J)
only after consultation on the availability of staff resources of the
office of regulatory assistance.
(2) "Department" means the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce.
(3) "Manufacturing" shall have the meaning assigned it in RCW
82.62.010.
(4) "Research and development" shall have the meaning assigned it
in RCW 82.62.010.
(5) "Applicant" means a person applying to the department for
designation of a development project as a project of statewide
significance.
(6) "Aviation biofuels production facility" means a facility
primarily for the processing of nonfossil biogenic feedstocks to
produce aviation fuels that meet the fuel quality technical standards
of the American society for testing materials for aviation fuels and
coproducts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.180
RCW, to be codified prior to the subchapter that begins with RCW
43.180.300, to read as follows:
(1) The commission may:
(a) Issue bonds for the purpose of financing all or part of the
project costs of facilities that are primarily for the production,
processing, or handling of aviation biofuels or for the production,
processing, or handling of nonfossil biogenic feedstocks to be used in
the production of aviation biofuels;
(b) Make or purchase loans for financing of these facilities; or
(c) Enter into financing documents relating to the repayment of
those loans or the provision of, or security for, debt service on the
bonds.
(2) In connection with the financing of project costs of facilities
that are primarily for the production, processing, or handling of
aviation biofuels, the commission may exercise the other powers granted
the commission under this chapter, including the requirements under RCW
43.180.170 and 43.180.180.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Aviation biofuels" means fuels for aviation from nonfossil
biogenic feedstocks that meet the fuel quality technical standards of
the American society for testing materials for aviation fuels and
coproducts.
(b) "Facilities" means land, rights in land, buildings, structures,
equipment, landscaping, utilities, approaches, roadways and parking,
handling and storage areas, and similar ancillary facilities.
(c) "Financing document" means a lease, sublease, installment sale
agreement, conditional sale agreement, loan agreement, mortgage, deed
of trust guaranty agreement, or other agreement for the purpose of
providing funds to pay or secure debt service on bonds.
(d) "Project costs" means costs of:
(i) Acquisition, construction, and improvement of any facilities
included in a facility;
(ii) Architectural, engineering, consulting, accounting, and legal
costs related directly to the development, financing, and construction
of a facility, including costs of studies assessing the feasibility of
a facility;
(iii) Finance costs, including discounts, if any, the costs of
issuing bonds, and costs incurred in carrying out any trust agreement;
(iv) Interest during construction and during the six months after
estimated completion of construction, and capitalized debt service or
repair and replacement or other appropriate reserves;
(v) The refunding of any outstanding obligations incurred for any
of the costs outlined in this subsection; and
(vi) Other costs incidental to any of the costs listed in this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.333 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Innovate Washington shall convene a sustainable aviation
biofuels work group.
(2) The purpose of the work group is to:
(a) Further the development of sustainable aviation fuel as a
productive industry in Washington, using as a foundation the regional
assessment prepared by the collaborative known as the sustainable
aviation fuels northwest;
(b) Facilitate communication and coordination among aviation
biofuels stakeholders;
(c) Provide a forum for discussion and problem-solving regarding
potential and current barriers related to technology development,
production, distribution, supply chain development, and
commercialization of aviation biofuels; and
(d) Provide recommendations to the legislature on potential
legislation that will facilitate the technology development,
production, distribution, and commercialization of aviation biofuels.
(3) Innovate Washington, in consultation with the legislative
members, shall designate work group members that represent sectors
involved in sustainable aviation biofuels research, development,
production, and utilization. The work group shall include but not be
limited to representatives from the following:
(a) The Washington state senate;
(b) The Washington state house of representatives;
(c) An agriculture advocacy organization;
(d) An airline operator;
(e) An airplane manufacturer;
(f) An airport operator located in western Washington and an
airport operator located in eastern Washington;
(g) Biofuels feedstock producers;
(h) Two biofuels producers;
(i) The department of agriculture;
(j) The department of commerce;
(k) The department of natural resources;
(l) A sustainable energy advocacy organization;
(m) The United States department of defense;
(n) The University of Washington;
(o) Washington State University;
(p) The Pacific Northwest national laboratory; and
(q) A member of the board of directors of Innovate Washington.
(4) The work group shall choose its chair from among its
membership.
(5) The work group may not meet more than twice a year.
(6) The work group shall provide an annual update of its findings
and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 1st of each year through 2014.
(7) This section expires June 30, 2015.

--- END ---