BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The holder of any of the following licenses
or certificates may ship spirits to a person who is a resident of
Washington and is twenty-one years of age or older for that person's
personal use and not for resale:
(1) Spirits distributor license;
(2) Spirits out-of-state certificate of approval holder;
(3) Craft distillery license;
(4) Distiller/rectifier license;
(5) Spirits importer license;
(6) Fruit and/or wine distiller license;
(7) Liquor manufacturer license; or
(8) Spirits retail license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Before spirits may be shipped to a person
who is a resident of Washington for that person's personal consumption,
the shipper must obtain a spirits shipper's permit under procedures
prescribed by the board by rule and pay a fee established by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) An applicant for a spirits shipper's
permit under section 2 of this act must:
(a) Certify that it holds all necessary state and federal licenses
and permits;
(b) Provide the board a copy of its licenses and permits, if so
requested;
(c) Register with the department of revenue under RCW 82.32.030.
(2) Holders of a spirits shipper's permit must:
(a) Notify the board in a manner determined by the board before
shipping any spirits to a Washington consumer; and
(b) Pay the taxes under RCW 82.08.150 for sales of spirits to
Washington state residents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A spirits shipper's permit holder must
clearly label all spirits cases or outside shipping packages of spirits
sent into or out of this state under this act to indicate that the
package may not be delivered to a person under twenty-one years of age
or to an intoxicated person.
(2) A spirits shipper's permit holder must ensure that the private
carrier used to deliver spirits:
(a) Obtains the signature of the person who receives the spirits
upon delivery;
(b) Verifies the age of the recipient; and
(c) Verifies that the recipient does not appear intoxicated at the
time of delivery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A spirits shipper's permit holder must
report to the board, on or before the twentieth day of each month, all
shipments of spirits made during the preceding calendar month directly
to Washington consumers under a spirits shipper's permit in effect for
all or any portion of the preceding year. All reports will be on forms
prescribed by the board.
(2) A spirit shipper's permit holder who advertises or offers
spirits for direct shipment to customers within this state must clearly
and conspicuously display the permit or license number in its
advertising.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Holders of a spirits shipper's permit are
deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of Washington concerning
enforcement of this act and all laws, rules, and regulations related to
the shipment of spirits directly to consumers. The privilege to ship
directly to Washington consumers under a spirits shipper's permit shall
be suspended or revoked if the permit holder fails to comply with the
provisions of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 66.20 RCW.

--- END ---