BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that buying in bulk
and in supersized packaging, a pattern of activity that is promoted and
encouraged by membership organizations, increases abusive consumption.
In order to protect the public interest, advance public safety, and
prevent abusive consumption of spirits, the Washington state liquor
control board is explicitly prohibited from issuing spirits retail
licenses to certain membership organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
No spirits retail license may be issued to a grocery store licensee
that is a membership organization that requires members to be at least
eighteen years of age.

--- END ---