BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In the absence of a compelling public necessity, no dissection
or autopsy shall be performed over the objection of a surviving
relative or friend of the deceased that the procedure is contrary to
the religious belief of the decedent, or if there is otherwise reason
to believe that a dissection or autopsy is contrary to the decedent's
religious beliefs.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Compelling public necessity" means:
(i) That the autopsy is essential to the conduct of the criminal
investigation of a homicide of which the decedent is the victim;
(ii) That discovery of the cause of death is necessary to meet an
immediate and substantial threat to the public health and that an
autopsy is essential to ascertain the cause of death; or
(iii) That the need for an autopsy is established in accordance
with subsection (5) of this section.
(b) "Friend" means any person who, prior to the decedent's death,
maintained such regular contact with the decedent as to be familiar
with his or her activities, health, and religious beliefs and who
presents an affidavit stating the facts and circumstances upon which
the claim that he or she is a friend is based, the religious
affiliation of the decedent, if any, that the decedent had religious
objections to an autopsy, the basis for such belief, and that he or she
will assume responsibility for the lawful disposition of the body of
the deceased.
(c) "Relative" means the person most closely related to the
decedent by consanguinity or affinity. In the event such person is
unavailable, the objection may be raised on his or her behalf by the
next most closely related person. The official who has authority to
order an autopsy of the decedent's body may require a relative to
present an affidavit stating his or her relationship to the decedent,
the religious affiliation of the decedent, if any, that the decedent
had religious objections to an autopsy, the basis for such belief, and
that he or she will assume responsibility for the lawful disposition of
the body of the deceased.
(3) All autopsies performed pursuant to this section shall be the
least intrusive procedure consistent with the compelling state
interest.
(4) No autopsy shall be performed over the objection of a surviving
friend or relative that the autopsy is contrary to the religious
beliefs of the deceased, or where there is otherwise reason to believe
that an autopsy is contrary to the decedent's religious beliefs, until
notice thereof is given to the friend or next of kin, or until forty-eight hours have elapsed, whichever is greater, to permit an objecting
party to institute legal proceedings to determine the propriety of the
autopsy. However, a court upon an ex parte motion may dispense with
the waiting period if it determines that the delay may prejudice the
accuracy of the autopsy or if the objecting party is a suspect in the
homicide.
(5) Whenever any coroner or medical examiner deems it necessary to
perform an autopsy over the objection of a surviving friend or relative
that the autopsy is contrary to the religious beliefs of the deceased,
or where there is otherwise reason to believe that an autopsy is
contrary to the decedent's religious beliefs, in circumstances not
provided for in subsection (2)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section, he or
she may institute a special proceeding, without a fee, in the superior
court of the county in which the autopsy is to be performed, for an
order authorizing the autopsy. The special proceeding shall be
determined summarily upon the petition and such oral or written proof
as may be offered by the parties. The court shall grant the relief
sought in the petition if it finds that the coroner or medical examiner
has established a demonstrable need for the autopsy. If the petition
is denied, and no stay is granted by the court, the body shall
immediately be released for burial to the surviving friend or relative.

--- END ---