BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that criminal
street gang activities are a serious problem that threatens the
long-term economic, social, and public safety interests of Washington
state and its counties and cities. Local communities require
assistance to reduce criminal street gang activity and to increase
criminal street gang intervention and prevention services that can
strengthen families, improve school performance, reduce criminal
activity and promote prosocial development and success among our
state's young adults.
(2) An initial investment in prevention and intervention measures
will help to ensure that our youth avoid gang membership and
activities, as well as other future criminal behavior. Studies have
shown that effective interventions reduce criminal activity and
recidivism. It is the intent of this act to provide youth and
communities with the effective tools they need to better protect the
citizens of Washington from criminal street gang activities.
(3) Criminal street gang activity may be influenced by activities
such as alcohol and drug use. Given this relationship, revenues for
liquor sale and consumption generated from the recent passage of
Initiative Measure No. 1183 are a logical source of funding for the
grant program established in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
Grants authorized.
(1) In general. When funding is appropriated for this purpose, the
Washington state partnership council on juvenile justice shall award
grants to carry out local projects focused on criminal street gang
prevention and intervention programs. The following members shall
serve on the grant application review committee: (a) The chair of the
Washington state partnership council on juvenile justice or the chair's
designee; (b) the secretary of the department of social and health
services or the secretary's designee; (c) the executive director of the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs or the executive
director's designee; (d) the attorney general or the attorney general's
designee; (e) one representative from counties; (f) one representative
from cities; and (g) one representative from nongovernmental
organizations, appointed by the chair of the partnership council. Each
entity or organization has a vote when determining awards.
(2) Eligible entities. Coalitions composed of, at a minimum, one
or more local governmental entities and one or more nonprofit,
nongovernmental organizations that have a documented history of
creating and administering effective criminal street gang prevention
and intervention programs may apply for funding under this section.
(3) Applications. An eligible entity seeking a grant under this
section shall submit an application to the Washington state partnership
council on juvenile justice at such time, in such form, and in such
manner as the partnership council may prescribe. Applications, at a
minimum, must demonstrate that:
(a) A significant criminal street gang problem exists in the
jurisdiction or jurisdictions. Factors that may be considered in
determining whether a significant criminal street gang problem exists
include, but are not limited to: Crime statistics that are coded as
gang-related; gang-related incidents, including graffiti and
gang-related criminal activity; offenders residing in a jurisdiction
that are under supervision of the department of corrections or the
department of social and health services and are known active gang
members; school or community surveys indicating a substantial level of
gang activity in schools or the community, and previous or ongoing gang
intervention activities in the jurisdiction;
(b) Addressing the impact of criminal street gangs is a high
priority in the jurisdiction seeking the grant;
(c) The funds will be used to offer services to prevent the
expansion of criminal street gang membership or support criminal street
gang membership intervention to a targeted population through:
(i) The use of one or more evidence-based or research-based
programs, as defined in RCW 71.36.010, such as the office of juvenile
justice and delinquency prevention program's comprehensive gang model;
or
(ii) The use of one or more innovative culturally relevant
practices;
(d) The applicant will provide at least twenty-five percent of the
requested grant amount through local matching funds. Local matching
funds may be provided in-kind or as cash, from public or private fund
sources; and
(e) The applicant's costs of administering the grant will not
exceed four percent of the grant award.
(4) Term. Grant funds awarded under this section are limited to a
period of twelve calendar months.
(5) The grant application review committee shall give priority to
applicants who have demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal
street gangs pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(6) No supplanting. Grant funds awarded under this section must be
used to supplement, not supplant, other moneys that are available for
prevention and intervention programs.
(7) Reports. Each eligible entity that receives a grant under this
section shall submit a report describing the activities carried out
with the grant funds to the secretary within one month of the one-year
anniversary of receiving the award. The report must include a
description of the number and types of youth served, the services
provided, and the impact of those services upon the youth and the
community. The partnership council shall report to the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding the status of
the grant program established by this section by December 31, 2012.
(8) As used in this section, "criminal street gang" has the same
meaning as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The criminal street gang prevention and intervention grant
program account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from the following must be deposited into the account:
Gifts, grants, bequests, devises, or other funds from public or
private sources to support the gang violence prevention and
intervention grant program established in section 2 of this act.
(2) Expenditures from the account may be made only for
establishing, administering, funding, and maintaining the criminal
street gang violence prevention and intervention grant program
established in section 2 of this act. Only the secretary or the
secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

--- END ---