BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.037 and 2006 c 292 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((No later than two years after full implementation of the
provisions of Title II of P.L. 109-13, improved security for driver's
licenses and personal identification cards (Real ID), as passed by
Congress May 10, 2005,)) The department ((shall)) may implement a
((voluntary biometric)) facial recognition matching system for
((driver's)) drivers' licenses, permits, and identicards. ((A
biometric)) Any facial recognition matching system ((shall)) selected
by the department must be used only to verify the identity of an
applicant for or holder of a ((renewal or duplicate)) driver's license,
permit, or identicard ((by matching a biometric identifier submitted by
the applicant against the biometric identifier submitted when the
license was last issued. This project requires a full review by the
information services board using the criteria for projects of the
highest visibility and risk)) to determine whether the person has been
issued a driver's license, permit, or identicard under a different name
or names.
(2) Any ((biometric)) facial recognition matching system selected
by the department ((shall)) must be capable of highly accurate
matching, and ((shall)) must be compliant with ((biometric))
appropriate standards established by the American association of motor
vehicle administrators that exist on the effective date of this
section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department
by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section.
(3) ((The biometric matching system selected by the department must
incorporate a process that allows the owner of a driver's license or
identicard to present a personal identification number or other code
along with the driver's license or identicard before the information
may be verified by a third party, including a governmental entity.
(4) Upon the establishment of a biometric driver's license and
identicard system as described in this section, the department shall
allow every person applying for an original, renewal, or duplicate
driver's license or identicard to voluntarily submit a biometric
identifier. Each applicant shall be informed of all ways in which the
biometric identifier may be used, all parties to whom the identifier
may be disclosed and the conditions of disclosure, the expected error
rates for the biometric matching system which shall be regularly
updated as the technology changes or empirical data is collected, and
the potential consequences of those errors. The department shall adopt
rules to allow applicants to verify the accuracy of the system at the
time that biometric information is submitted, including the use of at
least two separate devices.
(5) The department may not disclose biometric information to the
public or any governmental entity except when authorized by court
order.
(6))) The department shall post notices in conspicuous locations at
all department driver licensing offices, make written information
available to all applicants at department driver licensing offices, and
provide information on the department's web site regarding the facial
recognition matching system. The notices, written information, and
information on the web site must address how the facial recognition
matching system works, all ways in which the department may use results
from the facial recognition matching system, how an investigation based
on results from the facial recognition matching system would be
conducted, and a person's right to appeal any determinations made under
this chapter.
(4) Results from the facial recognition matching system:
(a) Are not available for public inspection and copying under
chapter 42.56 RCW;
(b) May only be disclosed pursuant to a valid subpoena, warrant, or
court order;
(c) May only be disclosed to a federal government agency if
specifically required under federal law; and
(d) May be disclosed by the department to a government agency,
including a court or law enforcement agency, for use in carrying out
its functions if the department has determined that person has
committed one of the prohibited practices listed in RCW 46.20.0921 and
this determination has been confirmed by a hearings examiner under this
chapter or the person declined a hearing or did not attend a scheduled
hearing.
(5) All ((biometric)) personally identifying information ((shall))
derived from the facial recognition matching system must be stored with
appropriate security safeguards((, including but not limited to
encryption)). The office of the chief information officer shall
develop the appropriate security standards for the department's use of
the facial recognition matching system, subject to approval and
oversight by the technology services board.
(((7))) (6) The department shall develop procedures to handle
instances in which the ((biometric)) facial recognition matching system
fails to verify the identity of an applicant for a renewal or duplicate
driver's license, permit, or identicard. These procedures ((shall))
must allow an applicant to prove identity without using ((a biometric
identifier.
(8) Any person who has voluntarily submitted a biometric identifier
may choose to discontinue participation in the biometric matching
program at any time, provided that the department utilizes a secure
procedure to prevent fraudulent requests for a renewal or duplicate
driver's license or identicard. When the person discontinues
participation, any previously collected biometric information shall be
destroyed.
(9) This section does not apply when an applicant renews his or her
driver's license or identicard by mail or electronic commerce)) the
facial recognition matching system.
(7) The department shall report to the governor and the legislature
by October 1st of each year, beginning October 1, 2012, regarding the
number of investigations initiated by the department based on results
from the facial recognition matching system and the final outcomes of
those investigations during the previous fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Facial recognition matching system" means a system that compares
the biometric template derived from an image of an applicant or holder
of a driver's license, permit, or identicard with the biometric
templates derived from the images in the department's negative file.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.038 (Biometric matching system--Funding) and 2004 c 273 s 4 are each repealed.

--- END ---