BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2012, and within allocated resources,
institutions of higher education shall require students to meet with an
academic advisor at least once per quarter for the purpose of assisting
each student to articulate the student's educational program goals,
identify program requirements, track the student's progress, and
promote completion of the student's degree or certificate.
(2) In order to increase program completions, each student must
meet with an academic advisor when the student has completed seventy-five percent of the requirements needed to obtain his or her degree or
certificate and identify those requirements remaining to be completed.
(3) Academic advising meetings may take place either in person or
through digital synchronous contact such as on the phone or using a
real time web application.
(4) Institutions of higher education shall require academic
advisors and students to sign a form that outlines the student's
educational goals and progress towards program completion.
(5) When possible, institutions of higher education are encouraged
to implement methods and tools to improve advising, including
applications used by award-winning schools such as an online student
advisor data portal that houses educational plans, maps student
transcripts against program requirements, provides early warning flags
for poor performance or attendance, and determines proximity to
completion.
(6) The successor agency to the higher education coordinating board
shall consult with the state board for community and technical colleges
and the four-year institutions of higher education to evaluate student
advising practices and impact on student retention and completion and
report to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2014.

--- END ---