BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.74.150 and 2007 c 98 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to practice or in any manner hold
himself or herself out to practice physical therapy or designate
himself or herself as a physical therapist or physical therapist
assistant, unless he or she is licensed in accordance with this
chapter.
(2) This chapter does not restrict persons licensed under any other
law of this state from engaging in the profession or practice for which
they are licensed, if they are not representing themselves to be
physical therapists, physical therapist assistants, or providers of
physical therapy.
(3) The following persons are exempt from licensure as physical
therapists under this chapter when engaged in the following activities:
(a) A person who is pursuing a course of study leading to a degree
as a physical therapist in an approved professional education program
and is satisfying supervised clinical education requirements related to
his or her physical therapy education while under direct supervision of
a licensed physical therapist;
(b) A physical therapist while practicing in the United States
armed services, United States public health service, or veterans
administration as based on requirements under federal regulations for
state licensure of health care providers; and
(c) A physical therapist licensed in another United States
jurisdiction, or a foreign-educated physical therapist credentialed in
another country, performing physical therapy as part of teaching or
participating in an educational seminar of no more than sixty days in
a calendar year.
(4) The following persons are exempt from licensure as physical
therapist assistants under this chapter when engaged in the following
activities:
(a) A person who is pursuing a course of study leading to a degree
as a physical therapist assistant in an approved professional education
program and is satisfying supervised clinical education requirements
related to his or her physical therapist assistant education while
under direct supervision of a licensed physical therapist or licensed
physical therapist assistant;
(b) A physical therapist assistant while practicing in the United
States armed services, United States public health service, or veterans
administration as based on requirements under federal regulations for
state licensure of health care providers; and
(c) A physical therapist assistant licensed in another United
States jurisdiction, or a foreign-educated physical therapist assistant
credentialed in another country, or a physical therapist assistant who
is teaching or participating in an educational seminar of no more than
sixty days in a calendar year.

--- END ---