BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.50.150 and 2004 c 242 s 47 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The employer of any employee whose retirement benefits are
based in part on excess compensation, as defined in this section,
shall, upon receipt of a billing from the department, pay into the
appropriate retirement system the present value at the time of the
employee's retirement of the total estimated cost of all present and
future benefits from the retirement system attributable to the excess
compensation. The state actuary shall determine the estimated cost
using the same method and procedure as is used in preparing fiscal note
costs for the legislature. However, the director may in the director's
discretion decline to bill the employer if the amount due is less than
fifty dollars. Accounts unsettled within thirty days of the receipt of
the billing shall be assessed an interest penalty of one percent of the
amount due for each month or fraction thereof beyond the original
thirty-day period.
(2) "Excess compensation," as used in this section, includes the
following payments, if used in the calculation of the employee's
retirement allowance:
(a) A cash out of unused annual leave in excess of two hundred
forty hours of such leave. "Cash out" for purposes of this subsection
means:
(i) Any payment in lieu of an accrual of annual leave; or
(ii) Any payment added to salary or wages, concurrent with a
reduction of annual leave;
(b) A cash out of any other form of leave;
(c) A payment for, or in lieu of, any personal expense or
transportation allowance to the extent that payment qualifies as
reportable compensation in the member's retirement system;
(d) The portion of any payment, including overtime payments, that
exceeds twice the regular daily or hourly rate of pay; ((and))
(e) The portion of total reportable compensation used in the
calculation of the employee's retirement allowance that exceeds one and
one-half times the employee's reportable compensation over the
calculation period, excluding reportable compensation from overtime,
bonuses, cash outs of any form of leave, or lump-sum payments; and
(f) Any termination or severance payment.
(3) This section applies to the retirement systems listed in RCW
41.50.030 and to retirements occurring on or after March 15, 1984.
Nothing in this section is intended to amend or determine the meaning
of any definition in chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.35,
41.37, or 43.43 RCW or to determine in any manner what payments are
includable in the calculation of a retirement allowance under such
chapters.
(4) An employer is not relieved of liability under this section
because of the death of any person either before or after the billing
from the department.

--- END ---