BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.66.045 and 2010 c 27 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every issuer of a medicare supplement insurance policy or
certificate providing coverage to a resident of this state issued on or
after January 1, 1996, and before June 1, 2010, must:
(a) Unless otherwise provided for in RCW 48.66.055, issue coverage
under its standardized benefit plans B, C, D, E, F, G, K, and L without
evidence of insurability to any resident of this state who is eligible
for both medicare hospital and physician services by reason of age or
by reason of disability or end-stage renal disease, if the medicare
supplement policy replaces another medicare supplement standardized
benefit plan policy or certificate B, C, D, E, F, G, K, or L, or other
more comprehensive coverage than the replacing policy; and
(b) Unless otherwise provided for in RCW 48.66.055, issue coverage
under its standardized plans A, H, I, and J without evidence of
insurability to any resident of this state who is eligible for both
medicare hospital and physician services by reason of age or by reason
of disability or end-stage renal disease, if the medicare supplement
policy replaces another medicare supplement policy or certificate which
is the same standardized plan as the replaced policy. After December
31, 2005, plans H, I, and J may be replaced only by the same plan if
that plan has been modified to remove outpatient prescription drug
coverage.
(2)(a)(i) Unless otherwise provided for in RCW 48.66.055, every
issuer of a medicare supplement insurance policy or certificate
providing coverage to a resident of this state issued on or after June
1, 2010, must issue coverage under its standardized plans B, C, D, F,
F with high deductible, G, K, L, M, or N ((without evidence of
insurability)) to any resident of this state who is eligible for both
medicare hospital and physician services by reason of age or by reason
of disability or end-stage renal disease, if the medicare supplement
policy or certificate replaces another medicare supplement policy or
certificate or other more comprehensive coverage; and
(((b))) (ii) Unless otherwise provided for in RCW 48.66.055, issue
coverage under its standardized plan A ((without evidence of
insurability)) to any resident of this state who is eligible for both
medicare hospital and physician services by reason of age or by reason
of disability or end-stage renal disease, if the medicare supplement
policy or certificate replaces another standardized plan A medicare
supplement policy or certificate.
(b) If the medicare supplement policy or certificate being replaced
was issued on or after June 1, 2010, the issuer of the medicare
supplement insurance policy or certificate may not require evidence of
insurability prior to issuing the new policy or certificate under (a)
of this subsection. If the medicare supplement policy or certificate
being replaced was issued prior to June 1, 2010, the issuer of the
medicare supplement insurance policy or certificate may require
evidence of insurability prior to issuing the new policy or certificate
under (a) of this subsection.
(3) Every issuer of a medicare supplement insurance policy or
certificate providing coverage to a resident of this state issued on or
after January 1, 1996, must set rates only on a community-rated basis.
Premiums must be equal for all policyholders and certificate holders
under a standardized medicare supplement benefit plan form, except that
an issuer may vary premiums based on spousal discounts, frequency of
payment, and method of payment including automatic deposit of premiums
and may develop no more than two rating pools that distinguish between
an insured's eligibility for medicare by reason of:
(a) Age; or
(b) Disability or end-stage renal disease.

--- END ---