BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.28.175 and 2011 c 293 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Counties and municipalities may establish and operate DUI
courts.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "DUI court" means a court
that has special calendars or dockets designed to achieve a reduction
in recidivism of impaired driving among nonviolent, alcohol abusing
offenders, whether adult or juvenile, by increasing their likelihood
for successful rehabilitation through early, continuous, and intense
judicially supervised treatment; mandatory periodic testing for alcohol
use and, if applicable, drug use; and the use of appropriate sanctions
and other rehabilitation services.
(3)(a) Any jurisdiction that seeks a state appropriation to fund a
DUI court program must first:
(i) Exhaust all federal funding that is available to support the
operations of its DUI court and associated services; and
(ii) Match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state moneys allocated
for DUI court programs with local cash or in-kind resources. Moneys
allocated by the state must be used to supplement, not supplant, other
federal, state, and local funds for DUI court operations and associated
services. However, until June 30, 2014, no match is required for state
moneys expended for the administrative and overhead costs associated
with the operation of a DUI court established as of January 1, 2011.
(b) Any ((county)) jurisdiction that establishes a DUI court
pursuant to this section shall establish minimum requirements for the
participation of offenders in the program. The DUI court may adopt
local requirements that are more stringent than the minimum. The
minimum requirements are:
(i) The offender would benefit from alcohol treatment;
(ii) The offender has not previously been convicted of a serious
violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, vehicular
homicide under RCW 46.61.520, vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522, or
an equivalent out-of-state offense; and
(iii) Without regard to whether proof of any of these elements is
required to convict, the offender is not currently charged with or
convicted of an offense:
(A) That is a sex offense;
(B) That is a serious violent offense;
(C) That is vehicular homicide or vehicular assault;
(D) During which the defendant used a firearm; or
(E) During which the defendant caused substantial or great bodily
harm or death to another person.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.475 and 2002 c 290 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any and all recommended sentencing agreements or plea agreements
and the sentences for any and all felony crimes shall be made and
retained as public records if the felony crime involves:
(1) Any violent offense as defined in this chapter;
(2) Any most serious offense as defined in this chapter;
(3) Any felony with a deadly weapon special verdict under RCW
((9.94A.602)) 9.94A.825;
(4) Any felony with any deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both; ((and/or))
(5) The felony crimes of possession of a machine gun, possessing a
stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful
possession of a firearm in the first or second degree, and/or use of a
machine gun in a felony; or
(6) The felony crime of driving a motor vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined in RCW
46.61.502, and felony physical control of a motor vehicle while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined in RCW
46.61.504.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.640 and 2006 c 73 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every offender who has been discharged under RCW 9.94A.637 may
apply to the sentencing court for a vacation of the offender's record
of conviction. If the court finds the offender meets the tests
prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, the court may clear the
record of conviction by: (a) Permitting the offender to withdraw the
offender's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty; or (b) if
the offender has been convicted after a plea of not guilty, by the
court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (c) by the court
dismissing the information or indictment against the offender.
(2) An offender may not have the record of conviction cleared if:
(a) There are any criminal charges against the offender pending in any
court of this state or another state, or in any federal court; (b) the
offense was a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; (c) the
offense was a crime against persons as defined in RCW 43.43.830; (d)
the offender has been convicted of a new crime in this state, another
state, or federal court since the date of the offender's discharge
under RCW 9.94A.637; (e) the offense is a class B felony and less than
ten years have passed since the date the applicant was discharged under
RCW 9.94A.637; (f) the offense was a class C felony, other than a class
C felony described in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), and less than
five years have passed since the date the applicant was discharged
under RCW 9.94A.637; or (g) the offense was a class C felony described
in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6) ((and less than ten years have
passed since the applicant was discharged under RCW 9.94A.637)).
(3) Once the court vacates a record of conviction under subsection
(1) of this section, the fact that the offender has been convicted of
the offense shall not be included in the offender's criminal history
for purposes of determining a sentence in any subsequent conviction,
and the offender shall be released from all penalties and disabilities
resulting from the offense. For all purposes, including responding to
questions on employment applications, an offender whose conviction has
been vacated may state that the offender has never been convicted of
that crime. Nothing in this section affects or prevents the use of an
offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.95.210 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection in granting
probation, the superior court may suspend the imposition or the
execution of the sentence and may direct that the suspension may
continue upon such conditions and for such time as it shall designate,
not exceeding the maximum term of sentence or two years, whichever is
longer.
(b) For a defendant sentenced under RCW 46.61.5055, the superior
court may suspend the imposition or the execution of the sentence and
may direct that the suspension continue upon such conditions and for
such time as the court shall designate, not to exceed five years. The
court shall have continuing jurisdiction and authority to suspend the
execution of all or any part of the sentence upon stated terms,
including installment payment of fines. A defendant who has been
sentenced, and who then fails to appear for any hearing to address the
defendant's compliance with the terms of probation when ordered to do
so by the court shall have the term of probation tolled until such time
as the defendant makes his or her presence known to the court on the
record. Any time before entering an order terminating probation, the
court may modify or revoke its order suspending the imposition or
execution of the sentence if the defendant violates or fails to carry
out any of the conditions of the suspended sentence.
(2) In the order granting probation and as a condition thereof, the
superior court may in its discretion imprison the defendant in the
county jail for a period not exceeding one year and may fine the
defendant any sum not exceeding the statutory limit for the offense
committed, and court costs. As a condition of probation, the superior
court shall require the payment of the penalty assessment required by
RCW 7.68.035. The superior court may also require the defendant to
make such monetary payments, on such terms as it deems appropriate
under the circumstances, as are necessary: (a) To comply with any
order of the court for the payment of family support; (b) to make
restitution to any person or persons who may have suffered loss or
damage by reason of the commission of the crime in question or when the
offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer offenses and agrees
with the prosecutor's recommendation that the offender be required to
pay restitution to a victim of an offense or offenses which are not
prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement; (c) to pay such fine as may be
imposed and court costs, including reimbursement of the state for costs
of extradition if return to this state by extradition was required; (d)
following consideration of the financial condition of the person
subject to possible electronic monitoring, to pay for the costs of
electronic monitoring if that monitoring was required by the court as
a condition of release from custody or as a condition of probation; (e)
to contribute to a county or interlocal drug fund; and (f) to make
restitution to a public agency for the costs of an emergency response
under RCW 38.52.430, and may require bonds for the faithful observance
of any and all conditions imposed in the probation.
(3) The superior court shall order restitution in all cases where
the victim is entitled to benefits under the crime victims'
compensation act, chapter 7.68 RCW. If the superior court does not
order restitution and the victim of the crime has been determined to be
entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation act, the
department of labor and industries, as administrator of the crime
victims' compensation program, may petition the superior court within
one year of imposition of the sentence for entry of a restitution
order. Upon receipt of a petition from the department of labor and
industries, the superior court shall hold a restitution hearing and
shall enter a restitution order.
(4) In granting probation, the superior court may order the
probationer to report to the secretary of corrections or such officer
as the secretary may designate and as a condition of the probation to
follow the instructions of the secretary. If the county legislative
authority has elected to assume responsibility for the supervision of
superior court misdemeanant probationers within its jurisdiction, the
superior court misdemeanant probationer shall report to a probation
officer employed or contracted for by the county. In cases where a
superior court misdemeanant probationer is sentenced in one county, but
resides within another county, there must be provisions for the
probationer to report to the agency having supervision responsibility
for the probationer's county of residence.
(5) If the probationer has been ordered to make restitution and the
superior court has ordered supervision, the officer supervising the
probationer shall make a reasonable effort to ascertain whether
restitution has been made. If the superior court has ordered
supervision and restitution has not been made as ordered, the officer
shall inform the prosecutor of that violation of the terms of probation
not less than three months prior to the termination of the probation
period. The secretary of corrections will promulgate rules and
regulations for the conduct of the person during the term of probation.
For defendants found guilty in district court, like functions as the
secretary performs in regard to probation may be performed by probation
officers employed for that purpose by the county legislative authority
of the county wherein the court is located.
(6) The provisions of RCW 9.94A.501 and 9.94A.5011 apply to
sentences imposed under this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.96.060 and 2001 c 140 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person convicted of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
offense who has completed all of the terms of the sentence for the
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense may apply to the sentencing
court for a vacation of the applicant's record of conviction for the
offense. If the court finds the applicant meets the tests prescribed
in subsection (2) of this section, the court may in its discretion
vacate the record of conviction by: (a)(i) Permitting the applicant to
withdraw the applicant's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not
guilty; or (ii) if the applicant has been convicted after a plea of not
guilty, the court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (b) the
court dismissing the information, indictment, complaint, or citation
against the applicant and vacating the judgment and sentence.
(2) An applicant may not have the record of conviction for a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense vacated if any one of the
following is present:
(a) There are any criminal charges against the applicant pending in
any court of this state or another state, or in any federal court;
(b) The offense was a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030
or an attempt to commit a violent offense;
(c) The offense was a violation of RCW 46.61.502 (driving while
under the influence), 46.61.504 (actual physical control while under
the influence), ((or)) 9.91.020 (operating a railroad, etc. while
intoxicated), or the offense is considered a "prior offense" under RCW
46.61.5055 and the applicant has had a subsequent alcohol or drug
violation within ten years of the date of arrest for the prior offense;
(d) The offense was any misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor violation,
including attempt, of chapter 9.68 RCW (obscenity and pornography),
chapter 9.68A RCW (sexual exploitation of children), or chapter 9A.44
RCW (sex offenses);
(e) The applicant was convicted of a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor offense as defined in RCW 10.99.020, or the court
determines after a review of the court file that the offense was
committed by one family member or household member against another, or
the court, after considering the damage to person or property that
resulted in the conviction, any prior convictions for crimes defined in
RCW 10.99.020, or for comparable offenses in another state or in
federal court, and the totality of the records under review by the
court regarding the conviction being considered for vacation,
determines that the offense involved domestic violence, and any one of
the following factors exist:
(i) The applicant has not provided written notification of the
vacation petition to the prosecuting attorney's office that prosecuted
the offense for which vacation is sought, or has not provided that
notification to the court;
(ii) The applicant has previously had a conviction for domestic
violence. For purposes of this subsection, however, if the current
application is for more than one conviction that arose out of a single
incident, none of those convictions counts as a previous conviction;
(iii) The applicant has signed an affidavit under penalty of
perjury affirming that the applicant has not previously had a
conviction for a domestic violence offense, and a criminal history
check reveals that the applicant has had such a conviction; or
(iv) Less than five years have elapsed since the person completed
the terms of the original conditions of the sentence, including any
financial obligations and successful completion of any treatment
ordered as a condition of sentencing;
(f) For any offense other than those described in (e) of this
subsection, less than three years have passed since the person
completed the terms of the sentence, including any financial
obligations;
(g) The offender has been convicted of a new crime in this state,
another state, or federal court since the date of conviction;
(h) The applicant has ever had the record of another conviction
vacated; or
(i) The applicant is currently restrained, or has been restrained
within five years prior to the vacation application, by a domestic
violence protection order, a no-contact order, an antiharassment order,
or a civil restraining order which restrains one party from contacting
the other party.
(3) Once the court vacates a record of conviction under subsection
(1) of this section, the person shall be released from all penalties
and disabilities resulting from the offense and the fact that the
person has been convicted of the offense shall not be included in the
person's criminal history for purposes of determining a sentence in any
subsequent conviction. For all purposes, including responding to
questions on employment or housing applications, a person whose
conviction has been vacated under subsection (1) of this section may
state that he or she has never been convicted of that crime. Nothing
in this section affects or prevents the use of an offender's prior
conviction in a later criminal prosecution.
(4) All costs incurred by the court and probation services shall be
paid by the person making the motion to vacate the record unless a
determination is made pursuant to chapter 10.101 RCW that the person
making the motion is indigent, at the time the motion is brought.
(5) The clerk of the court in which the vacation order is entered
shall immediately transmit the order vacating the conviction to the
Washington state patrol identification section and to the local police
agency, if any, which holds criminal history information for the person
who is the subject of the conviction. The Washington state patrol and
any such local police agency shall immediately update their records to
reflect the vacation of the conviction, and shall transmit the order
vacating the conviction to the federal bureau of investigation. A
conviction that has been vacated under this section may not be
disseminated or disclosed by the state patrol or local law enforcement
agency to any person, except other criminal justice enforcement
agencies.

Sec. 6 RCW 38.52.430 and 1993 c 251 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person whose intoxication causes an incident resulting in an
appropriate emergency response, and who, in connection with the
incident, has been found guilty of or has had their prosecution
deferred for (1) driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.502; (2) operating an aircraft under the
influence of intoxicants or drugs, RCW 47.68.220; (3) use of a vessel
while under the influence of alcohol or drugs, RCW ((88.12.100))
79A.60.040; (4) vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a); or (5) vehicular
assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug,
RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), is liable for the expense of an emergency response
by a public agency to the incident.
The expense of an emergency response is a charge against the person
liable for expenses under this section. The charge constitutes a debt
of that person and is collectible by the public agency incurring those
costs in the same manner as in the case of an obligation under a
contract, expressed or implied. Following a conviction of an offense
listed in this section, and prior to sentencing, the prosecution may
present to the court information setting forth the expenses incurred by
the public agency for its emergency response to the incident. Upon a
finding by the court that the expenses are reasonable, the court shall
order the defendant to reimburse the public agency. The cost
reimbursement shall be included in the sentencing order as an
additional monetary obligation of the defendant and may not be
substituted for any other fine or cost required or allowed by statute.
The court may establish a payment schedule for the payment of the cost
reimbursement, separate from any payment schedule imposed for other
fines and costs.
In no event shall a person's liability under this section for the
expense of an emergency response exceed ((one)) five thousand dollars
for a particular incident.
If more than one public agency makes a claim for payment from an
individual for an emergency response to a single incident under the
provisions of this section, and the sum of the claims exceeds the
amount recovered, the division of the amount recovered shall be
determined by an interlocal agreement consistent with the requirements
of chapter 39.34 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.20.308 and 2008 c 282 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state is
deemed to have given consent, subject to the provisions of RCW
46.61.506, to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood for the
purpose of determining the alcohol concentration or presence of any
drug in his or her breath or blood if arrested for any offense where,
at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has reasonable grounds
to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or was in violation of RCW 46.61.503. Neither
consent nor this section precludes a police officer from obtaining a
search warrant for a person's breath or blood.
(2) The test or tests of breath shall be administered at the
direction of a law enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to
believe the person to have been driving or in actual physical control
of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or the person to have been driving or
in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having alcohol in
a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 in his or her system and
being under the age of twenty-one. However, in those instances where
the person is incapable due to physical injury, physical incapacity, or
other physical limitation, of providing a breath sample or where the
person is being treated in a hospital, clinic, doctor's office,
emergency medical vehicle, ambulance, or other similar facility or
where the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person is
under the influence of a drug, a blood test shall be administered by a
qualified person as provided in RCW 46.61.506(5). The officer shall
inform the person of his or her right to refuse the breath or blood
test, and of his or her right to have additional tests administered by
any qualified person of his or her choosing as provided in RCW
46.61.506. The officer shall warn the driver, in substantially the
following language, that:
(a) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's license,
permit, or privilege to drive will be revoked or denied for at least
one year; and
(b) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's refusal to
take the test may be used in a criminal trial; and
(c) If the driver submits to the test and the test is administered,
the driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive will be suspended,
revoked, or denied for at least ninety days if the driver is age
twenty-one or over and the test indicates the alcohol concentration of
the driver's breath or blood is 0.08 or more, or if the driver is under
age twenty-one and the test indicates the alcohol concentration of the
driver's breath or blood is 0.02 or more, or if the driver is under age
twenty-one and the driver is in violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504; and
(d) If the driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive is
suspended, revoked, or denied the driver may be eligible to immediately
apply for an ignition interlock driver's license.
(3) Except as provided in this section, the test administered shall
be of the breath only. If an individual is unconscious or is under
arrest for the crime of felony driving under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs under RCW 46.61.502(6), felony physical
control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug under RCW 46.61.504(6), vehicular homicide as
provided in RCW 46.61.520, or vehicular assault as provided in RCW
46.61.522, or if an individual is under arrest for the crime of driving
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs as provided
in RCW 46.61.502, which arrest results from an accident in which there
has been serious bodily injury to another person, a breath or blood
test may be administered without the consent of the individual so
arrested.
(4) Any person who is dead, unconscious, or who is otherwise in a
condition rendering him or her incapable of refusal, shall be deemed
not to have withdrawn the consent provided by subsection (1) of this
section and the test or tests may be administered, subject to the
provisions of RCW 46.61.506, and the person shall be deemed to have
received the warnings required under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) If, following his or her arrest and receipt of warnings under
subsection (2) of this section, the person arrested refuses upon the
request of a law enforcement officer to submit to a test or tests of
his or her breath or blood, no test shall be given except as authorized
under subsection (3) or (4) of this section.
(6) If, after arrest and after the other applicable conditions and
requirements of this section have been satisfied, a test or tests of
the person's blood or breath is administered and the test results
indicate that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood
is 0.08 or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or 0.02 or
more if the person is under the age of twenty-one, or the person
refuses to submit to a test, the arresting officer or other law
enforcement officer at whose direction any test has been given, or the
department, where applicable, if the arrest results in a test of the
person's blood, shall:
(a) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of its intention to suspend, revoke, or deny the person's
license, permit, or privilege to drive as required by subsection (7) of
this section;
(b) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of his or her right to a hearing, specifying the steps he or
she must take to obtain a hearing as provided by subsection (8) of this
section and that the person waives the right to a hearing if he or she
receives an ignition interlock driver's license;
(c) Mark the person's Washington state driver's license or permit
to drive, if any, in a manner authorized by the department;
(d) Serve notice in writing that the marked license or permit, if
any, is a temporary license that is valid for sixty days from the date
of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event notice is
given by the department following a blood test, or until the
suspension, revocation, or denial of the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive is sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8)
of this section, whichever occurs first. No temporary license is valid
to any greater degree than the license or permit that it replaces; and
(e) Immediately notify the department of the arrest and transmit to
the department within seventy-two hours, except as delayed as the
result of a blood test, a sworn report or report under a declaration
authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 that states:
(i) That the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested
person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or drugs, or both, or was under the age of twenty-one years and
had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
while having an alcohol concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503;
(ii) That after receipt of the warnings required by subsection (2)
of this section the person refused to submit to a test of his or her
blood or breath, or a test was administered and the results indicated
that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.08
or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or was 0.02 or more if
the person is under the age of twenty-one; and
(iii) Any other information that the director may require by rule.
(7) The department of licensing, upon the receipt of a sworn report
or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 under
subsection (6)(e) of this section, shall suspend, revoke, or deny the
person's license, permit, or privilege to drive or any nonresident
operating privilege, as provided in RCW 46.20.3101, such suspension,
revocation, or denial to be effective beginning sixty days from the
date of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event
notice is given by the department following a blood test, or when
sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8) of this section,
whichever occurs first.
(8) A person receiving notification under subsection (6)(b) of this
section may, within twenty days after the notice has been given,
request in writing a formal hearing before the department. The person
shall pay a fee of two hundred dollars as part of the request. If the
request is mailed, it must be postmarked within twenty days after
receipt of the notification. Upon timely receipt of such a request for
a formal hearing, including receipt of the required two hundred dollar
fee, the department shall afford the person an opportunity for a
hearing. The department may waive the required two hundred dollar fee
if the person is an indigent as defined in RCW 10.101.010. Except as
otherwise provided in this section, the hearing is subject to and shall
be scheduled and conducted in accordance with RCW 46.20.329 and
46.20.332. The hearing shall be conducted in the county of the arrest,
except that all or part of the hearing may, at the discretion of the
department, be conducted by telephone or other electronic means. The
hearing shall be held within sixty days following the arrest or
following the date notice has been given in the event notice is given
by the department following a blood test, unless otherwise agreed to by
the department and the person, in which case the action by the
department shall be stayed, and any valid temporary license marked
under subsection (6)(c) of this section extended, if the person is
otherwise eligible for licensing. For the purposes of this section,
the scope of the hearing shall cover the issues of whether a law
enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had
been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug or had been driving or was in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her
system in a concentration of 0.02 or more if the person was under the
age of twenty-one, whether the person was placed under arrest, and (a)
whether the person refused to submit to the test or tests upon request
of the officer after having been informed that such refusal would
result in the revocation of the person's license, permit, or privilege
to drive, or (b) if a test or tests were administered, whether the
applicable requirements of this section were satisfied before the
administration of the test or tests, whether the person submitted to
the test or tests, or whether a test was administered without express
consent as permitted under this section, and whether the test or tests
indicated that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or
blood was 0.08 or more if the person was age twenty-one or over at the
time of the arrest, or 0.02 or more if the person was under the age of
twenty-one at the time of the arrest. The sworn report or report under
a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 submitted by a law
enforcement officer is prima facie evidence that the officer had
reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in
actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or the
person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her system in
a concentration of 0.02 or more and was under the age of twenty-one and
that the officer complied with the requirements of this section.
A hearing officer shall conduct the hearing, may issue subpoenas
for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, and
shall administer oaths to witnesses. The hearing officer shall not
issue a subpoena for the attendance of a witness at the request of the
person unless the request is accompanied by the fee required by RCW
5.56.010 for a witness in district court. The sworn report or report
under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 of the law enforcement
officer and any other evidence accompanying the report shall be
admissible without further evidentiary foundation and the
certifications authorized by the criminal rules for courts of limited
jurisdiction shall be admissible without further evidentiary
foundation. The person may be represented by counsel, may question
witnesses, may present evidence, and may testify. The department shall
order that the suspension, revocation, or denial either be rescinded or
sustained.
(9) If the suspension, revocation, or denial is sustained after
such a hearing, the person whose license, privilege, or permit is
suspended, revoked, or denied has the right to file a petition in the
superior court of the county of arrest to review the final order of
revocation by the department in the same manner as an appeal from a
decision of a court of limited jurisdiction. Notice of appeal must be
filed within thirty days after the date the final order is served or
the right to appeal is waived. Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.334, RALJ
1.1, or other statutes or rules referencing de novo review, the appeal
shall be limited to a review of the record of the administrative
hearing. The appellant must pay the costs associated with obtaining
the record of the hearing before the hearing officer. The filing of
the appeal does not stay the effective date of the suspension,
revocation, or denial. A petition filed under this subsection must
include the petitioner's grounds for requesting review. Upon granting
petitioner's request for review, the court shall review the
department's final order of suspension, revocation, or denial as
expeditiously as possible. The review must be limited to a
determination of whether the department has committed any errors of
law. The superior court shall accept those factual determinations
supported by substantial evidence in the record: (a) That were
expressly made by the department; or (b) that may reasonably be
inferred from the final order of the department. The superior court
may reverse, affirm, or modify the decision of the department or remand
the case back to the department for further proceedings. The decision
of the superior court must be in writing and filed in the clerk's
office with the other papers in the case. The court shall state the
reasons for the decision. If judicial relief is sought for a stay or
other temporary remedy from the department's action, the court shall
not grant such relief unless the court finds that the appellant is
likely to prevail in the appeal and that without a stay the appellant
will suffer irreparable injury. If the court stays the suspension,
revocation, or denial it may impose conditions on such stay.
(10)(a) If a person whose driver's license, permit, or privilege to
drive has been or will be suspended, revoked, or denied under
subsection (7) of this section, other than as a result of a breath or
blood test refusal, and who has not committed an offense for which he
or she was granted a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW,
petitions a court for a deferred prosecution on criminal charges
arising out of the arrest for which action has been or will be taken
under subsection (7) of this section, or notifies the department of
licensing of the intent to seek such a deferred prosecution, then the
license suspension or revocation shall be stayed pending entry of the
deferred prosecution. The stay shall not be longer than one hundred
fifty days after the date charges are filed, or two years after the
date of the arrest, whichever time period is shorter. If the court
stays the suspension, revocation, or denial, it may impose conditions
on such stay. If the person is otherwise eligible for licensing, the
department shall issue a temporary license, or extend any valid
temporary license marked under subsection (6) of this section, for the
period of the stay. If a deferred prosecution treatment plan is not
recommended in the report made under RCW 10.05.050, or if treatment is
rejected by the court, or if the person declines to accept an offered
treatment plan, or if the person violates any condition imposed by the
court, then the court shall immediately direct the department to cancel
the stay and any temporary marked license or extension of a temporary
license issued under this subsection.
(b) A suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this section,
other than as a result of a breath or blood test refusal, shall be
stayed if the person is accepted for deferred prosecution as provided
in chapter 10.05 RCW for the incident upon which the suspension,
revocation, or denial is based. If the deferred prosecution is
terminated, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or
denial reinstated. If the deferred prosecution is completed, the stay
shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial canceled.
(c) The provisions of (b) of this subsection relating to a stay of
a suspension, revocation, or denial and the cancellation of any
suspension, revocation, or denial do not apply to the suspension,
revocation, denial, or disqualification of a person's commercial
driver's license or privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle.
(11) When it has been finally determined under the procedures of
this section that a nonresident's privilege to operate a motor vehicle
in this state has been suspended, revoked, or denied, the department
shall give information in writing of the action taken to the motor
vehicle administrator of the state of the person's residence and of any
state in which he or she has a license.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.20.385 and 2011 c 293 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning January 1, 2009, any person licensed under this
chapter who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
or an equivalent local or out-of-state statute or ordinance, or a
violation of RCW 46.61.520(1)(a) or 46.61.522(1)(b), or who has had or
will have his or her license suspended, revoked, or denied under RCW
46.20.3101, or who is otherwise permitted under subsection (8) of this
section, may submit to the department an application for an ignition
interlock driver's license. The department, upon receipt of the
prescribed fee and upon determining that the petitioner is eligible to
receive the license, may issue an ignition interlock driver's license.
(b) A person may apply for an ignition interlock driver's license
anytime, including immediately after receiving the notices under RCW
46.20.308 or after his or her license is suspended, revoked, or denied.
A person receiving an ignition interlock driver's license waives his or
her right to a hearing or appeal under RCW 46.20.308.
(c) An applicant under this subsection shall provide proof to the
satisfaction of the department that a functioning ignition interlock
device has been installed on all vehicles operated by the person.
(i) The department shall require the person to maintain the device
on all vehicles operated by the person and shall restrict the person to
operating only vehicles equipped with the device, for the remainder of
the period of suspension, revocation, or denial. The installation of
an ignition interlock device is not necessary on vehicles owned,
leased, or rented by a person's employer and on those vehicles whose
care and/or maintenance is the temporary responsibility of the
employer, and driven at the direction of a person's employer as a
requirement of employment during working hours. The person must
provide the department with a declaration pursuant to RCW 9A.72.085
from his or her employer stating that the person's employment requires
the person to operate a vehicle owned by the employer or other persons
during working hours. However, when the employer's vehicle is assigned
exclusively to the restricted driver and used solely for commuting to
and from employment, the employer exemption does not apply.
(ii) Subject to any periodic renewal requirements established by
the department under this section and subject to any applicable
compliance requirements under this chapter or other law, an ignition
interlock driver's license granted upon a suspension or revocation
under RCW 46.61.5055 or 46.20.3101 extends through the remaining
portion of any concurrent or consecutive suspension or revocation that
may be imposed as the result of administrative action and criminal
conviction arising out of the same incident.
(iii) The time period during which the person is licensed under
this section shall apply on a day-for-day basis toward satisfying the
period of time the ignition interlock device restriction is required
under RCW 46.20.720 and 46.61.5055. Beginning with incidents occurring
on or after September 1, 2011, when calculating the period of time for
the restriction under RCW 46.20.720(3), the department must also give
the person a day-for-day credit for the time period, beginning from the
date of the incident, during which the person kept an ignition
interlock device installed on all vehicles the person operates. For
the purposes of this subsection (1)(c)(iii), the term "all vehicles"
does not include vehicles that would be subject to the employer
exception under RCW 46.20.720(3).
(2) An applicant for an ignition interlock driver's license who
qualifies under subsection (1) of this section is eligible to receive
a license only if the applicant files satisfactory proof of financial
responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW.
(3) Upon receipt of evidence that a holder of an ignition interlock
driver's license granted under this subsection no longer has a
functioning ignition interlock device installed on all vehicles
operated by the driver, the director shall give written notice by
first-class mail to the driver that the ignition interlock driver's
license shall be canceled. If at any time before the cancellation goes
into effect the driver submits evidence that a functioning ignition
interlock device has been installed on all vehicles operated by the
driver, the cancellation shall be stayed. If the cancellation becomes
effective, the driver may obtain, at no additional charge, a new
ignition interlock driver's license upon submittal of evidence that a
functioning ignition interlock device has been installed on all
vehicles operated by the driver.
(4) A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the
application for an ignition interlock driver's license may request a
hearing as provided by rule of the department.
(5) The director shall cancel an ignition interlock driver's
license after receiving notice that the holder thereof has been
convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of its
restrictions, no longer meets the eligibility requirements, or has been
convicted of or found to have committed a separate offense or any other
act or omission that under this chapter would warrant suspension or
revocation of a regular driver's license. The department must give
notice of the cancellation as provided under RCW 46.20.245. A person
whose ignition interlock driver's license has been canceled under this
section may reapply for a new ignition interlock driver's license if he
or she is otherwise qualified under this section and pays the fee
required under RCW 46.20.380.
(6)(a) Unless costs are waived by the ignition interlock company or
the person is indigent under RCW 10.101.010, the applicant shall pay
the cost of installing, removing, and leasing the ignition interlock
device and shall pay an additional fee of twenty dollars per month.
Payments shall be made directly to the ignition interlock company. The
company shall remit the additional twenty dollar fee to the department.
(b) The department shall deposit the proceeds of the twenty dollar
fee into the ignition interlock device revolving account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only to administer and operate the
ignition interlock device revolving account program. The department
shall adopt rules to provide monetary assistance according to greatest
need and when funds are available.
(7) The department shall adopt rules to implement ignition
interlock licensing. The department shall consult with the
administrative office of the courts, the state patrol, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, ignition interlock
companies, and any other organization or entity the department deems
appropriate.
(8)(a) Any person licensed under this chapter who is convicted of
a violation of RCW 46.61.500 when the charge was originally filed as a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local
ordinance, may submit to the department an application for an ignition
interlock driver's license under this section.
(b) A person who does not have any driver's license under this
chapter, but who would otherwise be eligible under this section to
apply for an ignition interlock license, may submit to the department
an application for an ignition interlock license. The department may
require the person to take any driver's licensing examination under
chapter 46.20 RCW and may require the person to also apply and qualify
for a temporary restricted driver's license under RCW 46.20.391.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.20.720 and 2011 c 293 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court may order that after a period of suspension,
revocation, or denial of driving privileges, and for up to as long as
the court has jurisdiction, any person convicted of any offense
involving the use, consumption, or possession of alcohol while
operating a motor vehicle may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with
a functioning ignition interlock. The court shall establish a specific
calibration setting at which the interlock will prevent the vehicle
from being started. The court shall also establish the period of time
for which interlock use will be required.
(2) Under RCW 46.61.5055 and subject to the exceptions listed in
that statute, the court shall order any person convicted of a violation
of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance to
((apply for an ignition interlock driver's license from the department
under RCW 46.20.385 and to have)) comply with the rules and
requirements of the department regarding the installation and use of a
functioning ignition interlock device installed on all motor vehicles
operated by the person. The court shall order any person participating
in a deferred prosecution program under RCW 10.05.020 for a violation
of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance to have
a functioning ignition interlock device installed on all motor vehicles
operated by the person.
(3) The department shall require that, after any applicable period
of suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges, a person
may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition
interlock device if the person is convicted of a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local or out-of-state statute
or ordinance. The department shall require that a person may drive
only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock
device if the person is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.5249 or
46.61.500 and is required under RCW 46.61.5249(4) or 46.61.500(3) (a)
or (b) to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated
by the person.
The department may waive the requirement for the use of such a
device if it concludes that such devices are not reasonably available
in the local area. The installation of an ignition interlock device is
not necessary on vehicles owned, leased, or rented by a person's
employer and on those vehicles whose care and/or maintenance is the
temporary responsibility of the employer, and driven at the direction
of a person's employer as a requirement of employment during working
hours. The person must provide the department with a declaration
pursuant to RCW 9A.72.085 from his or her employer stating that the
person's employment requires the person to operate a vehicle owned by
the employer or other persons during working hours. However, when the
employer's vehicle is assigned exclusively to the restricted driver and
used solely for commuting to and from employment, the employer
exemption does not apply.
The ignition interlock device shall be calibrated to prevent the
motor vehicle from being started when the breath sample provided has an
alcohol concentration of 0.025 or more. Subject to the provisions of
subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the period of time of the
restriction will be no less than:
(a) For a person who has not previously been restricted under this
section, a period of one year;
(b) For a person who has previously been restricted under (a) of
this subsection, a period of five years;
(c) For a person who has previously been restricted under (b) of
this subsection, a period of ten years.
(4) A restriction imposed under subsection (3) of this section
shall remain in effect until the department receives a declaration from
the person's ignition interlock device vendor, in a form provided or
approved by the department, certifying that there have been none of the
following incidents in the four consecutive months prior to the date of
release:
(a) An attempt to start the vehicle with a breath alcohol
concentration of 0.04 or more;
(b) Failure to take or pass any required retest; or
(c) Failure of the person to appear at the ignition interlock
device vendor when required for maintenance, repair, calibration,
monitoring, inspection, or replacement of the device.
(5) For a person required to install an ignition interlock device
pursuant to RCW 46.61.5249(4) or 46.61.500(3), the period of time of
the restriction shall be for six months and shall be subject to
subsection (4) of this section.
(6) In addition to any other costs associated with the use of an
ignition interlock device imposed on the person restricted under this
section, the person shall pay an additional fee of twenty dollars per
month. Payments must be made directly to the ignition interlock
company. The company shall remit the additional twenty dollar fee to
the department to be deposited into the ignition interlock device
revolving account.

Sec. 10 RCW 46.20.745 and 2008 c 282 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ignition interlock device revolving account program is
created within the department to assist in covering the monetary costs
of installing, removing, and leasing an ignition interlock device, and
applicable licensing, for indigent persons who are required under RCW
46.20.385, 46.20.720, and 46.61.5055 to install an ignition interlock
device in all vehicles owned or operated by the person. For purposes
of this subsection, "indigent" has the same meaning as in RCW
10.101.010, as determined by the department.
(2) A pilot program is created within the ignition interlock device
revolving account program for the purpose of monitoring compliance by
persons required to use ignition interlock devices and by ignition
interlock companies and vendors.
(3) The department, the state patrol, and the Washington traffic
safety commission shall coordinate to establish a compliance pilot
program that will target at least one county from eastern Washington
and one county from western Washington, as determined by the
department, state patrol, and Washington traffic safety commission.
(4) At a minimum, the compliance pilot program shall:
(a) Review the number of ignition interlock devices that are
required to be installed in the targeted county and the number of
ignition interlock devices actually installed;
(b) Work to identify those persons who are not complying with
ignition interlock requirements or are repeatedly violating ignition
interlock requirements; and
(c) Identify ways to track compliance and reduce noncompliance.
(5) As part of monitoring compliance, the Washington traffic safety
commission shall also track recidivism for violations of RCW 46.61.502
and 46.61.504 by persons required to have an ignition interlock
driver's license under RCW 46.20.385 and 46.20.720.

Sec. 11 RCW 46.61.500 and 2011 c 293 s 4 and 2011 c 96 s 34 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who drives any vehicle in willful or wanton
disregard for the safety of persons or property is guilty of reckless
driving. Violation of the provisions of this section is a gross
misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for up to three hundred sixty-four days and by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars.
(2)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, the license or permit to
drive or any nonresident privilege of any person convicted of reckless
driving shall be suspended by the department for not less than thirty
days.
(b) When a reckless driving conviction is a result of a charge that
was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or
an equivalent local ordinance, the department shall grant credit on a
day-for-day basis for any portion of a suspension, revocation, or
denial already served under an administrative action arising out of the
same incident. During any period of suspension, revocation, or denial
due to a conviction for reckless driving as the result of a charge
originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, any
person who has obtained an ignition interlock driver's license under
RCW 46.20.385 may continue to drive a motor vehicle pursuant to the
provision of the ignition interlock driver's license without obtaining
a separate temporary restricted driver's license under RCW 46.20.391.
(3)(a) Except as provided under (b) of this subsection, a person
convicted of reckless driving who has one or more prior offenses as
defined in RCW 46.61.5055(14) within seven years shall be required,
under RCW 46.20.720, to install an ignition interlock device on all
vehicles operated by the person if the conviction is the result of a
charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502,
46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance.
(b) A person convicted of reckless driving shall be required, under
RCW 46.20.720, to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles
operated by the person if the conviction is the result of a charge that
was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or RCW 46.61.522
committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.

Sec. 12 RCW 46.61.5055 and 2011 c 293 s 7 and 2011 c 96 s 35 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as
follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than three
hundred sixty-four days. Twenty-four consecutive hours of the
imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds
that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the
court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based.
In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under
this subsection (1)(a)(i), the court may order not less than fifteen
days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of
electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which the
penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also
require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an
alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount
of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than three
hundred sixty-four days. Two consecutive days of the imprisonment may
not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition
of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to
the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the
mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection
(1)(b)(i), the court may order not less than thirty days of electronic
home monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home
monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of
alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as
follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than
three hundred sixty-four days and sixty days of electronic home
monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of sixty days
electronic home monitoring, the court may order at least an additional
four days in jail. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is
being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and sixty days of electronic
home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds
that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the
court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based;
and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than
three hundred sixty-four days and ninety days of electronic home
monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of ninety days
electronic home monitoring, the court may order at least an additional
six days in jail. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is
being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. Forty-five days of imprisonment and ninety days of
electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the
court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or
deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the
suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or
deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has two or three prior offenses within seven years shall be
punished as follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than
three hundred sixty-four days and one hundred twenty days of electronic
home monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of one hundred
twenty days of electronic home monitoring, the court may order at least
an additional eight days in jail. The offender shall pay for the cost
of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the
penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also
require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an
alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol
the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic
home monitoring. Ninety days of imprisonment and one hundred twenty
days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum
sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or
mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is
suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason for
granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor
more than three hundred sixty-four days and one hundred fifty days of
electronic home monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of
one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring, the court may
order at least an additional ten days in jail. The offender shall pay
for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality
where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court
may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device
include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount
of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment
and one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars
nor more than five thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars
of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(4) A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 shall be punished under chapter 9.94A RCW if:
(a) The person has four or more prior offenses within ten years; or
(b) The person has ever previously been convicted of:
(i) A violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(ii) A violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(iii) An out-of-state offense comparable to the offense specified
in (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection; or
(iv) A violation of RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6).
(5)(a) The court shall require any person convicted of a violation
of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance to
((apply for an ignition interlock driver's license from the department
and to have)) comply with the rules and requirements of the department
regarding the installation and use of a functioning ignition interlock
device installed on all motor vehicles operated by the person.
(b) ((The installation of an ignition interlock device is not
necessary on vehicles owned, leased, or rented by a person's employer
and on those vehicles whose care and/or maintenance is the temporary
responsibility of the employer, and driven at the direction of a
person's employer as a requirement of employment during working hours.
The person must provide the department with a declaration pursuant to
RCW 9A.72.085 from his or her employer stating that the person's
employment requires the person to operate a vehicle owned by the
employer or other persons during working hours.
(c) An ignition interlock device imposed under this section shall
be calibrated to prevent a motor vehicle from being started when the
breath sample provided has an alcohol concentration of 0.025 or more.
(d) The court may waive the requirement that a person apply for an
ignition interlock driver's license if the court makes a specific
finding in writing that:
(i) The person lives out-of-state and the devices are not
reasonably available in the person's local area;
(ii) The person does not operate a vehicle; or
(iii) The person is not eligible to receive an ignition interlock
driver's license under RCW 46.20.385 because the person is not a
resident of Washington, is a habitual traffic offender, has already
applied for or is already in possession of an ignition interlock
driver's license, has never had a driver's license, has been certified
under chapter 74.20A RCW as noncompliant with a child support order, or
is subject to any other condition or circumstance that makes the person
ineligible to obtain an ignition interlock driver's license.
(e) If a court finds that a person is not eligible to receive an
ignition interlock driver's license under this section, the court is
not required to make any further subsequent inquiry or determination as
to the person's eligibility.
(f))) If the court orders that a person refrain from consuming any
alcohol ((and requires the person to apply for an ignition interlock
driver's license, and the person states that he or she does not operate
a motor vehicle or the person is ineligible to obtain an ignition
interlock driver's license)), the court ((shall)) may order the person
to submit to alcohol monitoring through an alcohol detection
breathalyzer device, transdermal sensor device, or other technology
designed to detect alcohol in a person's system. ((Alcohol monitoring
ordered under this subsection must be for the period of the mandatory
license suspension or revocation.)) The person shall pay for the cost
of the monitoring, unless the court specifies that the cost of
monitoring will be paid with funds that are available from an
alternative source identified by the court. The county or municipality
where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost.
(((g) The period of time for which ignition interlock use is
required will be as follows:
(i) For a person who has not previously been restricted under this
section, a period of one year;
(ii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (g)(i)
of this subsection, a period of five years;
(iii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (g)(ii)
of this subsection, a period of ten years.
(h) Beginning with incidents occurring on or after September 1,
2011, when calculating the period of time for the restriction under RCW
46.20.720(3), the department must also give the person a day-for-day
credit for the time period, beginning from the date of the incident,
during which the person kept an ignition interlock device installed on
all vehicles the person operates. For the purposes of this subsection
(5)(h), the term "all vehicles" does not include vehicles that would be
subject to the employer exception under RCW 46.20.720(3).))
(6) If a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 committed the offense while a passenger under the age of
sixteen was in the vehicle, the court shall:
(a) In any case in which the installation and use of an interlock
or other device is not mandatory under RCW 46.20.720 or other law,
order the use of such a device for not less than sixty days following
the restoration of the person's license, permit, or nonresident driving
privileges; and
(b) In any case in which the installation and use of such a device
is otherwise mandatory, order the use of such a device for an
additional sixty days.
(7) In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the
limits allowed by this section, the court shall particularly consider
the following:
(a) Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was
responsible for injury or damage to another or another's property; and
(b) Whether at the time of the offense the person was driving or in
physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers.
(8) An offender punishable under this section is subject to the
alcohol assessment and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.
(9) The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a person
convicted of driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs must:
(a) If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if
for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
suspended or denied by the department for ninety days;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years;
(b) If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for one year;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for nine hundred days; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years; or
(c) If by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308, there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there have been no prior offenses within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for three years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more previous offenses within
seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years.
The department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for any
portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under
this subsection for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under
RCW 46.20.3101 arising out of the same incident.
For purposes of this subsection (9), the department shall refer to
the driver's record maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when determining the
existence of prior offenses.
(10) After expiration of any period of suspension, revocation, or
denial of the offender's license, permit, or privilege to drive
required by this section, the department shall place the offender's
driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW 46.20.355.
(11)(a) In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail
sentence required by this section, whenever the court imposes up to
three hundred sixty-four days in jail, the court shall also suspend but
shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not exceeding five
years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that include:
(i) Not driving a motor vehicle within this state without a valid
license to drive and proof of financial responsibility for the future;
(ii) not driving a motor vehicle within this state while having an
alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more within two hours after driving;
and (iii) not refusing to submit to a test of his or her breath or
blood to determine alcohol concentration upon request of a law
enforcement officer who has reasonable grounds to believe the person
was driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within
this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor. The court
may impose conditions of probation that include nonrepetition,
installation of an ignition interlock device on the probationer's motor
vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment, supervised probation, or other
conditions that may be appropriate. The sentence may be imposed in
whole or in part upon violation of a condition of probation during the
suspension period.
(b) For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under
(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection, the court shall order the
convicted person to be confined for thirty days, which shall not be
suspended or deferred.
(c) For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory
condition of probation imposed under this subsection, the license,
permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be suspended by the
court for thirty days or, if such license, permit, or privilege to
drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the finding
of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial
then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall
notify the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any
extension of a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this
subsection.
(12) A court may waive the electronic home monitoring requirements
of this chapter when:
(a) The offender does not have a dwelling, telephone service, or
any other necessity to operate an electronic home monitoring system;
(b) The offender does not reside in the state of Washington; or
(c) The court determines that there is reason to believe that the
offender would violate the conditions of the electronic home monitoring
penalty.
Whenever the mandatory minimum term of electronic home monitoring
is waived, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the
waiver and the facts upon which the waiver is based, and shall impose
an alternative sentence with similar punitive consequences. The
alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to, additional
jail time, work crew, or work camp.
Whenever the combination of jail time and electronic home
monitoring or alternative sentence would exceed three hundred sixty-four days, the offender shall serve the jail portion of the sentence
first, and the electronic home monitoring or alternative portion of the
sentence shall be reduced so that the combination does not exceed three
hundred sixty-four days.
(13) An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or
not a mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an
extraordinary medical placement by the jail administrator subject to
the standards and limitations set forth in RCW 9.94A.728(3).
(14) For purposes of this section and RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504:
(a) A "prior offense" means any of the following:
(i) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(ii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(iii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or a conviction
for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed in a reckless manner or with
the disregard for the safety of others if the conviction is the result
of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.520
committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(iv) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or a conviction
for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed in a reckless manner or with
the disregard for the safety of others if the conviction is the result
of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.522
committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(v) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or
9A.36.050 or an equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the
result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW
46.61.520 or 46.61.522;
(vi) An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have
been a violation of (a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this
subsection if committed in this state;
(vii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an
equivalent local ordinance; ((or))
(viii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local
ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred prosecution was
granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or
46.61.522; or
(ix) A deferred prosecution granted in another state for a
violation of driving or having physical control of a vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the out-of-state deferred prosecution is equivalent to the deferred prosecution
under chapter 10.05 RCW, including a requirement that the defendant
participate in a chemical dependency treatment program;
If a deferred prosecution is revoked based on a subsequent
conviction for an offense listed in this subsection (14)(a), the
subsequent conviction shall not be treated as a prior offense of the
revoked deferred prosecution for the purposes of sentencing;
(b) "Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within seven years before or after the arrest for the current
offense; and
(c) "Within ten years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within ten years before or after the arrest for the current
offense.

Sec. 13 RCW 46.61.5249 and 2011 c 293 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) A person is guilty of negligent driving in the first degree
if he or she operates a motor vehicle in a manner that is both
negligent and endangers or is likely to endanger any person or
property, and exhibits the effects of having consumed liquor or an
illegal drug or exhibits the effects of having inhaled or ingested any
chemical, whether or not a legal substance, for its intoxicating or
hallucinatory effects.
(b) It is an affirmative defense to negligent driving in the first
degree by means of exhibiting the effects of having consumed an illegal
drug that must be proved by the defendant by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the driver has a valid prescription for the drug
consumed, and has been consuming it according to the prescription
directions and warnings.
(c) Negligent driving in the first degree is a misdemeanor.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Negligent" means the failure to exercise ordinary care, and is
the doing of some act that a reasonably careful person would not do
under the same or similar circumstances or the failure to do something
that a reasonably careful person would do under the same or similar
circumstances.
(b) "Exhibiting the effects of having consumed liquor" means that
a person has the odor of liquor on his or her breath, or that by
speech, manner, appearance, behavior, lack of coordination, or
otherwise exhibits that he or she has consumed liquor, and either:
(i) Is in possession of or in close proximity to a container that
has or recently had liquor in it; or
(ii) Is shown by other evidence to have recently consumed liquor.
(c) "Exhibiting the effects of having consumed an illegal drug"
means that a person by speech, manner, appearance, behavior, lack of
coordination, or otherwise exhibits that he or she has consumed an
illegal drug and either:
(i) Is in possession of an illegal drug; or
(ii) Is shown by other evidence to have recently consumed an
illegal drug.
(d) "Exhibiting the effects of having inhaled or ingested any
chemical, whether or not a legal substance, for its intoxicating or
hallucinatory effects" means that a person by speech, manner,
appearance, behavior, or lack of coordination or otherwise exhibits
that he or she has inhaled or ingested a chemical and either:
(i) Is in possession of the canister or container from which the
chemical came; or
(ii) Is shown by other evidence to have recently inhaled or
ingested a chemical for its intoxicating or hallucinatory effects.
(e) "Illegal drug" means a controlled substance under chapter 69.50
RCW for which the driver does not have a valid prescription or that is
not being consumed in accordance with the prescription directions and
warnings, or a legend drug under chapter 69.41 RCW for which the driver
does not have a valid prescription or that is not being consumed in
accordance with the prescription directions and warnings.
(3) Any act prohibited by this section that also constitutes a
crime under any other law of this state may be the basis of prosecution
under such other law notwithstanding that it may also be the basis for
prosecution under this section.
(4) A person convicted of negligent driving in the first degree who
has one or more prior offenses as defined in RCW 46.61.5055(14) within
seven years shall be required, under RCW 46.20.720, to install an
ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person.

Sec. 14 RCW 46.61.540 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 287 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
The word "drugs", as used in RCW 46.61.500 through 46.61.535, shall
include but not be limited to those drugs and substances regulated by
chapters 69.41 and 69.50 RCW and any chemical inhaled or ingested for
its intoxicating or hallucinatory effects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As part of the state patrol's authority to provide standards
for certification, installation, repair, maintenance, monitoring,
inspection, and removal of ignition interlock devices, the state patrol
shall by rule establish a fee schedule and collect fees from ignition
interlock manufacturers, technicians, providers, and persons required
under RCW 46.20.385, 46.20.720, and 46.61.5055 to install an ignition
interlock device in all vehicles owned or operated by the person.
(2) Fees collected under this section must be deposited into the
highway safety account to be used solely to fund the Washington state
patrol impaired driving section projects.

Sec. 16 RCW 43.43.395 and 2010 c 268 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state patrol shall by rule provide standards for the
certification, installation, repair, maintenance, monitoring,
inspection, and removal of ignition interlock devices, as defined under
RCW 46.04.215, and equipment as outlined under this section, and may
inspect the records and equipment of manufacturers and vendors during
regular business hours for compliance with statutes and rules and may
suspend or revoke certification for any noncompliance. The state
patrol may only inspect ignition interlock devices in the vehicles of
customers for proper installation and functioning when installation is
being done at the vendors' place of business.
(2)(a) When a certified service provider or individual installer of
ignition interlock devices is found to be out of compliance, the
installation privileges of that certified service provider or
individual installer may be suspended or revoked until the certified
service provider or individual installer comes into compliance. During
any suspension or revocation period, the certified service provider or
individual installer is responsible for notifying affected customers of
any changes in their service agreement.
(b) A certified service provider or individual installer whose
certification is suspended or revoked for noncompliance has a right to
an administrative hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW to contest the
suspension or revocation, or both. For the administrative hearing, the
procedure and rules of evidence are as specified in chapter 34.05 RCW,
except as otherwise provided in this chapter. Any request for an
administrative hearing must be made in writing and must be received by
the state patrol within twenty days after the receipt of the notice of
suspension or revocation.
(3)(a) An ignition interlock device must employ fuel cell
technology. For the purposes of this subsection, "fuel cell
technology" consists of the following electrochemical method: An
electrolyte designed to oxidize the alcohol and release electrons to be
collected by an active electrode; a current flow is generated within
the electrode proportional to the amount of alcohol oxidized on the
fuel cell surface; and the electrical current is measured and reported
as breath alcohol concentration. Fuel cell technology is highly
specific for alcohols.
(b) When reasonably available in the area, as determined by the
state patrol, an ignition interlock device must employ technology
capable of taking a photo identification of the user giving the breath
sample and recording on the photo the time the breath sample was given.
(c) To be certified, an ignition interlock device must:
(i) Meet or exceed the minimum test standards according to rules
adopted by the state patrol. Only a notarized statement from a
laboratory that is certified by the international organization of
standardization and is capable of performing the tests specified will
be accepted as proof of meeting or exceeding the standards. The
notarized statement must include the name and signature of the person
in charge of the tests under the following statement:

"Two samples of (model name) , manufactured by (manufacturer)
were tested by (laboratory) certified by the Internal Organization of
Standardization. They do meet or exceed all specifications listed in
the Federal Register, Volume 71, Number 31 (57 FR 11772), Breath
Alcohol Ignition Interlock Devices (BAIID), NHTSA 2005-23470."; and

(ii) Be maintained in accordance with the rules and standards
adopted by the state patrol.

--- END ---