BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state derives
significant economic benefits from its marine industry. The
legislature also finds that the state's marine industry is recognized
worldwide as a model of excellence in ship and boat building,
especially for its innovation and quality. The legislature finds that
maintaining competitiveness in the marine industry is in the state's
best interest and depends on continued investment in research and
development to foster continued innovation and improvements in
technology. Therefore, the legislature intends to establish the
Washington center for marine innovation as a public-private entity to
promote research and development efforts to keep and grow the state's
competitive advantage in technological innovation and high quality
standards of production and repair.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The northwest center of excellence for
marine manufacturing and technology shall convene and staff a work
group to develop a public-private entity to be known as the Washington
center for marine innovation.
(2) The work group shall consist of voluntary participants of:
(a) Representatives of the marine industry including, but not
limited to, ship and boat manufacturing, shipyards and boatyards, ship
and boat suppliers, ship and boat repair and maintenance, advanced
materials and composite manufacturing, and biofuel and other
alternative fuel production;
(b) Representatives of institutions of higher education, including
research universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State
College, and community and technical colleges; and
(c) Representatives of public ports, economic development agencies,
and workforce development agencies.
(3) The work group shall design the center to:
(a) Facilitate research and development of innovative technologies
and processes for use in marine manufacturing and marine fuel
production, such as new composites, advanced materials, and biofuel and
other alternative fuels;
(b) Develop education and training related to new innovations for
the marine industry through conferences, workshops, seminars, and
technical reviews;
(c) Provide research and other job training opportunities for
students in the marine industry;
(d) Engage in other activities to ensure that technologies are
easily transferred and implemented in the marine industry; and
(e) Coordinate the center's activities with other institutions and
initiatives in the region.
(4) The work group shall provide a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature on the center's design and its
recommendations for any legislation needed to fully implement the
design, by December 1, 2012.
(5) The sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2013, from the recreation resources account to the state board
for community and technical colleges to be allocated to the northwest
center of excellence for marine manufacturing and technology for the
purposes of this act.

--- END ---