BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The definition in this section applies throughout this chapter
unless otherwise specifically provided.
"Mileage-based insurance" means private passenger automobile
insurance that:
(1) Has rates expected to be on average at least seventy percent
variable according to actual miles driven and not on estimated miles
driven; and
(2) Is available in mileage bands of not more than one thousand
miles each; and
(3) Discloses the variable portion of the premium in a manner that
is conspicuous to the consumer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An insurer authorized to sell automobile insurance may offer
mileage-based insurance.
(2) Within eighteen months of the adoption of this section the
commissioner shall adopt rules establishing standards for mileage-based
insurance offerings. The rules must include measures to protect the
privacy of drivers including, at a minimum:
(a) Prohibiting the collection of location information without:
(i) Disclosure to the insured that such information is being
collected; and
(ii) The insured's consent;
(b) Ensuring that individually identifiable usage information is
used or retained only:
(i) For purposes of determining premiums; or
(ii) As required by law; and
(c) Ensuring that individually identifiable usage information is
not disclosed to any third party without consent of the insured.
(3) By July 1, 2018, the commissioner shall evaluate the impact of
usage and/or mileage-based policies upon consumer privacy and shall
issue recommendations for additional measures to protect the privacy of
insured drivers if the commissioner determines additional measures are
needed to protect consumer privacy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
By July 31, 2013, and every other year thereafter, the commissioner
must provide information to the public regarding available options that
enable consumers to save money on insurance premiums by driving fewer
miles each year.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.18.140 and 2002 c 344 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The written instrument, in which a contract of insurance is set
forth, is the policy.
(2) A policy shall specify:
(a) The names of the parties to the contract. The insurer's name
shall be clearly shown in the policy.
(b) The subject of the insurance.
(c) The risk insured against.
(d) The time at which the insurance thereunder takes effect and the
period or distance, in the case of mileage-based insurance, during
which the insurance is to continue.
(e) A statement of the premium, and if other than life, disability,
or title insurance, the premium rate where applicable. In the case of
mileage-based insurance, the premium may also be stated as a rate per
increment of mileage.
(f) The conditions pertaining to the insurance.
(3) If under the contract the exact amount of premiums is
determinable only at termination of the contract, a statement of the
basis and rates upon which the final premium is to be determined and
paid shall be specified in the policy.
(4)(a) Periodic payment plans for private passenger automobile
insurance shall allow a specific day of the month for a due date for
payment of premiums. A late charge may not be required if payment is
received within five days of the date payment is due.
(b) The commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this subsection
and shall take no disciplinary action against an insurer until ninety
days after the effective date of the rule.
(5) This section shall not apply to surety insurance contracts.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.18.291 and 2003 c 248 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A contract of insurance predicated wholly or in part upon the
use of a private passenger automobile may not be terminated by
cancellation by the insurer until at least twenty days after mailing
written notice of cancellation to the named insured at the latest
address filed with the insurer by or on behalf of the named insured,
accompanied by the reason therefor. If cancellation is for nonpayment
of premium, or is within the first thirty days after the contract has
been in effect, at least ten days notice of cancellation, accompanied
by the reason therefor, shall be given. In case of a contract
evidenced by a written binder which has been delivered to the insured,
if the binder contains a clearly stated expiration date, no additional
notice of cancellation or nonrenewal is required.
(2)(a) A notice of cancellation by the insurer as to a contract of
insurance to which subsection (1) of this section applies is not valid
if sent more than sixty days after the contract has been in effect
unless:
(i) The named insured fails to discharge when due any of his or her
obligations in connection with the payment of premium for the policy or
any installment thereof, whether payable directly to the insurer or to
its agent or indirectly under any premium finance plan or extension of
credit; or
(ii) The driver's license of the named insured, or of any other
operator who customarily operates an automobile insured under the
policy, has been suspended, revoked, or cancelled during the policy
period or, if the policy is a renewal, during its policy period or the
one hundred eighty days immediately preceding the effective date of the
renewal policy.
(b) Modification by the insurer of automobile physical damage
coverage by the inclusion of a deductible not exceeding one hundred
dollars is not a cancellation of the coverage or of the policy.
(3) The substance of subsections (1) and (2)(a) of this section
must be set forth in each contract of insurance subject to the
provisions of subsection (1) of this section, and may be in the form of
an attached endorsement.
(4) A notice of cancellation of a policy that may be canceled only
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section is not effective unless the
reason therefor accompanies or is included in the notice of
cancellation.
(5) The requirements in subsections (1) through (4) of this section
regarding time frames do not apply to mileage-based insurance policies
that provide coverage only based on distance and not based on time.
The commissioner shall adopt rules that apply to cancellations of
mileage-based insurance policies.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.18.292 and 2008 c 217 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each insurer shall be required to renew any contract of
insurance subject to RCW 48.18.291 unless one of the following
situations exists:
(a) The insurer gives the named insured at least twenty days'
notice in writing as provided for in RCW 48.18.291(1), that it proposes
to refuse to renew the insurance contract upon its expiration date; and
sets forth therein the actual reason for refusing to renew; or
(b) At least twenty days prior to its expiration date, the insurer
has communicated its willingness to renew in writing to the named
insured, and has included therein a statement of the amount of the
premium or portion thereof required to be paid by the insured to renew
the policy, including the amount by which the premium or deductibles
have changed from the previous policy period, and the date by which
such payment must be made, and the insured fails to discharge when due
his or her obligation in connection with the payment of such premium or
portion thereof; or
(c) The insured's insurance producer has procured other coverage
acceptable to the insured prior to the expiration of the policy period.
(2) Renewal of a policy shall not constitute a waiver or estoppel
with respect to grounds for cancellation which existed before the
effective date of such renewal.
(3) "Renewal" or "to renew" means the issuance and delivery by an
insurer of a contract of insurance replacing at the end of the contract
period a contract of insurance previously issued and delivered by the
same insurer, or the issuance and delivery of a certificate or notice
extending the term of a contract beyond its policy period or term:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That any contract of insurance with a policy period
or term of six months or less whether or not made continuous for
successive terms upon the payment of additional premiums shall for the
purpose of RCW 48.18.291 through 48.18.297 be considered as if written
for a policy period or term of six months: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That any
policy written for a term longer than one year or any policy with no
fixed expiration date, shall, for the purpose of RCW 48.18.291 through
48.18.297, be considered as if written for successive policy periods or
terms of one year.
(4) On and after January 1, 1980, no policy of insurance subject to
RCW 48.18.291 shall be issued for a policy period or term of less than
six months.
(5) No insurer shall refuse to renew the liability and/or collision
coverage of an automobile insurance policy on the basis that an insured
covered by the policy of the insurer has submitted one or more claims
under the comprehensive, road service, or towing coverage of the
policy. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the nonrenewal of
comprehensive, road service, or towing coverage on the basis of one or
more claims submitted by an insured.
(6) The requirements in subsections (1) through (5) of this section
regarding time frames do not apply to mileage-based insurance policies
that provide coverage only based on distance and not based on time.
The commissioner shall adopt rules that apply to renewals of
mileage-based insurance policies.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.19.040 and 1994 c 131 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every insurer or rating organization shall, before using, file
with the commissioner every classifications manual, manual of rules and
rates, rating plan, rating schedule, minimum rate, class rate, and
rating rule, and every modification of any of the foregoing which it
proposes. The insurer need not so file any rate on individually rated
risks as described in subdivision (1) of RCW 48.19.030; except that any
such specific rate made by a rating organization shall be filed.
(2) Every such filing shall indicate the type and extent of the
coverage contemplated and must be accompanied by sufficient information
to permit the commissioner to determine whether it meets the
requirements of this chapter. An insurer or rating organization shall
offer in support of any filing:
(a) The experience or judgment of the insurer or rating
organization making the filing;
(b) An exhibit detailing the major elements of operating expense
for the types of insurance affected by the filing;
(c) An explanation of how investment income has been taken into
account in the proposed rates; and
(d) Any other information which the insurer or rating organization
deems relevant.
(3) If an insurer has insufficient loss experience to support its
proposed rates, it may submit loss experience for similar exposures of
other insurers or of a rating organization.
(4) Every such filing shall state its proposed effective date.
(5)(a) A filing made pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from
the provisions of RCW 48.02.120(3). However, the filing and all
supporting information accompanying it shall be open to public
inspection only after the filing becomes effective, except as provided
in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Information filing of mileage-based insurance, as defined in
section 1 of this act, about the variable portion of the rate based on
mileage driven is confidential and is exempt from public inspection.
(6) Where a filing is required no insurer shall make or issue an
insurance contract or policy except in accordance with its filing then
in effect, except as is provided by RCW 48.19.090.

--- END ---