BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2013, each school district board of directors that
grants high school diplomas shall adopt a policy that defines a high
school credit for purposes of meeting state and local graduation
requirements, in accordance with rules regarding credits adopted by the
state board of education. The Washington state school directors'
association, within available funds and in consultation with the state
board of education, shall develop a model policy that school districts
may choose to adopt to satisfy the policy requirements. The policy may
define a high school credit based on a seat-time definition,
demonstrated competencies, or some combination, as long as the policy
specifies the means by which the school district assures that students
have gained the knowledge and skills necessary to earn a credit.
(2) Each school district board of directors shall submit a copy of
its policy to the state board of education.
(3) The state board of education shall require school districts to
certify annually to the board that the district has a policy to define
a high school credit.

--- END ---