BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that children who have
high-quality early learning opportunities from birth through age five
are more likely to succeed throughout their K-12 education and beyond,
and are less likely to require grade-level retention and special
education. The legislature also finds that access to high-quality
preschool programs varies widely around the state based on many
factors, including program availability and family income. The
legislature further finds that a comprehensive preschool program such
as the early childhood education and assistance program that offers
health, nutrition, and family support services to at-risk children and
their families promotes improved educational, economic, and life
outcomes. The legislature further finds that a high-quality preschool
program that is offered to children from families of various income
levels can effectively provide developmental benefits to lower-income
children, while addressing gaps in availability for working class and
middle-class families who may not be able to afford high-quality
preschool. The legislature also finds that a key strategy in the
state's ten-year early learning plan is supporting parent choice and
school readiness by implementing voluntary preschool using a mixed
delivery system for all three and four year old children in Washington.
The legislature also finds that aligning targeted infant and toddler
opportunities, including high-quality child care, with preschool is
critical to the success of Washington's education system and to closing
the gap in student achievement.
Therefore, the legislature intends to create a more comprehensive,
voluntary, high-quality preschool program in Washington that, upon full
implementation, shall be available to all three and four year old
children in Washington. The Washington preschool program must align
with the early learning quality improvement systems and Washington's
longitudinal education data system. The legislature also intends to
concurrently phase in strategies to strengthen birth to three early
learning, as a component of the implementation of the new Washington
preschool program. The legislature supports a mixed delivery system
for early learning, including preschool, which allows parents to choose
high-quality providers in their own communities.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.141 and 2010 c 231 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning ((September 1, 2011, an early learning)) with the
2014-15 school year, the Washington preschool program shall be
implemented to provide voluntary preschool opportunities for children
three and four years of age ((shall be implemented)) according to the
funding and implementation plan in RCW 43.215.142. ((The program must
be a comprehensive program providing early childhood education and
family support, options for parental involvement, and health
information, screening, and referral services, as family need is
determined. Participation in the program is voluntary. On a space
available basis, the program may allow enrollment of children who are
not otherwise eligible by assessing a fee.))
(2) ((The first phase of the program shall be implemented by
utilizing the program standards and eligibility criteria in the early
childhood education and assistance program.
(3))) In establishing the Washington preschool program in this
section, the director shall adopt rules or program performance
standards for the following program components((, as appropriate and
necessary during the phased implementation of the program)):
(a) ((Minimum program standards, including lead teacher, assistant
teacher, and staff qualifications;
(b) Approval of program providers; and
(c) Accountability and adherence to performance standards)) All
three and four year old children are eligible to attend. However,
families with incomes that exceed two hundred fifty percent of the
federal poverty level shall be required to pay a copay at a rate
recommended by the department to the legislature, subject to approval
and inclusion in the biennial omnibus appropriations act. During the
initial implementation phases of the Washington preschool program, the
director shall establish guidelines for prioritizing eligible children;
(b) Transportation of children shall be an allowable expense of the
provider, but the provider shall not be required to provide
transportation for children participating in the program;
(c) A minimum of four hundred fifty classroom hours must be
provided each year;
(d) Lead teachers shall be required to have a bachelor's degree in
early childhood education or a related field or demonstrate equivalent
competencies, or a bachelor's degree and demonstrated competencies.
Assistant teachers shall be required to have an associate of arts
degree in early childhood education or a related field or demonstrate
equivalent competencies, or an associate of arts degree and
demonstrated competencies. These degree requirements may be phased in
consistent with section 4 of this act;
(e) Class size may not exceed eighteen children per class;
(f) The teacher:child ratio may not exceed one teacher to nine
children;
(g) Lead teachers shall be required to complete one hundred hours
of approved continuing education or equivalent academic credit every
five years; and
(h) Child health coordination services and family supports
consistent with RCW 43.215.405(6) must be provided.
(((4))) (3) The department has administrative responsibility for:
(a) Approving and contracting with providers according to rules
developed by the director under this section. The rules shall allow
public and private early learning providers to apply, providing that
the program curriculum is free from religious instruction, activities,
symbolism, and control or influence. Eligible providers may include,
but are not limited to, nonprofit, profit, and faith-based
organizations; licensed child care centers and family homes; private
schools; school districts; educational service districts; community and
technical colleges; local governments; tribes; and tribal
organizations. Upon expansion of the program, the department may
establish a panel with diverse representation to inform provider
selection. The panel may submit recommendations to the department
regarding provider selection criteria;
(b) Monitoring classroom quality;
(c) Requiring the administration of a child assessment of social-emotional, cognitive, and physical development that is directly aligned
with the kindergarten inventory established in RCW 28A.150.315(2);
(((b) In partnership with school districts, monitoring program
quality and assuring the program is responsive to the needs of eligible
children;
(c))) (d) Assuring that program providers work cooperatively with
school districts to coordinate the transition from preschool to
kindergarten so that children and their families are well-prepared and
supported; ((and
(d))) (e) Providing technical assistance to contracted providers
and other providers who wish to offer the Washington preschool program;
(f) Providing information regarding program and child outcome data
to the education data center created in RCW 43.41.400;
(g) Submitting a report annually to the governor, the
superintendent of public instruction, and the legislature that provides
information regarding the program. The report shall include child
outcomes, performance goals, the extent in which the goals are being
met, and the status of program implementation. The first report must
be submitted by December 1, 2015, and annually thereafter; and
(h) Making evaluation data from the Washington state institute for
public policy publicly available on the department's web site beginning
December 1, 2017, and each year thereafter.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.215.142 and 2010 c 231 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Funding for the Washington preschool program ((of early
learning)) established under this chapter must be appropriated to the
department. ((Allocations must be made on the basis of eligible
children enrolled with eligible providers.)) The quality education
council, with assistance from the department, must develop a formula to
recommend to the legislature to be used to allocate funds to program
providers.
(2) The Washington preschool program shall be implemented in
phases, so that full implementation is achieved in the ((2018-19))
2024-25 school year. As the Washington preschool program is
implemented, it is the intent of the legislature that additional
enrollment slots will be funded for the program and that existing
enrollment slots in the early childhood education and assistance
program will be transferred over time to this program.
(3) For the ((initial phase of the early learning program in school
years)) 2011-12 ((and)), 2012-13, and 2013-14 school years, the
legislature shall appropriate funding to the department for
((implementation of)) the early childhood education and assistance
program in an amount not less than the 2009-2011 enacted budget for the
early childhood education and assistance program. The appropriation
shall be sufficient to fund an equivalent number of slots as funded in
the 2009-2011 enacted budget. Funding for the Washington preschool
program shall not supplant or divert funding for subsidized child care
programs, including but not limited to the working connections child
care or seasonal child care programs.
(4) Beginning in the ((2013-14)) 2014-15 school year, additional
funding for the Washington preschool program must be phased in
beginning in elementary school ((districts)) enrollment areas, as
defined by school districts, providing all-day kindergarten programs
under RCW 28A.150.315 and where there is lower than average access to
head start or the early childhood education and assistance program.
(5) Through the 2017-18 school year, funding shall continue to be
phased in incrementally each year ((until)) based on the goal of full
statewide implementation of the ((early learning)) Washington preschool
program ((is achieved)) in the ((2018-19)) 2024-25 school year, at
which time any eligible child shall be entitled to be enrolled in the
program if the program is fully funded. However, for the 2018-19
school year, and thereafter, further implementation of the Washington
preschool program requires explicit statutory authorization.
(6) The department and the office of financial management shall
annually review the caseload forecasts for the program and, beginning
December 1, 2012, and annually thereafter, report to the governor and
the appropriate committees of the legislature with recommendations for
phasing in additional funding necessary to achieve statewide
implementation of the Washington preschool program in the ((2018-19))
2024-25 school year.
(7) ((School districts and approved community-based early learning
providers may contract with the department to provide services under
the program.)) The department shall collaborate with school districts,
community-based providers, and educational service districts to promote
an adequate supply of approved providers and must encourage and support
the inclusion of family home child care and child care centers in the
delivery of high-quality preschool programs.
(8) The department may adopt rules to implement this section and
RCW 43.215.141.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
The early learning advisory council shall establish a subcommittee
to guide the development and implementation of the Washington preschool
program created in RCW 43.215.141. The subcommittee's duties include,
but are not limited to:
(1) Establishing criteria and a process for lead and assistant
teachers to demonstrate the required competencies or equivalent
competencies;
(2) Establishing criteria and a process for approving continuing
education and academic credits;
(3) Establishing qualifications and continuing education
requirements for other staff in addition to lead and assistant
teachers; and
(4) Developing a recommended schedule to phase in degree and
equivalent competency requirements provided in RCW 43.215.141(2)(d) for
lead and assistant teachers. The subcommittee shall present its
initial recommendations to the early learning advisory council and the
legislature by December 2012, and final recommendations in December
2013. When developing the schedule, the subcommittee must consult and
collaborate with other entities and stakeholders including, but not
limited to: The professional educator standards board, state board for
community and technical colleges, higher education coordinating board,
the nongovernmental private-public partnership under this chapter,
tribes, service employees international union local 925, child care
centers, early childhood education and assistance program and head
start associations, and the Puget Sound educational service district to
determine:
(a) Capacity at higher education institutions to implement degree
requirements;
(b) Availability of financial aid to ensure access to degree
requirements;
(c) Availability of classes for nontraditional students including
online, evening, and weekend offerings;
(d) Availability of additional resources to meet the unique needs
of tribes, family child care providers, and other nontraditional care
including, but not limited to, mentoring, coaching, or other resources
to ensure all child care providers have access to ongoing education
opportunities;
(e) Additional pathways to demonstrate competencies, including
consideration of the quality rating and improvement system ratings as
a mechanism to demonstrate high-quality services eligible to apply for
contracts for the Washington preschool program; and
(f) Development of a teacher compensation model.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The early learning advisory council shall establish a preschool
readiness subcommittee, which shall be cochaired by the department and
the nongovernmental private-public partnership established in RCW
43.215.070. The subcommittee shall be composed of at least one
representative from each of the following:
(a) The early learning advisory council;
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(c) The department of social and health services;
(d) The department of early learning;
(e) The nongovernmental private-public partnership created in RCW
43.215.070; and
(f) Additional stakeholders with expertise in birth-to-three policy
and programs and quality child care, as designated by the early
learning advisory council.
(2) The subcommittee may convene advisory subgroups on specific
topics as necessary to assure participation and input from a broad
array of diverse stakeholders.
(3) The subcommittee shall be monitored and overseen by the early
learning advisory council created in RCW 43.215.090.
(4) The subcommittee shall develop a preschool readiness proposal,
to further develop the Washington State Birth to 3 Plan. The proposal
must identify and prioritize supports and interventions in the existing
Birth to 3 Plan, and develop a financing plan to fund prioritized
services concurrent with the phased implementation of the Washington
preschool program. The proposal must be submitted to the legislature
no later than December 15, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The Washington state institute for public
policy shall conduct an outcome evaluation of the Washington preschool
program. The evaluation shall examine student outcomes including
kindergarten readiness, special education placements, grade repetition,
academic achievement, and a return-on-investment analysis. The
department of early learning, office of superintendent of public
instruction, and education research and data center shall provide the
institute with the necessary data to conduct the evaluation. The
institute shall submit the results of the evaluation to the relevant
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2017.
The Washington state institute for public policy shall provide updates
on the student outcomes annually thereafter on December 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 43.215.140 (Definitions) and 2010 c 231
s 2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act may be known and cited as the
high-quality early learning act.

--- END ---