BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.04A.090 and 2005 c 433 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person initiates an arbitration proceeding by giving notice
in a record to the other parties to the agreement to arbitrate in the
agreed manner between the parties or, in the absence of agreement, by
mail certified or registered, return receipt requested and obtained, or
by service as authorized for the initiation of a civil action. The
notice must describe the nature of the controversy and the remedy
sought.
(2) Unless a person interposes an objection as to lack or
insufficiency of notice under RCW 7.04A.150(3) not later than the
commencement of the arbitration hearing, the person's appearance at the
hearing waives any objection to lack of or insufficiency of notice.
(3) A claim sought to be arbitrated is subject to the same
limitations of time for the commencement of actions as if the claim had
been asserted in a court.

--- END ---