BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that educators deserve
to be recognized for their ability to help students learn, and students
deserve the opportunity to learn from the most competent teachers.
Because the loss of any teachers has the potential to impact student
learning, there is an urgent need to conduct workforce reductions in a
way that retains the most effective teachers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
(1) School board policies or collective bargaining agreements that
specify procedures and criteria for identifying certificated
instructional staff to receive a notice of nonrenewal of contract under
RCW 28A.405.210 or 28A.405.220 due to enrollment decline or loss of
revenue must provide that the contracts of classroom teachers who
received comparatively lower evaluation ratings, as described in RCW
28A.405.100, are nonrenewed before the contracts of classroom teachers
who received comparatively higher evaluation ratings are nonrenewed.
(2) School board policies or collective bargaining agreements that
outline recall rights for certificated instructional staff must provide
for the recall of classroom teachers in the reverse order that
contracts were nonrenewed under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Nothing in this section may be construed as altering the terms,
conditions, or practices contained in any collective bargaining
agreement or employment contract in effect on the effective date of
this section until the expiration date of the agreement or contract.
(4) All collective bargaining agreements and other contracts
entered into between a school district and an employee bargaining unit
or an employee after the effective date of this section, as well as
bargaining agreements existing on the effective date of this section
but renewed or extended after the effective date of this section, must
be consistent with this section.

--- END ---