BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. It is the intent of this chapter to
promote open competition and transparency for all contracts for goods
and services entered into by state agencies, unless specifically
exempted under this chapter. It is further the intent of this chapter
to centralize within one agency the authority and responsibility for
the development and oversight of policies related to state procurement
and contracting. To ensure the highest ethical standards, proper
accounting for contract expenditures, and for ease of public review, it
is further the intent to centralize the location of information about
state procurements and contracts. It is also the intent of the
legislature to provide state agency contract data to the public in a
searchable manner.
In addition, the legislature intends that the state develop
procurement policies, procedures, and materials that encourage and
facilitate state agency purchase of goods and services from Washington
small businesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means any state office or activity of the executive
and judicial branches of state government, including state agencies,
departments, offices, divisions, boards, commissions, institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, and correctional and
other types of institutions.
(2) "Bid" means an offer, proposal, or quote for goods or services
in response to a solicitation issued for such goods or services by the
department or an agency of Washington state government.
(3) "Bidder" means an individual or entity who submits a bid,
quotation, or proposal in response to a solicitation issued for such
goods or services by the department or an agency of Washington state
government.
(4) "Businesses owned and operated by persons with disabilities"
means any for-profit business certified under chapter 39.19 RCW as
being owned and controlled by persons who have been either:
(a) Determined by the department of social and health services to
have a developmental disability, as defined in RCW 71A.10.020;
(b) Determined by an agency established under Title I of the
federal vocational rehabilitation act to be or have been eligible for
vocational rehabilitation services;
(c) Determined by the federal social security administration to be
or have been eligible for either social security disability insurance
or supplemental security income; or
(d) Determined by the United States department of veterans affairs
to be or have been eligible for vocational rehabilitation services due
to service-connected disabilities, under 38 U.S.C. Sec. 3100 et seq.
(5) "Client services" means services provided directly to agency
clients including, but not limited to, medical and dental services,
employment and training programs, residential care, and subsidized
housing.
(6) "Community rehabilitation program of the department of social
and health services" means any entity that:
(a) Is registered as a nonprofit corporation with the secretary of
state; and
(b) Is recognized by the department of social and health services,
division of vocational rehabilitation as eligible to do business as a
community rehabilitation program.
(7) "Competitive solicitation" means a documented formal process
providing an equal and open opportunity to bidders and culminating in
a selection based on predetermined criteria.
(8) "Contractor" means an individual or entity awarded a contract
with an agency to perform a service or provide goods.
(9) "Debar" means to prohibit a contractor, individual, or other
entity from submitting a bid, having a bid considered, or entering into
a state contract during a specified period of time as set forth in a
debarment order.
(10) "Department" means the department of enterprise services.
(11) "Director" means the director of the department of enterprise
services.
(12) "Estimated useful life" of an item means the estimated time
from the date of acquisition to the date of replacement or disposal,
determined in any reasonable manner.
(13) "Goods" means products, materials, supplies, or equipment
provided by a contractor.
(14) "In-state business" means a business that has its principal
office located in Washington.
(15) "Life-cycle cost" means the total cost of an item to the state
over its estimated useful life, including costs of selection,
acquisition, operation, maintenance, and where applicable, disposal, as
far as these costs can reasonably be determined, minus the salvage
value at the end of its estimated useful life.
(16) "Master contracts" means a contract for specific goods or
services, or both, that is solicited and established by the department
in accordance with procurement laws and rules on behalf of and for
general use by agencies as specified by the department.
(17) "Purchase" means the acquisition of goods or services,
including the leasing or renting of goods.
(18) "Services" means labor, work, analysis, or similar activities
provided by a contractor to accomplish a specific scope of work.
(19) "Small business" means an in-state business, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that:
(a) Certifies, under penalty of perjury, that it is owned and
operated independently from all other businesses and has either:
(i) Fifty or fewer employees; or
(ii) A gross revenue of less than seven million dollars annually as
reported on its federal income tax return or its return filed with the
department of revenue over the previous three consecutive years; or
(b) Is certified with the office of women and minority business
enterprises under chapter 39.19 RCW.
(20) "Microbusiness" means any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that:
(a) Is owned and operated independently from all other businesses; and
(b) has a gross revenue of less than one million dollars annually as
reported on its federal tax return or on its return filed with the
department of revenue.
(21) "Minibusiness" means any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that:
(a) Is owned and operated independently from all other businesses; and
(b) has a gross revenue of less than three million dollars, but one
million dollars or more annually as reported on its federal tax return
or on its return filed with the department of revenue.
(22) "Sole source" means a contractor providing goods or services
of such a unique nature or sole availability at the location required
that the contractor is clearly and justifiably the only practicable
source to provide the goods or services.
(23) "Sweatshop labor" means all work or service extracted from or
performed by any person in violation of more than one law of the
country of manufacture governing wages, employee benefits, occupational
health, occupational safety, nondiscrimination, or freedom of
association.
(24) "Washington grown" has the definition in RCW 15.64.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 ETHICS IN PUBLIC CONTRACTING. (1)(a) A
state officer or employee of an agency who seeks to acquire goods or
services or who participates in those contractual matters is subject to
the requirements in RCW 42.52.150.
(b) A contractor who contracts with an agency to perform services
related to the acquisition of goods and services for or on behalf of
the state is subject to the requirements in RCW 42.52.150.
(2) No person or entity who seeks or may seek a contract with a
state agency may give, loan, transfer, or deliver to any person
something of economic value for which receipt of such item would cause
a state officer or employee to be in a violation of RCW 42.52.040,
42.52.110, 42.52.120, 42.52.140, or 42.52.150.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RELEASE OF BID DOCUMENTS. (1) Records
related to state procurements are public records subject to disclosure
to the extent provided in chapter 42.56 RCW except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Bid submissions and bid evaluations are exempt from disclosure
until the agency announces the apparent successful bidder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 PROHIBITION ON CERTAIN CONTRACTS. Agencies
that are authorized or directed to establish a board, commission,
council, committee, or other similar group made up of volunteers to
advise the activities and management of the agency are prohibited from
entering into contracts with any or all volunteer members as a means to
reimburse or otherwise pay members of such board, commission, council,
committee, or other similar group for the work performed as part of the
entity, except where payment is specifically authorized by statute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 PROVISION OF GOODS AND SERVICES. (1) In
addition to the powers and duties provided in chapter 43.19 RCW, the
department shall make available goods and services to support state
agencies, and may enter into agreements with any other local or federal
governmental agency or entity or a public benefit nonprofit
organization, in compliance with RCW 39.34.055, and any tribes located
in the state, to furnish such products and services as deemed
appropriate by both parties.
(2) The department shall ensure full cost recovery from state
agencies, other local or federal governmental agency or entity, public
benefit nonprofit organizations, or any tribes located in the state,
for activities performed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
Cost recovery must ensure that the department is reimbursed its full
cost for providing the goods and services furnished as determined by
the department. Cost recovery may be collected through the state
agency, other governmental entity, nonprofit organization, or through
the contractor.
(3) All governmental entities of this state may enter into
agreements under this section with the department, unless otherwise
prohibited.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 COOPERATIVE PURCHASING AUTHORIZED. (1) On
behalf of the state, the department may participate in, sponsor,
conduct, or administer a cooperative purchasing agreement for the
procurement of any goods or services with one or more states, state
agencies, local governments, local government agencies, federal
agencies, or tribes located in the state, in accordance with an
agreement entered into between the participants. The cooperative
purchasing may include, but is not limited to, joint or multiparty
contracts between the entities, and master contracts or convenience
contracts that are made available to other public agencies.
(2) All cooperative purchasing conducted under this chapter must be
through contracts awarded through a competitive solicitation process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 CONVENIENCE CONTRACT. A convenience
contract is a contract for specific goods or services, or both, that is
solicited and established by the department in accordance with
procurement laws and rules on behalf of and for use by a specific
agency or group of agencies as needed from time to time. A convenience
contract is not available for general use and may only be used as
specified by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 PROCUREMENT AGENCY. (1) The director is
responsible for the development and oversight of policy for the
procurement of goods and services by all state agencies under this
chapter. When establishing policies, standards, and procedures, the
director shall account for differentiation in procurement practices and
needs among state agencies and strive to establish policies, standards,
and procedures that promote greater efficiency in procurement.
(2) The director is authorized to adopt rules, policies, and
guidelines governing the procurement, contracting, and contract
management of any and all goods and services procured by state agencies
under this chapter.
(3) The director or designee is the sole authority to enter into
master contracts on behalf of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 DIRECTOR'S DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
REGARDING PROCUREMENT. The director shall:
(1) Establish overall state policies, standards, and procedures
regarding the procurement of goods and services by all state agencies;
(2) Develop policies and standards for the use of credit cards or
similar methods to make purchases;
(3) Establish procurement processes for information technology
goods and services, using technology standards and policies established
by the office of the chief information officer under chapter 43.41A
RCW;
(4) Enter into contracts or delegate the authority to enter into
contracts on behalf of the state to facilitate the purchase, lease,
rent, or otherwise acquire all goods and services and equipment needed
for the support, maintenance, and use of all state agencies, except as
provided in section 11 of this act;
(5) Have authority to delegate to agencies authorization to
purchase goods and services. The authorization must specify
restrictions as to dollar amount or to specific types of goods and
services, based on a risk assessment process developed by the
department. Acceptance of the purchasing authorization by an agency
does not relieve the agency from conformance with this chapter or from
policies established by the director. Also, the director may not
delegate to a state agency the authorization to purchase goods and
services if the agency is not in substantial compliance with overall
procurement policies as established by the director;
(6) Develop procurement policies and procedures, such as unbundled
contracting and subcontracting, that encourage and facilitate the
purchase of goods and services from Washington small businesses,
microbusinesses, and minibusinesses, and minority and women-owned
businesses to the maximum extent practicable and consistent with
international trade agreement commitments;
(7) Develop and implement an enterprise system for electronic
procurement;
(8) Provide for a commodity classification system and provide for
the adoption of goods and services commodity standards;
(9) Establish overall state policy for compliance by all agencies
regarding:
(a) Food procurement procedures and materials that encourage and
facilitate the purchase of Washington grown food by state agencies and
institutions to the maximum extent practicable and consistent with
international trade agreement commitments; and
(b) Policies requiring all food contracts to include a plan to
maximize to the extent practicable and consistent with international
trade agreement commitments the availability of Washington grown food
purchased through the contract;
(10) Develop guidelines and criteria for the purchase of vehicles,
high gas mileage vehicles, and alternate vehicle fuels and systems,
equipment, and materials, that reduce overall energy-related costs and
energy use by the state, including investigations into all
opportunities to aggregate the purchasing of clean technologies by
state and local governments, and including the requirement that new
passenger vehicles purchased by the state meet the minimum standards
for passenger automobile fuel economy established by the United States
secretary of transportation pursuant to the energy policy and
conservation act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 2002); and
(11) Develop and enact rules to implement the provisions of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 EXEMPTIONS FROM CHAPTER. (1) The
provisions of this chapter do not apply in any manner to the operation
of the state legislature except as requested by the legislature.
(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the contracting
for services and activities that are necessary to establish, operate,
or manage the state data center, including architecture, design,
engineering, installation, and operation of the facility, that are
approved by the technology services board or the acquisition of
proprietary software and information technology services necessary for
or part of the provision of services offered by the consolidated
technology services agency.
(3) Primary authority for the purchase of specialized equipment,
and instructional and research material, for their own use rests with
the institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(4) Universities operating hospitals with approval from the
director, as the agent for state hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010,
and for health care programs provided in state correctional
institutions as defined in RCW 72.65.010(3) and veterans' institutions
as defined in RCW 72.36.010 and 72.36.070, may make purchases for
hospital operation by participating in contracts for materials,
supplies, and equipment entered into by nonprofit cooperative hospital
group purchasing organizations if documented to be more cost-effective.
(5) Primary authority for the purchase of materials, supplies, and
equipment, for resale to other than public agencies, rests with the
state agency concerned.
(6) The authority for the purchase of insurance and bonds rests
with the risk manager under RCW 43.19.769, except for institutions of
higher education that choose to exercise independent purchasing
authority under RCW 28B.10.029.
(7) The authority to purchase interpreter services and interpreter
brokerage services on behalf of limited-English speaking or sensory-impaired applicants and recipients of public assistance rests with the
department of social and health services and the health care authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 TRAINING. (1) The department must provide
expertise and training on best practices for state procurement.
(2) The department must establish either training or certification
programs, or both, to ensure consistency in procurement practices for
employees authorized to perform procurement functions under the
provisions of this chapter. When establishing training or
certification programs, the department may approve existing training or
certification programs at state agencies. When establishing programs
or approving existing programs, the department shall work with agencies
with existing training programs to ensure coordination and minimize
additional costs associated with training requirements.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2013, state agencies must require agency
employees responsible for developing, executing, or managing
procurements or contracts, or both, to complete department-approved
training or certification programs, or both. Beginning July 1, 2015,
no agency employee may execute or manage contracts unless the employee
has met the training or certification requirements or both as set by
the department. Any request for exception to this requirement must be
submitted to the director for approval before the employee or group of
employees executes or manages contracts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 COMPETITIVE SOLICITATION. (1) Insofar as
practicable, all purchases of or contracts for goods and services must
be based on a competitive solicitation process. This process may
include electronic or web-based solicitations, bids, and signatures.
This requirement also applies to procurement of goods and services
executed by agencies under delegated authority granted in accordance
with section 10 of this act or under RCW 28B.10.029.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies to contract amendments
that substantially change the scope of work of the original contract or
substantially increase the value of the original contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 COMPETITIVE SOLICITATION--EXCEPTIONS. All
contracts must be entered into pursuant to competitive solicitation,
except for:
(1) Emergency contracts;
(2) Sole source contracts that comply with the provisions of
section 16 of this act;
(3) Direct buy purchases, as designated by the director. The
director shall establish policies to define criteria for direct buy
purchases. These criteria may be adjusted to accommodate special
market conditions and to promote market diversity for the benefit of
the citizens of the state of Washington;
(4) Purchases involving special facilities, services, or market
conditions, in which instances of direct negotiation is in the best
interest of the state;
(5) Purchases from master contracts established by the department
or an agency authorized by the department;
(6) Client services contracts;
(7) Other specific contracts or classes or groups of contracts
exempted from the competitive solicitation process when the director
determines that a competitive solicitation process is not appropriate
or cost-effective;
(8) Off-contract purchases of Washington grown food when such food
is not available from Washington sources through an existing contract.
However, Washington grown food purchased under this subsection must be
of an equivalent or better quality than similar food available through
the contract and must be able to be paid from the agency's existing
budget. This requirement also applies to purchases and contracts for
purchases executed by state agencies, including institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, under delegated authority
granted in accordance with this chapter or under RCW 28B.10.029;
(9) Contracts awarded to companies that furnish a service where the
tariff is established by the utilities and transportation commission or
other public entity;
(10) Intergovernmental agreements awarded to any governmental
entity, whether federal, state, or local and any department, division,
or subdivision thereof;
(11) Contracts for services that are necessary to the conduct of
collaborative research if the use of a specific contractor is mandated
by the funding source as a condition of granting funds;
(12) Contracts for architectural and engineering services as
defined in RCW 39.80.020, which shall be entered into under chapter
39.80 RCW;
(13) Contracts for the employment of expert witnesses for the
purposes of litigation; and
(14) Contracts for bank supervision authorized under RCW 30.38.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 EMERGENCY PURCHASES. (1) An agency may
make emergency purchases as defined in subsection (3) of this section.
When an emergency purchase is made, the agency head shall submit
written notification of the purchase within three business days of the
purchase to the director. This notification must contain a description
of the purchase, a description of the emergency and the circumstances
leading up to the emergency, and an explanation of why the
circumstances required an emergency purchase.
(2) Emergency contracts must be submitted to the department and
made available for public inspection within three working days
following the commencement of work or execution of the contract,
whichever occurs first.
(3) As used in this section, "emergency" means a set of unforeseen
circumstances beyond the control of the agency that either:
(a) Present a real, immediate, and extreme threat to the proper
performance of essential functions; or
(b) May reasonably be expected to result in material loss or damage
to property, bodily injury, or loss of life, if immediate action is not
taken.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 SOLE SOURCE CONTRACTS. (1) Agencies must
submit sole source contracts to the department and make the contracts
available for public inspection not less than ten working days before
the proposed starting date of the contract. Agencies must provide
documented justification for sole source contracts to the department
when the contract is submitted, and must include evidence that the
agency posted the contract opportunity at a minimum on the state's
enterprise vendor registration and bid notification system.
(2) The department must approve sole source contracts before any
such contract becomes binding and before any services may be performed
or goods provided under the contract. These requirements shall also
apply to all sole source contracts except as otherwise exempted by the
director.
(3) The director may provide an agency an exemption from the
requirements of this section for a contract or contracts. Requests for
exemptions must be submitted to the director in writing.
(4) Contracts awarded by institutions of higher education from
nonstate funds are exempt from the requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 NOTIFICATIONS. (1) Agencies must provide
public notice for all competitive solicitations. Agencies must post
all contract opportunities on the state's enterprise vendor
registration and bid notification system. In addition, agencies may
notify contractors and potential bidders by sending notices by mail,
electronic transmission, newspaper advertisements, or other means as
may be appropriate.
(2) Agencies should try to anticipate changes in a requirement
before the bid submittal date and to provide reasonable notice to all
prospective bidders of any resulting modification or cancellation. If,
in the opinion of the agency, it is not possible to provide reasonable
notice, the submittal date for receipt of bids may be postponed and all
bidders notified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 AWARD. (1)(a) After bids that are
submitted in response to a competitive solicitation process are
reviewed by the awarding agency, the awarding agency may:
(i) Reject all bids and rebid or cancel the competitive
solicitation;
(ii) Request best and final offers from responsive and responsible
bidders; or
(iii) Award the purchase or contract to the lowest responsive and
responsible bidder.
(b) The agency may award one or more contracts from a competitive
solicitation.
(2) In determining whether the bidder is a responsible bidder, the
agency must consider the following elements:
(a) The ability, capacity, and skill of the bidder to perform the
contract or provide the service required;
(b) The character, integrity, reputation, judgment, experience, and
efficiency of the bidder;
(c) Whether the bidder can perform the contract within the time
specified;
(d) The quality of performance of previous contracts or services;
(e) The previous and existing compliance by the bidder with laws
relating to the contract or services; and
(f) Such other information as may be secured having a bearing on
the decision to award the contract.
(3) In determining the lowest responsive and responsible bidder, an
agency may consider best value criteria, including but not limited to:
(a) Whether the bid satisfies the needs of the state as specified
in the solicitation documents;
(b) Whether the bid encourages diverse contractor participation;
(c) Whether the bid provides competitive pricing, economies, and
efficiencies;
(d) Whether the bid considers human health and environmental
impacts;
(e) Whether the bid appropriately weighs cost and noncost
considerations; and
(f) Life-cycle cost.
(4) The solicitation document must clearly set forth the
requirements and criteria that the agency will apply in evaluating bid
submissions.
(5) The awarding agency may at its discretion reject the bid of any
contractor who has failed to perform satisfactorily on a previous
contract with the state.
(6) After reviewing all bid submissions, an agency may enter into
negotiations with the lowest responsive and responsible bidder in order
to determine if the bid may be improved. An agency may not use this
negotiation opportunity to permit a bidder to change a nonresponsive
bid into a responsive bid.
(7) The procuring agency must enter into the state's enterprise
vendor and bid notification system the name of each bidder and an
indication as to the successful bidder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 COMPLAINT AND PROTEST PROCESS. (1) All
agencies that have original or delegated procurement authority for
goods or services must have a clear and transparent complaint process.
The complaint process must provide for the complaint to be submitted
and response provided before the deadline for bid submissions.
(2) All agencies that have original or delegated procurement
authority for goods or services must have a clear and transparent
protest process. The protest process must include a protest period
after the apparent successful bidder is announced but before the
contract is signed.
(3) The director may grant authority for an agency to sign a
contract before the protest process is completed due to exigent
circumstances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 PROCUREMENT MANAGEMENT. (1) The department
must adopt uniform policies and procedures for the effective and
efficient management of contracts by all state agencies. The policies
and procedures must, at a minimum, include:
(a) Precontract procedures for selecting potential contractors
based on their qualifications and ability to perform;
(b) Model complaint and protest procedures;
(c) Alternative dispute resolution processes;
(d) Incorporation of performance measures and measurable benchmarks
in contracts;
(e) Model contract terms to ensure contract performance and
compliance with state and federal standards;
(f) Executing contracts using electronic signatures;
(g) Criteria for contract amendments;
(h) Postcontract procedures;
(i) Procedures and criteria for terminating contracts for cause or
otherwise; and
(j) Any other subject related to effective and efficient contract
management.
(2) An agency may not enter into a contract under which the
contractor could charge additional costs to the agency, the department,
the joint legislative audit and review committee, or the state auditor
for access to data generated under the contract. A contractor under
such a contract must provide access to data generated under the
contract to the contracting agency, the joint legislative audit and
review committee, and the state auditor.
(3) To the extent practicable, agencies should enter into
performance-based contracts. Performance-based contracts identify
expected deliverables and performance measures or outcomes.
Performance-based contracts also use appropriate techniques, which may
include but are not limited to, either consequences or incentives or
both to ensure that agreed upon value to the state is received.
Payment for goods and services under performance-based contracts should
be contingent on the contractor achieving performance outcomes.
(4) An agency and contractor may execute a contract using
electronic signatures.
(5) As used in subsection (2) of this section, "data" includes all
information that supports the findings, conclusions, and
recommendations of the contractor's reports, including computer models
and the methodology for those models.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 SWEAT-FREE PROCUREMENT POLICY. (1) The
department shall establish a sweat-free procurement policy and code of
conduct that provides that apparel, garments and corresponding
accessories, equipment, materials, and supplies purchased by state
agencies be produced in workplaces free of sweatshop conditions.
(2) Every contract entered into by any state agency for the
procurement of apparel, garments or corresponding accessories,
equipment, materials, or supplies, other than procurement related to a
public works contract, shall require that a contractor certify that no
apparel, garments or corresponding accessories, equipment, materials,
or supplies furnished to or produced in whole or in part by sweatshop
labor, or with the benefit of sweatshop labor. The contractor shall
agree to comply with this provision of the contract. The contract may
not be awarded prior to receipt of the certification by the state
agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 BONDS--ANNUAL BID BOND, PERFORMANCE, AND
PROTEST. When any bid has been accepted, the agency may require of the
successful bidder a bond payable to the state in such amount with such
surety or sureties as determined by the agency, conditioned that he or
she will fully, faithfully, and accurately perform the terms of the
contract into which he or she has entered. Bidders who regularly do
business with the state shall be permitted to file with the agency an
annual performance bond in an amount established by the agency and such
annual bond shall be acceptable as surety in lieu of furnishing
individual bonds. The agency may also require bidders to provide bid
bonds conditioned that if a bidder is awarded the contract the bidder
will enter into and execute the contract, protest bonds, or other bonds
the agency deems necessary. Agencies must adhere to the policies
developed by the department regarding the use of protest bonds. All
bonds must be filed with the agency on a form acceptable to the agency.
Any surety issuing a bond must meet the qualification requirements
established by the agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 AUTHORITY TO DEBAR. (1)(a) The director
shall provide notice to the contractor of the director's intent to
debar with the specific reason for the debarment. The department must
establish the debarment process by rule.
(b) After reasonable notice to the contractor and reasonable
opportunity for that contractor to be heard, the director has the
authority to debar a contractor for cause from consideration for award
of contracts. The debarment must be for a period of not more than
three years.
(2) The director may debar a contractor based on a finding of one
or more of the following causes:
(a) Conviction for commission of a criminal offense as an incident
to obtaining or attempting to obtain a public or private contract or
subcontract, or in the performance of such contract or subcontract;
(b) Conviction under state or federal statutes of embezzlement,
theft, forgery, bribery, falsification or destruction of records,
receiving stolen property, or any other offense indicating a lack of
business integrity or business honesty that currently, seriously, and
directly affects responsibility as a state contractor;
(c) Conviction under state or federal antitrust statutes arising
out of the submission of bids or proposals;
(d) Two or more violations within the previous five years of the
federal labor relations act as determined by the national labor
relations board or court of competent jurisdiction;
(e) Violation of contract provisions, as set forth in this
subsection, of a character that is regarded by the director to be so
serious as to justify debarment action:
(i) Deliberate failure without good cause to perform in accordance
with the specifications or within the time limit provided in the
contract; or
(ii) A recent record of failure to perform or of unsatisfactory
performance in accordance with the terms of one or more contracts,
however the failure to perform or unsatisfactory performance caused by
acts beyond the control of the contractor may not be considered to be
a basis for debarment;
(f) Violation of ethical standards set forth in section 3 of this
act; and
(g) Any other cause the director determines to be so serious and
compelling as to affect responsibility as a state contractor, including
debarment by another governmental entity for any cause listed in
regulations.
(3) The director must issue a written decision to debar. The
decision must:
(a) State the reasons for the action taken; and
(b) Inform the debarred contractor of the contractor's rights to
judicial or administrative review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 TRANSPARENCY. (1) Agencies must annually
submit to the department a list of all contracts that the agency has
entered into or renewed. "Contracts," for the purposes of this
section, does not include purchase orders. The department must
maintain a publicly available list of all contracts entered into by
agencies during each fiscal year, except that contracts for the
employment of expert witnesses for the purposes of litigation shall not
be made publicly available to the extent that information is exempt
from disclosure under state law. Except as otherwise exempt, the data
must identify the contracting agency, the contractor, the purpose of
the contract, effective dates and periods of performance, the cost of
the contract and funding source, any substantive modifications to the
contract, and whether the contract was competitively procured or
awarded on a sole source basis.
(2) The department may conduct audits of its master contracts and
convenience contracts to ensure that the contractor is in compliance
with the contract terms and conditions, including but not limited to
providing only the goods and services specified in the contract at the
contract price.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 CONTRACT AUDITS AND INVESTIGATIVE
FINDINGS--REPORT BY STATE AUDITOR AND ATTORNEY GENERAL. The state
auditor and the attorney general must annually by November 30th of each
year, provide a collaborative report of contract audit and
investigative findings, enforcement actions, and the status of agency
resolution to the governor and the policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature.

Sec. 26 RCW 43.19.005 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 103 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department of enterprise services is created as an
executive branch agency. The department is vested with all powers and
duties transferred to it under chapter 43, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.
and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law.
(2) In addition to the powers and duties as provided in chapter 43,
Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess., the department shall((:
(a))) provide products and services to support state agencies, and
may enter into agreements with any other governmental entity or a
public benefit nonprofit organization, in compliance with RCW
39.34.055, to furnish such products and services as deemed appropriate
by both parties. The agreement shall provide for the reimbursement to
the department of the reasonable cost of the products and services
furnished. All governmental entities of this state may enter into such
agreements, unless otherwise prohibited((; and
(b) Make available to state, local, and federal agencies, local
governments, and public benefit nonprofit corporations on a full cost-recovery basis information and printing services to include equipment
acquisition assistance, including leasing, brokering, and establishing
master contracts. For the purposes of this section "public benefit
nonprofit corporation" means a public benefit nonprofit corporation as
defined in RCW 24.03.005 that is receiving local, state, or federal
funds either directly or through a public agency other than an Indian
tribe or political subdivision of another state)).

Sec. 27 RCW 43.19.725 and 2011 c 358 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department ((of general administration)) must develop a
model plan for state agencies to increase: (a) The number of small
businesses registering in the state's ((common)) enterprise vendor
registration and bid notification system; (b) the number of such
registered small businesses annually receiving state contracts for
goods and services purchased by the state; and (c) the percentage of
total state dollars spent for goods and services purchased from such
registered small businesses. The goal of the plan is to increase the
number of small businesses receiving state contracts as well as the
percentage of total state dollars spent for goods and services from
small businesses registered in the state's ((common)) enterprise vendor
registration and bid notification system by at least fifty percent in
fiscal year 2013, and at least one hundred percent in fiscal year 2015
over the baseline data reported for fiscal year 2011.
(2) ((All state purchasing agencies)) The department, the
department of transportation, and institutions of higher education as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016 may adopt the model plan developed by the
department ((of general administration)) under subsection (1) of this
section. ((A state purchasing agency that)) If the agency does not
adopt the model plan, it must establish and implement a plan consistent
with the goals of subsection (1) of this section.
(3) To facilitate the participation of small businesses in the
provision of goods and services to the state, including purchases under
chapters ((39.29)) 39.--- (the new chapter created in section 31 of
this act) and 43.105 RCW, the ((state purchasing and material control))
director, under the powers granted ((by RCW 43.19.190 through
43.19.1939)) under this chapter, and ((all state purchasing agencies))
the department, the department of transportation, and institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 operating under delegated
authority granted under this chapter or RCW ((43.19.190 or))
28B.10.029, must give technical assistance to small businesses
regarding the state bidding process. Such technical assistance shall
include providing opportunities for the agency to answer vendor
questions about the bid solicitation requirements in advance of the bid
due date and, upon request, holding a debriefing after the contract
award to assist the vendor in understanding how to improve his or her
responses for future competitive procurements.
(4)(a) ((All state purchasing agencies)) The department, the
department of transportation, and institutions of higher education as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016 must maintain records of state purchasing
contracts awarded to registered small businesses in order to track
outcomes and provide accurate, verifiable information regarding the
effects the technical assistance under subsection (3) of this section
is having on the number of small businesses annually receiving state
contracts for goods and services purchased by the state.
(b) The department ((of general administration)) may provide
assistance to other agencies attempting to maintain records of state
purchasing contracts awarded to registered small businesses for the
purposes described under (a) of this subsection.
(((5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section and RCW 43.19.727 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Small business" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
39.29.006.
(b) "State purchasing agencies" are limited to the department of
general administration, the department of information services, the
office of financial management, the department of transportation, and
institutions of higher education.))

Sec. 28 RCW 43.19.727 and 2011 c 358 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By November 15, 2013, and November 15th every two years
thereafter, ((all state purchasing agencies)) the department, the
department of transportation, and institutions of higher education as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016 shall submit a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature providing verifiable information
regarding the effects the technical assistance under RCW 43.19.725(3)
is having on the number of small businesses annually receiving state
contracts for goods and services purchased by the state.
(2) By December 31, 2013, ((all state purchasing agencies)) the
department, the department of transportation, and institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 must use the web-based
information system created under subsection (3)(a) of this section to
capture the data required under subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(3)(a) The department ((of general administration)), in
consultation with ((the department of information services,)) the
department of transportation((,)) and the department of commerce, must
develop and implement a web-based information system. The web-based
information system must be used to capture data, track outcomes, and
provide accurate and verifiable information regarding the effects the
technical assistance under RCW 43.19.725(3) is having on the number of
small businesses annually receiving state contracts for goods and
services purchased by the state. Such measurable data shall include,
but not be limited to: (i) The number of registered small businesses
that have been awarded state procurement contracts, (ii) the percentage
of total state dollars spent for goods and services purchased from
registered small businesses, and (iii) the number of registered small
businesses that have bid on but were not awarded state purchasing
contracts.
(b) ((By October 1, 2011, the department of general administration,
in collaboration with the department of information services and the
department of transportation, shall submit a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature detailing the projected cost associated
with the implementation and maintenance of the web-based information
system.
(c))) By September 1, 2012, the department ((of general
administration)), in collaboration with ((the department of information
services and)) the department of transportation, shall submit a report
to the appropriate committees of the legislature providing any
recommendations for needed legislation to improve the collection of
data required under (a) of this subsection.
(((d))) (c) By December 31, 2013, the department ((of general
administration)) must make the web-based information system available
to all state purchasing agencies.
(((e))) (d) The department ((of general administration)) may also
make the web-based information system available to other agencies that
would like to use the system for the purposes of chapter 358, Laws of
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 RCW 43.19.1932, 43.19.530, 43.19.534,
43.19.535, 43.19.536, 43.19.538, 43.19.539, 43.19.700, 43.19.702,
43.19.704, 43.19.797, and 39.29.052 are each recodified as sections in
chapter 39.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 31 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 39.29.003 (Intent) and 1998 c 101 s 1, 1993 c 433 s 1, 1987
c 414 s 1, & 1979 ex.s. c 61 s 1;
(2) RCW 39.29.006 (Definitions) and 2011 c 358 s 7, 2009 c 486 s 6,
2002 c 354 s 235, 1998 c 101 s 2, 1993 c 433 s 2, 1987 c 414 s 2, 1981
c 263 s 1, & 1979 ex.s. c 61 s 2;
(3) RCW 39.29.008 (Limitation on personal service contracts) and
1993 c 433 s 6;
(4) RCW 39.29.009 (Prohibition on certain personal service
contracts) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 60;
(5) RCW 39.29.011 (Competitive solicitation required -- Exceptions)
and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 522, 2011 c 358 s 4, 2009 c 486 s 7, 1998 c
101 s 3, & 1987 c 414 s 3;
(6) RCW 39.29.016 (Emergency contracts) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s
523, 1998 c 101 s 4, 1996 c 288 s 29, & 1987 c 414 s 4;
(7) RCW 39.29.018 (Sole source contracts) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43
s 524, 2009 c 486 s 8, 1998 c 101 s 5, 1996 c 288 s 30, 1993 c 433 s 5,
& 1987 c 414 s 5;
(8) RCW 39.29.020 (Compliance -- Expenditure of funds prohibited--Civil penalty) and 1987 c 414 s 6 & 1974 ex.s. c 191 s 2;
(9) RCW 39.29.025 (Amendments) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 525, 1998
c 101 s 6, 1996 c 288 s 31, & 1993 c 433 s 3;
(10) RCW 39.29.040 (Exemption of certain contracts) and 2002 c 260
s 11, 2002 c 200 s 2, 1998 c 101 s 7, 1996 c 2 s 19, 1995 c 80 s 1,
1987 c 414 s 7, 1986 c 33 s 3, & 1979 ex.s. c 61 s 4;
(11) RCW 39.29.050 (Contracts subject to requirements established
under office of minority and women's business enterprises) and 1983 c
120 s 12;
(12) RCW 39.29.055 (Contracts -- Filing -- Public inspection -- Review
and approval -- Effective date) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 526, 1998 c 101
s 8, 1996 c 288 s 32, & 1993 c 433 s 7;
(13) RCW 39.29.065 (Department of enterprise services to establish
policies and procedures -- Adjustment of dollar thresholds) and 2011 1st
sp.s. c 43 s 527, 2009 c 486 s 9, 1998 c 101 s 9, & 1987 c 414 s 8;
(14) RCW 39.29.068 (Department of enterprise services to maintain
list of contracts -- Report to legislature) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s
528;
(15) RCW 39.29.075 (Summary reports on contracts) and 2011 1st
sp.s. c 43 s 529 & 1987 c 414 s 9;
(16) RCW 39.29.080 (Data generated under personal services
contracts) and 1997 c 373 s 1;
(17) RCW 39.29.090 (Contracts awarded by institutions of higher
education) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 530 & 1998 c 101 s 11;
(18) RCW 39.29.100 (Contract management -- Uniform guidelines--Guidebook) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 531 & 2002 c 260 s 7;
(19) RCW 39.29.110 (Use of guidelines -- Report to department of
enterprise services) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 532 & 2002 c 260 s 8;
(20) RCW 39.29.120 (Contract management -- Training -- Risk-based
audits -- Reports) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 533 & 2002 c 260 s 9;
(21) RCW 39.29.130 (Contract audits and investigative findings--Report by state auditor and attorney general) and 2002 c 260 s 10;
(22) RCW 39.29.900 (Severability -- 1987 c 414) and 1987 c 414 s 13;
(23) RCW 43.19.180 (State purchasing and material control--Director's responsibility) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 205, 2009 c 549 s
5063, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 21 s 1, & 1965 c 8 s 43.19.180;
(24) RCW 43.19.185 (State purchasing and material control -- System
for the use of credit cards or similar devices to be developed -- Rules)
and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 206, 1987 c 47 s 1, & 1982 1st ex.s. c 45 s
1;
(25) RCW 43.19.190 (State purchasing and material control--Director's powers and duties -- Rules) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 805,
2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 207, 2002 c 200 s 3, 1995 c 269 s 1401, 1994 c
138 s 1, 1993 sp.s. c 10 s 2, 1993 c 379 s 102, & 1991 c 238 s 135;
(26) RCW 43.19.1901 ("Purchase" includes leasing or renting--Electronic data processing equipment excepted) and 1987 c 434 s 23,
1983 c 3 s 102, & 1967 ex.s. c 104 s 1;
(27) RCW 43.19.1905 (Statewide policy for purchasing and material
control -- Definitions) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 208, 2009 c 486 s 10,
& 2008 c 215 s 4;
(28) RCW 43.19.19052 (Initial purchasing and material control
policy -- Legislative intent -- Agency cooperation) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43
s 209, 1998 c 245 s 54, 1995 c 269 s 1403, 1986 c 158 s 9, 1979 c 151
s 98, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 21 s 6;
(29) RCW 43.19.1906 (Competitive bids -- Procedure -- Exceptions) and
2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 210, 2008 c 215 s 5, 2006 c 363 s 1, & 2002 c 332
s 4;
(30) RCW 43.19.1908 (Bids -- Solicitation -- Qualified bidders) and
2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 211, 2009 c 486 s 11, 2006 c 363 s 2, 1994 c 300
s 2, & 1965 c 8 s 43.19.1908;
(31) RCW 43.19.1911 (Competitive bids -- Notice of modification or
cancellation -- Cancellation requirements -- Lowest responsible bidder--Preferential purchase -- Life cycle costing) and 2006 c 363 s 3, 2005 c
204 s 5, 2003 c 136 s 6, 1996 c 69 s 2, 1989 c 431 s 60, 1983 c 183 s
4, 1980 c 172 s 8, & 1965 c 8 s 43.19.1911;
(32) RCW 43.19.1913 (Rejection of bid for previous unsatisfactory
performance) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 212 & 1965 c 8 s 43.19.1913;
(33) RCW 43.19.1914 (Low bidder claiming error -- Prohibition on
later bid for same project) and 1996 c 18 s 7;
(34) RCW 43.19.1915 (Bidder's bond -- Annual bid bond) and 2011 1st
sp.s. c 43 s 213, 2009 c 549 s 5064, & 1965 c 8 s 43.19.1915;
(35) RCW 43.19.1937 (Acceptance of benefits, gifts, etc.,
prohibited -- Penalties) and 2009 c 549 s 5065, 1995 c 269 s 1405, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 21 s 13, & 1965 c 8 s 43.19.1937;
(36) RCW 43.19.1939 (Unlawful to offer, give, accept, benefits as
inducement for or to refrain from bidding -- Penalty) and 2003 c 53 s 226
& 1965 c 8 s 43.19.1939; and
(37) RCW 43.19.200 (Duty of others in relation to purchases--Emergency purchases -- Written notifications) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s
221, 2009 c 549 s 5066, 1986 c 158 s 10, 1984 c 102 s 2, 1971 c 81 s
111, & 1965 c 8 s 43.19.200.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 Sections 1 through 25 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 This act takes effect January 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---