BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.51A.060 and 2011 c 181 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be a class 3 civil infraction to use or display
medical cannabis in a manner or place which is open to the view of the
general public.
(2) Nothing in this chapter establishes a right of care as a
covered benefit or requires any state purchased health care as defined
in RCW 41.05.011 or other health carrier or health plan as defined in
Title 48 RCW to be liable for any claim for reimbursement for the
medical use of cannabis. Such entities may enact coverage or
noncoverage criteria or related policies for payment or nonpayment of
medical cannabis in their sole discretion.
(3) Nothing in this chapter requires any health care professional
to authorize the medical use of cannabis for a patient.
(4) Nothing in this chapter requires any accommodation of any on-site medical use of cannabis in any place of employment, in any school
bus or on any school grounds, in any youth center, in any correctional
facility, or smoking cannabis in any public place or hotel or motel.
(5) Nothing in this chapter authorizes the use of medical cannabis
by any person who is subject to the Washington code of military justice
in chapter 38.38 RCW.
(6) Employers may establish drug-free work policies. Nothing in
this chapter requires an accommodation for the medical use of cannabis
if an employer has a drug-free work place.
(7) It is a class C felony to fraudulently produce any record
purporting to be, or tamper with the content of any record for the
purpose of having it accepted as, valid documentation under RCW
69.51A.010(32)(a), or to backdate such documentation to a time earlier
than its actual date of execution.
(8) No person shall be entitled to claim the protection from arrest
and prosecution under RCW 69.51A.040 or the affirmative defense under
RCW 69.51A.043 for engaging in the medical use of cannabis in a way
that endangers the health or well-being of any person through the use
of a motorized vehicle on a street, road, or highway, including
violations of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or equivalent local
ordinances. However, a qualifying patient may not be found in
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local
ordinance, based solely on the presence, or presence in a certain
concentration, of components or metabolites of cannabis, without other
evidence that the qualifying patient was actually impaired.

--- END ---