BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.048 and 2009 c 533 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The governing board of a public facilities district under
chapter 36.100 or 35.57 RCW may submit an authorizing proposition to
the voters of the district, and if the proposition is approved by a
majority of persons voting, impose a sales and use tax in accordance
with the terms of this chapter.
(b) The legislative authority of any city entering into an
interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW to form a public
facilities district under chapter 35.57 RCW that qualifies as a
distressed public facilities district may submit an authorizing
proposition to the voters of the city and, if the proposition is
approved by a majority of the persons voting, impose a sales and use
tax in accordance with the requirements of this section. To impose the
tax authorized under this subsection (1)(b), the legislative body of
the city must submit the authorizing proposition to the voters by July
1, 2013. The tax authorized under this subsection (1)(b) expires on
December 31st of the year in which all outstanding indebtedness of the
distressed public facilities district has been paid or legally
defeased.
(2) The ((tax)) taxes authorized in this section ((shall be)) are
in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
public facilities district. The rate of tax shall not exceed two-tenths of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax,
or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax. A public
facilities district formed under RCW 35.57.010(1)(e) may not impose the
tax authorized under this subsection at a rate that exceeds two-tenths
of one percent minus the rate of the highest tax authorized by this
subsection that is imposed by any other public facilities district
within its boundaries. If a public facilities district formed under
RCW 35.57.010(1)(e) has imposed a tax under this subsection and issued
or incurred obligations pledging that tax, so long as those obligations
are outstanding no other public facilities district within its
boundaries may thereafter impose a tax under this subsection at a rate
that would reduce the rate of the tax that was pledged to the repayment
of those obligations. A public facilities district that imposes a tax
under this subsection is responsible for the payment of any costs
incurred for the purpose of administering the provisions of this
subsection, RCW 35.57.010(1)(e), and 35.57.020(1)(b), including any
administrative costs associated with the imposition of a tax under this
subsection incurred by either the department of revenue or local
government, or both.
(3)(a) Moneys received from ((any)) a tax imposed under ((the
authority)) subsection (1)(a) of this section ((shall)) must be used
for the purpose of providing funds for the costs associated with the
financing, design, acquisition, construction, equipping, operating,
maintaining, remodeling, repairing, and reequipping of its public
facilities.
(b) A tax imposed under subsection (1)(b) of this section must be
used only for the purpose of providing financial support to a
distressed public facilities district.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Distressed public facilities district" means a public
facilities district under chapter 35.57 RCW that has defaulted due to
an inability to pay indebtedness on or before June 30, 2012.
(b) "Outstanding indebtedness" means indebtedness issued on or
before January 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---