BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.32.100 and 2011 c 227 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to all other penalties provided by law, and
except as provided otherwise in (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection, a commercial motor vehicle that is subject to compliance
reviews under this chapter and an officer, agent, or employee of a
company operating a commercial motor vehicle who violates or who
procures, aids, or abets in the violation of this title or any order or
rule of the state patrol is liable for a penalty of one hundred dollars
for each violation.
(i) It is a violation of this chapter for a person operating a
commercial motor vehicle to fail to comply with the requirements of 49
C.F.R. Pt. 382, controlled substances and alcohol use and testing, 49
C.F.R. Sec. 391.15, disqualification of drivers, and 49 C.F.R. Sec.
396.9(c)(2), moving a vehicle placed out of service before the out of
service defects have been satisfactorily repaired. For each violation
the person is liable for a penalty of five hundred dollars.
(ii) The driver of a commercial motor vehicle who is convicted of
violating an out-of-service order is liable for a penalty of at least
two thousand five hundred dollars for a first violation, and not less
than five thousand dollars for (([a])) a second or subsequent
violation.
(iii) An employer who allows the operation of a commercial motor
vehicle when there is an out-of-service order is liable for a penalty
of at least two thousand seven hundred fifty dollars but not more than
twenty-five thousand dollars for each violation.
(iv) Each violation under this subsection (1)(a) is a separate and
distinct offense, and in case of a continuing violation every day's
continuance is a separate and distinct violation.
(b) In addition to all other penalties provided by law, any motor
carrier, company, or any officer or agent of a motor carrier or company
operating a commercial motor vehicle subject to compliance reviews
under this chapter who refuses entry or to make the required records,
documents, and vehicles available to a duly authorized agent of the
state patrol is liable for a penalty of at least five thousand dollars
as well as an out-of-service order being placed on the department of
transportation number, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, and vehicle
registration to operate. Each violation is a separate and distinct
offense, and in case of a continuing violation every day's continuance
is a separate and distinct violation.
(c) A motor carrier operating a commercial motor vehicle after
receiving a final unsatisfactory rating or being placed out of service
is liable for a penalty of not more than eleven thousand dollars for
each violation. Each violation is a separate and distinct offense, and
in case of a continuing violation every day's continuance is a separate
and distinct violation.
(d) A high-risk carrier is liable for double the amount of the
penalty of a prior violation if the high-risk carrier repeats the same
violation during a follow-up compliance review. Each repeat violation
is a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a repeat continuing
violation every day's continuance is a separate and distinct violation.
(2) The Washington state patrol may place an out-of-service order
on a department of transportation number, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010,
for violations of this chapter or for nonpayment of any monetary
penalties assessed by the state patrol or the utilities and
transportation commission, as a result of compliance reviews, or for
violations of cease and desist orders issued by the utilities and
transportation commission. The state patrol shall notify the
department of licensing when an out-of-service order has been placed on
a motor carrier's department of transportation number. The state
patrol shall notify the motor carrier when there has been an out-of-service order placed on the motor carrier's department of
transportation number and the vehicle registrations have been revoked
by sending a notice by first-class mail using the last known address
for the registered or legal owner or owners, and recording the
transmittal on an affidavit of first-class mail. Notices under this
section fulfill the requirements of RCW 46.12.550. Motor carriers may
not be eligible for a new department of transportation number, vehicle
registration, or temporary permits to operate unless the violations
that resulted in the out-of-service order have been corrected. The
Washington state patrol or other law enforcement agency must confiscate
and may recycle or destroy the license plates from a motor carrier who
operates a commercial motor vehicle while the vehicle registration is
revoked, suspended, or canceled. The confiscation of license plates
under this subsection only applies to trucks, truck tractors, and
tractors.
(3) Any penalty provided in this section is due and payable when
the person incurring it receives a notice in writing from the state
patrol describing the violation and advising the person that the
penalty is due.
(a)(i) Any motor carrier who incurs a penalty as provided in this
section, except for a high-risk carrier that incurs a penalty for a
repeat violation during a follow-up compliance review, may, upon
written application, request that the state patrol mitigate the
penalty. An application for mitigation must be received by the state
patrol within twenty days of the receipt of notice.
(ii) The state patrol may decline to consider any application for
mitigation.
(b) Any motor carrier who incurs a penalty as provided in this
section has a right to an administrative hearing under chapter 34.05
RCW to contest the violation or the penalty imposed, or both. In all
such hearings, the procedure and rules of evidence are as specified in
chapter 34.05 RCW except as otherwise provided in this chapter. Any
request for an administrative hearing must be made in writing and must
be received by the state patrol within twenty days after the later of
(i) receipt of the notice imposing the penalty, or (ii) disposition of
a request for mitigation, or the right to a hearing is waived.
(c) All penalties recovered under this section shall be paid into
the state treasury and credited to the state patrol highway account of
the motor vehicle fund.

--- END ---