BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.480 and 2000 c 70 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of health shall adopt guidelines and protocols
for how emergency medical personnel shall respond when summoned to the
site of an injury or illness for the treatment of a person who has
signed a written directive ((or durable power of attorney)) requesting
that he or she not receive ((futile)) certain emergency medical
treatments.
(2) The guidelines developed under subsection (1) of this section
shall include development of a ((simple)) form that shall be used
statewide to provide emergency and end-of-life instructions to
emergency medical personnel. The form shall be known as "physician
orders for life sustaining treatment."
(3) To be valid and enforceable, the form must be signed by:
(a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, an advanced registered
nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, a physician
assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, or an osteopathic
physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW; and
(b) The patient or legal surrogate.
(4) The form may be used by health care providers to communicate
orders pertaining to emergency and end-of-life care.
(5) Any provider, acting within the scope of his or her license,
who participates in good faith in the provision, withholding, or
withdrawal of life-sustaining treatment in accordance with the
directions contained in a physician orders for life-sustaining
treatment form shall be immune from legal liability, including civil,
criminal, or professional conduct sanctions, unless otherwise
negligent.
(6) For purposes of this section, the term "provider" includes:
(a) Health care providers listed in subsection (3)(a) of this
section or RCW 70.122.051(1);
(b) Health facilities listed in RCW 70.122.020 and their health-related personnel;
(c) Adult family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW and their
health-related personnel;
(d) Any "health care facility" or "long-term care facility" as
defined in RCW 71.32.020 and their health-related personnel;
(e) "State veterans' homes" as defined in RCW 72.36.035 and their
health-related personnel;
(f) Kidney disease treatment centers and their personnel; and
(g) Any provider or entity identified in RCW 18.71.210.

--- END ---