BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.45.0631 and 2009 c 561 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The allocation of costs between the employer and members of the
Washington state patrol retirement system shall be made only after the
application of any minimum total contribution rate that may be in
effect for the system under subsection (4) of this section. For
benefit improvements effective on or after July 1, ((2007)) 2012, costs
shall be shared equally by members and the employer, and any cap on
member contributions shall be adjusted accordingly. Beginning July 1,
2012, the member contribution rate shall be ((based on the adjusted
total contribution rate described in subsection (2) of this section.
Beginning July 1, 2007, the required member contribution rate for
members of the Washington state patrol retirement system shall be the
lesser of the following: (a) One-half of the adjusted total
contribution rate for the system; or (b) seven percent, plus fifty
percent of the contribution rate increase caused by any benefit
improvements effective on or after July 1, 2007)) seven percent plus
fifty percent of the contribution rate increase caused by any benefit
improvements effective on or after July 1, 2012.
(2) The employer shall continue to pay for all costs attributable
to distributions under RCW 43.43.270(2) for survivors of members who
became disabled under RCW 43.43.040(2) prior to July 1, 2006, until
such costs are fully paid. In order to avoid charging members for
these costs, the total required contribution rate shall be adjusted to
exclude these costs. The result of the adjustment shall be the
adjusted total contribution rate that is to be used to calculate the
required member contribution rate.
(3) The employer rate shall be the contribution rate required to
cover all total system costs that are not covered by the member
contribution rate.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2009, a minimum total contribution rate is
established for the Washington state patrol retirement system. The
total Washington state patrol retirement system contribution rate may
exceed, but may not drop below, the established minimum total
contribution rate. From July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, the
minimum total contribution rate shall equal the total contribution rate
required to fund fifty percent of the Washington state patrol
retirement system's normal cost as calculated under the entry age
normal cost method. Beginning July 1, 2011, the minimum total
contribution rate shall equal the total contribution rate required to
fund seventy percent of the Washington state patrol retirement system's
normal cost as calculated under the entry age normal cost method. This
minimum rate, when applicable, shall be collected in addition to any
contribution rate required to amortize any unfunded costs attributable
to distributions under RCW 43.43.270(2) for survivors of members who
became disabled under RCW 43.43.040(2) prior to July 1, 2006.
(5) Upon completion of each biennial actuarial valuation, the state
actuary shall review the appropriateness of this minimum total
contribution rate and recommend to the council any adjustments as may
be needed. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature.

--- END ---