BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.58.355 and 1994 c 257 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
The procedural requirements of this chapter shall not apply to any
person:
(1) Conducting a remedial action at a facility pursuant to a
consent decree, order, or agreed order issued pursuant to chapter
70.105D RCW, or to the department of ecology when it conducts a
remedial action under chapter 70.105D RCW. The department ((of ecology
shall)) must ensure compliance with the substantive requirements of
this chapter through the consent decree, order, or agreed order issued
pursuant to chapter 70.105D RCW, or during the department-conducted
remedial action, through the procedures developed by the department
pursuant to RCW 70.105D.090; or
(2) Installing site improvements for storm water treatment in an
existing boatyard facility to meet requirements of a national pollutant
discharge elimination system storm water general permit. The
department must ensure compliance with the substantive requirements of
this chapter through the review of engineering reports, site plans, and
other documents related to the installation of boatyard storm water
treatment facilities.

--- END ---