BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.88A.020 and 2010 c 169 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Alternative training" means a nursing assistant-certified
program meeting criteria adopted by the commission under RCW 18.88A.087
to meet the requirements of a state-approved nurse aide competency
evaluation program consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395i-3(e) and (f) of
the federal social security act.
(2) "Approved training program" means a nursing assistant-certified
training program approved by the commission to meet the requirements of
a state-approved nurse aide training and competency evaluation program
consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395i-3(e) and (f) of the federal social
security act. For community college, vocational-technical institutes,
skill centers, and secondary school as defined in chapter 28B.50 RCW,
nursing assistant-certified training programs shall be approved by the
commission in cooperation with the board for community and technical
colleges or the superintendent of public instruction.
(3) "Commission" means the Washington nursing care quality
assurance commission.
(4) "Competency evaluation" means the measurement of an
individual's knowledge and skills as related to safe, competent
performance as a nursing assistant.
(5) "Department" means the department of health.
(6) "Health care facility" means a nursing home, hospital, hospice
care facility, home health care agency, hospice agency, or other entity
for delivery of health care services as defined by the commission.
(7) "Medication assistant" means a nursing assistant-certified with
a medication assistant endorsement issued under section 2 of this act
who is authorized, in addition to his or her duties as a nursing
assistant-certified, to administer certain medications and perform
certain treatments in a nursing home under the supervision of a
registered nurse under section 2 of this act.
(8) "Nursing assistant" means an individual, regardless of title,
who, under the direction and supervision of a registered nurse or
licensed practical nurse, assists in the delivery of nursing and
nursing-related activities to patients in a health care facility. The
two levels of nursing assistants are:
(a) "Nursing assistant-certified," an individual certified under
this chapter; and
(b) "Nursing assistant-registered," an individual registered under
this chapter.
(((8))) (9) "Nursing home" means a nursing home licensed under
chapter 18.51 RCW.
(10) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.88A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2013, the secretary shall issue a medication
assistant endorsement to any nursing assistant-certified who meets the
following requirements:
(a) Ongoing certification as a nursing assistant-certified in good
standing under this chapter;
(b) Completion of a minimum number of hours of documented work
experience as a nursing assistant-certified in a long-term care setting
as defined in rule by the commission;
(c) Successful completion of an education and training program
approved by the commission by rule, such as the model medication
assistant-certified curriculum adopted by the national council of state
boards of nursing. The education and training program must include
training on the specific tasks listed in subsection (2) of this section
as well as training on identifying tasks that a medication assistant
may not perform under subsection (4) of this section;
(d) Passage of an examination approved by the commission by rule,
such as the medication aide competency examination available through
the national council of state boards of nursing; and
(e) Continuing competency requirements as defined in rule by the
commission.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a medication
assistant may perform the following additional tasks:
(a) The administration of medications orally, topically, and
through inhalation;
(b) The performance of simple prescriber-ordered treatments,
including blood glucose monitoring, noncomplex clean dressing changes,
pulse oximetry reading, and oxygen administration, to be defined by the
commission by rule; and
(c) The documentation of the tasks in this subsection (2) on
applicable medication or treatment forms.
(3) A medication assistant may only perform the additional tasks in
subsection (2) of this section:
(a) In a nursing home;
(b) Under the direct supervision of a designated registered nurse
who is on-site and immediately accessible during the medication
assistant's shift. The registered nurse shall assess the resident
prior to the medication assistant administering medications or
treatments and determine whether it is safe to administer the
medications or treatments. The judgment and decision to administer
medications or treatments is retained by the registered nurse; and
(c) If, while functioning as a medication assistant, the primary
responsibility of the medication assistant is performing the additional
tasks. The commission may adopt rules regarding the medication
assistant's primary responsibilities and limiting the duties, within
the scope of practice of a nursing assistant-certified, that a nursing
assistant-certified may perform while functioning as a medication
assistant.
(4) A medication assistant may not:
(a) Accept telephone or verbal orders from a prescriber;
(b) Calculate medication dosages;
(c) Inject any medications;
(d) Perform any sterile task;
(e) Administer medications through a tube;
(f) Administer any Schedule I, II, or III controlled substance; or
(g) Perform any task that requires nursing judgment.
(5) Nothing in this section requires a nursing home to employ a
nursing assistant-certified with a medication assistant endorsement.
(6) A medication assistant is responsible and accountable for his
or her specific functions.
(7) A medication assistant's employer may limit or restrict the
range of functions permitted under this section, but may not expand
those functions.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.88A.040 and 1991 c 16 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may practice or represent himself or herself as a
nursing assistant-registered by use of any title or description without
being registered by the department pursuant to this chapter.
(2) After October 1, 1990, no person may by use of any title or
description, practice or represent himself or herself as a nursing
assistant-certified without applying for certification, meeting the
qualifications, and being certified by the department pursuant to this
chapter.
(3) After July 1, 2013, no person may practice, or represent
himself or herself by any title or description, as a medication
assistant without a medication assistant endorsement issued under
section 2 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.88A.050 and 2010 c 169 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary
has the authority to:
(1) Set all nursing assistant certification, registration,
medication assistant endorsement, and renewal fees in accordance with
RCW 43.70.250 and to collect and deposit all such fees in the health
professions account established under RCW 43.70.320;
(2) Establish forms, procedures, and the competency evaluation
necessary to administer this chapter;
(3) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as
needed to implement this chapter;
(4) Issue a nursing assistant registration to any applicant who has
met the requirements for registration;
(5) After January 1, 1990, issue a nursing assistant certificate to
any applicant who has met the training, competency evaluation, and
conduct requirements for certification under this chapter;
(6) Issue a medication assistant endorsement to any applicant who
has met the requirements of section 2 of this act;
(7) Maintain the official record for the department of all
applicants and persons with registrations ((and)), certificates, and
medication assistant endorsements under this chapter;
(((7))) (8) Exercise disciplinary authority as authorized in
chapter 18.130 RCW;
(((8))) (9) Deny registration to any applicant who fails to meet
requirement for registration as a nursing assistant;
(((9))) (10) Deny certification to applicants who do not meet the
training, competency evaluation, and conduct requirements for
certification as a nursing assistant; and
(11) Deny medication assistant endorsement to applicants who do not
meet the requirements of section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.88A.060 and 2010 c 169 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other authority provided by law, the commission
may:
(1) Determine minimum nursing assistant education requirements and
approve training programs;
(2) Approve education and training programs and examinations for
medication assistants as provided in section 2 of this act;
(3) Define the prescriber-ordered treatments a medication assistant
is authorized to perform under section 2 of this act;
(4) Prepare, grade, and administer, or determine the nature of, and
supervise the grading and administration of, the competency evaluation
for applicants for nursing assistant certification, using the same
competency evaluation for all applicants, whether qualifying to take
the competency evaluation under an approved training program or
alternative training;
(((3))) (5) Establish forms and procedures for evaluation of an
applicant's alternative training under criteria adopted pursuant to RCW
18.88A.087;
(((4))) (6) Define and approve any experience requirement for
nursing assistant certification;
(((5))) (7) Adopt rules implementing a continuing competency
evaluation program for nursing assistants; and
(((6))) (8) Adopt rules to enable it to carry into effect the
provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.88A.120 and 1996 c 191 s 74 are each amended to
read as follows:
Applications for registration ((and)), certification, and
medication assistant endorsement shall be submitted on forms provided
by the secretary. The secretary may require any information and
documentation that reasonably relates to the need to determine whether
the applicant meets the criteria for registration ((and)),
certification, and medication assistant endorsement credentialing
provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each applicant
shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative
requirements, and fees determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250
and 43.70.280.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.88A.130 and 1996 c 191 s 75 are each amended to
read as follows:
Registrations ((and)), certifications, and medication assistant
endorsements shall be renewed according to administrative procedures,
administrative requirements, and fees determined by the secretary under
RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.88A.150 and 1991 c 16 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
unregistered ((or)), uncertified, or unendorsed practice, issuance of
certificates ((and)), registrations, and medication assistant
endorsements, and the discipline of persons registered or with
certificates under this chapter. The secretary shall be the
disciplinary authority under this chapter.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.130.040 and 2011 c 41 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iii) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(iv) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(v) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vi) East Asian medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06
RCW;
(vii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(viii) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(ix) Hypnotherapists and agency affiliated counselors registered
and advisors and counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(x) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, mental health
counselor associates, marriage and family therapists, marriage and
family therapist associates, social workers, social work associates -- advanced, and social work associates -- independent clinical under
chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xi) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xii) Nursing assistants registered or certified or medication
assistants endorsed under chapter 18.88A RCW;
(xiii) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xiv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xv) Chemical dependency professionals and chemical dependency
professional trainees certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;
(xvi) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex
offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;
(xvii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xviii) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xix) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200
RCW;
(xx) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
(xxi) Recreational therapists (([under chapter 18.230 RCW])) under
chapter 18.230 RCW;
(xxii) Animal massage practitioners certified under chapter 18.240
RCW;
(xxiii) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW;
(xxiv) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW; and
(xxv) Genetic counselors licensed under chapter 18.290 RCW.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW and
licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW;
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW; and
(xv) The board of naturopathy established in chapter 18.36A RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses.
The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to
conditions.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The department of health and the Washington
nursing care quality assurance commission shall adopt any rules
necessary to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 9 of this act take
effect July 1, 2013.

--- END ---