BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that text messaging
services are a growing sector in the wireless industry. As data
networks continue to expand, more and more text messaging traffic is
being routed through a wireless provider's data network rather than its
cellular network. Charging a per message fee for a text message that
is sent over the internet or a wireless provider's data network, in
addition to charging the customer for a monthly data plan, is an unfair
billing practice. Because there is no effective federal regulation in
this area to protect consumers, it is the intent of the legislature to
regulate electronic text messaging for the limited purpose of
preventing unfair billing practices in the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.190.010 and 2005 c 378 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Assist the transmission" means actions taken by a person to
provide substantial assistance or support which enables any person to
formulate, compose, send, originate, initiate, or transmit a commercial
electronic mail message or a commercial electronic text message when
the person providing the assistance knows or consciously avoids knowing
that the initiator of the commercial electronic mail message or the
commercial electronic text message is engaged, or intends to engage, in
any practice that violates the consumer protection act. "Assist the
transmission" does not include any of the following: (a) Activities of
an electronic mail service provider or other entity who provides
intermediary transmission service in sending or receiving electronic
mail, or provides to users of electronic mail services the ability to
send, receive, or compose electronic mail; or (b) activities of any
entity related to the design, manufacture, or distribution of any
technology, product, or component that has a commercially significant
use other than to violate or circumvent this section.
(2) "Commercial electronic mail message" means an electronic mail
message sent for the purpose of promoting real property, goods, or
services for sale or lease. It does not mean an electronic mail
message to which an interactive computer service provider has attached
an advertisement in exchange for free use of an electronic mail
account, when the sender has agreed to such an arrangement.
(3) "Commercial electronic text message" means an electronic text
message sent to promote real property, goods, or services for sale or
lease.
(4) "Electronic mail address" means a destination, commonly
expressed as a string of characters, to which electronic mail may be
sent or delivered.
(5) "Electronic mail message" means an electronic message sent to
an electronic mail address and a reference to an internet domain,
whether or not displayed, to which an electronic mail message can be
sent or delivered.
(6) "Electronic text message" means a text message sent to a
cellular telephone or pager equipped with short message service or any
similar capability, whether the message is initiated as a short message
service message or as an electronic mail message.
(7) "Initiate the transmission" refers to the action by the
original sender of an electronic mail message or an electronic text
message, not to the action by any intervening interactive computer
service or wireless network that may handle or retransmit the message,
unless such intervening interactive computer service assists in the
transmission of an electronic mail message when it knows, or
consciously avoids knowing, that the person initiating the transmission
is engaged, or intends to engage, in any act or practice that violates
the consumer protection act.
(8) "Interactive computer service" means any information service,
system, or access software provider that provides or enables computer
access by multiple users to a computer server, including specifically
a service or system that provides access to the internet and such
systems operated or services offered by libraries or educational
institutions.
(9) "Internet" means collectively the myriad of computer and
telecommunications facilities, including equipment and operating
software, that comprise the interconnected world wide network of
networks that employ the transmission control protocol/internet
protocol, or any predecessor or successor protocols to such protocol,
to communicate information of all kinds by wire or radio.
(10) "Internet domain name" refers to a globally unique,
hierarchical reference to an internet host or service, assigned through
centralized internet naming authorities, comprising a series of
character strings separated by periods, with the right-most string
specifying the top of the hierarchy.
(11) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency or
instrumentality, public corporation, or any other legal or commercial
entity.
(12) "Personally identifying information" means an individual's:
(a) Social security number; (b) driver's license number; (c) bank
account number; (d) credit or debit card number; (e) personal
identification number; (f) automated or electronic signature; (g)
unique biometric data; (h) account passwords; or (i) any other piece of
information that can be used to access an individual's financial
accounts or to obtain goods or services.
(13) "Radio communications service company" has the same meaning as
defined in RCW 80.04.010.
(14) "Web page" means a location, with respect to the world wide
web, that has a single uniform resource locator or other single
location with respect to the internet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.190 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is a violation of the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86
RCW, for a radio communications service company to charge a customer a
per message fee for any electronic text message sent or received by a
customer if:
(a) The electronic text message is transmitted over the radio
communications service company's data network or over the internet; and
(b) The customer already pays a monthly fee or usage fee for use of
the radio communications service company's data network.
(2) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this
section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A
violation of this section is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

--- END ---