BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.60.010 and 2009 c 20 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state patrol shall establish a missing children
and endangered person clearinghouse which shall include the maintenance
and operation of a toll-free, twenty-four-hour telephone hotline. The
clearinghouse shall distribute information to local law enforcement
agencies, school districts, the department of social and health
services, and the general public regarding missing children and
endangered persons. The information shall include pictures, bulletins,
training sessions, reports, and biographical materials that will assist
in local law enforcement efforts to locate missing children and
endangered persons. The state patrol shall also maintain a regularly
updated computerized link with national and other statewide missing
person systems or clearinghouses, and within existing resources, shall
develop and implement a plan, commonly known as an "amber alert plan,"
for voluntary cooperation between local, state, tribal, and other law
enforcement agencies, state government agencies, radio and television
stations, ((and)) cable and satellite systems, and social media pages
and sites to enhance the public's ability to assist in recovering
abducted children and missing endangered persons.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter:
(a) "Child" or "children((,))" ((as used in this chapter,)) means
an individual under eighteen years of age.
(b) "Missing endangered person" means a person believed to be in
danger because of age, health, mental or physical disability, in
combination with environmental or weather conditions, or is believed to
be unable to return to safety without assistance.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.60.020 and 1985 c 443 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
Local law enforcement agencies shall file an official missing
person report and enter biographical information into the state missing
person computerized network within ((twelve)) six hours after
notification of a missing child or endangered person is received under
RCW 13.32A.050 (1)(a), (((3))) (c), or (((4))) (d), or an endangered
missing person received under RCW 13.60.050. The patrol shall collect
such information as will enable it to retrieve immediately the
following information about a missing child or endangered person:
Name, date of birth, social security number, fingerprint
classification, relevant physical descriptions, and known associates
and locations. Access to the preceding information shall be available
to appropriate law enforcement agencies, and to parents and legal
guardians, when appropriate.

--- END ---