BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that, as higher
education consumers, students have a strong interest in a system that
is as cost-effective as possible. It is the intent of the legislature
to enhance the affordability and efficiency of higher education
programs and institutions by providing a mechanism for systematic
review and consideration of cost containment strategies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A student auditing committee composed of student members shall
be created at each four-year institution of higher education. Each
institution's student government association shall appoint not more
than seven members to the committee, one of whom shall be the student
member on the board of regents or the board of trustees of the
four-year institution as provided in RCW 28B.20.100, 28B.30.100,
28B.35.100, and 28B.40.100. The chair of the committee shall be
selected from among the membership.
(2) Each year the student auditing committee shall examine at least
one major project at the institution of higher education for the
purpose of identifying programs, practices, and processes that could
benefit from improved efficiency and report findings and
recommendations for reducing costs. Copies of the report shall be
distributed to the board members and made available to the public on
the institution's web site.
(3) The boards of regents and the boards of trustees at each
four-year institution of higher education shall provide at least one
opportunity per year for the student auditing committee to present its
findings and recommendations at a public meeting of the board.
(4) The student auditing committee shall consult with staff of the
joint legislative audit and review committee and the successor agency
to the higher education coordinating board for guidance on choosing
appropriate projects, methodology, and presentation of information.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2017.

--- END ---