BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.305.141 and 2009 c 543 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to waivers authorized under RCW 28A.305.140 and
28A.655.180, the state board of education may grant waivers from the
requirement for a one hundred eighty-day school year under RCW
28A.150.220 ((and 28A.150.250)) to school districts that propose to
operate one or more schools on a flexible calendar for purposes of
economy and efficiency as provided in this section. The requirement
under RCW 28A.150.220 that school districts offer an annual average
instructional hour offering of at least one thousand hours shall not be
waived.
(2) A school district seeking a waiver under this section must
submit an application that includes:
(a) A proposed calendar for the school day and school year that
demonstrates how the instructional hour requirement will be maintained;
(b) An explanation and estimate of the economies and efficiencies
to be gained from compressing the instructional hours into fewer than
one hundred eighty days;
(c) An explanation of how monetary savings from the proposal will
be redirected to support student learning;
(d) A summary of comments received at one or more public hearings
on the proposal and how concerns will be addressed;
(e) An explanation of the impact on students who rely upon free and
reduced-price school child nutrition services and the impact on the
ability of the child nutrition program to operate an economically
independent program;
(f) An explanation of the impact on the ability to recruit and
retain employees in education support positions;
(g) An explanation of the impact on students whose parents work
during the missed school day; and
(h) Other information that the state board of education may request
to assure that the proposed flexible calendar will not adversely affect
student learning.
(3) The state board of education shall adopt criteria to evaluate
waiver requests. No more than ((five)) twenty-five districts may be
granted waivers. Waivers may be granted for up to three years. After
each school year, the state board of education shall analyze empirical
evidence to determine whether the reduction is affecting student
learning. If the state board of education determines that student
learning is adversely affected, the school district shall discontinue
the flexible calendar as soon as possible but not later than the
beginning of the next school year after the determination has been
made. ((All waivers expire August 31, 2014.))
(a) Two of the five waivers granted under this subsection shall be
granted to school districts with student populations of less than one
hundred fifty students.
(b) Three of the five waivers granted under this subsection shall
be granted to school districts with student populations of between one
hundred fifty-one and five hundred students.
(c) Beginning with the 2012-13 school year, twenty of the waivers
granted under this subsection (3) shall be granted to school districts
with student populations of between five hundred one students and two
thousand two hundred students.
(4) The state board of education shall examine the waivers granted
under subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section and make a
recommendation to the education committees of the legislature by
December 15, 2013, regarding whether the waiver program should be
continued, modified, or allowed to terminate. This recommendation
should focus on whether the program resulted in improved student
learning as demonstrated by empirical evidence. Such evidence
includes, but is not limited to: Improved scores on the ((Washington))
statewide student assessment ((of student learning)), results of the
dynamic indicators of basic early literacy skills or another valid and
reliable literary assessment, student grades, and attendance.
(5)(a) The waivers in subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section
expire August 31, 2014.
(b) The waivers in subsection (3)(c) of this section expire August
31, 2019.
(6) This section expires August 31, ((2014)) 2019.

--- END ---