BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.073 and 2004 c 148 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person twenty-one years of age or older who is licensed to
carry a pistol in a state, the laws of which recognize and give effect
in that state to a concealed pistol license issued under the laws of
the state of Washington, is authorized to carry a concealed pistol in
this state if((:
(i) The licensing state does not issue concealed pistol licenses to
persons under twenty-one years of age; and
(ii))) the licensing state requires mandatory fingerprint-based
background checks of criminal and mental health history for all persons
who apply for a concealed pistol license.
(b) This section applies to a license holder from another state
only while the license holder is not a resident of this state. A
license holder from another state must carry the handgun in compliance
with the laws of this state.
(2) The attorney general shall periodically publish a list of
states the laws of which recognize and give effect in that state to a
concealed pistol license issued under the laws of the state of
Washington and which meet the requirements of subsection (1)(a)(((i)
and (ii))) of this section.

--- END ---