BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.270 and 2009 c 72 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department ((shall)) must design and implement an
innovation partnership zone program through which the state will
encourage and support research institutions, workforce training
organizations, and globally competitive companies to work cooperatively
in close geographic proximity to create commercially viable products
and jobs.
(2) The director ((shall)) must designate innovation partnership
zones on the basis of the following criteria:
(a) Innovation partnership zones must have three types of
institutions operating within their boundaries, or show evidence of
planning and local partnerships that will lead to dense concentrations
of these institutions:
(i) Research capacity in the form of a university or community
college fostering commercially valuable research, nonprofit
institutions creating commercially applicable innovations, or a
national laboratory;
(ii) An industry cluster as defined in RCW 43.330.090. The cluster
must include a dense proximity of globally competitive firms in a
research-based industry or industries or ((of)) individual firms with
innovation strategies linked to (a)(i) of this subsection. A globally
competitive firm may be signified through international organization
for standardization 9000 or 1400 certification, or ((other recognized))
evidence of sales in international ((success)) markets; and
(iii) Training capacity either within the zone or readily
accessible to the zone. The training capacity requirement may be met
by the same institution as the research capacity requirement, to the
extent both are associated with an educational institution in the
proposed zone.
(b) The support of a local jurisdiction, a research institution, an
educational institution, an industry or cluster association, a
workforce development council, and an associate development
organization, port, or chamber of commerce;
(c) Identifiable boundaries for the zone within which the applicant
will concentrate efforts to connect innovative researchers,
entrepreneurs, investors, industry associations or clusters, and
training providers. The geographic area defined should lend itself to
a distinct identity and have the capacity to accommodate firm growth;
(d) The innovation partnership zone administrator must be an
economic development council, port, workforce development council,
city, or county.
(3) With respect solely to the research capacity required in
subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section, the director may waive the
requirement that the research institution be located within the zone.
To be considered for such a waiver, an applicant must provide a
specific plan that demonstrates the research institution's unique
qualifications and suitability for the zone, and the types of jointly
executed activities that will be used to ensure ongoing, face-to-face
interaction and research collaboration among the zone's partners.
(4) On October 1st of each odd-numbered year, the director
((shall)) must designate innovation partnership zones on the basis of
applications that meet the legislative criteria, estimated economic
impact of the zone, evidence of forward planning for the zone, and
other criteria as ((recommended by)) developed by the department in
consultation with the Washington state economic development commission.
Estimated economic impact must include evidence of anticipated private
investment, job creation, innovation, and commercialization. The
director ((shall)) must require evidence that zone applicants will
promote commercialization, innovation, and collaboration among zone
residents.
(5) Innovation partnership zones are eligible for funds and other
resources as provided by the legislature or at the discretion of the
governor.
(6) If the innovation partnership zone meets the other requirements
of the fund sources, then the zone is eligible for the following funds
relating to:
(a) The local infrastructure financing tools program;
(b) The sales and use tax for public facilities in rural counties;
((and))
(c) Job skills; and
(d) Local improvement districts.
(7) An innovation partnership zone ((shall)) must be designated as
a zone for a four-year period. At the end of the four-year period, the
zone must reapply for the designation through the department.
(8) If the director finds that an applicant does not meet all of
the statutory criteria or additional criteria recommended by the
department in consultation with the Washington state economic
development commission to be designated as an innovation partnership
zone, the department must:
(a) Identify the deficiencies in the proposal and recommended steps
for the applicant to take to strengthen the proposal;
(b) Provide the applicant with the opportunity to appeal the
decision to the director; and
(c) Allow the applicant to reapply for innovation partnership
designation on October 1st of the following calendar year or during any
subsequent application cycle.
(9) If the director finds at any time after the initial year of
designation that an innovation partnership zone is failing to meet the
performance standards required in its contract with the department, the
director may withdraw such designation and cease state funding of the
zone.
(((9))) (10) The department ((shall)) must convene annual
information sharing events for innovation partnership zone
administrators and other interested parties.
(((10))) (11) An innovation partnership zone ((shall)) must
annually provide performance measures as required by the director,
including but not limited to private investment measures, job creation
measures, and measures of innovation such as licensing of ideas in
research institutions, patents, or other recognized measures of
innovation.
(((11))) (12) The department ((shall)) must compile a biennial
report on the innovation partnership zone program by December 1st of
every even-numbered year. The report ((shall)) must provide
information for each zone on its: Objectives; funding, tax incentives,
and other support obtained from public sector sources; major
activities; partnerships; performance measures; and outcomes achieved
since the inception of the zone or since the previous biennial report.
The Washington state economic development commission ((shall)) must
review the department's draft report and make recommendations on ways
to increase the effectiveness of individual zones and the program
overall. The department ((shall)) must submit the report, including
the commission's recommendations, to the governor and legislature
beginning December 1, 2010.

--- END ---