BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
An employee who is occupying a position that is reallocated to a
class with a lower salary range, or is appointed to a position due to
a layoff action, shall have his or her base salary determined according
to the employer's salary determination policy for the class and range
of the employee's new position without regard to the employee's base
salary in his or her previous position.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.80.040 and 2002 c 354 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
The employer shall not bargain over rights of management which, in
addition to all powers, duties, and rights established by
constitutional provision or statute, shall include but not be limited
to the following:
(1) The functions and programs of the employer, the use of
technology, and the structure of the organization;
(2) The employer's budget and the size of the agency workforce,
including determining the financial basis for layoffs;
(3) The right to direct and supervise employees;
(4) The right to take whatever actions are deemed necessary to
carry out the mission of the state and its agencies during emergencies;
((and))
(5) Retirement plans and retirement benefits; and
(6) The adjustment of an employee's base salary upon reallocation
to a class with a lower salary range or appointment to a new position
following a layoff action.

--- END ---