BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.330.080 and 1990 c 33 s 346 are each amended to
read as follows:
Moneys of such school districts shall be paid out only upon orders
for warrants signed by the president, or a majority of the board of
directors and countersigned by the secretary: PROVIDED, That when, in
the judgment of the board of directors, the orders for warrants issued
by the district monthly shall have reached such numbers that the
signing of each warrant by the president personally imposes too great
a task on the president, the board of directors, after auditing all
payrolls and bills as provided by RCW 28A.330.090, may authorize the
issuing of one general certificate to the county treasurer, to be
signed by the president, authorizing said treasurer to pay all the
warrants specified by date, number, name and amount, and the funds on
which said warrants shall be drawn; thereupon the secretary of said
board shall be authorized to draw and sign said orders for warrants.
Orders for warrants and warrant registers may be sent in an electronic
format and using facsimile signatures as provided under chapter 39.62
RCW.

--- END ---