BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS. The legislature finds:
(1) That in many of Washington's urban centers including those in
heavily populated unincorporated areas, there is insufficient
availability of desirable and convenient residential units, including
affordable housing units, to meet the needs of a growing number of the
public who would live in these urban centers if these desirable,
convenient, attractive, affordable, and livable places to live were
available;
(2) That the development of additional and desirable residential
units, including affordable housing units, in these urban centers
including those in heavily populated unincorporated areas that will
attract and maintain a significant increase in the number of permanent
residents in these areas will help to alleviate the detrimental
conditions and social liability that tend to exist in the absence of a
viable mixed income residential population and will help to achieve the
planning goals mandated by the growth management act under RCW
36.70A.020; and
(3) That planning solutions to solve the problems of urban sprawl
often lack incentive and implementation techniques needed to encourage
residential redevelopment in those urban centers lacking a sufficient
variety of residential opportunities, and it is in the public interest
and will benefit, provide, and promote the public health, safety, and
welfare to stimulate new or enhanced residential opportunities,
including affordable housing opportunities, within urban centers
through a tax incentive as provided by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 PURPOSE. It is the purpose of this chapter
to encourage increased residential opportunities, including affordable
housing opportunities, for counties with heavily populated
unincorporated urban growth areas that are required to plan or choose
to plan under the growth management act within urban centers where the
governing authority of the affected county has found there is
insufficient housing opportunities, including affordable housing
opportunities. It is further the purpose of this chapter to stimulate
the construction of new multifamily housing and the rehabilitation of
existing vacant and underutilized buildings for multifamily housing in
urban centers having insufficient housing opportunities that will
increase and improve residential opportunities, including affordable
housing opportunities, within these urban centers. To achieve these
purposes, this chapter provides for special valuations in residentially
deficient urban centers for eligible improvements associated with
multiunit housing, which includes affordable housing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.
(1) "Affordable housing" means residential housing that is rented
by a person or household whose monthly housing costs, including
utilities other than telephone, do not exceed thirty percent of the
household's monthly income. For the purposes of housing intended for
owner occupancy, "affordable housing" means residential housing that is
within the means of low or moderate-income households.
(2) "City" means either:
(a) A city or town with a population of at least fifteen thousand;
(b) The largest city or town, if there is no city or town with a
population of at least fifteen thousand, located in a county planning
under the growth management act; or
(c) A city or town with a population of at least five thousand
located in a county subject to the provisions of RCW 36.70A.215.
(3) "County" means a county with an unincorporated population of at
least three hundred fifty thousand.
(4) "Governing authority" means the local legislative authority of
a county having jurisdiction over the property for which an exemption
may be applied for under this chapter.
(5) "Growth management act" means chapter 36.70A RCW.
(6) "High cost area" means a county where the third quarter median
house price for the previous year as reported by the Washington center
for real estate research at Washington State University is equal to or
greater than one hundred thirty percent of the statewide median house
price published during the same time period.
(7) "Household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons
living together.
(8) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below
eighty percent of the median family income adjusted for family size,
for the county where the project is located, as reported by the United
States department of housing and urban development. For counties
located in high-cost areas, "low-income household" means a household
that has an income at or below one hundred percent of the median family
income adjusted for family size, for the county where the project is
located.
(9) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is more than
eighty percent but is at or below one hundred fifteen percent of the
median family income adjusted for family size, for the county where the
project is located, as reported by the United States department of
housing and urban development. For counties located in high-cost
areas, "moderate-income household" means a household that has an income
that is more than one hundred percent, but at or below one hundred
fifty percent, of the median family income adjusted for family size,
for the county where the project is located.
(10) "Multiple-unit housing" means a building having four or more
dwelling units not designed or used as transient accommodations and not
including hotels and motels. Multifamily units may result from new
construction or rehabilitated or conversion of vacant, underutilized,
or substandard buildings to multifamily housing.
(11) "Owner" means the property owner of record.
(12) "Permanent residential occupancy" means multiunit housing that
provides either rental or owner occupancy on a nontransient basis.
This includes owner-occupied or rental accommodation that is leased for
a period of at least one month. This excludes hotels and motels that
predominately offer rental accommodation on a daily or weekly basis.
(13) "Rehabilitation improvements" means modifications to existing
structures, that are vacant for twelve months or longer, that are made
to achieve a condition of substantial compliance with existing building
codes or modification to existing occupied structures which increase
the number of multifamily housing units.
(14) "Residential targeted area" means an area within an urban
center that has been designated by the governing authority as a
residential targeted area in accordance with this chapter.
(15) "Substantial compliance" means compliance with local building
or housing code requirements that are typically required for
rehabilitation as opposed to new construction.
(16) "Urban center" means a compact identifiable district within
the unincorporated portion of an urban growth area under RCW 36.70A.110
where urban residents may obtain a variety of products and services and
where:
(a) A campus of an institution of higher education as defined in
RCW 28B.92.030 where at least one thousand two hundred students live on
campus during the academic year;
(b) Adequate public facilities including streets, sidewalks,
lighting, transit, domestic water, and sanitary sewer systems; and
(c) A mixture of uses and activities that may include housing,
recreation, and cultural activities in association with either
commercial or office, or both, use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 EXEMPTION--DURATION--VALUATION. (1) The
value of new housing construction, conversion, and rehabilitation
improvements qualifying under this chapter is exempt from ad valorem
property taxation, as follows:
(a) For properties for which applications for certificates of tax
exemption eligibility are submitted under this chapter on or after the
effective date of this section, the value is exempt:
(i) For eight successive years beginning January 1st of the year
immediately following the calendar year of issuance of the certificate;
or
(ii) For twelve successive years beginning January 1st of the year
immediately following the calendar year of issuance of the certificate,
if the property otherwise qualifies for the exemption under this
chapter and meets the conditions in (a)(ii) of this subsection. For
the property to qualify for the twelve-year exemption under this
subsection, the applicant must commit to renting or selling at least
twenty percent of the multifamily housing units as affordable housing
units to low and moderate-income households, and the property must
satisfy that commitment and any additional affordability and income
eligibility conditions adopted by the local government under this
chapter. In the case of projects intended exclusively for owner
occupancy, the minimum requirement of (a)(ii) of this subsection may be
satisfied solely through housing affordable to moderate-income
households.
(b) The exemptions provided in (a) of this subsection do not
include the value of land or nonhousing-related improvements not
qualifying under this chapter.
(2) When a local government adopts guidelines pursuant to section
5(2) of this act and includes conditions that must be satisfied with
respect to individual dwelling units, rather than with respect to the
multiple-unit housing as a whole or some minimum portion thereof, the
exemption may, at the local government's discretion, be limited to the
value of the qualifying improvements allocable to those dwelling units
that meet the local guidelines.
(3) In the case of rehabilitation of existing buildings, the
exemption does not include the value of improvements constructed prior
to the submission of the application required under this chapter. The
incentive provided by this chapter is in addition to any other
incentives, tax credits, grants, or other incentives provided by law.
(4) This chapter does not apply to increases in assessed valuation
made by the assessor on nonqualifying portions of building and value of
land nor to increases made by lawful order of a county board of
equalization, the department of revenue, or a county, to a class of
property throughout the county or specific area of the county to
achieve the uniformity of assessment or appraisal required by law.
(5) At the conclusion of the exemption period, the new or
rehabilitated housing cost are considered as new construction for the
purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 APPLICATION--REQUIREMENTS. An owner of
property making application under this chapter must meet the following
requirements:
(1) The new or rehabilitated multiple-unit housing must be located
in a residential targeted area as designated by the county;
(2) The multiple-unit housing must meet guidelines as adopted by
the governing authority that may include height, density, public
benefit features, number and size of proposed development, parking,
income limits for occupancy, limits on rents or sale prices, and other
adopted requirements indicated necessary by the county. The required
amenities should be relative to the size of the project and tax benefit
to be obtained;
(3) The new, converted, or rehabilitated multiple-unit housing must
provide for a minimum of fifty percent of the space for permanent
residential occupancy. In the case of existing occupied multifamily
development, the multifamily housing must also provide for a minimum of
four additional multifamily units. Existing multifamily vacant housing
that has been vacant for twelve months or more does not have to provide
additional multifamily units;
(4) New construction multifamily housing and rehabilitation
improvements must be completed within three years from the date of
approval of the application;
(5) Property proposed to be rehabilitated must fail to comply with
one or more standards of the applicable state or local building or
housing codes on or after the effective date of this section. If the
property proposed to be rehabilitated is not vacant, an applicant must
provide each existing tenant housing of comparable size, quality, and
price and a reasonable opportunity to relocate; and
(6) The applicant must enter into a contract with the county
approved by the governing authority, or an administrative official or
commission authorized by the governing authority, under which the
applicant has agreed to the implementation of the development on terms
and conditions satisfactory to the governing authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 DESIGNATION OF RESIDENTIAL TARGETED AREA--CRITERIA--LOCAL DESIGNATION--HEARING--STANDARDS, GUIDELINES. (1) The
following criteria must be met before an area may be designated as a
residential targeted area:
(a) The area must be within an urban center, as determined by the
governing authority;
(b) The area must lack, as determined by the governing authority,
sufficient available, desirable, and convenient residential housing,
including affordable housing, to meet the needs of the public who would
be likely to live in the urban center, if the affordable, desirable,
attractive, and livable places to live were available; and
(c) The providing of additional housing opportunity, including
affordable housing, in the area, as determined by the governing
authority, will assist in achieving one or more of the stated purposes
of this chapter.
(2) For the purpose of designating a residential targeted area or
areas, the governing authority may adopt a resolution of intention to
so designate an area as generally described in the resolution. The
resolution must state the time and place of a hearing to be held by the
governing authority to consider the designation of the area and may
include such other information pertaining to the designation of the
area as the governing authority determines to be appropriate to apprise
the public of the action intended.
(3) The governing authority must give notice of a hearing held
under this chapter by publication of the notice once each week for two
consecutive weeks, not less than seven days, nor more than thirty days
before the date of the hearing in a paper having a general circulation
in the county where the proposed residential targeted area is located.
The notice must state the time, date, place, and purpose of the hearing
and generally identify the area proposed to be designated as a
residential targeted area.
(4) Following the hearing, or a continuance of the hearing, the
governing authority may designate all or a portion of the area
described in the resolution of intent as a residential targeted area if
it finds, in its sole discretion, that the criteria in subsections (1)
through (3) of this section have been met.
(5) After designation of a residential targeted area, the governing
authority must adopt and implement standards and guidelines to be
utilized in considering applications and making the determinations
required under section 8 of this act. The standards and guidelines
must establish basic requirements for both new construction and
rehabilitation, which must include:
(a) Application process and procedures;
(b) Requirements that address demolition of existing structures and
site utilization; and
(c) Building requirements that may include elements addressing
parking, height, density, environmental impact, and compatibility with
the existing surrounding property and such other amenities as will
attract and keep permanent residents and that will properly enhance the
livability of the residential targeted area in which they are to be
located.
(6) The governing authority may adopt and implement, either as
conditions to eight-year exemptions or as conditions to an extended
exemption period under section (4)(a)(ii) of this act, or both, more
stringent income eligibility, rent, or sale price limits, including
limits that apply to a higher percentage of units, than the minimum
conditions for an extended exemption period under section (4)(a)(ii) of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 APPLICATION--PROCEDURES. An owner of
property seeking tax incentives under this chapter must complete the
following procedures:
(1) In the case of rehabilitation or where demolition or new
construction is required, the owner must secure from the governing
authority or duly authorized representative, before commencement of
rehabilitation improvements or new construction, verification of
property noncompliance with applicable building and housing codes;
(2) In the case of new and rehabilitated multifamily housing, the
owner must apply to the county on forms adopted by the governing
authority. The application must contain the following:
(a) Information setting forth the grounds supporting the requested
exemption including information indicated on the application form or in
the guidelines;
(b) A description of the project and site plan, including the floor
plan of units and other information requested;
(c) A statement that the applicant is aware of the potential tax
liability involved when the property ceases to be eligible for the
incentive provided under this chapter;
(3) The applicant must verify the application by oath or
affirmation; and
(4) The application must be accompanied by the application fee, if
any, required under section 10 of this act. The governing authority
may permit the applicant to revise an application before final action
by the governing authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 APPROVAL--REQUIRED FINDINGS. The duly
authorized administrative official or committee of the county may
approve the application if it finds that:
(1) A minimum of four new units are being constructed or in the
case of occupied rehabilitation or conversion a minimum of four
additional multifamily units are being developed;
(2) If applicable, the proposed multiunit housing project meets the
affordable housing requirements as described in section 4 of this act;
(3) The proposed project is or will be, at the time of completion,
in conformance with all local plans and regulations that apply at the
time the application is approved;
(4) The owner has complied with all standards and guidelines
adopted by the county under this chapter; and
(5) The site is located in a residential targeted area of an urban
center that has been designated by the governing authority in
accordance with procedures and guidelines indicated in section 6 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 PROCESSING--APPROVAL--DENIAL--APPEAL. (1)
The governing authority or an administrative official or commission
authorized by the governing authority must approve or deny an
application filed under this chapter within ninety days after receipt
of the application.
(2) If the application is approved, the county must issue the owner
of the property a conditional certificate of acceptance of tax
exemption. The certificate must contain a statement by a duly
authorized administrative official of the governing authority that the
property has complied with the required findings indicated in section
8 of this act.
(3) If the application is denied by the authorized administrative
official or commission authorized by the governing authority, the
deciding administrative official or commission must state in writing
the reasons for denial and send the notice to the applicant at the
applicant's last known address within ten days of the denial.
(4) Upon denial by a duly authorized administrative official or
commission, an applicant may appeal the denial to the governing
authority within thirty days after receipt of the denial. The appeal
before the governing authority will be based upon the record made
before the administrative official with the burden of proof on the
applicant to show that there was no substantial evidence to support the
administrative official's decision. The decision of the governing body
in denying or approving the application is final.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 FEES. The governing authority may
establish an application fee. This fee may not exceed an amount
determined to be required to cover the cost to be incurred by the
governing authority and the assessor in administering this chapter.
The application fee must be paid at the time the application for
limited exemption is filed. If the application is approved, the
governing authority must pay the application fee to the county assessor
for deposit in the county current expense fund, after first deducting
that portion of the fee attributable to its own administrative costs in
processing the application. If the application is denied, the
governing authority may retain that portion of the application fee
attributable to its own administrative costs and refund the balance to
the applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 FILING REQUIREMENTS UPON COMPLETION--OWNER,
COUNTY--DETERMINATION BY COUNTY--NOTICE OF INTENTION OF COUNTY NOT TO
FILE--EXTENSION OF DEADLINE--APPEAL. (1) Upon completion of
rehabilitation or new construction for which an application for a
limited tax exemption under this chapter has been approved and after
issuance of the certificate of occupancy, the owner must file with the
county the following:
(a) A statement of the amount of rehabilitation or construction
expenditures made with respect to each housing unit and the composite
expenditures made in the rehabilitation or construction of the entire
property;
(b) A description of the work that has been completed and a
statement that the rehabilitation improvements or new construction on
the owner's property qualify the property for limited exemption under
this chapter;
(c) If applicable, a statement that the project meets the
affordable housing requirements as described in section 4 of this act;
and
(d) A statement that the work has been completed within three years
of the issuance of the conditional certificate of tax exemption.
(2) Within thirty days after receipt of the statements required
under subsection (1) of this section, the authorized representative of
the county must determine whether the work completed, and the
affordability of the units, is consistent with the application and the
contract approved by the county and is qualified for a limited tax
exemption under this chapter. The county must also determine which
specific improvements completed meet the requirements and required
findings.
(3) If the rehabilitation, conversion, or construction is completed
within three years of the date the application for a limited tax
exemption is filed under this chapter, or within an authorized
extension of this time limit, and the authorized representative of the
county determines that improvements were constructed consistent with
the application and other applicable requirements, including if
applicable, affordable housing requirements, and the owner's property
is qualified for a limited tax exemption under this chapter, the county
must file the certificate of tax exemption with the county assessor
within ten days of the expiration of the thirty-day period provided
under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The authorized representative of the county must notify the
applicant that a certificate of tax exemption is not going to be filed
if the authorized representative determines that:
(a) The rehabilitation or new construction was not completed within
three years of the application date, or within any authorized extension
of the time limit;
(b) The improvements were not constructed consistent with the
application or other applicable requirements;
(c) If applicable, the affordable housing requirements as described
in RCW 84.14.020 were not met; or
(d) The owner's property is otherwise not qualified for limited
exemption under this chapter.
(5) If the authorized representative of the county finds that
construction or rehabilitation of multiple-unit housing was not
completed within the required time period due to circumstances beyond
the control of the owner and that the owner has been acting and could
reasonably be expected to act in good faith and with due diligence, the
governing authority or the county official authorized by the governing
authority may extend the deadline for completion of construction or
rehabilitation for a period not to exceed twenty-four consecutive
months.
(6) The governing authority may provide by ordinance for an appeal
of a decision by the deciding officer or authority that an owner is not
entitled to a certificate of tax exemption to the governing authority,
a hearing examiner, or other county officer authorized by the governing
authority to hear the appeal in accordance with such reasonable
procedures and time periods as provided by ordinance of the governing
authority. The owner may appeal a decision by the deciding officer or
authority that is not subject to local appeal or a decision by the
local appeal authority that the owner is not entitled to a certificate
of tax exemption in superior court under RCW 34.05.510 through
34.05.598, if the appeal is filed within thirty days of notification by
the county to the owner of the decision being challenged.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 REPORT--FILING. (1) Thirty days after the
anniversary of the date of the certificate of tax exemption and each
year for the tax exemption period, the owner of the rehabilitated or
newly constructed property must file with a designated authorized
representative of the county an annual report indicating the following:
(a) A statement of occupancy and vacancy of the rehabilitated or
newly constructed property during the twelve months ending with the
anniversary date;
(b) A certification by the owner that the property has not changed
use and, if applicable, that the property has been in compliance with
the affordable housing requirements as described in section 4 of this
act since the date of the certificate approved by the county;
(c) A description of changes or improvements constructed after
issuance of the certificate of tax exemption; and
(d) Any additional information requested by the county in regards
to the units receiving a tax exemption.
(2) All counties, which issue certificates of tax exemption for
multiunit housing that conform to the requirements of this chapter,
shall report annually by December 31st of each year, beginning in 2012,
to the department of commerce. The report must include the following
information:
(a) The number of tax exemption certificates granted;
(b) The total number and type of units produced or to be produced;
(c) The number and type of units produced or to be produced meeting
affordable housing requirements;
(d) The actual development cost of each unit produced;
(e) The total monthly rent or total sale amount of each unit
produced;
(f) The income of each renter household at the time of initial
occupancy and the income of each initial purchaser of owner-occupied
units at the time of purchase for each of the units receiving a tax
exemption and a summary of these figures for the county; and
(g) The value of the tax exemption for each project receiving a tax
exemption and the total value of tax exemptions granted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 CANCELLATION OF EXEMPTION--NOTICE BY OWNER
OF CHANGE IN USE--ADDITIONAL TAX--PENALTY--INTEREST--LIEN--NOTICE OF
CANCELLATION--APPEAL--CORRECTION OF TAX ROLLS. (1) If improvements
have been exempted under this chapter, the improvements continue to be
exempted for the applicable period under section 4 of this act, so long
as they are not converted to another use and continue to satisfy all
applicable conditions. If the owner intends to convert the multifamily
development to another use, or if applicable, if the owner intends to
discontinue compliance with the affordable housing requirements as
described in section 4 of this act or any other condition to exemption,
the owner must notify the assessor within sixty days of the change in
use or intended discontinuance. If, after a certificate of tax
exemption has been filed with the county assessor, the authorized
representative of the governing authority discovers that a portion of
the property is changed or will be changed to a use that is other than
residential or that housing or amenities no longer meet the
requirements, including, if applicable, affordable housing
requirements, as previously approved or agreed upon by contract between
the county and the owner and that the multifamily housing, or a portion
of the housing, no longer qualifies for the exemption, the tax
exemption must be canceled and the following must occur:
(a) Additional real property tax must be imposed upon the value of
the nonqualifying improvements in the amount that would normally be
imposed, plus a penalty must be imposed amounting to twenty percent.
This additional tax is calculated based upon the difference between the
property tax paid and the property tax that would have been paid if it
had included the value of the nonqualifying improvements dated back to
the date that the improvements were converted to a nonmultifamily use;
(b) The tax must include interest upon the amounts of the
additional tax at the same statutory rate charged on delinquent
property taxes from the dates on which the additional tax could have
been paid without penalty if the improvements had been assessed at a
value without regard to this chapter; and
(c) The additional tax owed together with interest and penalty must
become a lien on the land and attach at the time the property or
portion of the property is removed from multifamily use or the
amenities no longer meet applicable requirements, and has priority to
and must be fully paid and satisfied before a recognizance, mortgage,
judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with which the land
may become charged or liable. The lien may be foreclosed upon
expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner
provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property
taxes. An additional tax unpaid on its due date is delinquent. From
the date of delinquency until paid, interest must be charged at the
same rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.
(2) Upon a determination that a tax exemption is to be canceled for
a reason stated in this section, the governing authority or authorized
representative shall notify the record owner of the property as shown
by the tax rolls by mail, return receipt requested, of the
determination to cancel the exemption. The owner may appeal the
determination to the governing authority or authorized representative,
within thirty days by filing a notice of appeal with the clerk of the
governing authority, which notice must specify the factual and legal
basis on which the determination of cancellation is alleged to be
erroneous. The governing authority or a hearing examiner or other
official authorized by the governing authority may hear the appeal. At
the hearing, all affected parties may be heard and all competent
evidence received. After the hearing, the deciding body or officer
shall either affirm, modify, or repeal the decision of cancellation of
exemption based on the evidence received. An aggrieved party may
appeal the decision of the deciding body or officer to the superior
court under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.
(3) Upon determination by the governing authority or authorized
representative to terminate an exemption, the county officials having
possession of the assessment and tax rolls must correct the rolls in
the manner provided for omitted property under RCW 84.40.080. The
county assessor shall make such a valuation of the property and
improvements as is necessary to permit the correction of the rolls.
The value of the new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements added to the rolls is considered as new
construction for the purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW. The owner may
appeal the valuation to the county board of equalization under chapter
84.48 RCW and according to the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. If there
has been a failure to comply with this chapter, the property must be
listed as an omitted assessment for assessment years beginning January
1 of the calendar year in which the noncompliance first occurred, but
the listing as an omitted assessment may not be for a period more than
three calendar years preceding the year in which the failure to comply
was discovered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 13 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 84 RCW.

--- END ---