BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that small
businesses are the backbone of our economy, creating two out of every
three new jobs. The legislature further finds that during these tough
economic times, it has never been more necessary to support small
businesses so that they can focus on what they do best--running and
growing their businesses.
(2) The governor issued Executive Order 10-05 on October 26, 2010.
This executive order charged the department of revenue with exploring,
evaluating, and recommending tax simplification solutions to help small
businesses by reducing the complexity of the state's tax system.
(3) Following extensive outreach with small business owners,
business associations, tax practitioners, and local government
officials, the department of revenue issued its report to the governor
on June 29, 2011. Key findings and recommendations from the
department's report include:
(a) Small businesses struggle with business and occupation (B&O)
tax reporting, particularly when they are subject to B&O taxes in one
or more of the thirty-nine cities that currently impose a B&O tax.
(b) Despite 2003 legislation requiring a model B&O tax ordinance
for municipal B&O taxes, there are still significant differences
between the state's B&O tax system, the model B&O tax ordinance, and
each city's B&O tax system.
(c) The state's B&O tax system has over fifty tax classifications.
A business must report under one or more tax classifications depending
on its business activities. The large number of tax classifications
creates complexity for small businesses as they attempt to determine
which classification or classifications they must report under.
(d) Local business licensing requirements are a significant burden
on small businesses. Approximately two hundred twelve of the two
hundred eighty cities in Washington require a license to engage in
business within the city. Fees associated with city business licenses
vary from flat-rate charges to fees based on one or more factors,
including employee count, square footage occupied, and business type.
(e) State and local B&O tax administration should be centralized as
is done today with sales tax. Centralizing the administration of state
and local B&O taxes would provide one of the greatest simplifications
for small businesses with the least impact on local governments.
Centralized B&O tax reporting would provide businesses with one place
to go for information and reduce the number of forms required to be
filed. It would also involve reducing the number of tax
classifications and providing greater uniformity of tax classifications
and definitions.
(f) Work should continue on integration of state systems working
toward a goal of a single internet business portal for small businesses
to use to interact with the state.
(4) The legislature concurs with the key findings and
recommendations as summarized in subsection (3) of this section. Based
on these findings and recommendations, the legislature intends to
pursue a long-term vision of a single internet portal for business
licensing, registration, and tax reporting, to include both state and
local governments. The legislature recognizes that implementing this
vision will require a significant investment in resources, both human
and financial, and will take a considerable amount of time to fully
achieve. Therefore, the legislature intends by this act to begin the
tax and licensing simplification process by reducing the number of
state B&O tax classifications; requiring greater uniformity between
local B&O taxes and the state B&O tax, with a goal of state-level
administration of all local B&O taxes by January 1, 2015, or as soon
thereafter as possible; and simplifying local business licensing to
facilitate the transition to mandatory issuance and renewal of local
business licenses through the state's business licensing system by July
1, 2014, or as soon thereafter as possible, for cities imposing a B&O
tax, and by January 1, 2018, or as soon thereafter as possible, for all
other cities and towns that have a business licensing requirement.

PART I
INCREASING UNIFORMITY BETWEEN STATE AND LOCAL B&O TAXES
Sec. 101 RCW 35.102.020 and 2007 c 6 s 1021 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Chapter 79, Laws of 2003)) (1) This chapter does not apply to
utility taxes ((on any service)) imposed by a city. For purposes of
this subsection, "utility tax" means a tax that historically or
traditionally has been ((taxed as a)) imposed on utility ((business))
businesses for municipal tax purposes((, such as:
(1) A light and power business or a natural gas distribution
business, as defined in RCW 82.16.010;
(2) A telephone business, as defined in RCW 82.16.010;
(3) Cable television services;
(4) Sewer or water services;
(5) Drainage services;
(6) Solid waste services; or
(7) Steam services)).
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, city business
and occupation taxes apply to business activities that have
historically been taxed under a city's utility tax, such as cable
television service and telecommunications service, to the extent that
such activities are subject to state business and occupation tax.
Nothing in this chapter prevents a city from taxing business activities
under both its business and occupation tax and utility tax. However,
a city is free to exempt an activity from either or both of its utility
tax and business and occupation tax if such activity would otherwise be
subject to both taxes.
(3) No city may tax an activity under its business and occupation
tax if such activity is subject to the state public utility tax under
chapter 82.16 RCW. However, a city may tax such activities under the
city's utility tax.

Sec. 102 RCW 35.102.030 and 2003 c 79 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter ((79,
Laws of 2003)), unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Business" has the same meaning as given in chapter 82.04 RCW.
(2) "City" means a city, town, or code city.
(3) "Business and occupation tax" or "gross receipts tax" means a
tax imposed on or measured by the value of products, the gross income
of the business, or the gross proceeds of sales, as the case may be,
and that is the legal liability of the business.
(4) "Value of products" has the same meaning as given in chapter
82.04 RCW.
(5) "Gross income of the business" has the same meaning as given in
chapter 82.04 RCW.
(6) "Gross proceeds of sales" has the same meaning as given in
chapter 82.04 RCW.
(7) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(8) "State business and occupation tax" means the tax imposed in
chapter 82.04 RCW.
(9) "State business and occupation tax definitions" means the
definitions in chapter 82.04 RCW, rules adopted by the department to
administer chapter 82.04 RCW, and interpretive statements or other
public guidance issued by the department relating to the tax imposed in
chapter 82.04 RCW.
(10) "City business and occupation tax" means a business and
occupation tax imposed by a city.
(11) "Service and other business activities classification" means
the classification under which an activity is taxed if it is not taxed
under some other classification.

Sec. 103 RCW 35.102.040 and 2010 c 271 s 706 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) ((The cities, working through the association of Washington
cities, shall form a model ordinance development committee made up of
a representative sampling of cities that as of July 27, 2003, impose a
business and occupation tax. This committee shall work through the
association of Washington cities to adopt a model ordinance on
municipal gross receipts business and occupation tax. The model
ordinance and subsequent amendments shall)) After June 30, 2012, only
the department may amend the city business and occupation tax model
ordinance. Beginning July 1, 2012, the department may amend the model
ordinance as it deems appropriate. Amendments, other than those
required to conform with changes to state law, must be adopted using a
process that includes opportunity for substantial input from cities,
individually or through the association of Washington cities, business
stakeholders, and other members of the public. Input ((shall)) must be
solicited from statewide business associations and from local chambers
of commerce and downtown business associations in cities that levy a
business and occupation tax.
(b) The department of commerce ((shall)) must contract to post the
model ordinance on an internet web site and to make paper copies
available for inspection upon request. The department of revenue and
the department of licensing ((shall)) must post copies of or links to
the model ordinance on their internet web sites. Additionally, a city
that imposes a business and occupation tax must make copies of its
ordinance available for inspection and copying as provided in chapter
42.56 RCW.
(((c) The definitions and tax classifications in the model
ordinance may not be amended more frequently than once every four
years, however the model ordinance may be amended at any time to comply
with changes in state law. Any amendment to a mandatory provision of
the model ordinance must be adopted with the same effective date by all
cities.))
(2) A city that imposes a business and occupation tax must adopt
the mandatory provisions of the model ordinance. The following
provisions are mandatory:
(a) A system of credits that meets the requirements of RCW
35.102.060 and a form for such use;
(b) A uniform, minimum small business tax threshold of at least the
equivalent of twenty thousand dollars in gross income annually. A city
may elect to deviate from this requirement by creating a higher
threshold or exemption, but it ((shall)) may not deviate lower than the
level required in this subsection((. If a city has a small business
threshold or exemption in excess of that provided in this subsection as
of January 1, 2003, and chooses to deviate below the threshold or
exemption level that was in place as of January 1, 2003, the city must
notify all businesses licensed to do business within the city at least
one hundred twenty days prior to the potential implementation of a
lower threshold or exemption amount));
(c) Tax reporting frequencies that meet the requirements of RCW
35.102.070;
(d) Penalty and interest provisions that meet the requirements of
RCW 35.102.080 and 35.102.090;
(e) Claim periods that meet the requirements of RCW 35.102.100;
(f) Refund provisions that meet the requirements of RCW 35.102.110;
and
(g) Allocation and apportionment provisions that meet the
requirements of this chapter;
(h) Provisions consistent with RCW 82.04.480 and 82.04.520;
(i) Nexus provisions consistent with RCW 35.102.050;
(j) Tax classifications for reporting purposes that include all of
the state business and occupation tax classifications, including those
created in RCW 82.04.230 through 82.04.298, classifications created
after the effective date of this section and codified outside of those
statutes, and any classifications created by the department under the
authority of section 402 of this act. The model ordinance may not
include any classifications that are not used for state business and
occupation tax purposes; and
(k) Definitions, which at a minimum, must include the definitions
enumerated in RCW 35.102.030 and 35.102.120. ((The definitions in
chapter 82.04 RCW shall be used as the baseline for all definitions in
the model ordinance, and any deviation in the model ordinance from
these definitions must be described by a comment in the model
ordinance.))
(3) Except for the deduction required by RCW 35.102.160 and the
system of credits developed to address multiple taxation under
subsection (2)(a) of this section, a city may adopt its own provisions
for tax exemptions, tax credits, and tax deductions.
(4) Any city that adopts an ordinance that deviates from the
nonmandatory provisions of the model ordinance ((shall)) must make a
description of such differences available to the public, in written and
electronic form.

Sec. 104 RCW 35.102.050 and 2008 c 129 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A city may not impose a business and occupation tax on a person
unless that person has a substantial nexus with the city. For the
purposes of this section, the term "substantial nexus" means business
activities conducted by a person sufficient to subject that person to
the taxing jurisdiction of a city under the standards established for
interstate commerce under the commerce clause of the United States
Constitution and the person has a substantial nexus with the state
under RCW 82.04.067 or 82.04.220(2).
(2) It must be conclusively presumed that a person that has a
substantial nexus with the state under RCW 82.04.067 or 82.04.220(2)
has a substantial nexus with any city in this state in which the person
conducts business activities sufficient to generate gross income of the
business or value of products, or any combination thereof, exceeding
the city's small business tax threshold.
(3) Mere registration under or compliance with the streamlined
sales and use tax agreement does not constitute a substantial nexus for
the purposes of this section.
(4) A person that has a substantial nexus with a city under this
section in one tax year will be deemed to have a substantial nexus with
the city for the next tax year even if that person would otherwise not
have a substantial nexus with the city under this section for that
subsequent tax year.

Sec. 105 RCW 35.102.120 and 2003 c 79 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the definitions in RCW 35.102.030, the following
terms and phrases must be defined in the model ordinance under RCW
35.102.040, and such definitions ((shall)) must include any specific
requirements as noted in this ((subsection)) section:
(a) Eligible gross receipts tax.
(b) Extracting.
(c) Manufacturing. ((Software development may not be defined as a
manufacturing activity.)) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, "manufacturing" must have the same meaning as "to manufacture"
in RCW 82.04.120.
(d) Retailing.
(e) Retail sale.
(f) Services. The term "services" excludes retail or wholesale
services.
(g) Wholesale sale.
(h) Wholesaling.
(i) To manufacture.
(j) Commercial ((and)) or industrial use.
(k) Engaging in business.
(l) Person.
(2) ((Any)) (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section or
other provisions of this chapter:
(i) The state business and occupation tax definitions apply to the
model ordinance and any city's business and occupation tax in the same
manner as they apply for purposes of chapter 82.04 RCW; and
(ii) A city may not, for purposes of its business and occupation
tax, deviate from the state business and occupation tax definitions in
its ordinances, rules, other public guidance, and interpretations.
(b) For purposes of complying with (a) of this subsection (2),
references to the department in state business and occupation tax
definitions must be construed as references to the city or cities,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(c) For purposes of complying with (a) of this subsection (2),
references to the state in state business and occupation tax
definitions must be construed as references to the city or cities,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(d) Any portion of a state business and occupation tax definition
that relates solely to sales or use tax or otherwise does not apply to
the tax imposed in chapter 82.04 RCW does not apply to the model
ordinance or business and occupation taxes imposed by the cities.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the cities and
the model ordinance need not adopt any exclusionary language contained
in a state business and occupation tax definition, but only if the
exclusionary language has the effect of exempting a person, activity,
or income from the tax imposed in chapter 82.04 RCW.
(f) Notwithstanding (e) of this subsection (2), a city may not
deviate from the exclusion in RCW 82.04.062 from the definitions of
"wholesale sale," "sale at wholesale," "retail sale," and "sale at
retail." Cities imposing a business and occupation tax must compute
tax on the business of making sales of precious metal bullion or
monetized bullion consistent with RCW 82.04.062.
(g) Notwithstanding (e) of this subsection (2), cities may not
deviate from the exclusion in RCW 82.04.216 of steam, electricity, and
electrical energy from various terms denoting tangible items that may
be used, sold, or consumed.
(h) Language in a state business and occupation tax definition
governing how the defined term is to be applied for state business and
occupation tax purposes also applies for purposes of city business and
occupation taxes.
(3) Tax classifications in addition to those enumerated in
subsection (1) of this section ((that)), which are required to be
included in the model ordinance pursuant to RCW 35.102.040(2)(j), must
be uniform among all cities and with state business and occupation tax
classifications.

Sec. 106 RCW 35.102.140 and 2003 c 79 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Cities imposing business and occupation taxes must comply with
all requirements of RCW 35.102.020 through 35.102.130 by December 31,
2004. A city that has not complied with the requirements of RCW
35.102.020 through 35.102.130 by December 31, 2004, may not impose a
tax that is imposed by a city on the privilege of engaging in business
activities.)) (1) Cities imposing business and occupation taxes after
December 31, 2004, must comply with ((RCW 35.102.020 through
35.102.130)) this chapter.
(2) The department may issue official written guidance on any
provision of a city's business and occupation tax that is required by
this chapter to be administered consistently with the state business
and occupation tax. Any such official public guidance issued by the
department preempts any conflicting interpretation of the city.
Likewise, any official public guidance issued by the department on a
state business and occupation tax matter preempts any conflicting
interpretation by the city on a matter involving a provision of the
city's business and occupation tax that is required by this chapter to
be administered consistently with the state business and occupation
tax. Nothing in this subsection is intended to affect the
interpretation or application of a city's business and occupation tax
for periods before the effective date of this section.

Sec. 107 RCW 35.102.160 and 2006 c 301 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provision of professional employer services by a
professional employer organization is taxable under a city's service
and other business activities classification. A city that imposes its
business and occupation tax on professional employer services performed
by a professional employer organization((, regardless of the tax
classification applicable to such services, shall)) must provide a
deduction identical to the deduction in RCW 82.04.540(2).
(2) For the purposes of this section, "professional employer
organization" and "professional employer services" have the same
meanings as in RCW 82.04.540.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning on the effective date of this section, the department may
adopt rules and issue interpretive and policy statements in accordance
with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as it
considers necessary or useful in enhancing uniformity between state and
city business and occupation taxes and in carrying out the department's
duties under this chapter. Such rules and interpretive and policy
statements take precedence over any conflicting rules and interpretive
or policy guidance issued by the cities. The department must seek
input from affected cities before issuing any rules and interpretive
and policy statements concerning city business and occupation taxes to
the extent required by chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
For purposes of city business and occupation taxes, a person may
meet its burden of proving that a sale is a wholesale sale rather than
a retail sale as provided in RCW 82.04.470. Upon request of a city,
the department must assist the city in determining whether a person has
met the requirements of RCW 82.04.470(6).

Sec. 110 RCW 35.102.130 and 2010 c 111 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A city that imposes a business and occupation tax must provide
for the allocation and apportionment of a person's gross income((,
other than persons subject to the provisions of chapter 82.14A RCW, as
follows:
(1) Gross income derived from all activities other than those taxed
as service or royalties)) as provided in this section.
(2) Gross income derived from all activities other than
apportionable activities must be allocated to the location where the
activity takes place.
(a) In the case of sales of tangible personal property, the
activity takes place where delivery to the buyer occurs.
(b)(i) In the case of sales of digital products, the activity takes
place where delivery to the buyer occurs. The delivery of digital
products will be deemed to occur at:
(A) The seller's place of business if the purchaser receives the
digital product at the seller's place of business;
(B) If not received at the seller's place of business, the location
where the purchaser or the purchaser's donee, designated as such by the
purchaser, receives the digital product, including the location
indicated by instructions for delivery to the purchaser or donee, known
to the seller;
(C) If the location where the purchaser or the purchaser's donee
receives the digital product is not known, the purchaser's address
maintained in the ordinary course of the seller's business when use of
this address does not constitute bad faith;
(D) If no address for the purchaser is maintained in the ordinary
course of the seller's business, the purchaser's address obtained
during the consummation of the sale, including the address of a
purchaser's payment instrument, if no other address is available, when
use of this address does not constitute bad faith; and
(E) If no address for the purchaser is obtained during the
consummation of the sale, the address where the digital good or digital
code is first made available for transmission by the seller or the
address from which the digital automated service or service described
in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(b) was provided, disregarding for these
purposes any location that merely provided the digital transfer of the
product sold.
(ii) If none of the methods in (b)(i) of this subsection (((1)))
(2) for determining where the delivery of digital products occurs are
available after a good faith effort by the taxpayer to apply the
methods provided in (b)(i)(A) through (E) of this subsection (((1)))
(2), then the city and the taxpayer may mutually agree to employ any
other method to effectuate an equitable allocation of income from the
sale of digital products. The taxpayer will be responsible for
petitioning the city to use an alternative method under this subsection
(((1))) (2)(b)(ii). The city may employ an alternative method for
allocating the income from the sale of digital products if the methods
provided in (b)(i)(A) through (E) of this subsection (((1))) (2) are
not available and the taxpayer and the city are unable to mutually
agree on an alternative method to effectuate an equitable allocation of
income from the sale of digital products.
(iii) For purposes of this subsection (((1))) (2)(b), the following
definitions apply:
(A) "Digital automated services," "digital codes," and "digital
goods" have the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.192;
(B) "Digital products" means digital goods, digital codes, digital
automated services, and the services described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g)
and (6)(b); and
(C) "Receive" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.32.730.
(c) If a business activity allocated under this subsection (((1)))
(2) takes place in more than one city and all cities impose a gross
receipts tax, a credit must be allowed as provided in RCW 35.102.060;
if not all of the cities impose a gross receipts tax, the affected
cities must allow another credit or allocation system as they and the
taxpayer agree.
(((2) Gross income derived as royalties from the granting of
intangible rights must be allocated to the commercial domicile of the
taxpayer.
(3) Gross income derived from activities taxed as services shall be
apportioned to a city by multiplying apportionable income by a
fraction, the numerator of which is the payroll factor plus the
service-income factor and the denominator of which is two.
(a) The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the
total amount paid in the city during the tax period by the taxpayer for
compensation and the denominator of which is the total compensation
paid everywhere during the tax period. Compensation is paid in the
city if:
(i) The individual is primarily assigned within the city;
(ii) The individual is not primarily assigned to any place of
business for the tax period and the employee performs fifty percent or
more of his or her service for the tax period in the city; or
(iii) The individual is not primarily assigned to any place of
business for the tax period, the individual does not perform fifty
percent or more of his or her service in any city, and the employee
resides in the city.
(b) The service income factor is a fraction, the numerator of which
is the total service income of the taxpayer in the city during the tax
period, and the denominator of which is the total service income of the
taxpayer everywhere during the tax period. Service income is in the
city if:
(i) The customer location is in the city; or
(ii) The income-producing activity is performed in more than one
location and a greater proportion of the service-income-producing
activity is performed in the city than in any other location, based on
costs of performance, and the taxpayer is not taxable at the customer
location; or
(iii) The service-income-producing activity is performed within the
city, and the taxpayer is not taxable in the customer location.
(c) If the allocation and apportionment provisions of this
subsection do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's
business activity in the city or cities in which the taxpayer does
business, the taxpayer may petition for or the tax administrators may
jointly require, in respect to all or any part of the taxpayer's
business activity, that one of the following methods be used jointly by
the cities to allocate or apportion gross income, if reasonable:
(i) Separate accounting;
(ii) The use of a single factor;
(iii) The inclusion of one or more additional factors that will
fairly represent the taxpayer's business activity in the city; or
(iv) The employment of any other method to effectuate an equitable
allocation and apportionment of the taxpayer's income.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Apportionable income" means the gross income of the business
taxable under the service classifications of a city's gross receipts
tax, including income received from activities outside the city if the
income would be taxable under the service classification if received
from activities within the city, less any exemptions or deductions
available.
(b) "Compensation" means wages, salaries, commissions, and any
other form of remuneration paid to individuals for personal services
that are or would be included in the individual's gross income under
the federal internal revenue code.
(c) "Individual" means any individual who, under the usual common
law rules applicable in determining the employer-employee relationship,
has the status of an employee of that taxpayer.
(d) "Customer location" means the city or unincorporated area of a
county where the majority of the contacts between the taxpayer and the
customer take place.
(e) "Primarily assigned" means the business location of the
taxpayer where the individual performs his or her duties.
(f) "Service-taxable income" or "service income" means gross income
of the business subject to tax under either the service or royalty
classification.
(g) "Tax period" means the calendar year during which tax liability
is accrued. If taxes are reported by a taxpayer on a basis more
frequent than once per year, taxpayers shall calculate the factors for
the previous calendar year for reporting in the current calendar year
and correct the reporting for the previous year when the factors are
calculated for that year, but not later than the end of the first
quarter of the following year.
(h) "Taxable in the customer location" means either that a taxpayer
is subject to a gross receipts tax in the customer location for the
privilege of doing business, or that the government where the customer
is located has the authority to subject the taxpayer to gross receipts
tax regardless of whether, in fact, the government does so.))
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, gross income
received from apportionable activities must be apportioned to a city by
multiplying apportionable income by the receipts factor. Persons who
are subject to tax under more than one tax classification on their
apportionable activities must calculate a separate receipts factor for
each tax classification the person is taxable under.
(a) The receipts factor is a fraction and is calculated as provided
in this subsection.
(i) The numerator of the receipts factor is the total gross income
of the taxpayer attributable to the city during the tax year from
engaging in an apportionable activity. The denominator of the receipts
factor is the total gross income of the taxpayer from engaging in an
apportionable activity everywhere in the world during the tax year.
(ii) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for purposes
of computing the receipts factor, gross income generated from each
apportionable activity is attributable to the city, if any:
(A) Where the customer received the benefit of the taxpayer's
service or, in the case of gross income from royalties, where the
customer used the taxpayer's intangible property. When a customer
receives the benefit of the taxpayer's services or uses the taxpayer's
intangible property in the city and outside of the city and the amount
of gross income that was received by the taxpayer in return for the
services received or intangible property used by the customer in the
city can be reasonably determined by the taxpayer, such amount of gross
income must be attributed to the city.
(B) If the customer received the benefit of the service or used the
intangible property in the city and outside of the city and the
taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income under the provisions of
(a)(ii)(A) of this subsection (3), gross income of the business must be
attributed to the location in which the benefit of the service was
primarily received or in which the intangible property was primarily
used.
(C) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income under the
provisions of (a)(ii)(A) or (B) of this subsection (3), gross income
must be attributed to the location from which the customer ordered the
service or, in the case of royalties, the office of the customer from
which the royalty agreement with the taxpayer was negotiated.
(D) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income under the
provisions of (a)(ii)(A), (B), or (C) of this subsection (3), gross
income must be attributed to the location to which the billing
statements or invoices are sent to the customer by the taxpayer.
(E) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income under the
provisions of (a)(ii)(A), (B), (C), or (D) of this subsection (3),
gross income of the business must be attributed to the location from
which the customer sends payment to the taxpayer.
(F) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income under the
provisions of (a)(ii)(A), (B), (C), (D), or (E) of this subsection (3),
gross income must be attributed to the location of the customer as
indicated by the customer's address: (I) Shown in the taxpayer's
business records maintained in the regular course of business; or (II)
obtained during consummation of the sale or the negotiation of the
contract for services or for the use of the taxpayer's intangible
property, including any address of a customer's payment instrument when
readily available to the taxpayer and no other address is available.
(G) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (a)(ii)(A), (B), (C), (D), (E), or (F)
of this subsection (3), gross income must be attributed to the
commercial domicile of the taxpayer.
(b) For purposes of (a)(ii) of this subsection (3), "customer"
means a person or entity to whom the taxpayer makes a sale or renders
services or from whom the taxpayer otherwise receives gross income of
the business. "Customer" includes anyone who pays royalties or charges
in the nature of royalties for the use of the taxpayer's intangible
property.
(c) A taxpayer may calculate the receipts factor for the current
tax year based on the most recent calendar year for which information
is available for the full calendar year. If a taxpayer does not
calculate the receipts factor for the current tax year based on
previous calendar year information as authorized in this subsection,
the business must use current year information to calculate the
receipts factor for the current tax year. In either case, a taxpayer
must correct the reporting for the current tax year when complete
information is available to calculate the receipts factor for that
year, but not later than October 31st of the following tax year.
Interest applies to any additional tax due on a corrected tax return.
Interest must be computed and assessed in the manner provided in RCW
82.32.050 and accrues until the additional taxes are paid. Penalties
in accordance with RCW 82.32.090 will apply to any such additional tax
due only if the current tax year reporting is not corrected and the
additional tax is not paid by October 31st of the following tax year.
Interest as provided in RCW 82.32.060 will apply to any tax paid in
excess of that properly due on a return as a result of a taxpayer using
previous calendar year data or incomplete current-year data to
calculate the receipts factor.
(d) This subsection does not apply to financial institutions with
respect to apportionable income taxable under a city's service and
other business activities classification.
(4) The department must by rule provide a method of apportioning
the apportionable income of financial institutions, where such
apportionable income is taxable under a city's service and other
business activities classification. The rule adopted by the department
must be consistent, to the extent feasible, with the rule adopted by
the department as required by RCW 82.04.460(2).
(5) If the department adopts a rule as authorized in RCW
82.04.460(3), gross income received from sales of telecommunications
service and competitive telephone service must be allocated or
apportioned for purposes of city business and occupation taxes
consistent with the department's rule notwithstanding anything to the
contrary in this section.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Apportionable activities" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.460, except that the term does not include the printing and
publishing activities described in RCW 35.102.150.
(b) "Apportionable income" means the gross income of the business
generated from engaging in apportionable activities, including income
received from activities performed outside the city if the income would
be taxable under the city's business and occupation tax if received
from activities within the city, less any exemptions or deductions
available.
(c) "Gross income" means gross income of the business as defined in
RCW 82.04.080.

Sec. 111 RCW 82.14A.020 and 1972 ex.s. c 134 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
((For purposes of RCW 82.14A.010, the state department of revenue
is hereby authorized and directed to promulgate, pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, rules establishing uniform methods of
division of gross income of the business of a single taxpayer between
those cities, towns and unincorporated areas in which such taxpayer has
a place of business.)) The gross income of the business of a financial
institution must be allocated and apportioned in accordance with RCW
35.102.130 and the rule adopted by the department of revenue as
required by RCW 35.102.130(4).

Sec. 112 RCW 82.04.462 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 105 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The apportionable income of a person within the scope of RCW
82.04.460(1) is apportioned to Washington by multiplying its
apportionable income by the receipts factor. Persons who are subject
to tax under more than one of the tax classifications enumerated in RCW
82.04.460(4)(a) (i) through (x) must calculate a separate receipts
factor for each tax classification that the person is taxable under.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, the receipts
factor is a fraction and is calculated as provided in subsections (3)
and (4) of this section and, for financial institutions, as provided in
the rule adopted by the department under the authority of RCW
82.04.460(2).
(3)(a) The numerator of the receipts factor is the total gross
income of the business of the taxpayer attributable to this state
during the tax year from engaging in an apportionable activity. The
denominator of the receipts factor is the total gross income of the
business of the taxpayer from engaging in an apportionable activity
everywhere in the world during the tax year.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, for purposes of
computing the receipts factor, gross income of the business generated
from each apportionable activity is attributable to the state:
(i) Where the customer received the benefit of the taxpayer's
service or, in the case of gross income from royalties, where the
customer used the taxpayer's intangible property. When a customer
receives the benefit of the taxpayer's services or uses the taxpayer's
intangible property in this and one or more other states and the amount
of gross income of the business that was received by the taxpayer in
return for the services received or intangible property used by the
customer in this state can be reasonably determined by the taxpayer,
such amount of gross income must be attributed to this state.
(ii) If the customer received the benefit of the service or used
the intangible property in more than one state and if the taxpayer is
unable to attribute gross income of the business under the provisions
of (b)(i) of this subsection (3), gross income of the business must be
attributed to the state in which the benefit of the service was
primarily received or in which the intangible property was primarily
used.
(iii) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection (3),
gross income of the business must be attributed to the state from which
the customer ordered the service or, in the case of royalties, the
office of the customer from which the royalty agreement with the
taxpayer was negotiated.
(iv) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (3), gross income of the business must be attributed to the
state to which the billing statements or invoices are sent to the
customer by the taxpayer.
(v) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this
subsection (3), gross income of the business must be attributed to the
state from which the customer sends payment to the taxpayer.
(vi) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of
this subsection (3), gross income of the business must be attributed to
the state where the customer is located as indicated by the customer's
address: (A) Shown in the taxpayer's business records maintained in
the regular course of business; or (B) obtained during consummation of
the sale or the negotiation of the contract for services or for the use
of the taxpayer's intangible property, including any address of a
customer's payment instrument when readily available to the taxpayer
and no other address is available.
(vii) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (v), or
(vi) of this subsection (3), gross income of the business must be
attributed to the commercial domicile of the taxpayer.
(viii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(b), "customer" means a
person or entity to whom the taxpayer makes a sale or renders services
or from whom the taxpayer otherwise receives gross income of the
business. "Customer" includes anyone who pays royalties or charges in
the nature of royalties for the use of the taxpayer's intangible
property.
(c) Gross income of the business from engaging in an apportionable
activity must be excluded from the denominator of the receipts factor
if, in respect to such activity, at least some of the activity is
performed in this state, and the gross income is attributable under (b)
of this subsection (3) to a state in which the taxpayer is not taxable.
For purposes of this subsection (3)(c), "not taxable" means that the
taxpayer is not subject to a business activities tax by that state,
except that a taxpayer is taxable in a state in which it would be
deemed to have a substantial nexus with that state under the standards
in RCW 82.04.067(1) regardless of whether that state imposes such a
tax. "Business activities tax" means a tax measured by the amount of,
or economic results of, business activity conducted in a state. The
term includes taxes measured in whole or in part on net income or gross
income or receipts. "Business activities tax" does not include a sales
tax, use tax, or a similar transaction tax, imposed on the sale or
acquisition of goods or services, whether or not denominated a gross
receipts tax or a tax imposed on the privilege of doing business.
(d) This subsection (3) does not apply to financial institutions
with respect to apportionable income taxable under RCW 82.04.290.
Financial institutions must calculate the receipts factor as provided
in subsection (4) of this section and the rule adopted by the
department under the authority of RCW 82.04.460(2) with respect to
apportionable income taxable under RCW 82.04.290. Financial
institutions that are subject to tax under any other tax classification
enumerated in RCW 82.04.460(4)(a) (i) through (v) and (vii) through (x)
must calculate a separate receipts factor, as provided in this section,
for each of the other tax classifications that the financial
institution is taxable under.
(4) A taxpayer may calculate the receipts factor for the current
tax year based on the most recent calendar year for which information
is available for the full calendar year. If a taxpayer does not
calculate the receipts factor for the current tax year based on
previous calendar year information as authorized in this subsection,
the business must use current year information to calculate the
receipts factor for the current tax year. In either case, a taxpayer
must correct the reporting for the current tax year when complete
information is available to calculate the receipts factor for that
year, but not later than October 31st of the following tax year.
Interest will apply to any additional tax due on a corrected tax
return. Interest must be computed and assessed ((at the rate provided
for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to
the date the original return was due, and will accrue)) as provided in
RCW 82.32.050 and accrues until the additional taxes are paid.
Penalties as provided in RCW 82.32.090 will apply to any such
additional tax due only if the current tax year reporting is not
corrected and the additional tax is not paid by October 31st of the
following tax year. Interest as provided in RCW 82.32.060 will apply
to any tax paid in excess of that properly due on a return as a result
of a taxpayer using previous calendar year data or incomplete current-year data to calculate the receipts factor.
(5) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Apportionable activities" and "apportionable income" have the
same meaning as in RCW 82.04.460.
(b) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, any territory or possession
of the United States, or any foreign country or political subdivision
of a foreign country.

PART II
LOCAL BUSINESS LICENSING SIMPLIFICATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Business licensing system" and "business license" have the
same meaning as in RCW 19.02.020.
(2) "City" means a city, town, or code city.
(3) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(4)(a) "Employee" means any individual:
(i) Who is considered an employee under the statutory or common law
of this state;
(ii) Who is considered an employee or worker by the department of
labor and industries;
(iii) Whose wages are reported by his or her employer to the
employment security department for purposes of contributions payable
under chapter 50.24 RCW;
(iv) Who is a sole proprietor of a business; or
(v) Who is an owner, officer, partner, member, manager, or trustee
of a business entity. For purposes of this subsection, "manager" means
a person designated as such by a limited liability company, limited
liability partnership, or similar business entity, in the entity's
certificate of formation or similar governing documents.
(b) An individual that falls within any provision in (a) of this
subsection (4) is an employee regardless of whether that individual is
employed full-time or part-time; is employed on a permanent or
temporary basis; or receives wages, salary, commission, or other form
of remuneration from his or her employer.
(c) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this subsection
(4), an individual who is merely a passive investor in a business and
does not perform any services or activities as an agent of the business
is not an employee.
(d) An individual performing services in his or her capacity as a
director of a corporation or other entity is not an employee of the
entity if the individual does not otherwise fall within the provisions
of (a) of this subsection (4).
(5) "General business license" means a license, not including a
regulatory license, that a city requires all or most businesses to
obtain in order to conduct business within the city. For purposes of
this subsection (5), "regulatory license" means a license that a city
requires only for certain types of businesses, such as taxicab or other
for-hire vehicle operators, adult entertainment businesses, amusement
device operators, massage parlors, debt collectors, door-to-door sales
persons, trade-show operators, and home-based businesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3)
of this section, all cities that impose a business and occupation tax
must, by July 1, 2014, have their general business licenses issued and
renewed, if the license is required to be renewed, through the business
licensing system in accordance with chapter 19.02 RCW.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, by
January 1, 2018, all cities that require general business licenses and
that do not impose a business and occupation tax must have such
licenses issued and renewed, if the license is required to be renewed,
through the business licensing system in accordance with chapter 19.02
RCW.
(3) The department may delay or phase-in the issuance and renewal
of general business licenses beyond the dates provided in subsections
(1) and (2) of this section if funding or other resources are
insufficient to enable the department to meet the deadlines in
subsection (1) or (2) of this section or as necessary to ensure the
business licensing system is adequately prepared to handle all general
business licenses and that the transition to mandatory department
issuance and renewal of general business licenses is as seamless as
possible. To that end, the department, working with affected cities,
is authorized to establish a schedule for assuming the issuance and
renewal of general business licenses as required by this section.
Cities may continue to issue and renew their general business licenses
until those licenses have been incorporated into the business licensing
system. A city whose general business license has been incorporated
into the business licensing system may no longer issue and renew those
licenses.
(4) For purposes of this section, "business and occupation tax" has
the same meaning as in RCW 35.102.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 (1) By the time that a city's general
business license is required to be issued and renewed through the
business licensing system, the license is subject to all of the
provisions of this section.
(2)(a) A city may use only the following types of fees for general
business licenses:
(i) A flat fee as established by the city;
(ii) A flat fee calculated by multiplying a specific dollar amount
by the quotient resulting from dividing the total hours worked by the
business's employees located within the city by one thousand nine
hundred twenty; or
(iii) A range of flat fees where the determination of the
applicable fee is based on the quotient resulting from dividing the
total hours worked by the business's employees located within the city
by one thousand nine hundred twenty.
(b) A city may not use a combination of fees described in (a)(i)
through (iii) of this subsection (2) for its general business license.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, a flat fee for a general
business license must be the same amount for all businesses or for all
businesses within a specified fee range.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, an employee of a staffing firm
is not considered to be an employee of any client of the staffing firm
to whom the employee is assigned. To the extent that a staffing firm
assigns its employees to work in any city that imposes a licensing fee
as authorized in (a) of this subsection (2), the staffing firm is
subject to a licensing fee in such city even if the staffing firm is
not otherwise physically located in that city. For purposes of this
subsection (2)(d), "staffing firm" means a person providing "staffing
services" as defined in RCW 82.04.540.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, a covered employee is not
considered to be an employee of the professional employer organization
with which the individual has a coemployment relationship. Rather, the
covered employee is deemed the sole employee of the client. The
definitions in RCW 82.04.540 apply to this subsection (2)(e).
(f) For purposes of the fees authorized in (a)(ii) and (iii) of
this subsection (2):
(i) Hours worked are for the twelve-month period ending the last
day of the month immediately preceding the month in which the license
for which the fee is imposed takes effect, except that new businesses
must make a reasonable estimation of the hours that their employees
located within the city will work in the city during the twelve-month
period beginning on the date that the license for which the fee is
imposed will take effect; and
(ii) It must be presumed that any employee that works in a city for
any part of a twelve-month period has worked for at least one thousand
nine hundred twenty hours in that city during that twelve-month period
unless the individual's employer has records establishing that the
employee worked more or fewer than one thousand nine hundred twenty
hours in that city during that twelve-month period.
(g) For purposes of (a)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection (2), an
employee is located in a city if the employee:
(i) Spends any amount of time in the city on behalf of his or her
employer, even if most of the employee's work time is spent outside of
the city; or
(ii) Does not spend any time in the city on behalf of his or her
employer; but the employee's work is directed or managed by the
employer primarily from a location within the city, and the employer is
not required to pay a general business license fee to any other city in
which the employee performs services for the employer.
(3) A general business license may not be renewed more frequently
than once per year except that the department may require a more
frequent renewal date as may be necessary to synchronize the renewal
date for the general business license with the business's business
license expiration date.
(4) The business licensing system need not accommodate any monetary
penalty imposed by a city for failing to obtain or renew a general
business license. The penalty imposed in RCW 19.02.085 applies to
general business licenses that are not renewed by their expiration
date.
(5) The department may refuse to administer any provision of a city
ordinance that is inconsistent with this chapter. This authority
includes refusing to issue or renew a city's general business license.
Within five working days following the department's refusal to
administer a provision of a city's licensing ordinance, the department
must provide notice to the city of the department's refusal and the
reasons therefore.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 The department is not authorized to
enforce a city's licensing laws except to the extent of issuing or
renewing a license in accordance with this chapter and chapter 19.02
RCW or refusing to issue a license due to an incomplete application,
nonpayment of the appropriate licensing fee as indicated by the license
application or renewal application, or the nonpayment of any applicable
penalty for late renewal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 Cities whose general business licenses are
issued through the business licensing system retain the authority to
provide exemptions and thresholds for these licenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 Cities may not require a person to obtain
or renew a general business license unless the person engages in
business within a city. For purposes of this section, a person engages
in business within a city if the person has business property or
employees located in the city on either a permanent or nonpermanent
basis. A person also engages in business within a city if the person,
either directly or through an agent or other representative, engages in
activities in the city that are significantly associated with the
person's ability to establish or maintain a market for the person's
products or services in the city. For purposes of this section,
engaging in business within a city is intended to be construed
coextensive with the physical presence requirement for purposes of
imposing a sales or use tax collection obligation as established in
Quill Corp. v. North Dakota, 504 U.S. 298 (1992).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 A general business license change enacted
by a city whose general business license is issued through the business
licensing system takes effect no sooner than seventy-five days after
the department receives notice of the change and only on the first day
of January, April, July, or October, if the change affects in any way
who must obtain a license, who is exempt from obtaining a license, or
the amount or method of determining any fee for the issuance or renewal
of a license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 A new section is added to chapter 19.02
RCW to read as follows:
The department may require applicants to submit applications for
general business licenses or their renewal electronically. The
department may also require application and renewal fees for general
business licenses be paid electronically. For purposes of this
section, "general business license" has the same meaning as in section
201 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 Sections 201 through 207 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

PART III
MAKING TECHNICAL CHANGES TO LICENSING AND TRADE NAME
LAWS AND CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
Sec. 301 RCW 15.13.250 and 2007 c 335 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of this chapter:
(1) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state
of Washington.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department or the
director's duly authorized representative.
(3) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, society and association, and every officer, agent or employee
thereof.
(4) "Horticultural plant" includes, but is not limited to, any
horticultural, floricultural, or viticultural plant, or turf, for
planting, propagation or ornamentation growing or otherwise. The term
does not apply to potato, garlic, or onion planting stock or to cut
plant material, except plant parts used for propagative purposes.
(5) "Horticultural facilities" means, but is not limited to, the
premises where horticultural plants or Christmas trees are grown,
stored, handled or delivered for sale or transportation, or where
records required under this chapter are stored or kept, and all
vehicles and equipment used to transport horticultural plants or
Christmas trees.
(6) "Plant pests" means, but is not limited to, a living stage of
insect, mite, or other arthropod; nematode; slug, snail, or other
mollusk; protozoa or other invertebrate animals; bacteria; fungus;
virus; viroid; phytoplasma; weed or parasitic plant; or any organisms
similar to or allied with any of the plant pests listed in this
section; or any infectious substance; which can directly or indirectly
injure or cause disease or damage to any plant or plant product or that
threatens the diversity or abundance of native species.
(7) "Inspection and/or certification" means, but is not limited to,
the inspection by the director of horticultural plants or Christmas
trees at any time prior to, during, or subsequent to harvest or sale
and the issuance by the director of a written certificate stating if
the horticultural plants or Christmas trees are in compliance with the
provisions of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.
Inspection may include, but is not limited to, examination of
horticultural plants or Christmas trees, taking samples, destructive
testing, conducting interviews, taking photographs, and examining
records.
(8) "Nursery dealer" means any person who sells horticultural
plants or plants, grows, receives, or handles horticultural plants for
the purpose of selling or planting for another person.
(9) "Sell" means to sell, hold for sale, offer for sale, handle, or
to use as an inducement for the sale of another article or product.
(10) "((Master license)) Business licensing system" means the
mechanism established by chapter 19.02 RCW by which ((master)) business
licenses, endorsed for individual state-issued licenses, are issued and
renewed utilizing a ((master)) business license application and a
((master)) business license expiration date common to each renewable
license endorsement.
(11) "Certificate" or "certificate of inspection" means an official
document certifying compliance with the requirements of this chapter.
The term "certificate" includes labels, rubber stamp imprints, tags,
permits, written statements, or any other form of certification
document that accompanies the movement of inspected and certified plant
material, including Christmas trees.
(12) "Turf" means field-cultivated turf grass sod consisting of
grass varieties, or blends of grass varieties, and dichondra for use in
residential and commercial landscapes.
(13) "This chapter" means this chapter and the rules adopted under
this chapter.
(14) "Compliance agreement" means a written agreement between the
department and a person engaged in growing, handling, or moving
articles, plants, or plant products regulated under this chapter or
title, in which the person agrees to comply with stipulated
requirements.
(15) "Consignor" means the person named in the invoice, bill, or
other shipping document accompanying a horticultural plant as the
person from whom the horticultural plant has been received for
shipment.
(16) "Christmas tree" means a cut evergreen tree:
(a) Of a marketable species;
(b) Managed to produce trees meeting United States number 2 or
better standards for Christmas trees as specified by the United States
department of agriculture; and
(c) Evidencing periodic maintenance practices of shearing or
culturing, or both; weed and brush control; and one or more of the
following practices: Basal pruning, fertilization, insect and disease
control, stump culture, soil cultivation, and irrigation.
(17) "Christmas tree grower" means any person who grows Christmas
trees for sale.

Sec. 302 RCW 15.13.250 and 2000 c 144 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of this chapter:
(1) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state
of Washington.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department or the
director's duly authorized representative.
(3) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, society and association, and every officer, agent or employee
thereof.
(4) "Horticultural plant" includes, but is not limited to, any
horticultural, floricultural, or viticultural plant, or turf, for
planting, propagation or ornamentation growing or otherwise. The term
does not apply to potato, garlic, or onion planting stock or to cut
plant material, except plant parts used for propagative purposes.
(5) "Horticultural facilities" means, but is not limited to, the
premises where horticultural plants are grown, stored, handled or
delivered for sale or transportation, or where records required under
this chapter are stored or kept, and all vehicles and equipment used to
transport horticultural plants.
(6) "Plant pests" means, but is not limited to, a living stage of
insect, mite, or other arthropod; nematode; slug, snail, or other
mollusk; protozoa or other invertebrate animals; bacteria; fungus;
virus; viroid; phytoplasma; weed or parasitic plant; or any organisms
similar to or allied with any of the plant pests listed in this
section; or any infectious substance; which can directly or indirectly
injure or cause disease or damage to any plant or plant product or that
threatens the diversity or abundance of native species.
(7) "Inspection and/or certification" means, but is not limited to,
the inspection by the director of horticultural plants at any time
prior to, during, or subsequent to harvest or sale and the issuance by
the director of a written certificate stating if the horticultural
plants are in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and rules
adopted under this chapter. Inspection may include, but is not limited
to, examination of horticultural plants, taking samples, destructive
testing, conducting interviews, taking photographs, and examining
records.
(8) "Nursery dealer" means any person who sells horticultural
plants or plants, grows, receives, or handles horticultural plants for
the purpose of selling or planting for another person.
(9) "Sell" means to sell, hold for sale, offer for sale, handle, or
to use as an inducement for the sale of another article or product.
(10) "((Master license)) Business licensing system" means the
mechanism established by chapter 19.02 RCW by which ((master)) business
licenses, endorsed for individual state-issued licenses, are issued and
renewed utilizing a ((master)) business license application and a
((master)) business license expiration date common to each renewable
license endorsement.
(11) "Certificate" or "certificate of inspection" means an official
document certifying compliance with the requirements of this chapter.
The term "certificate" includes labels, rubber stamp imprints, tags,
permits, written statements, or any other form of certification
document that accompanies the movement of inspected and certified plant
material.
(12) "Turf" means field-cultivated turf grass sod consisting of
grass varieties, or blends of grass varieties, and dichondra for use in
residential and commercial landscapes.
(13) "This chapter" means this chapter and the rules adopted under
this chapter.
(14) "Compliance agreement" means a written agreement between the
department and a person engaged in growing, handling, or moving
articles, plants, or plant products regulated under this chapter or
title, in which the person agrees to comply with stipulated
requirements.
(15) "Consignor" means the person named in the invoice, bill, or
other shipping document accompanying a horticultural plant as the
person from whom the horticultural plant has been received for
shipment.

Sec. 303 RCW 15.13.280 and 2000 c 144 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person ((shall)) may act as a nursery dealer without a
license for each place of business where horticultural plants are sold
except as provided in RCW 15.13.270. Any person applying for such a
license ((shall)) must apply through the ((master license)) business
licensing system. The application ((shall)) must be accompanied by the
appropriate fee. The director ((shall)) must establish a schedule of
fees for retail and wholesale nursery dealer licenses based upon the
person's gross annual sales of horticultural plants at each place of
business. The schedule for retail licenses ((shall)) must include
separate fees for at least the following two categories:
(a) A person whose gross annual sales of horticultural plants do
not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars; and
(b) A person whose gross annual sales of horticultural plants
exceed two thousand five hundred dollars.
(2) A person conducting both retail and wholesale sales of
horticultural plants at the same place of business shall secure one of
the following:
(a) A retail nursery dealer license if retail sales of the
horticultural plants exceed such wholesale sales; or
(b) A wholesale nursery dealer license if wholesale sales of the
horticultural plants exceed such retail sales.
(3) The director may issue a wholesale nursery dealer license to a
person operating as a farmers market at which individual producers are
selling directly to consumers. The license ((shall)) must be at the
appropriate level to cover all persons selling horticultural plants at
each site at which the person operates a market.
(4) The licensing fee that must accompany an application for a new
license shall be based upon the applicant's estimated gross sales of
horticultural plants for the ensuing licensing year. The fee for
renewing a license ((shall)) must be based upon the licensee's gross
sales of these products during the preceding licensing year.
(5) The license expires on the ((master)) business license
expiration date unless it has been revoked or suspended prior to the
expiration date by the director for cause. Each license ((shall)) must
be posted in a conspicuous place open to the public in the location for
which it was issued.
(6) The department may audit licensees during normal business hours
to determine that appropriate fees have been paid.

Sec. 304 RCW 15.13.290 and 2000 c 144 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
If any application for renewal of a nursery dealer license is not
filed prior to the ((master)) business license expiration date, the
((master)) business license delinquency fee ((shall be)) is assessed
under chapter 19.02 RCW and ((shall)) must be paid by the applicant
before the renewal license is issued.

Sec. 305 RCW 15.49.011 and 1989 c 354 s 73 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(l) "Advertisement" means all representations, other than those on
the label, disseminated in any manner or by any means, relating to seed
within the scope of this chapter.
(2) "Agricultural seed" includes grass, forage, cereal, oil, fiber,
and other kinds of crop seeds commonly recognized within this state as
agricultural seeds, lawn seeds, and combinations of such seeds, and may
include common and restricted noxious weed seeds but not prohibited
noxious weed seeds.
(3) "Blend" means seed consisting of more than one variety of a
kind, each in excess of five percent by weight of the whole.
(4) "Bulk seed" means seed distributed in a nonpackage form.
(5) "Certifying agency" means (a) an agency authorized under the
laws of any state, territory, or possession to certify seed officially
and which has standards and procedures approved by the United States
secretary of agriculture to assure the genetic purity and identity of
the seed certified; or (b) an agency of a foreign country determined by
the United States secretary of agriculture to adhere to procedures and
standards for seed certification comparable to those adhered to
generally by seed-certifying agencies under (a) of this subsection.
(6) "Conditioning" means drying, cleaning, scarifying, and other
operations that could change the purity or germination of the seed and
require the seed lot to be retested to determine the label information.
(7) "Dealer" means any person who distributes.
(8) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state
of Washington or its duly authorized representative.
(9) "Director" means the director of the department of agriculture.
(10) "Distribute" means to import, consign, offer for sale, hold
for sale, sell, barter, or otherwise supply seed in this state.
(11) "Flower seeds" includes seeds of herbaceous plants grown from
their blooms, ornamental foliage, or other ornamental parts, and
commonly known and sold under the name of flower seeds in this state.
(12) The terms "foundation seed," "registered seed," and "certified
seed" mean seed that has been produced and labeled in compliance with
the regulations of the department.
(13) "Germination" means the emergence and development from the
seed embryo of those essential structures which, for the kind of seed
in question, are indicative of the ability to produce a normal plant
under favorable conditions.
(14) "Hard seeds" means seeds that remain hard at the end of the
prescribed test period because they have not absorbed water due to an
impermeable seed coat.
(15) "Hybrid" means the first generation seed of a cross produced
by controlling the pollination and by combining (a) two or more inbred
lines; (b) one inbred or a single cross with an open pollinated
variety; or (c) two varieties or species, except open-pollinated
varieties of corn (Zea mays). The second generation or subsequent
generations from such crosses ((shall)) are not ((be)) regarded as
hybrids. Hybrid designations ((shall)) must be treated as variety
names.
(16) "Inert matter" means all matter not seed, that includes broken
seeds, sterile florets, chaff, fungus bodies, and stones as determined
by methods defined by rule.
(17) "Kind" means one or more related species or subspecies that
singly or collectively is known by one common name, for example, corn,
oats, alfalfa, and timothy.
(18) "Label" includes a tag or other device attached to or written,
stamped, or printed on any container or accompanying any lot of bulk
seeds purporting to set forth the information required on the seed
label by this chapter, and it may include any other information
relating to the labeled seed.
(19) "Lot" means a definite quantity of seed identified by a lot
number or other mark, every portion or bag of which is uniform within
recognized tolerances for the factors that appear in the labeling.
(20) "Lot number" ((shall)) must identify the producer or dealer
and year of production or the year distributed for each lot of seed.
This requirement may be satisfied by use of a conditioner's or dealer's
code.
(21) "((Master license)) Business licensing system" means the
mechanism established by chapter 19.02 RCW by which ((master)) business
licenses, endorsed for individual state-issued licenses, are issued and
renewed using a ((master)) business license application and a
((master)) business license expiration date common to each renewable
license endorsement.
(22) "Mixture," "mix," or "mixed" means seed consisting of more
than one kind, each in excess of five percent by weight of the whole.
(23) "Official sample" means any sample of seed taken and
designated as official by the department.
(24) "Other crop seed" means seed of plants grown as crops, other
than the kind or variety included in the pure seed, as determined by
methods defined by rule.
(25) "Prohibited (primary) noxious weed seeds" are the seeds of
weeds which when established are highly destructive, competitive,
and/or difficult to control by cultural or chemical practices.
(26) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
company, association, receiver, trustee, or agent.
(27) "Pure live seed" means the product of the percent of
germination plus hard or dormant seed multiplied by the percent of pure
seed divided by one hundred. The result is expressed as a whole
number.
(28) "Pure seed" means seed exclusive of inert matter and all other
seeds not of the seed being considered as determined by methods defined
by rule.
(29) "Restricted (secondary) noxious weed seeds" are the seeds of
weeds which are objectionable in fields, lawns, and gardens of this
state, but which can be controlled by cultural or chemical practices.
(30) "Retail" means to distribute to the ultimate consumer.
(31) "Screenings" mean chaff, seed, weed seed, inert matter, and
other materials removed from seed in cleaning or conditioning.
(32) "Seed labeling registrant" means a person who has obtained a
permit to label seed for distribution in this state.
(33) "Seeds" mean agricultural or vegetable seeds or other seeds as
determined by rules adopted by the department.
(34) "Stop sale, use, or removal order" means an administrative
order restraining the sale, use, disposition, and movement of a
specific amount of seed.
(35) "Treated" means that the seed has received an application of
a substance, or that it has been subjected to a process for which a
claim is made.
(36) "Type" means a group of varieties so nearly similar that the
individual varieties cannot be clearly differentiated except under
special conditions.
(37) "Variety" means a subdivision of a kind that is distinct,
uniform, and stable; "distinct" in the sense that the variety can be
differentiated by one or more identifiable morphological,
physiological, or other characteristics from all other varieties of
public knowledge; "uniform" in the sense that variations in essential
and distinctive characteristics are describable; and "stable" in the
sense that the variety will remain unchanged in its essential and
distinctive characteristics and its uniformity when reproduced or
reconstituted as required by the different categories of varieties.
(38) "Vegetable seeds" includes the seeds of those crops that are
grown in gardens and on truck farms and are generally known and sold
under the name of vegetable or herb seeds in this state.
(39) "Weed seeds" include the seeds of all plants generally
recognized as weeds within this state, and includes the seeds of
prohibited and restricted noxious weeds as determined by regulations
adopted by the department.
(40) "Inoculant" means a commercial preparation containing nitrogen
fixing bacteria applied to the seed.
(41) "Coated seed" means seed that has been treated and has
received an application of inert material during the treatment process.

Sec. 306 RCW 15.49.380 and 2010 c 8 s 6064 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person ((shall)) may distribute seeds without having
obtained a dealer's license for each regular place of business((:
PROVIDED, That no)). However, a license ((shall be)) is not required
of a person who distributes seeds only in sealed packages of eight
ounces or less, packed by a seed labeling registrant and bearing the
name and address of the registrant((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
Moreover, a license ((shall not be)) is not required of any grower
selling seeds of his or her own production exclusively. Such seed sold
by such grower must be properly labeled as provided in this chapter.
Each dealer's license ((shall)) must cost twenty-five dollars,
((shall)) must be issued through the ((master license)) business
licensing system, ((shall)) must bear the date of issue, ((shall)) must
expire on the ((master)) business license expiration date and ((shall))
must be prominently displayed in each place of business.
(2) Persons custom conditioning and/or custom treating seeds for
others for remuneration ((shall be)) are considered dealers for the
purpose of this chapter.
(3) Application for a license to distribute seed ((shall)) must be
through the ((master license)) business licensing system and ((shall))
must include the name and address of the person applying for the
license, the name of a person domiciled in this state authorized to
receive and accept service or legal notices of all kinds, and any other
reasonable and practical information prescribed by the department
necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 307 RCW 15.49.390 and 1982 c 182 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
If an application for renewal of the dealer's license provided for
in RCW 15.49.380, is not filed prior to the ((master)) business license
expiration date, the ((master)) business license delinquency fee
((shall be)) is assessed under chapter 19.02 RCW and ((shall)) must be
paid by the applicant before the renewal license shall be issued.

Sec. 308 RCW 15.54.275 and 1998 c 36 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may distribute a bulk fertilizer in this state until
a license to distribute has been obtained by that person. An annual
license is required for each out-of-state or in-state location that
distributes bulk fertilizer in Washington state. An application for
each location ((shall)) must be filed on forms provided by the ((master
license)) business licensing system established under chapter 19.02 RCW
and ((shall)) must be accompanied by an annual fee of twenty-five
dollars per location. The license ((shall)) expires on the ((master))
business license expiration date.
(2) An application for license ((shall)) must include the
following:
(a) The name and address of licensee.
(b) Any other information required by the department by rule.
(3) The name and address shown on the license ((shall)) must be
shown on all labels, pertinent invoices, and storage facilities for
fertilizer distributed by the licensee in this state.
(4) If an application for license renewal provided for in this
section is not filed prior to the ((master)) business license
expiration date, a delinquency fee of twenty-five dollars ((shall be))
is assessed and added to the original fee and ((shall)) must be paid by
the applicant before the renewal license ((shall be)) is issued. The
assessment of this delinquency fee ((shall)) does not prevent the
department from taking any other action as provided for in this
chapter. The penalty ((shall)) does not apply if the applicant
furnishes an affidavit that he or she has not distributed this
commercial fertilizer subsequent to the expiration of his or her prior
license.

Sec. 309 RCW 15.58.030 and 2011 c 103 s 35 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
((As used in this chapter the words and phrases defined in this
section shall have the meanings indicated)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Active ingredient" means any ingredient which will prevent,
destroy, repel, control, or mitigate pests, or which will act as a
plant regulator, defoliant, desiccant, or spray adjuvant.
(2) "Antidote" means the most practical immediate treatment in case
of poisoning and includes first aid treatment.
(3) "Arthropod" means any invertebrate animal that belongs to the
phylum arthropoda, which in addition to insects, includes allied
classes whose members are wingless and usually have more than six legs;
for example, spiders, mites, ticks, centipedes, and isopod crustaceans.
(4) "Complete wood destroying organism inspection" means inspection
for the purpose of determining evidence of infestation, damage, or
conducive conditions as part of the transfer, exchange, or refinancing
of any structure in Washington state. Complete wood destroying
organism inspections include any wood destroying organism inspection
that is conducted as the result of telephone solicitation by an
inspection, pest control, or other business, even if the inspection
would fall within the definition of a specific wood destroying organism
inspection.
(5) "Defoliant" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to cause the leaves or foliage to drop from a plant with or
without causing abscission.
(6) "Department" means the Washington state department of
agriculture.
(7) "Desiccant" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to artificially accelerate the drying of plant tissues.
(8) "Device" means any instrument or contrivance intended to trap,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate pests, or to destroy, control,
repel or mitigate fungi, nematodes, or such other pests, as may be
designated by the director, but not including equipment used for the
application of pesticides when sold separately from the pesticides.
(9) "Director" means the director of the department or a duly
authorized representative.
(10) "Distribute" means to offer for sale, hold for sale, sell,
barter, or supply pesticides in this state.
(11) "EPA" means the United States environmental protection agency.
(12) "EPA restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide with
restricted uses as classified for restricted use by the administrator,
EPA.
(13) "FIFRA" means the federal insecticide, fungicide, and
rodenticide act as amended (61 Stat. 163, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.).
(14) "Fungi" means all nonchlorophyll-bearing thallophytes (all
nonchlorophyll-bearing plants of a lower order than mosses and
liverworts); for example, rusts, smuts, mildews, molds, yeasts, and
bacteria, except those on or in living persons or other animals.
(15) "Fungicide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any fungi.
(16) "Herbicide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any weed.
(17) "Inert ingredient" means an ingredient which is not an active
ingredient.
(18) "Ingredient statement" means a statement of the name and
percentage of each active ingredient together with the total percentage
of the inert ingredients in the pesticide, and when the pesticide
contains arsenic in any form, the ingredient statement shall also
include percentages of total and water soluble arsenic, each calculated
as elemental arsenic. The ingredient statement for a spray adjuvant
must be consistent with the labeling requirements adopted by rule.
(19) "Insect" means any of the numerous small invertebrate animals
whose bodies are more or less obviously segmented, and which for the
most part belong to the class insecta, comprising six-legged, usually
winged forms, for example, beetles, bugs, bees, flies, and to other
allied classes of arthropods whose members are wingless and usually
have more than six legs, for example, spiders, mites, ticks,
centipedes, and isopod crustaceans.
(20) "Insecticide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any insects which may
be present in any environment whatsoever.
(21) "Inspection control number" means a number obtained from the
department that is recorded on wood destroying organism inspection
reports issued by a structural pest inspector in conjunction with the
transfer, exchange, or refinancing of any structure.
(22) "Label" means the written, printed, or graphic matter on, or
attached to, the pesticide, device, or immediate container, and the
outside container or wrapper of the retail package.
(23) "Labeling" means all labels and other written, printed, or
graphic matter:
(a) Upon the pesticide, device, or any of its containers or
wrappers;
(b) Accompanying the pesticide, or referring to it in any other
media used to disseminate information to the public; and
(c) To which reference is made on the label or in literature
accompanying or referring to the pesticide or device except when
accurate nonmisleading reference is made to current official
publications of the department, United States departments of
agriculture; interior; education; health and human services; state
agricultural colleges; and other similar federal or state institutions
or agencies authorized by law to conduct research in the field of
pesticides.
(24) "Land" means all land and water areas, including airspace and
all plants, animals, structures, buildings, devices and contrivances,
appurtenant thereto or situated thereon, fixed or mobile, including any
used for transportation.
(25) "((Master license)) Business licensing system" means the
mechanism established by chapter 19.02 RCW by which ((master)) business
licenses, endorsed for individual state-issued licenses, are issued and
renewed using a ((master)) business license application and a
((master)) business license expiration date common to each renewable
license endorsement.
(26) "Nematocide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate nematodes.
(27) "Nematode" means any invertebrate animal of the phylum
nemathelminthes and class nematoda, that is, unsegmented round worms
with elongated, fusiform, or saclike bodies covered with cuticle, and
inhabiting soil, water, plants or plant parts, may also be called nemas
or eelworms.
(28) "Person" means any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, or organized group of persons whether or not incorporated.
(29) "Pest" means, but is not limited to, any insect, rodent,
nematode, snail, slug, weed and any form of plant or animal life or
virus, except virus on or in a living person or other animal, which is
normally considered to be a pest or which the director may declare to
be a pest.
(30) "Pest control consultant" means any individual who sells or
offers for sale at other than a licensed pesticide dealer outlet or
location where they are employed, or who offers or supplies technical
advice or makes recommendations to the user of:
(a) Highly toxic pesticides, as determined under RCW 15.58.040;
(b) EPA restricted use pesticides or restricted use pesticides
which are restricted by rule to distribution by licensed pesticide
dealers only; or
(c) Any other pesticide except those pesticides which are labeled
and intended for home and garden use only.
(31) "Pesticide" means, but is not limited to:
(a) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to prevent,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate any insect, rodent, snail, slug,
fungus, weed, and any other form of plant or animal life or virus,
except virus on or in a living person or other animal which is normally
considered to be a pest or which the director may declare to be a pest;
(b) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to be used as
a plant regulator, defoliant or desiccant; and
(c) Any spray adjuvant.
(32) "Pesticide dealer" means any person who distributes any of the
following pesticides:
(a) Highly toxic pesticides, as determined under RCW 15.58.040;
(b) EPA restricted use pesticides or restricted use pesticides
which are restricted by rule to distribution by licensed pesticide
dealers only; or
(c) Any other pesticide except those pesticides which are labeled
and intended for home and garden use only.
(33) "Pesticide dealer manager" means the owner or other individual
supervising pesticide distribution at one outlet holding a pesticide
dealer license.
(34) "Plant regulator" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended through physiological action, to accelerate or retard the rate
of growth or maturation, or to otherwise alter the behavior of
ornamental or crop plants or their produce, but ((shall)) does not
include substances insofar as they are intended to be used as plant
nutrients, trace elements, nutritional chemicals, plant inoculants, or
soil amendments.
(35) "Registrant" means the person registering any pesticide under
the provisions of this chapter.
(36) "Restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide or device
which, when used as directed or in accordance with a widespread and
commonly recognized practice, the director determines, subsequent to a
hearing, requires additional restrictions for that use to prevent
unreasonable adverse effects on the environment including people,
lands, beneficial insects, animals, crops, and wildlife, other than
pests.
(37) "Rodenticide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate rodents, or any other
vertebrate animal which the director may declare by rule to be a pest.
(38) "Special local needs registration" means a registration issued
by the director pursuant to provisions of section 24(c) of FIFRA.
(39) "Specific wood destroying organism inspection" means an
inspection of a structure for purposes of identifying or verifying
evidence of an infestation of wood destroying organisms prior to pest
management activities.
(40) "Spray adjuvant" means any product intended to be used with a
pesticide as an aid to the application or to the effect of the
pesticide, and which is in a package or container separate from the
pesticide. Spray adjuvant includes, but is not limited to, acidifiers,
compatibility agents, crop oil concentrates, defoaming agents, drift
control agents, modified vegetable oil concentrates, nonionic
surfactants, organosilicone surfactants, stickers, and water
conditioning agents. Spray adjuvant does not include products that are
only intended to mark the location where a pesticide is applied.
(41) "Structural pest inspector" means any individual who performs
the service of conducting a complete wood destroying organism
inspection or a specific wood destroying organism inspection.
(42) "Unreasonable adverse effects on the environment" means any
unreasonable risk to people or the environment taking into account the
economic, social, and environmental costs and benefits of the use of
any pesticide, or as otherwise determined by the director.
(43) "Weed" means any plant which grows where not wanted.
(44) "Wood destroying organism" means insects or fungi that
consume, excavate, develop in, or otherwise modify the integrity of
wood or wood products. Wood destroying organism includes, but is not
limited to, carpenter ants, moisture ants, subterranean termites,
dampwood termites, beetles in the family Anobiidae, and wood decay
fungi (wood rot).
(45) "Wood destroying organism inspection report" means any written
document that reports or comments on the presence or absence of wood
destroying organisms, their damage, and/or conducive conditions leading
to the establishment of such organisms.

Sec. 310 RCW 15.58.180 and 2008 c 285 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section,
it is unlawful for any person to act in the capacity of a pesticide
dealer or advertise as or assume to act as a pesticide dealer without
first having obtained an annual license from the director. The license
expires on the ((master)) business license expiration date. A license
is required for each location or outlet located within this state from
which pesticides are distributed. A manufacturer, registrant, or
distributor who has no pesticide dealer outlet licensed within this
state and who distributes pesticides directly into this state must
obtain a pesticide dealer license for his or her principal out-of-state
location or outlet, but such a licensed out-of-state pesticide dealer
is exempt from the pesticide dealer manager requirements.
(2) Application for a license must be accompanied by a fee of
sixty-seven dollars and must be made through the ((master license))
business licensing system and must include the full name of the person
applying for the license and the name of the individual within the
state designated as the pesticide dealer manager. If the applicant is
a partnership, association, corporation, or organized group of persons,
the full name of each member of the firm or partnership or the names of
the officers of the association or corporation must be given on the
application. The application must state the principal business address
of the applicant in the state and elsewhere, the name of a person
domiciled in this state authorized to receive and accept service of
summons of legal notices of all kinds for the applicant, and any other
necessary information prescribed by the director.
(3) It is unlawful for any licensed dealer outlet to operate
without a pesticide dealer manager who has a license of qualification.
(4) This section does not apply to (a) a licensed pesticide
applicator who sells pesticides only as an integral part of the
applicator's pesticide application service when pesticides are
dispensed only through apparatuses used for pesticide application, or
(b) any federal, state, county, or municipal agency that provides
pesticides only for its own programs.
(5) A user of a pesticide may distribute a properly labeled
pesticide to another user who is legally entitled to use that pesticide
without obtaining a pesticide dealer's license if the exclusive purpose
of distributing the pesticide is keeping it from becoming a hazardous
waste as defined in chapter 70.105 RCW.

Sec. 311 RCW 15.58.235 and 1989 c 380 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If an application for renewal of a pesticide dealer license is
not filed on or before the ((master)) business license expiration date,
the ((master)) business license delinquency fee ((shall be)) is
assessed under chapter 19.02 RCW and ((shall)) must be paid by the
applicant before the renewal license is issued.
(2) If application for renewal of any license provided for in this
chapter other than the pesticide dealer license is not filed on or
before the expiration date of the license, a penalty equivalent to the
license fee ((shall be)) is assessed and added to the original fee, and
((shall)) must be paid by the applicant before the renewal license is
issued((: PROVIDED, That)). However, such penalty ((shall)) does not
apply if the applicant furnishes an affidavit certifying that he or she
has not acted as a licensee subsequent to the expiration of the
license.
(3) Any license for which a renewal application has been made, all
other requirements have been met, and the proper fee paid, continues in
full force and effect until the director notifies the applicant that
the license has been renewed or the application has been denied.

Sec. 312 RCW 18.44.031 and 2010 c 34 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
An application for an escrow agent license ((shall)) must be in
writing in such form as is prescribed by the director, and ((shall))
must be verified on oath by the applicant. An application for an
escrow agent license ((shall)) must include the following:
(1) The applicant's form of business organization and place of
organization;
(2) Information concerning the identity of the applicant, and its
officers, directors, owners, partners, controlling persons, and
employees, including fingerprints for submission to the Washington
state patrol, the federal bureau of investigation, and any government
agency or subdivision authorized to receive information for state and
national criminal history background checks; personal history;
experience; business record; purposes; and other pertinent facts, as
the director may reasonably require. The director may also request
criminal history record information, including nonconviction data, as
defined by RCW 10.97.030. The department may disseminate nonconviction
data obtained under this section only to criminal justice agencies.
The applicant must pay the cost of fingerprinting and processing the
fingerprints by the department;
(3) If the applicant is a corporation or limited liability company,
the address of its physical location, a list of officers, controlling
persons, and directors of such corporation or company and their
residential addresses, telephone numbers, and other identifying
information as the director may determine by rule. If the applicant is
a sole proprietorship or partnership, the address of its business
location, a list of owners, partners, or controlling persons and their
residential addresses, telephone numbers, and other identifying
information as the director may determine by rule. Any information in
the application regarding the personal residential address or telephone
number of any officer, director, partner, owner, controlling person, or
employee is exempt from the public records disclosure requirements of
chapter 42.56 RCW;
(4) In the event the applicant is doing business under an assumed
name, a copy of the ((master)) business license with the registered
trade name shown;
(5) The qualifications and business history of the applicant and
all of its officers, directors, owners, partners, and controlling
persons;
(6) A personal credit report from a recognized credit reporting
bureau satisfactory to the director on all officers, directors, owners,
partners, and controlling persons of the applicant;
(7) Whether any of the officers, directors, owners, partners, or
controlling persons have been convicted of any crime within the
preceding ten years which relates directly to the business or duties of
escrow agents, or have suffered a judgment within the preceding five
years in any civil action involving fraud, misrepresentation, any
unfair or deceptive act or practice, or conversion;
(8) The identity of the licensed escrow officer designated by the
escrow agent as the designated escrow officer responsible for
supervising the agent's escrow activity;
(9) Evidence of compliance with the bonding and insurance
requirements of RCW 18.44.201; and
(10) Any other information the director may require by rule. The
director may share any information contained within a license
application, including fingerprints, with the federal bureau of
investigation and other regulatory or law enforcement agencies.

Sec. 313 RCW 18.64.011 and 2009 c 549 s 1008 are each reenacted
and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise((, definitions of terms
shall be as indicated when used in this chapter)).
(1) "Administer" means the direct application of a drug or device,
whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the
body of a patient or research subject.
(2) "Board" means the Washington state board of pharmacy.
(3) "Compounding" ((shall be)) is the act of combining two or more
ingredients in the preparation of a prescription.
(4) "Controlled substance" means a drug or substance, or an
immediate precursor of such drug or substance, so designated under or
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 69.50 RCW.
(5) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or
attempted transfer from one person to another of a drug or device,
whether or not there is an agency relationship.
(6) "Department" means the department of health.
(7) "Device" means instruments, apparatus, and contrivances,
including their components, parts, and accessories, intended (a) for
use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of
disease in human beings or other animals, or (b) to affect the
structure or any function of the body of human beings or other animals.
(8) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order
for a drug, biological, or device and, pursuant to that prescription or
order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or
packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.
(9) "Distribute" means the delivery of a drug or device other than
by administering or dispensing.
(10) ((The words)) "Drug" and "devices" ((shall)) do not include
surgical or dental instruments or laboratory materials, gas and oxygen,
therapy equipment, X-ray apparatus or therapeutic equipment, their
component parts or accessories, or equipment, instruments, apparatus,
or contrivances used to render such articles effective in medical,
surgical, or dental treatment, or for use or consumption in or for
mechanical, industrial, manufacturing, or scientific applications or
purposes((, nor shall the word)). "Drug" also does not include any
article or mixture covered by the Washington pesticide control act
(chapter 15.58 RCW), as enacted or hereafter amended, nor medicated
feed intended for and used exclusively as a feed for animals other than
human beings.
(11) "Drugs" means:
(a) Articles recognized in the official United States pharmacopoeia
or the official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in human beings or other animals;
(c) Substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure
or any function of the body of human beings or other animals; or
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any substances
specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, but not including
devices or their component parts or accessories.
(12) "Health care entity" means an organization that provides
health care services in a setting that is not otherwise licensed by the
state. Health care entity includes a freestanding outpatient surgery
center or a freestanding cardiac care center. It does not include an
individual practitioner's office or a multipractitioner clinic.
(13) "Labeling" ((shall)) means the process of preparing and
affixing a label to any drug or device container. The label must
include all information required by current federal and state law and
pharmacy rules.
(14) "Legend drugs" means any drugs which are required by any
applicable federal or state law or regulation to be dispensed on
prescription only or are restricted to use by practitioners only.
(15) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation,
compounding, or processing of a drug or other substance or device or
the packaging or repackaging of such substance or device, or the
labeling or relabeling of the commercial container of such substance or
device, but does not include the activities of a practitioner who, as
an incident to his or her administration or dispensing such substance
or device in the course of his or her professional practice, prepares,
compounds, packages, or labels such substance or device.
(16) "Manufacturer" shall mean a person, corporation, or other
entity engaged in the manufacture of drugs or devices.
(17) "((Master license)) Business licensing system" means the
mechanism established by chapter 19.02 RCW by which ((master)) business
licenses, endorsed for individual state-issued licenses, are issued and
renewed utilizing a ((master)) business license application and a
((master)) business license expiration date common to each renewable
license endorsement.
(18) "Nonlegend" or "nonprescription" drugs means any drugs which
may be lawfully sold without a prescription.
(19) "Person" means an individual, corporation, government,
governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust,
partnership or association, or any other legal entity.
(20) "Pharmacist" means a person duly licensed by the Washington
state board of pharmacy to engage in the practice of pharmacy.
(21) "Pharmacy" means every place properly licensed by the board of
pharmacy where the practice of pharmacy is conducted.
(22) ((The word)) "Poison" ((shall)) does not include any article
or mixture covered by the Washington pesticide control act (chapter
15.58 RCW), as enacted or hereafter amended.
(23) "Practice of pharmacy" includes the practice of and
responsibility for: Interpreting prescription orders; the compounding,
dispensing, labeling, administering, and distributing of drugs and
devices; the monitoring of drug therapy and use; the initiating or
modifying of drug therapy in accordance with written guidelines or
protocols previously established and approved for his or her practice
by a practitioner authorized to prescribe drugs; the participating in
drug utilization reviews and drug product selection; the proper and
safe storing and distributing of drugs and devices and maintenance of
proper records thereof; the providing of information on legend drugs
which may include, but is not limited to, the advising of therapeutic
values, hazards, and the uses of drugs and devices.
(24) "Practitioner" means a physician, dentist, veterinarian,
nurse, or other person duly authorized by law or rule in the state of
Washington to prescribe drugs.
(25) "Prescription" means an order for drugs or devices issued by
a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of
Washington to prescribe drugs or devices in the course of his or her
professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.
(26) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(27) "Wholesaler" ((shall)) means a corporation, individual, or
other entity which buys drugs or devices for resale and distribution to
corporations, individuals, or entities other than consumers.

Sec. 314 RCW 18.64.044 and 2005 c 388 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A shopkeeper registered as provided in this section may sell
nonprescription drugs, if such drugs are sold in the original package
of the manufacturer.
(2) Every shopkeeper not a licensed pharmacist, desiring to secure
the benefits and privileges of this section, is ((hereby)) required to
register as a shopkeeper through the ((master license system)) business
licensing system established under chapter 19.02 RCW, and he or she
((shall)) must pay the fee determined by the secretary for
registration, and on a date to be determined by the secretary
thereafter the fee determined by the secretary for renewal of the
registration; and ((shall)) must at all times keep said registration or
the current renewal thereof conspicuously exposed in the location to
which it applies. In event such shopkeeper's registration is not
renewed by the ((master)) business license expiration date, no renewal
or new registration ((shall)) may be issued except upon payment of the
registration renewal fee and the ((master)) business license
delinquency fee under chapter 19.02 RCW. This registration fee
((shall)) does not authorize the sale of legend drugs or controlled
substances.
(3) The registration fees determined by the secretary under
subsection (2) of this section ((shall)) may not exceed the cost of
registering the shopkeeper.
(4) Any shopkeeper who ((shall)) vends or sells, or offers to sell
to the public any such nonprescription drug or preparation without
having registered to do so as provided in this section, ((shall be)) is
guilty of a misdemeanor and each sale or offer to sell ((shall))
constitutes a separate offense.
(5) A shopkeeper who is not a licensed pharmacy may purchase
products containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, only from a wholesaler licensed by the department
under RCW 18.64.046 or from a manufacturer licensed by the department
under RCW 18.64.045. The board ((shall)) must issue a warning to a
shopkeeper who violates this subsection, and may suspend or revoke the
registration of the shopkeeper for a subsequent violation.
(6) A shopkeeper who has purchased products containing any
detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, in
a suspicious transaction as defined in RCW 69.43.035, is subject to the
following requirements:
(a) The shopkeeper may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
ten percent of the shopkeeper's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs in March through October. In November through
February, the shopkeeper may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
twenty percent of the shopkeeper's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs. For purposes of this section, "monthly sales"
means total dollars paid by buyers. The board may suspend or revoke
the registration of a shopkeeper who violates this subsection.
(b) The shopkeeper ((shall)) must maintain inventory records of the
receipt and disposition of nonprescription drugs, utilizing existing
inventory controls if an auditor or investigator can determine
compliance with (a) of this subsection, and otherwise in the form and
manner required by the board. The records must be available for
inspection by the board or any law enforcement agency and must be
maintained for two years. The board may suspend or revoke the
registration of a shopkeeper who violates this subsection. For
purposes of this subsection, "disposition" means the return of product
to the wholesaler or distributor.

Sec. 315 RCW 19.02.010 and 1982 c 182 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Experience under the pilot program of the business coordination
act suggests that the number of state licenses required for new
businesses and the renewal of existing licenses places an undue burden
on business. Studies under this act also show that the state can
reduce its costs by coordinating and consolidating application forms,
information, and licenses. Therefore, the legislature extends the
business coordination act by establishing a business license program
and license center to develop and implement the following goals and
objectives:
(((1))) (a) The first goal of this system is to provide a
convenient, accessible, and timely one-stop system for the business
community to acquire and maintain the necessary state licenses to
conduct business. This system ((shall)) must be developed and operated
in the most cost-efficient manner for the business community and state.
The objectives of this goal are:
(((a))) (i) To provide a service whereby information is available
to the business community concerning all state licensing and regulatory
requirements, and to the extent feasible, include local and federal
information concerning the same regulated activities;
(((b))) (ii) To provide a system which ((will)) enables state
agencies to efficiently store, retrieve, and exchange license
information with due regard to privacy statutes; to issue and renew
((master)) business licenses where such licenses are appropriate; and
to provide appropriate support services for this objective;
(((c))) (iii) To provide at designated locations one consolidated
application form to be completed by any given applicant; and
(((d))) (iv) To provide a statewide system of common business
identification.
(((2))) (b) The second goal of this system is to aid business and
the growth of business in Washington state by instituting a ((master))
business license system that ((will)) reduces the paperwork burden on
business, and promotes the elimination of obsolete and duplicative
licensing requirements by consolidating existing licenses and
applications.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that the authority for
determining if a requested license ((shall be)) is issued ((shall))
remains with the agency legally authorized to issue the license.
(3) It is the further intent of the legislature that those licenses
which no longer serve a useful purpose in regulating certain business
activities should be eliminated.

Sec. 316 RCW 19.02.020 and 2011 c 298 s 4 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Business license" means the single document designed for
public display issued by the business licensing service, which
certifies state agency or local government license approval and which
incorporates the endorsements for individual licenses included in the
business licensing system, which the state or local government requires
for any person subject to this chapter.
(2) "Business license application" means a document incorporating
pertinent data from existing applications for licenses covered under
this chapter.
(3) "Business ((license center)) licensing service" means the
business registration and licensing ((center)) service established by
this chapter and located in and under the administrative control of the
department ((of revenue)).
(((2))) (4) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(((3))) (5) "Director" means the director of ((revenue)) the
department.
(((4))) (6) "License" means the whole or part of any agency or
local government permit, license, certificate, approval, registration,
charter, or any form or permission required by law, including agency
rule, to engage in any activity.
(((5))) (7) "License information packet" means a collection of
information about licensing requirements and application procedures
custom-assembled for each request.
(((6) "Master application" means a document incorporating pertinent
data from existing applications for licenses covered under this
chapter.
(7) "Master license" means the single document designed for public
display issued by the business license center which certifies state
agency or local government license approval and which incorporates the
endorsements for individual licenses included in the master license
system, which the state or local government requires for any person
subject to this chapter.))
(8) "Participating local government" means a municipal corporation
or political subdivision that participates in the ((master license))
business licensing system established by this chapter.
(9) "Person" means any individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, association, cooperative, corporation, nonprofit
organization, state or local government agency, and any other
organization required to register with the state or a participating
local government to do business in the state or the participating local
government and to obtain one or more licenses from the state or any of
its agencies or the participating local government.
(10) "Regulatory" means all licensing and other governmental or
statutory requirements pertaining to business or professional
activities.
(11) "Regulatory agency" means any state agency, board, commission,
division, or local government that regulates one or more professions,
occupations, industries, businesses, or activities.
(12) "Renewal application" means a document used to collect
pertinent data for renewal of licenses covered under this chapter.
(13) "System" or "((master license)) business licensing system"
means the procedure by which ((master)) business licenses are issued
and renewed, license and regulatory information is collected and
disseminated with due regard to privacy statutes, and account data is
exchanged by the agencies and participating local governments.

Sec. 317 RCW 19.02.030 and 2011 c 298 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is located within the department a business ((license
center)) licensing service.
(2) The duties of the ((center)) business licensing service
include:
(a) Developing and administering a computerized one-stop ((master
license)) business licensing system capable of storing, retrieving, and
exchanging license information with due regard to privacy statutes, as
well as issuing and renewing ((master)) business licenses in an
efficient manner;
(b) Providing a license information service detailing requirements
to establish or engage in business in this state;
(c) Providing for staggered ((master)) business license renewal
dates;
(d) Identifying types of licenses appropriate for inclusion in the
((master license)) business licensing system;
(e) Recommending in reports to the governor and the legislature the
elimination, consolidation, or other modification of duplicative,
ineffective, or inefficient licensing or inspection requirements; and
(f) Incorporating licenses into the ((master license)) business
licensing system.
(3) The department may adopt under chapter 34.05 RCW such rules as
may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 318 RCW 19.02.035 and 1982 c 182 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The business ((license center shall)) licensing service must
compile information regarding the regulatory programs associated with
each of the licenses obtainable under the ((master license)) business
licensing system. This information ((shall)) must include, at a
minimum, a listing of the statutes and administrative rules requiring
the licenses and pertaining to the regulatory programs that are
directly related to the licensure. For example, for pesticide dealers'
licenses, the information ((shall)) must include the statutes and rules
requiring licensing as well as those pertaining to the subject of
registering or distributing pesticides.
(2) The business ((license center shall)) licensing service must
provide information governed by this section to any person requesting
it. Materials used by the ((center)) business licensing service to
describe ((the)) its services ((provided by the center shall)) must
indicate that this information is available upon request.

Sec. 319 RCW 19.02.070 and 2011 c 298 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person requiring licenses ((which)) that have been
incorporated into the system must submit a ((master)) business license
application to the department requesting the issuance of the licenses.
The ((master)) business license application form must contain in
consolidated form information necessary for the issuance of the
licenses.
(2) The applicant must include with the application the sum of all
fees and deposits required for the requested individual license
endorsements as well as the handling fee established by the department
under the authority of RCW 19.02.075.
(3) Irrespective of any authority delegated to the department to
implement the provisions of this chapter, the authority for approving
issuance and renewal of any requested license that requires a
prelicensing or renewal investigation, inspection, testing, or other
judgmental review by the regulatory agency otherwise legally authorized
to issue the license must remain with that agency. The business
((license center)) licensing service has the authority to issue those
licenses for which proper fee payment and a completed application form
have been received and for which no prelicensing or renewal approval
action is required by the regulatory agency.
(4) Upon receipt of the application and proper fee payment for any
license for which issuance is subject to regulatory agency action under
subsection (3) of this section, the department must immediately notify
the regulatory agency with authority to approve issuance or renewal of
the license requested by the applicant. Each regulatory agency must
advise the department within a reasonable time after receiving the
notice: (a) That the agency approves the issuance of the requested
license and will advise the applicant of any specific conditions
required for issuing the license; (b) that the agency denies the
issuance of the license and gives the applicant reasons for the denial;
or (c) that the application is pending.
(5) The department must issue a ((master)) business license
endorsed for all the approved licenses to the applicant and advise the
applicant of the status of other requested licenses. It is the
responsibility of the applicant to contest the decision regarding
conditions imposed or licenses denied through the normal process
established by statute or by the regulatory agency with the authority
for approving issuance of the license.
(6) Regulatory agencies must be provided information from the
((master)) business license application for their licensing and
regulatory functions.

Sec. 320 RCW 19.02.075 and 2011 c 298 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department must collect a handling fee on each ((master))
business license application and each business license renewal
application filing. The department must set the amount of the handling
fees by rule, as authorized by RCW 19.02.030. The handling fees may
not exceed nineteen dollars for each ((master)) business license
application, and eleven dollars for each business license renewal
application filing, and must be deposited in the ((master)) business
license ((fund)) account. The department may increase handling and
renewal fees for the purposes of making improvements in the ((master
license)) business licensing service program, including improvements in
technology and customer services, expanded access, and infrastructure.
(2) The department may waive the fees imposed in subsection (1) of
this section for good cause. The department's decision whether or not
to waive a fee may not be overturned by any court except upon a showing
by clear and convincing evidence that the department acted arbitrarily
in making its decision.

Sec. 321 RCW 19.02.080 and 1992 c 107 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
All fees collected under the system ((shall)) must be deposited
with the state treasurer. Upon issuance or renewal of the ((master))
business license or supplemental licenses, the department ((shall))
must distribute the fees, except for fees covered under RCW 19.02.210
and for fees covered under RCW 19.80.075, to the appropriate accounts
under the applicable statutes for those agencies' licenses.

Sec. 322 RCW 19.02.085 and 1992 c 107 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
To encourage timely renewal by applicants, a ((master)) business
license delinquency fee ((shall be)) is imposed on licensees who fail
to renew by the ((master)) business license expiration date. The
((master)) business license delinquency fee ((shall)) must be the
lesser of one hundred fifty dollars or fifty percent of a base
comprised of the licensee's renewal fee minus corporate licensing
taxes, corporation annual report fee, and any interest fees or
penalties charged for late taxes or corporate renewals. The ((master))
business license delinquency fee ((shall)) must be added to the renewal
fee and paid by the licensee before a ((master)) business license
((shall be)) is renewed. The delinquency fee ((shall)) must be
deposited in the ((master license fund)) business license account.

Sec. 323 RCW 19.02.090 and 1982 c 182 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department ((shall)) must assign an expiration date for
each ((master)) business license. All renewable licenses endorsed on
that ((master)) business license ((shall)) must expire on that date.
License fees ((shall)) must be prorated to accommodate the staggering
of expiration dates.
(2) All renewable licenses endorsed on a ((master)) business
license ((shall)) must be renewed by the department under conditions
originally imposed unless a regulatory agency advises the department of
conditions or denials to be imposed before the endorsement is renewed.

Sec. 324 RCW 19.02.100 and 2011 c 298 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may ((not)) refuse to issue or renew a
((master)) business license to any person if:
(a) The person does not have a valid tax registration, if required
by a regulatory agency;
(b) The person is a corporation delinquent in fees or penalties
owing to the secretary of state or is not validly registered under
Title 23B RCW, chapter 18.100 RCW, Title 24 RCW, or any other statute
now or hereafter adopted which gives corporate or business licensing
responsibilities to the secretary of state if the person is required to
be so registered and the regulatory agency issuing or renewing the
license requires, as a condition of approving the issuance or renewal
of the license, that the person be so registered or not delinquent in
fees or penalties owing to the secretary of state; or
(c) The person has not submitted the sum of all fees and deposits
required for the requested individual license endorsements, any
outstanding ((master)) business license delinquency fee, or other fees
and penalties to be collected through the system.
(2) Nothing in this section prevents registration by the state of
a business for taxation purposes, or an employer for the purpose of
paying an employee of that employer industrial insurance or
unemployment insurance benefits.
(((3) The department must immediately suspend the license or
certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW
74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person
who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has
continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the
suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate is automatic upon
the department's receipt of a release issued by the department of
social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance
with the order.))

Sec. 325 RCW 19.02.110 and 2007 c 52 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the licenses processed under the ((master
license)) business licensing system prior to April 1, 1982, on July 1,
1982, use of the ((master license)) business licensing system ((shall
be)) is expanded as provided by this section.
(2) Applications for the following ((shall)) must be filed with the
business ((license center and shall)) licensing service and must be
processed, and renewals ((shall)) must be issued, under the ((master
license)) business licensing system:
(((1))) (a) Nursery dealer's licenses required by chapter 15.13
RCW;
(((2))) (b) Seed dealer's licenses required by chapter 15.49 RCW;
(((3))) (c) Pesticide dealer's licenses required by chapter 15.58
RCW;
(((4))) (d) Shopkeeper's licenses required by chapter 18.64 RCW;
(((5))) (e) Egg dealer's licenses required by chapter 69.25 RCW.

Sec. 326 RCW 19.02.115 and 2011 c 298 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Disclose" means to make known to any person in any manner
licensing information;
(b) "Licensing information" means any information created or
obtained by the department in the administration of this chapter and
chapters 19.80 and 59.30 RCW, which information relates to any person
who: (i) Has applied for or has been issued a license or trade name;
or (ii) has been issued an assessment or delinquency fee. Licensing
information includes ((master applications, renewal applications, and
master)) initial and renewal business license applications, and
business licenses; and
(c) "State agency" means every Washington state office, department,
division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency.
(2) Licensing information is confidential and privileged, and
except as authorized by this section, neither the department nor any
other person may disclose any licensing information. Nothing in this
chapter requires any person possessing licensing information made
confidential and privileged by this section to delete information from
such information so as to permit its disclosure.
(3) This section does not prohibit the department of revenue from:
(a) Disclosing licensing information in a civil or criminal
judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:
(i) In which the person about whom such licensing information is
sought and the department, another state agency, or a local government
are adverse parties in the proceeding; or
(ii) Involving a dispute arising out of the department's
administration of chapter ((19.02,)) 19.80((,)) or 59.30 RCW, or this
chapter if the licensing information relates to a party in the
proceeding;
(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the
director prescribes by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW,
such licensing information regarding a license applicant or license
holder to such license applicant or license holder or to such person or
persons as that license applicant or license holder may designate in a
request for, or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person, at
the license applicant's or license holder's request, to the extent
necessary to comply with a request for information or assistance made
by the license applicant or license holder to such other person.
However, licensing information not received from the license applicant
or holder must not be so disclosed if the director determines that such
disclosure would compromise any investigation or litigation by any
federal, state, or local government agency in connection with the civil
or criminal liability of the license applicant, license holder, or
another person, or that such disclosure would identify a confidential
informant, or that such disclosure is contrary to any agreement entered
into by the department that provides for the reciprocal exchange of
information with other government agencies, which agreement requires
confidentiality with respect to such information unless such
information is required to be disclosed to the license applicant or
license holder by the order of any court;
(c) Publishing statistics so classified as to prevent the
identification of particular licensing information;
(d) Disclosing licensing information for official purposes only, to
the governor or attorney general, or to any state agency, or to any
committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing with matters of
taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of industry or the
professions, or licensing;
(e) Permitting the department's records to be audited and examined
by the proper state officer, his or her agents and employees;
(f) Disclosing any licensing information to a peace officer as
defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for official
purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a search
warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure is for
the purpose of criminal tax or license enforcement. A peace officer or
county prosecuting attorney who receives the licensing information may
disclose that licensing information only for use in the investigation
and a related court proceeding, or in the court proceeding for which
the licensing information originally was sought;
(g) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other
licensing information, the name of a license applicant or license
holder, entity type, registered trade name, business address, mailing
address, unified business identifier number, list of licenses issued to
a person through the ((master license)) business licensing system
established in this chapter ((19.02 RCW)) and their issuance and
expiration dates, and the dates of opening of a business((. The
department is authorized to give, sell, or provide access to lists of
licensing information under this subsection (3)(g) that will be used
for commercial purposes));
(h) Disclosing licensing information that is also maintained by
another Washington state or local governmental agency as a public
record available for inspection and copying under the provisions of
chapter 42.56 RCW or is a document maintained by a court of record and
is not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;
(i) Disclosing any licensing information when the disclosure is
specifically authorized under any other section of the Revised Code of
Washington;
(j) Disclosing licensing information to the proper officer of the
licensing or tax department of any city, town, or county of this state,
for official purposes. If the licensing information does not relate to
a license issued by the city, town, or county requesting the licensing
information, disclosure may be made only if the laws of the requesting
city, town, or county grants substantially similar privileges to the
proper officers of this state; or
(k) Disclosing licensing information to the federal government for
official purposes.
(4) The department may refuse to disclose licensing information
that is otherwise disclosable under subsection (3) of this section if
such disclosure would violate federal law or any information sharing
agreement between the state and federal government.
(5) Any person acquiring knowledge of any licensing information in
the course of his or her employment with the department and any person
acquiring knowledge of any licensing information as provided under
subsection (3)(d), (e), (f), (j), or (k) of this section, who discloses
any such licensing information to another person not entitled to
knowledge of such licensing information under the provisions of this
section, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If the person guilty of such
violation is an officer or employee of the state, such person must
forfeit such office or employment and is incapable of holding any
public office or employment ((in this state)) with the state or any
local governmental entity in this state for a period of two years
thereafter.

Sec. 327 RCW 19.02.210 and 1992 c 107 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((master license fund)) business license account is created in
the state treasury. Unless otherwise indicated in RCW 19.02.075, all
receipts from handling and ((master)) business license delinquency fees
((shall)) must be deposited into the ((fund)) account. Moneys in the
((fund)) account may be spent only after appropriation beginning in
fiscal year 1993. Expenditures from the ((fund)) account may be used
only to administer the ((master license services)) business licensing
service program.

Sec. 328 RCW 19.02.310 and 2005 c 201 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department ((shall)) may administer a
performance-based grant program that provides funding assistance to
public agencies that issue business licenses and that wish to join with
the department's ((master)) business licensing service.
(2) The department may determine among interested grant applicants
the order and the amount of the grant. In making grant determinations,
consideration must be given, but not limited to, the following
criteria: Readiness of the public agency to participate; the number of
renewable licenses; and the reduced regulatory impact to businesses
subject to licensure relative to the overall investment required by the
department.
(3) The department ((shall)) must invite and encourage
participation by all Washington city and county governments having
interests or responsibilities relating to business licensing.
(4) The total amount of grants provided under this section may not
exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars in any one fiscal year.
(5) The source of funds for this grant program is the ((master))
business license account.

Sec. 329 RCW 19.02.800 and 2011 c 298 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 43.07.200, the provisions of this chapter
regarding the processing of license applications and renewals under ((a
master license)) the business licensing system do not apply to those
business or professional activities that are licensed or regulated
under chapter 31.04, 31.12, or 31.13 RCW or under Title 30, 32, 33, or
48 RCW.

Sec. 330 RCW 19.02.890 and 1982 c 182 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter may be known and cited as the business ((license
center)) licensing service act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 331 A new section is added to chapter 19.80
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department may cancel a trade name when it has revoked a
business's certificate of registration as provided in RCW 82.32.215,
when the department has closed a business's tax reporting account, or
when the business's business license, as defined in RCW 19.02.020, is
inactive.
(2) The department may also provide for the cancellation of trade
names under circumstances as defined by the department by rule.
(3) The department must notify a person in writing at the person's
last known address on record with the department that the person's
trade name has been canceled. Except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, the department must reinstate a canceled trade name if,
within sixty days of sending the notice required under this subsection,
the person requests that the trade name be reinstated and pays any
applicable renewal fees. The department may not reinstate a trade name
if the person's certificate of registration under RCW 82.32.030 is
revoked and has not been reinstated or the department is aware that the
person is otherwise not legally entitled to carry on, conduct, or
transact business in this state.
(4) A person whose trade name has been canceled by the department
may no longer use such trade name for any purpose.
(5) The department may remove any canceled trade names from its
database of trade names after the period for reinstatement provided in
subsection (3) of this section has expired.

Sec. 332 RCW 19.80.010 and 2011 c 298 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each person or persons who carries on, conducts, or transacts
business in this state under any trade name must register that trade
name with the department as provided in this section.
(1) Sole proprietorship or general partnership: The registration
must set forth the true and real name or names of each person
conducting the same, together with the post office address or addresses
of each such person and the name of the general partnership, if
applicable.
(2) Foreign or domestic limited partnership: The registration must
set forth the limited partnership name as filed with the office of the
secretary of state.
(3) Foreign or domestic limited liability company: The
registration must set forth the limited liability company name as filed
with the office of the secretary of state.
(4) Foreign or domestic corporation: The registration must set
forth the corporate name as filed with the office of the secretary of
state.
(5) Other business entities: The registration must set forth the
entity's name as required by the department.

Sec. 333 RCW 19.80.075 and 2011 c 298 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
All fees collected by the department under this chapter must be
deposited with the state treasurer and credited to the ((master license
fund)) business license account.

Sec. 334 RCW 19.94.015 and 2011 c 298 s 19 and 2011 c 103 s 38
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section for the
initial registration of an instrument or device, no weighing or
measuring instrument or device may be used for commercial purposes in
the state unless its commercial use is registered annually. If its
commercial use is within a city that has a city sealer and a weights
and measures program as provided by RCW 19.94.280, the commercial use
of the instrument or device must be registered with the city if the
city has adopted fees pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. If
its commercial use is outside of such a city, the commercial use of the
instrument or device must be registered with the department.
(2) A city with such a sealer and program may establish an annual
fee for registering the commercial use of such a weighing or measuring
instrument or device with the city. The annual fee may not exceed the
fee established in RCW 19.94.175 for registering the use of a similar
instrument or device with the department. Fees upon weighing or
measuring instruments or devices within the jurisdiction of the city
that are collected under this subsection by city sealers must be
deposited into the general fund, or other account, of the city as
directed by the governing body of the city.
(3) Registrations with the department are accomplished as part of
the ((master license)) business licensing system under chapter 19.02
RCW. Payment of the registration fee for a weighing or measuring
instrument or device under the ((master license)) business licensing
system constitutes the registration required by this section.
(4) The fees established by or under RCW 19.94.175 for registering
a weighing or measuring instrument or device must be paid to the
department of revenue concurrently with an application for a ((master))
business license under chapter 19.02 RCW or with the annual renewal of
a ((master)) business license under chapter 19.02 RCW. A weighing or
measuring instrument or device must be initially registered with the
state at the time the owner applies for a ((master)) business license
for a new business or at the first renewal of the license that occurs
after the instrument or device is first placed into commercial use.
The department of revenue must remit to the department of agriculture
all fees collected under this provision less reasonable collection
expenses.
(5) Each city charging registration fees under this section must
notify the department of agriculture at the time such fees are adopted
and whenever changes in the fees are adopted.

Sec. 335 RCW 19.94.2582 and 2006 c 358 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each request for an official registration certificate ((shall))
must be in writing, under oath, and on a form prescribed by the
department and shall contain any relevant information as the director
may require, including but not limited to the following:
(a) The name and address of the person, corporation, partnership,
or sole proprietorship requesting registration;
(b) The names and addresses of all individuals requesting an
official registration certificate from the department; and
(c) The tax registration number as required under RCW 82.32.030 or
uniform business identifier provided on a ((master)) business license
issued under RCW 19.02.070.
(2) Each individual when submitting a request for an official
registration certificate or a renewal of such a certificate ((shall))
must pay a fee to the department in the amount of one hundred sixty
dollars per individual.
(3) The department ((shall)) must issue a decision on a request for
an official registration certificate within twenty days of receipt of
the request. If an individual is denied their request for an official
registration certificate, the department must notify that individual in
writing stating the reasons for the denial and ((shall)) must refund
any payments made by that individual in connection with the request.

Sec. 336 RCW 35.21.392 and 2011 c 298 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
A city that issues a business license to a person required to be
registered under chapter 18.27 RCW may verify that the person is
registered under chapter 18.27 RCW and report violations to the
department of labor and industries. The department of revenue must
conduct the verification for cities that participate in the ((master
license)) business licensing system.

Sec. 337 RCW 35.21.392 and 2011 c 298 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
A city that issues a business license to a person required to be
registered under chapter 18.27 RCW may verify that the person is
registered under chapter 18.27 RCW and report violations to the
department of labor and industries. The department of revenue must
conduct the verification for cities that participate in the ((master
license)) business licensing system.

Sec. 338 RCW 35A.21.340 and 2011 c 298 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
A city that issues a business license to a person required to be
registered under chapter 18.27 RCW may verify that the person is
registered under chapter 18.27 RCW and report violations to the
department of labor and industries. The department of revenue must
conduct the verification for cities that participate in the ((master
license)) business licensing system.

Sec. 339 RCW 36.110.130 and 1995 c 154 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the event of a failure such as a bankruptcy or dissolution, of
a private sector business, industry, or nonprofit organization engaged
in a free venture industry agreement, responsibility for obligations
under Title 51 RCW ((shall)) must be borne by the city or county
responsible for establishment of the free venture industry agreement,
as if the city or county had been the employing agency. To ensure that
this obligation can be clearly identified and accomplished, and to
provide accountability for purposes of the department of labor and
industries, a free venture jail industry agreement entered into by a
city or county and private sector business, industry, or nonprofit
organization should be filed under a separate ((master)) business
license application in accordance with chapter 19.02 RCW, establishing
a new and separate account with the department of labor and industries,
and not be reported under an existing account for parties to the
agreement.

Sec. 340 RCW 43.22.035 and 2007 c 287 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
When an employer initially files a ((master)) business license
application under chapter 19.02 RCW for the purpose, in whole or in
part, of registering to pay industrial insurance taxes, the department
((shall)) must send to the employer any printed material the department
recommends or requires the employer to post. Any time the printed
material has substantive changes in the information, the department
((shall)) must send a copy to each employer.

Sec. 341 RCW 46.72A.020 and 2011 c 374 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Contact by a customer or customer's agent to engage the
services of a carrier's limousine must be initiated by a customer or
customer's agent at a time and place different from the customer's time
and place of departure. The fare for service must be agreed upon prior
to departure. Under no circumstances may customers or customers'
agents make arrangements to immediately engage the services of a
carrier's limousine with the chauffeur, even if the chauffeur is an
owner or officer of the company, with the single exception of stand-hail limousines only at a facility owned and operated by a port
district in a county with a population of one million or more that are
licensed and restricted by the rules and policies set forth by the port
district.
(2) At the time of the conduct of the commercial limousine
business, the chauffeur of a limousine and the limousine carrier
business must possess written or electronic records substantiating the
prearrangement of the carrier's services for any customer carried for
compensation, except for vehicles meeting the requirements of the
exception for stand-hail limousines described in subsection (1) of this
section. Limousine carriers and limousine chauffeurs operating as an
independent business must list a physical address on their ((master))
business license issued under chapter 19.02 RCW where records
substantiating the prearrangement of the carrier's services may be
reviewed by an enforcement officer. A limousine carrier must retain
these records for a minimum of one calendar year, and failure to do so
is a class 3 civil infraction against the carrier for each record that
is missing or fails to include all of the information described in
rules adopted under subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Limousine carriers and limousine chauffeurs operating as an
independent business must list a telephone or pager number that is used
to prearrange the carrier's services for any customer carried for
compensation.
(4) The department ((shall)) must adopt rules specifying the
content and retention schedule of the records required for compliance
with subsection (2) of this section.
(5) The failure of a chauffeur who is operating a limousine to
immediately provide, on demand by an enforcement officer, written or
electronic records required by the department substantiating the
prearrangement of the carrier's services for any customer carried for
compensation, except for limousines meeting the requirements of the
exception for stand-hail limousines described in subsection (1) of this
section, is a class 2 civil infraction and is subject to monetary
penalties under RCW 7.80.120. It is a class 1 civil infraction for a
repeat offense under this subsection during the same calendar year.
(6) The department ((shall)) must define by rule conditions under
which a chauffeur is considered to be operating a limousine, including
when the limousine is parked in a designated passenger load zone.

Sec. 342 RCW 50.12.290 and 2007 c 287 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
When an employer initially files a ((master)) business license
application under chapter 19.02 RCW for the purpose, in whole or in
part, of registering to pay unemployment insurance taxes, the
employment security department ((shall)) must send to the employer any
printed material the department recommends or requires the employer to
post. Any time the printed material has substantive changes in the
information, the department ((shall)) must send a copy to each
employer.

Sec. 343 RCW 59.30.050 and 2011 c 298 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department must annually register all manufactured/mobile
home communities. Each community must be registered separately. The
department must deliver by certified mail registration notifications to
all known manufactured/mobile home community landlords. Registration
information packets must include:
(a) Registration forms; and
(b) Registration assessment information, including registration due
dates and late fees, and the collections procedures, liens, and
charging costs to tenants.
(2) To apply for registration, the landlord of a
manufactured/mobile home community must file with the department an
application for registration on a form provided by the department and
must pay a registration fee as described in subsection (3) of this
section. The department may require the submission of information
necessary to assist in identifying and locating a manufactured/mobile
home community and other information that may be useful to the state,
which must include, at a minimum:
(a) The names and addresses of the owners of the
manufactured/mobile home community;
(b) The name and address of the manufactured/mobile home community;
(c) The name and address of the landlord and manager of the
manufactured/mobile home community;
(d) The number of lots within the manufactured/mobile home
community that are subject to chapter 59.20 RCW; and
(e) The addresses of each manufactured/mobile home lot within the
manufactured/mobile home community that is subject to chapter 59.20
RCW.
(3) Each manufactured/mobile home community landlord must pay to
the department:
(a) A one-time ((master)) business license application fee for the
first year of registration and, in subsequent years, an annual
((master)) renewal application fee, as provided in RCW 19.02.075; and
(b) An annual registration assessment of ten dollars for each
manufactured/mobile home that is subject to chapter 59.20 RCW within a
manufactured/mobile home community. Manufactured/mobile home community
landlords may charge a maximum of five dollars of this assessment to
tenants. Nine dollars of the registration assessment for each
manufactured/mobile home must be deposited into the manufactured/mobile
home dispute resolution program account created in RCW 59.30.070 to
fund the costs associated with the manufactured/mobile home dispute
resolution program. The remaining one dollar must be deposited into
the ((master license fund)) business license account created in RCW
19.02.210. The annual registration assessment must be reviewed once
each biennium by the department and the attorney general and may be
adjusted to reasonably relate to the cost of administering this
chapter. The registration assessment may not exceed ten dollars, but
if the assessment is reduced, the portion allocated to the
manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution program account and the
((master license fund)) business license account must be adjusted
proportionately.
(4) Initial registrations of manufactured/mobile home communities
must be filed before November 1, 2007, or within three months of the
availability of mobile home lots for rent within the community. The
manufactured/mobile home community is subject to a delinquency fee of
two hundred fifty dollars for late initial registrations. The
delinquency fee must be deposited in the ((master license fund))
business license account. Renewal registrations that are not renewed
by the expiration date as assigned by the department are subject to
delinquency fees under RCW 19.02.085.
(5) Thirty days after sending late fee notices to a noncomplying
landlord, the department may issue a warrant under RCW 59.30.090 for
the unpaid registration assessment and delinquency fee. If a warrant
is issued by the department under RCW 59.30.090, the department must
add a penalty of ten percent of the amount of the unpaid registration
assessment and delinquency fee, but not less than ten dollars. The
warrant penalty must be deposited into the ((master license fund))
business license account created in RCW 19.02.210. Chapter 82.32 RCW
applies to the collection of warrants issued under RCW 59.30.090.
(6) Registration is effective on the date determined by the
department, and the department must issue a registration number to each
registered manufactured/mobile home community. The department must
provide an expiration date, assigned by the department, to each
manufactured/mobile home community who registers.

Sec. 344 RCW 59.30.090 and 2011 c 298 s 33 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If any registration assessment or delinquency fee is not paid
in full within thirty days after sending late fee notices to a
noncomplying landlord, the department may issue a warrant in the amount
of such unpaid sums, together with interest thereon from the date the
warrant is issued until the date of payment.
(2) Interest must be computed on a daily basis on the amount of
outstanding registration assessment and delinquency fee imposed under
RCW 59.30.050 at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate
so computed must be adjusted on the first day of January of each year
for use in computing interest for that calendar year. Interest must be
deposited in the ((master license fund)) business license account
created in RCW 19.02.210.
(3) The department may file a copy of the warrant with the clerk of
the superior court of any county of the state in which real or personal
property of the owner of the manufactured/mobile home community may be
found. The clerk is entitled to a filing fee under RCW 36.18.012(10).
Upon filing, the clerk must enter in the judgment docket the name of
the owner of the manufactured/mobile home community mentioned in the
warrant and the amount of the registration assessment and delinquency
fee, or portion thereof, and any increases and penalties for which the
warrant is issued, and the date when the copy is filed.
(4) The amount of the warrant so docketed becomes a lien upon the
title to, and interest in, all real and personal property of the owner
of the manufactured/mobile home community against whom the warrant is
issued the same as a judgment in a civil case duly docketed in the
office of the clerk. The warrant so docketed is sufficient to support
the issuance of writs of garnishment in favor of the state in the
manner provided by law in the case of judgments wholly or partially
unsatisfied.
(5) The lien is not superior to bona fide interests of third
persons that had vested prior to the filing of the warrant. The phrase
"bona fide interests of third persons" does not include any mortgage of
real or personal property or any other credit transaction that results
in the mortgagee or the holder of the security acting as trustee for
unsecured creditors of the owner of the manufactured/mobile home
community mentioned in the warrant who executed the chattel or real
property mortgage or the document evidencing the credit transaction.

Sec. 345 RCW 69.25.020 and 2011 c 306 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
((When used in this chapter the following terms shall have the
indicated meanings,)) The definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Adulterated" applies to any egg or egg product under one or
more of the following circumstances:
(a) If it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance
which may render it injurious to health; but in case the substance is
not an added substance, such article ((shall)) is not ((be)) considered
adulterated under this clause if the quantity of such substance in or
on such article does not ordinarily render it injurious to health;
(b) If it bears or contains any added poisonous or added
deleterious substance (other than one which is: (i) A pesticide
chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity; (ii) a food additive;
or (iii) a color additive) which may, in the judgment of the director,
make such article unfit for human food;
(c) If it is, in whole or in part, a raw agricultural commodity and
such commodity bears or contains a pesticide chemical which is unsafe
within the meaning of RCW 69.04.392, as enacted or hereafter amended;
(d) If it bears or contains any food additive which is unsafe
within the meaning of RCW 69.04.394, as enacted or hereafter amended;
(e) If it bears or contains any color additive which is unsafe
within the meaning of RCW 69.04.396; however, an article which is not
otherwise deemed adulterated under ((subsection (1)))(c), (d), or (e)
of this ((section shall)) subsection are nevertheless ((be)) deemed
adulterated if use of the pesticide chemical, food additive, or color
additive, in or on such article, is prohibited by regulations of the
director in official plants;
(f) If it consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or
decomposed substance, or if it is otherwise unfit for human food;
(g) If it consists in whole or in part of any damaged egg or eggs
to the extent that the egg meat or white is leaking, or it has been
contacted by egg meat or white leaking from other eggs;
(h) If it has been prepared, packaged, or held under insanitary
conditions whereby it may have become contaminated with filth, or
whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health;
(i) If it is an egg which has been subjected to incubation or the
product of any egg which has been subjected to incubation;
(j) If its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any
poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents
injurious to health;
(k) If it has been intentionally subjected to radiation, unless the
use of the radiation was in conformity with a regulation or exemption
in effect pursuant to RCW 69.04.394; or
(l) If any valuable constituent has been in whole or in part
omitted or abstracted therefrom; or if any substance has been
substituted, wholly or in part therefor; or if damage or inferiority
has been concealed in any manner; or if any substance has been added
thereto or mixed or packed therewith so as to increase its bulk or
weight, or reduce its quality or strength, or make it appear better or
of greater value than it is.
(2) "Ambient temperature" means the atmospheric temperature
surrounding or encircling shell eggs.
(3) "At retail" means any transaction in intrastate commerce
between a retailer and a consumer.
(4) "Candling" means the examination of the interior of eggs by the
use of transmitted light used in a partially dark room or place.
(5) "Capable of use as human food" shall apply to any egg or egg
product unless it is denatured, or otherwise identified, as required by
regulations prescribed by the director, to deter its use as human food.
(6) "Check" means an egg that has a broken shell or crack in the
shell but has its shell membranes intact and contents not leaking.
(7) "Clean and sound shell egg" means any egg whose shell is free
of adhering dirt or foreign material and is not cracked or broken.
(8) "Consumer" means any person who purchases eggs for his or her
own family use or consumption; or any restaurant, hotel, boarding
house, bakery, or other institution or concern which purchases eggs for
serving to guests or patrons thereof, or for its own use in cooking or
baking.
(9) "Container" or "package" includes any box, can, tin, plastic,
or other receptacle, wrapper, or cover.
(10) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state
of Washington.
(11) "Director" means the director of the department or his duly
authorized representative.
(12) "Dirty egg" means an egg that has a shell that is unbroken and
has adhering dirt or foreign material.
(13) "Egg" means the shell egg of the domesticated chicken, turkey,
duck, goose, or guinea, or any other specie of fowl.
(14) "Egg handler" or "dealer" means any person who produces,
contracts for or obtains possession or control of any eggs or egg
products for the purpose of sale to another dealer or retailer, or for
processing and sale to a dealer, retailer or consumer. For the purpose
of this chapter, "sell" or "sale" includes the following: Offer for
sale, expose for sale, have in possession for sale, exchange, barter,
trade, or as an inducement for the sale of another product.
(15)(a) "Egg product" means any dried, frozen, or liquid eggs, with
or without added ingredients, excepting products which contain eggs
only in a relatively small proportion, or historically have not been,
in the judgment of the director, considered by consumers as products of
the egg food industry, and which may be exempted by the director under
such conditions as the director may prescribe to assure that the egg
ingredients are not adulterated and are not represented as egg
products.
(b) The following products are not included in the definition of
"egg product" if they are prepared from eggs or egg products that have
been either inspected by the United States department of agriculture or
by the department under a cooperative agreement with the United States
department of agriculture: Freeze-dried products, imitation egg
products, egg substitutes, dietary foods, dried no-bake custard mixes,
eggnog mixes, acidic dressings, noodles, milk and egg dip, cake mixes,
French toast, balut and other similar ethnic delicacies, and sandwiches
containing eggs or egg products.
(16) "Immediate container" means any consumer package, or any other
container in which egg products, not consumer-packaged, are packed.
(17) "Incubator reject" means an egg that has been subjected to
incubation and has been removed from incubation during the hatching
operations as infertile or otherwise unhatchable.
(18) "Inedible" means eggs of the following descriptions: Black
rots, yellow rots, white rots, mixed rots (addled eggs), sour eggs,
eggs with green whites, eggs with stuck yolks, moldy eggs, musty eggs,
eggs showing blood rings, and eggs containing embryo chicks (at or
beyond the blood ring stage).
(19) "Inspection" means the application of such inspection methods
and techniques as are deemed necessary by the director to carry out the
provisions of this chapter.
(20) "Inspector" means any employee or official of the department
authorized to inspect eggs or egg products under the authority of this
chapter.
(21) "Intrastate commerce" means any eggs or egg products in
intrastate commerce, whether such eggs or egg products are intended for
sale, held for sale, offered for sale, sold, stored, transported, or
handled in this state in any manner and prepared for eventual
distribution in this state, whether at wholesale or retail.
(22) "Leaker" means an egg that has a crack or break in the shell
and shell membranes to the extent that the egg contents are exposed or
are exuding or free to exude through the shell.
(23) "Loss" means an egg that is unfit for human food because it is
smashed or broken so that its contents are leaking; or overheated,
frozen, or contaminated; or an incubator reject; or because it contains
a bloody white, large meat spots, a large quantity of blood, or other
foreign material.
(24) "((Master license)) Business licensing system" means the
mechanism established by chapter 19.02 RCW by which ((master)) business
licenses, endorsed for individual state-issued licenses, are issued and
renewed utilizing a ((master)) business license application and a
((master)) business license expiration date common to each renewable
license endorsement.
(25) "Misbranded" ((shall apply)) applies to egg products ((which))
that are not labeled and packaged in accordance with the requirements
prescribed by regulations of the director under RCW 69.25.100.
(26) "Official certificate" means any certificate prescribed by
regulations of the director for issuance by an inspector or other
person performing official functions under this chapter.
(27) "Official device" means any device prescribed or authorized by
the director for use in applying any official mark.
(28) "Official inspection legend" means any symbol prescribed by
regulations of the director showing that egg products were inspected in
accordance with this chapter.
(29) "Official mark" means the official inspection legend or any
other symbol prescribed by regulations of the director to identify the
status of any article under this chapter.
(30) "Official plant" means any plant which is licensed under the
provisions of this chapter, at which inspection of the processing of
egg products is maintained by the United States department of
agriculture or by the state under cooperative agreements with the
United States department of agriculture or by the state.
(31) "Official standards" means the standards of quality, grades,
and weight classes for eggs, adopted under the provisions of this
chapter.
(32) "Pasteurize" means the subjecting of each particle of egg
products to heat or other treatments to destroy harmful, viable micro-organisms by such processes as may be prescribed by regulations of the
director.
(33) "Person" means any natural person, firm, partnership,
exchange, association, trustee, receiver, corporation, and any member,
officer, or employee thereof, or assignee for the benefit of creditors.
(34) "Pesticide chemical," "food additive," "color additive," and
"raw agricultural commodity" ((shall)) have the same meaning for
purposes of this chapter as prescribed in chapter 69.04 RCW.
(35) "Plant" means any place of business where egg products are
processed.
(36) "Processing" means manufacturing egg products, including
breaking eggs or filtering, mixing, blending, pasteurizing,
stabilizing, cooling, freezing, drying, or packaging egg products.
(37) "Restricted egg" means any check, dirty egg, incubator reject,
inedible, leaker, or loss.
(38) "Retailer" means any person in intrastate commerce who sells
eggs to a consumer.
(39) "Shipping container" means any container used in packaging a
product packed in an immediate container.

Sec. 346 RCW 69.25.050 and 2011 c 306 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) No person ((shall)) may act as an egg handler or dealer
without first obtaining an annual license and permanent dealer's number
from the department.
(b) Application for an egg dealer license and renewal or egg dealer
branch license must be made through the ((master license)) business
licensing system as provided under chapter 19.02 RCW and expires on the
((master)) business license expiration date. The annual egg dealer
license fee is thirty dollars and the annual egg dealer branch license
fee is fifteen dollars. A copy of the ((master)) business license
issued under chapter 19.02 RCW must be posted at each location where
the licensee operates. The application must include the full name of
the applicant for the license, the location of each facility the
applicant intends to operate, and, if applicable, documentation of
compliance with RCW 69.25.065 or 69.25.103.
(2) If an applicant is an individual, receiver, trustee, firm,
partnership, association or corporation, the full name of each member
of the firm or partnership or the names of the officers of the
association or corporation ((shall)) must be given on the application.
The application must further state the principal business address of
the applicant in the state and elsewhere and the name of a person
domiciled in this state authorized to receive and accept service of
summons of legal notices of all kinds for the applicant and any other
necessary information prescribed by the director.
(3) The applicant must be issued a license or renewal under this
section upon the approval of the application and compliance with the
provisions of this chapter, including the applicable rules adopted by
the department.
(4) The license and permanent egg handler or dealer's number is
nontransferable.

Sec. 347 RCW 69.25.060 and 1982 c 182 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the application for the renewal of an egg handler's or dealer's
license is not filed before the ((master)) business license expiration
date, the ((master)) business license delinquency fee ((shall be)) is
assessed under chapter 19.02 RCW and ((shall)) must be paid by the
applicant before the renewal license ((shall be)) is issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 348 A new section is added to chapter 70.290
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) A third-party administrator must register with the
Washington vaccine association and renew its registration annually.
Registrants must report a change of legal name, business name, business
address, or business telephone number to the association within ten
days after the change.
(b) Any person or entity acting as or holding itself out as a
third-party administrator without being registered under this section
is subject to a civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars nor
more than ten thousand dollars for each violation. The civil penalty
is in addition to any other penalties that may be imposed for
violations of other laws of this state. Penalties imposed under this
section must be deposited in the universal vaccine purchase account
created under RCW 43.70.720.
(2) The secretary may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as
necessary to implement this section. Any rules must be developed in
consultation with the association.

Sec. 349 RCW 70.290.030 and 2010 c 174 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The association is comprised of all health carriers issuing or
renewing health benefit plans in Washington state and all third-party
administrators conducting business on behalf of residents of Washington
state or Washington health care providers and facilities. Third-party
administrators are subject to registration under ((RCW 43.24.160))
section 348 of this act.
(2) The association is a nonprofit corporation under chapter 24.03
RCW and has the powers granted under that chapter.
(3) The board of directors includes the following voting members:
(a) Four members, selected from health carriers or third-party
administrators, excluding health maintenance organizations, that have
the most fully insured and self-funded covered lives in Washington
state. The count of total covered lives includes enrollment in all
companies included in their holding company system. Each health
carrier or third-party administrator is entitled to no more than a
single position on the board to represent all entities under common
ownership or control.
(b) One member selected from the health maintenance organization
having the most fully insured and self-insured covered lives in
Washington state. The count of total lives includes enrollment in all
companies included in its holding company system. Each health
maintenance organization is entitled to no more than a single position
on the board to represent all entities under common ownership or
control.
(c) One member, representing health carriers not otherwise
represented on the board under (a) or (b) of this subsection, who is
elected from among the health carrier members not designated under (a)
or (b) of this subsection.
(d) One member, representing Taft Hartley plans, appointed by the
secretary from a list of nominees submitted by the Northwest
administrators association.
(e) One member representing Washington state employers offering
self-funded health coverage, appointed by the secretary from a list of
nominees submitted by the Puget Sound health alliance.
(f) Two physician members appointed by the secretary, including at
least one board certified pediatrician.
(g) The secretary, or a designee of the secretary with expertise in
childhood immunization purchasing and distribution.
(4) The directors' terms and appointments must be specified in the
plan of operation adopted by the association.
(5) The board of directors of the association ((shall)) must:
(a) Prepare and adopt articles of association and bylaws;
(b) Prepare and adopt a plan of operation. The plan of operation
((shall)) must include a dispute mechanism through which a carrier or
third-party administrator can challenge an assessment determination by
the board under RCW 70.290.040. The board ((shall)) must include a
means to bring unresolved disputes to an impartial decision maker as a
component of the dispute mechanism;
(c) Submit the plan of operation to the secretary for approval;
(d) Conduct all activities in accordance with the approved plan of
operation;
(e) Enter into contracts as necessary or proper to collect and
disburse the assessment;
(f) Enter into contracts as necessary or proper to administer the
plan of operation;
(g) Sue or be sued, including taking any legal action necessary or
proper for the recovery of any assessment for, on behalf of, or against
members of the association or other participating person;
(h) Appoint, from among its directors, committees as necessary to
provide technical assistance in the operation of the association,
including the hiring of independent consultants as necessary;
(i) Obtain such liability and other insurance coverage for the
benefit of the association, its directors, officers, employees, and
agents as may in the judgment of the board of directors be helpful or
necessary for the operation of the association;
(j) ((By May 1, 2010, establish the estimated amount of the
assessment needed for the period of May 1, 2010, through December 31,
2010, based upon the estimate provided to the association under RCW
70.290.040(1); and notify, in writing, each health carrier and
third-party administrator of the health carrier's or third-party
administrator's total assessment for this period by May 15, 2010;
(k) On an annual basis, beginning no later than November 1, 2010,
and)) Annually, by November 1st of each year thereafter, establish the
estimated amount of the assessment;
(((l))) (k) Notify, in writing, each health carrier and third-party
administrator of the health carrier's or third-party administrator's
estimated total assessment by November 15th of each year;
(((m))) (l) Submit a periodic report to the secretary listing those
health carriers or third-party administrators that failed to remit
their assessments and audit health carrier and third-party
administrator books and records for accuracy of assessment payment
submission;
(((n))) (m) Allow each health carrier or third-party administrator
no more than ninety days after the notification required by (((l))) (k)
of this subsection to remit any amounts in arrears or submit a payment
plan, subject to approval by the association and initial payment under
an approved payment plan;
(((o))) (n) Deposit annual assessments collected by the
association, less the association's administrative costs, with the
state treasurer to the credit of the universal vaccine purchase account
established in RCW 43.70.720;
(((p))) (o) Borrow and repay such working capital, reserve, or
other funds as, in the judgment of the board of directors, may be
helpful or necessary for the operation of the association; and
(((q))) (p) Perform any other functions as may be necessary or
proper to carry out the plan of operation and to affect any or all of
the purposes for which the association is organized.
(6) The secretary ((shall)) must convene the initial meeting of the
association board of directors.

Sec. 350 RCW 76.48.121 and 2011 c 298 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every first or secondary specialized forest products buyer
purchasing specialty wood and every specialty wood processor must
prominently display the ((master)) business license issued under RCW
19.02.070 and endorsed with the respective licenses or registrations or
a copy of the ((master)) business license at each location where the
buyer or processor receives specialty wood if the first or secondary
specialized forest products buyer or specialty wood processor is
required to possess a license incorporated into the ((master license))
business licensing system created in chapter 19.02 RCW.

Sec. 351 RCW 82.24.510 and 2009 c 154 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The licenses issuable under this chapter are as follows:
(a) A wholesaler's license.
(b) A retailer's license.
(2) Application for the licenses ((shall)) must be made through the
((master license)) business licensing system under chapter 19.02 RCW.
The board ((shall)) must adopt rules regarding the regulation of the
licenses. The board may refrain from the issuance of any license under
this chapter if the board has reasonable cause to believe that the
applicant has ((wilfully)) willfully withheld information requested for
the purpose of determining the eligibility of the applicant to receive
a license, or if the board has reasonable cause to believe that
information submitted in the application is false or misleading or is
not made in good faith. In addition, for the purpose of reviewing an
application for a wholesaler's license or retailer's license and for
considering the denial, suspension, or revocation of any such license,
the board may consider any prior criminal conduct of the applicant,
including an administrative violation history record with the board and
a criminal history record information check within the previous five
years, in any state, tribal, or federal jurisdiction in the United
States, its territories, or possessions, and the provisions of RCW
9.95.240 and chapter 9.96A RCW ((shall)) do not apply to such cases.
The board may, in its discretion, grant or refuse the wholesaler's
license or retailer's license, subject to the provisions of RCW
82.24.550.
(3) No person may qualify for a wholesaler's license or a
retailer's license under this section without first undergoing a
criminal background check. The background check ((shall)) must be
performed by the board and must disclose any criminal conduct within
the previous five years in any state, tribal, or federal jurisdiction
in the United States, its territories, or possessions. A person who
possesses a valid license on July 22, 2001, is subject to this
subsection and subsection (2) of this section beginning on the date of
the person's ((master)) business license expiration under chapter 19.02
RCW, and thereafter. If the applicant or licensee also has a license
issued under chapter 66.24 or 82.26 RCW, the background check done
under the authority of chapter 66.24 or 82.26 RCW satisfies the
requirements of this section.
(4) Each such license ((shall)) expires on the ((master)) business
license expiration date, and each such license ((shall)) must be
continued annually if the licensee has paid the required fee and
complied with all the provisions of this chapter and the rules of the
board made pursuant thereto.
(5) Each license and any other evidence of the license that the
board requires must be exhibited in each place of business for which it
is issued and in the manner required for the display of a ((master))
business license.

Sec. 352 RCW 82.24.520 and 1986 c 321 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
A fee of six hundred fifty dollars ((shall)) must accompany each
wholesaler's license application or license renewal application. If a
wholesaler sells or intends to sell cigarettes at two or more places of
business, whether established or temporary, a separate license with a
license fee of one hundred fifteen dollars ((shall be)) is required for
each additional place of business. Each license, or certificate
thereof, and such other evidence of license as the department of
revenue requires, ((shall)) must be exhibited in the place of business
for which it is issued and in such manner as is prescribed for the
display of a ((master)) business license issued under chapter 19.02
RCW. The ((department of revenue shall)) board must require each
licensed wholesaler to file with the department of revenue a bond in an
amount not less than one thousand dollars to guarantee the proper
performance of the duties and the discharge of the liabilities under
this chapter. The bond ((shall)) must be executed by such licensed
wholesaler as principal, and by a corporation approved by the
department of revenue and authorized to engage in business as a surety
company in this state, as surety. The bond ((shall)) must run
concurrently with the wholesaler's license.

Sec. 353 RCW 82.26.150 and 2009 c 154 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The licenses issuable by the board under this chapter are as
follows:
(a) A distributor's license; and
(b) A retailer's license.
(2) Application for the licenses ((shall)) must be made through the
((master license)) business licensing system under chapter 19.02 RCW.
The board may adopt rules regarding the regulation of the licenses.
The board may refuse to issue any license under this chapter if the
board has reasonable cause to believe that the applicant has willfully
withheld information requested for the purpose of determining the
eligibility of the applicant to receive a license, or if the board has
reasonable cause to believe that information submitted in the
application is false or misleading or is not made in good faith. In
addition, for the purpose of reviewing an application for a
distributor's license or retailer's license and for considering the
denial, suspension, or revocation of any such license, the board may
consider criminal conduct of the applicant, including an administrative
violation history record with the board and a criminal history record
information check within the previous five years, in any state, tribal,
or federal jurisdiction in the United States, its territories, or
possessions, and the provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and chapter 9.96A RCW
((shall)) do not apply to such cases. The board may, in its
discretion, issue or refuse to issue the distributor's license or
retailer's license, subject to the provisions of RCW 82.26.220.
(3) No person may qualify for a distributor's license or a
retailer's license under this section without first undergoing a
criminal background check. The background check ((shall)) must be
performed by the board and must disclose any criminal conduct within
the previous five years in any state, tribal, or federal jurisdiction
in the United States, its territories, or possessions. If the
applicant or licensee also has a license issued under chapter 66.24 or
82.24 RCW, the background check done under the authority of chapter
66.24 or 82.24 RCW satisfies the requirements of this section.
(4) Each license issued under this chapter ((shall)) expires on the
((master)) business license expiration date. The license ((shall))
must be continued annually if the licensee has paid the required fee
and complied with all the provisions of this chapter and the rules of
the board adopted pursuant to this chapter.
(5) Each license and any other evidence of the license required
under this chapter must be exhibited in each place of business for
which it is issued and in the manner required for the display of a
((master)) business license.

Sec. 354 RCW 90.76.010 and 2011 c 298 s 39 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(b) "Director" means the director of the department.
(c) "Facility compliance tag" means a marker, constructed of metal,
plastic, or other durable material, that clearly identifies all
qualifying underground storage tanks on the particular site for which
it is issued.
(d) "Federal act" means the federal resource conservation and
recovery act, as amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901, et seq.).
(e) "Federal regulations" means the underground storage tanks
regulations (40 C.F.R. Secs. 280 and 281) adopted by the United States
environmental protection agency under the federal act.
(f) "License" means the ((master)) business license underground
storage tank endorsement issued by the department of revenue.
(g) "Underground storage tank compliance act of 2005" means Title
XV and subtitle B of P.L. 109-58 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 15801 et seq.) which
have amended the federal resource conservation and recovery act's
subtitle I.
(h) "Underground storage tank system" means an underground storage
tank, connected underground piping, underground ancillary equipment,
and containment system, if any.
(2) Except as provided in this section and any rules adopted by the
department under this chapter, the definitions contained in the federal
regulations apply to the terms in this chapter.

Sec. 355 RCW 90.76.020 and 2011 c 298 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department must adopt rules establishing requirements for
all underground storage tanks that are regulated under the federal act,
taking into account the various classes or categories of tanks to be
regulated. The rules must be consistent with and no less stringent
than the federal regulations and the underground storage tank
compliance act of 2005 and consist of requirements for the following:
(a) New underground storage tank system design, construction,
installation, and notification;
(b) Upgrading existing underground storage tank systems;
(c) General operating requirements;
(d) Release detection;
(e) Release reporting;
(f) Out-of-service underground storage tank systems and closure;
(g) Financial responsibility for underground storage tanks
containing regulated substances; and
(h) Groundwater protection measures, including secondary
containment and monitoring for installation or replacement of all
underground storage tank systems or components, such as tanks and
piping, installed after July 1, 2007, and under dispenser spill
containment for installation or replacement of all dispenser systems
installed after July 1, 2007.
(2) The department must adopt rules:
(a) Establishing physical site criteria to be used in designating
local environmentally sensitive areas;
(b) Establishing procedures for local government application for
this designation; and
(c) Establishing procedures for local government adoption and
department approval of rules more stringent than the statewide
standards in these designated areas.
(3) The department must establish by rule an administrative and
enforcement program that is consistent with and no less stringent than
the program required under the federal regulations in the areas of:
(a) Compliance monitoring, including procedures for recordkeeping
and a program for systematic inspections;
(b) Enforcement;
(c) Public participation;
(d) Information sharing;
(e) Owner and operator training; and
(f) Delivery prohibition for underground storage tank systems or
facilities that are determined by the department to be ineligible to
receive regulated substances.
(4) The department must establish a program that provides for the
annual licensing of underground storage tanks. The license must take
the form of a tank endorsement on the facility's annual ((master))
business license issued by the department of revenue under chapter
19.02 RCW. A tank is not eligible for a license unless the owner or
operator can demonstrate compliance with the requirements of this
chapter and the annual tank fees have been remitted. The department
may revoke a tank license if a facility is not in compliance with this
chapter, or any rules adopted under this chapter. The ((master))
business license must be displayed by the tank owner or operator in a
location clearly identifiable.
(5)(a) The department must issue a one-time "facility compliance
tag" to underground storage tank facilities that have installed the
equipment required to meet corrosion protection, spill prevention,
overfill prevention, leak detection standards, have demonstrated
financial responsibility, and have paid annual tank fees. The facility
must continue to maintain compliance with corrosion protection, spill
prevention, overfill prevention, and leak detection standards,
financial responsibility, and have remitted annual tank fees to display
a facility compliance tag. The facility compliance tag must be
displayed on or near the fire emergency shutoff device, or in the
absence of such a device in close proximity to the fill pipes and
clearly identifiable to persons delivering regulated substance to
underground storage tanks.
(b) The department may revoke a facility compliance tag if a
facility is not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter, or
any rules adopted under this chapter.
(6) The department may place a red tag on a tank at a facility if
the department determines that the owner or operator is not in
compliance with this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter
regarding the compliance requirements related to that tank. Removal of
a red tag without authorization from the department is a violation of
this chapter.
(7) The department may establish programs to certify persons who
install or decommission underground storage tank systems or conduct
inspections, testing, closure, cathodic protection, interior tank
lining, corrective action, site assessments, or other activities
required under this chapter. Certification programs must be designed
to ensure that each certification will be effective in all
jurisdictions of the state.
(8) When adopting rules under this chapter, the department must
consult with the state building code council to ensure coordination
with the building and fire codes adopted under chapter 19.27 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 356 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 19.02.220 (Combined licensing project -- Report -- Evaluation)
and 1995 c 403 s 1006;
(2) RCW 19.02.810 (Master license system -- Existing licenses or
permits registered under, when) and 1982 c 182 s 46;
(3) RCW 19.80.065 (RCW 42.56.070(9) inapplicable) and 2005 c 274 s
236, 2000 c 171 s 59, & 1984 c 130 s 8; and
(4) RCW 43.24.160 (Registration of third-party administrators--Fee -- Penalty -- Rules) and 2010 c 174 s 9.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 357 The repeals in section 356 of this act do
not affect any existing right acquired or liability or obligation
incurred under the statutes repealed or under any rule or order adopted
under them nor does it affect any proceedings instituted under them.

PART IV
REDUCING STATE B&O TAX CLASSIFICATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 (1) The legislature finds that there are
currently over fifty tax classifications for purposes of the state
business and occupation tax. Most of these tax classifications were
created to provide a reduced tax rate to certain business activities.
(2) The legislature further finds that the considerable number of
state business and occupation tax classifications creates complexity
for taxpayers, increases opportunities for disputes between taxpayers
and the department of revenue, and is a major barrier to achieving
significant uniformity between state and local business and occupation
tax systems.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends Part IV of this act to
significantly reduce state business and occupation tax classifications
by:
(a) Eliminating most classifications providing for a reduced tax
rate and replacing the reduced tax rate with a deduction to achieve the
same tax results for taxpayers;
(b) Taxing retail sales of interstate transportation equipment and
services under the general retailing classification, resulting in a tax
rate reduction from 0.484 percent to 0.471 percent;
(c) Taxing low-level waste disposal under the catch-all service and
other business activities classification, resulting in a tax rate
reduction from 3.3 percent to 1.8 percent through June 30, 2013, and
1.5 percent beginning July 1, 2013;
(d) Consolidating the manufacturing and processing for hire
classifications;
(e) Consolidating the extracting and extracting for hire
classifications;
(f) Consolidating the public road construction and government
contracting classifications into the wholesaling classification; and
(g) Consolidating the public and nonprofit hospital and real estate
broker classifications into the catch-all service and other business
activities classification.
(4) Except for the tax rate reductions described in subsection
(3)(b) and (c) of this section, Part IV of this act is not intended to
materially affect the tax burden of any person. If any provision of
sections 402 through 462 of this act would, under a plain meaning
analysis, materially impact a person's tax liability except as
described in subsection (3)(b) or (c) of this section, the legislature
expresses its intent that such provision should be deemed a mistake and
interpreted to achieve a result that is consistent with the
legislature's intent as described in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
For purposes of reporting the tax due under this chapter in a way
that provides taxpayers with more consistency between state and city-imposed business and occupation taxes or for ease of administration for
the department or taxpayers, the department may classify business
activities other than as provided in RCW 82.04.230 through 82.04.298.
However, new classifications created under the authority of this
section do not affect the tax rates applicable to the activities that
come within the new classifications.

Sec. 403 RCW 82.04.060 and 2010 c 106 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Sale at wholesale" or "wholesale sale" means:
(1) Any sale, which is not a sale at retail, of:
(a) Tangible personal property;
(b) Services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2) (a) or
(g);
(c) Amusement or recreation services as defined in RCW
82.04.050(3)(a);
(d) Prewritten computer software;
(e) Services described in RCW 82.04.050(6)(b);
(f) Extended warranties as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7);
(g) Competitive telephone service, ancillary services, or
telecommunications service as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065;
or
(h) Digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated services;
(2) Any charge made for labor and services rendered for persons who
are not consumers, in respect to real or personal property, if such
charge is expressly defined as a retail sale by RCW 82.04.050 when
rendered to or for consumers. For the purposes of this subsection (2),
"real or personal property" does not include any natural products named
in RCW 82.04.100; ((and))
(3) The sale of any service for resale, if the sale is excluded
from the definition of "sale at retail" and "retail sale" in RCW
82.04.050(14); and
(4) Any sale of or charge made for labor and services if the sale
or charge is excluded from the definition of retail sale in RCW
82.04.050 (10) or (12). Nothing in this subsection may be construed as
affecting the status of persons providing such services as consumers as
provided in RCW 82.04.190.

Sec. 404 RCW 82.04.230 and 2006 c 300 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
extractor or extractor for hire, except persons taxable as an extractor
or extractor for hire under any other provision in this chapter; as to
such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business
((shall be)) is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of the
products, including by-products, extracted for sale or for commercial
or industrial use, and, in the case of extractors for hire, the gross
income of the business of extracting for hire, multiplied by the rate
of 0.484 percent.
(2) The measure of the tax on extractors is the value of the
products, including by-products, so extracted, regardless of the place
of sale or the fact that deliveries may be made to points outside the
state.

Sec. 405 RCW 82.04.240 and 2004 c 24 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
manufacturer or processor for hire, except persons taxable as
manufacturers or processors for hire under other provisions of this
chapter; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such
business ((shall be)) is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the
value of the products, including by-products, manufactured, and, in the
case of processors for hire, the gross income of the business of
processing for hire, multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(2) The measure of the tax on manufacturers is the value of the
products, including by-products, so manufactured regardless of the
place of sale or the fact that deliveries may be made to points outside
the state.

Sec. 406 RCW 82.04.250 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 509 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(((1))) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of making sales at retail, except persons taxable ((as
retailers)) under other provisions of this chapter on the business of
making sales at retail, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
(((2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(10) or
subsection (3) of this section, as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(3) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person classified by the federal
aviation administration as a federal aviation regulation part 145
certificated repair station and that is engaging within this state in
the business of making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax
imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261,
82.08.0262, or 82.08.0263, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
business, multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.))

Sec. 407 RCW 82.04.255 and 2011 c 322 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Upon every person engaging within the state in)) The business
of providing real estate brokerage services((; as to such persons, the
amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent)) is
subject to tax under RCW 82.04.290.
(2) The measure of the tax on real estate commissions earned by the
real estate firm is the gross commission earned by the particular real
estate firm including that portion of the commission paid to brokers,
including designated and managing brokers, in the same firm on a
particular transaction. However, when a real estate commission on a
particular transaction is divided among real estate firms at the
closing of the transaction, including a firm located out of state, each
firm must pay the tax only upon its respective shares of said
commission. Moreover, when the real estate firm has paid the tax as
provided herein, brokers, including designated and managing brokers,
within the same real estate firm may not be required to pay a similar
tax upon the same transaction. If any firm located out of state
receives a share of commission on a particular transaction, that
company or broker must pay the tax based on the requirements of this
section and RCW 82.04.067.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "broker," "designated
broker," "managing broker," and "real estate firm" have the same
meaning as provided in RCW 18.85.011.

Sec. 408 RCW 82.04.260 and 2011 c 2 s 203 (Initiative Measure No.
1107) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) ((Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of
the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2012, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(c) Beginning July 1, 2012, dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein; or selling the same to purchasers who transport in
the ordinary course of business the goods out of state; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2012, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the
gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas
split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from
such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross
income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16
RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this
subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to
the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under
chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or
a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities
is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of
0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent
thereafter.
(11)))(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the
value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of
the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal
to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (((11))) (1)
and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing
tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial
airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case
of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and
the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case
of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (((11))) (1), "commercial
airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW
82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection
(((11))) (1) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.
(e) This subsection (((11))) (1) does not apply on and after July
1, 2024.
(((12))) (2)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting
timber for hire ((timber)); as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to the business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the
value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case of
extractors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing ((or processing for hire)): (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from
July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
For purposes of this subsection (((12))) (2)(d), "selling standing
timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer
is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of
the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the
timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (((12))) (2)(e)(iii),
"postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be
disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a
consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection
(((12))) (2) must file a complete annual survey with the department
under RCW 82.32.585.
(((13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.484 percent.
(14))) (3)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the
amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (((14))) (3) must file a complete annual report with the
department under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 409 RCW 82.04.280 and 2010 c 106 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of: (a) Printing materials other than newspapers, and of publishing
periodicals or magazines; or (b) ((building, repairing or improving any
street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of
the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used,
primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation
vehicles of any kind and including any readjustment, reconstruction or
relocation of the facilities of any public, private or cooperatively
owned utility or railroad in the course of such building, repairing or
improving, the cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or
relocation, is the responsibility of the public authority whose street,
place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
is being built, repaired or improved; (c) extracting for hire or
processing for hire, except persons taxable as extractors for hire or
processors for hire under another section of this chapter; (d)
operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse, but not
including the rental of cold storage lockers; (e) representing and
performing services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an
independent resident managing general agent licensed under the
provisions of chapter 48.17 RCW; (f))) radio and television
broadcasting, excluding network, national and regional advertising
computed as a standard deduction based on the national average thereof
as annually reported by the federal communications commission, or in
lieu thereof by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and
excluding that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state
audience computed as a ratio to the station's total audience as
measured by the 100 micro-volt signal strength and delivery by wire, if
any; (((g) engaging in activities which bring a person within the
definition of consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6);)) as to such
persons, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross
income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section, ((the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse used to
store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables, meat,
seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination thereof, at a
desired temperature to maintain the quality of the product for orderly
marketing.
(b) "Storage warehouse" means a building or structure, or any part
thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are received for storage
for compensation, except field warehouses, fruit warehouses, fruit
packing plants, warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW, public
garages storing automobiles, railroad freight sheds, docks and wharves,
and "self-storage" or "mini storage" facilities whereby customers have
direct access to individual storage areas by separate entrance.
"Storage warehouse" does not include a building or structure, or that
part of such building or structure, in which an activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
(c))) "periodical or magazine" means a printed publication, other
than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated intervals at least once
every three months, including any supplement or special edition of the
publication.

Sec. 410 RCW 82.04.285 and 2005 c 369 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
operating contests of chance; as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to the business of operating contests of chance is equal
to the gross income of the business derived from contests of chance
multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed on those persons subject to tax in
subsection (1) of this section. The amount of the additional tax with
respect to the business of operating contests of chance is equal to the
gross income of the business derived from contests of chance multiplied
by the rate of 0.1 percent through June 30, 2006, and 0.13 percent
thereafter. The money collected under this subsection (2) ((shall))
must be deposited in the problem gambling account created in RCW
43.20A.892. ((This subsection does not apply to businesses operating
contests of chance when the gross income from the operation of contests
of chance is less than fifty thousand dollars per year.))
(3) For the purpose of this section, "contests of chance" means any
contests, games, gaming schemes, or gaming devices, other than the
state lottery as defined in RCW 67.70.010, in which the outcome depends
in a material degree upon an element of chance, notwithstanding that
skill of the contestants may also be a factor in the outcome. The term
includes social card games, bingo, raffle, and punchboard games, and
pull-tabs as defined in chapter 9.46 RCW. The term does not include
race meets for the conduct of which a license must be secured from the
Washington horse racing commission, or "amusement game" as defined in
RCW 9.46.0201.
(4) "Gross income of the business" does not include the monetary
value or actual cost of any prizes that are awarded, amounts paid to
players for winning wagers, accrual of prizes for progressive jackpot
contests, or repayment of amounts used to seed guaranteed progressive
jackpot prizes.

Sec. 411 RCW 82.04.290 and 2011 c 174 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal
to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business
multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.
(2)(a))) Upon every person engaging within this state in any
business activity other than or in addition to an activity taxed
explicitly under another section in this chapter ((or subsection (1) or
(3) of this section)); as to such persons the amount of tax on account
of such activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.
(((b))) (2) This ((subsection (2) includes)) section applies to,
among others, and without limiting the scope hereof (whether or not
title to materials used in the performance of such business passes to
another by accession, confusion or other than by outright sale),
persons engaged in the business of rendering any type of service which
does not constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." This
includes, but is not limited to, the business of inspecting, testing,
labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person; conducting
research and development for compensation; providing chemical
dependency treatment services; providing travel agent or tour operator
services; acting as an international steamship agent, international
customs house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel or cargo
charter broker in foreign commerce, or international air cargo agent;
the business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce as defined in section 422 of this act; performing aerospace
product development for others; operating a warehouse; providing
international investment management services; providing boarding home
services as defined in section 429 of this act; receiving income from
royalties; providing day care services; and performing insurance
services as defined in section 432 of this act.
(3) The value of advertising, demonstration, and promotional
supplies and materials furnished to an agent by his or her principal or
supplier to be used for informational, educational, and promotional
purposes ((shall)) is not ((be)) considered a part of the agent's
remuneration or commission and ((shall)) is not ((be)) subject to
taxation under this section.
(((3)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of performing aerospace product development for
others, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by a rate of 0.9 percent.
(b) "Aerospace product development" has the meaning as provided in
RCW 82.04.4461.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 412 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.04.2404 (Manufacturers -- Processors for hire--Semiconductor materials) and 2010 c 114 s 105 & 2006 c 84 s 2;
(2) RCW 82.04.272 (Tax on warehousing and reselling prescription
drugs) and 2003 c 168 s 401 & 1998 c 343 s 1;
(3) RCW 82.04.2905 (Tax on providing day care) and 1998 c 312 s 7;
(4) RCW 82.04.2906 (Tax on certain chemical dependency services)
and 2003 c 343 s 1;
(5) RCW 82.04.2907 (Tax on royalties) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s
107, 2010 c 111 s 302, 2009 c 535 s 407, 2001 c 320 s 3, & 1998 c 331
s 1;
(6) RCW 82.04.2908 (Tax on provision of room and domiciliary care
to boarding home residents) and 2005 c 514 s 302 & 2004 c 174 s 1;
(7) RCW 82.04.2909 (Tax on aluminum smelters) and 2011 c 174 s 301;
(8) RCW 82.04.294 (Tax on manufacturers or wholesalers of solar
energy systems) and 2011 c 179 s 1, 2010 c 114 s 109, 2009 c 469 s 501,
2007 c 54 s 8, & 2005 c 301 s 2;
(9) 2010 c 114 s 104;
(10) 2003 c 149 s 3;
(11) 2010 c 106 s 206;
(12) 2009 c 461 s 3;
(13) 2006 c 300 s 7; and
(14) 2003 c 149 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 413 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.290 on engaging in
the business of conducting research and development for compensation,
a nonprofit corporation or nonprofit association is entitled to a
deduction as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The amount of the deduction under this section is determined by
multiplying 0.67734 by:
(a) The gross income of the business during the reporting period
from conducting research and development for compensation; or
(b) If the taxpayer is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.290 on the business of conducting research and development for
compensation, the difference resulting from subtracting all other
deductible amounts from the gross income of the business during the
reporting period from conducting research and development for
compensation.
(3) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 414 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.240 on the
business of manufacturing wood biomass fuel, a person is entitled to a
deduction as determined in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The amount of the deduction under this section is determined by
multiplying 0.71488 by:
(a) The value of the wood biomass fuel manufactured by the person
during the reporting period; or
(b) If the person is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.240 on the business of manufacturing wood biomass fuel, the
difference resulting from subtracting all other deductible amounts from
the value of the wood biomass fuel manufactured by the person during
the reporting period.
(3) "Wood biomass fuel" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.29A.135.
(4) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 415 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.270 on the
business of making wholesale sales of aluminum manufactured by the
seller, an aluminum smelter is entitled to a deduction as determined in
(b) of this subsection (1).
(b) The amount of the deduction under this subsection (1) is
determined by multiplying 0.4 by:
(i) The gross proceeds of wholesale sales by the taxpayer, during
the reporting period, of aluminum manufactured by the taxpayer; or
(ii) If the taxpayer is entitled to one or more deductions under
any other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under
RCW 82.04.270 on the business of making wholesale sales of aluminum
manufactured by the taxpayer, the difference resulting from subtracting
all other deductible amounts from the gross proceeds of wholesale sales
by the taxpayer, during the reporting period, of aluminum manufactured
by the taxpayer.
(2)(a) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.240 on the
business of manufacturing aluminum, an aluminum smelter is entitled to
a deduction as determined in (b) of this subsection (2).
(b) The amount of the deduction under this subsection (2) is
determined by multiplying 0.4 by:
(i) The value of the product manufactured by the taxpayer during
the reporting period, in the case of manufacturers, or, in the case of
processors for hire, the gross income of the business from processing
aluminum for hire during the reporting period; or
(ii) If the taxpayer is entitled to one or more deductions under
any other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under
RCW 82.04.240 on the business of manufacturing aluminum, the difference
resulting from subtracting all other deductible amounts from the value
of the product manufactured by the taxpayer during the reporting
period, in the case of manufacturers, or, in the case of processors for
hire, the gross income of the business from processing aluminum for
hire during the reporting period.
(3) A person claiming a deduction under this section must file a
complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.
However, if legislation is enacted after 2011 that replaces the annual
report under RCW 82.32.534 with the annual survey under RCW 82.32.585,
a person claiming a deduction under this section must file a complete
annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(4) The deductions in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.
(5) No deduction may be claimed under this section for reporting
periods beginning January 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 416 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.240 on the
business of manufacturing semiconductor materials, a person is entitled
to a deduction as determined in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The amount of the deduction under this section is determined by
multiplying 0.43183 by:
(a) The value of the product manufactured by the taxpayer during
the reporting period, in the case of manufacturers, or, in the case of
processors for hire, the gross income of the business from processing
semiconductor materials for hire during the reporting period; or
(b) If the taxpayer is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.240 on the business of manufacturing semiconductor materials, the
difference resulting from subtracting all other deductible amounts from
the value of the product manufactured by the taxpayer during the
reporting period, in the case of manufacturers, or, in the case of
processors for hire, the gross income of the business from processing
semiconductor materials for hire during the reporting period.
(3) For the purposes of this section "semiconductor materials"
means silicon crystals, silicon ingots, raw polished semiconductor
wafers, and compound semiconductor wafers.
(4) A person claiming a deduction under this section must file a
complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.
However, if legislation is enacted after 2011 that replaces the annual
report under RCW 82.32.534 with the annual survey under RCW 82.32.585,
a person claiming a deduction under this section must file a complete
annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(5) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.
(6) No deduction may be claimed under this section for reporting
periods beginning December 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 417 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.240 on the
business of manufacturing semiconductor materials, a person is entitled
to a deduction as determined in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The amount of the deduction under this section is determined by
multiplying 0.43183 by:
(a) The value of the product manufactured by the taxpayer during
the reporting period, in the case of manufacturers, or, in the case of
processors for hire, the gross income of the business from processing
semiconductor materials for hire during the reporting period; or
(b) If the taxpayer is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.240 on the business of manufacturing semiconductor materials, the
difference resulting from subtracting all other deductible amounts from
the value of the product manufactured by the taxpayer during the
reporting period, in the case of manufacturers, or, in the case of
processors for hire, the gross income of the business from processing
semiconductor materials for hire during the reporting period.
(3) For the purposes of this section "semiconductor materials"
means silicon crystals, silicon ingots, raw polished semiconductor
wafers, compound semiconductors, integrated circuits, and microchips.
(4) A person claiming a deduction under this section must file a
complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.
However, if legislation is enacted after 2011 that replaces the annual
report under RCW 82.32.534 with the annual survey under RCW 82.32.585,
a person claiming a deduction under this section must file a complete
annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(5) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.
(6) No deduction may be claimed under this section for reporting
periods beginning the date that is twelve years after the effective
date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 418 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.290 on the
business of inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon
owned by another person, a person is entitled to a deduction as
determined in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The amount of the deduction under this section is determined by
multiplying 0.67734 by:
(a) The person's gross income of the business during the reporting
period from inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon
owned by another person; or
(b) If the person is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.290 on the person's business of inspecting, testing, labeling,
and storing canned salmon owned by another person, the difference
resulting from subtracting all other deductible amounts from the
person's gross income of the business during the reporting period from
inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by
another person.
(3) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 419 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.290 on the
business of providing eligible chemical dependency treatment services,
a person is entitled to a deduction as determined in subsection (2) of
this section.
(2) The amount of the deduction under this section is determined by
multiplying 0.67734 by:
(a) The person's gross income of the business during the reporting
period from providing eligible chemical dependency treatment services;
or
(b) If the person is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.290 on the business of providing eligible chemical dependency
treatment services, the difference resulting from subtracting all other
deductible amounts from the person's gross income of the business
during the reporting period from providing eligible chemical dependency
treatment services.
(3) For purposes of this section, "eligible chemical dependency
treatment services" means intensive inpatient or recovery house
residential treatment services for chemical dependency, certified by
the department of social and health services, for which payment from
the United States or any of its instrumentalities or from the state of
Washington or any of its municipal corporations or political
subdivisions is received as compensation for or to support those
services.
(4) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 420 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.270 on the
business of making wholesale sales of qualifying solar energy systems
or qualifying components by the manufacturer of the system or
component, a person is entitled to a deduction as determined in (b) of
this subsection (1).
(b) The amount of the deduction under this subsection (1) is
determined by multiplying 0.43183 by:
(i) The gross proceeds of wholesale sales by the person, during the
reporting period, of qualifying solar energy products or qualifying
components, manufactured by the person; or
(ii) If the person is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.270 on the business of making wholesale sales of qualifying solar
energy systems or qualifying components manufactured by the person, the
difference resulting from subtracting all other deductible amounts from
the gross proceeds of wholesale sales by the person, during the
reporting period, of qualifying solar energy systems or qualifying
components manufactured by the person.
(2)(a) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.240 on the
business of manufacturing qualifying solar energy systems or qualifying
components, a person is entitled to a deduction as determined in (b) of
this subsection (2).
(b) The amount of the deduction under this subsection (2) is
determined by multiplying 0.43183 by:
(i) The value of the qualifying solar energy systems or qualifying
components manufactured by the person during the reporting period, in
the case of manufacturers, or, in the case of processors for hire, the
gross income of the business from processing qualifying solar energy
systems or qualifying components for hire during the reporting period;
or
(ii) If the person is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.240 on the business of manufacturing qualifying solar energy
systems or qualifying components, the difference resulting from
subtracting all other deductible amounts from the value of the
qualifying solar energy systems or qualifying components manufactured
by the person during the reporting period, in the case of
manufacturers, or, in the case of processors for hire, the gross income
of the business from processing solar energy systems or qualifying
components for hire during the reporting period.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Compound semiconductor solar wafers" means a semiconductor
solar wafer composed of elements from two or more different groups of
the periodic table.
(b) "Module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.
(c) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(d) "Qualifying component" means the following products to be used
exclusively in components of qualifying solar energy systems: Solar
grade silicon, silicon solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film
solar devices, or compound semiconductor solar wafers.
(e) "Qualifying solar energy system" means a solar energy system
using photovoltaic modules or stirling converters.
(f) "Silicon solar cells" means a photovoltaic cell manufactured
from a silicon solar wafer.
(g) "Silicon solar wafers" means a silicon wafer manufactured for
solar conversion purposes.
(h) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity.
(i) "Solar grade silicon" means high-purity silicon used
exclusively in components of solar energy systems using photovoltaic
modules to capture direct sunlight. "Solar grade silicon" does not
include silicon used in semiconductors.
(j) "Stirling converter" means a device that produces electricity
by converting heat from a solar source utilizing a stirling engine.
(k) "Thin film solar devices" means a nonparticipating substrate on
which various semiconducting materials are deposited to produce a
photovoltaic cell that is used to generate electricity.
(4) A person claiming a deduction under this section must file a
complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.
However, if legislation is enacted after 2011 that replaces the annual
report under RCW 82.32.534 with the annual survey under RCW 82.32.585,
a person claiming a deduction under this section must file a complete
annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(5) The deductions in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.
(6) No deduction may be claimed under this section for reporting
periods beginning July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 421 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.240 on the
business of splitting or processing dried peas or of manufacturing
wheat into flour; barley into pearl barley; soybeans into soybean oil;
canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products; or
sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; a person is entitled to a deduction
as determined in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The amount of the deduction under this section is determined by
multiplying 0.71488 by:
(a) The value of the product or products described in subsection
(1) of this section and manufactured by the person during the reporting
period; or
(b) If the person is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.240 on the business of manufacturing one or more of the products
described in subsection (1) of this section, the difference resulting
from subtracting all other deductible amounts from the value of the
product or products described in subsection (1) of this section and
manufactured by the person during the reporting period.
(3) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 422 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.290 on qualifying
travel or transportation-related activities, a person is entitled to a
deduction as determined in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The amount of the deduction under this section is determined by
multiplying 0.81667 by:
(a) The person's gross income of the business during the reporting
period from engaging in qualifying travel or transportation-related
activities; or
(b) If the person is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.290 on the person's business of engaging in qualifying travel or
transportation-related activities, the difference resulting from
subtracting all other deductible amounts from the person's gross income
of the business during the reporting period from engaging in qualifying
travel or transportation-related activities.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Qualifying travel or transportation-related activities" means
engaging within this state in one or more of the following businesses:
Travel agent, tour operator, international steamship agent,
international customs house broker, international freight forwarder,
vessel or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, international air
cargo agent, or stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce.
(b) "Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce" means all activities of a labor, service, or transportation
nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or
barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar
structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding or
storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export or
may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed, unstuffed,
containerized, separated, or otherwise segregated or aggregated for
delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to its
consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are:
Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient
place of delivery to the consignee or a convenient place for further
movement to export mode; documentation services in connection with the
receipt, delivery, checking, care, custody, and control of cargo
required in the transfer of cargo; imported automobile handling prior
to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel
services, including but not limited to plugging and unplugging
refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated
cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.
(4) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 423 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.250 on the
business of making qualifying retail sales, an eligible person is
entitled to a deduction as determined in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) The amount of the deduction under this section is determined by
multiplying 0.38344 by:
(a) The eligible person's gross proceeds of qualifying retail sales
during the reporting period; or
(b) If the eligible person is entitled to one or more deductions
under any other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed
under RCW 82.04.250 on the business of making qualifying retail sales,
the difference resulting from subtracting all other deductible amounts
from the eligible person's gross proceeds of qualifying retail sales
during the reporting period.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Eligible person" means a person classified by the federal
aviation administration as a federal aviation regulation part 145
certificated repair station.
(b) "Qualifying retail sales" means sales at retail that are exempt
from the tax imposed under RCW 82.08.020 by reason of RCW 82.08.0261,
82.08.0262, or 82.08.0263.
(4) A person claiming a deduction under this section must file a
complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.
However, if legislation is enacted after 2011 that replaces the annual
report under RCW 82.32.534 with the annual survey under RCW 82.32.585,
a person claiming a deduction under this section must file a complete
annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(5) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.
(6) No deduction may be claimed under this section for reporting
periods beginning July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 424 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.250 or 82.04.270
on the business of making sales at retail or wholesale of prescription
drugs, an eligible person is entitled to a deduction as determined in
this subsection.
(a) The deduction under this subsection from the gross proceeds of
retail sales of prescription drugs is determined by multiplying 0.70701
by:
(i) The gross proceeds of retail sales of prescription drugs by the
eligible person during the reporting period; or
(ii) If the eligible person is entitled to one or more deductions
under any other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed
under RCW 82.04.250 on the business of making retail sales of
prescription drugs, the difference resulting from subtracting all other
deductible amounts from the gross proceeds of retail sales of
prescription drugs by the eligible person during the reporting period.
(b) The deduction under this subsection from the gross proceeds of
wholesale sales of prescription drugs is determined by multiplying
0.71488 by:
(i) The gross proceeds of wholesale sales of prescription drugs by
the eligible person during the reporting period; or
(ii) If the eligible person is entitled to one or more deductions
under any other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed
under RCW 82.04.270 on the business of making wholesale sales of
prescription drugs, the difference resulting from subtracting all other
deductible amounts from the gross proceeds of wholesale sales of
prescription drugs by the eligible person during the reporting period.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section:
(a) "Eligible person" means a person who:
(i) Is registered with the federal drug enforcement administration
and licensed by the state board of pharmacy;
(ii) Buys prescription drugs from a manufacturer or another
wholesaler and resells the drugs to persons selling at retail or to
hospitals, clinics, health care providers, or other providers of health
care services; and
(iii) Owns or operates a warehouse inside or outside of this state
where the person's prescription drugs are stored pending delivery to
buyers.
(b) "Prescription drugs" means drugs intended for human use
pursuant to a prescription.
(c) "Prescription" and "drug" have the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.0281.
(3) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 425 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.290 on the
business of performing aerospace product development for others, a
person is entitled to a deduction as determined in subsection (2) of
this section.
(2) The amount of the deduction under this section is determined by
multiplying 0.4 by:
(a) The person's gross income of the business during the reporting
period from performing aerospace product development for others; or
(b) If the person is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.290 on the person's business of performing aerospace product
development for others, the difference resulting from subtracting all
other deductible amounts from the person's gross income of the business
during the reporting period from performing aerospace product
development for others.
(3) For purposes of this section, "aerospace product development"
has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.4461.
(4) A person claiming a deduction under this section must file a
complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.
However, if legislation is enacted after 2011 that replaces the annual
report under RCW 82.32.534 with the annual survey under RCW 82.32.585,
a person claiming a deduction under this section must file a complete
annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(5) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.
(6) No deduction may be claimed under this section for reporting
periods beginning July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 426 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.290 on the
business of operating a qualifying warehouse, a person is entitled to
a deduction as determined in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The amount of the deduction under this section is determined by
multiplying 0.67734 by:
(a) The person's gross income of the business during the reporting
period from operating a qualifying warehouse; or
(b) If the person is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.290 on the person's business of operating a qualifying warehouse,
the difference resulting from subtracting all other deductible amounts
from the person's gross income of the business during the reporting
period from operating a qualifying warehouse.
(3) For purposes of this section, "qualifying warehouse" means a
cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse. The term does not include
cold storage lockers.
(a) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse used to
store any combination of fresh or frozen perishable fruits or
vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, at a desired
temperature to maintain the quality of the product for orderly
marketing.
(b) "Storage warehouse" means a building or structure, or any part
of a building or structure, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are
received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses, fruit
warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under chapter
22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight sheds,
docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage" facilities
whereby customers have direct access to individual storage areas by
separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a building or
structure, or that part of such building or structure, in which an
activity is conducted that entitles the person conducting the activity
to a deduction under section 424 of this act.
(4) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 427 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.290 on
international investment management services, a person is entitled to
a deduction as determined in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The amount of the deduction under this section is determined by
multiplying 0.81667 by:
(a) The person's gross income of the business during the reporting
period from providing international investment management services; or
(b) If the person is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.290 on the person's business of providing international
investment management services, the difference resulting from
subtracting all other deductible amounts from the person's gross income
of the business during the reporting period from providing
international investment management services.
(3) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 428 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.270 on the
business of making wholesale sales of qualifying meat products, an
eligible person is entitled to a deduction as determined in (b) of this
subsection (1).
(b) The amount of the deduction under this subsection (1) is
determined by multiplying 0.71488 by:
(i) The gross proceeds of wholesale sales of qualifying meat
products during the reporting period by the eligible person; or
(ii) If the eligible person is entitled to one or more deductions
under any other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed
under RCW 82.04.270 on the business of making wholesale sales of
qualifying meat products, the difference resulting from subtracting all
other deductible amounts from the gross proceeds of wholesale sales of
qualifying meat products during the reporting period by the eligible
person.
(2)(a) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.240 on the
business of processing perishable meat products, a person is entitled
to a deduction as determined in (b) of this subsection (2).
(b) The amount of the deduction under this subsection (2) is
determined by multiplying 0.71488 by:
(i) The value of the meat product processed by the person for the
reporting period, in the case of manufacturers, or, in the case of
processors for hire, the gross income of the business for the reporting
period from processing meat products for hire; or
(ii) If the person is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.240 on the business of processing perishable meat products, the
difference resulting from subtracting all other deductible amounts from
the value of the meat product processed by the person for the reporting
period, in the case of manufacturers, or, in the case of processors for
hire, the gross income of the business for the reporting period from
processing meat products for hire.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Eligible person" means any person who sells perishable meat
products at wholesale or any person who takes an animal or a perishable
meat product, processes it, and sells the resulting qualifying meat
product at wholesale.
(b) "Meat product" means a product derived in whole or in part from
any part of an animal carcass, except products derived from seafood or
insects. The term includes only products that are intended for human
consumption as food or animal consumption as feed.
(c) "Perishable meat product" means a meat product having a high
risk of spoilage within a period of thirty days without refrigeration
or freezing.
(d) "Processed," "processes," or "processing" means to engage in
one or more of the following activities: Slaughtering an animal,
breaking an animal carcass or part of an animal carcass into any type
of smaller unit, or engaging in any other manufacturing activity when
perishable meat is either the finished product or an ingredient or
component of the finished product.
(e) "Qualifying meat product" means: (i) With respect to any
person, a perishable meat product; and (ii) any meat product,
perishable or not, that is the result of the seller taking an animal or
a perishable meat product, processing it, and selling the resulting
meat product at wholesale, even if meat is only a component of the
finished product.
(4) The deductions in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 429 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.290 on boarding
home services, a licensed boarding home is entitled to a deduction as
provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The amount of the deduction under this section is determined by
multiplying 0.81667 by:
(a) The gross income of the business during the reporting period
from providing boarding home services; or
(b) If the taxpayer is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.290 on the business of providing boarding home services, the
difference resulting from subtracting all other deductible amounts from
the gross income of the business during the reporting period from
providing boarding home services.
(3) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Boarding home services" means any services that a licensed
boarding home is authorized to provide to residents of the boarding
home, either directly or indirectly, and housing provided to residents
of the boarding home.
(b) "Licensed boarding home" means a boarding home licensed under
chapter 18.20 RCW.
(4) The definitions in RCW 18.20.020 apply to this section.
(5) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 430 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.290 on the
business of receiving income from royalties, a person is entitled to a
deduction as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The amount of the deduction under this section is determined by
multiplying 0.67734 by:
(a) The gross income from royalties during the reporting period; or
(b) If the person is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.290 on the business of receiving income from royalties, the
difference resulting from subtracting all other deductible amounts from
the gross income from royalties during the reporting period.
(3) For purposes of this section, "gross income from royalties"
means compensation for the use of intangible property, including
charges in the nature of royalties, regardless of where the intangible
property will be used. For purposes of this subsection, "intangible
property" includes copyrights, patents, licenses, franchises,
trademarks, trade names, and similar items. "Gross income from
royalties" does not include compensation for any natural resource, the
licensing of prewritten computer software to the end user, or the
licensing of digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated
services to the end user as defined in RCW 82.04.190(11).
(4) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 431 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.290 on providing
child day care, a person is entitled to a deduction as provided in
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The amount of the deduction under this section is determined by
multiplying 0.67734 by:
(a) The gross income of the business during the reporting period
from providing child day care; or
(b) If the person is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.290 on the business of providing child day care, the difference
resulting from subtracting all other deductible amounts from the gross
income of the business during the reporting period from providing child
day care.
(3) For purposes of this section, "child day care" means providing
child care for continuous periods of less than twenty-four hours.
(4) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 432 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.290 on providing
insurance services, a person is entitled to a deduction as provided in
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The amount of the deduction under this section is determined by
multiplying 0.67734 by:
(a) The gross income of the business during the reporting period
from providing insurance services; or
(b) If the person is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.290 on the business of providing insurance services, the
difference resulting from subtracting all other deductible amounts from
the gross income of the business during the reporting period from
providing insurance services.
(3) For purposes of this section, "insurance services" means:
(a) Representing and performing services for fire or casualty
insurance companies as an independent resident managing general agent
licensed under the provisions of chapter 48.17 RCW; or
(b) The licensed activities of insurance producers or title
insurance agents licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or surplus line
brokers licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW.
(4) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 433 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.240 on
qualifying manufacturing activities, a person is entitled to a
deduction as determined in (b) of this subsection (1).
(b) The amount of the deduction under this subsection is determined
by multiplying 0.71488 by:
(i) The value of the eligible product manufactured by the person
during the reporting period; or
(ii) If the person is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.240 on qualifying manufacturing, the difference resulting from
subtracting all other deductible amounts from the value of the eligible
products manufactured by the person during the reporting period.
(2) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.250 on the
business of making qualifying retail sales, a person is entitled to a
deduction as determined in (b) of this subsection (2).
(a) The amount of the deduction under this subsection (2) is
determined by multiplying 0.70701 by:
(i) The gross proceeds of sales for qualifying retail sales by the
person during the reporting period; or
(ii) If the person is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.250 on the business of making qualifying retail sales, the
difference resulting from subtracting all other deductible amounts from
the gross proceeds of sales for qualifying retail sales by the person
during the reporting period.
(b) Persons claiming a deduction under this subsection (2) must
keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070
establishing that the qualifying retail sales were for eligible
products that were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state.
(3) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.270 on the
business of making qualifying wholesale sales, a person is entitled to
a deduction as determined in (b) of this subsection (3).
(a) The amount of the deduction under this subsection (3) is
determined by multiplying 0.71488 by:
(i) The gross proceeds of sales for qualifying wholesale sales by
the person during the reporting period; or
(ii) If the person is entitled to one or more deductions under any
other statute in this chapter in computing the tax imposed under RCW
82.04.270 on the business of making qualifying wholesale sales, the
difference resulting from subtracting all other deductible amounts from
the gross proceeds of sales for qualifying wholesale sales by the
person during the reporting period.
(b) Persons claiming a deduction under this subsection (3) must
keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070
establishing that the qualifying wholesale sales were for eligible
products transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of
business out of this state.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Eligible product" means:
(i) Seafood products that remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw
salted state at the completion of the manufacturing;
(ii) Dairy products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified
in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including by-products
from the manufacturing process, such as whey and casein; and
(iii) Fruits and vegetables that have been manufactured by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables.
(b) "Qualifying manufacturing" means manufacturing an eligible
product.
(c) "Qualifying retail sales" means retail sales of an eligible
product described in (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection (4) by the
manufacturer of the product, but only when the product is delivered to
purchasers who transport the product out of this state in the ordinary
course of business.
(d) "Qualifying wholesale sales" means wholesale sales of any
eligible product described in (a) of this subsection (4) by the
manufacturer of the product, but only when the product is delivered to
purchasers who transport the product out of this state in the ordinary
course of business.
(5) The deduction in this section may only be claimed on a return
filed electronically using the department's online tax filing service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 434 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.285(2), a credit
is allowed for eligible persons. The credit equals the full amount of
tax otherwise due under RCW 82.04.285(2) for the reporting period.
(2) For purposes of this section, "eligible person" means a person
subject to tax under RCW 82.04.285 and whose gross income of the
business from the operation of contests of chance is less than fifty
thousand dollars in the tax year in which the credit under this section
is claimed.

Sec. 435 RCW 35.102.150 and 2011 c 174 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding RCW 35.102.130, a city that imposes a business and
occupation tax must allocate a person's gross income from the
activities of printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or
magazines, to the principal place in this state from which the
taxpayer's business is directed or managed. As used in this section,
the activities of printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals,
or magazines are those activities to which the tax rates in RCW
82.04.260(((13))) (3) and 82.04.280(1)(a) apply.

Sec. 436 RCW 48.14.080 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 520 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) As to insurers, other than title insurers and taxpayers under
RCW 48.14.0201, the taxes imposed by this title are in lieu of all
other taxes, except as otherwise provided in this section.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply with respect to:
(a) Taxes on real and tangible personal property;
(b) Excise taxes on the sale, purchase, use, or possession of (i)
real property; (ii) tangible personal property; (iii) extended
warranties; (iv) services, including digital automated services as
defined in RCW 82.04.192; and (v) digital goods and digital codes as
those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.192; and
(c) The tax imposed in ((RCW 82.04.260(9), regarding)) chapter
82.04 RCW on public and nonprofit hospitals.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the term "taxes" includes
taxes imposed by the state or any county, city, town, municipal
corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or other political
subdivision.

Sec. 437 RCW 82.04.051 and 1999 c 212 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As used in RCW 82.04.050, the term "services rendered in
respect to" means those services that are directly related to the
constructing, building, repairing, improving, and decorating of
buildings or other structures and that are performed by a person who is
responsible for the performance of the constructing, building,
repairing, improving, or decorating activity. The term does not
include services such as engineering, architectural, surveying,
flagging, accounting, legal, consulting, or administrative services
provided to the consumer of, or person responsible for performing, the
constructing, building, repairing, improving, or decorating services.
(2) A contract or agreement under which a person is responsible for
both services that would otherwise be subject to tax as a service under
RCW 82.04.290(((2))) and also constructing, building, repairing,
improving, or decorating activities that would otherwise be subject to
tax under another section of this chapter is subject to the tax that
applies to the predominant activity under the contract or agreement.
(3) Unless otherwise provided by law, a contract or agreement under
which a person is responsible for activities that are subject to tax as
a service under RCW 82.04.290(((2))), and a subsequent contract or
agreement under which the same person is responsible for constructing,
building, repairing, improving, or decorating activities subject to tax
under another section of this chapter, ((shall)) may not be combined
and taxed as a single activity if at the time of the first contract or
agreement it was not contemplated by the parties, as evidenced by the
facts, that the same person would be awarded both contracts.
(4) As used in this section "responsible for the performance" means
that the person is obligated to perform the activities, either
personally or through a third party. A person who reviews work for a
consumer, retailer, or wholesaler but does not supervise or direct the
work is not responsible for the performance of the work. A person who
is financially obligated for the work, such as a bank, but who does not
have control over the work itself is not responsible for the
performance of the work.

Sec. 438 RCW 82.04.257 and 2010 c 111 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, upon
every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales
at retail or wholesale of digital goods, digital codes, digital
automated services, or services described in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or
(6)(b), as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent in the case of retail sales and
by the rate of 0.484 percent in the case of wholesale sales.
(2) Persons providing subscription television services or
subscription radio services are subject to tax under RCW
82.04.290(((2))) on the gross income of the business received from
providing such services.
(3) For purposes of this section, a person is considered to be
engaging within this state in the business of making sales of digital
goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services described
in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(b), if the person makes sales of digital
goods, digital codes, digital automated services, or services described
in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(g) or (6)(b) and the sales are sourced to this
state under RCW 82.32.730 for sales tax purposes or would have been
sourced to this state under RCW 82.32.730 if the sale had been taxable
under chapter 82.08 RCW.
(4) A person subject to tax under this section is subject to the
mandatory electronic filing and payment requirements in RCW 82.32.080.

Sec. 439 RCW 82.04.261 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 510 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(((11)))
(2), a surcharge is imposed on those persons who are subject to any of
the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (2). Except as otherwise
provided in this section, the surcharge is equal to 0.052 percent. The
surcharge is added to the rates provided in RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (2)
(a), (b), (c), and (d). The surcharge and this section expire July 1,
2024.
(2) All receipts from the surcharge imposed under this section must
be deposited into the forest and fish support account created in RCW
76.09.405.
(3)(a) The surcharge imposed under this section is suspended if:
(i) Receipts from the surcharge total at least eight million
dollars during any fiscal biennium; or
(ii) The office of financial management certifies to the department
that the federal government has appropriated at least two million
dollars for participation in forest and fish report-related activities
by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical
boundaries of the state of Washington for any federal fiscal year.
(b)(i) The suspension of the surcharge under (a)(i) of this
subsection (3) takes effect on the first day of the calendar month that
is at least thirty days after the end of the month during which the
department determines that receipts from the surcharge total at least
eight million dollars during the fiscal biennium. The surcharge is
imposed again at the beginning of the following fiscal biennium.
(ii) The suspension of the surcharge under (a)(ii) of this
subsection (3) takes effect on the later of the first day of October of
any federal fiscal year for which the federal government appropriates
at least two million dollars for participation in forest and fish
report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located
within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington, or the
first day of a calendar month that is at least thirty days following
the date that the office of financial management makes a certification
to the department under subsection (5) of this section. The surcharge
is imposed again on the first day of the following July.
(4)(a) If, by October 1st of any federal fiscal year, the office of
financial management certifies to the department that the federal
government has appropriated funds for participation in forest and fish
report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located
within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington but the
amount of the appropriation is less than two million dollars, the
department must adjust the surcharge in accordance with this
subsection.
(b) The department must adjust the surcharge by an amount that the
department estimates will cause the amount of funds deposited into the
forest and fish support account for the state fiscal year that begins
July 1st and that includes the beginning of the federal fiscal year for
which the federal appropriation is made, to be reduced by twice the
amount of the federal appropriation for participation in forest and
fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes
located within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington.
(c) Any adjustment in the surcharge takes effect at the beginning
of a calendar month that is at least thirty days after the date that
the office of financial management makes the certification under
subsection (5) of this section.
(d) The surcharge is imposed again at the rate provided in
subsection (1) of this section on the first day of the following state
fiscal year unless the surcharge is suspended under subsection (3) of
this section or adjusted for that fiscal year under this subsection.
(e) Adjustments of the amount of the surcharge by the department
are final and may not be used to challenge the validity of the
surcharge imposed under this section.
(f) The department must provide timely notice to affected taxpayers
of the suspension of the surcharge or an adjustment of the surcharge.
(5) The office of financial management must make the certification
to the department as to the status of federal appropriations for tribal
participation in forest and fish report-related activities.

Sec. 440 RCW 82.04.270 and 2004 c 24 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at wholesale, except persons taxable ((as wholesalers))
under other provisions of this chapter on the business of making sales
at wholesale; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of such
business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

Sec. 441 RCW 82.04.29001 and 2003 c 168 s 602 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The creation and distribution of custom software is a service
taxable under RCW 82.04.290(((2))). Duplication of the software for
the same person, or by the same person for its own use, does not change
the character of the software.
(2) The customization of prewritten computer software is a service
taxable under RCW 82.04.290(((2))).

Sec. 442 RCW 82.04.29002 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1101 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Beginning May 1, 2010, through June 30, 2013, an additional
rate of tax of 0.30 percent is added to the rate provided for in RCW
((82.04.255,)) 82.04.285((,)) and 82.04.290(((2)(a))).
(2)(((a))) The additional rate in subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to:
(a) Persons engaging within this state in business as a hospital.
"Hospital" has the meaning provided in chapter 70.41 RCW but also
includes any hospital that comes within the scope of chapter 71.12 RCW
if the hospital is also licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW((.));
(b) ((The additional rate in subsection (1) of this section does
not apply to)) Amounts received from performing scientific research and
development services including but not limited to aerospace product
development, as defined in RCW 82.04.4461, performed for others, and
research and development in the physical, engineering, and life
sciences (such as agriculture, bacteriological, biotechnology,
chemical, life sciences, and physical science research and development
laboratories or services);
(c) Amounts received by nonprofit corporations or nonprofit
associations engaging in the business of conducting research and
development for compensation;
(d) Amounts received from inspecting, testing, labeling, and
storing canned salmon owned by another person;
(e) Amounts received from providing eligible chemical dependency
treatment services as defined in section 419 of this act;
(f) Amounts received from providing qualifying travel or
transportation-related activities as defined in section 422 of this
act;
(g) Amounts received from operating a qualifying warehouse as
defined in section 426 of this act;
(h) Amounts received from providing international investment
management services;
(i) Amounts received by boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20
RCW for providing boarding home services as defined in section 429 of
this act;
(j) Amounts received from providing child day care as defined in
section 431 of this act;
(k) Amounts received from providing insurance services as defined
in section 432 of this act; and
(l) Gross income from royalties as defined in section 430 of this
act.

Sec. 443 RCW 82.04.293 and 1997 c 7 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of ((RCW 82.04.290)) this chapter:
(1) A person is engaged in the business of providing international
investment management services, if:
(a) Such person is engaged primarily in the business of providing
investment management services; and
(b) At least ten percent of the gross income of such person is
derived from providing investment management services to any of the
following: (i) Persons or collective investment funds residing outside
the United States; or (ii) persons or collective investment funds with
at least ten percent of their investments located outside the United
States.
(2) "Investment management services" means investment research,
investment consulting, portfolio management, fund administration, fund
distribution, investment transactions, or related investment services.
(3) "Collective investment fund" includes:
(a) A mutual fund or other regulated investment company, as defined
in section 851(a) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended;
(b) An "investment company," as that term is used in section 3(a)
of the investment company act of 1940, as well as any entity that would
be an investment company for this purpose but for the exemptions
contained in section 3(c)(1) or (11);
(c) An "employee benefit plan," which includes any plan, trust,
commingled employee benefit trust, or custodial arrangement that is
subject to the employee retirement income security act of 1974, as
amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq., or that is described in sections
125, 401, 403, 408, 457, and 501(c)(9) and (17) through (23) of the
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, or a similar plan maintained
by a state or local government, or a plan, trust, or custodial
arrangement established to self-insure benefits required by federal,
state, or local law;
(d) A fund maintained by a tax-exempt organization, as defined in
section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, for
operating, quasi-endowment, or endowment purposes;
(e) Funds that are established for the benefit of such tax-exempt
organizations, such as charitable remainder trusts, charitable lead
trusts, charitable annuity trusts, or other similar trusts; or
(f) Collective investment funds similar to those described in (a)
through (e) of this subsection created under the laws of a foreign
jurisdiction.
(4) Investments are located outside the United States if the
underlying assets in which the investment constitutes a beneficial
interest reside or are created, issued or held outside the United
States.

Sec. 444 RCW 82.04.297 and 2010 c 111 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provision of internet access is subject to tax under RCW
82.04.290(((2))).
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "internet" and
"internet access" have the same meaning as those terms are defined in
the federal internet tax freedom act, Title 47 U.S.C. Sec. 151 note, as
existing on July 1, 2009.
(b) "Internet access" does not include telecommunications service
purchased, used, or sold by a person that provides a service that
enables users to connect to the internet to access content,
information, or other services offered over the internet, to the extent
such telecommunications service is purchased, used, or sold: (i) To
provide such service; or (ii) to otherwise enable users to access
content, information, or other services offered over the internet.
(3) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter.

Sec. 445 RCW 82.04.298 and 2011 c 2 s 204 (Initiative Measure No.
1107) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) The amount of tax with respect to a qualified grocery
distribution cooperative's sales of groceries or related goods for
resale, excluding ((items subject to tax under RCW 82.04.260(4)))
qualifying meat products, to customer-owners of the grocery
distribution cooperative is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
grocery distribution cooperative multiplied by the rate of one and
one-half percent.
(2) A qualified grocery distribution cooperative is allowed a
deduction from the gross proceeds of sales of groceries or related
goods for resale, excluding ((items subject to tax under RCW
82.04.260(4))) qualifying meat products, to customer-owners of the
grocery distribution cooperative that is equal to the portion of the
gross proceeds of sales for resale that represents the actual cost of
the merchandise sold by the grocery distribution cooperative to
customer-owners.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Grocery distribution cooperative" means an entity that sells
groceries and related items to customer-owners of the grocery
distribution cooperative and has customer-owners, in the aggregate, who
own a majority of the outstanding ownership interests of the grocery
distribution cooperative or of the entity controlling the grocery
distribution cooperative. "Grocery distribution cooperative" includes
an entity that controls a grocery distribution cooperative.
(b) "Qualified grocery distribution cooperative" means:
(i) A grocery distribution cooperative that has been determined by
a court of record of the state of Washington to be not engaged in
wholesaling or making sales at wholesale, within the meaning of RCW
82.04.270 or any similar provision of a municipal ordinance that
imposes a tax on gross receipts, gross proceeds of sales, or gross
income, with respect to purchases made by customer-owners, and
subsequently changes its form of doing business to make sales at
wholesale of groceries or related items to its customer-owners; or
(ii) A grocery distribution cooperative that has acquired
substantially all of the assets of a grocery distribution cooperative
described in (b)(i) of this subsection.
(c) "Customer-owner" means a person who has an ownership interest
in a grocery distribution cooperative and purchases groceries and
related items at wholesale from that grocery distribution cooperative.
(d) "Controlling" means holding fifty percent or more of the voting
interests of an entity and having at least equal power to direct or
cause the direction of the management and policies of the entity,
whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or
otherwise.
(e) "Qualifying meat product" has the same meaning as provided in
section 428 of this act.

Sec. 446 RCW 82.04.334 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 512 are each
amended to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to any sale of standing timber excluded
from the definition of "sale" in RCW 82.45.010(3). The definitions in
RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (2) apply to this section.

Sec. 447 RCW 82.04.360 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 702 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to any person in respect to his or
her employment in the capacity of an employee or servant as
distinguished from that of an independent contractor. For the purposes
of this section, the definition of employee includes those persons that
are defined in section 3121(d)(3)(B) of the federal internal revenue
code of 1986, as amended through January 1, 1991.
(2) Until July 1, 2010, this chapter does not apply to amounts
received by an individual from a corporation as compensation for
serving as a member of that corporation's board of directors.
Beginning on July 1, 2010, such amounts are taxable under RCW
82.04.290(((2))).
(3) A booth renter is an independent contractor for purposes of
this chapter. For purposes of this section, "booth renter" means any
person who:
(a) Performs cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or manicuring
services for which a license is required under chapter 18.16 RCW; and
(b) Pays a fee for the use of salon or shop facilities and receives
no compensation or other consideration from the owner of the salon or
shop for the services performed.

Sec. 448 RCW 82.04.440 and 2011 c 2 s 205 (Initiative Measure No.
1107) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in activities that are subject to tax
under two or more provisions of RCW 82.04.230 through 82.04.298,
inclusive, is taxable under each provision applicable to those
activities.
(2) Persons taxable under RCW ((82.04.2909(2),)) 82.04.250,
82.04.270, ((82.04.294(2),)) or 82.04.260 (1)(((b), (c), or (d), (4),
(11), or (12))) or (2)(c) with respect to selling products in this
state, including those persons who are also taxable under RCW
82.04.261, are allowed a credit against those taxes for any (a)
manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the manufacturing of products
so sold in this state, and/or (b) extracting taxes paid with respect to
the extracting of products so sold in this state or ingredients of
products so sold in this state. Extracting taxes taken as credit under
subsection (3) of this section may also be taken under this subsection,
if otherwise allowable under this subsection. The amount of the credit
may not exceed the tax liability arising under this chapter with
respect to the sale of those products.
(3) Persons taxable as manufacturers under RCW 82.04.240 or
82.04.260 (((1)(b) or (12))) (2), including those persons who are also
taxable under RCW 82.04.261, are allowed a credit against those taxes
for any extracting taxes paid with respect to extracting the
ingredients of the products so manufactured in this state. The amount
of the credit may not exceed the tax liability arising under this
chapter with respect to the manufacturing of those products.
(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240,
((82.04.2909(1), 82.04.294(1), 82.04.2404,)) or 82.04.260 (1)((, (2),
(4), (11), or (12))) or (2), including those persons who are also
taxable under RCW 82.04.261, with respect to extracting or
manufacturing products in this state are allowed a credit against those
taxes for any (i) gross receipts taxes paid to another state with
respect to the sales of the products so extracted or manufactured in
this state, (ii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the
manufacturing of products using ingredients so extracted in this state,
or (iii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to manufacturing
activities completed in another state for products so manufactured in
this state. The amount of the credit may not exceed the tax liability
arising under this chapter with respect to the extraction or
manufacturing of those products.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of
business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the
tax an income tax or value added tax; and
(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately
stated from the sales price.
(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the
United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of
such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign
country or political subdivision thereof.
(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and
includes (i) the taxes imposed on persons who are engaged in business
as a manufacturer in RCW 82.04.240((, 82.04.2404, 82.04.2909(1),)) and
82.04.260 (1)((, (2), (4), (11), and (12), and 82.04.294(1))) or (2);
(ii) the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.261 on persons who are engaged in
business as a manufacturer; and (iii) similar gross receipts taxes paid
to other states.
(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act
or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes (i)
the tax imposed on extractors in RCW 82.04.230 and 82.04.260(((12)))
(2); (ii) the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.261 on persons who are
engaged in business as an extractor; and (iii) similar gross receipts
taxes paid to other states.
(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used
in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through
((82.04.212 [82.04.217])) 82.04.217, notwithstanding the use of those
terms in the context of describing taxes imposed by other states.

Sec. 449 RCW 82.04.4451 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1102 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed against the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter, as
provided in this section. Except for taxpayers that report at least
fifty percent of their taxable amount under RCW ((82.04.255,))
82.04.290(((2)(a),)) and 82.04.285, the maximum credit for a taxpayer
for a reporting period is thirty-five dollars multiplied by the number
of months in the reporting period, as determined under RCW 82.32.045.
For a taxpayer that reports at least fifty percent of its taxable
amount under RCW ((82.04.255,)) 82.04.290(((2)(a),)) and 82.04.285, the
maximum credit for a reporting period is seventy dollars multiplied by
the number of months in the reporting period, as determined under RCW
82.32.045.
(2) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter is
equal to or less than the maximum credit, a credit is allowed equal to
the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter.
(3) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter exceeds
the maximum credit, a reduced credit is allowed equal to twice the
maximum credit, minus the tax otherwise due under this chapter, but not
less than zero.
(4) The department may prepare a tax credit table consisting of tax
ranges using increments of no more than five dollars and a
corresponding tax credit to be applied to those tax ranges. The table
((shall)) must be prepared in such a manner that no taxpayer will owe
a greater amount of tax by using the table than would be owed by
performing the calculation under subsections (1) through (3) of this
section. A table prepared by the department under this subsection must
be used by all taxpayers in taking the credit provided in this section.

Sec. 450 RCW 82.04.44525 and 2009 c 535 s 1104 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits in this section, an eligible person is
allowed a credit against the tax due under this chapter. The credit is
based on qualified employment positions in eligible areas. The credit
is available to persons who are engaged in international services as
defined in this section. In order to receive the credit, the
international service activities must take place at a business within
the eligible area.
(2)(a) The credit ((shall)) equals three thousand dollars for each
qualified employment position created after July 1, 1998, in an
eligible area. A credit is earned for the calendar year the person is
hired to fill the position, plus the four subsequent consecutive years,
if the position is maintained for those four years.
(b) Credit may not be taken for hiring of persons into positions
that exist on July 1, 1998. Credit is authorized for new employees
hired for new positions created after July 1, 1998. New positions
filled by existing employees are eligible for the credit under this
section only if the position vacated by the existing employee is filled
by a new hire.
(c) When a position is newly created, if it is filled before July
1st, this position is eligible for the full yearly credit. If it is
filled after June 30th, this position is eligible for half of the
credit.
(d) Credit may be accrued and carried over until it is used. No
refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Eligible area" means: (i) A community empowerment zone under
RCW 43.31C.020; or (ii) a contiguous group of census tracts that meets
the unemployment and poverty criteria of RCW 43.31C.030 and is
designated under subsection (4) of this section;
(b) "Eligible person" means a person, as defined in RCW 82.04.030,
who in an eligible area at a specific location is engaged in the
business of providing international services;
(c)(i) "International services" means the provision of a service,
as defined under (c)(iii) of this subsection, that is subject to tax
under RCW 82.04.290 (((2) or (3))), and either:
(A) Is for a person domiciled outside the United States; or
(B) The service itself is for use primarily outside of the United
States.
(ii) "International services" excludes ((any service taxable under
RCW 82.04.290(1))) international investment management services.
(iii) Eligible services are: Computer; data processing;
information; legal; accounting and tax preparation; engineering;
architectural; business consulting; business management; public
relations and advertising; surveying; geological consulting; real
estate appraisal; or financial services. For the purposes of this
section these services mean the following:
(A) "Computer services" are services such as computer programming,
custom software modification, customization of canned software, custom
software installation, custom software maintenance, custom software
repair, training in the use of software, computer systems design, and
custom software update services;
(B) "Data processing services" are services such as word
processing, data entry, data retrieval, data search, information
compilation, payroll processing, business accounts processing, data
production, and other computerized data and information storage or
manipulation. "Data processing services" also includes the use of a
computer or computer time for data processing whether the processing is
performed by the provider of the computer or by the purchaser or other
beneficiary of the service;
(C) "Information services" are services such as electronic data
retrieval or research that entails furnishing financial or legal
information, data or research, internet access as defined in RCW
82.04.297, general or specialized news, or current information;
(D) "Legal services" are services such as representation by an
attorney, or other person when permitted, in an administrative or legal
proceeding, legal drafting, paralegal services, legal research
services, and court reporting services, arbitration, and mediation
services;
(E) "Accounting and tax preparation services" are services such as
accounting, auditing, actuarial, bookkeeping, or tax preparation
services;
(F) "Engineering services" are services such as civil, electrical,
mechanical, petroleum, marine, nuclear, and design engineering, machine
designing, machine tool designing, and sewage disposal system designing
services;
(G) "Architectural services" are services such as structural or
landscape design or architecture, interior design, building design,
building program management, and space planning services;
(H) "Business consulting services" are services such as primarily
providing operating counsel, advice, or assistance to the management or
owner of any business, private, nonprofit, or public organization,
including but not limited to those in the following areas:
Administrative management consulting; general management consulting;
human resource consulting or training; management engineering
consulting; management information systems consulting; manufacturing
management consulting; marketing consulting; operations research
consulting; personnel management consulting; physical distribution
consulting; site location consulting; economic consulting; motel,
hotel, and resort consulting; restaurant consulting; government affairs
consulting; and lobbying;
(I) "Business management services" are services such as
administrative management, business management, and office management.
"Business management services" does not include property management or
property leasing, motel, hotel, and resort management, or automobile
parking management;
(J) "Public relations and advertising services" are services such
as layout, art direction, graphic design, copy writing, mechanical
preparation, opinion research, marketing research, marketing, or
production supervision;
(K) "Surveying services" are services such as land surveying;
(L) "Geological consulting services" are services rendered for the
oil, gas, and mining industry and other earth resource industries, and
other services such as soil testing;
(M) "Real estate appraisal services" are services such as market
appraisal and other real estate valuation; and
(N) "Financial services" are services such as banking, loan,
security, investment management, investment advisory, mortgage
servicing, contract collection, and finance leasing services, engaged
in by financial businesses, or businesses similar to or in competition
with financial businesses; and
(d) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
position to provide international services. If an employee is either
voluntarily or involuntarily separated from employment, the employment
position is considered filled on a full-time basis if the employer is
either training or actively recruiting a replacement employee.
(4) By ordinance, the legislative authority of a city, or
legislative authorities of contiguous cities by ordinance of each
city's legislative authority, with population greater than eighty
thousand, located in a county containing no community empowerment zones
as designated under RCW 43.31C.020, may designate a contiguous group of
census tracts within the city or cities as an eligible area under this
section. Each of the census tracts must meet the unemployment and
poverty criteria of RCW 43.31C.030. Upon making the designation, the
city or cities ((shall)) must transmit to the department of revenue a
certification letter and a map, each explicitly describing the
boundaries of the census tract. This designation must be made by
December 31, 1998.
(5) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. This information includes:
(a) Employment records for the previous six years;
(b) Information relating to description of international service
activity engaged in at the eligible location by the person; and
(c) Information relating to customers of international service
activity engaged in at that location by the person.
(6) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been used ((shall be)) is immediately due. The
department ((shall)) must assess interest, but not penalties, on the
credited taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest
((shall be)) is assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise
taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, ((shall be)) is assessed retroactively
to the date the tax credit was taken, and ((shall)) accrues until the
taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.
(7) The employment security department ((shall)) must provide to
the department of revenue such information needed by the department of
revenue to verify eligibility under this section.

Sec. 451 RCW 82.04.4463 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 515 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for property taxes and leasehold excise taxes paid during the
calendar year.
(2) The credit is equal to:
(a)(i)(A) Property taxes paid on buildings, and land upon which the
buildings are located, constructed after December 1, 2003, and used
exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such
airplanes; and
(B) Leasehold excise taxes paid with respect to buildings
constructed after January 1, 2006, the land upon which the buildings
are located, or both, if the buildings are used exclusively in
manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes; and
(C) Property taxes or leasehold excise taxes paid on, or with
respect to, buildings constructed after June 30, 2008, the land upon
which the buildings are located, or both, and used exclusively for
aerospace product development, manufacturing tooling specifically
designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or their
components, or in providing aerospace services, by persons not within
the scope of (a)(i)(A) and (B) of this subsection (2) and are taxable
under RCW ((82.04.290(3),)) 82.04.260(((10))) (1)(b)((,)) or
((82.04.250(3))) are eligible for a deduction under section 423 or 425
of this act; or
(ii) Property taxes attributable to an increase in assessed value
due to the renovation or expansion, after: (A) December 1, 2003, of a
building used exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes; and (B) June 30, 2008, of buildings used
exclusively for aerospace product development, manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
their components, or in providing aerospace services, by persons not
within the scope of (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection (2) and are taxable
under RCW ((82.04.290(3),)) 82.04.260(((10))) (1)(b)((, or
82.04.250(3))) or are eligible for a deduction under section 423 or 425
of this act; and
(b) An amount equal to:
(i)(A) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW
82.04.260(((10))) (1)(a), on machinery and equipment exempt under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 and acquired after December 1, 2003;
(B) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW
82.04.260(((10))) (1)(b), on machinery and equipment exempt under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 and acquired after June 30, 2008; or
(C) Property taxes paid, by persons ((taxable under RCW
82.04.250(3) or 82.04.290(3))) eligible for the deduction provided in
section 423 or 425 of this act, on computer hardware, computer
peripherals, and software exempt under RCW 82.08.975 or 82.12.975 and
acquired after June 30, 2008.
(ii) For purposes of determining the amount eligible for credit
under (i)(A) and (B) of this subsection (2)(b), the amount of property
taxes paid is multiplied by a fraction.
(A) The numerator of the fraction is the total taxable amount
subject to the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.260(((10))) (1) (a) or (b)
on the applicable business activities of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, components of such airplanes, or tooling specifically
designed for use in the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes.
(B) The denominator of the fraction is the total taxable amount
subject to the tax imposed under all manufacturing classifications in
chapter 82.04 RCW.
(C) For purposes of both the numerator and denominator of the
fraction, the total taxable amount refers to the total taxable amount
required to be reported on the person's returns for the calendar year
before the calendar year in which the credit under this section is
earned. The department may provide for an alternative method for
calculating the numerator in cases where the tax rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(((10))) (1) for manufacturing was not in effect during the
full calendar year before the calendar year in which the credit under
this section is earned.
(D) No credit is available under (b)(i)(A) or (B) of this
subsection (2) if either the numerator or the denominator of the
fraction is zero. If the fraction is greater than or equal to nine-tenths, then the fraction is rounded to one.
(E) As used in (b)(ii)(C) of this subsection (2), "returns" means
the tax returns for which the tax imposed under this chapter is
reported to the department.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(a) "Aerospace product development" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 82.04.4461.
(b) "Aerospace services" has the same meaning given in RCW
82.08.975.
(c) "Commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as
provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(4) A credit earned during one calendar year may be carried over to
be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year, but
may not be carried over a second year. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.
(5) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person claiming the credit under this section must file a complete
annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 452 RCW 82.04.4483 and 2010 c 114 s 119 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
persons engaged in a rural county in the business of manufacturing
computer software or programming, as those terms are defined in this
section.
(2) A person who partially or totally relocates a business from one
rural county to another rural county is eligible for any new qualifying
employment positions created as a result of the relocation but is not
eligible to receive credit for the jobs moved from one county to the
other.
(3)(a) To qualify for the credit, the qualifying activity of the
person must be conducted in a rural county and the new qualified
employment position must be located in the rural county.
(b) If an activity is conducted both from a rural county and
outside of a rural county, the credit is available if at least ninety
percent of the qualifying activity is conducted within a rural county.
If the qualifying activity is a service taxable activity, the place
where the work is performed is the place at which the activity is
conducted.
(4)(a) The credit under this section ((shall)) equals one thousand
dollars for each new qualified employment position created after
January 1, 2004, in an eligible area. A credit is earned for the
calendar year the person is hired to fill the position. Additionally
a credit is earned for each year the position is maintained over the
subsequent consecutive years, up to four years. The county must meet
the definition of a rural county at the time the position is filled.
If the county does not have a rural county status the following year or
years, the position is still eligible for the remaining years if all
other conditions are met.
(b) Participants who claimed credit under RCW 82.04.4456 for
qualified employment positions created before December 31, 2003, are
eligible to earn credit for each year the position is maintained over
the subsequent consecutive years, for up to four years, which four
years include any years claimed under RCW 82.04.4456. Those persons
who did not receive a credit under RCW 82.04.4456 before December 31,
2003, are not eligible to earn credit for qualified employment
positions created before December 31, 2003.
(c) Credit is authorized for new employees hired for new qualified
employment positions created on or after January 1, 2004. New
qualified employment positions filled by existing employees are
eligible for the credit under this section only if the position vacated
by the existing employee is filled by a new hire. A business that is
a sole proprietorship without any employees is equivalent to one
employee position and this type of business is eligible to receive
credit for one position.
(d) If a position is filled before July 1st, the position is
eligible for the full yearly credit for that calendar year. If it is
filled after June 30th, the position is eligible for half of the credit
for that calendar year.
(5) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. This information includes information relating to
description of qualifying activity conducted in the rural county and
outside the rural county by the person as well as detailed records on
positions and employees.
(6) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been claimed is immediately due. The department
must assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes for which the
person is not eligible. The interest must be assessed at the rate
provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, applies
retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken, and accrues until
the taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.
(7) The credit under this section may be used against any tax due
under this chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one
calendar year be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in
a subsequent calendar year. A person is not eligible to receive a
credit under this section if the person is receiving credit for the
same position under chapter 82.62 RCW or RCW 82.04.44525 or is taking
a credit under this chapter for information technology help desk
services conducted from a rural county. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.
(8) Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility.
However, the successive credits are available to the successor for
remaining periods in the five years only if the eligibility conditions
of this section are met.
(9) A person claiming a tax credit under this section must file a
complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(10) As used in this section:
(a) "Computer software" has the meaning as defined in RCW 82.04.215
after June 30, 2004, and includes "software" as defined in RCW
82.04.215 before July 1, 2004.
(b) "Manufacturing" means the same as "to manufacture" under RCW
82.04.120. Manufacturing includes the activities of both manufacturers
and processors for hire.
(c) "Programming" means the activities that involve the creation or
modification of computer software, as that term is defined in this
chapter, and that are taxable as a service under RCW 82.04.290(((2)))
or as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050.
(d) "Qualifying activity" means manufacturing of computer software
or programming.
(e) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
position doing programming of computer software or manufacturing of
computer software. This excludes administrative, professional,
service, executive, and other similar positions. If an employee is
either voluntarily or involuntarily separated from employment, the
employment position is considered filled on a full-time basis if the
employer is either training or actively recruiting a replacement
employee. Full-time means a position for at least thirty-five hours a
week.
(f) "Rural county" means the same as in RCW 82.14.370.
(11) No credit may be taken or accrued under this section on or
after January 1, 2011.

Sec. 453 RCW 82.04.460 and 2011 c 174 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person
earning apportionable income taxable under this chapter and also
taxable in another state must, for the purpose of computing tax
liability under this chapter, apportion to this state, in accordance
with RCW 82.04.462, that portion of the person's apportionable income
derived from business activities performed within this state.
(2) The department must by rule provide a method of apportioning
the apportionable income of financial institutions, where such
apportionable income is taxable under RCW 82.04.290. The rule adopted
by the department must, to the extent feasible, be consistent with the
multistate tax commission's recommended formula for the apportionment
and allocation of net income of financial institutions as existing on
June 1, 2010, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section,
except that:
(a) The department's rule must provide for a single factor
apportionment method based on the receipts factor; and
(b) The definition of "financial institution" contained in appendix
A to the multistate tax commission's recommended formula for the
apportionment and allocation of net income of financial institutions is
advisory only.
(3) The department may by rule provide a method or methods of
apportioning or allocating gross income derived from sales of
telecommunications service and competitive telephone service taxed
under this chapter, if the gross proceeds of sales subject to tax under
this chapter do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's
income attributable to this state. The rule must provide for an
equitable and constitutionally permissible division of the tax base.
(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Apportionable income" means gross income of the business
generated from engaging in apportionable activities, including income
received from apportionable activities performed outside this state if
the income would be taxable under this chapter if received from
activities in this state, less the exemptions and deductions allowable
under this chapter. For purposes of this subsection, "apportionable
activities" means only those activities taxed under:
(i) ((RCW 82.04.255;
(ii) RCW 82.04.260 (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), and (12);
(iii) RCW 82.04.280 (1)(e);
(iv))) RCW 82.04.285;
(((v))) (ii) RCW 82.04.286;
(((vi))) (iii) RCW 82.04.290;
(((vii) RCW 82.04.2907;
(viii) RCW 82.04.2908;
(ix))) (iv) RCW 82.04.263, but only to the extent of any activity
that would be taxable under ((any of the provisions enumerated under
(a)(i) through (viii) of this subsection (4))) RCW 82.04.290 if the tax
classification in RCW 82.04.263 did not exist; and
(((x))) (v) RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (3) and 82.04.280(1)(a), but only
with respect to advertising.
(b)(i) "Taxable in another state" means that the taxpayer is
subject to a business activities tax by another state on its income
received from engaging in apportionable activities; or the taxpayer is
not subject to a business activities tax by another state on its income
received from engaging in apportionable activities, but any other state
has jurisdiction to subject the taxpayer to a business activities tax
on such income under the substantial nexus standards in RCW
82.04.067(1).
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (4)(b), "business activities
tax" and "state" have the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.462.

Sec. 454 RCW 82.04.540 and 2006 c 301 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provision of professional employer services by a
professional employer organization is taxable under RCW
82.04.290(((2))).
(2) A professional employer organization is allowed a deduction
from the gross income of the business derived from performing
professional employer services that is equal to the portion of the fee
charged to a client that represents the actual cost of wages and
salaries, benefits, workers' compensation, payroll taxes, withholding,
or other assessments paid to or on behalf of a covered employee by the
professional employer organization under a professional employer
agreement.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Client" means any person who enters into a professional
employer agreement with a professional employer organization. For
purposes of this subsection (3)(a), "person" has the same meaning as
"buyer" in RCW 82.08.010.
(b) "Coemployer" means either a professional employer organization
or a client.
(c) "Coemployment relationship" means a relationship which is
intended to be an ongoing relationship rather than a temporary or
project-specific one, wherein the rights, duties, and obligations of an
employer which arise out of an employment relationship have been
allocated between coemployers pursuant to a professional employer
agreement and applicable state law. In such a coemployment
relationship:
(i) The professional employer organization is entitled to enforce
only such employer rights and is subject to only those obligations
specifically allocated to the professional employer organization by the
professional employer agreement or applicable state law;
(ii) The client is entitled to enforce those rights and obligated
to provide and perform those employer obligations allocated to such
client by the professional employer agreement and applicable state law;
and
(iii) The client is entitled to enforce any right and obligated to
perform any obligation of an employer not specifically allocated to the
professional employer organization by the professional employer
agreement or applicable state law.
(d) "Covered employee" means an individual having a coemployment
relationship with a professional employer organization and a client who
meets all of the following criteria: (i) The individual has received
written notice of coemployment with the professional employer
organization, and (ii) the individual's coemployment relationship is
pursuant to a professional employer agreement. Individuals who are
officers, directors, shareholders, partners, and managers of the client
are covered employees to the extent the professional employer
organization and the client have expressly agreed in the professional
employer agreement that such individuals would be covered employees and
provided such individuals meet the criteria of this subsection and act
as operational managers or perform day-to-day operational services for
the client.
(e) "Professional employer agreement" means a written contract by
and between a client and a professional employer organization that
provides:
(i) For the coemployment of covered employees; and
(ii) For the allocation of employer rights and obligations between
the client and the professional employer organization with respect to
the covered employees.
(f) "Professional employer organization" means any person engaged
in the business of providing professional employer services. The
following ((shall)) are not ((be)) deemed to be professional employer
organizations or the providing of professional employer services for
purposes of this section:
(i) Arrangements wherein a person, whose principal business
activity is not entering into professional employer arrangements and
which does not hold itself out as a professional employer organization,
shares employees with a commonly owned company within the meaning of
section 414(b) and (c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended;
(ii) Independent contractor arrangements by which a person assumes
responsibility for the product produced or service performed by such
person or his or her agents and retains and exercises primary direction
and control over the work performed by the individuals whose services
are supplied under such arrangements; or
(iii) Providing staffing services.
(g) "Professional employer services" means the service of entering
into a coemployment relationship with a client in which all or a
majority of the employees providing services to a client or to a
division or work unit of a client are covered employees.
(h) "Staffing services" means services consisting of a person:
(i) Recruiting and hiring its own employees;
(ii) Finding other organizations that need the services of those
employees;
(iii) Assigning those employees on a temporary basis to perform
work at or services for the other organizations to support or
supplement the other organizations' workforces, or to provide
assistance in special work situations such as, but not limited to,
employee absences, skill shortages, seasonal workloads, or to perform
special assignments or projects, all under the direction and
supervision of the customer; and
(iv) Customarily attempting to reassign the employees to other
organizations when they finish each assignment.

Sec. 455 RCW 82.04.620 and 2007 c 447 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
imposed by RCW 82.04.290(((2))) amounts received by physicians or
clinics for drugs for infusion or injection by licensed physicians or
their agents for human use pursuant to a prescription, but only if the
amounts: (1) Are separately stated on invoices or other billing
statements; (2) do not exceed the then current federal rate; and (3)
are covered or required under a health care service program subsidized
by the federal or state government. The federal rate means the rate at
or below which the federal government or its agents reimburse providers
for prescription drugs administered to patients as provided for in the
medicare, part B, drugs average sales price information resource as
published by the United States department of health and human services,
or any successor index thereto.

Sec. 456 RCW 82.08.806 and 2011 c 174 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales, to a
printer or publisher, of computer equipment, including repair parts and
replacement parts for such equipment, when the computer equipment is
used primarily in the printing or publishing of any printed material,
or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
computer equipment. This exemption applies only to computer equipment
not otherwise exempt under RCW 82.08.02565.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. This exemption is available only when the purchaser provides
the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection (3) apply throughout this
section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Computer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.
(b) "Computer equipment" means a computer and the associated
physical components that constitute a computer system, including
monitors, keyboards, printers, modems, scanners, pointing devices, and
other computer peripheral equipment, cables, servers, and routers.
"Computer equipment" also includes digital cameras and computer
software.
(c) "Computer software" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.
(d) "Primarily" means greater than fifty percent as measured by
time.
(e) "Printer or publisher" means a person, as defined in RCW
82.04.030, who is subject to tax under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (3) or
82.04.280(1)(a).
(4) "Computer equipment" does not include computer equipment that
is used primarily for administrative purposes including but not limited
to payroll processing, accounting, customer service, telemarketing, and
collection. If computer equipment is used simultaneously for
administrative and nonadministrative purposes, the administrative use
must be disregarded during the period of simultaneous use for purposes
of determining whether the computer equipment is used primarily for
administrative purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 457 A new section is added to chapter 82.16
RCW to read as follows:
Persons engaged in the business of stevedoring and associated
activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in
waterborne interstate or foreign commerce, as that term is defined in
section 422 of this act, are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by
this chapter for that portion of their business subject to taxation
under RCW 82.04.290(1).

Sec. 458 RCW 82.16.100 and 2001 c 320 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The business of collection, receipt, transfer, including
transportation between any locations, storage, or disposal of solid
waste is not subject to this chapter. Any such business activities are
subject to taxation under the classification in RCW 82.04.290(((2))).
"Solid waste" for purposes of this section is defined in RCW 82.18.010.

Sec. 459 RCW 82.32.045 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1103 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, payments of the
taxes imposed under chapters 82.04, 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, and 82.16 RCW,
along with reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department,
are due monthly within twenty-five days after the end of the month in
which the taxable activities occur.
(2) The department of revenue may relieve any taxpayer or class of
taxpayers from the obligation of remitting monthly and may require the
return to cover other longer reporting periods, but in no event may
returns be filed for a period greater than one year. For these
taxpayers, tax payments are due on or before the last day of the month
next succeeding the end of the period covered by the return.
(3) The department of revenue may also require verified annual
returns from any taxpayer, setting forth such additional information as
it may deem necessary to correctly determine tax liability.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
department may relieve any person of the requirement to file returns if
the following conditions are met:
(a) The person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or
gross income of the business, from all business activities taxable
under chapter 82.04 RCW, is less than:
(i) Twenty-eight thousand dollars per year; or
(ii) Forty-six thousand six hundred sixty-seven dollars per year
for persons generating at least fifty percent of their taxable amount
from activities taxable under RCW ((82.04.255,)) 82.04.290(((2)(a),))
and 82.04.285;
(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities
taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than twenty-four thousand
dollars per year; and
(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department
of revenue any other tax or fee which the department is authorized to
collect.

Sec. 460 RCW 82.32.533 and 2010 c 111 s 801 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no person
may be held liable for the failure to collect or pay state and local
sales and use taxes accrued before July 26, 2009, on the sale or use of
digital goods or of services defined as a retail sale in RCW
82.04.050(2)(a) and rendered in respect to digital goods.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not relieve any person from
liability for state and local sales taxes that the person collected
from buyers but did not remit to the department of revenue.
(3) Nothing in this section may be construed as authorizing the
refund of state and local sales and use taxes properly paid on the sale
or use, before July 26, 2009, of digital goods or of services defined
as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a) and rendered in respect to
digital goods.
(4) A person is not entitled to a credit or refund of any business
and occupation tax paid in excess of that properly due as a result of
the person paying tax on its income earned from the sale of eligible
digital products and services at the tax rate provided in RCW
82.04.290(((2)(a))) rather than the tax rate provided in RCW
82.04.250(((1))), unless the person requesting the credit or refund has
paid the proper amount of state and local sales taxes due on the sales
of the eligible digital products and services that generated the income
in respect to which the business and occupation tax credit or refund is
sought. For purposes of this subsection, "eligible digital products
and services" means: (a) Digital goods; and (b) services defined as a
retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a) and rendered in respect to digital
goods.
(5) For purposes of this section, "digital goods" has the same
meaning as in RCW 82.04.192.

Sec. 461 RCW 82.32.790 and 2010 c 114 s 201 and 2010 c 106 s 401
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Section ((206, chapter 106, Laws of 2010, sections 104,))
417, chapter . . ., Laws of 2012 (section 417 of this act), sections
110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws of 2010,
((section 3, chapter 461, Laws of 2009, section 7, chapter 300, Laws of
2006, and section 4)) and sections 1, 2, 5 through 10, and 12, chapter
149, Laws of 2003 are contingent upon the siting and commercial
operation of a significant semiconductor microchip fabrication facility
in the state of Washington.
(b) For the purposes of this section:
(i) "Commercial operation" means the same as "commencement of
commercial production" as used in RCW 82.08.965.
(ii) "Semiconductor microchip fabrication" means "manufacturing
semiconductor microchips" as defined in RCW 82.04.426.
(iii) "Significant" means the combined investment of new buildings
and new machinery and equipment in the buildings, at the commencement
of commercial production, will be at least one billion dollars.
(2) Section 417, chapter . . ., Laws of 2012 (section 417 of this
act), sections 110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws
of 2010, and sections 1, 2, 5 through 10, and 12, chapter 149, Laws of
2003 take((s)) effect the first day of the month in which a contract
for the construction of a significant semiconductor fabrication
facility is signed, as determined by the director of the department of
revenue.
(3)(a) The department of revenue must provide notice of the
effective date of ((sections 104,)) section 417, chapter . . ., Laws
of 2012 (section 417 of this act), sections 110, 117, 123, 125, 129,
131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws of 2010(([,] section 3, chapter 461,
Laws of 2009, section 7, chapter 300, Laws of 2006, and section 4)),
and sections 1, 2, 5 through 10, and 12, chapter 149, Laws of 2003 to
affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed appropriate
by the department.
(b) If, after making a determination that a contract has been
signed and chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is effective, the department
discovers that commencement of commercial production did not take place
within three years of the date the contract was signed, the department
must make a determination that section 417, chapter . . ., Laws of 2012
(section 417 of this act), sections 110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and
150, chapter 114, Laws of 2010 and sections 1, 2, 5 through 10, and 12,
chapter 149, Laws of 2003 ((is)) are no longer effective, and all taxes
that would have been otherwise due are deemed deferred taxes and are
immediately assessed and payable from any person ((reporting tax under
RCW 82.04.240(2) or)) claiming an exemption, deduction, or credit under
((section 2 or 5 through 10, chapter 149, Laws of 2003)) section 417 of
this act or RCW 82.04.426, 82.04.448, 82.08.965, 82.08.970, 82.12.965,
82.12.970, or 84.36.645. The department is not authorized to make a
second determination regarding the effective date of section 417,
chapter . . ., Laws of 2012 (section 417 of this act), sections 110,
117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter 114, Laws of 2010, and
sections 1, 2, 5 through 10, and 12, chapter 149, Laws of 2003.

Sec. 462 RCW 82.45.195 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 518 are each
amended to read as follows:
A sale of standing timber is exempt from tax under this chapter if
the gross income from such sale is taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((11)))
(2)(d).

PART V
CENTRALIZED ADMINISTRATION OF CITY B&O TAXES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 It is the legislature's intent that the
department of revenue administer local business and occupation taxes in
a manner similar to the administration and collection of local sales
and use taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no city
may impose or continue to impose a business and occupation tax after
December 31, 2014, unless it consents to having the department collect
and administer its tax in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) The department may delay or phase-in the collection and
administration of city business and occupation taxes beyond January 1,
2015, if funding or other resources are insufficient to enable the
department to meet the deadline in subsection (1) of this section or as
necessary to ensure the department is adequately prepared to assume
collection and administration of city business and occupation taxes and
that the transition to department collection and administration of city
business and occupation taxes is as seamless as possible. To that end,
the department, working with affected cities, is authorized to
establish a schedule for assuming the collection and administration of
city business and occupation taxes. Cities scheduled to transition to
having the department collect and administer their business and
occupation taxes on or after January 1, 2015, may continue to collect
and administer their business and occupation taxes until the date the
department will begin collecting and administering the city's business
and occupation tax as determined by the department and communicated to
the city.
(3)(a) The department must charge a fee to a city to collect and
administer its business and occupation tax. The fee may be set in an
amount necessary to reasonably approximate the department's anticipated
costs of collecting and administering city business and occupation
taxes, defray the costs incurred by the department to make changes to
its infrastructure and information technology systems to accommodate
the collection and administration of city business and occupation
taxes, and to generate revenue for infrastructure and information
technology system improvements used for the collection and
administration of city business and occupation taxes. However, the fee
may not exceed one percent of the business and occupation taxes
collected by the department on behalf of a city. The department may
adjust the fee but not more frequently than once per year. Fees
imposed under this subsection must be uniform for all cities imposing
a business and occupation tax collected and administered by the
department. The department's determination of the amount of fee
charged to a city may not be overturned by a court except upon a
showing by clear and convincing evidence that the department acted
arbitrarily.
(b) The local business and occupation tax collection and
administration account is created in the state treasury. All fees
collected under the authority of this subsection must be deposited into
the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only to
collect and administer city business and occupation taxes.
(4) The department may collect and administer a city's business and
occupation tax without entering into a contract with the city.
However, if the department and a city choose to enter into a contract
for the collection and administration of the city's business and
occupation tax, the contract must include provisions to resolve
disputes using a nonjudicial process before resorting to litigation.
A contract also must include a procedure for notifying the other party
that a violation of the contract is believed to have occurred, a
nonjudicial procedure for establishing whether a violation has in fact
occurred, an opportunity to correct such violation, and, should the
violation fail to be resolved through this process, a provision that
litigation to resolve the dispute must be brought in the superior court
for Thurston county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
The department may take any lawful action it deems advisable to
effectively and efficiently carry out its duties under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Business and occupation taxes collected by the department on
behalf of a city, less the amount of the department's collection and
administration fee, must be deposited into the city business and
occupation tax account hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in
the local business and occupation tax account may be withdrawn only
for:
(a) Distribution to the cities entitled to the tax proceeds; and
(b) Making refunds of overpaid taxes.
(2) Penalties and interest on city business and occupation taxes
collected by the department belong to the state and must be deposited
into the general fund.
(3) If a return or payment is submitted with less than the full
amount of taxes, interest, and penalties due, the department may
allocate payments among applicable funds so as to minimize
administrative costs to the extent practicable.
(4) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, 82.04,
82.32, and 82.32A RCW, insofar as they are applicable to state business
and occupation taxes and not inconsistent with the provisions of this
chapter, are applicable to city business and occupation taxes collected
and administered by the department.
(5) Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of
investments of balances in the local business and occupation tax
account must be credited to the local business and occupation tax
account and distributed monthly to the cities whose business and
occupation taxes are collected and administered by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Collection and administration of local business and occupation
taxes by the department includes the authority for the department to
conduct audits for any city imposing a business and occupation tax.
However, a city may also conduct its own business and occupation tax
audits subject to the limitations in this section.
(2) Cities conducting their own business and occupation tax audits
may not conduct an audit for any period of time included in an audit of
the city's business and occupation tax conducted by the department.
Also, cities may not, without consent from the department, conduct an
audit of any business if (a) the department has notified the business
of the department's intent to conduct an audit of the business, and the
city's business and occupation tax is within the scope of the audit or
(b) the department's current audit plan includes the business, and the
city's business and occupation tax is within the scope of the planned
audit.
(3) Cities conducting their own business and occupation tax audits
must use any format and template required by the department. To assist
cities in complying with this requirement, the department must provide
any required template and instructions on any required format to cities
conducting their own business and occupation tax audits. Cities
conducting their own business and occupation tax audits must also
forward the results of any such audit to the department in a form and
format acceptable to the department so that the department, and not the
city, may issue any resulting assessment, credit, or refund to the
taxpayer as deemed appropriate by the department. The department may
make an independent determination of whether a city's business and
occupation tax audit justifies the issuance of an assessment, refund,
credit, future reporting instructions, or other appropriate action
including entering into a closing agreement with the taxpayer.
(4) Nothing in this section may be construed as giving cities the
authority to conduct state business and occupation tax audits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
(1) At such time as the department begins collecting and
administering a city's business and occupation tax, the department may
provide official written advice and written tax reporting instructions
to taxpayers concerning the city's business and occupation tax. If the
department determines that input from the city would be helpful, the
department may notify the affected city or cities of the taxpayer's
request and provide a reasonable opportunity for the city or cities to
provide input. When the department notifies a city of a taxpayer's
request for official written guidance or written tax reporting
instructions, the department must advise the city of any internal
deadline for responding to the taxpayer's request. The department may,
but need not, extend any internal deadline for responding to a
taxpayer's request to accommodate a city's opportunity under this
subsection to provide input. Failure to notify a city of a taxpayer's
request for official written advice or written tax reporting
instructions does not invalidate the department's official written
advice or written tax reporting instructions.
(2) At such time as the department begins collecting and
administering a city's business and occupation tax, RCW 82.32.160,
82.32.170, and chapter 82.03 RCW provide the sole administrative review
of the amount of city business and occupation taxes, penalties, or
interest paid by the taxpayer or assessed by the department. In
appeals before the department involving a city's business and
occupation tax, the department will provide a meaningful opportunity
for the city to present its views to the department when the department
determines that input from the city will assist the department in
resolving the appeal. Input by a city must be in writing, and the city
must provide a copy of its input to the taxpayer. A taxpayer will have
a reasonable opportunity, as determined by the department, to respond
to the city's input. This subsection applies even to disputes over an
assessment issued as a result of a city's own business and occupation
tax audit of a taxpayer.
(3) At such time as the department begins collecting and
administering a city's business and occupation tax, the provisions of
RCW 82.03.180, 82.32.150, and 82.32.180 govern judicial proceedings
seeking refunds of that city's business and occupation tax, penalties,
or interest; to restrain or enjoin the collection of that city's
business and occupation tax, penalties, or interest; or review of a
decision of the board of tax appeals concerning the city's business and
occupation tax, penalties, or interest. This subsection applies even
to disputes over an assessment issued as a result of a city's own
business and occupation tax audit of a taxpayer.

Sec. 507 RCW 35.102.070 and 2003 c 79 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) A city that imposes a business and occupation tax ((shall))
must allow reporting and payment of tax on a monthly, quarterly, or
annual basis. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the frequency for any particular person may be assigned at the
discretion of the city((, except that monthly reporting may be assigned
only if it can be demonstrated that the taxpayer is remitting excise
tax to the state on a monthly basis. For persons assigned a monthly
frequency, payment is due within the same time period provided for
monthly taxpayers under RCW 82.32.045. For persons assigned a
quarterly or annual frequency,)).
(b) Payment is due within the same time period as provided ((for
quarterly or annual frequency)) under RCW 82.32.045.
(2)(a) Monthly reporting may be assigned only if it can be
demonstrated that the taxpayer is remitting excise tax to the state on
a monthly basis.
(b) A person's frequency for reporting city business and occupation
taxes must coincide with the person's frequency for reporting state
business and occupation taxes at such time as the department collects
and administers the city's business and occupation tax.

Sec. 508 RCW 35.102.080 and 2003 c 79 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((A city that imposes a business and occupation tax shall
compute)) Interest charged a taxpayer on an underpaid ((tax or
penalty)) city business and occupation tax liability must be computed
in accordance with RCW 82.32.050.
(2) ((A city that imposes a business and occupation tax shall
compute)) Interest paid on refunds or credits of amounts paid or other
recovery allowed a taxpayer with respect to a city's business and
occupation taxes, penalties, and interest must be computed in
accordance with RCW 82.32.060.

Sec. 509 RCW 35.102.090 and 2003 c 79 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
((A city that imposes a business and occupation tax shall provide
for the imposition of)) Penalties on municipal business and occupation
taxes must be imposed in accordance with chapter 82.32 RCW.

Sec. 510 RCW 35.102.145 and 2010 c 106 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
A city that imposes a business and occupation tax may by ordinance
provide that return or tax information is confidential, privileged, and
subject to disclosure in the manner provided by RCW 82.32.330. When
the department is responsible for collecting and administering a city's
business and occupation tax, RCW 82.32.330 applies to that city's
business and occupation tax information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
When the department begins to collect and administer a city's
business and occupation tax, the city has the right to periodically
examine the records of the department as they concern the city's
business and occupation tax or the taxpayers of the city subject to the
city's business and occupation tax. The department may establish
reasonable parameters around a city's right under this section to
examine the department's records as the department deems necessary to
avoid an undue burden on the department. Chapter 42.56 RCW does not
apply to requests by a city for records of the department described in
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For city business and occupation taxes collected and
administered by the department, the department will, upon ten days'
notice to the affected cities, redistribute taxes distributed in error
from the city that received the original distribution to the city
entitled to the tax. However, no such redistribution may be made as to
amounts originally distributed more than six monthly distribution
periods before the monthly distribution period in which the department
obtains knowledge of the improper distribution. For purposes of this
subsection, "obtains knowledge of the improper distribution" includes
information from a city or other person calling into question in any
way the amount of a distribution of city business and occupation taxes.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not affect in any way a
person's liability for unpaid or underpaid city business and occupation
tax liability or of a person's right to a refund or credit of overpaid
city business and occupation taxes, if such unpaid, underpaid, or
overpaid liability is discovered within the limits prescribed in RCW
35.102.100, 35.102.110, and chapter 82.32 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
Cities imposing a business and occupation tax that is collected and
administered by the department in accordance with this chapter must
defend and hold the department and state harmless from claims that
challenge the authority of the city to impose its business and
occupation tax. In the event there is a legal challenge to the
validity of the ordinances imposing a city's business and occupation
tax relating to the authority of the city to impose the tax, the
department is not obligated to represent the city or otherwise to
defend the city's position in any proceeding relating to such
challenge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
A business and occupation tax change enacted by a city whose
business and occupation taxes are collected and administered by the
department takes effect (1) no sooner than seventy-five days after the
department receives notice of the change and (2) only on the first day
of January, April, July, or October.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
The department may refuse to administer and enforce any provision
of the city's business and occupation tax that is inconsistent with
this chapter. Within five working days following the department's
refusal to administer a provision of a city's business and occupation
tax ordinance, the department must provide notice to the city of the
department's refusal and the reasons therefore.

Sec. 516 RCW 82.32.080 and 2011 c 24 s 1 and 2010 2nd sp.s. c 2
s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When authorized by the department, payment of the tax may be
made by uncertified check under such rules as the department
prescribes, but, if a check so received is not paid by the bank on
which it is drawn, the taxpayer, by whom such check is tendered, will
remain liable for payment of the tax and for all legal penalties, the
same as if such check had not been tendered.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, payment of
the tax must be made by electronic funds transfer, as defined in RCW
82.32.085. As an alternative to electronic funds transfer, the
department may authorize other forms of electronic payment, such as
payment by credit card. All state and local taxes administered by this
chapter are subject to this requirement, except that the department may
exclude any taxes not reported on the combined excise tax return or any
successor return from the electronic payment requirement in this
subsection.
(b) The department may waive the electronic payment requirement in
this subsection for any taxpayer or class of taxpayers, for good cause
or for whom the department has assigned a reporting frequency that is
less than quarterly. In the discretion of the department, a waiver
under this subsection may be made temporary or permanent, and may be
made on the department's own motion.
(c) The department is authorized to accept payment of taxes by
electronic funds transfer or other acceptable forms of electronic
payment from taxpayers that are not subject to the mandatory electronic
payment requirements in this subsection.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, returns
must be filed electronically using the department's online tax filing
service or other method of electronic reporting as the department may
authorize.
(b) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
this subsection for any taxpayer or class of taxpayers, for good cause
or for whom the department has assigned a reporting frequency that is
less than quarterly. In the discretion of the department, a waiver
under this subsection may be made temporary or permanent, and may be
made on the department's own motion.
(c) The department is authorized to allow electronic filing of
returns from taxpayers that are not subject to the mandatory electronic
filing requirements in this subsection.
(4)(a)(i) The department, for good cause shown, may extend the time
for making and filing any return, and may grant such reasonable
additional time within which to make and file returns as it may deem
proper, but any permanent extension granting the taxpayer a reporting
date without penalty more than ten days beyond the due date, and any
extension in excess of thirty days must be conditional on deposit with
the department of an amount to be determined by the department which is
approximately equal to the estimated tax liability for the reporting
period or periods for which the extension is granted. In the case of
a permanent extension or a temporary extension of more than thirty days
the deposit must be deposited within the state treasury with other tax
funds and a credit recorded to the taxpayer's account which may be
applied to taxpayer's liability upon cancellation of the permanent
extension or upon reporting of the tax liability where an extension of
more than thirty days has been granted.
(ii) The department must review the requirement for deposit at
least annually and may require a change in the amount of the deposit
required when it believes that such amount does not approximate the tax
liability for the reporting period or periods for which the extension
is granted.
(b) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer
affected by the emergency, may extend the time for making or filing any
return as the department deems proper. The department may not require
any deposit as a condition for granting an extension under this
subsection (4)(b).
(5) The department must keep full and accurate records of all funds
received and disbursed by it. Subject to the provisions of RCW
82.32.105, 82.32.052, and 82.32.350, the department must apply the
payment of the taxpayer first against penalties and interest, and then
upon the tax, without regard to any direction of the taxpayer.
(6) The department may refuse to accept any return that is not
accompanied by a remittance of the tax shown to be due thereon or that
is not filed electronically as required in this section. When such
return is not accepted, the taxpayer is deemed to have failed or
refused to file a return and is subject to the procedures provided in
RCW 82.32.100 and to the penalties provided in RCW 82.32.090. The
above authority to refuse to accept a return may not apply when a
return is timely filed electronically and a timely payment has been
made by electronic funds transfer or other form of electronic payment
as authorized by the department.
(7) Except for returns and remittances required to be transmitted
to the department electronically under this section and except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, a return or remittance that is
transmitted to the department by United States mail is deemed filed or
received on the date shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped
upon the envelope containing it. A return or remittance that is
transmitted to the department electronically is deemed filed or
received according to procedures set forth by the department.
(8)(a) For purposes of subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
"good cause" means the inability of a taxpayer to comply with the
requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section because:
(i) The taxpayer does not have the equipment or software necessary
to enable the taxpayer to comply with subsection (2) or (3) of this
section;
(ii) The equipment or software necessary to enable the taxpayer to
comply with subsection (2) or (3) of this section is not functioning
properly;
(iii) The taxpayer does not have access to the internet using the
taxpayer's own equipment;
(iv) The taxpayer does not have a bank account or a credit card;
(v) The taxpayer's bank is unable to send or receive electronic
funds transfer transactions; or
(vi) Some other circumstance or condition exists that, in the
department's judgment, prevents the taxpayer from complying with the
requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(b) "Good cause" also includes any circumstance that, in the
department's judgment, supports the efficient or effective
administration of the tax laws of this state, including providing
relief from the requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section
to any taxpayer that is voluntarily collecting and remitting this
state's sales or use taxes on sales to Washington customers but has no
legal requirement to be registered with the department.

Sec. 517 RCW 34.05.328 and 2011 c 298 s 21 and 2011 c 149 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Before adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this
section, an agency must:
(a) Clearly state in detail the general goals and specific
objectives of the statute that the rule implements;
(b) Determine that the rule is needed to achieve the general goals
and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection, and
analyze alternatives to rule making and the consequences of not
adopting the rule;
(c) Provide notification in the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320 that a preliminary cost-benefit analysis is
available. The preliminary cost-benefit analysis must fulfill the
requirements of the cost-benefit analysis under (d) of this subsection.
If the agency files a supplemental notice under RCW 34.05.340, the
supplemental notice must include notification that a revised
preliminary cost-benefit analysis is available. A final cost-benefit
analysis must be available when the rule is adopted under RCW
34.05.360;
(d) Determine that the probable benefits of the rule are greater
than its probable costs, taking into account both the qualitative and
quantitative benefits and costs and the specific directives of the
statute being implemented;
(e) Determine, after considering alternative versions of the rule
and the analysis required under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection,
that the rule being adopted is the least burdensome alternative for
those required to comply with it that will achieve the general goals
and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection;
(f) Determine that the rule does not require those to whom it
applies to take an action that violates requirements of another federal
or state law;
(g) Determine that the rule does not impose more stringent
performance requirements on private entities than on public entities
unless required to do so by federal or state law;
(h) Determine if the rule differs from any federal regulation or
statute applicable to the same activity or subject matter and, if so,
determine that the difference is justified by the following:
(i) A state statute that explicitly allows the agency to differ
from federal standards; or
(ii) Substantial evidence that the difference is necessary to
achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of
this subsection; and
(i) Coordinate the rule, to the maximum extent practicable, with
other federal, state, and local laws applicable to the same activity or
subject matter.
(2) In making its determinations pursuant to subsection (1)(b)
through (h) of this section, the agency must place in the rule-making
file documentation of sufficient quantity and quality so as to persuade
a reasonable person that the determinations are justified.
(3) Before adopting rules described in subsection (5) of this
section, an agency must place in the rule-making file a rule
implementation plan for rules filed under each adopting order. The
plan must describe how the agency intends to:
(a) Implement and enforce the rule, including a description of the
resources the agency intends to use;
(b) Inform and educate affected persons about the rule;
(c) Promote and assist voluntary compliance; and
(d) Evaluate whether the rule achieves the purpose for which it was
adopted, including, to the maximum extent practicable, the use of
interim milestones to assess progress and the use of objectively
measurable outcomes.
(4) After adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this
section regulating the same activity or subject matter as another
provision of federal or state law, an agency must do all of the
following:
(a) Coordinate implementation and enforcement of the rule with the
other federal and state entities regulating the same activity or
subject matter by making every effort to do one or more of the
following:
(i) Deferring to the other entity;
(ii) Designating a lead agency; or
(iii) Entering into an agreement with the other entities specifying
how the agency and entities will coordinate implementation and
enforcement.
If the agency is unable to comply with this subsection (4)(a), the
agency must report to the legislature pursuant to (b) of this
subsection;
(b) Report to the joint administrative rules review committee:
(i) The existence of any overlap or duplication of other federal or
state laws, any differences from federal law, and any known overlap,
duplication, or conflict with local laws; and
(ii) Make recommendations for any legislation that may be necessary
to eliminate or mitigate any adverse effects of such overlap,
duplication, or difference.
(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, this section
applies to:
(i) Significant legislative rules of the departments of ecology,
labor and industries, health, revenue, social and health services, and
natural resources, the employment security department, the forest
practices board, the office of the insurance commissioner, and to the
legislative rules of the department of fish and wildlife implementing
chapter 77.55 RCW; and
(ii) Any rule of any agency, if this section is voluntarily made
applicable to the rule by the agency, or is made applicable to the rule
by a majority vote of the joint administrative rules review committee
within forty-five days of receiving the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(i) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;
(ii) Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that
are not subject to violation by a nongovernment party;
(iii) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material
change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes,
rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs
other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide
significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national
consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;
(iv) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or
name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its
effect;
(v) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically
dictated by statute;
(vi) Rules that set or adjust fees under the authority of RCW
19.02.075 or that set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative
standards, including fees set or adjusted under the authority of RCW
19.80.045;
(vii) Rules of the department of social and health services
relating only to client medical or financial eligibility and rules
concerning liability for care of dependents; ((or))
(viii) Rules of the department of revenue that adopt a uniform
expiration date for reseller permits as authorized in RCW 82.32.780 and
82.32.783;
(ix) The schedule developed by the department of revenue under
section 502 of this act for assuming the collection and administration
of city business and occupation taxes;
(x) The schedule developed by the department of revenue under
section 202 of this act for assuming the issuance and renewal of city
business licenses through the business licensing system; and
(xi) Amendments made by the department of revenue to the model
ordinance for city business and occupation taxes.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) A "procedural rule" is a rule that adopts, amends, or repeals
(A) any procedure, practice, or requirement relating to any agency
hearings; (B) any filing or related process requirement for making
application to an agency for a license or permit; or (C) any policy
statement pertaining to the consistent internal operations of an
agency.
(ii) An "interpretive rule" is a rule, the violation of which does
not subject a person to a penalty or sanction, that sets forth the
agency's interpretation of statutory provisions it administers.
(iii) A "significant legislative rule" is a rule other than a
procedural or interpretive rule that (A) adopts substantive provisions
of law pursuant to delegated legislative authority, the violation of
which subjects a violator of such rule to a penalty or sanction; (B)
establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification or standard for the
issuance, suspension, or revocation of a license or permit; or (C)
adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a policy or
regulatory program.
(d) In the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320, an
agency must state whether this section applies to the proposed rule
pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection, or if the agency will apply this
section voluntarily.
(6) By January 31, 1996, and by January 31st of each even-numbered
year thereafter, the office of regulatory assistance, after consulting
with state agencies, counties, and cities, and business, labor, and
environmental organizations, must report to the governor and the
legislature regarding the effects of this section on the regulatory
system in this state. The report must document:
(a) The rules proposed to which this section applied and to the
extent possible, how compliance with this section affected the
substance of the rule, if any, that the agency ultimately adopted;
(b) The costs incurred by state agencies in complying with this
section;
(c) Any legal action maintained based upon the alleged failure of
any agency to comply with this section, the costs to the state of such
action, and the result;
(d) The extent to which this section has adversely affected the
capacity of agencies to fulfill their legislatively prescribed mission;
(e) The extent to which this section has improved the acceptability
of state rules to those regulated; and
(f) Any other information considered by the office of financial
management to be useful in evaluating the effect of this section.

Sec. 518 RCW 43.84.092 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 6, 2011 1st
sp.s. c 7 s 22, 2011 c 369 s 6, 2011 c 339 s 1, 2011 c 311 s 9, 2011 c
272 s 3, 2011 c 120 s 3, and 2011 c 83 s 7 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the budget stabilization account,
the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin
taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin
water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction
fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the Interstate 405
express toll lanes operations account, the education construction fund,
the education legacy trust account, the election account, the energy
freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail
assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the freight
mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account,
the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account,
the health system capacity account, the high capacity transportation
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher
education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the
highway infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high
occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital safety net
assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the
judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold
excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local
sales and use tax account, the city business and occupation tax
account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multiagency
permitting team account, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and
use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account,
the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public
facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004,
the public health supplemental account, the public transportation
systems account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account,
the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program
account, the rural Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the
skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement
and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special
wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state
employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route number 520
civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account,
the state wildlife account, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account),
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain
injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement
system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state economic development
commission account, the Washington state health insurance pool account,
the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 519 (1) Nothing in sections 501 through 518 of
this act authorizes the department of revenue to collect and administer
city business and occupation taxes that were originally due before the
effective date that the department of revenue begins collecting and
administering the city's business and occupation tax. Even after the
department has assumed responsibility for collecting and administering
a city's business and occupation tax, the city retains the authority to
collect and administer its business and occupation taxes with respect
to taxes originally due before the effective date that the department
began collecting and administering the city's business and occupation
tax. This retained authority of the city includes auditing taxpayers,
engaging in collection activities, processing tax payments, and
participating in administrative, quasi-judicial, and judicial
proceedings involving liability for a city's business and occupation
tax.
(2) Nothing in sections 501 through 518 of this act affects
administrative, quasi-judicial, and judicial proceedings that are
ongoing as of the effective date that the department of revenue assumes
responsibility for collecting and administering the city's business and
occupation tax. The same administrative, quasi-judicial, and judicial
remedies available before January 1, 2015, to cities and taxpayers with
respect to city business and occupation taxes also apply with respect
to taxes that were originally due before the effective date that the
department began collecting and administering a city's business and
occupation tax.
(3) For purposes of this section, "taxes that were originally due
before the effective date that the department of revenue began
collecting and administering a city's business and occupation tax"
includes business and occupation taxes assessed by a city, or reported
by a taxpayer, after the date that the department began collecting and
administering the city's business and occupation tax but that were
required to have been reported and paid before such date.

PART VI
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 Section 112 of this act applies both
prospectively and retroactively to June 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this
section, this act takes effect July 1, 2012.
(2) Section 302 of this act takes effect July 1, 2014.
(3) Sections 345 and 346 of this act take effect August 1, 2012.
(4) Sections 401 through 416 and 418 through 462 of this act take
effect January 1, 2013.
(5) Section 417 of this act takes effect if the contingency in
section 461 of this act occurs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 Section 301 of this act expires July 1,
2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 The provisions of this act are to be
liberally construed to effectuate the intent, policies, and purpose of
this act to reduce the complexity of state and local business and
occupation taxes and to make it easier for businesses to meet their
local licensing and business and occupation tax filing obligations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 This act may be known and cited as the tax
and licensing simplification act.

--- END ---