BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The state board of education must provide a school district
fiscal impact statement prepared by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction with the published notice of a rule-making hearing
required under RCW 34.05.320 on rules proposed by the board. At the
rule-making hearing, the board must also hear a presentation from the
office of the superintendent of public instruction and take public
testimony on the fiscal impact statement. A copy of the fiscal impact
statement must be forwarded to the education committees of the
legislature.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
solicit fiscal impact estimates from a representative sample of school
districts across the state when preparing a fiscal impact statement.
(3) This section does not apply to the following rules:
(a) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;
(b) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material
change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes, or
rules of other Washington state agencies;
(c) Rules that adopt, amend, or repeal a procedure or practice
related only to the operation of the state board of education and not
to any external parties;
(d) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or
name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its
effect; or
(e) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically
dictated by statute.

Sec. 2 RCW 34.05.320 and 2004 c 31 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At least twenty days before the rule-making hearing at which
the agency receives public comment regarding adoption of a rule, the
agency shall cause notice of the hearing to be published in the state
register. The publication constitutes the proposal of a rule. The
notice shall include all of the following:
(a) A title, a description of the rule's purpose, and any other
information which may be of assistance in identifying the rule or its
purpose;
(b) Citations of the statutory authority for adopting the rule and
the specific statute the rule is intended to implement;
(c) A short explanation of the rule, its purpose, and anticipated
effects, including in the case of a proposal that would modify existing
rules, a short description of the changes the proposal would make, and
a statement of the reasons supporting the proposed action;
(d) The agency personnel, with their office location and telephone
number, who are responsible for the drafting, implementation, and
enforcement of the rule;
(e) The name of the person or organization, whether private,
public, or governmental, proposing the rule;
(f) Agency comments or recommendations, if any, regarding statutory
language, implementation, enforcement, and fiscal matters pertaining to
the rule;
(g) Whether the rule is necessary as the result of federal law or
federal or state court action, and if so, a citation to such law or
court decision;
(h) When, where, and how persons may present their views on the
proposed rule;
(i) The date on which the agency intends to adopt the rule;
(j) A copy of the small business economic impact statement prepared
under chapter 19.85 RCW, or a copy of the school district fiscal impact
statement under section 1 of this act in the case of the state board of
education, or an explanation for why the agency did not prepare the
statement;
(k) A statement indicating whether RCW 34.05.328 applies to the
rule adoption; and
(l) If RCW 34.05.328 does apply, a statement indicating that a copy
of the preliminary cost-benefit analysis described in RCW
34.05.328(1)(c) is available.
(2)(a) Upon filing notice of the proposed rule with the code
reviser, the adopting agency shall have copies of the notice on file
and available for public inspection. Except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, the agency shall forward three copies of the notice to the
rules review committee.
(b) A pilot of at least ten agencies, including the departments of
labor and industries, fish and wildlife, revenue, ecology, retirement
systems, and health, shall file the copies required under this
subsection, as well as under RCW 34.05.350 and 34.05.353, with the
rules review committee electronically for a period of four years from
June 10, 2004. The office of regulatory assistance shall negotiate the
details of the pilot among the agencies, the legislature, and the code
reviser.
(3) No later than three days after its publication in the state
register, the agency shall cause either a copy of the notice of
proposed rule adoption, or a summary of the information contained on
the notice, to be mailed to each person, city, and county that has made
a request to the agency for a mailed copy of such notices. An agency
may charge for the actual cost of providing a requesting party mailed
copies of these notices.
(4) In addition to the notice required by subsections (1) and (2)
of this section, an institution of higher education shall cause the
notice to be published in the campus or standard newspaper of the
institution at least seven days before the rule-making hearing.

--- END ---