BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that the
state board of education provide meaningful policy direction as defined
in RCW 28A.305.130 and 28A.230.090. The legislature finds that
meaningful policies are best made when a majority of board members have
firsthand knowledge of how educational institutions and staff in the K-12 system operate, including how policy changes affect local district
and state budgets, school programs, and student achievement. It is
also critical that members of the state board of education understand
which policies and goals will contribute the greatest benefit to all
students, as well as policies and goals that create burdens on the
system and barriers to student achievement.
The legislature finds that a similar model has worked well for the
professional educator standards board, which was split from the state
board of education through legislation in 2000. Further, the
legislature finds that such members, working as a team with citizen
members, are more likely to save the state time and money by
identifying unintended consequences of decisions early on, and will be
well-positioned to assist local education staff and communities with
implementation of innovative policy changes.
It is also the intent of the legislature that any policy changes or
rules considered by the state board of education be accompanied by a
thorough fiscal analysis of local school district costs, as well as the
impact to state funds, with the clear understanding that no mandates be
imposed on students, schools, staff, or school districts without ample
funding.
Therefore the legislature intends to reconfigure the membership of
the state board of education to include locally elected school
directors and school district staff, as well as citizens appointed by
the governor to broadly represent the interests of Washington state
students. Furthermore, the legislature intends to clarify that fiscal
impact statements be required and considered by the board and
legislature before board adoption of goals or policy changes.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.305.011 and 2006 c 263 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The membership of the state board of education shall be
composed of sixteen voting members who are residents of the state of
Washington. The membership shall consist of the following:
(a) ((Seven shall be members representing the educational system,
as follows:
(i) Five members elected by school district directors. Three of
the members elected by school district directors shall be residents of
western Washington and two members shall be residents of eastern
Washington;
(ii))) One member elected at-large by the members of the boards of
directors of all private schools in the state meeting the requirements
of RCW 28A.195.010((; and
(iii) The superintendent of public instruction));
(b) ((Seven)) Four members appointed by the Washington state school
directors' association, one of whom must be a resident of western
Washington, one of whom must be a resident of eastern Washington, and
one of whom must represent a school with two thousand or fewer
students;
(c) Two members appointed by the Washington association of school
administrators, one of whom must be a resident of western Washington
and one of whom must be a resident of eastern Washington;
(d) One member appointed by the association of Washington school
principals;
(e) Three members appointed by the Washington education
association, one of whom must be a resident of western Washington, one
of whom must be a resident of eastern Washington, and one of whom must
represent a school with two thousand or fewer students;
(f) One member appointed by the Washington association for career
and technical education;
(g) One member appointed by unions representing classified school
employees;
(h) Three members appointed by the governor; and
(((c))) (i) Two students selected in a manner determined by the
state board of education.
(2) Initial appointments shall be for terms from one to four years
in length, with the terms expiring on the second Monday of January of
the applicable year. As ((the terms of the first appointees expire
or)) vacancies on the board occur, the ((governor shall appoint or
reappoint members of the board)) members shall be appointed or
reappointed to complete the ((initial)) terms or to four-year terms, as
appropriate, in the same manner as the original appointment.
(a) Appointees of the governor must be individuals who have
demonstrated interest in public schools and are supportive of
educational improvement, have a positive record of service, and who
will devote sufficient time to the responsibilities of the board.
(b) In appointing board members, the governor and appointing
authorities shall consider the geographic, gender, and ethnic diversity
of the population of the state.
(c) All appointments to the board made by the governor are subject
to confirmation by the senate.
(d) No person may serve as a member of the board((, except the
superintendent of public instruction,)) for more than two consecutive
full four-year terms.
(3) The governor may remove an appointed member of the board for
neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance, or misfeasance in office, or
for incompetent or unprofessional conduct as defined in chapter 18.130
RCW. In such a case, the governor shall file with the secretary of
state a statement of the causes for and the order of removal from
office, and the secretary of state shall send a certified copy of the
statement of causes and order of removal to the last known post office
address of the member.
(4)(a) The chair of the board shall be elected by a majority vote
of the members of the board. The chair of the board shall serve a term
of two years, and may be reelected to an additional term. A member of
the board may not serve as chair for more than two consecutive terms.
(b) ((Eight)) Nine voting members of the board constitute a quorum
for the transaction of business.
(c) All members except the student members are voting members.
(5) Members of the board appointed by the governor who are not
public employees shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250
and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out
the duties of the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.305.130 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 6 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
The purpose of the state board of education is to provide advocacy
and strategic oversight of public education; implement a standards-based accountability framework that creates a unified system of
increasing levels of support for schools in order to improve student
academic achievement; provide leadership in the creation of a system
that personalizes education for each student and respects diverse
cultures, abilities, and learning styles; and promote achievement of
the goals of RCW 28A.150.210. In addition to any other powers and
duties as provided by law, the state board of education shall:
(1) Hold regularly scheduled meetings at such time and place within
the state as the board shall determine and may hold such special
meetings as may be deemed necessary for the transaction of public
business;
(2) Form committees as necessary to effectively and efficiently
conduct the work of the board;
(3) Seek advice from the public and interested parties regarding
the work of the board;
(4) For purposes of statewide accountability:
(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading,
writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once
assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and
technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical
education programs; and student attendance, as the board deems
appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent
with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and
shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the
federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the
requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998,
each as amended. The goals may be established for all students,
economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient
students, students with disabilities, and students from
disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic
backgrounds. The board may establish school and school district goals
addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for
students in grades seven through twelve. The board shall adopt the
goals by rule. However, before each goal or policy change is
implemented, the board shall:
(i) Complete a fiscal analysis on the impact of the rule or policy
change on the state and school district, including soliciting fiscal
impact data from a representative sample of school districts from
across the state, and share this information with the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate at the time
the goal or policy change is presented; and
(ii) Present the goal or policy change to the education committees
of the house of representatives and the senate for the committees'
review and comment, including a public hearing, in a time frame that
will permit the legislature to take statutory action on the goal or
policy change if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature;
(b) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the
standard on the statewide student assessment and, for high school
students, to obtain a certificate of academic achievement. The board
shall also determine student scores that identify levels of student
performance below and beyond the standard. The board shall consider
the incorporation of the standard error of measurement into the
decision regarding the award of the certificates. The board shall set
such performance standards and levels in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and after consideration of any
recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that
may be established for this purpose. The legislature shall be advised
of the initial performance standards for the high school statewide
student assessment. Any changes recommended by the board in the
performance standards for the high school assessment shall be presented
to the education committees of the house of representatives and the
senate by November 30th of the school year in which the changes will
take place to permit the legislature to take statutory action before
the changes are implemented if such action is deemed warranted by the
legislature. The legislature shall be advised of the initial
performance standards and any changes made to the elementary level
performance standards and the middle school level performance
standards. The board must provide an explanation of and rationale for
all initial performance standards and any changes, for all grade levels
of the statewide student assessment. If the board changes the
performance standards for any grade level or subject, the
superintendent of public instruction must recalculate the results from
the previous ten years of administering that assessment regarding
students below, meeting, and beyond the state standard, to the extent
that this data is available, and post a comparison of the original and
recalculated results on the superintendent's web site;
(c) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure
fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially
with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique
populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of
public instruction of any improvements needed to the system; and
(d) Include in the biennial report required under RCW 28A.305.035,
information on the progress that has been made in achieving goals
adopted by the board;
(5) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and
procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all
private schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to
the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a
program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve.
However, no private school may be approved that operates a kindergarten
program only and no private school shall be placed upon the list of
accredited schools so long as secret societies are knowingly allowed to
exist among its students by school officials;
(6) Articulate with the institutions of higher education, workforce
representatives, and early learning policymakers and providers to
coordinate and unify the work of the public school system;
(7) Hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to
reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
administrative purposes. Any other personnel of the board shall be
appointed as provided by RCW 28A.300.020. The board may delegate to
the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to
efficiently carry on the business of the board including, but not
limited to, the authority to employ necessary personnel and the
authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of
the board. The executive director, administrative assistant, and all
but one of the other personnel of the board are exempt from civil
service, together with other staff as now or hereafter designated as
exempt in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW; and
(8) Adopt a seal that shall be kept in the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 28A.305.021 (Election of board members--Restrictions) and 2005 c 497 s 102 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Appointing authorities must identify
appointees as soon as possible after the effective date of this section
and the state board of education as reconfigured by this act must
convene at the earliest opportunity after the effective date of
sections 1 through 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 5 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---