BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.46.020 and 1999 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) ((Until January 1, 1999, every employer shall pay to each of
his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at
a rate of not less than four dollars and ninety cents per hour.
(2) Beginning January 1, 1999, and until January 1, 2000, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than five dollars and
seventy cents per hour.
(3))) Beginning January 1, 2000, and until January 1, 2001, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than six dollars and
fifty cents per hour.
(((4))) (2)(a) Beginning on January 1, 2001, and each following
January 1st as set forth under (b) of this subsection, every employer
shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the age of
eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than the amount established
under (b) of this subsection.
(b) On September 30, 2000, and on each following September 30th,
the department of labor and industries shall calculate an adjusted
minimum wage rate to maintain employee purchasing power by increasing
the current year's minimum wage rate by the rate of inflation. The
adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated to the nearest cent
using the consumer price index for ((urban wage earners and clerical
workers, CPI-W,)) all urban consumers, CPI-U, or a successor index, for
the twelve months prior to each September 1st as calculated by the
United States department of labor. Each adjusted minimum wage rate
calculated under this subsection (((4))) (2)(b) takes effect on the
following January 1st.
(((5))) (3) The director shall by ((regulation)) rule establish the
minimum wage for employees under the age of eighteen years.

--- END ---