BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.46.020 and 1999 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) ((Until January 1, 1999, every employer shall pay to each of
his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at
a rate of not less than four dollars and ninety cents per hour.
(2) Beginning January 1, 1999, and until January 1, 2000, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than five dollars and
seventy cents per hour.
(3))) Beginning January 1, 2000, and until January 1, 2001, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than six dollars and
fifty cents per hour.
(((4))) (2)(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection,
beginning on January 1, 2001, and each following January 1st as set
forth under (b) of this subsection, every employer shall pay to each of
his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at
a rate of not less than the amount established under (b) of this
subsection.
(b) On September 30, 2000, and on each following September 30th,
the department of labor and industries shall calculate an adjusted
minimum wage rate to maintain employee purchasing power by increasing
the current year's minimum wage rate by the rate of inflation. The
adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated to the nearest cent
using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical
workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve months prior to
each September 1st as calculated by the United States department of
labor. Each adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under this
subsection (((4))) (2)(b) takes effect on the following January 1st.
(((5))) (c) The requirements of (a) and (b) of this subsection are
suspended when the average rate of unemployment in the state,
seasonally adjusted, as determined by the United States secretary of
labor, for the twelve-month period prior to each September 1st equals
or exceeds seven and one-half percent. Under these circumstances,
every employer shall pay each of his or her employees who has reached
the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than the minimum
wage rate from the previous year.
(3) The director shall by ((regulation)) rule establish the minimum
wage for employees under the age of eighteen years.

--- END ---