BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes and supports the
constitutional right of the people to pass laws through the initiative
and referendum process. However in recent years, corporations have
hijacked the initiative process to advance their special interests.
The total dollar amount raised for initiatives between 2001 and 2010
averaged nine million eight hundred thousand dollars per year. In
2010, the total amount of money raised for initiatives was sixty
million dollars, and in 2011 that total was forty-one million dollars.
A single corporation contributed over twenty-two million dollars to
support Initiative Measure No. 1183. Less than one thousand dollars
for that same initiative was received from individuals. Therefore, the
legislature intends to return the initiative process to the people by
setting a contribution limit for ballot measure committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.17A RCW
to read as follows:
No person may make a contribution to a political committee formed
to support or oppose a ballot proposition in excess of one thousand six
hundred dollars in the aggregate in a calendar year. No political
committee formed to support or oppose a ballot proposition may accept
a contribution from any person in excess of one thousand six hundred
dollars in the aggregate in a calendar year.
The dollar limits in this section must be adjusted according to RCW
42.17A.125.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.17A.125 and 2011 c 60 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the beginning of each even-numbered calendar year, the
commission shall increase or decrease the dollar amounts in RCW
42.17A.005(26), 42.17A.405, 42.17A.410, section 2 of this act,
42.17A.445(3), 42.17A.475, and 42.17A.630(1) based on changes in
economic conditions as reflected in the inflationary index recommended
by the office of financial management. The new dollar amounts
established by the commission under this section shall be rounded off
to amounts as judged most convenient for public understanding and so as
to be within ten percent of the target amount equal to the base amount
provided in this chapter multiplied by the increase in the inflationary
index since July 2008.
(2) The commission may revise, at least once every five years but
no more often than every two years, the monetary reporting thresholds
and reporting code values of this chapter. The revisions shall be only
for the purpose of recognizing economic changes as reflected by an
inflationary index recommended by the office of financial management.
The revisions shall be guided by the change in the index for the period
commencing with the month of December preceding the last revision and
concluding with the month of December preceding the month the revision
is adopted. As to each of the three general categories of this
chapter, reports of campaign finance, reports of lobbyist activity, and
reports of the financial affairs of elected and appointed officials,
the revisions shall equally affect all thresholds within each category.
The revisions authorized by this subsection shall reflect economic
changes from the time of the last legislative enactment affecting the
respective code or threshold.
(3) Revisions made in accordance with subsections (1) and (2) of
this section shall be adopted as rules under chapter 34.05 RCW.

--- END ---