BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.28.130 and 2011 c 251 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
RCW 49.28.140 and 49.28.150 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1)(a) "Employee" means a ((licensed practical nurse or a
registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW)) person who:
(i) Is employed by a health care facility ((who));
(ii) Is involved in direct patient care activities or clinical
services ((and));
(iii) Receives an hourly wage or is covered by a collective
bargaining agreement; and
(iv) Is a licensed practical nurse or registered nurse licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW, a surgical technologist registered under
chapter 18.215 RCW, a diagnostic radiologic technologist or
cardiovascular invasive specialist certified under chapter 18.84 RCW,
a respiratory care practitioner licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW, or a
certified nursing assistant as defined in RCW 18.88A.020.
(b) "Employee" does not mean a person who:
(i) Is employed by a health care facility as defined in subsection
(3)(a)(v) of this section; and
(ii) Is a surgical technologist registered under chapter 18.215
RCW, a diagnostic radiologic technologist or cardiovascular invasive
specialist certified under chapter 18.84 RCW, a respiratory care
practitioner licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW, or a certified nursing
assistant as defined in RCW 18.88A.020.
(2) "Employer" means an individual, partnership, association,
corporation, the state, a political subdivision of the state, or person
or group of persons, acting directly or indirectly in the interest of
a health care facility.
(3)(a) "Health care facility" means the following facilities, or
any part of the facility, including such facilities if owned and
operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the state,
that operate on a twenty-four hours per day, seven days per week basis:
(i) Hospices licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW;
(ii) Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW;
(iii) Rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020;
(iv) Psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW; or
(v) Facilities owned and operated by the department of corrections
or by a governing unit as defined in RCW 70.48.020 in a correctional
institution as defined in RCW 9.94.049 that provide health care
services ((to inmates as defined in RCW 72.09.015)).
(b) If a nursing home regulated under chapter 18.51 RCW or a home
health agency regulated under chapter 70.127 RCW is operating under the
license of a health care facility, the nursing home or home health
agency is considered part of the health care facility for the purposes
of this subsection.
(c) "Health care facility" does not mean a critical access hospital
designated under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395i-4.
(4) "Overtime" means the hours worked in excess of an agreed upon,
predetermined, regularly scheduled shift within a twenty-four hour
period not to exceed twelve hours in a twenty-four hour period or
eighty hours in a consecutive fourteen-day period.
(5) "On-call time" means time spent by an employee who is not
working on the premises of the place of employment but who is
compensated for availability or who, as a condition of employment, has
agreed to be available to return to the premises of the place of
employment on short notice if the need arises.
(6) "Reasonable efforts" means that the employer, to the extent
reasonably possible, does all of the following but is unable to obtain
staffing coverage:
(a) Seeks individuals to volunteer to work extra time from all
available qualified staff who are working;
(b) Contacts qualified employees who have made themselves available
to work extra time;
(c) Seeks the use of per diem staff; and
(d) Seeks personnel from a contracted temporary agency when such
staffing is permitted by law or an applicable collective bargaining
agreement, and when the employer regularly uses a contracted temporary
agency.
(7) "Unforeseeable emergent circumstance" means (a) any unforeseen
declared national, state, or municipal emergency; (b) when a health
care facility disaster plan is activated; or (c) any unforeseen
disaster or other catastrophic event which substantially affects or
increases the need for health care services.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.28.140 and 2002 c 112 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No employee of a health care facility may be required to work
overtime. Attempts to compel or force employees to work overtime are
contrary to public policy, and any such requirement contained in a
contract, agreement, or understanding is void.
(2) The acceptance by any employee of overtime is strictly
voluntary, and the refusal of an employee to accept such overtime work
is not grounds for discrimination, dismissal, discharge, or any other
penalty, threat of reports for discipline, or employment decision
adverse to the employee.
(3) This section does not apply to overtime work that occurs:
(a) Because of any unforeseeable emergent circumstance;
(b) Because of prescheduled on-call time necessary for immediate
and unanticipated patient care emergencies. The employer may not use
prescheduled on-call time to fill chronic or foreseeable staff
shortages;
(c) When the employer documents that the employer has used
reasonable efforts to obtain staffing. An employer has not used
reasonable efforts if overtime work is used to fill vacancies resulting
from chronic staff shortages; or
(d) When an employee is required to work overtime to complete a
patient care procedure already in progress where the absence of the
employee could have an adverse effect on the patient. The employer may
not schedule nonemergency procedures that would require overtime.

--- END ---