BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in the 2012-13 academic year, institutions of higher
education that offer an early course registration period for any
segment of the student population must have a process in place to offer
students who are eligible veterans or national guard members early
course registration as follows:
(a) New students who are eligible veterans or national guard
members and who have completed all of their admission processes must be
offered an early course registration period; and
(b) Continuing students who are eligible veterans or national guard
members and who have met current enrollment requirements must be
offered early course registration among students with the same level of
class standing or credit as determined by the attending institution and
according to institutional policies.
(2) For the purposes of this section "eligible veterans or national
guard members" has the definition in RCW 28B.15.621.
(3) This section expires August 1, 2021.

--- END ---