BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.41A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The chief information officer must develop a policy regarding
the state's cell phone use. In developing the policy, the chief
information officer must consider strategies that will save costs
including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) Expanding opportunities for agencies to use prepaid cell
phones;
(b) Requiring agencies to turn in all unused and little-used cell
phones unless required for emergencies or for the safety of employees
or the public;
(c) Providing stipends to employees who use personal cell phones;
and
(d) Contracting with a private optimization specialist that can
help state agencies match actual cell phone use with cost-effective
price plans.
(2) The policy developed under this section must be reviewed and
approved by the technology services board created under RCW 43.41A.070.

--- END ---