BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.05.060 and 2009 c 135 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the report recommends treatment, the court shall examine the
treatment plan. If it approves the plan and the petitioner agrees to
comply with its terms and conditions and agrees to pay the cost
thereof, if able to do so, or arrange for the treatment, an entry shall
be made upon the person's court docket showing that the person has been
accepted for deferred prosecution. A copy of the treatment plan shall
be filed with the court. If the charge be one that an abstract of the
docket showing the charge, the date of the violation for which the
charge was made, and the date of petitioner's acceptance is required to
be sent to the department of licensing, an abstract shall be sent, and
the department of licensing shall make an entry of the charge and of
the petitioner's acceptance for deferred prosecution on the
department's driving record of the petitioner. The entry is not a
conviction for purposes of Title 46 RCW, except as defined under RCW
46.25.010(7). Upon receipt of the abstract of the docket, the
department shall issue the petitioner a probationary license in
accordance with RCW 46.20.355, and the petitioner's driver's license
shall be on probationary status for five years from the date of the
violation that gave rise to the charge. The department shall maintain
the record for ten years from date of entry of the order granting
deferred prosecution.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.0921 and 2003 c 214 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a misdemeanor for any person:
(a) To display or cause or permit to be displayed or have in his or
her possession any fictitious or fraudulently altered driver's license
or identicard;
(b) To lend his or her driver's license or identicard to any other
person or knowingly permit the use thereof by another;
(c) To display or represent as one's own any driver's license or
identicard not issued to him or her;
(d) Willfully to fail or refuse to surrender to the department upon
its lawful demand any driver's license or identicard which has been
suspended, revoked or canceled;
(e) To use a false or fictitious name in obtaining or making any
application for a driver's license or identicard or to knowingly make
a false statement or to knowingly conceal a material fact or otherwise
commit a fraud in attempting to obtain a driver's license or identicard
or any such application;
(f) To permit any unlawful use of a driver's license or identicard
issued to him or her.
(2) It is a class C felony for any person to sell or deliver a
stolen driver's license or identicard.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to manufacture, sell, or deliver
a forged, fictitious, counterfeit, fraudulently altered, or unlawfully
issued driver's license or identicard, or to manufacture, sell, or
deliver a blank driver's license or identicard except under the
direction of the department. A violation of this subsection is:
(a) A class C felony if committed (i) for financial gain or (ii)
with intent to commit forgery, theft, or identity theft; or
(b) A gross misdemeanor if the conduct does not violate (a) of this
subsection.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, it is a
misdemeanor for any person under the age of twenty-one to manufacture
or deliver fewer than four forged, fictitious, counterfeit, or
fraudulently altered driver's licenses or identicards for the sole
purpose of misrepresenting a person's age.
(5) In a proceeding under subsection (2), (3), or (4) of this
section that is related to an identity theft under RCW 9.35.020, the
crime will be considered to have been committed in any locality where
the person whose means of identification or financial information was
appropriated resides, or in which any part of the offense took place,
regardless of whether the defendant was ever actually in that locality.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.117 and 2005 c 314 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Issuance. The department shall issue an identicard, containing
a picture, if the applicant:
(a) Does not hold a valid Washington driver's license;
(b) Proves his or her identity as required by RCW 46.20.035; and
(c) Pays the required fee. The fee is twenty dollars unless an
applicant is a recipient of continuing public assistance grants under
Title 74 RCW, who is referred in writing by the secretary of social and
health services. For those persons the fee must be the actual cost of
production of the identicard.
(2) Design and term. The identicard must:
(a) Be distinctly designed so that it will not be confused with the
official driver's license; and
(b) Expire on the fifth anniversary of the applicant's birthdate
after issuance.
(3) Renewal. An application for identicard renewal may be
submitted by means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her identicard by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired. However, the
department may accept an application for renewal of an identicard
submitted by means of mail or electronic commerce only if specific
authority and funding is provided for this purpose by June 30, 2004, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act.
An identicard may not be renewed by mail or by electronic commerce
unless the renewal issued by the department includes a photograph of
the identicard holder.
(4) Cancellation. The department may cancel an identicard if the
holder of the identicard ((used the card or allowed others to use the
card in violation of)) has committed one of the prohibited practices
relating to identicards under RCW 46.20.0921.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.291 and 2007 c 393 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to suspend or deny the license or
driving privilege of a ((driver)) person upon a showing by its records
or other sufficient evidence that the ((licensee)) person:
(1) Has committed an offense for which mandatory revocation or
suspension of license is provided by law;
(2) Has, by reckless or unlawful operation of a motor vehicle,
caused or contributed to an accident resulting in death or injury to
any person or serious property damage;
(3) Has been convicted of offenses against traffic regulations
governing the movement of vehicles, or found to have committed traffic
infractions, with such frequency as to indicate a disrespect for
traffic laws or a disregard for the safety of other persons on the
highways;
(4) Is incompetent to drive a motor vehicle under RCW 46.20.031(3);
(5) Has failed to respond to a notice of traffic infraction, failed
to appear at a requested hearing, violated a written promise to appear
in court, or has failed to comply with the terms of a notice of traffic
infraction or citation, as provided in RCW 46.20.289;
(6) Is subject to suspension under RCW 46.20.305 or 9A.56.078;
(7) Has committed one of the prohibited practices relating to
drivers' licenses defined in RCW 46.20.0921; or
(8) Has been certified by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a child support
order or a residential or visitation order as provided in RCW
74.20A.320.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.20.342 and 2011 c 372 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to drive a motor vehicle in this
state while that person is in a suspended or revoked status or when his
or her privilege to drive is suspended or revoked in this or any other
state. Any person who has a valid Washington driver's license is not
guilty of a violation of this section.
(a) A person found to be a habitual offender under chapter 46.65
RCW, who violates this section while an order of revocation issued
under chapter 46.65 RCW prohibiting such operation is in effect, is
guilty of driving while license suspended or revoked in the first
degree, a gross misdemeanor. Upon the first such conviction, the
person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than ten days.
Upon the second conviction, the person shall be punished by
imprisonment for not less than ninety days. Upon the third or
subsequent conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for
not less than one hundred eighty days. If the person is also convicted
of the offense defined in RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, when both
convictions arise from the same event, the minimum sentence of
confinement shall be not less than ninety days. The minimum sentence
of confinement required shall not be suspended or deferred. A
conviction under this subsection does not prevent a person from
petitioning for reinstatement as provided by RCW 46.65.080.
(b) A person who violates this section while an order of suspension
or revocation prohibiting such operation is in effect and while the
person is not eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or
driving privilege, other than for a suspension for the reasons
described in (c) of this subsection, is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the second degree, a gross misdemeanor. For
the purposes of this subsection, a person is not considered to be
eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege
if the person is eligible to obtain an ignition interlock driver's
license but did not obtain such a license. This subsection applies
when a person's driver's license or driving privilege has been
suspended or revoked by reason of:
(i) A conviction of a felony in the commission of which a motor
vehicle was used;
(ii) A previous conviction under this section;
(iii) A notice received by the department from a court or diversion
unit as provided by RCW 46.20.265, relating to a minor who has
committed, or who has entered a diversion unit concerning an offense
relating to alcohol, legend drugs, controlled substances, or imitation
controlled substances;
(iv) A conviction of RCW 46.20.410, relating to the violation of
restrictions of an occupational driver's license, a temporary
restricted driver's license, or an ignition interlock driver's license;
(v) A conviction of RCW 46.20.345, relating to the operation of a
motor vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;
(vi) A conviction of RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of
injury to or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(vii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.024, relating to attempting to
elude pursuing police vehicles;
(viii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.212(4), relating to reckless
endangerment of emergency zone workers;
(ix) A conviction of RCW 46.61.500, relating to reckless driving;
(x) A conviction of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to a
person under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(xi) A conviction of RCW 46.61.520, relating to vehicular homicide;
(xii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.522, relating to vehicular assault;
(xiii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.527(4), relating to reckless
endangerment of roadway workers;
(xiv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.530, relating to racing of vehicles
on highways;
(xv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.685, relating to leaving children in
an unattended vehicle with motor running;
(xvi) A conviction of RCW 46.61.740, relating to theft of motor
vehicle fuel;
(xvii) A conviction of RCW 46.64.048, relating to attempting,
aiding, abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(xviii) An administrative action taken by the department under
chapter 46.20 RCW;
(xix) A conviction of a local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution of a political subdivision of this state, the federal
government, or any other state, of an offense substantially similar to
a violation included in this subsection; or
(xx) A finding that a person has committed a traffic infraction
under RCW 46.61.526 and suspension of driving privileges pursuant to
RCW 46.61.526 (4)(b) or (7)(a)(ii).
(c) A person who violates this section when his or her driver's
license or driving privilege is, at the time of the violation,
suspended or revoked solely because (((i))) the person:
(i) Must furnish proof of satisfactory progress in a required
alcoholism or drug treatment program((,));
(ii) ((the person)) Must furnish proof of financial responsibility
for the future as provided by chapter 46.29 RCW((,));
(iii) ((the person)) Has failed to comply with the provisions of
chapter 46.29 RCW relating to uninsured accidents((,));
(iv) ((the person)) Has failed to respond to a notice of traffic
infraction, failed to appear at a requested hearing, violated a written
promise to appear in court, or has failed to comply with the terms of
a notice of traffic infraction or citation, as provided in RCW
46.20.289((,));
(v) ((the person)) Has committed an offense in another state that,
if committed in this state, would not be grounds for the suspension or
revocation of the person's driver's license((,));
(vi) ((the person)) Has been suspended or revoked by reason of one
or more of the items listed in (b) of this subsection, but was eligible
to reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege at the
time of the violation((, or));
(vii) ((the person)) Has received traffic citations or notices of
traffic infraction that have resulted in a suspension under RCW
46.20.267 relating to intermediate drivers' licenses((, or));
(viii) Has been certified by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a child support
order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320;
(ix) Has been suspended or revoked as a result of noncompliance
with an ignition interlock requirement; or
(x) Has been suspended or revoked for any combination of (c)(i)
through (((vii))) (ix) of this subsection, is guilty of driving while
license suspended or revoked in the third degree, a misdemeanor.
For the purposes of this subsection, a person is not considered to
be eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or driving
privilege if the person is eligible to obtain an ignition interlock
driver's license but did not obtain such a license.
(2) Upon receiving a record of conviction of any person or upon
receiving an order by any juvenile court or any duly authorized court
officer of the conviction of any juvenile under this section, the
department shall:
(a) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
first degree, as provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section, extend
the period of administrative revocation imposed under chapter 46.65 RCW
for an additional period of one year from and after the date the person
would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new license or have
his or her driving privilege restored; or
(b) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
second degree, as provided by subsection (1)(b) of this section, not
issue a new license or restore the driving privilege for an additional
period of one year from and after the date the person would otherwise
have been entitled to apply for a new license or have his or her
driving privilege restored; or
(c) Not extend the period of suspension or revocation if the
conviction was under subsection (1)(c) of this section. If the
conviction was under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section and the
court recommends against the extension and the convicted person has
obtained a valid driver's license, the period of suspension or
revocation shall not be extended.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.65.065 and 1989 c 337 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a person's driving record, as maintained by the
department, brings him or her within the definition of an habitual
traffic offender, as defined in RCW 46.65.020, the department shall
forthwith notify the person of the revocation in writing by
((certified)) mail at his or her address of record as maintained by the
department. If the person is a nonresident of this state, notice shall
be sent to the person's last known address. Notices of revocation
shall inform the recipient thereof of his or her right to a formal
hearing and specify the steps which must be taken in order to obtain a
hearing. Within fifteen days after the notice has been given, the
person may, in writing, request a formal hearing. If such a request is
not made within the prescribed time the right to a hearing is waived.
A request for a hearing stays the effectiveness of the revocation.
(2) Upon receipt of a request for a hearing, the department shall
schedule a hearing in the county in which the person making the request
resides, and if (([the])) the person is a nonresident of this state,
the hearing shall be held in Thurston county. The department shall
give at least ten days notice of the hearing to the person.
(3) The scope of the hearings provided by this section is limited
to the issues of whether the certified transcripts or abstracts of the
convictions, as maintained by the department, show that the requisite
number of violations have been accumulated within the prescribed period
of time as set forth in RCW 46.65.020 and whether the terms and
conditions for granting stays, as provided in RCW 46.65.060, have been
met.
(4) Upon receipt of the hearing officer's decision, an aggrieved
party may appeal to the superior court of the county in which he or she
resides, or, in the case of a nonresident of this state, in the
superior court of Thurston county, for review of the revocation.
Notice of appeal must be filed within thirty days after receipt of the
hearing officer's decision or the right to appeal is waived. Review by
the court shall be de novo and without a jury.
(5) The filing of a notice of appeal does not stay the effective
date of the revocation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1,
2012.

--- END ---