BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
The blueprint for safety program is established. The goal of the
program is to improve safety for employees and lower costs for
employers by assisting those employers for which the traditional safety
and health model has not been effective. The department shall design
the program to promote management and labor leadership in safety and
health as essential for long-term success. The criteria for
participation may include, but are not limited to: A history with the
department indicating a less than optimal leadership commitment to
safety and health, a rising experience modification factor, a recent
catastrophic workplace injury, a change in the employer's safety
management, and a request by the employer to participate. The
department shall offer the program statewide in a phased manner. The
department shall post information on its web page to provide
information about the program to employers. Participation by an
employer is voluntary and subject to approval by the department. The
program shall supplement, but not replace any of, the department's
existing compliance or consultation programs. The department shall
adopt rules to establish criteria for participation in the blueprint
for safety program, and shall initiate rule making in 2012.

--- END ---