BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.71A.060 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 324 are each amended
to read as follows:
No health care services may be performed under this chapter in any
of the following areas:
(1) ((The measurement of the powers or range of human vision, or
the determination of the accommodation and refractive state of the
human eye or the scope of its functions in general, or the fitting or
adaptation of lenses or frames for the aid thereof.
(2) The prescribing or directing the use of, or using, any optical
device in connection with ocular exercises, visual training, vision
training, or orthoptics.
(3) The prescribing of contact lenses for, or the fitting or
adaptation of contact lenses to, the human eye.
(4) Nothing in this section shall preclude the performance of
routine visual screening.
(5))) The practice of dentistry or dental hygiene as defined in
chapters 18.32 and 18.29 RCW respectively. The exemptions set forth in
RCW 18.32.030 (1) and (8)((,)) shall not apply to a physician
assistant.
(((6))) (2) The practice of chiropractic as defined in chapter
18.25 RCW including the adjustment or manipulation of the articulations
of the spine.
(((7))) (3) The practice of podiatric medicine and surgery as
defined in chapter 18.22 RCW.

--- END ---