BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to prohibit the
state building code council from adopting any mandates or rules related
to equipment and processes used for cold storage. The council is
supposed to make minimum standards related to safety for those that
occupy buildings, not micromanage industrial or commercial processes.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27.065 and 1996 c 157 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(1) Temporary growing structures used solely for the commercial
production of horticultural plants including ornamental plants,
flowers, vegetables, and fruits. A temporary growing structure is not
considered a building for purposes of this chapter;
(2) Equipment used for commercial or industrial cold storage.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.27A.027 and 1996 c 323 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The state building code council shall exempt the following
from regulation under this chapter:
(1) Equipment shelters of personal wireless service facilities from
building envelope insulation requirements.
(((2) For the purposes of this section,)) "Personal wireless
service facilities" means facilities for the provision of personal
wireless services;
(2) Refrigerated warehouse heating and cooling systems or equipment
used for cold storage spaces.

--- END ---