BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.065 and 1996 c 157 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(1) Temporary growing structures used solely for the commercial
production of horticultural plants including ornamental plants,
flowers, vegetables, and fruits. A temporary growing structure is not
considered a building for purposes of this chapter;
(2) Equipment or processes used for commercial or industrial
processing or activities unrelated to the building structure.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27A.027 and 1996 c 323 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The state building code council shall exempt the following
from regulation under this chapter:
(1) Equipment shelters of personal wireless service facilities from
building envelope insulation requirements.
(((2) For the purposes of this section,)) "Personal wireless
service facilities" means facilities for the provision of personal
wireless services;
(2) Equipment or processes used for commercial or industrial
processing or activities unrelated to the building structure.

--- END ---