BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.40 RCW
to read as follows:
Any taxing district that through ordinance, resolution, statute,
rule, or by any other means implements any policy requiring a portion
of assessed property to be set aside for the purposes of environmental
protection, critical area protection, wetland protection, salmon
protection, stream or creek buffers, storm water retention, forest
preservation, aquifer protection, or any other restriction on the
assessed property, must determine the percentage portion of the
property set aside through the ordinance, resolution, statute, or rule.
The taxing district must then reduce the assessed value of the property
equal to the percentage of the portion determined to have been set
aside through the ordinance, resolution, statute, or rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2014 and thereafter.

--- END ---