BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Collective bargaining sessions with employee organizations
specified in RCW 41.56.026, 41.56.028, 41.56.029, and 41.56.510 shall
be conducted as open public meetings as provided for in chapter 42.30
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.80 RCW
to read as follows:
Collective bargaining sessions with employee organizations under
this chapter shall be conducted as open public meetings as provided for
in chapter 42.30 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Records before and during the course of any collective bargaining,
labor negotiations, or grievance or mediation proceedings that would
reveal the strategy or position being taken by an agency are exempt
from disclosure under this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.30.140 and 1990 c 98 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
If any provision of this chapter conflicts with the provisions of
any other statute, the provisions of this chapter shall control:
PROVIDED, That this chapter shall not apply to:
(1) The proceedings concerned with the formal issuance of an order
granting, suspending, revoking, or denying any license, permit, or
certificate to engage in any business, occupation, or profession or to
any disciplinary proceedings involving a member of such business,
occupation, or profession, or to receive a license for a sports
activity or to operate any mechanical device or motor vehicle where a
license or registration is necessary; or
(2) That portion of a meeting of a quasi-judicial body which
relates to a quasi-judicial matter between named parties as
distinguished from a matter having general effect on the public or on
a class or group; or
(3) Matters governed by chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative
procedure act; or
(4)(((a) Collective bargaining sessions with employee
organizations, including contract negotiations, grievance meetings, and
discussions relating to the interpretation or application of a labor
agreement; or (b) that)) The portion of a meeting during which the
governing body is planning or adopting the strategy or position to be
taken by the governing body during the course of any collective
bargaining, professional negotiations, or grievance or mediation
proceedings, or reviewing the proposals made in the negotiations or
proceedings while in progress.

--- END ---