BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the impacts to
public safety occasioned by unsafe equipment in intermodal commerce on
the state's roads and highways. It is the legislature's intent to
ensure safe transport of intermodal cargo and fair treatment of all
persons engaged in that transport.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---