BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that to
effectively fulfill its role as a financial steward of state tax
dollars, the legislature must understand the return on investment
associated with each tax preference.
(2) The legislature therefore intends to add a return on investment
measurement to the duties of the joint legislative audit and review
committee to provide a rigorous and measurable analysis of value of
each tax preference.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.136.055 and 2011 c 335 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee must review
tax preferences according to the schedule developed under RCW
43.136.045. The committee must consider, but not be limited to, the
following factors in the review as relevant to each particular tax
preference:
(a) The classes of individuals, types of organizations, or types of
industries whose state tax liabilities are directly affected by the tax
preference;
(b) Public policy objectives that might provide a justification for
the tax preference, including but not limited to the legislative
history, any legislative intent, or the extent to which the tax
preference encourages business growth or relocation into this state,
promotes growth or retention of high wage jobs, or helps stabilize
communities;
(c) Evidence that the existence of the tax preference has
contributed to the achievement of any of the public policy objectives;
(d) The extent to which continuation of the tax preference might
contribute to any of the public policy objectives;
(e) The extent to which the tax preference may provide unintended
benefits to an individual, organization, or industry other than those
the legislature intended;
(f) The extent to which terminating the tax preference may have
negative effects on the category of taxpayers that currently benefit
from the tax preference, and the extent to which resulting higher taxes
may have negative effects on employment and the economy;
(g) The feasibility of modifying the tax preference to provide for
adjustment or recapture of the tax benefits of the tax preference if
the objectives are not fulfilled;
(h) Fiscal impacts of the tax preference, including past impacts
and expected future impacts if it is continued. For the purposes of
this subsection, "fiscal impact" includes an analysis of the general
effects of the tax preference on the overall state economy, including,
but not limited to, the effects of the tax preference on the
consumption and expenditures of persons and businesses within the
state;
(i) The extent to which termination of the tax preference would
affect the distribution of liability for payment of state taxes;
(j) The economic impact of the tax preference compared to the
economic impact of government activities funded by the tax for which
the tax preference is taken at the same level of expenditure as the tax
preference. For purposes of this subsection the economic impact shall
be determined using the Washington input-output model as published by
the office of financial management;
(k) Consideration of similar tax preferences adopted in other
states, and potential public policy benefits that might be gained by
incorporating corresponding provisions in Washington;
(l) The rate of return of the tax preference. The "rate of return"
is the ratio of: (i) The amount of direct, indirect, and induced state
taxes that are paid to the state as a result of the tax preference; and
(ii) the amount of state tax savings claimed by taxpayers as a result
of the tax preference. Local taxes may be included as part of the
ratio calculation under (l)(i) and (ii) of this subsection if the tax
preference provides for a reduction in local taxes. The committee may
determine the length of the time period used in the ratio calculation.
The rate of return of the tax preference may be considered only where
a purpose of the tax preference is job creation or retention. Where
appropriate, the committee may deem the seller as the taxpayer with
respect to sales and use tax exemptions. The factor under this
subsection (1)(l) is not required to be part of a tax preference review
until 2013 and thereafter.
(2) For each tax preference, the committee must provide a
recommendation as to whether the tax preference should be continued
without modification, modified, scheduled for sunset review at a future
date, or terminated immediately. The committee may recommend
accountability standards for the future review of a tax preference.

--- END ---