BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4452 and 2010 c 114 s 114 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person whose research and development spending during
the year in which the credit is claimed exceeds 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year.
(2)(a) The credit is calculated as follows:
(((a))) (i) Determine the greater of the amount of qualified
research and development expenditures of a person or eighty percent of
amounts received by a person other than a public educational or
research institution in compensation for the conduct of qualified
research and development;
(((b))) (ii) Subtract 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount
from the amount determined under (a)(i) of this subsection;
(((c))) (iii) Multiply the amount determined under (((b))) (a)(ii)
of this subsection by the following:
(((i))) (A) For the period June 10, 2004, through December 31,
2006, the person's average tax rate for the calendar year for which the
credit is claimed;
(((ii))) (B) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2007, the
greater of the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 0.75
percent;
(((iii))) (C) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2008, the
greater of the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.0
percent;
(((iv))) (D) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2009, the
greater of the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.25
percent;
(((v))) (E) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2010, and
thereafter, 1.50 percent.
(b) For purposes of calculating the credit, if a person's reporting
period is less than annual, the person may use an estimated average tax
rate for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed by using the
person's average tax rate for each reporting period. A person who uses
an estimated average tax rate must make an adjustment to the total
credit claimed for the calendar year using the person's actual average
tax rate for the calendar year when the person files its last return
for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(3) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified research and development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified research
and development.
(4) The credit, including any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section, must be claimed against taxes due for
the same calendar year in which the qualified research and development
expenditures are incurred. The credit, including any credit assigned
to a person under subsection (3) of this section, for each calendar
year may not exceed the lesser of ((two million)) four hundred thousand
dollars or the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the
calendar year.
(5) For any person claiming the credit, including any credit
assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section, whose
research and development spending during the calendar year in which the
credit is claimed fails to exceed 0.92 percent of the person's taxable
amount during the same calendar year or who is otherwise ineligible,
the department must declare the taxes against which the credit was
claimed to be immediately due and payable. The department must assess
interest, but not penalties, on the taxes against which the credit was
claimed. Interest must be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent
excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date the
credit was claimed, and accrues until the taxes against which the
credit was claimed are repaid. Any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section that is disallowed as a result of this
section may be claimed by the person who performed the qualified
research and development subject to the limitations set forth in
subsection (4) of this section.
(6) A person may not claim a credit under this section if the
person reported an annual gross amount of twenty-five million dollars
or more in the prior calendar year.
(7) A person may not claim a credit under this section after the
total length of time the credit has been claimed, based on the person's
tax reporting periods in which a credit under this section has been
claimed, exceeds eight years. The determination under this subsection
(7) includes all tax reporting periods prior to the effective date of
this section.
(8) A person claiming the credit provided in this section must file
a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.585.
(((7))) (9) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Average tax rate" means a person's total tax liability under
this chapter for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed
divided by the taxpayer's total taxable amount under this chapter for
the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(b) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined under rules adopted by the
department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly
incurred in qualified research and development by a person claiming the
credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development. Nor does
the term include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land,
structures, or depreciable property.
(c) "Qualified research and development" ((shall have)) has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 82.63.010.
(d) "Research and development spending" means qualified research
and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts paid to a
person other than a public educational or research institution to
conduct qualified research and development.
(e) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
combined excise tax returns for the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under
RCW 82.04.440.
(((8))) (10) This section expires January 1, ((2015)) 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax owed under this chapter, a person may take a
credit for contributions to the program administrator of the
opportunity scholarship board. Contributions must be deposited into a
separate account to be used for the opportunity expansion program.
(2) A person may take a credit under this section only if the
person is prohibited from taking all or a portion of the high
technology research and development credit as a result of the changes
made in section 1, chapter . . ., Laws of 2012 (this act).
(3) A person may not take a credit under this section in an amount
that exceeds two million five hundred thousand dollars for any calendar
year.
(4) A credit claimed under this section may not exceed the person's
tax liability under this chapter in the tax reporting period in which
the credit is claimed. Unused credits may be carried forward until
used.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "High technology research and development credit" means the
credit under RCW 82.04.4452(2).
(b) "Opportunity expansion program," "opportunity scholarship
board," "program administrator," and "scholarship account" have the
same meanings as provided in chapter 28B.145 RCW.
(6) This section expires January 1, 2022.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.145.060 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 13 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The opportunity expansion program is established.
(2) The opportunity scholarship board ((shall)) must select
institutions of higher education to receive opportunity expansion
awards. In so doing, the opportunity scholarship board must:
(a) Solicit, receive, and evaluate proposals from institutions of
higher education that are designed to directly increase the number of
high-quality baccalaureate degrees produced in high employer demand and
other programs of study, and that include annual numerical targets for
the number of such degrees, with a strong emphasis on serving students
who received their high school diploma or GED in Washington or are
adult Washington residents who are returning to school to gain a
baccalaureate degree;
(b) Develop criteria for evaluating proposals and awarding funds to
the proposals deemed most likely to increase the number of
baccalaureate degrees and degrees produced in high employer demand and
other programs of study; however:
(i) The annual numeric targets referenced in (a) of this subsection
must be set as a specific percentage increase from a rigorously defined
baseline of the institution's science, technology, engineering, and
math degree production. The baseline must represent the institution's
production of science, technology, engineering, and math degrees for
the five years before receipt of an opportunity expansion award;
(ii) Awards must specify that, if an institution fails to achieve
their annual numeric target of degrees awarded that institution must
refund their award in an amount proportional to the percentage of their
target they did not achieve; and
(iii) Awards must only be made to institutions who demonstrate, to
the board's satisfaction, that award funds will be used only for
increased degree production and not on unrelated administrative,
capital, or other university costs;
(c) Give priority to proposals that include a partnership between
public and private partnership entities that leverage additional
private funds;
(d) Give priority to proposals that are innovative, efficient, and
cost-effective, given the nature and cost of the particular program of
study;
(e) Consult and operate in consultation with existing higher
education stakeholders, including but not limited to: Faculty, labor,
student organizations, and relevant higher education agencies; ((and))
(f) Determine which proposals to improve and accelerate the
production of baccalaureate degrees in high employer demand and other
programs of study will receive opportunity expansion awards for the
following state fiscal year, notify the state treasurer, and announce
the awards; and
(g) Operate in consultation with program donors to ensure that
awards are given to those programs most likely to meet workforce needs.
(3) The state treasurer, at the direction of the opportunity
scholarship board, must distribute the funds that have been awarded to
the institutions of higher education from the opportunity expansion
account.
(4) Institutions of higher education receiving awards under this
section may not supplant existing general fund state revenues with
opportunity expansion awards.
(5) Annually, the office of financial management ((shall)) must
report to the opportunity scholarship board, the governor, and the
relevant committees of the legislature regarding the percentage of
Washington households with incomes in the middle-income bracket or
higher. For purposes of this section, "middle-income bracket" means
household incomes between two hundred and five hundred percent of the
2010 federal poverty level, as determined by the United States
department of health and human services for a family of four, adjusted
annually for inflation.
(6) Annually, the higher education coordinating board must report
to the opportunity scholarship board, the governor, and the relevant
committees of the legislature regarding the increase in the number of
degrees in high employer demand and other programs of study awarded by
institutions of higher education over the average of the preceding ten
academic years.
(7) In its comprehensive plan, the workforce training and education
coordinating board ((shall)) must include specific strategies to reach
the goal of increasing the percentage of Washington households living
in the middle-income bracket or higher, as calculated by the office of
financial management and developed by the agency or education
institution that will lead the strategy.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.145.080 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 13 s 9 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in 2018, the joint legislative audit and review
committee ((shall)) must evaluate the opportunity scholarship and
opportunity expansion programs, and submit a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2018. The committee's
evaluation ((shall)) must include, but is not ((be)) limited to:
(a) The number and type of eligible education programs as
determined by the opportunity scholarship board;
(b) The number of participants in the opportunity scholarship
program in relation to the number of participants who completed a
baccalaureate degree;
(c) The total cumulative number of students who received
opportunity scholarships, and the total cumulative number of students
who gained a baccalaureate degree after receiving an opportunity
scholarship and the types of baccalaureate degrees awarded;
(d) The amount of private contributions to the opportunity
scholarship program, annually and in total;
(e) The amount of state match moneys to the opportunity scholarship
program, annually and in total;
(f) The amount of any administrative fees paid to the program
administrator, annually and in total;
(g) The source and amount of funding, annually and cumulatively,
for the opportunity expansion program;
(h) The number and type of proposals submitted by institutions for
opportunity expansion awards, the number and type of proposals that
received an award of opportunity expansion funds, and the amount of
such awards;
(i) The total cumulative number of additional high employer demand
degrees produced in Washington state due to the opportunity expansion
program((, including both the initial opportunity expansion awards and
the subsequent inclusion in base funding)); and
(j) Evidence that the existence of the opportunity scholarship and
opportunity expansion programs have contributed to the achievement of
the public policy objectives of helping to mitigate the impact of
tuition increases, increasing the number of baccalaureate degrees in
high employer demand and other programs, and investing in programs and
students to meet market demands for a knowledge-based economy while
filling middle-income jobs with a sufficient supply of skilled workers.
(2) In the event that the joint legislative audit and review
committee is charged with completing an evaluation of other aspects of
degree production, funding, or other aspects of higher education in
2018, and to the extent that it is economical and feasible to do so,
the committee ((shall)) must combine the multiple evaluations and
submit a single report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---