BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.09.260 and 2009 c 564 s 927 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The examination of the financial affairs of all local
governments shall be made at such reasonable, periodic intervals as the
state auditor shall determine. However, an examination of the
financial affairs of all local governments shall be made at least once
in every three years, and an examination of individual local government
health and welfare benefit plans and local government self-insurance
programs shall be made at least once every two years. Additionally,
after July 1, 2012, the state auditor shall conduct fiscal and
performance audits no more often than once every three years for school
districts when no findings of impropriety were found for the school
districts for the three-year period immediately preceding the audit
period. This subsection does not prohibit the state auditor from
conducting audits: (a) To address suspected fraud or irregular
conduct; (b) at the request of the local school board of directors; (c)
if there has been a change in the superintendent or the chief financial
officer in the year immediately preceding the audit; or (d) as required
by federal laws or regulations.
(2) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the state auditor shall
conduct audits no more often than once every two years of local
governments with annual general fund revenues of ten million dollars or
less and no findings of impropriety for the three-year period
immediately preceding the audit period. This subsection does not
prohibit the state auditor from conducting audits: (a) To address
suspected fraud or irregular conduct; (b) at the request of the local
government governing body; or (c) as required by federal laws or
regulations.
(3) The term local governments for purposes of this chapter
includes but is not limited to all counties, cities, and other
political subdivisions, municipal corporations, and quasi-municipal
corporations, however denominated.
(4) The state auditor shall establish a schedule to govern the
auditing of local governments which shall include: A designation of
the various classifications of local governments; a designation of the
frequency for auditing each type of local government; and a description
of events which cause a more frequent audit to be conducted.
(5) On every such examination, inquiry shall be made as to the
financial condition and resources of the local government; whether the
Constitution and laws of the state, the ordinances and orders of the
local government, and the requirements of the state auditor have been
properly complied with; and into the methods and accuracy of the
accounts and reports.
(6) A report of such examination shall be made and filed in the
office of state auditor, and one copy shall be transmitted to the local
government. A copy of any report containing findings of noncompliance
with state law shall be transmitted to the attorney general. If any
such report discloses malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in
office on the part of any public officer or employee, within thirty
days from the receipt of his or her copy of the report, the attorney
general shall institute, in the proper county, such legal action as is
proper in the premises by civil process and prosecute the same to final
determination to carry into effect the findings of the examination.
(7) It shall be unlawful for any local government or the
responsible head thereof, to make a settlement or compromise of any
claim arising out of such malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance, or
any action commenced therefor, or for any court to enter upon any
compromise or settlement of such action, without the written approval
and consent of the attorney general and the state auditor.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.405.210 and 2010 c 235 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
No teacher, principal, supervisor, superintendent, or other
certificated employee, holding a position as such with a school
district, hereinafter referred to as "employee", shall be employed
except by written order of a majority of the directors of the district
at a regular or special meeting thereof, nor unless he or she is the
holder of an effective teacher's certificate or other certificate
required by law or the Washington professional educator standards board
for the position for which the employee is employed.
The board shall make with each employee employed by it a written
contract, which shall be in conformity with the laws of this state, and
except as otherwise provided by law, limited to a term of not more than
one year. Every such contract shall be made in duplicate, one copy to
be retained by the school district superintendent or secretary and one
copy to be delivered to the employee. No contract shall be offered by
any board for the employment of any employee who has previously signed
an employment contract for that same term in another school district of
the state of Washington unless such employee shall have been released
from his or her obligations under such previous contract by the board
of directors of the school district to which he or she was obligated.
Any contract signed in violation of this provision shall be void.
In the event it is determined that there is probable cause or
causes that the employment contract of an employee should not be
renewed by the district for the next ensuing term such employee shall
be notified in writing on or before May 15th preceding the commencement
of such term of that determination, or ((if the omnibus appropriations
act has not passed the legislature by May 15th, then notification shall
be no later than June 15th)) thirty days after the omnibus
appropriations act passes the legislature, whichever occurs later,
which notification shall specify the cause or causes for nonrenewal of
contract. Such determination of probable cause for certificated
employees, other than the superintendent, shall be made by the
superintendent. Such notice shall be served upon the employee
personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of
the notice at the house of his or her usual abode with some person of
suitable age and discretion then resident therein. Every such employee
so notified, at his or her request made in writing and filed with the
president, chair or secretary of the board of directors of the district
within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be granted
opportunity for hearing pursuant to RCW 28A.405.310 to determine
whether there is sufficient cause or causes for nonrenewal of contract:
PROVIDED, That any employee receiving notice of nonrenewal of contract
due to an enrollment decline or loss of revenue may, in his or her
request for a hearing, stipulate that initiation of the arrangements
for a hearing officer as provided for by RCW 28A.405.310(4) shall occur
within ten days following July 15 rather than the day that the employee
submits the request for a hearing. If any such notification or
opportunity for hearing is not timely given, the employee entitled
thereto shall be conclusively presumed to have been reemployed by the
district for the next ensuing term upon contractual terms identical
with those which would have prevailed if his or her employment had
actually been renewed by the board of directors for such ensuing term.
This section shall not be applicable to "provisional employees" as
so designated in RCW 28A.405.220; transfer to a subordinate
certificated position as that procedure is set forth in RCW 28A.405.230
or 28A.405.245 shall not be construed as a nonrenewal of contract for
the purposes of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.405.220 and 2010 c 235 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 28A.405.210, every person
employed by a school district in a teaching or other nonsupervisory
certificated position shall be subject to nonrenewal of employment
contract as provided in this section during the first three years of
employment by such district, unless: (a) The employee has previously
completed at least two years of certificated employment in another
school district in the state of Washington, in which case the employee
shall be subject to nonrenewal of employment contract pursuant to this
section during the first year of employment with the new district; or
(b) the school district superintendent may make a determination to
remove an employee from provisional status if the employee has received
one of the top two evaluation ratings during the second year of
employment by the district. Employees as defined in this section shall
hereinafter be referred to as "provisional employees."
(2) In the event the superintendent of the school district
determines that the employment contract of any provisional employee
should not be renewed by the district for the next ensuing term such
provisional employee shall be notified thereof in writing on or before
May 15th preceding the commencement of such school term, or ((if the
omnibus appropriations act has not passed the legislature by May 15th,
then notification shall be no later than June 15th)) thirty days after
the omnibus appropriations act passes the legislature, whichever occurs
later, which notification shall state the reason or reasons for such
determination. Such notice shall be served upon the provisional
employee personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving
a copy of the notice at the place of his or her usual abode with some
person of suitable age and discretion then resident therein. The
determination of the superintendent shall be subject to the evaluation
requirements of RCW 28A.405.100.
(3) Every such provisional employee so notified, at his or her
request made in writing and filed with the superintendent of the
district within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be given
the opportunity to meet informally with the superintendent for the
purpose of requesting the superintendent to reconsider his or her
decision. Such meeting shall be held no later than ten days following
the receipt of such request, and the provisional employee shall be
given written notice of the date, time and place of meeting at least
three days prior thereto. At such meeting the provisional employee
shall be given the opportunity to refute any facts upon which the
superintendent's determination was based and to make any argument in
support of his or her request for reconsideration.
(4) Within ten days following the meeting with the provisional
employee, the superintendent shall either reinstate the provisional
employee or shall submit to the school district board of directors for
consideration at its next regular meeting a written report recommending
that the employment contract of the provisional employee be nonrenewed
and stating the reason or reasons therefor. A copy of such report
shall be delivered to the provisional employee at least three days
prior to the scheduled meeting of the board of directors. In taking
action upon the recommendation of the superintendent, the board of
directors shall consider any written communication which the
provisional employee may file with the secretary of the board at any
time prior to that meeting.
(5) The board of directors shall notify the provisional employee in
writing of its final decision within ten days following the meeting at
which the superintendent's recommendation was considered. The decision
of the board of directors to nonrenew the contract of a provisional
employee shall be final and not subject to appeal.
(6) This section applies to any person employed by a school
district in a teaching or other nonsupervisory certificated position
after June 25, 1976. This section provides the exclusive means for
nonrenewing the employment contract of a provisional employee and no
other provision of law shall be applicable thereto, including, without
limitation, RCW 28A.405.210 and chapter 28A.645 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.405.230 and 2010 c 235 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any certificated employee of a school district employed as an
assistant superintendent, director, principal, assistant principal,
coordinator, or in any other supervisory or administrative position,
hereinafter in this section referred to as "administrator", shall be
subject to transfer, at the expiration of the term of his or her
employment contract, to any subordinate certificated position within
the school district. "Subordinate certificated position" as used in
this section, shall mean any administrative or nonadministrative
certificated position for which the annual compensation is less than
the position currently held by the administrator.
Every superintendent determining that the best interests of the
school district would be served by transferring any administrator to a
subordinate certificated position shall notify that administrator in
writing on or before May 15th preceding the commencement of such school
term of that determination, or ((if the omnibus appropriations act has
not passed the legislature by May 15th, then notification shall be no
later than June 15th)) thirty days after the omnibus appropriations act
passes the legislature, whichever occurs later, which notification
shall state the reason or reasons for the transfer, and shall identify
the subordinate certificated position to which the administrator will
be transferred. Such notice shall be served upon the administrator
personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of
the notice at the place of his or her usual abode with some person of
suitable age and discretion then resident therein.
Every such administrator so notified, at his or her request made in
writing and filed with the president or chair, or secretary of the
board of directors of the district within ten days after receiving such
notice, shall be given the opportunity to meet informally with the
board of directors in an executive session thereof for the purpose of
requesting the board to reconsider the decision of the superintendent.
Such board, upon receipt of such request, shall schedule the meeting
for no later than the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board,
and shall notify the administrator in writing of the date, time and
place of the meeting at least three days prior thereto. At such
meeting the administrator shall be given the opportunity to refute any
facts upon which the determination was based and to make any argument
in support of his or her request for reconsideration. The
administrator and the board may invite their respective legal counsel
to be present and to participate at the meeting. The board shall
notify the administrator in writing of its final decision within ten
days following its meeting with the administrator. No appeal to the
courts shall lie from the final decision of the board of directors to
transfer an administrator to a subordinate certificated position:
PROVIDED, That in the case of principals such transfer shall be made at
the expiration of the contract year and only during the first three
consecutive school years of employment as a principal by a school
district; except that if any such principal has been previously
employed as a principal by another school district in the state of
Washington for three or more consecutive school years the provisions of
this section shall apply only to the first full school year of such
employment.
This section applies to any person employed as an administrator by
a school district on June 25, 1976, and to all persons so employed at
any time thereafter, except that RCW 28A.405.245 applies to persons
first employed after June 10, 2010, as a principal by a school district
meeting the criteria of RCW 28A.405.245. This section provides the
exclusive means for transferring an administrator subject to this
section to a subordinate certificated position at the expiration of the
term of his or her employment contract.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.405.245 and 2010 c 235 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any certificated employee of a school district under this
section who is first employed as a principal after June 10, 2010, shall
be subject to transfer as provided under this section, at the
expiration of the term of his or her employment contract, to any
subordinate certificated position within the school district.
"Subordinate certificated position" as used in this section means any
administrative or nonadministrative certificated position for which the
annual compensation is less than the position currently held by the
administrator. This section applies only to school districts with an
annual average student enrollment of more than thirty-five thousand
full-time equivalent students.
(2) During the first three consecutive school years of employment
as a principal by the school district, or during the first full school
year of such employment in the case of a principal who has been
previously employed as a principal by another school district in the
state for three or more consecutive school years, the transfer of the
principal to a subordinate certificated position may be made by a
determination of the superintendent that the best interests of the
school district would be served by the transfer.
(3) Commencing with the fourth consecutive school year of
employment as a principal, or the second consecutive school year of
such employment in the case of a principal who has been previously
employed as a principal by another school district in the state for
three or more consecutive school years, the transfer of the principal
to a subordinate certificated position shall be based on the
superintendent's determination that the results of the evaluation of
the principal's performance using the evaluative criteria and rating
system established under RCW 28A.405.100 provide a valid reason for the
transfer without regard to whether there is probable cause for the
transfer. If a valid reason is shown, it shall be deemed that the
transfer is reasonably related to the principal's performance. No
probationary period is required. However, provision of support and an
attempt at remediation of the performance of the principal, as defined
by the superintendent, are required for a determination by the
superintendent under this subsection that the principal should be
transferred to a subordinate certificated position.
(4) Any superintendent transferring a principal under this section
to a subordinate certificated position shall notify that principal in
writing on or before May 15th before the beginning of the school year
of that determination, or ((if the omnibus appropriations act has not
passed the legislature by May 15th, then notification shall be no later
than June 15th)) thirty days after the omnibus appropriations act
passes the legislature, whichever occurs later. The notification shall
state the reason or reasons for the transfer and shall identify the
subordinate certificated position to which the principal will be
transferred. The notification shall be served upon the principal
personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of
the notice at the place of his or her usual abode with some person of
suitable age and discretion then resident therein.
(5) Any principal so notified may request to the president or chair
of the board of directors of the district, in writing and within ten
days after receiving notice, an opportunity to meet informally with the
board of directors in an executive session for the purpose of
requesting the board to reconsider the decision of the superintendent,
and shall be given such opportunity. The board, upon receipt of such
request, shall schedule the meeting for no later than the next
regularly scheduled meeting of the board, and shall give the principal
written notice at least three days before the meeting of the date,
time, and place of the meeting. At the meeting the principal shall be
given the opportunity to refute any evidence upon which the
determination was based and to make any argument in support of his or
her request for reconsideration. The principal and the board may
invite their respective legal counsel to be present and to participate
at the meeting. The board shall notify the principal in writing of its
final decision within ten days following its meeting with the
principal. No appeal to the courts shall lie from the final decision
of the board of directors to transfer a principal to a subordinate
certificated position.
(6) This section provides the exclusive means for transferring a
certificated employee first employed by a school district under this
section as a principal after June 10, 2010, to a subordinate
certificated position at the expiration of the term of his or her
employment contract.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.310.250 and 2009 c 57 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
No certificated employee of an educational service district shall
be employed as such except by written contract, which shall be in
conformity with the laws of this state. Every such contract shall be
made in duplicate, one copy of which shall be retained by the
educational service district superintendent and the other shall be
delivered to the employee.
Every educational service district superintendent or board
determining that there is probable cause or causes that the employment
contract of a certificated employee thereof is not to be renewed for
the next ensuing term shall be notified in writing on or before May
15th preceding the commencement of such term of that determination or
((if the omnibus appropriations act has not passed the legislature by
May 15th, then notification shall be no later than June 15th)) thirty
days after the omnibus appropriations act passes the legislature,
whichever occurs later, which notification shall specify the cause or
causes for nonrenewal of contract. Such notice shall be served upon
that employee personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by
leaving a copy of the notice at the house of his or her usual abode
with some person of suitable age and discretion then resident therein.
The procedure and standards for the review of the decision of the
hearing officer, superintendent or board and appeal therefrom shall be
as prescribed for nonrenewal cases of teachers in RCW 28A.405.210,
28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380, and 28A.645.010. Appeals may be filed
in the superior court of any county in the educational service
district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2 through 6 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---