BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Architectural paints are a solid waste issue. Despite local
government moderate-risk waste and other waste collection programs,
architectural paint may still present environmental and health and
safety risks, especially to workers in the solid waste industry.
During waste collection and processing, wet paint can create spills and
splashes and oil paint and aerosol containers may rupture, releasing
fumes that are hazardous to workers, and the remaining liquids
contribute to leachate problems in landfills. Many local governments
provide collection sites or events for latex paint in order to provide
their residents with reasonable disposal options and to keep latex
paint out of the solid waste stream. Drying latex for disposal is
difficult for many residents and wastes resources that might otherwise
be reused or recycled. Local government special and moderate-risk
waste collection programs are heavily impacted by the cost of managing
unwanted architectural paints and these costs decrease the available
funds to address other more hazardous and hard-to-handle materials.
(2) Nationally, an estimated average of ten percent of
architectural paint purchased becomes leftover paint. Current programs
only collect a fraction of the potential leftover unwanted paint for
proper reuse, recycling, or disposal. There is not a comprehensive
statewide end-of-life management plan for architectural paint,
resulting in significant missed opportunities to reduce, reuse, and
recycle paint.
(3)(a) It is in the best interest of Washington for paint
manufacturers to assume responsibility for development and
implementation of a cost-effective paint stewardship program that will:
(i) Develop and implement strategies to reduce the generation of
postconsumer paint; (ii) promote the reuse of postconsumer paint; and
(iii) collect, transport, and process postconsumer paint for end-of-life management, including reuse, recycling, energy recovery, and
disposal.
(b) The paint stewardship program will follow the waste management
hierarchy for managing and reducing leftover paint in the order as
follows: Reduce consumer generation of leftover paint; reuse; recycle;
provide for energy recovery; and disposal. Requiring paint
manufacturers to assume responsibility for the collection, recycling,
reuse, transportation, and disposal of postconsumer paint will provide
more opportunities for consumers to properly manage their leftover
paint, provide fiscal relief for local governments in managing
postconsumer paint, keep paint out of the waste stream, and conserve
natural resources.
(4) This chapter creates an architectural paint recovery program
that is enforced by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Architectural paint" means interior and exterior architectural
coatings, sold in containers of five gallons or less for commercial or
homeowner use. "Architectural paint" does not include industrial,
original equipment, or specialty coatings.
(2) "Architectural paint stewardship assessment" means the amount
added to the purchase price of architectural paint sold in this state
necessary to cover the cost of collecting, transporting, and processing
the postconsumer architectural paint managed through a statewide
architectural paint stewardship program.
(3) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(4) "Distributor" means a person that has a contractual
relationship with one or more manufacturers to market and sell
architectural paint to retailers in Washington.
(5) "Energy recovery" means the recovery of energy in a useable
form from mass burning or refuse-derived fuel incineration, pyrolysis,
or any other means of using the heat of combustion of solid waste that
involves high temperature (above twelve hundred degrees Fahrenheit)
processing.
(6) "Environmentally sound management practices" means policies to
be implemented by a producer or a stewardship organization to ensure
compliance with all applicable laws and rules and also addresses issues
such as adequate recordkeeping, tracking and documenting the fate of
materials within the state and beyond, and adequate environmental
liability coverage for professional services and for the operations of
the contractors working on behalf of the producer organization.
(7) "Person" means any individual, business, manufacturer,
transporter, collector, processor, retailer, charity, nonprofit
organization, or government agency.
(8) "Postconsumer paint" means architectural paint not used and no
longer wanted by a purchaser.
(9) "Producer" means a manufacturer of architectural paint that is
sold, offered for sale, or distributed in Washington under the
producer's own name or brand.
(10) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing waste
materials into usable or marketable materials for use other than
landfill disposal or incineration. Recycling does not include
collection, compacting, repackaging, and sorting for the purpose of
transport.
(11) "Retailer" means any person who offers architectural paint for
sale at retail in Washington.
(12) "Reuse" means any operation by which an architectural paint
product changes ownership and is used for the same purpose for which it
was originally purchased.
(13) "Sell" or "sale" means any transfer of title for
consideration, including remote sales conducted through sales outlets,
catalogues, or the internet or any other similar electronic means.
(14) "Stewardship organization" means a corporation, nonprofit
organization, or other legal entity created by a producer or group of
producers to implement the paint stewardship program required under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A producer or a stewardship organization
representing producers shall submit a plan for the implementation of a
paint stewardship program to the department for approval by April 1,
2014. The plan must address the following:
(a) Provide producer or stewardship organization contact
information and a list of participating brands and producers under the
program.
(b)(i) Demonstrate sufficient funding for the architectural paint
stewardship program as described in the plan, including administrative,
operational, and capital cost. The plan must include a funding
mechanism whereby each architectural paint producer remits to the
stewardship organization payment of an architectural paint stewardship
assessment for each container of architectural paint the producer sells
in this state. The architectural paint stewardship assessment must be
added to the cost of all architectural paint sold to Washington
retailers and distributors, and each Washington retailer or distributor
shall add the assessment to the purchase price of all architectural
paint sold in this state. No fee may be charged at the time of
collection.
(ii) To ensure that the funding mechanism is equitable and
sustainable, a uniform architectural paint stewardship assessment must
be established for all architectural paint sold in the state. The
architectural paint stewardship assessment must be approved by the
director of the department as part of the plan and must be sufficient
to recover, but not exceed, the costs of the architectural paint
stewardship program. The plan must require any surplus funds generated
from the funding mechanism be put back into the program to reduce the
cost of the program, including the architectural paint stewardship
assessment.
(c) Describe how the program will provide for reasonably convenient
and available statewide collection of postconsumer paint in urban and
rural areas of the state, including island communities. The plan must
determine collection convenience based on population and distance to
permanent collection locations that are open to the public at a
frequency adequate to meet the needs of the area being served on an
ongoing basis. Special consideration must be made for providing
opportunities to island and geographically isolated populations, such
as providing collection events.
(i) The producer or stewardship organization shall utilize the
existing government-owned moderate risk waste infrastructure when
selecting collection points for postconsumer paint where cost-effective, reasonably feasible, and mutually agreeable.
(ii) A retailer may act as a voluntary collection point for
postconsumer paint where cost-effective, reasonably feasible, and
mutually agreeable.
(iii) The plan for the implementation of a paint stewardship
program must provide the collection site name, location, and hours of
operation of each site statewide accepting architectural paint under
the program.
(d) Establish goals to reduce the generation of postconsumer paint,
to promote the reuse of postconsumer paint, and for the proper end-of-life management of postconsumer paint based on current or historical
household hazardous waste program information, whichever provided the
highest level of service to Washington residents. The goals may be
revised by the manufacturer or stewardship organization based on the
information collected annually.
(e) Describe how postconsumer paint will be managed using
environmentally sound management practices and in the most economically
sound manner, including following the waste-management hierarchy of
source reduction, reuse, recycling, energy recovery, and disposal.
(f) Describe education and outreach efforts to promote the paint
stewardship program. The education and outreach efforts must include
effective strategies for reaching all sectors of the population. The
plan must describe how the paint stewardship program will evaluate the
effectiveness of its education and outreach efforts.
(2) By July 1, 2014, or three months after approval of the paint
stewardship program plan under subsection (1) of this section,
whichever occurs first, a producer of architectural paint sold at
retail, or a stewardship organization of which a producer is a member,
shall implement an approved paint stewardship program plan.
(3) A producer or a stewardship organization of which a producer is
a member shall promote a paint stewardship program and provide
consumers and retailers with educational and informational materials
describing collection opportunities for postconsumer paint statewide,
the architectural paint stewardship assessment used to finance the
program, and promotion of waste prevention, reuse, and recycling.
These materials may include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) Signage that is prominently displayed and easily visible to the
consumer.
(b) Written materials and templates of materials for reproduction
by retailers to be provided to the consumer at the time of purchase or
delivery, or both.
(c) Advertising or other promotional materials, or both, that
include references to the architectural paint stewardship program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department shall review a plan
required under section 3 of this act within one hundred twenty days of
receipt, and make a determination whether or not to approve the plan.
The department shall provide a letter of approval for the plan if the
plan provides for the establishment of a paint stewardship program that
meets the requirements of section 3 of this act. If a plan is
rejected, the department shall provide the reasons for rejecting the
plan to the producer or stewardship organization. The producer or
stewardship organization must submit a new plan within sixty days after
receipt of the letter of disapproval.
(2) When a plan required under section 3 of this act or an
amendment to an approved plan is submitted under this section, the
department shall make the proposed plan or amendment available for
public review and comment for at least fifteen days.
(3) The department shall enforce this chapter.
(a) The stewardship organization shall pay the department an annual
administrative fee pursuant to (b) of this subsection.
(b) The department shall impose fees in an amount that is
sufficient to cover the department's full costs of administering and
enforcing this chapter, including any program development costs or
regulatory costs incurred by the department prior to the submittal of
the stewardship plans required by section 3 of this act. Fee revenues
collected under this section may only be used to administer and enforce
this chapter.
(c) A civil penalty may be administratively assessed by the
department on any person who violates this chapter in an amount of up
to one thousand dollars per violation per day.
(d) A person who intentionally, knowingly, or negligently violates
this chapter may be administratively assessed a civil penalty by the
department of up to ten thousand dollars per violation per day.
(4) On July 1, 2014, or upon the date the first plan required under
section 3 of this act is approved, whichever date is earlier, the
department shall post on its web site a list of producers and brands
for which the department has approved a plan pursuant to section 3 of
this act. The department shall update the list of producers and brands
participating under an approved program plan at least once every six
months.
(5) A producer that is not listed on the department's web site
pursuant to this section, but demonstrates to the satisfaction of the
department that it is in compliance with this chapter, may request a
certification letter from the department stating that the producer is
in compliance. The producer who receives such a letter is deemed to be
in compliance with this chapter.
(6) A wholesaler or a retailer that distributes or sells
architectural paint shall monitor the department's internet site to
determine if the sale of a producer's architectural paint is in
compliance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A producer or retailer may not sell or offer
for sale to any person in Washington architectural paint unless the
producer of a paint brand or a stewardship organization of which the
producer is a member is implementing an approved paint stewardship
program plan as required by section 3 of this act. A retailer is in
compliance with the requirements of this section if, on the date the
architectural paint was ordered from the producer or its agent, the
producer of the paint is listed on the department's web site as a
producer implementing an approved paint stewardship program plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A producer or stewardship organization that
manages a paint stewardship program pursuant to this chapter is granted
immunity from state laws relating to antitrust, restraint of trade,
unfair trade practices, and other regulation of trade and commerce for
the limited purpose of establishing and operating a paint stewardship
program. The activities of a stewardship organization that comply with
the provisions of this chapter may not be considered to be in restraint
of trade, a conspiracy, or a combination thereof, nor any other
unlawful activity in violation of any provision of Title 9 or 9A RCW or
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) By October 1, 2015, or fifteen months
after an approved plan required under section 3 of this act is
implemented, whichever occurs first, and annually thereafter, a
producer or a stewardship organization of which the producer is a
member shall submit to the department a report describing the paint
stewardship program that the producer or stewardship organization is
implementing. The report must include all of the following:
(a) A description of the methods the producer or stewardship
organization used to reduce, reuse, collect, transport, recycle, and
process postconsumer paint statewide;
(b) The volume by product type of postconsumer paint collected by
the producer or stewardship organization in the preceding year in
Washington;
(c) The total volume of postconsumer paint collected by the
producer or stewardship organization in Washington by method of
disposition, including reuse, recycling, energy recovery, and disposal;
(d) The total volume of architectural paint sold in Washington
during the preceding year either by producer or by producers
participating in the stewardship organization;
(e) An independent financial audit of the paint stewardship program
implemented by the producer or the stewardship organization;
(f) The total cost of implementing the architectural paint
stewardship program;
(g) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the product stewardship
program, and anticipated steps, if needed, to improve performance
throughout the state; and
(h) Samples of the educational materials that the producer or
stewardship organization provided to consumers of architectural paint
during the first year of the program and any changes to those materials
in subsequent years.
(2) All reports submitted to the department must be available to
the general public through the department's web site. Proprietary
information submitted to the department under this chapter is exempt
from public disclosure under RCW 42.56.270. The department may use and
disclose this information in summary or aggregated form that does not
directly or indirectly identify financial, production, or sales data of
an individual producer or product stewardship organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department may adopt rules as necessary
for the purpose of implementing, administering, and enforcing this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The paint product stewardship account is
created in the state treasury. All receipts received by the department
from producers and paint stewardship organizations under this chapter
must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used by
the department only for administering and implementing product
stewardship programs under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) This chapter is void if a federal law,
or a combination of federal laws, take effect establishing a national
program for the collection and recycling of architectural paints that
substantially meets the intent of this chapter, including the creation
of a funding mechanism for collection, transportation, recycling, and
proper disposal of all architectural paints in the United States.
(2) Upon the establishment of a federal law or laws under
subsection (1) of this section, the department must provide written
notification to the secretary of the senate, chief clerk of the house
of representatives, and the office of the code reviser.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Nothing in this chapter changes or limits
the authority of the Washington utilities and transportation commission
to regulate collection of solid waste, including curbside collection of
residential recyclable materials, nor does this chapter change or limit
the authority of a city or town to provide the service itself or by
contract under RCW 81.77.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The decisions of the department in
enforcing this chapter are appealable to the pollution control hearings
board under RCW 43.21B.110.

Sec. 13 RCW 42.56.270 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and
43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and
financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked
social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant
to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes
with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
commerce:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce pursuant to RCW
43.330.050(8); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce or the office of the
governor in connection with the siting, recruitment, expansion,
retention, or relocation of that person's business and until a siting
decision is made, identifying information of any person supplying
information under this subsection and the locations being considered
for siting, relocation, or expansion of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of commerce based on
information as described in (a)(i) of this subsection, any work product
is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of commerce from a person connected with siting,
recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's
business, information described in (a)(ii) of this subsection will be
available to the public under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information;
(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to
the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or
19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit;
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information;
(19) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business;
(20) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained
by the University of Washington, other than information the university
is required to disclose under RCW 28B.20.150, when the information
relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such
information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in
loss to the University of Washington consolidated endowment fund or to
result in private loss to the providers of this information; ((and))
(21) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by innovate Washington in
applications for, or delivery of, grants and loans under chapter 43.333
RCW, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably
be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this
information; and
(22) Proprietary information submitted by the department of ecology
under section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2010 c 210 s 7 and 2010 c 84 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW,
local health departments, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the parks and recreation
commission:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 76.09.170, 77.55.291, 78.44.250, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) A final decision by the department or director made under
chapter 183, Laws of 2009.
(d) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(f) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(g) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(h) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(i) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(j) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable
under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources'
appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).
(k) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of
public lands under RCW 76.06.180.
(l) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under
chapter 77.55 RCW.
(m) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are
reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.
(n) Decisions of a state agency that is an authorized public entity
under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or custody of a
vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that are
reviewable under RCW 79.100.120.
(o) Appeals of decisions of the department made under chapter 70.--
RCW (the new chapter created in section 14 of this act).
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and
90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(((e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.))
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 16 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2010 c 210 s 8 and 2010 c 84 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW,
local health departments, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the parks and recreation
commission:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 76.09.170, 77.55.291, 78.44.250, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(i) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable
under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources'
appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).
(j) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of
public lands under RCW 76.06.180.
(k) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under
chapter 77.55 RCW.
(l) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are
reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.
(m) Decisions of a state agency that is an authorized public entity
under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or custody of a
vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that are
reviewable under RCW 79.100.120.
(n) Appeals of decisions of the department made under chapter 70.--
RCW (the new chapter created in section 14 of this act).
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and
90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(((e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.))
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Section 15 of this act expires June 30,
2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Section 16 of this act takes effect June
30, 2019.

--- END ---