BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.50.050 and 2011 c 338 s 4 and 2011 c 333 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This section governs records relating to the commission of
juvenile offenses, including records relating to diversions.
(2) The official juvenile court file of any alleged or proven
juvenile offender shall be ((open to public inspection, unless sealed
pursuant to subsection (12) of this section)) confidential, except as
provided by RCW 13.50.010(8), unless:
(a) The juvenile has been charged by information with a serious
violent offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, in which case, the
official juvenile court file shall be open to the public; or
(b) The juvenile court has ordered that the official juvenile court
file be open to public inspection, either in its entirety, or in part,
as provided in subsection (6) of this section.
(3) Access to the confidential official juvenile court file of any
alleged or proven juvenile offender shall be limited to the court,
prosecuting attorney, the parties and their attorneys, and only as
provided in subsection (4) of this section, juvenile justice or care
agencies.
(4) A juvenile justice or care agency shall have access to the
confidential official juvenile court file only when an investigation or
case involving the juvenile in question is being pursued by the
juvenile justice or care agency or when the juvenile justice or care
agency is responsible for supervising the juvenile.
(5) The official juvenile court file of any alleged or proven
juvenile offender which is initially open to public inspection pursuant
to subsection (2)(a) of this section is confidential if the charge is
a finding of not guilty is entered, the charge is dismissed, or if the
charge is amended to an offense that is not a serious violent offense.
The official juvenile court file of any alleged or proven juvenile
offender shall become open to public inspection if amended upward to a
serious violent offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, from a lesser
offense that previously required it to be confidential. The official
juvenile court file of any alleged or proven juvenile offender,
containing multiple charges, one of which is a serious violent offense,
shall be open to public inspection in its entirety.
(6) Upon application of any interested party, after a hearing with
notice to all parties, the juvenile court may order that the
confidential official juvenile court file of any alleged or proven
juvenile offender shall be opened to the public in part or in its
entirety upon making written findings that:
(a) The proponent of opening the court file to public inspection
has made a showing that there are not identified compelling
circumstances which establish a need for continued confidentiality of
the juvenile court record;
(b) Anyone present when the motion is made had an opportunity to
address the motion to open the juvenile court file to public
inspection;
(c) The court has analyzed whether continued confidentiality would
be the least restrictive means available and effective in protecting
the interests of the juvenile which may be threatened by opening the
official juvenile court file to public inspection;
(d) The court has weighed the competing privacy interests of the
juvenile and the public's right to open court records, as they apply to
the specific court record; and
(e) The order of the court is no broader in its application or
duration than necessary to service its purpose.
(7) When weighing the competing privacy interests of the juvenile
and the public's right to open court records, the court shall consider,
but is not limited to considering, the following factors:
(a) The impact of the juvenile offense on any victim(s), any
victim(s)'s family, and to the community;
(b) Whether the current alleged or proven juvenile offense(s)
involved multiple victims or multiple incidents per victim;
(c) Whether the current alleged or proven juvenile offense involved
attempted or actual monetary loss greater than typical for the offense;
(d) Whether the current alleged or proven juvenile offense is a
violent offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(e) Whether the current alleged or proven juvenile offense involved
the use of a deadly weapon;
(f) Any prior criminal history of juvenile offenses;
(g) The age of the alleged or proven juvenile offender.
(((3))) (8) All records ((other than)) retained or produced, which
are not part of the official juvenile court file, are confidential and
may be released only as provided in this section, RCW 13.50.010,
13.40.215, and 4.24.550.
(((4))) (9) Except as otherwise provided in this section and RCW
13.50.010, records retained or produced by any juvenile justice or care
agency may be released to other participants in the juvenile justice or
care system only when an investigation or case involving the juvenile
in question is being pursued by the other participant or when that
other participant is assigned the responsibility for supervising the
juvenile.
(((5))) (10) Except as provided in RCW 4.24.550, information not in
an official juvenile court file concerning a juvenile or a juvenile's
family may be released to the public only when that information could
not reasonably be expected to identify the juvenile or the juvenile's
family.
(((6))) (11) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
the release, to the juvenile or his or her attorney, of law enforcement
and prosecuting attorneys' records pertaining to investigation,
diversion, and prosecution of juvenile offenses shall be governed by
the rules of discovery and other rules of law applicable in adult
criminal investigations and prosecutions.
(((7))) (12) Upon the decision to arrest or the arrest, law
enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may cooperate with schools in
releasing information to a school pertaining to the investigation,
diversion, and prosecution of a juvenile attending the school. Upon
the decision to arrest or the arrest, incident reports may be released
unless releasing the records would jeopardize the investigation or
prosecution or endanger witnesses. If release of incident reports
would jeopardize the investigation or prosecution or endanger
witnesses, law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may release
information to the maximum extent possible to assist schools in
protecting other students, staff, and school property.
(((8))) (13) The juvenile court and the prosecutor may set up and
maintain a central recordkeeping system which may receive information
on all alleged juvenile offenders against whom a complaint has been
filed pursuant to RCW 13.40.070 whether or not their cases are
currently pending before the court. The central recordkeeping system
may be computerized. If a complaint has been referred to a diversion
unit, the diversion unit shall promptly report to the juvenile court or
the prosecuting attorney when the juvenile has agreed to diversion. An
offense shall not be reported as criminal history in any central
recordkeeping system without notification by the diversion unit of the
date on which the offender agreed to diversion.
(((9))) (14) Upon request of the victim of a crime or the victim's
immediate family, the identity of an alleged or proven juvenile
offender alleged or found to have committed a crime against the victim
and the identity of the alleged or proven juvenile offender's parent,
guardian, or custodian and the circumstance of the alleged or proven
crime shall be released to the victim of the crime or the victim's
immediate family.
(((10))) (15) Subject to the rules of discovery applicable in adult
criminal prosecutions, the juvenile offense records of an adult
criminal defendant or witness in an adult criminal proceeding shall be
released upon request to prosecution and defense counsel after a charge
has actually been filed. The juvenile offense records of any adult
convicted of a crime and placed under the supervision of the adult
corrections system shall be released upon request to the adult
corrections system.
(((11))) (16) In any case in which an information has been filed
pursuant to RCW 13.40.100 or a complaint has been filed with the
prosecutor and referred for diversion pursuant to RCW 13.40.070, the
person the subject of the information or complaint may file a motion
with the court to have the court vacate its order and findings, if any,
and, subject to subsection (((23))) (28) of this section, order the
sealing of the official juvenile court file, the social file, and
records of the court and of any other agency in the case.
(((12))) (17)(a) The court shall not grant any motion to seal
records for class A offenses made pursuant to subsection (((11))) (16)
of this section that is filed on or after July 1, 1997, unless:
(i) Since the last date of release from confinement, including
full-time residential treatment, if any, or entry of disposition, the
person has spent five consecutive years in the community without
committing any offense or crime that subsequently results in an
adjudication or conviction;
(ii) No proceeding is pending against the moving party seeking the
conviction of a juvenile offense or a criminal offense;
(iii) No proceeding is pending seeking the formation of a diversion
agreement with that person;
(iv) The person is no longer required to register as a sex offender
under RCW 9A.44.130 or has been relieved of the duty to register under
RCW 9A.44.143 if the person was convicted of a sex offense;
(v) The person has not been convicted of rape in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, or indecent liberties that was actually
committed with forcible compulsion; and
(vi) Full restitution has been paid.
(b) The court shall not grant any motion to seal records for class
B, C, gross misdemeanor and misdemeanor offenses and diversions made
under subsection (((11))) (16) of this section unless:
(i) Since the date of last release from confinement, including
full-time residential treatment, if any, entry of disposition, or
completion of the diversion agreement, the person has spent two
consecutive years in the community without being convicted of any
offense or crime;
(ii) No proceeding is pending against the moving party seeking the
conviction of a juvenile offense or a criminal offense;
(iii) No proceeding is pending seeking the formation of a diversion
agreement with that person;
(iv) The person is no longer required to register as a sex offender
under RCW 9A.44.130 or has been relieved of the duty to register under
RCW 9A.44.143 if the person was convicted of a sex offense; and
(v) Full restitution has been paid.
(((13))) (18) The person making a motion pursuant to subsection
(((11))) (16) of this section shall give reasonable notice of the
motion to the prosecution and to any person or agency whose files are
sought to be sealed.
(((14))) (19)(a) If the court grants the motion to seal made
pursuant to subsection (((11))) (16) of this section, it shall, subject
to subsection (((23))) (28) of this section, order sealed the official
juvenile court file, the social file, and other records relating to the
case as are named in the order. Thereafter, the proceedings in the
case shall be treated as if they never occurred, and the subject of the
records may reply accordingly to any inquiry about the events, records
of which are sealed. Any agency shall reply to any inquiry concerning
confidential or sealed records that records are confidential, and no
information can be given about the existence or nonexistence of records
concerning an individual.
(b) In the event the subject of the juvenile records receives a
full and unconditional pardon, the proceedings in the matter upon which
the pardon has been granted shall be treated as if they never occurred,
and the subject of the records may reply accordingly to any inquiry
about the events upon which the pardon was received. Any agency shall
reply to any inquiry concerning the records pertaining to the events
for which the subject received a pardon that records are confidential,
and no information can be given about the existence or nonexistence of
records concerning an individual.
(((15))) (20) Inspection of the files and records included in the
order to seal may thereafter be permitted only by order of the court
upon motion made by the person who is the subject of the information or
complaint, except as otherwise provided in RCW 13.50.010(8) and
subsection (((23))) (28) of this section.
(((16))) (21) Any adjudication of a juvenile offense or a crime
subsequent to sealing has the effect of nullifying the sealing order.
Any charging of an adult felony subsequent to the sealing has the
effect of nullifying the sealing order for the purposes of chapter
9.94A RCW. The administrative office of the courts shall ensure that
the superior court judicial information system provides prosecutors
access to information on the existence of sealed juvenile records.
(((17))) (22)(a)(i) Subject to subsection (((23))) (28) of this
section, all records maintained by any court or law enforcement agency,
including the juvenile court, local law enforcement, the Washington
state patrol, and the prosecutor's office, shall be automatically
destroyed within ninety days of becoming eligible for destruction.
Juvenile records are eligible for destruction when:
(A) The person who is the subject of the information or complaint
is at least eighteen years of age;
(B) His or her criminal history consists entirely of one diversion
agreement or counsel and release entered on or after June 12, 2008;
(C) Two years have elapsed since completion of the agreement or
counsel and release;
(D) No proceeding is pending against the person seeking the
conviction of a criminal offense; and
(E) There is no restitution owing in the case.
(ii) No less than quarterly, the administrative office of the
courts shall provide a report to the juvenile courts of those
individuals whose records may be eligible for destruction. The
juvenile court shall verify eligibility and notify the Washington state
patrol and the appropriate local law enforcement agency and
prosecutor's office of the records to be destroyed. The requirement to
destroy records under this subsection is not dependent on a court
hearing or the issuance of a court order to destroy records.
(iii) The state and local governments and their officers and
employees are not liable for civil damages for the failure to destroy
records pursuant to this section.
(b) All records maintained by any court or law enforcement agency,
including the juvenile court, local law enforcement, the Washington
state patrol, and the prosecutor's office, shall be automatically
destroyed within thirty days of being notified by the governor's office
that the subject of those records received a full and unconditional
pardon by the governor.
(c) A person eighteen years of age or older whose criminal history
consists entirely of one diversion agreement or counsel and release
entered prior to June 12, 2008, may request that the court order the
records in his or her case destroyed. The request shall be granted,
subject to subsection (((23))) (28) of this section, if the court finds
that two years have elapsed since completion of the agreement or
counsel and release.
(d) A person twenty-three years of age or older whose criminal
history consists of only referrals for diversion may request that the
court order the records in those cases destroyed. The request shall be
granted, subject to subsection (((23))) (28) of this section, if the
court finds that all diversion agreements have been successfully
completed and no proceeding is pending against the person seeking the
conviction of a criminal offense.
(((18))) (23) If the court grants the motion to destroy records
made pursuant to subsection (((17))) (22)(c) or (d) of this section, it
shall, subject to subsection (((23))) (28) of this section, order the
official juvenile court file, the social file, and any other records
named in the order to be destroyed.
(((19))) (24) The person making the motion pursuant to subsection
(((17))) (22)(c) or (d) of this section shall give reasonable notice of
the motion to the prosecuting attorney and to any agency whose records
are sought to be destroyed.
(((20))) (25) Any juvenile to whom the provisions of this section
may apply shall be given written notice of his or her rights under this
section at the time of his or her disposition hearing or during the
diversion process.
(((21))) (26) Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent
a crime victim or a member of the victim's family from divulging the
identity of the alleged or proven juvenile offender or his or her
family when necessary in a civil proceeding.
(((22))) (27) Any juvenile justice or care agency may, subject to
the limitations in subsection (((23))) (28) of this section and (a) and
(b) of this subsection, develop procedures for the routine destruction
of records relating to juvenile offenses and diversions.
(a) Records may be routinely destroyed only when the person the
subject of the information or complaint has attained twenty-three years
of age or older or pursuant to subsection (((17))) (22)(a) of this
section.
(b) The court may not routinely destroy the official juvenile court
file or recordings or transcripts of any proceedings.
(((23))) (28) Except for subsection (((17))) (22)(b) of this
section, no identifying information held by the Washington state patrol
in accordance with chapter 43.43 RCW is subject to destruction or
sealing under this section. For the purposes of this subsection,
identifying information includes photographs, fingerprints, palmprints,
soleprints, toeprints, and any other data that identifies a person by
physical characteristics, name, birthdate or address, but does not
include information regarding criminal activity, arrest, charging,
diversion, conviction or other information about a person's treatment
by the criminal justice system or about the person's behavior.
(((24))) (29) Information identifying child victims under age
eighteen who are victims of sexual assaults by juvenile offenders is
confidential and not subject to release to the press or public without
the permission of the child victim or the child's legal guardian.
Identifying information includes the child victim's name, addresses,
location, photographs, and in cases in which the child victim is a
relative of the alleged perpetrator, identification of the relationship
between the child and the alleged perpetrator. Information identifying
a child victim of sexual assault may be released to law enforcement,
prosecutors, judges, defense attorneys, or private or governmental
agencies that provide services to the child victim of sexual assault.
(30) No confidential juvenile offense records maintained by any
court, law enforcement agency, or state agency, including the juvenile
court, local law enforcement, the Washington state patrol, and the
county prosecutor's offices, may be published or distributed. Nothing
in this section shall affect or prevent the use of a juvenile
offender's prior adjudication in later juvenile offender or adult
criminal proceedings.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.97.050 and 2005 c 421 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Adult conviction records may be disseminated without
restriction.
(2) No confidential juvenile offense records may be published or
distributed.
(3) Any criminal history record information which pertains to an
incident that occurred within the last twelve months for which a person
is currently being processed by the criminal justice system, including
the entire period of correctional supervision extending through final
discharge from parole, when applicable, may be disseminated without
restriction with the exception of a record being disseminated in
response to a request for a conviction record under RCW 43.43.832. A
request for a conviction record under RCW 43.43.832 shall not contain
information for a person who, within the last twelve months, is
currently being processed by the criminal justice system unless it
pertains to information relating to a crime against a person as defined
in RCW 9.94A.411.
(((3))) (4) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated by a criminal justice agency to
another criminal justice agency for any purpose associated with the
administration of criminal justice, or in connection with the
employment of the subject of the record by a criminal justice or
juvenile justice agency. A criminal justice agency may respond to any
inquiry from another criminal justice agency without any obligation to
ascertain the purpose for which the information is to be used by the
agency making the inquiry.
(((4))) (5) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated by a criminal justice agency to
implement a statute, ordinance, executive order, or a court rule,
decision, or order which expressly refers to records of arrest,
charges, or allegations of criminal conduct or other nonconviction data
and authorizes or directs that it be available or accessible for a
specific purpose.
(((5))) (6) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated to individuals and agencies
pursuant to a contract with a criminal justice agency to provide
services related to the administration of criminal justice. Such
contract must specifically authorize access to criminal history record
information, but need not specifically state that access to
nonconviction data is included. The agreement must limit the use of
the criminal history record information to stated purposes and insure
the confidentiality and security of the information consistent with
state law and any applicable federal statutes and regulations.
(((6))) (7) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated to individuals and agencies for
the express purpose of research, evaluative, or statistical activities
pursuant to an agreement with a criminal justice agency. Such
agreement must authorize the access to nonconviction data, limit the
use of that information which identifies specific individuals to
research, evaluative, or statistical purposes, and contain provisions
giving notice to the person or organization to which the records are
disseminated that the use of information obtained therefrom and further
dissemination of such information are subject to the provisions of this
chapter and applicable federal statutes and regulations, which shall be
cited with express reference to the penalties provided for a violation
thereof.
(((7))) (8) Every criminal justice agency that maintains and
disseminates criminal history record information must maintain
information pertaining to every dissemination of criminal history
record information except a dissemination to the effect that the agency
has no record concerning an individual. Information pertaining to
disseminations shall include:
(a) An indication of to whom (agency or person) criminal history
record information was disseminated;
(b) The date on which the information was disseminated;
(c) The individual to whom the information relates; and
(d) A brief description of the information disseminated.
The information pertaining to dissemination required to be
maintained shall be retained for a period of not less than one year.
(((8))) (9) In addition to the other provisions in this section
allowing dissemination of criminal history record information, RCW
4.24.550 governs dissemination of information concerning offenders who
commit sex offenses as defined by RCW 9.94A.030. Criminal justice
agencies, their employees, and officials shall be immune from civil
liability for dissemination on criminal history record information
concerning sex offenders as provided in RCW 4.24.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The provisions of section 1 of this act
on April 1, 2013, shall apply prospectively and shall also apply
retroactively to all existing official juvenile court files of any
alleged or proven juvenile offender.
(2) Except for juvenile court files that have been sealed pursuant
to RCW 13.50.050, any existing official juvenile court file containing
a serious violent offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, charged prior
to April 1, 2013, shall, upon April 1, 2013, be public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 2 of this act take effect
April 1, 2013.

--- END ---