BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) On March 23, 2010, President Barack Obama signed into law the
patient protection and affordable care act and the health care and
education reconciliation act of 2010, collectively known as the
affordable care act;
(b) The affordable care act prohibits states from dropping or
restricting medicaid and the children's health insurance program
coverage for groups covered on March 23, 2010; and
(c) The state currently has a one and one-half billion dollar
deficit projected for the remainder of the 2011-2013 budget, which will
result in further significant reductions to health care and human
service programs, including medicaid.
(2) The legislature intends to require the department to request a
waiver from the United States department of health and human services
to provide state lawmakers with the flexibility needed to modify our
state's medicaid and children's health insurance programs to meet the
new economic realities that we are facing, and to prioritize services
and programs for the most vulnerable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall apply, within ten business days of the
effective date of this section, to the secretary of the United States
department of health and human services for a waiver from the
maintenance of eligibility requirements of section 1902(gg) (1) and (2)
and any other section of the social security act. The waiver is to be
effective through January 1, 2014, and shall seek approval to reduce
eligibility requirements for select Titles XIX and XXI populations that
were previously optional under Titles XIX and XXI of the social
security act before passage of the federal patient protection and
affordable care act, P.L. 111-48, as amended by the health care and
education reconciliation act of 2010, P.L. 111-152.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---