BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.22.070 and 2011 c 281 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After conducting a hearing, the director may deny, suspend, or
revoke any permit provided for in this chapter if it is determined that
a permittee has committed any of the following acts:
(a) Refused, neglected, or failed to comply with the provisions of
this chapter, any rules adopted to administer this chapter, or any
lawful order of the director;
(b) Refused, neglected, or failed to keep and maintain records
required by this chapter, or to make the records available when
requested pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
(c) Consistent with RCW 69.22.060, refused the director access to
the permitted area of a domestic residence housing a cottage food
operation for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this
chapter; or
(d) Consistent with RCW 69.22.060, refused the department access to
any records required to be kept under the provisions of this chapter((;
or
(e) Exceeded the annual income limits provided in RCW 69.22.050)).
(2) The director may summarily suspend a permit issued under this
chapter if the director finds that a cottage food operation is
operating under conditions that constitute an immediate danger to
public health or if the director is denied access to the permitted area
of a domestic residence housing a cottage food operation and records
where the access was sought for the purposes of enforcing or
administering this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 69.22.050 (Annual gross sales--Department to determine annual amount) and 2011 c 281 s 5 are each
repealed.

--- END ---