BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that property owners
are finding increasing restrictions placed on their property in the
name of the public good without just compensation. Many government
agencies expect the property owner to pay for and accept the burdens
placed on them by government statutes, ordinances, regulations,
policies, and permitting requirements that provide a benefit to someone
other than the property owner at the property owner's expense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Government authorities must provide just compensation to
property owners whenever land use ordinances, regulations, or policies
adopted pursuant to requirements in this chapter or as part of a land
use permitting decision require the property owner to:
(a) Place any form of signage on their property related to
provisions in this chapter or ordinances adopted to comply with this
chapter or associated regulations;
(b) Pay for and place fencing around critical areas, open space,
habitat areas, riparian areas, or other property features;
(c) Record restrictive covenants, land use designations, or change
any legal lot description on the property;
(d) Restore vegetation in a location where no vegetation existed
during the time the property owner owned the property or vegetation
degraded through natural causes;
(e) Make expenditures in furtherance of protecting the function and
values of wetlands;
(f) Make any expenditure in furtherance of protecting the function
and values of riparian areas; or
(g) Grant or set aside easements for public access on the property.
(2) Unless under the authority of a specific statutory requirement,
a state agency may not adopt a rule or policy that results in any
governmental authority being required to provide just compensation
under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70B.030 and 1995 c 347 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Fundamental land use planning choices made in adopted
comprehensive plans and development regulations shall serve as the
foundation for project review. The review of a proposed project's
consistency with applicable development regulations, or in the absence
of applicable regulations the adopted comprehensive plan, under RCW
36.70B.040 shall incorporate the determinations under this section.
(2) During project review, a local government or any subsequent
reviewing body shall determine whether the items listed in this
subsection are defined in the development regulations applicable to the
proposed project or, in the absence of applicable regulations the
adopted comprehensive plan. At a minimum, such applicable regulations
or plans shall be determinative of the:
(a) Type of land use permitted at the site, including uses that may
be allowed under certain circumstances, such as planned unit
developments and conditional and special uses, if the criteria for
their approval have been satisfied;
(b) Density of residential development in urban growth areas; and
(c) Availability and adequacy of public facilities identified in
the comprehensive plan, if the plan or development regulations provide
for funding of these facilities as required by chapter 36.70A RCW.
(3) During project review, the local government or any subsequent
reviewing body shall not reexamine alternatives to or hear appeals on
the items identified in subsection (2) of this section, except for
issues of code interpretation. As part of its project review process,
a local government shall provide a procedure for obtaining a code
interpretation as provided in RCW 36.70B.110.
(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 43.21C.240, a local government may determine
that the requirements for environmental analysis and mitigation
measures in development regulations and other applicable laws provide
adequate mitigation for some or all of the project's specific adverse
environmental impacts to which the requirements apply.
(b) Local governments may not require without just compensation
that property owners: (i) Place any form of signage on their property;
(ii) pay for and place fencing around critical areas, open space,
habitat areas, or other government designated property attributes;
(iii) record restrictive covenants, land use designations, or change
any legal lot description on the property; (iv) restore vegetation in
locations where no vegetation existed during the time the property
owner owned the land or the vegetation degraded due to natural causes;
(v) make any expenditure in furtherance of protective measures for the
function and values of wetlands or riparian areas; or (vi) grant or set
aside easements for public access on the property.
(5) Except under subsection (4)(b) of this section, nothing in this
section limits the authority of a permitting agency to approve,
condition, or deny a project as provided in its development regulations
adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW and in its policies adopted under RCW
43.21C.060. Project review shall be used to identify specific project
design and conditions relating to the character of development, such as
the details of site plans, curb cuts, drainage swales, transportation
demand management, the payment of impact fees, or other measures to
mitigate a proposal's probable adverse environmental impacts, if
applicable.
(6) Subsections (1) through (4) of this section apply only to local
governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040.

--- END ---