BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.58.270 and 2010 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a metropolitan municipal corporation shall be authorized to
perform the function of metropolitan transportation with a commission
form of management, a metropolitan transit commission shall be formed
prior to the effective date of the assumption of such function. Except
as provided in this section, the metropolitan transit commission shall
exercise all powers of the metropolitan municipal corporation with
respect to metropolitan transportation facilities, including but not
limited to the power to construct, acquire, maintain, operate, extend,
alter, repair, control and manage a local public transportation system
within and without the metropolitan area, to establish new passenger
transportation services and to alter, curtail, or abolish any services
as the commission may deem desirable and to fix tolls and fares.
(2) The comprehensive plan for public transportation service and
any amendments thereof shall be adopted by the metropolitan council and
the metropolitan transit commission shall provide transportation
facilities and service consistent with such plan. The metropolitan
transit commission shall authorize expenditures for transportation
purposes within the budget adopted by the metropolitan council. Tolls
and fares may be fixed or altered by the commission only after approval
thereof by the metropolitan council. Bonds of the metropolitan
municipal corporation for public transportation purposes shall be
issued by the metropolitan council as provided in this chapter.
(3) The metropolitan transit commission shall consist of seven
members. Six of such members shall be appointed by the metropolitan
council and the seventh member shall be the chair of the metropolitan
council who shall be ex officio the chair of the metropolitan transit
commission. Three of the six appointed members of the commission shall
be residents of the central city and three shall be residents of the
metropolitan area outside of the central city. The three central city
members of the first metropolitan transit commission shall be selected
from the existing transit commission of the central city, if there be
a transit commission in such city. The terms of first appointees shall
be for one, two, three, four, five and six years, respectively.
Thereafter, commissioners shall serve for a term of four years.
Compensation of transit commissioners shall be determined by the
metropolitan council.
(4) There is one nonvoting member of the metropolitan transit
commission. The nonvoting member is recommended by the labor
organization representing the public transportation employees within
the local public transportation system. If the public transportation
employees are represented by more than one labor organization, all such
labor organizations shall select the nonvoting member by majority vote.
The nonvoting member is appointed for a term of four years. The
nonvoting member shall comply with all governing bylaws and policies of
the commission. The chair or cochairs of the commission shall exclude
the nonvoting member from attending any executive session held for the
purpose of discussing contract negotiations with labor organizations((.
The chair or cochairs may exclude the nonvoting member from attending
any other executive session)), personnel matters, potential litigation,
litigation, or issues that present a conflict of interest, but may not
exclude the nonvoting member from attending executive sessions
addressing other matters or from attending commission subcommittees and
work groups.
(5) The requirement to create a metropolitan transit commission
shall not apply to a county that has assumed the rights, powers,
functions, and obligations of the metropolitan municipal corporation
under chapter 36.56 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.57.030 and 2010 c 278 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every county which undertakes the transportation function pursuant
to RCW 36.57.020 shall create by resolution of the county legislative
body a county transportation authority which shall be composed as
follows:
(1) The elected officials of the county legislative body, not to
exceed three such elected officials;
(2) The mayor of the most populous city within the county;
(3) The mayor of a city with a population less than five thousand,
to be selected by the mayors of all such cities within the county;
(4) The mayor of a city with a population greater than five
thousand, excluding the most populous city, to be selected by the
mayors of all such cities within the county: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That
if there is no city with a population greater than five thousand,
excluding the most populous city, then the sixth member who shall be an
elected official, shall be selected by the other two mayors selected
pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section; and
(5) An individual recommended by the labor organization
representing the public transportation employees within the county
transportation authority. If the public transportation employees are
represented by more than one labor organization, all such labor
organizations shall select the nonvoting member by majority vote. The
nonvoting member shall comply with all governing bylaws and policies of
the authority. The chair or cochairs of the county transportation
authority shall exclude the nonvoting member from attending any
executive session held for the purpose of discussing contract
negotiations with labor organizations((. The chair or cochairs may
exclude the nonvoting member from attending any other executive
session)), personnel matters, potential litigation, litigation, or
issues that present a conflict of interest, but may not exclude the
nonvoting member from attending executive sessions addressing other
matters or from attending authority subcommittees and work groups.
The members of the authority shall be selected within sixty days
after the date of the resolution creating such authority.
Any member of the authority who is a mayor or an elected official
selected pursuant to subsection (4) of this section and whose office is
not a full time position shall receive one hundred dollars for each day
attending official meetings of the authority.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.57A.050 and 2010 c 278 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within sixty days of the establishment of the boundaries of the
public transportation benefit area the members of the county
legislative authority and the elected representative of each city
within the area shall provide for the selection of the governing body
of such area, the public transportation benefit area authority, which
shall consist of elected officials selected by and serving at the
pleasure of the governing bodies of component cities within the area
and the county legislative authority of each county within the area.
If at the time a public transportation benefit area authority assumes
the public transportation functions previously provided under the
Interlocal Cooperation Act (chapter 39.34 RCW) there are citizen
positions on the governing board of the transit system, those positions
may be retained as positions on the governing board of the public
transportation benefit area authority.
(2) Within such sixty-day period, any city may by resolution of its
legislative body withdraw from participation in the public
transportation benefit area. The county legislative authority and each
city remaining in the public transportation benefit area may disapprove
and prevent the establishment of any governing body of a public
transportation benefit area if the composition thereof does not meet
its approval.
(3) In no case shall the governing body of a single county public
transportation benefit area be greater than nine voting members and in
the case of a multicounty area, fifteen voting members. Those cities
within the transportation benefit area and excluded from direct
membership on the authority are hereby authorized to designate a member
of the authority who shall be entitled to represent the interests of
such city which is excluded from direct membership on the authority.
The legislative body of such city shall notify the authority as to the
determination of its authorized representative on the authority.
(4) There is one nonvoting member of the public transportation
benefit area authority. The nonvoting member is recommended by the
labor organization representing the public transportation employees
within the local public transportation system. If the public
transportation employees are represented by more than one labor
organization, all such labor organizations shall select the nonvoting
member by majority vote. The nonvoting member shall comply with all
governing bylaws and policies of the authority. The chair or cochairs
of the authority shall exclude the nonvoting member from attending any
executive session held for the purpose of discussing contract
negotiations with labor organizations((. The chair or cochairs may
exclude the nonvoting member from attending any other executive
session)), personnel matters, potential litigation, litigation, or
issues that present a conflict of interest, but may not exclude the
nonvoting member from attending executive sessions addressing other
matters or from attending authority subcommittees and work groups. The
requirement that a nonvoting member be appointed to the governing body
of a public transportation benefit area authority does not apply to an
authority that has no employees represented by a labor union.
(5) Each member of the authority is eligible to be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and to
receive compensation, as set by the authority, in an amount not to
exceed forty-four dollars for each day during which the member attends
official meetings of the authority or performs prescribed duties
approved by the chair of the authority. Except that the authority may,
by resolution, increase the payment of per diem compensation to each
member from forty-four dollars up to ninety dollars per day or portion
of a day for actual attendance at board meetings or for performance of
other official services or duties on behalf of the authority. In no
event may a member be compensated in any year for more than seventy-five days, except the chair who may be paid compensation for not more
than one hundred days: PROVIDED, That compensation shall not be paid
to an elected official or employee of federal, state, or local
government who is receiving regular full-time compensation from such
government for attending meetings and performing prescribed duties of
the authority.
(6) The dollar thresholds established in this section must be
adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five
years, beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price
index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
(7) A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or
duties while representing more than one of his or her districts.
However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation
if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

--- END ---