BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.285 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that thermal energy resources are an
important part of the state's energy strategy, and that renewable
thermal energy is a useful alternative to fossil-fueled thermal energy.
(2) Eligible renewable energy resources do not have to be converted
to electricity for purposes of receiving renewable energy credits. The
rules must specify the quantity of energy derived from an eligible
renewable energy resource that is equal to one megawatt hour of
electricity, including that one megawatt hour equals 3,412,142 British
thermal units.
(3) Renewable energy credits that have been converted from British
thermal units into electricity units may not be used to meet renewable
energy targets set forth under RCW 19.285.040.

--- END ---