BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a theater license to sell beer, including strong
beer, or wine, or both, at retail for consumption in a single theater
room on theater premises. Only one theater license is available per
theater premises, regardless of the number of theater rooms on the
premises. The annual fee for such license shall be two hundred dollars
for the beer license, two hundred dollars for the wine license, or four
hundred dollars for a combination beer and wine license.
(2) If the theater premises are ever to be frequented by minors, a
minor control plan must be submitted to the board at the time of
application. The minor control plan must be approved by the board, and
be prominently posted on the premises, prior to minors being allowed.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "minor control plan" means a
written, dated, and signed plan submitted to the board by an applicant
or licensee for the entire theater premises, or a room or area therein,
that shows where and when minors are permitted and the control measures
used to prevent minors from obtaining alcohol, prohibit minors when
drinking alcohol predominates, and minimize minors' exposure to a
drinking environment.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "theater" means a place where
motion pictures or live musical, dance, artistic, dramatic, literary,
or educational performances are shown.
(5) The board shall adopt rules regarding minor control plans and
necessary control measures to prevent minors from obtaining alcohol,
prohibit minors when drinking alcohol predominates, and minimize
minors' exposure to a drinking environment.

--- END ---