BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.68.010 and 2011 c 336 s 386 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of bribery if:
(a) With the intent to secure a particular result in a particular
matter involving the exercise of the public servant's vote, opinion,
judgment, exercise of discretion, or other action in his or her
official capacity, he or she offers, confers, or agrees to confer any
pecuniary benefit, including a campaign contribution, upon such public
servant; or
(b) Being a public servant, he or she requests, accepts, or agrees
to accept any pecuniary benefit, including a campaign contribution,
pursuant to an agreement or understanding that his or her vote,
opinion, judgment, exercise of discretion, or other action as a public
servant will be used to secure or attempt to secure a particular result
in a particular matter.
(2) It is no defense to a prosecution under this section that the
public servant sought to be influenced was not qualified to act in the
desired way, whether because he or she had not yet assumed office,
lacked jurisdiction, or for any other reason.
(3) Bribery is a class B felony.

--- END ---