BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.015 and 2009 c 362 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agricultural structure" means a structure designed and
constructed to house farm implements, hay, grain, poultry, livestock,
or other horticultural products. This structure may not be a place of
human habitation or a place of employment where agricultural products
are processed, treated, or packaged, nor may it be a place used by the
public((;)).
(2) "City" means a city or town((;)).
(3) "Multifamily residential building" means common wall
residential buildings that consist of four or fewer units, that do not
exceed two stories in height, that are less than five thousand square
feet in area, and that have a one-hour fire-resistive occupancy
separation between units((; and)).
(4) "Ski facilities" means an operation open to the public that
holds itself out as the purveyor of alpine or cross-country skiing
opportunities and is required to abide by the signage requirements of
RCW 79A.45.010.
(5) "Temporary growing structure" means a structure that has the
sides and roof covered with polyethylene, polyvinyl, or similar
flexible synthetic material and is used to provide plants with either
frost protection or increased heat retention.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27.097 and 2010 c 271 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Each applicant for a building permit of a building
necessitating potable water shall provide evidence of an adequate water
supply for the intended use of the building. Evidence may be in the
form of:
(i) A water right permit from the department of ecology((,)).
However, an application for a water right is not sufficient proof of an
adequate water supply;
(ii) A letter from an approved water purveyor stating the ability
to provide water((,)); or
(iii) Another form sufficient to verify the existence of an
adequate water supply.
(b) A ski facility is considered to have satisfied the requirements
of this section if the ski facility provides evidence that it has:
(i) A water tank on its premises, or has an agreement to store
water in a water tank reasonably near to its premises, that has a
storage capacity large enough to serve the anticipated daily potable
water needs of the ski facility operations, guests, and employees; and
(ii) Has an agreement with an approved water purveyor to provide
sufficient water to meet the needs of the ski facility regardless of
whether the ski facility or the water purveyor plan to fill the water
tank through a direct connection to a water main, through a direct
connection to a well, or by manually transporting unpressurized water
by vehicle from a water main or well to the water tank located at or
near the ski facility.
(c) In addition to other authorities, the county or city may impose
conditions on building permits requiring connection to an existing
public water system where the existing system is willing and able to
provide safe and reliable potable water to the applicant with
reasonable economy and efficiency. ((An application for a water right
shall not be sufficient proof of an adequate water supply.))
(2) Within counties not required or not choosing to plan pursuant
to RCW 36.70A.040, the county and the state may mutually determine
those areas in the county in which the requirements of subsection (1)
of this section shall not apply. The departments of health and ecology
shall coordinate on the implementation of this section. Should the
county and the state fail to mutually determine those areas to be
designated pursuant to this subsection, the county may petition the
department of ((general administration)) enterprise services to mediate
or, if necessary, make the determination.
(3) Buildings that do not need potable water facilities are exempt
from the provisions of this section. The department of ecology, after
consultation with local governments, may adopt rules to implement this
section, which may recognize differences between high-growth and low-growth counties.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.27.040 and 1990 c 2 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for the potable water requirements for ski facilities as
provided in RCW 19.27.097, the governing body of each county or city is
authorized to amend the state building code as it applies within the
jurisdiction of the county or city. The minimum performance standards
of the codes and the objectives enumerated in RCW 19.27.020 shall not
be diminished by any county or city amendments.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall authorize any modifications of
the requirements of chapter 70.92 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.119A
RCW to read as follows:
A ski facility that meets the potable water requirements set forth
in RCW 19.27.040 must be deemed acceptable by the department in terms
of adequate water supply and may not be found in violation of this
chapter.

--- END ---