BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds a healthy budget
reserve helps provide stability to the state budget process by reducing
the likelihood of tax increases or severe budget cuts during economic
downturns and helps guard against excessive spending during good
economic times. The legislature further finds economists conclude a
healthy state government budget reserve includes at least five percent
of budgeted expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The governor may not propose, and the legislature may not
enact, any near general fund operating budget that does not set aside
at least five percent of near general fund budgeted expenditures as a
reserve amount.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Near general fund" means the state general fund, pension
funding stabilization account, the education legacy trust account
created in RCW 83.100.230, and the Washington opportunity pathways
account created in RCW 28B.76.526;
(b) "Operating budget" means the omnibus operating appropriations
act, or any combination of acts that make appropriations for operating
budget purposes; and
(c) "Reserve amount" means the unrestricted ending fund balance and
the budget stabilization account created in RCW 43.79.490.

--- END ---