BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that unfettered public
access to civil court records materially diminishes the ability of some
rental applicants to obtain rental housing in this state. This often
affects individuals who have sought orders of protection against
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, who have been unjustly
sued for eviction, or who have acquired civil court records that are
not predictive of their suitability for residential tenancies. These
records are commonly searched and compiled by tenant screening
companies and reported to residential landlords who frequently deny
housing to applicants about whom the records pertain, often with little
or no regard for the circumstances, merits, or dispositions of the
civil litigation. Such use of court records is contrary to the public
policy of this state. Such use of court records also does not
contribute to public oversight of the administration of justice, and
tends to undermine the legitimacy of our civil courts by systematically
deterring people from appearing in court, even when they have
meritorious claims or defenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any hearing concerning the proposed redaction or sealing of
court records, a person's ability to obtain rental housing in the
future constitutes a compelling privacy and safety concern that may be
weighed against the public's interest in access to the records where
the person for whom the court records are proposed to be redacted or
sealed is neither a homeowner nor an incarcerated person.
(2) In any hearing concerning the proposed redaction or sealing of
an unlawful detainer court record, a person's ability to obtain rental
housing in the future is presumed to outweigh the public's interest in
access to the record if:
(a) The court entered a final order in the unlawful detainer
action, and the person was not found guilty of unlawful detainer or
otherwise in unlawful possession of the disputed premises;
(b) The person occupied the real property as a tenant prior to a
foreclosure sale concerning the same premises, and the action was filed
less than ninety days after the foreclosure sale;
(c) Notwithstanding any other findings or orders in the unlawful
detainer action, the person prevailed on an affirmative defense,
counterclaim, or setoff asserted in the action, such as a claim for
breach of an implied warranty of habitability or breach of the covenant
of quiet enjoyment; or
(d) A judgment entered solely for nonpayment of rent was entered
but was fully cured, and the tenancy was reinstated pursuant to RCW
59.12.170, 59.12.190, or 59.18.410, or any other law.
(3) The presumption arising under subsection (2) of this section
may be rebutted by evidence establishing that the public's interest in
access to the court records outweighs the person's interest in
obtaining future rental housing, and that public access to the records
will not materially chill tenants with meritorious defenses from
appearing and defending in unlawful detainer actions.
(4) In any hearing concerning the proposed redaction or sealing of
a qualified victim protection record, a person's ability to obtain
rental housing in the future is presumed to outweigh the public's
interest in access to the record. For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Qualified victim protection records" means:
(i) Records or information concerning any judicial or
administrative proceeding in which the person about whom the records or
information pertains sought to obtain an order of protection from
domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking, harassment, or other
violent crime, including any petition or action for a protection order
under chapter 9A.46, 10.14, 10.99, 26.09, 26.26, or 26.50 RCW, or any
other law;
(ii) Records or information concerning any judicial or
administrative proceeding in which the person about whom the records or
information pertains exercised or attempted to exercise a right or
obtain a benefit available specifically or exclusively to victims of
violence, such as, but not limited to, the early termination of a
rental agreement under RCW 59.18.575;
(iii) Records or information indicating that the person about whom
the records or information pertains asserted that a claim or defense
was available to the person in a judicial or administrative proceeding
by reason of the person's status as a victim of violence, such as in a
proceeding under chapter 49.60 RCW; and
(iv) Any other records or information indicating that the person
about whom the records or information pertains is a victim of domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or is protected by a court
order.
(b) "Qualified victim protection records" does not include records
or information tending to indicate that the person about whom the
records or information pertains was a perpetrator of sexual assault,
harassment, or violent crime.
(5) The presumption arising under subsection (4) of this section
may be rebutted by evidence establishing that the public's interest in
access to the court records outweighs the person's interest in
obtaining future rental housing, that public access to the records will
not materially chill victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking from seeking orders of protection, and that access to the
records will not materially chill victims of domestic violence from
leaving abusive partners.
(6) A person for whose benefit an order to seal or redact court
records has been entered under this section, when engaged in an effort
to secure possession of residential rental property:
(a) Has no duty to disclose the action to any prospective landlord
or provider of any services in connection with housing on any written
or nonwritten application; and
(b) May not be penalized in any manner, or denied any right or
privilege, for making to any prospective landlord or provider of any
services in connection with housing a statement denying the existence
of the action or denying knowledge of its existence.
(7)(a) A tenant screening service shall not unreasonably make a
tenant screening report that contains information the court has sealed
or redacted under this section. Such a report is presumed to be
unreasonable if the screening service provided the report based on
records the screening service obtained from the court more than thirty
days before the date of the report.
(b) A screening service that violates this section is liable to the
prospective tenant in the amount of his or her actual damages and costs
of the action together with reasonable attorneys' fees as determined by
the court and, in the case of a willful violation, for a monetary
penalty in the amount of one thousand dollars. A report is presumed to
be willful if the report contains qualified victim protection records.
(8)(a) A person having notice of an order to seal or redact
unlawful detainer case records or qualified victim protection records
shall not, either directly or through any agent, disclose the existence
of the action, or other information expected to enable discovery of the
action, to any tenant screening service or prospective landlord seeking
information about the person for whose benefit the order was entered.
(b) The duty imposed under this subsection cannot be waived by the
person for whose benefit the order to seal was entered, and any
purported or attempted waiver, whether written or nonwritten, is void
and has no effect.
(c) A person who willfully violates this subsection is liable to
the person for whose benefit the order was entered in the amount of
such person's actual damages and costs of suit, together with
reasonable attorneys' fees as determined by the court, and a monetary
penalty of one thousand dollars for each willful violation. A
violation of this subsection is considered willful only if the person
committing the violation had actual knowledge of the order to seal or
redact.
(9) This section does not limit or impair the right of any party to
a civil action from pursuing, or of a court from ordering, the sealing
or redaction of court records under any other provision of law.

--- END ---