BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.310.040 and 2010 c 179 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Applications for licensure must be made to the department on
forms approved by the director. A license is valid for two years and
must be renewed on or before the expiration date. Applications for
original and renewal licenses must include a statement confirming that
the company must comply with applicable rules and that the company
understands the penalties for misconduct.
(2) The appropriate fees must accompany all applications for
original licensure and renewal.
(3) Each applicant shall file and maintain a surety bond, approved
by the director, executed by the applicant as obligor and by a surety
company authorized to do a surety business in this state as surety,
whose liability as the surety may not exceed in the aggregate the penal
sum of the bond. The penal sum of the bond must be a minimum of
((twenty-five)) one hundred thousand dollars. The bond must run to the
state of Washington as obligee for the use and benefit of the state and
of any person or persons who may have a cause of action against the
obligor under this chapter. The bond must be conditioned that the
obligor as licensee will faithfully conform to and abide by this
chapter and all the rules adopted under this chapter. The bond will
pay to the state and any person or persons having a cause of action
against the obligor all moneys that may become due and owing to the
state and those persons under and by virtue of this chapter.

--- END ---