BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 89.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to implement the authority granted under this chapter,
and as an alternative, but not in addition to the system provided by
RCW 89.08.400, a conservation district may provide for revenues by
fixing rates and charges payable by the landowner for the furnishing of
service to those served or receiving benefits, or to be served or to
receive benefits, from the district. In fixing rates and charges, the
conservation district may, in its discretion, consider:
(a) Services furnished or to be furnished;
(b) Benefits received or to be received;
(c) The character and use of land or its water runoff
characteristics;
(d) The nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW
24.03.490, of the land user;
(e) The income level of persons served or provided benefits under
this chapter, including senior citizens and disabled persons; and
(f) Any other matters which present a reasonable difference as a
ground for distinction.
(2) The maximum annual per acre rate or charge shall not exceed ten
cents per acre. The maximum annual per parcel rate may not exceed five
dollars, except that for counties with a population of more than one
million five hundred thousand persons, the maximum annual per parcel
rate may not exceed ten dollars.
(3) Public land, including lands owned or held by the state, shall
be subject to rates and charges to the same extent as privately owned
lands. The procedures provided in chapter 79.44 RCW shall be followed
if lands owned or held by the state are subject to the rates and
charges of a conservation district.
(4) Forest lands used solely for the planting, growing, or
harvesting of trees may be subject to rates and charges if such lands
are served by the activities of the conservation district. The per
acre rate or charge on these forest lands, however, may not exceed
one-tenth of the weighted average per acre rate or charge on all other
lands within the conservation district that are subject to rates and
charges. The calculation of the weighted average per acre shall be a
ratio calculated as follows: (a) The numerator shall be the total
amount of money estimated to be derived from the per acre special rates
and charges on the nonforest lands in the conservation district; and
(b) the denominator shall be the total number of nonforest land acres
in the conservation district that are served by the activities of the
conservation district and that are subject to the rates or charges of
the conservation district. No more than ten thousand acres of forest
lands that are both owned by the same person or entity and are located
in the same conservation district may be subject to the rates and
charges that are imposed for that conservation district in any year.
Per parcel charges may not be imposed on forest land parcels. However,
in lieu of a per parcel charge, a charge of up to three dollars per
forest landowner may be imposed on each owner of forest lands whose
forest lands are subject to a per acre rate or charge.
(5) The consideration, adoption, implementation, and collection of
a system of rates and charges shall follow the same public notice and
hearing process and be subject to the same procedure and authority of
RCW 89.08.400.
(6) In the resolution providing for a system of rates and charges,
or by separate resolution, the conservation district board of
supervisors shall establish rules providing for appeals and the board's
hearing of appeals regarding the application of the adopted system of
rates and charges to a parcel or parcels. Any appeal must be filed
with the conservation district no later than twenty-one days after the
system of rates and charges has been approved by the county legislative
authority. The decision of the board of supervisors regarding any
appeal shall be final and conclusive. Any appeal of the decision of
the board shall be to the superior court of the county in which the
district is located, and served and filed within twenty-one days of the
date of the board's written decision.
(7) A conservation district shall prepare a roll that implements
the system of rates and charges approved by the county legislative
authority. The rates and charges from the roll shall be spread by the
county assessor as a separate item on the tax rolls and shall be
collected and accounted for with property taxes by the county
treasurer. The amount of the rates and charges shall constitute a lien
against the land that shall be subject to the same conditions as a tax
lien, and collected by the treasurer in the same manner as delinquent
real property taxes. The interest rate on the amount of the rates and
charges shall be the lesser of an average of the federal short-term
rate as defined in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1274(d) as it existed on the
effective date of this section, plus two percentage points or eight
percent. The rate set for each new year shall be computed by taking an
arithmetical average to the nearest percentage point of the federal
short-term rate, compounded annually. That average shall be calculated
using the rates from four months: January, April, and July of the
calendar year immediately preceding the new year, and October of the
previous preceding year. The county treasurer shall deduct an amount
from the collected rates and charges, as established by the county
legislative authority, to cover the costs incurred by the county
assessor and county treasurer in spreading and collecting the rates and
charges, but not to exceed the actual costs of the work. All remaining
funds collected under this section shall be transferred to the
conservation district and used by the conservation district in
accordance with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---