BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) An electronic employment verification system, originally known
as the basic pilot program, enacted by P.L. 104-208 and renamed in 2007
as the e-verify program, was established as an experimental and
temporary system available to employers on a voluntary basis;
(b) A recent study by the United States government accountability
office found that significant challenges remain for the e-verify
program, including the persistence of erroneous tentative
nonconfirmations, the risks of identity theft and employer fraud, the
difficulties in correcting personal information, and the need for
reliable cost estimates and sufficient resources;
(c) Another recent study concluded that, if use of the e-verify
program had been made mandatory for all employers in 2010, it would
have cost businesses two billion seven hundred million dollars, two
billion six hundred million dollars of which would have been borne by
small businesses;
(d) The costs, technological demands, and staff time required to
use and implement the e-verify program come at a time when many
employers are struggling and many workers remain unemployed;
(e) The state must pursue all avenues in facilitating and
incubating economic growth and job development;
(f) It is too expensive to mandate the use of the e-verify program,
especially in fragile economic times; and
(g) Our state's diverse economy relies on increased certainty and
stability for the present and future needs of our industries and
workforce, and immigration reform by congress is critical to accomplish
the needed certainty and stability.
(2) For these reasons, the legislature intends that the state
maintain the intent of federal law by ensuring that private employers
retain the ability to choose whether to participate in an electronic
employment verification program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Electronic employment verification system" means an employment
verification system that allows employers to electronically verify
workers' employment authorization with the federal government. The
term "electronic employment verification system" includes the basic
pilot program, enacted by P.L. 104-208 and renamed in 2007 as the
e-verify program, and other pilot programs for electronic employment
eligibility confirmation. The term "electronic employment verification
system" does not include the I-9 employment eligibility verification
form or any other employment eligibility systems that are required by
federal law.
(2) "Employer" means an employer other than the state, or a county,
city, town, or other political subdivision thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Except as required by federal law or as a
condition of receiving federal funds, neither the state nor any county,
city, town, or other political subdivision thereof shall require an
employer to use an electronic employment verification system, including
under the following circumstances:
(1) As a condition of receiving a government contract;
(2) As a condition of applying for or maintaining a business
license; or
(3) As a penalty for violating licensing or other similar laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

--- END ---