BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The task force on commercial and
nonferrous metal property theft is established. For purposes of this
section, "commercial metal property," "nonferrous metal property," and
"scrap metal business" have the same meanings as defined in RCW
19.290.010.
(2) The purpose of the task force is to formulate suggestions for
state policy regarding regulation of commercial and nonferrous metal
property theft.
(3) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(a) A representative of a national trade association or other
organization that represents scrap metal recycling businesses, such as
the institute of scrap metal recycling industries incorporated or its
successor organization or another entity representing comparable
interests;
(b) A scrap metal business located in Washington who is appointed
by and a member of the institute of scrap recycling industries, or its
successor organization and whose primary business location is located
in a city with a minimum population more than five hundred thousand;
(c) A scrap metal business located in Washington who is appointed
by and a member of the institute of scrap recycling industries, or its
successor organization and whose primary business location is located
in a city with a maximum population less than fifty thousand;
(d) One investor-owned utility, as defined in RCW 19.29A.010, whose
service territory is predominately located on the western side of the
Cascade mountain range;
(e) One investor–owned utility, as defined in RCW 19.29A.010, whose
service territory is predominately located on the eastern side of the
Cascade mountain range;
(f) A consumer-owned utility, as defined in RCW 19.29A.010;
(g) A municipally owned utility;
(h) A representative of the Washington department of
transportation;
(i) A representative of the Washington state prosecutors
association;
(j) A representative of the Washington state patrol;
(k) A representative from a city with a population of less than
five hundred thousand;
(l) A representative from a city with a population of more than
five hundred thousand;
(m) A representative of a law enforcement agency, appointed by the
Washington council of police and sheriffs;
(n) A representative from the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs;
(o) A representative from a county appointed by the Washington
state association of counties;
(p) A representative of the broadband and cable telecommunications
industry;
(q) A representative of the wireless telecommunications industry;
(r) A representative of the wireline telecommunications industry;
(s) A representative from the Washington state emergency
communications committee;
(t) A representative from the AM/FM radio communications industry;
(u) A representative from the Washington state farm bureau; and
(v) A representative of crime victims, appointed by the office of
crime victims advocacy.
(4) The task force shall elect a chair and organize itself in a
manner, and adopt rules of procedure that it determines are most
conducive to the timely completion of its charge.
(5) In conducting its study, the task force shall consider, at a
minimum, the following issues:
(a) Penalties, both criminal and civil, for theft of commercial and
nonferrous metal property including, but not limited to, issues such as
categorization of crimes, trespass, organized commercial metal property
theft, and aggregation of crimes;
(b) Valuation in the criminal prosecution of theft of commercial
and nonferrous metal property, where the actual damages of the theft
may greatly exceed the value of the stolen property;
(c) The role of local governments in policing and prosecuting theft
of commercial and nonferrous property;
(d) Restrictions on cash purchases of commercial and nonferrous
metal property;
(e) Private rights of action to prosecute theft of commercial and
nonferrous metal property;
(f) Registration or licensing of all scrap metal businesses;
(g) A no-buy list for commercial and nonferrous metal purchases;
(h) Use and effectiveness of a scrap theft alert system, such as
scraptheftalert.com, offered as a no fee service by the institute of
scrap recycling industries; and
(i) Such other items the task force deems necessary.
(6) The task force shall meet at least quarterly.
(7) Members must seek reimbursement for travel and other membership
expenses through their respective agencies or organizations within
existing resources.
(8) The task force shall report its preliminary findings and
recommendations for legislative action to the legislature by December
31, 2012. The task force shall continue to communicate and collaborate
regarding a policy plan through December 31, 2014.
(9) This section expires December 31, 2014.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.56.030 and 2009 c 431 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft in the first degree if he or she
commits theft of:
(a) Property or services which exceed(s) five thousand dollars in
value other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010;
(b) Property of any value, other than a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 or a motor vehicle, taken from the person of another; ((or))
(c) A search and rescue dog, as defined in RCW 9.91.175, while the
search and rescue dog is on duty; or
(d) Metal wire, taken from a public service company, as defined in
RCW 80.04.010, and the costs of the damage to the public service
company's property exceed five thousand dollars in value.
(2) Theft in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.56.040 and 2009 c 431 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft in the second degree if he or she
commits theft of:
(a) Property or services which exceed(s) seven hundred fifty
dollars in value but does not exceed five thousand dollars in value,
other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 or a motor vehicle;
((or))
(b) A public record, writing, or instrument kept, filed, or
deposited according to law with or in the keeping of any public office
or public servant; ((or))
(c) Metal wire, taken from a public service company, as defined in
RCW 80.04.010, and the costs of the damage to the public service
company's property exceed seven hundred fifty dollars but does not
exceed five thousand dollars in value; or
(d) An access device.
(2) Theft in the second degree is a class C felony.

--- END ---