BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the right of
citizens to observe the actions of their public officials and to have
timely access to public records are the underpinnings of democracy and
are essential for meaningful citizen participation in the democratic
process. All too often, however, violations of the requirements of the
public records act and the open public meetings act by public officials
and agencies result in citizens being denied these important rights.
Such violations are often the result of inadvertent error or a lack of
knowledge on the part of officials and agencies regarding their legal
duties to the public pursuant to these acts. Also, whether due to
error or ignorance, violations of the public records act and open
public meetings act are very costly for state and local governments,
both in terms of litigation expenses and administrative costs.
The legislature also finds that the implementation of simple, cost-effective training programs made available via an interactive internet
web site, or equivalent means, will greatly increase the likelihood
that our public officials and agencies will better serve the public by
improving citizen access to public records and encouraging public
participation in governmental deliberations. Such improvements in
public service will, in turn, enhance the public's trust in its
government and result in significant cost savings by reducing the
number of violations of the public records act and open public meetings
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Not later than July 1, 2013, the attorney general shall develop
and implement a training program regarding the legal requirements and
purposes of this chapter. The training program shall be:
(a) A concise, interactive, web-based presentation, including
instruction in:
(i) The purposes and intent of the open public meetings act and the
importance of open public meetings in a democracy;
(ii) The applicability of this chapter to governmental bodies and
members of governing boards of agencies;
(iii) Procedures and requirements necessary for compliance with the
provisions of this chapter;
(iv) Best practices for compliance with this chapter;
(v) Penalties and other consequences for failure to comply with the
requirements of this chapter; and
(vi) The role of the attorney general under this chapter;
(b) No shorter than one hour and no longer than two hours in
length; and
(c) Available on the Washington state attorney general's web site,
or on a functionally similar and widely available medium at no cost,
and made available for posting on state and local agency web sites.
(2) In developing the training required under this section, the
attorney general shall consult with, and may utilize training materials
from, associations representing cities, counties, and/or those
nonprofit organizations whose mission includes education regarding the
provisions of this chapter. The attorney general shall review and may
accredit in-person or interactive web-based trainings offered by
agencies and such associations or nonprofit organizations that provide
similar training by persons with appropriate expertise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every member of the governing body of a public agency must
complete the open public meetings act training course implemented or
accredited by the attorney general as set forth in section 2 of this
act. Such training must:
(a) Be completed no later than ninety days after the date the
member either:
(i) Takes the oath of office, if the member is required to take an
oath of office to assume his or her duties as a public official; or
(ii) Otherwise assumes his or her duties as a public official;
(b) Be regularly updated at intervals of no more than two years.
(2) Individuals completing the training course required under this
section shall maintain proof of completion for two years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Not later than July 1, 2013, the attorney general shall develop
and implement a training program on the legal requirements and purposes
of this chapter and chapter 40.14 RCW. The training program shall be:
(a) A concise, interactive, web-based presentation, including
instruction in:
(i) The purposes and intent of this chapter and chapter 40.14 RCW
as well as the importance of public records disclosure and retention in
a democracy;
(ii) The applicability of this chapter and chapter 40.14 RCW to
governmental bodies and members of governing boards of agencies;
(iii) Procedures and requirements necessary for compliance with the
provisions of this chapter and chapter 40.14 RCW;
(iv) Best practices for compliance with this chapter;
(v) Penalties and other consequences for failure to comply with the
requirements of this chapter and chapter 40.14 RCW; and
(vi) The role of the attorney general under this chapter and
chapter 40.14 RCW;
(b) No shorter than one hour and no longer than two hours in
length; and
(c) Available on the Washington state attorney general's web site,
or on a functionally similar and widely available medium at no cost.
(2) In developing the training program required under this section,
the attorney general shall consult with, and may utilize training
materials from, the secretary of state, associations representing
cities or counties, and/or those nonprofit organizations whose mission
includes education regarding the provisions of this chapter and chapter
40.14 RCW.
(3) The attorney general shall, after providing guidelines for
general content, establish a process for periodic certification that
training programs provided by agencies and outside organizations are
consistent with the elements of subsection (2) of this section. Such
programs may be tailored to a particular office or agency.
(4) In addition to the general training program required under this
section, the attorney general shall develop and implement an intensive
training seminar for public records officers designated pursuant to RCW
42.56.580. This training may be administered via interactive web
technology or in person. Such training shall:
(a) Be no less than four hours in length;
(b) Include duties and obligations of agencies regarding public
records disclosure and retention established under recent court
decisions and legislative changes, if any;
(c) Include training on duties to manage and preserve records,
including electronic records, and the provision of access to electronic
records in original, searchable forms;
(d) Include discussion of innovative mechanisms for providing
timely access to public records to the public;
(e) Include discussion of the model rules for the public records
act as adopted by the attorney general; and
(f) Include discussion of the benefits of indexing records,
including but not limited to the duty of state agencies to index, and
provide access to indices, if records are relied upon or invoked for
any purpose pursuant to RCW 42.56.070(6).
(5) Individuals completing the training course required under this
section shall maintain proof of completion for two years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each elected state or local official, and each person appointed
to fill a vacancy in elective office, who is subject to the
requirements of this chapter must complete a training course
implemented or accredited by the attorney general as set forth in
section 4 of this act, regarding basic open government principles,
including the responsibility of state employees to preserve, disclose,
and provide public records in accordance with the requirements of this
chapter and chapter 40.14 RCW. Such training must:
(a) Be completed no later than ninety days after the date the
official either:
(i) Takes the oath of office, if the official is required to take
an oath of office to assume his or her duties as a public official; or
(ii) Otherwise assumes his or her duties as a public official;
(b) Be regularly updated at intervals of no more than two years.
(2) Every public records officer of a state agency, as designated
under RCW 42.56.580, within ninety days of being so designated shall
complete an intensive training seminar pursuant to section 4(4) of this
act and shall complete refresher training every two years thereafter.
(3) Every public records officer of a local agency, as designated
under RCW 42.56.580, shall complete a training seminar administered by
the attorney general pursuant to section 4(4) of this act no less
frequently than every three years.
(4) Individuals completing the training course required under this
section shall maintain proof of completion for two years.

--- END ---