BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.19.060 and 2011 c 171 s 75 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An additional fee may not be charged for special license plates
for persons with disabilities except for any other fees and taxes
required to be paid upon registration of a motor vehicle.
(2) A registered owner who qualifies for special parking privileges
as described in RCW 46.19.010 may apply to the department for special
license plates for persons with disabilities or special license plates
with a special year tab for persons with disabilities. Special license
plates with a special year tab for persons with disabilities are
available on ((the following)) any special license plate ((designs:

PLATE TYPE ISSUED UNDER

Armed forces collection RCW 46.18.210

Baseball stadium RCW 46.18.215

Collegiate RCW 46.18.225

Disabled American veteran RCW 46.18.235

Endangered wildlife RCW 46.18.200

Former prisoner of war RCW 46.18.235

Helping kids speak RCW 46.18.200

Keep kids safe RCW 46.18.200

Law enforcement memorial RCW 46.18.200

Pearl Harbor survivor RCW 46.18.270

Personalized RCW 46.18.275

Professional firefighters and paramedics RCW 46.18.200

Purple Heart RCW 46.18.280

Share the road RCW 46.18.200

Ski & ride Washington RCW 46.18.200

Square dancer RCW 46.18.290

Washington lighthouses RCW 46.18.200

Washington's national park fund RCW 46.18.200

Washington state parks RCW 46.18.200

Washington's wildlife collection RCW 46.18.200

We love our pets RCW 46.18.200

Wild on Washington RCW 46.18.200))

created under chapter 46.18 RCW, except the collector vehicle,
horseless carriage, and ride share special license plates.
(3) A registered owner who chooses to purchase special license
plates as described in subsection (2) of this section shall pay the
applicable special license plate fee, in addition to any other fees or
taxes required for registering a motor vehicle.
(4) Special license plates for persons with disabilities or special
license plates with a special year tab for persons with disabilities
must be renewed in the same manner and at the time required for the
renewal of standard motor vehicle license plates under chapter 46.16A
RCW.
(5) Special license plates for persons with disabilities or special
license plates with a special year tab for persons with disabilities
may be transferred from one motor vehicle to another motor vehicle
owned by the person with the parking privilege upon application to the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director.
(6) Special license plates for persons with disabilities or special
license plates with a special year tab for persons with disabilities
must be removed from the motor vehicle when the person with
disabilities transfers or assigns his or her interest in the motor
vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2013.

--- END ---