BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that last year nearly
nine hundred thousand voters approved Initiative Measure No. 1125.
Postelection polling showed that an overwhelming majority of voters
supported many of its major policies. In focusing on those provisions
the voters strongly support, this act would:
(1) Prohibit state government from diverting gas taxes and toll
revenues in the motor vehicle fund and other funds to any other funds
to be used for nontransportation purposes; and
(2) Require tolls to be dedicated to the project in which the tolls
are paid, end such tolls when the project is completed, and only allow
such tolls to be used for purposes consistent with Article II, section
40 of the state Constitution.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.68.070 and 1972 ex.s. c 103 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created in the state treasury a permanent fund to be known
as the motor vehicle fund to the credit of which shall be deposited all
moneys directed by law to be deposited therein. This fund shall be for
the use of the state, and through state agencies, for the use of
counties, cities, and towns for proper road, street, and highway
purposes, including the purposes of RCW 47.30.030. The department of
transportation and any other state agency may not transfer any revenues
in the motor vehicle fund to any other fund to be used for
nontransportation purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The department or any other state agency may not transfer any
revenues from any account created under this chapter to any other
account or fund to be used for nontransportation purposes.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.56.030 and 2008 c 122 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as permitted under chapter 47.29 or 47.46 RCW:
(a) Unless otherwise delegated, and subject to RCW 47.56.820, the
department of transportation shall have full charge of the planning,
analysis, and construction of all toll bridges and other toll
facilities including the Washington state ferries, and the operation
and maintenance thereof.
(b) The transportation commission shall determine and establish the
tolls and charges thereon. Except for Washington state ferries toll
facilities, revenue from tolls or charges on a highway, freeway, road,
bridge, or street may be used only for the cost of construction and
capital improvements to that particular highway, freeway, road, bridge,
or street and for purposes consistent with Article II, section 40 of
the state Constitution.
(c) Unless otherwise delegated, and subject to RCW 47.56.820, the
department shall have full charge of planning, analysis, and design of
all toll facilities. The department may conduct the planning,
analysis, and design of toll facilities as necessary to support the
legislature's consideration of toll authorization.
(d) The department shall utilize and administer toll collection
systems that are simple, unified, and interoperable. To the extent
practicable, the department shall avoid the use of toll booths. The
department shall set the statewide standards and protocols for all toll
facilities within the state, including those authorized by local
authorities.
(e) Except as provided in this section, the department shall
proceed with the construction of such toll bridges and other facilities
and the approaches thereto by contract in the manner of state highway
construction immediately upon there being made available funds for such
work and shall prosecute such work to completion as rapidly as
practicable. The department is authorized to negotiate contracts for
any amount without bid under (e)(i) and (ii) of this subsection:
(i) Emergency contracts, in order to make repairs to ferries or
ferry terminal facilities or removal of such facilities whenever
continued use of ferries or ferry terminal facilities constitutes a
real or immediate danger to the traveling public or precludes prudent
use of such ferries or facilities; and
(ii) Single source contracts for vessel dry dockings, when there is
clearly and legitimately only one available bidder to conduct dry dock-related work for a specific class or classes of vessels. The contracts
may be entered into for a single vessel dry docking or for multiple
vessel dry dockings for a period not to exceed two years.
(2) The department shall proceed with the procurement of materials,
supplies, services, and equipment needed for the support, maintenance,
and use of a ferry, ferry terminal, or other facility operated by
Washington state ferries, in accordance with chapter 43.19 RCW except
as follows:
(a) When the secretary of the department of transportation
determines in writing that the use of invitation for bid is either not
practicable or not advantageous to the state and it may be necessary to
make competitive evaluations, including technical or performance
evaluations among acceptable proposals to complete the contract award,
a contract may be entered into by use of a competitive sealed proposals
method, and a formal request for proposals solicitation. Such formal
request for proposals solicitation shall include a functional
description of the needs and requirements of the state and the
significant factors.
(b) When purchases are made through a formal request for proposals
solicitation the contract shall be awarded to the responsible proposer
whose competitive sealed proposal is determined in writing to be the
most advantageous to the state taking into consideration price and
other evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals. No
significant factors may be used in evaluating a proposal that are not
specified in the request for proposals. Factors that may be considered
in evaluating proposals include but are not limited to: Price;
maintainability; reliability; commonality; performance levels; life
cycle cost if applicable under this section; cost of transportation or
delivery; delivery schedule offered; installation cost; cost of spare
parts; availability of parts and service offered; and the following:
(i) The ability, capacity, and skill of the proposer to perform the
contract or provide the service required;
(ii) The character, integrity, reputation, judgment, experience,
and efficiency of the proposer;
(iii) Whether the proposer can perform the contract within the time
specified;
(iv) The quality of performance of previous contracts or services;
(v) The previous and existing compliance by the proposer with laws
relating to the contract or services;
(vi) Objective, measurable criteria defined in the request for
proposal. These criteria may include but are not limited to items such
as discounts, delivery costs, maintenance services costs, installation
costs, and transportation costs; and
(vii) Such other information as may be secured having a bearing on
the decision to award the contract.
(c) When purchases are made through a request for proposal process,
proposals received shall be evaluated based on the evaluation factors
set forth in the request for proposal. When issuing a request for
proposal for the procurement of propulsion equipment or systems that
include an engine, the request for proposal must specify the use of a
life cycle cost analysis that includes an evaluation of fuel
efficiency. When a life cycle cost analysis is used, the life cycle
cost of a proposal shall be given at least the same relative importance
as the initial price element specified in the request of proposal
documents. The department may reject any and all proposals received.
If the proposals are not rejected, the award shall be made to the
proposer whose proposal is most advantageous to the department,
considering price and the other evaluation factors set forth in the
request for proposal.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.56.810 and 2011 c 377 s 7 and 2011 c 369 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Eligible toll facility" or "eligible toll facilities" means
portions of the state highway system specifically identified by the
legislature including, but not limited to, transportation corridors,
bridges, crossings, interchanges, on-ramps, off-ramps, approaches,
bistate facilities, and interconnections between highways.
(2) "Express toll lanes" means one or more high occupancy vehicle
lanes of a highway in which the department charges tolls primarily as
a means of regulating access to or use of the lanes to maintain travel
speed and reliability.
(3) "Toll revenue" or "revenue from an eligible toll facility"
means toll receipts, all interest income derived from the investment of
toll receipts, and any gifts, grants, or other funds received for the
benefit of transportation facilities in the state, including eligible
toll facilities, which may be used only for purposes consistent with
Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution.
(4) "Tolling authority" means the governing body that is legally
empowered to review and adjust toll rates. Unless otherwise delegated,
the transportation commission is the tolling authority for all state
highways.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.56.820 and 2008 c 122 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise delegated, only the legislature may authorize
the imposition of tolls on eligible toll facilities.
(2) All revenue from an eligible toll facility must be used only
((to construct, improve, preserve, maintain, manage, or operate)) for
the cost of construction and capital improvements to the eligible toll
facility on or in which the revenue is collected subject to the
limitations under RCW 47.56.830. Expenditures of toll revenues are
subject to appropriation and must be made only for the following
purposes as long as the expenditure is consistent with Article II,
section 40 of the state Constitution:
(a) To cover the operating costs of the eligible toll facility,
including necessary maintenance, preservation, administration, and toll
enforcement by public law enforcement within the boundaries of the
facility;
(b) To meet obligations for the repayment of debt and interest on
the eligible toll facilities, and any other associated financing costs
including, but not limited to, required reserves and insurance;
(c) To meet any other obligations to provide funding contributions
for any projects or operations on the eligible toll facilities;
(d) To provide for the operations of conveyances of people or
goods; or
(e) For any other improvements to the eligible toll facilities.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.56.830 and 2008 c 122 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any proposal for the establishment of eligible toll facilities
shall consider the following policy guidelines:
(1) Overall direction. Washington should use tolling to encourage
effective use of the transportation system and provide a source of
transportation funding.
(2) When to use tolling. Tolling should be used when it can be
demonstrated to contribute a significant portion of the cost of a
project that cannot be funded solely with existing sources or optimize
the performance of the transportation system. Such tolling should, in
all cases, be fairly and equitably applied in the context of the
statewide transportation system and not have significant adverse
impacts through the diversion of traffic to other routes that cannot
otherwise be reasonably mitigated. Such tolling should also consider
relevant social equity, environmental, and economic issues, and should
be directed at making progress toward the state's greenhouse gas
reduction goals.
(3) Use of toll revenue. All revenue from an eligible toll
facility must be used only to improve((, preserve, manage,)) or operate
the eligible toll facility on or in which the revenue is collected and
for purposes consistent with Article II, section 40 of the state
Constitution. Additionally, toll revenue should provide for and
encourage the inclusion of recycled and reclaimed construction
materials.
(4) Setting toll rates. Toll rates must be uniform and consistent,
((which)) may not include variable pricing, and must be set to meet
anticipated funding obligations. To the extent possible, the toll
rates should be set to optimize system performance, recognizing
necessary trade-offs to generate revenue.
(5) Dedication of tolls. As described in RCW 47.56.030, tolls
collected on a project must be spent only on that project, and all
revenue from such tolls may be used only for purposes consistent with
Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution.
(6) Duration of toll collection. ((Because transportation
infrastructure projects have costs and benefits that extend well beyond
those paid for by initial construction funding,)) Tolls on future toll
facilities ((may remain in place to fund additional capacity, capital
rehabilitation, maintenance, management, and operations, and to
optimize performance of the system)) must end after the cost of the
toll facility project is paid.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.56.790 and 2008 c 270 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall work with the federal highways administration
to determine the necessary actions for receiving federal authorization
to toll the Interstate 90 floating bridge. The department must
periodically report the status of those discussions to the governor and
the joint transportation committee. Tolls imposed and toll revenue
collected on Interstate 90 must be used exclusively for toll facilities
on and capital improvements to the Interstate 90 floating bridge and
may be used only for purposes consistent with Article II, section 40 of
the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is to be liberally construed to
effectuate the intent, policies, and purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---