BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71A.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The department:
(1) May, within sixty days of admission to a residential
habilitation center, ensure that each resident's individual
habilitation plan includes a plan for discharge to the community;
(2) Shall use a person-centered approach in developing the
discharge plan to assess the resident's needs and identify services the
resident requires to successfully transition to the community,
including:
(a) Engaging families and guardians of residents by offering
family-to-family mentoring provided by family members who themselves
experienced moving a family member with developmental disabilities from
an institution to the community. The department shall contract with
the developmental disabilities council to provide mentoring services;
(b) Employees of the residential habilitation centers and the
department providing transition planning for residents. To strengthen
continuity of care for residents leaving residential habilitation
centers, the department shall provide opportunities for residential
habilitation center employees to obtain employment in state-operated
living alternatives;
(c) Providing choice of community living options and providers,
consistent with federal requirements, including offering to place, with
the consent of the resident or his or her guardian, each resident of
the residential habilitation center on the appropriate home and
community-based waiver, as authorized under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n, and
provide continued access to the services that meet his or her assessed
needs;
(d) Providing residents and their families or guardians
opportunities to visit state-operated living alternatives and supported
living options in the community;
(e) Offering residents leaving a residential habilitation center a
"right to return" to a residential habilitation center during the first
year following their move;
(f) Addressing services in addition to those that will be provided
by residential services providers that are necessary to address the
resident's assessed needs, including:
(i) Medical services;
(ii) Nursing services;
(iii) Dental care;
(iv) Behavioral and mental health supports;
(v) Habilitation services;
(vi) Employment or other day support; and
(vii) Transportation or other supports needed to assist family and
friends in maintaining regular contact with the resident;
(3) Shall assure that, prior to discharge from a residential
habilitation center, clients continue to be eligible for services for
which they have an assessed need;
(4) Shall maximize federal funding for transitioning clients
through the roads to community living grant;
(5) Shall limit the ability of a state-operated living alternative
to reject clients;
(6) Shall use any savings achieved through efficiencies to extend
services, including state-staffed crisis stabilization and respite
services, to people with developmental disabilities currently receiving
limited or no services; and
(7)(a) Shall employ the quality assurance process currently in use
by the department to monitor the adjustment of each resident who leaves
a residential habilitation center; and
(b) Convene a work group to review findings from the quality
assurance for people moving process and provide feedback on the
transition process. The work group shall include representatives of
the developmental disabilities council, disability rights Washington,
University of Washington center for human development and disability,
providers, and families and advocates of persons with disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71A.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning November 1, 2012, and annually thereafter, the department
shall submit information to the appropriate committees of the
legislature regarding persons who have transitioned from residential
habilitation centers to the community, for the first two years
following each person's new placement, including:
(1) Progress toward meeting the requirements of this act;
(2) Client and guardian satisfaction with services;
(3) Stability of placement and provider turnover, including
information on returns to a residential habilitation center under
section 1(2)(e) of this act;
(4) Safety and health outcomes;
(5) Types of services received by clients transitioned to the
community; and
(6) Continued accessibility of former residents to family.

--- END ---