BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08.580 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 42 s 14 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person receiving public assistance, as defined in RCW
74.04.004, is prohibited from using electronic benefit cards or cash
obtained with electronic benefit cards:
(a) For the purpose of participating in any of the activities
authorized under chapter 9.46 RCW;
(b) For the purpose of parimutuel wagering authorized under chapter
67.16 RCW;
(c) To purchase lottery tickets or shares authorized under chapter
67.70 RCW;
(d) For the purpose of participating in or purchasing any
activities located in a tattoo, body piercing, or body art shop
licensed under chapter 18.300 RCW;
(e) To purchase cigarettes as defined in RCW 82.24.010 or tobacco
products as defined in RCW 82.26.010;
(f) To purchase any items regulated under Title 66 RCW; or
(g) For the purpose of purchasing or participating in any
activities in any location listed in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) On or before January 1, 2012, the businesses listed in this
subsection must disable the ability of ATM and point-of-sale machines
located on their business premises to accept the electronic benefit
card. The following businesses are required to comply with this
mandate:
(a) Taverns licensed under RCW 66.24.330;
(b) Beer/wine specialty stores licensed under RCW 66.24.371;
(c) Nightclubs licensed under RCW 66.24.600;
(d) Contract liquor stores defined under RCW 66.04.010;
(e) Bail bond agencies regulated under chapter 18.185 RCW;
(f) Gambling establishments licensed under chapter 9.46 RCW;
(g) Tattoo, body piercing, or body art shops regulated under
chapter 18.300 RCW;
(h) Adult entertainment venues with performances that contain
erotic material where minors under the age of eighteen are prohibited
under RCW 9.68A.150; and
(i) Any establishments where persons under the age of eighteen are
not permitted.
(3) The department must notify the licensing authority of any
business listed in subsection (2) of this section that such business
has continued to allow the use of the electronic benefit card in
violation of subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Only the recipient, an eligible member of the household, or the
recipient's authorized representative may use an electronic benefit
card or the benefit and such use shall only be for the respective
benefit program purposes. The recipient shall not sell, or attempt to
sell, exchange, or donate an electronic benefit card or any benefits to
any other person or entity.
(5) ((The first violation of subsection (1) or (4) of this section
by a recipient constitutes a class 4 civil infraction under RCW
7.80.120. Second and subsequent violations of subsection (1) or (4) of
this section constitute a class 3 civil infraction under RCW 7.80.120.
(a) The department shall notify, in writing, all recipients of
electronic benefit cards that any violation of subsection (1) or (4) of
this section could result in legal proceedings and forfeiture of all
cash public assistance.
(b))) Whenever the department receives notice that a person has
violated subsection (1) or (4) of this section, the department shall
terminate the recipient's public assistance benefits, and notify the
((person)) recipient in writing ((that the violation could result in
legal proceedings and forfeiture of all cash public assistance.
(c) The department shall assign a protective payee to the person
receiving public assistance who violates subsection (1) or (4) of this
section two or more times)) of the termination.
(6) A person whose benefits have been terminated pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section is not eligible for public assistance
benefits as defined in RCW 74.04.004.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.04.004 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 42 s 21 are each
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Abuse" means any intentional use of public assistance benefits
that constitutes a violation of any state statute or regulation
relating to the use of public assistance benefits. This definition
excludes medicaid and other medical programs as defined in chapter
74.09 RCW, and fraud and abuse committed by medical providers and
recipients of medicaid and other medical program services.
(2) "Disclosable information" means public information that (a) is
not exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW; and (b) does not
pertain to an ongoing investigation.
(3) "Fraud" means an intentional deception or misrepresentation
made by a person with the knowledge that the deception could result in
some unauthorized benefit to himself or herself or some other person.
(4) "Office" means the office of fraud and accountability.
(5) "Public assistance" or "public assistance programs" means
public aid to persons in need including assistance grants, food
assistance, work relief, ((disability lifeline)) benefits received
pursuant to RCW 74.62.030, temporary assistance for needy families,
and, for purposes of this section, working connections child care
subsidies. This definition excludes medicaid and other medical
programs as defined in chapter 74.09 RCW, and fraud and abuse committed
by medical providers and recipients of medicaid and other medical
program services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person who has been found, in a civil administrative
hearing or in a criminal court, to have made a willful or intentional
false statement or misrepresentation, failed to reveal any material
fact, for the purposes of obtaining an unauthorized benefit for himself
or herself or some other person, or otherwise committed fraud, is not
eligible to receive public assistance as defined in RCW 74.04.004.
(2) Whenever the department receives notice that a person has been
found to have committed fraud pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, the department shall terminate the recipient's public
assistance benefits, as defined in RCW 74.04.004, and notify the
recipient in writing of the termination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.08.025 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 42 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Public assistance may be awarded to any applicant:
(a) Who is in need and otherwise meets the eligibility requirements
of department assistance programs; ((and))
(b) Who has not made a voluntary assignment of property or cash for
the purpose of qualifying for an assistance grant; ((and))
(c) Who is not an inmate of a public institution except as a
patient in a medical institution or except as an inmate in a public
institution who could qualify for federal aid assistance: PROVIDED,
That the assistance paid by the department to recipients in nursing
homes, or receiving nursing home care, may cover the cost of clothing
and incidentals and general maintenance exclusive of medical care and
health services. The department may pay a grant to cover the cost of
clothing and personal incidentals in public or private medical
institutions and institutions for tuberculosis. The department shall
allow recipients in nursing homes to retain, in addition to the grant
to cover the cost of clothing and incidentals, wages received for work
as a part of a training or rehabilitative program designed to prepare
the recipient for less restrictive placement to the extent permitted
under Title XIX of the federal social security act;
(d) Who has not been terminated from public assistance pursuant to
RCW 74.08.580; and
(e) Who has not been terminated from public assistance benefits
pursuant to section 3 of this act.
(2) Any person otherwise qualified for temporary assistance for
needy families under this title who has resided in the state of
Washington for fewer than twelve consecutive months immediately
preceding application for assistance is limited to the benefit level in
the state in which the person resided immediately before Washington,
using the eligibility rules and other definitions established under
this chapter, that was obtainable on the date of application in
Washington state, if the benefit level of the prior state is lower than
the level provided to similarly situated applicants in Washington
state. The benefit level under this subsection shall be in effect for
the first twelve months a recipient is on temporary assistance for
needy families in Washington state.
(3) Any person otherwise qualified for temporary assistance for
needy families who is assessed through the state alcohol and substance
abuse program as drug or alcohol-dependent and requiring treatment to
become employable shall be required by the department to participate in
a drug or alcohol treatment program as a condition of benefit receipt.
(4) The department may implement a permanent disqualification for
adults who have been terminated due to WorkFirst noncompliance sanction
three or more times since March 1, 2007. A household that includes an
adult who has been permanently disqualified from receiving temporary
assistance for needy families shall be ineligible for further temporary
assistance for needy families assistance.
(5) Pursuant to 21 U.S.C. 862a(d)(1), the department shall exempt
individuals from the eligibility restrictions of 21 U.S.C. 862a(a)(1)
and (2) to ensure eligibility for temporary assistance for needy
families benefits and federal food assistance.

--- END ---