BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature that reasonable legal
services be provided to persons committed to any institution under the
supervision of the department of social and health services or
corrections. The department shall contract with persons or
organizations to provide legal services. The secretary shall adopt
procedures designed to minimize any conflict of interest, or appearance
thereof, in respect to the provision of legal services and the
department's administration of such contracts.
(2) Persons who contract to provide legal services are expressly
forbidden to solicit plaintiffs or promote litigation that has not been
pursued initially by a person entitled to such services under this
section.
(3) Persons who contract to provide legal services shall exhaust
all informal means of resolving a legal complaint or dispute prior to
the filing of any court proceeding.
(4) Nothing in this section forbids the secretary to supplement
contracted legal services with any of the following: (a) Law
libraries; (b) law student interns; and (c) volunteer attorneys.
(5) The total due a contractor as compensation, fees, or
reimbursement under the terms of the contract shall be reduced by the
total of any other compensation, fees, or reimbursement received by or
due the contractor for the performance of any legal service to persons
committed to an institution under the supervision of the department
during the contract period. Any amount received by a contractor under
contract that is not due under this section shall be immediately
returned by the contractor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 72.09.190 (Legal services for inmates)
and 1981 c 136 s 23 are each repealed.

--- END ---