BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a landowner is not
liable in contract or tort for any personal injury, death, or property
damage that arises out of the use of the landowner's land by:
(a) A person conducting a fish habitat improvement project using
state or federal money for the purpose of building the project; or
(b) A participant in a state or federally funded watershed or
stream restoration or enhancement program.
(2) An operator, timber owner, or landowner may not be held liable
for any damages resulting from:
(a) A fish habitat improvement project done in cooperation and
consultation with the department, a tribe, or the salmon recovery
funding board, or conducted as part of a forest practice in accordance
with chapter 76.09 RCW; or
(b) Leaving large woody debris within the waters of the state to
protect, retain, or recruit large woody debris for the purposes of
enhancing fish habitat or water quality improvement, if such a project
was funded by state or federal money for the purpose of building fish
habitat or water quality improvement.
(3) The limitations to liability provided by this section only
apply if:
(a) The damages, injury, or death were not caused by willful,
wanton, or intentional conduct on the part of the operator, timber
owner, or landowner or by the gross negligence of the operator, timber
owner, or landowner; and
(b) The project was properly designed and constructed to meet
appropriate standards of care that adequately address and mitigate for
potential hazards to public safety.

--- END ---