BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that the
transit service overlay zone describes a concept for subregional
collaborations between municipalities and transit agencies to better
link transit and land use decision making and planning.
The legislature further finds that this process is intended to
provide sufficient incentives and remove enough barriers to stimulate
transit supportive development in proximity to a set of core, high
frequency bus transit corridors. The process also helps better
prioritize the allocation of new transit agency service hours, as well
as ensure the reliability and productivity of existing higher capacity
bus transit by engaging land use authorities in local corridor planning
processes.
To be eligible for the transit service overlay zone program, a
corridor must meet an agreed upon set of criteria, including a minimum
housing unit density within walking distance to the corridor and
frequent all-day, two direction bus service. A transit service overlay
zone corridor must also connect to high density employment/population
centers, as well as to other destinations along the corridor to allow
for other nonwork trips to occur.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each regional transportation planning organization may
establish eligibility criteria for cities, counties, and transit
agencies to enact transit service overlay zones. The eligibility
criteria must include:
(a) Frequent all-day, two direction bus service or inclusion in a
transit agency's long-range plan for frequent all-day, two direction
bus service;
(b) A minimum existing or planned housing unit and employment
density within walking distance to the corridor;
(c) A requirement for connecting high density employment and
population centers; and
(d) Design criteria applicable to appropriate portions of the
transit service overlay zone that assist with the provision of transit
service.
(2) Cities, counties, and transit agencies may establish transit
service overlay zones through an interlocal agreement under chapter
39.34 RCW that meets the eligibility criteria established by the local
regional transportation planning organization, as determined by the
local regional transportation planning organization.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.80.023 and 2009 c 515 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each regional transportation planning organization shall have the
following duties:
(1) Prepare and periodically update a transportation strategy for
the region. The strategy shall address alternative transportation
modes and transportation demand management measures in regional
corridors and shall recommend preferred transportation policies to
implement adopted growth strategies. The strategy shall serve as a
guide in preparation of the regional transportation plan.
(2) Prepare a regional transportation plan as set forth in RCW
47.80.030 that is consistent with countywide planning policies if such
have been adopted pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, with county, city,
and town comprehensive plans, and state transportation plans.
(3) Certify by December 31, 1996, that the transportation elements
of comprehensive plans adopted by counties, cities, and towns within
the region reflect the guidelines and principles developed pursuant to
RCW 47.80.026, are consistent with the adopted regional transportation
plan, and, where appropriate, conform with the requirements of RCW
36.70A.070.
(4) Where appropriate, certify that countywide planning policies
adopted under RCW 36.70A.210 and the adopted regional transportation
plan are consistent.
(5) Develop, in cooperation with the department of transportation,
operators of public transportation services and local governments
within the region, a six-year regional transportation improvement
program which proposes regionally significant transportation projects
and programs and transportation demand management measures. The
regional transportation improvement program shall be based on the
programs, projects, and transportation demand management measures of
regional significance as identified by transit agencies, cities, and
counties pursuant to RCW 35.58.2795, 35.77.010, and 36.81.121,
respectively, and any recommended programs or projects identified by
the agency council on coordinated transportation, as provided in
chapter 47.06B RCW, that advance special needs coordinated
transportation as defined in RCW 47.06B.012. The program shall include
a priority list of projects and programs, project segments and
programs, transportation demand management measures, and a specific
financial plan that demonstrates how the transportation improvement
program can be funded. The program shall be updated at least every two
years for the ensuing six-year period.
(6) Include specific opportunities and projects to advance special
needs coordinated transportation, as defined in RCW 47.06B.012, in the
coordinated transit-human services transportation plan, after providing
opportunity for public comment.
(7) Designate a lead planning agency to coordinate preparation of
the regional transportation plan and carry out the other
responsibilities of the organization. The lead planning agency may be
a regional organization, a component county, city, or town agency, or
the appropriate Washington state department of transportation district
office.
(8) Review level of service methodologies used by cities and
counties planning under chapter 36.70A RCW to promote a consistent
regional evaluation of transportation facilities and corridors.
(9) Work with cities, counties, transit agencies, the department of
transportation, and others to develop level of service standards or
alternative transportation performance measures.
(10) Submit to the agency council on coordinated transportation, as
provided in chapter 47.06B RCW, beginning on July 1, 2007, and every
four years thereafter, an updated plan that includes the elements
identified by the council. Each regional transportation planning
organization must submit to the council every two years a prioritized
regional human service and transportation project list.
(11) Work with interested cities, counties, transit agencies, the
department of transportation, and others to develop transit service
overlay zones as prescribed in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.080 and 2011 c 318 s 801 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A comprehensive plan may include additional elements, items, or
studies dealing with other subjects relating to the physical
development within its jurisdiction, including, but not limited to:
(a) Conservation;
(b) Solar energy; ((and))
(c) Recreation; and
(d) Transit service overlay zones, as prescribed in section 2 of
this act.
(2) A comprehensive plan may include, where appropriate, subarea
plans, each of which is consistent with the comprehensive plan.
(3)(a) Cities that qualify as a receiving city may adopt a
comprehensive plan element and associated development regulations that
apply within receiving areas under chapter 39.108 RCW.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the terms "receiving city" and
"receiving area" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 39.108.010.

--- END ---