BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that while Washington
state has a history and tradition of promoting and establishing limited
purpose governmental entities, the proliferation of special purpose
districts has resulted in the creation and operation of a highly
complex and multilayered tapestry of local governments and governmental
services that can hinder shared goals of efficient and effective
service delivery.
The legislature, therefore, intends to establish a joint select
committee on junior taxing districts to review junior taxing districts
for the purpose of evaluating their provided services and making
recommendations regarding their appropriateness for consolidation into
an appropriate general purpose local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) A joint select committee on junior
taxing districts is established, with members as provided in this
subsection.
(i) Each legislative leader of the two largest political parties in
each house of the legislature shall appoint one voting member to the
committee by July 1, 2012.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives and the president
of the senate jointly shall appoint two nonvoting members to the
committee by July 1, 2012.
(iii) The governor shall appoint one nonvoting member to the
committee by July 1, 2012.
(b) The committee shall choose its chair from among its legislative
membership. The appointee from the majority caucus of the house of
representatives shall convene the initial meeting of the committee.
(2)(a) The committee shall review junior taxing districts for the
purpose of evaluating their provided services and making
recommendations regarding their appropriateness for consolidation into
a city or county, the general purpose local governments of Washington.
In completing its review and recommendations, the committee shall seek
pertinent information and advice from:
(i) Organizations representing counties, cities, and junior taxing
districts;
(ii) Counties, cities, and junior taxing districts;
(iii) The department of revenue;
(iv) The state auditor; and
(v) The office of the attorney general.
(b) For purposes of this section, the term "junior taxing district"
includes all taxing districts other than the state, counties, cities,
towns, and school districts.
(3) Staff support for the committee must be provided by senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(4) Legislative members of the committee must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) The expenses of the committee must be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Committee expenses are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee or their
successor committees.
(6) The voting members of the committee shall report their findings
and recommendations, in the form of draft legislation, to the governor
and the ways and means committees of the house of representatives and
senate, or their successor committees, by November 1, 2012.

--- END ---