BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When the governor submits his or her operating budget documents
to the legislature as provided in RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060, the
office of financial management shall simultaneously publish a six-year
outlook that is based on the governor's budget documents. The six-year
period covered by the outlook is the current biennium and two
subsequent biennia. The revenue and caseload projections used in the
outlook must be based on the most recent official forecasts adopted by
the economic and revenue forecast council and the caseload forecast
council for the years for which those forecasts are available, adjusted
by the office of financial management for policy changes made in the
governor's budget documents. The outlook shall clearly state the
assumptions used in the baseline expenditure estimates and any
adjustments made to those estimates. The outlook shall clearly state
the assumptions used in the baseline revenue estimates and any
adjustments to those estimates. The outlook must include the impact of
previously enacted legislation or proposed legislation with a future
effective date, adjusted by the office of financial management for
policy changes made in the governor's budget documents.
(2) After enactment of a biennial or supplemental operating budget,
the office of financial management shall update the outlook to reflect
the enacted budget.
(3) Quarterly, after the economic and revenue forecast council
adopts a new revenue forecast, the office of financial management shall
update the outlook required in subsection (2) of this section to
reflect the new revenue forecast.
(4) An outlook prepared under subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, for biennia in which a budget is not yet enacted, must include
the impact of enacted legislation with a future effective date.

--- END ---