BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.020 and 2010 c 233 s 1, 2010 c 232 s 2, and
2010 c 231 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department of early learning is created as an executive
branch agency. The department is vested with all powers and duties
transferred to it under this chapter and such other powers and duties
as may be authorized by law.
(2) The primary duties of the department are to implement state
early learning policy and to coordinate, consolidate, and integrate
child care and early learning programs in order to administer programs
and funding as efficiently as possible. The department's duties
include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To support both public and private sectors toward a
comprehensive and collaborative system of early learning that serves
parents, children, and providers and to encourage best practices in
child care and early learning programs;
(b) To make early learning resources available to parents and
caregivers;
(c) To carry out activities, including providing clear and easily
accessible information about quality and improving the quality of early
learning opportunities for young children, in cooperation with the
nongovernmental private-public partnership;
(d) To administer child care and early learning programs;
(e) To serve as the state lead agency for Part C of the federal
individuals with disabilities education act (IDEA);
(f) To standardize internal financial audits, oversight visits,
performance benchmarks, and licensing criteria, so that programs can
function in an integrated fashion;
(g) To support the implementation of the nongovernmental private-public partnership and cooperate with that partnership in pursuing its
goals including providing data and support necessary for the successful
work of the partnership;
(h) To work cooperatively and in coordination with the early
learning council;
(i) To collaborate with the K-12 school system at the state and
local levels to ensure appropriate connections and smooth transitions
between early learning and K-12 programs;
(j) To develop and adopt rules for administration of the program of
early learning established in RCW 43.215.141;
(k) To develop a comprehensive birth-to-three plan to provide
education and support through a continuum of options including, but not
limited to, services such as: Home visiting; quality incentives for
infant and toddler child care subsidies; quality improvements for
family home and center-based child care programs serving infants and
toddlers; professional development; early literacy programs; and
informal supports for family, friend, and neighbor caregivers; ((and))
(l) To develop and make widely available early learning guidelines,
jointly with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and
the nongovernmental private-public partnership, and to periodically
review and revise the guidelines with a committee offering broad
stakeholder representation and a tribal member from a federally
recognized tribe; and
(m) Upon the development of an early learning information system,
to make available to parents timely inspection and licensing action
information through the internet and other means.
(3) The department's programs shall be designed in a way that
respects and preserves the ability of parents and legal guardians to
direct the education, development, and upbringing of their children,
and that recognizes and honors cultural and linguistic diversity. The
department shall include parents and legal guardians in the development
of policies and program decisions affecting their children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall,
jointly with the department of early learning and the nongovernmental
private-public partnership, develop and make widely available early
learning guidelines and periodically review and revise the guidelines
with a committee offering broad stakeholder representation and a tribal
member from a federally recognized tribe.

--- END ---