BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.120A.010 and 2010 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Pursuant to the federal clean air act, the legislature adopts
the California motor vehicle emission standards in Title 13 of the
California Code of Regulations, effective January 1, 2005, except as
provided in this chapter. The department of ecology shall adopt rules
to implement the emission standards of the state of California for
passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles,
and shall amend the rules from time to time, to maintain consistency
with the California motor vehicle emission standards and 42 U.S.C. Sec.
7507 (section 177 of the federal clean air act). Notwithstanding other
provisions of this chapter, the department of ecology shall not adopt
the zero emission vehicle program regulations contained in Title 13
section 1962 of the California Code of Regulations effective January 1,
2005. During rule development, the department of ecology shall convene
an advisory group composed of industry and consumer group
representatives. Any proposed rules or changes to rules shall be
subject to review and comment by the advisory group, prior to rule
adoption. The order of adoption for the rules required in this section
shall include the signature of the governor. The rules shall be
effective only for those model years for which the state of Oregon has
adopted the California motor vehicle emission standards. This section
does not limit the department of ecology's authority to regulate motor
vehicle emissions for any other class of vehicle.
(2) Motor vehicles with a model year equal to or later than the
first model year for which new vehicles sold to Washington state
residents are required to comply with California motor vehicle emission
standards are exempt from emission inspections under chapter 70.120
RCW.
(3) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to:
(a) The use by a resident of this state of a motor vehicle acquired
and used while the resident is a member of the armed services and is
stationed outside this state pursuant to military orders; and
(b) Motor vehicles purchased by a local police department, county
sheriff, fire district, or the Washington state patrol.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16A.060 and 2011 c 114 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director may not issue or renew a motor vehicle
registration or change the registered owner of a registered vehicle for
any motor vehicle required to be inspected under chapter 70.120 RCW,
unless the application for issuance or renewal is: (a) Accompanied by
a valid certificate of compliance or a valid certificate of acceptance
issued as required under chapter 70.120 RCW; or (b) exempt, as
described in subsection (2) of this section. The certificates must
have a date of validation that is within twelve months of the assigned
registration renewal date. Certificates for fleet or owner tested
diesel vehicles may have a date of validation that is within twelve
months of the assigned registration renewal date.
(2) The following motor vehicles are exempt from emission test
requirements:
(a) Motor vehicles that are less than five years old or more than
twenty-five years old;
(b) Motor vehicles that are a 2009 model year or newer;
(c) Motor vehicles powered exclusively by electricity, propane,
compressed natural gas, or liquid petroleum gas;
(d) Motorcycles as defined in RCW 46.04.330 and motor-driven cycles
as defined in RCW 46.04.332;
(e) Farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.181;
(f) Street rod vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.572 and custom
vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.161;
(g) Used vehicles that are offered for sale by a motor vehicle
dealer licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW;
(h) Classes of motor vehicles exempted by the director of the
department of ecology; and
(i) Hybrid motor vehicles that obtain a rating by the environmental
protection agency of at least fifty miles per gallon of gas during city
driving. For purposes of this section, a hybrid motor vehicle is one
that uses propulsion units powered by both electricity and gas.
(3) The department of ecology shall provide information to motor
vehicle owners:
(a) Regarding the boundaries of emission contributing areas and
restrictions established under this section that apply to vehicles
registered in such areas; and
(b) On the relationship between motor vehicles and air pollution
and steps motor vehicle owners should take to reduce motor vehicle
related air pollution.
(4) The department of licensing shall:
(a) Notify all registered motor vehicle owners affected by the
emission testing program that they must have an emission test to renew
their registration;
(b) Adopt rules implementing and enforcing this section, except for
subsection (2)(e) of this section, as specified in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(5) A motor vehicle may not be registered, leased, rented, or sold
for use in the state, starting with the model year as provided in RCW
70.120A.010, unless the vehicle:
(a) Has seven thousand five hundred miles or more; ((or))
(b) Is a motor vehicle purchased by a local police department,
county sheriff, fire district, or the Washington state patrol; or
(c)(i) Is consistent with the vehicle emission standards and carbon
dioxide equivalent emission standards adopted by the department of
ecology; and
(ii) Has a California certification label for all emission
standards, and carbon dioxide equivalent emission standards necessary
to meet fleet average requirements.
(6) The department of licensing, in consultation with the
department of ecology, may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section and may provide for reasonable exemptions to these
requirements. The department of ecology may exempt public safety
vehicles from meeting the standards where the department finds that
vehicles necessary to meet the needs of public safety agencies are not
otherwise reasonably available.

--- END ---