BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 35.10.540 (Consolidation -- Creation of community municipal
corporation) and 1993 c 75 s 2;
(2) RCW 35.14.010 (When community municipal corporation may be
organized -- Service areas -- Territory) and 1993 c 75 s 1, 1985 c 281 s
24, & 1967 c 73 s 1; and
(3) RCW 35A.14.025 (Election method -- Creation of community
municipal corporation) and 1993 c 75 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 35.14.020 (Community council -- Membership -- Election -- Terms)
and 1985 c 281 s 25 & 1967 c 73 s 2;
(2) RCW 35.14.030 (Community council -- Employees -- Office -- Officers--Quorum -- Meetings -- Compensation and expenses) and 2009 c 549 s 2012 &
1967 c 73 s 3;
(3) RCW 35.14.040 (Ordinances or resolutions of city applying to
land, buildings or structures within corporation, effectiveness -- Zoning
ordinances, resolutions or land use controls to remain in effect upon
annexation or consolidation -- Comprehensive plan) and 1967 c 73 s 4;
(4) RCW 35.14.050 (Powers and duties of community municipal
corporation) and 1967 c 73 s 5; and
(5) RCW 35.14.060 (Original term of existence of community
municipal corporation -- Continuation of existence -- Procedure) and 2009
c 549 s 2013 & 1967 c 73 s 6.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.13.015 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 220 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
In addition to the method prescribed by RCW 35.13.020 for the
commencement of annexation proceedings, the legislative body of any
city or town may, whenever it shall determine by resolution that the
best interests and general welfare of such city or town would be served
by the annexation of unincorporated territory contiguous to such city
or town, file a certified copy of the resolution with the board of
county commissioners of the county in which said territory is located.
The resolution of the city or town initiating such election shall,
subject to RCW 35.02.170, describe the boundaries of the area to be
annexed, as nearly as may be state the number of voters residing
therein, pray for the calling of an election to be held among the
qualified voters therein upon the question of annexation, and provide
that said city or town will pay the cost of the annexation election.
The resolution may require that there also be submitted to the
electorate of the territory sought to be annexed a proposition that all
property within the area annexed shall, upon annexation, be assessed
and taxed at the same rate and on the same basis as the property of
such annexing city or town is assessed and taxed to pay for all or any
portion of the then outstanding indebtedness of the city or town to
which said area is annexed, approved by the voters, contracted, or
incurred prior to, or existing at, the date of annexation. Whenever a
city or town has prepared and filed a comprehensive plan for the area
to be annexed as provided for in RCW 35.13.177 and 35.13.178, the
resolution initiating the election may also provide for the
simultaneous adoption of the comprehensive plan upon approval of
annexation by the electorate of the area to be annexed. ((The
resolution initiating the election may also provide for the
simultaneous creation of a community municipal corporation and election
of community councilmembers as provided for in RCW 35.14.010 through
35.14.060 upon approval of annexation by the electorate of the area to
be annexed. In cities under the optional municipal code the resolution
initiating the election may also provide for the simultaneous inclusion
of the annexed area into a named existing community municipal
corporation. The proposition for the creation of a community municipal
corporation may be submitted as part of the annexation proposition or
may be submitted as a separate proposition. The proposition for
inclusion within a named existing community municipal corporation shall
be submitted as part of the annexation proposition.))

Sec. 4 RCW 35.13.020 and 1981 c 332 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A petition for an election to vote upon the annexation of a portion
of a county to a contiguous city or town signed by qualified voters
resident in the area equal in number to twenty percent of the votes
cast at the last election may be filed in the office of the board of
county commissioners: PROVIDED, That any such petition shall first be
submitted to the prosecuting attorney who shall, within twenty-one days
after submission, certify or refuse to certify the petition as set
forth in RCW 35.13.025. If the prosecuting attorney certifies the
petition, it shall be filed with the legislative body of the city or
town to which the annexation is proposed, and such legislative body
shall, by resolution entered within sixty days from the date of
presentation, notify the petitioners, either by mail or by publication
in the same manner notice of hearing is required by RCW 35.13.040 to be
published, of its approval or rejection of the proposed action. ((The
petition may also provide for the simultaneous creation of a community
municipal corporation and election of community councilmembers as
provided for in RCW 35.14.010 through 35.14.060.)) In approving the
proposed action, the legislative body may require that there also be
submitted to the electorate of the territory to be annexed, a
proposition that all property within the area to be annexed shall, upon
annexation be assessed and taxed at the same rate and on the same basis
as the property of such annexing city or town is assessed and taxed to
pay for all or any portion of the then outstanding indebtedness of the
city or town to which said area is annexed, approved by the voters,
contracted, or incurred prior to, or existing at, the date of
annexation. Only after the legislative body has completed preparation
and filing of a comprehensive plan for the area to be annexed as
provided for in RCW 35.13.177 and 35.13.178, the legislative body in
approving the proposed action, may require that the comprehensive plan
be simultaneously adopted upon approval of annexation by the electorate
of the area to be annexed. The approval of the legislative body shall
be a condition precedent to the filing of such petition with the board
of county commissioners as hereinafter provided. The costs of
conducting such election shall be a charge against the city or town
concerned. The proposition or questions provided for in this section
may be submitted to the voters either separately or as a single
proposition.

Sec. 5 RCW 35.13.030 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 220 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
A petition filed with the county commissioners to call an
annexation election shall, subject to RCW 35.02.170, particularly
describe the boundaries of the area proposed to be annexed, state the
number of voters residing therein as nearly as may be, state the
provisions, if any there be, relating to assumption of debt by the
owners of property of the area proposed to be annexed, and/or the
simultaneous adoption of a comprehensive plan for the area proposed to
be annexed, and shall pray for the calling of an election to be held
among the qualified voters therein upon the question of annexation.
((If the petition also provides for the creation of a community
municipal corporation and election of community councilmembers, the
petition shall also describe the boundaries of the proposed service
area, state the number of voters residing therein as nearly as may be,
and pray for the election of community councilmembers by the qualified
voters residing in the service area.))

Sec. 6 RCW 35.13.080 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 164 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
Notice of an annexation election shall particularly describe the
boundaries of the area proposed to be annexed, ((describe the
boundaries of the proposed service area if the simultaneous creation of
a community municipal corporation is provided for,)) state the objects
of the election as prayed in the petition or as stated in the
resolution and require the voters to cast ballots which shall contain
the words "For annexation" and "Against annexation" or words equivalent
thereto, or contain the words "For annexation and adoption of
comprehensive plan" and "Against annexation and adoption of
comprehensive plan" or words equivalent thereto in case the
simultaneous adoption of a comprehensive plan is proposed, ((and, if
appropriate, the words "For creation of community municipal
corporation" and "Against creation of community municipal corporation"
or words equivalent thereto, or contain the words "For annexation and
creation of community municipal corporation" and "Against annexation
and creation of community municipal corporation" or words equivalent
thereto in case the simultaneous creation of a community municipal
corporation is proposed,)) and which in case the assumption of
indebtedness is proposed, shall contain as a separate proposition, the
words "For assumption of indebtedness" and "Against assumption of
indebtedness" or words equivalent thereto and if only a portion of the
indebtedness of the annexing city or town is to be assumed, an
appropriate separate proposition for and against the assumption of such
portion of the indebtedness shall be submitted to the voters. ((If the
creation of a community municipal corporation and election of community
councilmembers is provided for, the notice shall also require the
voters within the service area to cast ballots for candidates for
positions on such council.)) The notice shall be posted for at least
two weeks prior to the date of election in four public places within
the area proposed to be annexed and published in accordance with the
notice required by RCW 29.27.080 prior to the date of election in a
newspaper of general circulation in the area proposed to be annexed.

Sec. 7 RCW 35.13.090 and 1996 c 286 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The proposition for or against annexation or for or against
annexation and adoption of the comprehensive plan((, or for or against
creation of a community municipal corporation, or any combination
thereof, as the case may be,)) shall be deemed approved if a majority
of the votes cast on that proposition are cast in favor of annexation
or in favor of annexation and adoption of the comprehensive plan((, or
for creation of the community municipal corporation, or any combination
thereof, as the case may be)).
(2) If a proposition for or against assumption of all or any
portion of indebtedness was submitted to the registered voters, it
shall be deemed approved if a majority of at least three-fifths of the
registered voters of the territory proposed to be annexed voting on
such proposition vote in favor thereof, and the number of registered
voters voting on such proposition constitutes not less than forty
percent of the total number of votes cast in such territory at the last
preceding general election.
(3) If either or both propositions were approved by the registered
voters, the county auditor shall on completion of the canvassing of the
returns transmit to the county legislative authority and to the clerk
of the city or town to which annexation is proposed a certificate of
the election results, together with a certified abstract of the vote
showing the whole number who voted at the election, the number of votes
cast for annexation and the number cast against annexation or for
annexation and adoption of the comprehensive plan and the number cast
against annexation and adoption of the comprehensive plan ((or for
creation of a community municipal corporation and the number cast
against creation of a community municipal corporation, or any
combination thereof, as the case may be)).
(4) If a proposition for assumption of all or of any portion of
indebtedness was submitted to the registered voters, the abstract shall
include the number of votes cast for assumption of indebtedness and the
number of votes cast against assumption of indebtedness, together with
a statement of the total number of votes cast in such territory at the
last preceding general election.
(((5) If the proposition for creation of a community municipal
corporation was submitted and approved, the abstract shall include the
number of votes cast for the candidates for community council positions
and certificates of election shall be issued pursuant to RCW 29.27.100
to the successful candidates who shall assume office as soon as
qualified.))

Sec. 8 RCW 35.13.100 and 1996 c 286 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a proposition relating to annexation or annexation and adoption
of the comprehensive plan ((or creation of a community municipal
corporation, or both, as the case may be)) was submitted to the voters
and such proposition was approved, the legislative body shall adopt an
ordinance providing for the annexation or adopt ordinances providing
for the annexation and adoption of the comprehensive plan((, or adopt
an ordinance providing for the annexation and creation of a community
municipal corporation, as the case may be)). If a proposition for
annexation or annexation and adoption of the comprehensive plan ((or
creation of a community municipal corporation, as the case may be,))
and a proposition for assumption of all or of any portion of
indebtedness were both submitted, and were approved, the legislative
body shall adopt an ordinance providing for the annexation or
annexation and adoption of the comprehensive plan ((or annexation and
creation of a community municipal corporation)) including the
assumption of all or of any portion of indebtedness. If the
propositions were submitted and only the annexation ((or annexation and
adoption of the comprehensive plan or annexation and creation of a
community municipal corporation proposition)) was approved, the
legislative body may, if it deems it wise or expedient, adopt an
ordinance providing for the annexation or adopt ordinances providing
for the annexation and adoption of the comprehensive plan((, or adopt
ordinances providing for the annexation and creation of a community
municipal corporation, as the case may be)).

Sec. 9 RCW 35.13.110 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 164 s 10 are each
amended to read as follows:
Upon the date fixed in the ordinance of annexation, the area
annexed shall become a part of the city or town. Upon the date fixed
in the ordinances of annexation and adoption of the comprehensive plan,
the area annexed shall become a part of the city or town and property
in the annexed area shall be subject to and a part of the comprehensive
plan, as prepared and filed as provided for in RCW 35.13.177 and
35.13.178. ((Upon the date fixed in the ordinances of annexation and
creation of a community municipal corporation, the area annexed shall
become a part of the city or town, the community municipal corporation
shall be deemed organized, and property in the service area shall be
deemed subject to the powers granted to such corporation as provided
for in this 1967 amendatory act.)) All property within the territory
hereafter annexed shall, if the proposition approved by the people so
provides after June 12, 1957, be assessed and taxed at the same rate
and on the same basis as the property of such annexing city is assessed
and taxed to pay for all or any portion of the then outstanding
indebtedness of the city or town to which said area is annexed,
approved by the voters, contracted, or incurred prior to, or existing
at, the date of annexation.

Sec. 10 RCW 54.04.035 and 1987 c 292 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to other powers authorized in Title 54 RCW, public
utility districts may annex territory as provided in this section.
The boundaries of a public utility district may be enlarged and new
contiguous territory added pursuant to the procedures for annexation by
cities and towns provided in RCW 35.13.015 through 35.13.110. The
provisions of these sections concerning ((community municipal
corporations,)) review boards((,)) and comprehensive plans, however, do
not apply to public utility district annexations. For purposes of
conforming with such procedures, the public utility district is deemed
to be the city or town and the board of commissioners is deemed to be
the city or town legislative body.
Annexation procedures provided in this section may only be used to
annex territory that is both: (1) Contiguous to the annexing public
utility district; and (2) located within the service area of the
annexing public utility district. As used in this section, a public
utility district's "service area" means those areas whether located
within or outside of the annexing public utility district's boundaries
that were generally served with electrical energy by the annexing
public utility district on January 1, 1987. Such service area may, or
may not, have been recognized in an agreement made under chapter 54.48
RCW, but no area may be included within such service area that was
generally served with electrical energy on January 1, 1987, by another
public utility as defined in RCW 54.48.010. An area proposed to be
annexed may be located in the same or a different county as the
annexing public utility district.
If an area proposed to be annexed is located within the boundaries
of another public utility district, annexation may be initiated only
upon petition of registered voters residing in the area in accordance
with RCW 35.13.020 and adoption by the boards of commissioners of both
districts of identical resolutions stating (a) the boundaries of the
area to be annexed, (b) a determination that annexation is in the
public interest of the residents of the area to be annexed as well as
the public interest of their respective districts, (c) approval of
annexation by the board, (d) the boundaries of the districts after
annexation, (e) the disposition of any assets of the districts in the
area to be annexed, (f) the obligations to be assumed by the annexing
district, (g) apportionment of election costs, and (h) that voters in
the area to be annexed will be advised of lawsuits that may impose
liability on the annexed territory and the possible impact of
annexation on taxes and utility rates.
If annexation is approved, the area annexed shall cease to be a
part of the one public utility district at the same time that it
becomes a part of the other district. The annexing public utility
district shall assume responsibility for providing the area annexed
with the services provided by the other public utility district in the
area annexed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 2 and 10 of this act take effect
January 6, 2014.

--- END ---