BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington voting rights act of 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "At-large method of election" means any of the following
methods of electing members of the governing body of a political
subdivision:
(a) One in which the voters of the entire jurisdiction elect the
members to the governing body;
(b) One in which the candidates are required to reside within given
areas of the jurisdiction and the voters of the entire jurisdiction
elect the members to the governing body; or
(c) One which combines at-large elections with district-based
elections.
(2) "District-based elections" means a method of electing members
to the governing body of a political subdivision in which the candidate
must reside within an election district that is a divisible part of the
political subdivision and is elected only by voters residing within
that election district. District-based elections shall include
elections where only one official is elected in a district-based
election district and shall include the election districts within
existing boundaries of a city, a school district, or other district
organized pursuant to state, county, or local law.
(3) "Political subdivision" means a geographic area of
representation created for the provision of government services
including, but not limited to, a state, a county, a city, a school
district, or other district organized pursuant to state law.
(4) "Protected class" means a class of voters who are members of a
race, color, or language minority group, as this class is referenced
and defined in the federal voting rights act 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1973 et
seq.
(5) "Racially polarized voting" means voting in which there is a
difference, as defined in case law regarding enforcement of the federal
voting rights act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1973 et seq., in the choice of
candidates or other electoral choices that are preferred by voters in
a protected class, and in the choice of candidates and electoral
choices that are preferred by voters in the rest of the electorate.
The methodologies for estimating group voting behavior as approved in
applicable federal cases to enforce the federal voting rights act, 42
U.S.C. Sec. 1973 et seq., to establish racially polarized voting or
other evidence and methodologies which a court finds relevant and
admissible may be used for purposes of this section to prove that
elections are characterized by racially polarized voting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) At-large elections and district-based
elections may not be drawn or maintained in a manner that denies an
equal opportunity of a protected class to elect candidates of its
choice or an equal opportunity to influence the outcome of an election,
as a result of the vote dilution of voters who are members of a
protected class.
(2) An at-large election district or a district-based election
district is dilutive, and in violation of this section, when it is
shown that:
(a) A political subdivision utilizes an at-large or district-based
election district;
(b) The elections in the political subdivision are racially
polarized;
(c) The racially polarized voting in the political subdivision
results in vote dilution where the protected class members do not have
an equal opportunity to elect candidates of their choice or an equal
opportunity to influence the outcome of an election; and
(d) A remedy exists that will provide members of the protected
class with an equal opportunity to elect candidates of their choice or
an equal opportunity to influence the outcome of an election. Such a
remedy will not adversely affect or diminish the impact of those
district-based election districts that are protected by the federal
voting rights act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1973, et seq.
(3) The fact that members of a protected class are not
geographically compact or concentrated to constitute a numerical
majority in a proposed district-based election district shall not
preclude a finding of racially polarized voting that results in vote
dilution.
(4) Racially polarized voting that results in vote dilution is
shown by demonstrating that there is a difference in voting preferences
between members of a protected class and the rest of the electorate.
Such a difference in voting preferences may be demonstrated by the
methodologies specified in section 2(5) of this act or other evidence
and methodologies that a court finds relevant and admissible.
(5) In determining whether there is racially polarized voting that
results in vote dilution under this section, elections for members of
the governing body of the political subdivision or in elections
incorporating other electoral choices by the voters of the political
subdivision shall be analyzed. Only elections conducted prior to the
filing of an action pursuant to this chapter shall be used to establish
or rebut the existence of racially polarized voting that results in
vote dilution.
(6) The occurrence of racially polarized voting that results in
vote dilution will be determined from examining results of elections in
which at least one candidate is a member of a protected class or
elections involving ballot measures, or other electoral choices that
affect the rights and privileges of members of a protected class who
are voters of the political subdivision which is the subject of an
action filed pursuant to this chapter.
(7) The election of candidates who are members of a protected class
and who are preferred by voters of the protected class and who were
elected prior to the filing of this action pursuant to this chapter, as
determined by an analysis of voting behavior, shall not preclude a
finding of racially polarized voting that results in vote dilution.
(8) Members of different protected classes may file an action
jointly pursuant to this chapter if they demonstrate that their
combined voting preferences as a group are different from the rest of
the electorate and demonstrate that there is racially polarized voting
that results in vote dilution consistent with the standards established
in this section.
(9) In an action filed pursuant to this section, ninety days after
the defendant or defendants file an answer, the plaintiff shall
disclose to the other parties the identity of any expert witness
retained to testify regarding the existence of racially polarized
voting that results in vote dilution in elections occurring within the
political subdivision that is the subject of the action. This time
period may be adjusted by the court for good cause.
(10) Ninety days after the defendant or defendants have been served
with the identity and written report of the expert witness retained by
the plaintiff or plaintiffs, the defendant or defendants shall disclose
to the plaintiffs the identity of any expert witness retained to
testify regarding the existence of racially polarized voting.
(11) Disclosure and written reports shall not be required for an
expert that is retained as a nontestifying consultant.
(12) The fact that members of a protected class are not
geographically compact or concentrated to constitute a majority within
an existing district-based election may not preclude a finding of
racially polarized voting that results in vote dilution.
(13) Proof of an intent on the part of the voters or elected
officials to discriminate against a protected class is not required.
(14) For purposes of any applicable statute of limitations, a cause
of action under this section arises every time there is an election
pursuant to an at-large method of election or a district-based election
district that is the subject of an action pursuant to this section.
(15) A plaintiff initiating an action under this section shall not
be required to disclose pursuant to any discovery request or judicial
proceeding under this section whether the plaintiff voted in favor of
a candidate or did not vote in favor of a candidate. A plaintiff
initiating an action under this section shall not be required to
disclose pursuant to any discovery request or proceeding under this
section whether the plaintiff voted in favor or in opposition of any
state propositions and referenda, state initiatives, local measures and
referenda, or local initiatives. The plaintiff's right to the secrecy
of the plaintiff's vote is preserved and is not waived by the filing of
an action pursuant to this section.
(16) In seeking a temporary restraining order or a preliminary
injunction a plaintiff shall not be required to post a bond or any
other security in order to secure such equitable relief.
(l7) An action filed pursuant to this section is a suit based in
equity. As a suit in equity, there is no right to trial by jury.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Upon a finding of a violation of section
3 of this act, the court shall implement appropriate remedies,
including the imposition of a district-based election district that is
tailored to remedy the violation. The court may direct the affected
jurisdiction to draw or redraw district boundaries or appoint an
individual or panel to draw or redraw district lines.
(2) In tailoring a remedy consisting of district-based elections,
the court shall implement a district-based election district that is
geographically compact. The fact that members of a protected class do
not constitute a numerical majority within a proposed district-based
election district shall not preclude the implementation of such a
district-based election district. In tailoring a remedy, the court
shall order the implementation of a district-based election district
where the members of the protected class are not a numerical majority
in order to provide the protected class an equal opportunity to elect
candidates of their choice or an equal opportunity to influence the
outcome of an election.
(3) In tailoring a remedy after a finding of a violation of section
3 of this act, the court shall order new elections to be scheduled at
the next date authorized by state law for conducting elections. All of
the positions that were elected pursuant to the at-large or
district-based election district that was the subject of the action
filed pursuant to this chapter and have at least two years remaining in
their terms of office shall be subject to new elections in order to
continue their term of office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) In any action to enforce this chapter,
the court shall allow the prevailing plaintiff, other than the state or
political subdivision thereof, reasonable attorneys' fees and a fees
multiplier that takes into account the contingency, the novelty and
complexity of the filed action, and litigation expenses including, but
not limited to, expert witness fees and expenses as part of the costs.
(2) Prevailing defendants shall not recover any award of attorneys'
fees.
(3) Prevailing defendants shall not recover any costs, unless the
court finds the action to be frivolous, unreasonable, or without
foundation.
(4) A fees multiplier is determined by the court by multiplying a
numerical value and the fees lodestar. The fees lodestar is determined
by multiplying the number of reasonable hours expended by an attorney
or support personnel, such as law clerks, paralegals, and legal
assistants in the action filed pursuant to this chapter, times a
reasonable hourly rate that is consistent with the rates charged by
attorneys and firms located within a city or an area where the
attorneys and firms filing the action are located.
(5) A prevailing plaintiff shall not be required to first notify a
political subdivision prior to the filing of an action pursuant to this
chapter that such an action will be filed against the political
subdivision in order for a prevailing plaintiff to be awarded
reasonable attorneys' fees, a fees multiplier, and costs pursuant to
this section.
(6) A plaintiff shall be deemed to be a prevailing party for
purposes of this section if the political subdivision which is the
subject of an action filed pursuant to this chapter adopts or
implements a district-based election district after the action is filed
that is different from the district-based election district that is the
subject of the action filed.
(7) A prevailing plaintiff shall recover, as part of reasonable
attorneys' fees and fees multiplier award, work performed in any
ancillary administrative, legislative, or citizen redistricting
commission proceeding where the prevailing plaintiff party sought to
secure a district-based election district that was different from the
district-based election district ultimately adopted by a governing body
or a citizen's redistricting commission and that was ultimately
declared by a court to be in violation of section 3 of this act in an
action filed by the prevailing plaintiff.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Any voter who is a member of a protected
class and who resides in a political subdivision where a violation of
section 3 of this act is alleged may file an action in the superior
court of the county in which the political subdivision is located. If
the action is against a county, the action may be filed in the superior
court of such county, or in the superior court of either of the two
nearest judicial districts as determined pursuant to RCW 36.01.050(2).
There is no requirement that an action filed pursuant to this chapter
be filed as a class action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The provisions of this act are not
applicable to cities and towns with populations under one thousand.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 29A RCW.

--- END ---