BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be known and cited as the
Washington innovation industries enabling act. This chapter is enacted
in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of
protecting the economic well-being and general welfare of the people of
this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature finds that innovation in
the production of goods and services is woven throughout the history,
economy, and culture of Washington state and that the future economic
success of the state will be dependent on our being in the forefront of
innovation. The legislature declares that the promotion of innovation
within private sector companies is a fundamental purpose of state
government and that the commercialization and manufacture of products
within this state is in the public interest.
(2) By this chapter, the legislature intends to accelerate the
growth of industry clusters, strengthen industry collaboration in
innovation, create jobs, enhance public revenues and further the
continued commercialization and manufacture of innovative products in
Washington, and the promotion of Washington's products and services
nationally and globally. It is the purpose of this chapter to:
(a) Enable industry-sponsored organizations to work collaboratively
and provide technical and other joint assistance to help industrial
producers meet their research, commercialization, financial, workforce
training, marketing, exporting, and other industry identified needs;
(b) Assist industrial producers to improve productivity and reduce
costs within a globally competitive environment and remove impairments
to their ability to compete in local, domestic, and foreign markets;
and
(c) Promote industry clusters individually and as part of a
comprehensive state strategy to enhance the innovativeness, quality,
reputation, and sales of Washington's industrial products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Certified industry cluster" means an industry sector, which
may include sector suppliers and associated institutions, which has
been certified by the director as eligible for assistance through
innovation industry funds.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce or
his or her duly appointed representative. The phrase "director or his
or her designee" means the director unless he or she has designated an
administrator, board, or other designee to act in the matter
designated, in which case "director or his or her designee" means the
administrator, board, or other person or persons so designated and not
the director.
(3) "Industry development organization" means a nonprofit,
membership-based organization formed by firms within an industry
cluster for the purpose of providing technical assistance and support
to firms within the industry cluster. Industry development
organization membership may be either statewide in scope or a workforce
development area or areas as determined under the federal workforce
investment act, P.L. 105-220.
(4) "Industry cluster" means a group of firms, as determined by the
director, that share a NAICS classification code or related NAICS
classification codes as assigned by the department of revenue. The
director may determine that firms sharing a NAICS code, such as supply
firms or information technology firms, may be assigned to more than one
industry cluster.
(5)(a) "Innovation allocation" means for the calendar year in which
certification of an industry cluster occurs and any subsequent calendar
year during which an industry cluster is certified for the duration of
the year, fifty percent of the amount, if any, of business and
occupation taxes reported for that calendar year by all business
entities within that certified industry cluster that exceed the
projected tax receipts for that certified industry cluster.
(b) An innovation allocation may not exceed five million dollars.
(6) "Innovation industry funds" means the funds awarded to industry
development organizations under section 6 of this act.
(7) "NAICS" means the North American industry classification
system.
(8) "Projected tax receipts" means the expected business and
occupation tax receipts for a calendar year from all businesses in a
certified industry cluster based on a five-year trend line of state
business and occupation taxes reported by all businesses in that
certified industry cluster, as established by the department of
revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The director is hereby authorized to
implement, administer, and enforce this chapter. The director may
adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this
chapter, including rules that provide for a method to fund, out of the
innovation industry account created in section 7 of this act, the
actual costs, including personnel costs, for carrying out the
director's obligations under this chapter if the costs are not directly
funded by the legislature. The director must administer provisions of
this act to align with the strategic plan and priorities of the
Washington economic development commission.
(2) The director, in consultation with the executive director of
the Washington economic development commission, must:
(a) Establish the process by which firms or industry development
organizations may petition for certification of an industry cluster.
The process must reference the minimum number of firms, or the minimum
percent of the firms within an industry cluster, that must join in the
petition. Industry firm participation in the cluster is voluntary;
(b) Establish industry cluster certification standards. The
certification standards must reference:
(i) The minimum number of firms, which must be at least three, that
may be in a certified industry cluster;
(ii) The minimum rate of employment growth within the certified
industry cluster;
(iii) The minimum rate of revenue growth within the certified
industry cluster;
(iv) The identification of relationships with organizations
critical to accelerating a cluster's innovation capacity and growth,
such as universities and colleges, research organizations, workforce
development organizations, public agencies, local economic development
agencies, innovation partnership zones, and technical assistance
providers; and
(iv) Any other quantitative and qualitative factors as the director
determines are appropriate;
(c) Certify, via certification orders, industry clusters that meet
the certification standards established by the director. The director
may amend or terminate certification orders, consistent with the
standards and rules adopted by the director;
(d) Make the final determination on the NAICS codes that define a
certified industry cluster;
(e) Notify the director of the department of revenue when an
industry cluster has been certified;
(f) Establish the processes, selection criteria, and contractual
requirements relating to the distribution of innovation industry funds;
and
(g) Provide bona fide industry development organizations seeking
innovation industry funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Upon receipt of a certification order
from the director, the department of revenue must establish the
projected tax receipts for a certified industry cluster. The
department of revenue must establish the projected tax receipts by the
later of sixty days following the receipt of the certification order or
September 1st of the year in which the certification order was
received. In determining the projected tax receipts the department of
revenue must use existing data that is compiled in the department of
revenue's normal course of business and used for other purposes. No
corrections to the projected tax receipts for a certified industry
cluster may be made after the department of revenue determines the
initial innovation allocation for that certified industry cluster.
(2) The department of revenue must determine the annual innovation
allocation attributable to each certified industry cluster when the
data is available. Such determination must be made by September 1st of
each year. In determining the annual innovation allocation the
department of revenue must use existing data that is compiled in the
department of revenue's normal course of business and used for other
purposes. No changes to the innovation allocation for a certified
industry cluster may be made after the department of revenue notifies
the state treasurer of that innovation allocation as required in
subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The department of revenue must notify the state treasurer of
the innovation allocations determined under subsection (2) of this
section. When innovation allocations are greater than zero, the state
treasurer must transfer such amounts from the general fund to the
innovation industry account created in section 7 of this act.
(4) The department of revenue must annually provide to the director
such contact information for firms within a certified industry cluster
as is subject to disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(k). The information
required under this subsection must be provided by a date mutually
agreed to by the department of revenue and the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The innovation industry program is
established in the department of commerce. The director may award
funds via contract with industry development organizations to assist
certified industry clusters consistent with the purpose of this
chapter. The period during which awarded funds may be used may be up
to five years. The amount awarded to an industry development
organization must not exceed five million dollars per year and may not
exceed the amount of private sector contributions to the industry
development organization. Industry development organizations must
indicate the certified industry cluster they seek to serve and whether
they intend to provide services statewide or within a substate area.
The director must set qualification standards for industry development
organizations applying for funds under the program including, but not
limited to, the number and the percentage of certified industry cluster
firms in the proposed service area that are members of the industry
development organization.
(2) Innovation industry funds awarded to industry development
organizations may be used for any of the following:
(a) Research and development of better and more efficient
production, processing, transportation, handling, and marketing of
value-added products;
(b) Assistance with quality control and testing of products and
processes;
(c) Workforce training and recruitment;
(d) Incubation and acceleration services;
(e) Export assistance, including the prevention, modification, or
elimination of trade barriers;
(f) Providing marketing information and services including the
development of cooperative efforts;
(g) Providing information and services for meeting energy
efficiency and conservation objectives; and
(h) Any other services as are approved by the director.
(3) Innovation industry funds may not be used for:
(a) Lobbying;
(b) Providing cash grants or loans to businesses; or
(c) Any other purpose prohibited by the director through rule or
contract.
(4) The contracts with industry development organizations must
specify:
(a) The expected deliverables and performance requirements;
(b) The annual reporting requirements; and
(c) That the organizations must demonstrate the maintenance of
previous efforts and the use of innovation industry funds for
activities in addition to and beyond previous efforts.
(5) Priority will be given to those applicants who demonstrate:
(a) The capacity to serve all firms in an industry cluster;
(b) Collaboration with, and the ability to facilitate the goals of,
innovation partnership zones established under RCW 43.330.270; and
(c) Collaboration with centers of excellence established under RCW
28B.50.902 or with other industry specific assistance centers.
(6) Industry development organizations receiving innovation
industry funds may contract with other research, education, management,
and technical assistance providers for services necessary to meet
industry cluster objectives and state contract obligations.
(7) The director may, through interagency agreement or contract,
utilize the services of public or private entities to carry out the
provisions of this chapter.
(8) All activities of the certified industry cluster under the
provisions of this act should not violate United States antitrust law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The innovation industry account is
created in the custody of the state treasury. All receipts from
innovation allocations collected by the department of revenue under
section 5 of this act must be deposited in the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for the innovation industry program
and the costs associated with carrying out the director's obligations
under this chapter. Only the director or the director's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.
(2) The director must keep subaccounts for each certified industry
cluster and must:
(a) Deposit the innovation allocation attributable to each
certified industry cluster into its subaccount after deducting for
administrative costs incurred by innovate Washington; and
(b) Make innovation industry funds available to industry
development organizations from the appropriate certified industry
cluster subaccount.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---