BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 61.24.100 and 1998 c 295 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except to the extent permitted in this section for deeds of
trust securing commercial loans, a deficiency judgment shall not be
obtained on the obligations secured by a deed of trust against any
borrower, grantor, or guarantor after a trustee's sale under that deed
of trust.
(b) A beneficiary may not obtain a deficiency judgment on the
obligations secured by a deed of trust against any borrower, grantor,
or guarantor in any case when, as a consequence of or in conjunction
with a sale of owner-occupied residential real property resulting in
proceeds that were insufficient to pay the obligation in full, the
beneficiary reports to the internal revenue service that the
beneficiary has canceled all or a portion of the borrower's obligation
and the beneficiary provided the borrower written evidence of the
beneficiary's report to the internal revenue service. This subsection
(1)(b) does not apply: (i) To a deed of trust securing a commercial
loan; (ii) to an obligation secured by owner-occupied residential real
property when the funds were used to finance a commercial venture; or
(iii) when the property sold was not occupied by the borrower as the
borrower's principal residence at the time of the sale.
(2)(a) Nothing in this chapter precludes an action against any
person liable on the obligations secured by a deed of trust or any
guarantor prior to a notice of trustee's sale being given pursuant to
this chapter or after the discontinuance of the trustee's sale.
(b) No action under (a) of this subsection precludes the
beneficiary from commencing a judicial foreclosure or trustee's sale
under the deed of trust after the completion or dismissal of that
action.
(3) This chapter does not preclude any one or more of the following
after a trustee's sale under a deed of trust securing a commercial loan
executed after June 11, 1998:
(a)(i) To the extent the fair value of the property sold at the
trustee's sale to the beneficiary or an affiliate of the beneficiary is
less than the unpaid obligation secured by the deed of trust
immediately prior to the trustee's sale, an action for a deficiency
judgment against the borrower or grantor, if such person or persons was
timely given the notices under RCW 61.24.040, for (A) any decrease in
the fair value of the property caused by waste to the property
committed by the borrower or grantor, respectively, after the deed of
trust is granted, and (B) the wrongful retention of any rents,
insurance proceeds, or condemnation awards by the borrower or grantor,
respectively, that are otherwise owed to the beneficiary.
(ii) This subsection (3)(a) does not apply to any property that is
occupied by the borrower as its principal residence as of the date of
the trustee's sale;
(b) Any judicial or nonjudicial foreclosures of any other deeds of
trust, mortgages, security agreements, or other security interests or
liens covering any real or personal property granted to secure the
obligation that was secured by the deed of trust foreclosed; or
(c) Subject to this section, an action for a deficiency judgment
against a guarantor if the guarantor is timely given the notices under
RCW 61.24.042.
(4) Any action referred to in subsection (3)(a) and (c) of this
section shall be commenced within one year after the date of the
trustee's sale, or a later date to which the liable party otherwise
agrees in writing with the beneficiary after the notice of foreclosure
is given, plus any period during which the action is prohibited by a
bankruptcy, insolvency, moratorium, or other similar debtor protection
statute. If there occurs more than one trustee's sale under a deed of
trust securing a commercial loan or if trustee's sales are made
pursuant to two or more deeds of trust securing the same commercial
loan, the one-year limitation in this section begins on the date of the
last of those trustee's sales.
(5) In any action against a guarantor following a trustee's sale
under a deed of trust securing a commercial loan, the guarantor may
request the court or other appropriate adjudicator to determine, or the
court or other appropriate adjudicator may in its discretion determine,
the fair value of the property sold at the sale and the deficiency
judgment against the guarantor shall be for an amount equal to the sum
of the total amount owed to the beneficiary by the guarantor as of the
date of the trustee's sale, less the fair value of the property sold at
the trustee's sale or the sale price paid at the trustee's sale,
whichever is greater, plus interest on the amount of the deficiency
from the date of the trustee's sale at the rate provided in the
guaranty, the deed of trust, or in any other contracts evidencing the
debt secured by the deed of trust, as applicable, and any costs,
expenses, and fees that are provided for in any contract evidencing the
guarantor's liability for such a judgment. If any other security is
sold to satisfy the same debt prior to the entry of a deficiency
judgment against the guarantor, the fair value of that security, as
calculated in the manner applicable to the property sold at the
trustee's sale, shall be added to the fair value of the property sold
at the trustee's sale as of the date that additional security is
foreclosed. This section is in lieu of any right any guarantor would
otherwise have to establish an upset price pursuant to RCW 61.12.060
prior to a trustee's sale.
(6) A guarantor granting a deed of trust to secure its guaranty of
a commercial loan shall be subject to a deficiency judgment following
a trustee's sale under that deed of trust only to the extent stated in
subsection (3)(a)(i) of this section. If the deed of trust encumbers
the guarantor's principal residence, the guarantor shall be entitled to
receive an amount up to the homestead exemption set forth in RCW
6.13.030, without regard to the effect of RCW 6.13.080(2), from the bid
at the foreclosure or trustee's sale accepted by the sheriff or trustee
prior to the application of the bid to the guarantor's obligation.
(7) A beneficiary's acceptance of a deed in lieu of a trustee's
sale under a deed of trust securing a commercial loan exonerates the
guarantor from any liability for the debt secured thereby except to the
extent the guarantor otherwise agrees as part of the deed in lieu
transaction.
(8) This chapter does not preclude a beneficiary from foreclosing
a deed of trust in the same manner as a real property mortgage and this
section does not apply to such a foreclosure.
(9) Any contract, note, deed of trust, or guaranty may, by its
express language, prohibit the recovery of any portion or all of a
deficiency after the property encumbered by the deed of trust securing
a commercial loan is sold at a trustee's sale.
(10) A trustee's sale under a deed of trust securing a commercial
loan does not preclude an action to collect or enforce any obligation
of a borrower or guarantor if that obligation, or the substantial
equivalent of that obligation, was not secured by the deed of trust.
(11) Unless the guarantor otherwise agrees, a trustee's sale shall
not impair any right or agreement of a guarantor to be reimbursed by a
borrower or grantor for a deficiency judgment against the guarantor.
(12) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
rights and obligations of any borrower, grantor, and guarantor
following a trustee's sale under a deed of trust securing a commercial
loan or any guaranty of such a loan executed prior to June 11, 1998,
shall be determined in accordance with the laws existing prior to June
11, 1998.

--- END ---