BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the
contrary, a public utility district bordered by the Columbia river may
supply water from a pumped storage generating facility under its
control to be used in a pumped storage generating facility to any
entity that sells water, directly or indirectly, to the public, and
contracts therefor must extend over the period of years and contain the
terms and conditions for the sale thereof as the commission of the
public utility district elects. Such a contract may only be made
pursuant to resolution of the commission authorizing such a contract,
and the resolution must be introduced at a meeting of the commission at
least ten days prior to the date of the adoption of the resolution.
However, the commission shall first make adequate provision for the
needs of the public utility district, both actual and prospective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---