BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature intends to clarify that
a seller who advertises the price as including the sales tax or that
the seller is paying the sales tax must separately state the amount of
sales tax due on any sales invoice or other instrument of sale given to
the buyer and that this requirement is a precondition for excluding the
tax from the selling price for purposes of determining the proper
amount of sales tax to be remitted by the seller to the department of
revenue.
(2) The legislature finds that failing to separately itemize the
sales tax on invoices or other instruments of sale lacks transparency,
may have adverse consequences for buyers, may lead to disputes between
the department and taxpayers, and may make it more difficult for the
department to ensure compliance with sales and use tax laws resulting
in reduced tax revenues to the state.
(3) Therefore, it is the legislature's intent to ensure consistent
treatment for all sellers, regardless of their advertising practices,
by clarifying that sales tax must be computed on the gross price
charged to customers when the seller fails to separately itemize the
sales tax on any instrument of sale given to the buyer, regardless of
whether the seller advertises the selling price as including the sales
tax or that the seller is paying the sales tax. As a clarification of
the law, this act applies both retroactively as well as prospectively.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.050 and 2010 c 112 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax imposed in this chapter must be paid by the buyer to
the seller. Each seller must collect from the buyer the full amount of
the tax payable in respect to each taxable sale in accordance with the
schedule of collections adopted by the department under the provisions
of RCW 82.08.060.
(2) The tax required by this chapter, to be collected by the
seller, is deemed to be held in trust by the seller until paid to the
department. Any seller who appropriates or converts the tax collected
to the seller's own use or to any use other than the payment of the tax
to the extent that the money required to be collected is not available
for payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is guilty of
a gross misdemeanor.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if any seller
fails to collect the tax imposed in this chapter or, having collected
the tax, fails to pay it to the department in the manner prescribed by
this chapter, whether such failure is the result of the seller's own
acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the seller's control,
the seller is, nevertheless, personally liable to the state for the
amount of the tax.
(4) Sellers are not relieved from personal liability for the amount
of the tax unless they maintain proper records of exempt or nontaxable
transactions and provide them to the department when requested.
(5) Sellers are not relieved from personal liability for the amount
of tax if they fraudulently fail to collect the tax or if they solicit
purchasers to participate in an unlawful claim of exemption.
(6) Sellers are not relieved from personal liability for the amount
of tax if they accept an exemption certificate from a purchaser
claiming an entity-based exemption if:
(a) The subject of the transaction sought to be covered by the
exemption certificate is actually received by the purchaser at a
location operated by the seller in Washington; and
(b) Washington provides an exemption certificate that clearly and
affirmatively indicates that the claimed exemption is not available in
Washington. Graying out exemption reason types on a uniform form and
posting it on the department's web site is a clear and affirmative
indication that the grayed out exemptions are not available.
(7)(a) Sellers are relieved from personal liability for the amount
of tax if they obtain a fully completed exemption certificate or
capture the relevant data elements required under the streamlined sales
and use tax agreement within ninety days, or a longer period as may be
provided by rule by the department, subsequent to the date of sale.
(b) If the seller has not obtained an exemption certificate or all
relevant data elements required under the streamlined sales and use tax
agreement within the period allowed subsequent to the date of sale, the
seller may, within one hundred twenty days, or a longer period as may
be provided by rule by the department, subsequent to a request for
substantiation by the department, either prove that the transaction was
not subject to tax by other means or obtain a fully completed exemption
certificate from the purchaser, taken in good faith.
(c) Sellers are relieved from personal liability for the amount of
tax if they obtain a blanket exemption certificate for a purchaser with
which the seller has a recurring business relationship. The department
may not request from a seller renewal of blanket exemption certificates
or updates of exemption certificate information or data elements if
there is a recurring business relationship between the buyer and
seller. For purposes of this subsection (7)(c), a "recurring business
relationship" means at least one sale transaction within a period of
twelve consecutive months.
(d) Sellers are relieved from personal liability for the amount of
tax if they obtain a copy of a direct pay permit issued under RCW
82.32.087.
(8) The amount of tax, until paid by the buyer to the seller or to
the department, constitutes a debt from the buyer to the seller. Any
seller who fails or refuses to collect the tax as required with intent
to violate the provisions of this chapter or to gain some advantage or
benefit, either direct or indirect, and any buyer who refuses to pay
any tax due under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(9)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, the
tax required by this chapter to be collected by the seller must be
stated separately from the selling price in any sales invoice or other
instrument of sale. ((On all retail sales through vending machines,
the tax need not be stated separately from the selling price or
collected separately from the buyer.)) Except as otherwise provided in
this subsection, for purposes of determining the tax due from the buyer
to the seller and from the seller to the department it must be
conclusively presumed that the selling price quoted in any price list,
sales document, contract or other agreement between the parties does
not include the tax imposed by this chapter. But if the seller
advertises the price as including the tax or that the seller is paying
the tax, the advertised price may not be considered the selling price,
provided that the seller separately states the sales tax from the
selling price on any sales invoice or other instrument of sale given to
the buyer.
(b) On all retail sales through vending machines, the tax need not
be stated separately from the selling price or collected separately
from the buyer.
(10) Where a buyer has failed to pay to the seller the tax imposed
by this chapter and the seller has not paid the amount of the tax to
the department, the department may, in its discretion, proceed directly
against the buyer for collection of the tax. If the department
proceeds directly against the buyer for collection of the tax as
authorized in this subsection, the department may add a penalty of ten
percent of the unpaid tax to the amount of the tax due for failure of
the buyer to pay the tax to the seller, regardless of when the tax may
be collected by the department. In addition to the penalty authorized
in this subsection, all of the provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW,
including those relative to interest and penalties, apply. For the
sole purpose of applying the various provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW,
the twenty-fifth day of the month following the tax period in which the
purchase was made will be considered as the due date of the tax.
(11) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (10) of this section,
any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by
this chapter if:
(a) The person's activities in this state, whether conducted
directly or through another person, are limited to:
(i) The storage, dissemination, or display of advertising;
(ii) The taking of orders; or
(iii) The processing of payments; and
(b) The activities are conducted electronically via a web site on
a server or other computer equipment located in Washington that is not
owned or operated by the person making sales into this state nor owned
or operated by an affiliated person. "Affiliated persons" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.424.
(12) Subsection (11) of this section expires when: (a) The United
States congress grants individual states the authority to impose sales
and use tax collection duties on remote sellers; or (b) it is
determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a judgment not
subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use tax collection
duties on remote sellers.
(13) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Exemption certificate" means documentation furnished by a
buyer to a seller to claim an exemption from sales tax. An exemption
certificate includes a reseller permit or other documentation
authorized in RCW 82.04.470 furnished by a buyer to a seller to
substantiate a wholesale sale; and
(b) "Seller" includes a certified service provider, as defined in
RCW 82.32.020, acting as agent for the seller.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.055 and 1985 c 38 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A seller may advertise the price as including the sales tax or
that the seller is paying the sales tax, subject to the following
conditions:
(((1))) (a) Unless the advertised price is one in a listed series,
the words "tax included" are stated immediately following the
advertised price and in print size at least half as large as the
advertised price;
(((2))) (b) If the advertised prices are listed in a series, the
words "tax included in all prices" are placed conspicuously at the head
of the list and in the same print size as the advertised prices;
(((3))) (c) If a price is advertised as "tax included," the price
listed on any price tag ((shall)) must be shown in the same manner; and
(((4))) (d) All advertised prices and the words "tax included" are
stated in the same medium, be it oral or visual, and if oral, in
substantially the same inflection and volume.
(2) A seller that advertises as provided in subsection (1) of this
section must separately state the sales tax from the selling price on
any sales invoice or other instrument of sale given to the buyer, as
provided by RCW 82.08.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies prospectively as well as
retroactively to tax periods open for assessment or refund of taxes
under RCW 82.32.050 or 82.32.060, including any refund claims or
disputed assessments pending before the department of revenue, board of
tax appeals, or any court of law.

--- END ---