BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.04.080 and 2007 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
On all claims under this title, claimants' written notices, orders,
or warrants must be forwarded directly to the claimant until such time
as there has been entered an order on the claim appealable to the board
of industrial insurance appeals in the claimant's primary language as
designated in the claimant's application under RCW 51.28.020 or
51.28.030. Claimants' written notices, orders, or warrants may be
forwarded to the claimant in care of a representative before an order
has been entered if the claimant sets forth in writing the name and
address of the representative to whom the claimant desires this
information to be forwarded. If the claimant's application under RCW
51.28.020 or 51.28.030 designates a primary language other than English
and the claimant has designated a representative, the department shall,
upon request from the claimant's representative, send all
correspondence, written notices, and orders to the claimant's
representative in English rather than the primary language on the
claimant's application.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.28.010 and 2007 c 77 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any accident occurs to any worker it shall be the duty
of such worker or someone in his or her behalf to forthwith report such
accident to his or her employer, superintendent, or supervisor in
charge of the work, and of the employer to at once report such accident
and the injury resulting therefrom to the department pursuant to RCW
51.28.025 where the worker has received treatment from a physician or
a licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, has been
hospitalized, disabled from work, or has died as the apparent result of
such accident and injury. The report of an accident shall allow the
worker to designate a primary language for purposes of communication
with respect to the claim.
(2) Upon receipt of such notice of accident, the department shall
immediately forward to the worker or his or her beneficiaries or
dependents notification, in nontechnical language, and in the language
designated by the worker, of their rights under this title. The notice
must specify the worker's right to receive health services from a
physician or a licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner of the
worker's choice under RCW 51.36.010, including chiropractic services
under RCW 51.36.015, and must list the types of providers authorized to
provide these services.
(3) Employers shall not engage in claim suppression.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "claim suppression" means
intentionally:
(a) Inducing employees to fail to report injuries;
(b) Inducing employees to treat injuries in the course of
employment as off-the-job injuries; or
(c) Acting otherwise to suppress legitimate industrial insurance
claims.
(5) In determining whether an employer has engaged in claim
suppression, the department shall consider the employer's history of
compliance with industrial insurance reporting requirements, and
whether the employer has discouraged employees from reporting injuries
or filing claims. The department has the burden of proving claim
suppression by a preponderance of the evidence.
(6) Claim suppression does not include bona fide workplace safety
and accident prevention programs or an employer's provision at the
worksite of first aid as defined by the department. The department
shall adopt rules defining bona fide workplace safety and accident
prevention programs and defining first aid.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.28.020 and 2005 c 108 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Where a worker is entitled to compensation under this title
he or she shall file with the department or his or her self-insured
employer, as the case may be, his or her application for such, together
with the certificate of the physician or licensed advanced registered
nurse practitioner who attended him or her. An application form
developed by the department shall include a notice specifying the
worker's right to receive health services from a physician or licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioner of the worker's choice under RCW
51.36.010, including chiropractic services under RCW 51.36.015, and
listing the types of providers authorized to provide these services.
The application form shall allow the worker to designate a primary
language for purposes of communication with respect to the claim.
(b) The physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner who attended the injured worker shall inform the injured
worker of his or her rights under this title and lend all necessary
assistance in making this application for compensation and such proof
of other matters as required by the rules of the department without
charge to the worker. The department shall provide physicians with a
manual which outlines the procedures to be followed in applications for
compensation involving occupational diseases, and which describes
claimants' rights and responsibilities related to occupational disease
claims.
(2) If the application required by this section is:
(a) Filed on behalf of the worker by the physician who attended the
worker, the physician may transmit the application to the department
electronically using facsimile mail;
(b) Made to the department and the employer has not received a copy
of the application, the department shall immediately send a copy of the
application to the employer; or
(c) Made to a self-insured employer, the employer shall forthwith
send a copy of the application to the department.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.28.030 and 2004 c 65 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Where death results from injury the parties entitled to
compensation under this title, or someone in their behalf, shall make
application for the same to the department or self-insurer as the case
may be, which application must be accompanied with proof of death and
proof of relationship showing the parties to be entitled to
compensation under this title, certificates of attending physician or
licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, if any, and such proof
as required by the rules of the department. An application form
developed by the department must allow the parties to designate a
primary language for purposes of communication with respect to the
claim.
Upon receipt of notice of accident under RCW 51.28.010, the
director shall immediately forward to the party or parties required to
make application for compensation under this section, notification, in
nontechnical language, of their rights under this title.

Sec. 5 RCW 51.32.095 and 2011 c 291 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) One of the primary purposes of this title is to enable the
injured worker to become employable at gainful employment. To this
end, the department or self-insurers shall utilize the services of
individuals and organizations, public or private, whose experience,
training, and interests in vocational rehabilitation and retraining
qualify them to lend expert assistance to the supervisor of industrial
insurance in such programs of vocational rehabilitation as may be
reasonable to make the worker employable consistent with his or her
physical and mental status. Where, after evaluation and recommendation
by such individuals or organizations and prior to final evaluation of
the worker's permanent disability and in the sole opinion of the
supervisor or supervisor's designee, whether or not medical treatment
has been concluded, vocational rehabilitation is both necessary and
likely to enable the injured worker to become employable at gainful
employment, the supervisor or supervisor's designee may, in his or her
sole discretion, pay or, if the employer is a self-insurer, direct the
self-insurer to pay the cost as provided in subsection (4) of this
section or RCW 51.32.099, as appropriate. An injured worker may not
participate in vocational rehabilitation under this section or RCW
51.32.099 if such participation would result in a payment of benefits
as described in RCW 51.32.240(5), and any benefits so paid shall be
recovered according to the terms of that section.
(2) When in the sole discretion of the supervisor or the
supervisor's designee vocational rehabilitation is both necessary and
likely to make the worker employable at gainful employment, then the
following order of priorities shall be used:
(a) Return to the previous job with the same employer;
(b) Modification of the previous job with the same employer
including transitional return to work;
(c) A new job with the same employer in keeping with any
limitations or restrictions;
(d) Modification of a new job with the same employer including
transitional return to work;
(e) Modification of the previous job with a new employer;
(f) A new job with a new employer or self-employment based upon
transferable skills;
(g) Modification of a new job with a new employer;
(h) A new job with a new employer or self-employment involving on-the-job training;
(i) Short-term retraining and job placement.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, vocational
services may be provided to an injured worker who has suffered the loss
or complete use of both legs, or arms, or one leg and one arm, or total
eyesight when, in the sole discretion of the supervisor or the
supervisor's designee, these services will either substantially improve
the worker's quality of life or substantially improve the worker's
ability to function in an employment setting, regardless of whether or
not these services are either necessary or reasonably likely to make
the worker employable at any gainful employment. Vocational services
must be completed prior to the commencement of the worker's entitlement
to benefits under RCW 51.32.060. However, workers who are eligible for
vocational services under this subsection are not eligible for option
2 benefits, as provided in RCW 51.32.099(4).
(4)(a) For vocational plans approved prior to July 1, 1999, costs
for vocational rehabilitation benefits allowed by the supervisor or
supervisor's designee under subsection (1) of this section may include
the cost of books, tuition, fees, supplies, equipment, transportation,
child or dependent care, and other necessary expenses for any such
worker in an amount not to exceed three thousand dollars in any fifty-two week period, and the cost of continuing the temporary total
disability compensation under RCW 51.32.090 while the worker is
actively and successfully undergoing a formal program of vocational
rehabilitation.
(b) When the department has approved a vocational plan for a worker
between July 1, 1999, through December 31, 2007, costs for vocational
rehabilitation benefits allowed by the supervisor or supervisor's
designee under subsection (1) of this section may include the cost of
books, tuition, fees, supplies, equipment, child or dependent care, and
other necessary expenses for any such worker in an amount not to exceed
four thousand dollars in any fifty-two week period, and the cost of
transportation and continuing the temporary total disability
compensation under RCW 51.32.090 while the worker is actively and
successfully undergoing a formal program of vocational rehabilitation.
(c) The expenses allowed under (a) or (b) of this subsection may
include training fees for on-the-job training and the cost of
furnishing tools and other equipment necessary for self-employment or
reemployment. However, compensation or payment of retraining with job
placement expenses under (a) or (b) of this subsection may not be
authorized for a period of more than fifty-two weeks, except that such
period may, in the sole discretion of the supervisor after his or her
review, be extended for an additional fifty-two weeks or portion
thereof by written order of the supervisor.
(d) In cases where the worker is required to reside away from his
or her customary residence, the reasonable cost of board and lodging
shall also be paid.
(e) Costs paid under this subsection shall be chargeable to the
employer's cost experience or shall be paid by the self-insurer as the
case may be.
(5) In addition to the vocational rehabilitation expenditures
provided for under subsection (4) of this section and RCW 51.32.099, an
additional five thousand dollars may, upon authorization of the
supervisor or the supervisor's designee, be expended for: (a)
Accommodations for an injured worker that are medically necessary for
the worker to participate in an approved retraining plan; and (b)
accommodations necessary to perform the essential functions of an
occupation in which an injured worker is seeking employment, consistent
with the retraining plan or the recommendations of a vocational
evaluation. The injured worker's attending physician or licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioner must verify the necessity of the
modifications or accommodations. The total expenditures authorized in
this subsection and the expenditures authorized under RCW 51.32.250
shall not exceed five thousand dollars.
(6) When the department has approved a vocational plan for a worker
prior to January 1, 2008, regardless of whether the worker has begun
participating in the approved plan, costs for vocational rehabilitation
benefits allowed by the supervisor or supervisor's designee under
subsection (1) of this section are limited to those provided under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section.
For vocational plans approved for a worker between January 1, 2008,
through June 30, 2013, total vocational costs allowed by the supervisor
or supervisor's designee under subsection (1) of this section shall be
limited to those provided under the pilot program established in RCW
51.32.099, and vocational rehabilitation services shall conform to the
requirements in RCW 51.32.099.
(7) The department shall establish criteria to monitor the quality
and effectiveness of rehabilitation services provided by the
individuals and organizations used under subsection (1) of this section
and under RCW 51.32.099. The state fund shall make referrals for
vocational rehabilitation services based on these performance criteria.
(8) The department shall engage in, where feasible and cost-effective, a cooperative program with the state employment security
department to provide job placement services under this section and RCW
51.32.099.
(9) The benefits in this section and RCW 51.32.099 shall be
provided for the injured workers of self-insured employers. Self-insurers shall report both benefits provided and benefits denied under
this section and RCW 51.32.099 in the manner prescribed by the
department by rule adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The director may,
in his or her sole discretion and upon his or her own initiative or at
any time that a dispute arises under this section or RCW 51.32.099,
promptly make such inquiries as circumstances require and take such
other action as he or she considers will properly determine the matter
and protect the rights of the parties.
(10) Except as otherwise provided in this section or RCW 51.32.099,
the benefits provided for in this section and RCW 51.32.099 are
available to any otherwise eligible worker regardless of the date of
industrial injury. However, claims shall not be reopened solely for
vocational rehabilitation purposes.
(11) If the application for benefits under RCW 51.28.020 designates
a primary language other than English, the worker must be provided
interpreter services for any vocational meetings conducted pursuant to
this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 51.32.110 and 1997 c 325 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any worker entitled to receive any benefits or claiming such
under this title shall, if requested by the department or self-insurer,
submit himself or herself for medical examination, at a time and from
time to time, at a place reasonably convenient for the worker and as
may be provided by the rules of the department. An injured worker,
whether an alien or other injured worker, who is not residing in the
United States at the time that a medical examination is requested may
be required to submit to an examination at any location in the United
States determined by the department or self-insurer. If the
application for benefits under RCW 51.28.020 designates a primary
language other than English, the worker must be provided interpreter
services for any examination under this section.
(2) If the worker refuses to submit to medical examination, or
obstructs the same, or, if any injured worker shall persist in
unsanitary or injurious practices which tend to imperil or retard his
or her recovery, or shall refuse to submit to such medical or surgical
treatment as is reasonably essential to his or her recovery or refuse
or obstruct evaluation or examination for the purpose of vocational
rehabilitation or does not cooperate in reasonable efforts at such
rehabilitation, the department or the self-insurer upon approval by the
department, with notice to the worker may suspend any further action on
any claim of such worker so long as such refusal, obstruction,
noncooperation, or practice continues and reduce, suspend, or deny any
compensation for such period: PROVIDED, That the department or the
self-insurer shall not suspend any further action on any claim of a
worker or reduce, suspend, or deny any compensation if a worker has
good cause for refusing to submit to or to obstruct any examination,
evaluation, treatment, or practice requested by the department or
required under this section.
(3) If the worker necessarily incurs traveling expenses in
attending the examination pursuant to the request of the department or
the self-insurer, such traveling expenses shall be repaid to him or her
out of the accident fund upon proper voucher and audit or shall be
repaid by the self-insurer, as the case may be.
(4)(a) If the medical examination required by this section causes
the worker to be absent from his or her work without pay:
(i) In the case of a worker insured by the department, the worker
shall be paid compensation out of the accident fund in an amount equal
to his or her usual wages for the time lost from work while attending
the medical examination; or
(ii) In the case of a worker of a self-insurer, the self-insurer
shall pay the worker an amount equal to his or her usual wages for the
time lost from work while attending the medical examination.
(b) This subsection (4) shall apply prospectively to all claims
regardless of the date of injury.

Sec. 7 RCW 51.52.060 and 1995 c 253 s 1 and 1995 c 199 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this section,
a worker, beneficiary, employer, health services provider, or other
person aggrieved by an order, decision, or award of the department
must, before he or she appeals to the courts, file with the board and
the director, by mail or personally, within sixty days from the day on
which a copy of the order, decision, or award was communicated to such
person, a notice of appeal to the board. However, a health services
provider or other person aggrieved by a department order or decision
making demand, whether with or without penalty, solely for repayment of
sums paid to a provider of medical, dental, vocational, or other health
services rendered to an industrially injured worker must, before he or
she appeals to the courts, file with the board and the director, by
mail or personally, within twenty days from the day on which a copy of
the order or decision was communicated to the health services provider
upon whom the department order or decision was served, a notice of
appeal to the board. If the application under RCW 51.28.020 or
51.28.030 designates a primary language other than English, the order
is not communicated for purposes of the sixty-day requirement under
this subsection, until it is communicated in the language so
designated.
(b) Failure to file a notice of appeal with ((both)) the board and
the department shall not be grounds for denying the appeal if the
notice of appeal is filed with either the board or the department.
(2) Within ten days of the date on which an appeal has been granted
by the board, the board shall notify the other interested parties to
the appeal of the receipt of the appeal and shall forward a copy of the
notice of appeal to the other interested parties. Within twenty days
of the receipt of such notice of the board, the worker or the employer
may file with the board a cross-appeal from the order of the department
from which the original appeal was taken.
(3) If within the time limited for filing a notice of appeal to the
board from an order, decision, or award of the department, the
department directs the submission of further evidence or the
investigation of any further fact, the time for filing the notice of
appeal shall not commence to run until the person has been advised in
writing of the final decision of the department in the matter. In the
event the department directs the submission of further evidence or the
investigation of any further fact, as provided in this section, the
department shall render a final order, decision, or award within ninety
days from the date further submission of evidence or investigation of
further fact is ordered which time period may be extended by the
department for good cause stated in writing to all interested parties
for an additional ninety days.
(4) The department, either within the time limited for appeal, or
within thirty days after receiving a notice of appeal, may:
(a) Modify, reverse, or change any order, decision, or award; or
(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, hold an
order, decision, or award in abeyance for a period of ninety days which
time period may be extended by the department for good cause stated in
writing to all interested parties for an additional ninety days pending
further investigation in light of the allegations of the notice of
appeal; or
(ii) Hold an order, decision, or award issued under RCW 51.32.160
in abeyance for a period not to exceed ninety days from the date of
receipt of an application under RCW 51.32.160. The department may
extend the ninety-day time period for an additional sixty days for good
cause.
For purposes of this subsection, good cause includes delay that
results from conduct of the claimant that is subject to sanction under
RCW 51.32.110.
The board shall deny the appeal upon the issuance of an order under
(b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection holding an earlier order, decision,
or award in abeyance, without prejudice to the appellant's right to
appeal from any subsequent determinative order issued by the
department.
This subsection (4)(b) does not apply to applications deemed
granted under RCW 51.32.160.
(5) An employer shall have the right to appeal an application
deemed granted under RCW 51.32.160 on the same basis as any other
application adjudicated pursuant to that section.
(6) A provision of this section shall not be deemed to change,
alter, or modify the practice or procedure of the department for the
payment of awards pending appeal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act applies to all claims open after
January 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 5 of this act expires June 30, 2013.

--- END ---