BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.150 and 1997 c 321 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license to manufacturers of liquor, including
all kinds of manufacturers except those licensed as distillers,
domestic brewers, microbreweries, wineries, and domestic wineries,
authorizing such licensees to manufacture, import, sell, and export
liquor from the state; fee five hundred dollars per annum.
(2) A manufacturer licensed under this section may sell liquor of
its own production for consumption off the premises, up to two liters
per person per day, at its licensed premises. A manufacturer selling
liquor under this subsection must comply with the applicable laws and
rules relating to retailers.
(3) A manufacturer licensed under this section may provide, free of
charge, one-half ounce or less samples of liquor of its own production
to persons on the licensed premises. The maximum total per person per
day is two ounces. Every person who participates in any manner in the
service of samples must obtain a class 12 alcohol server permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To promote economic development and the ability for businesses
to market products in Washington, licensed distillers, manufacturers,
domestic breweries, microbreweries, and domestic wineries may create
joint tasting locations where participating licensees may market and
sell their products as provided in this section. A licensed distiller,
manufacturer, domestic brewery, microbrewery, and domestic winery may
serve samples of and sell at retail liquor of its own production for
consumption on and off the premises, at up to two locations separate
from its production or manufacturing sites. For a winery, the combined
limit on locations under this section and RCW 66.24.170(4) is two
locations. Samples may be served with or without charge. Multiple
licensees may sell and serve liquor under this section at a single
location. Each location must be approved by the board under RCW
66.24.010. Each additional location is deemed to be part of the
distiller, manufacturer, domestic brewery, microbrewery, and domestic
winery license, as applicable, for the purpose of this title.
(2) Any person selling or serving liquor under this section for on-premise consumption must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server
permit.
(3) Food must be available at the joint tasting location.
(4) Samples of spirits under this section must be one-quarter ounce
or less. The maximum total per person per day of spirits samples by a
licensee is one ounce. Sales of spirits by a licensee for off-premises
consumption are limited to two liters per person per day.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.28.295 and 2011 c 66 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in RCW 66.28.290 shall prohibit:
(1) A licensed domestic brewery or microbrewery from being licensed
as a retailer pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling
beer or wine at retail on the brewery premises and at one additional
off-site retail only location.
(2) A domestic winery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to
chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on
the winery premises. Such beer and wine so sold at retail shall be
subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210 and to
reporting and bonding requirements as prescribed by regulations adopted
by the board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, and beer and wine that is
not produced by the brewery or winery shall be purchased from a
licensed beer or wine distributor.
(3) A microbrewery holding a beer and/or wine restaurant license
under RCW 66.24.320 from holding the same privileges and endorsements
attached to the beer and/or wine restaurant license.
(4) A licensed craft distillery from selling spirits of its own
production under RCW 66.24.145 or section 2 of this act.
(5) A licensed manufacturer from selling spirits of its own
production under RCW 66.24.150 or section 2 of this act.
(6) A licensed distiller, domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic
winery, or a lessee of a licensed domestic brewer, microbrewery, or
domestic winery, from being licensed as a spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling
liquor at a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant premises on the property
on which the primary manufacturing facility of the licensed distiller,
domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery is located or on
contiguous property owned or leased by the licensed distiller, domestic
brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery as prescribed by rules adopted
by the board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
(((6))) (7) A microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant license under RCW 66.24.420 from holding the same privileges
and endorsements attached to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license.
(((7))) (8) A brewery or microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license or a beer and/or wine license under chapter
66.24 RCW operated on the premises of the brewery or microbrewery from
holding a second retail only license at a location separate from the
premises of the brewery or microbrewery.
(((8))) (9) Retail licensees with a caterer's endorsement issued
under RCW 66.24.320 or 66.24.420 from operating on a domestic winery
premises.
(((9))) (10) An organization qualifying under RCW 66.24.375 formed
for the purpose of constructing and operating a facility to promote
Washington wines from holding retail licenses on the facility property
or leasing all or any portion of such facility property to a retail
licensee on the facility property if the members of the board of
directors or officers of the board for the organization include
officers, directors, owners, or employees of a licensed domestic
winery. Financing for the construction of the facility must include
both public and private money.
(((10))) (11) A bona fide charitable nonprofit society or
association registered under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the
federal internal revenue code, or a local wine industry association
registered under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(6) of the federal internal
revenue code as it existed on July 22, 2007, and having an officer,
director, owner, or employee of a licensed domestic winery or a wine
certificate of approval holder on its board of directors from holding
a special occasion license under RCW 66.24.380.
(((11))) (12) A person licensed pursuant to RCW 66.24.170,
66.24.240, or 66.24.244 from exercising the privileges of distributing
and selling at retail such person's own production or from exercising
any other right or privilege that attaches to such license or from
selling at retail such person's own production under section 2 of this
act.
(((12))) (13) A person holding a certificate of approval pursuant
to RCW 66.24.206 from obtaining an endorsement to act as a distributor
of their own product or from shipping their own product directly to
consumers as authorized by RCW 66.20.360.
(((13))) (14) A person holding a wine shipper's permit pursuant to
RCW 66.20.375 from shipping their own product directly to consumers.
(((14))) (15) A person holding a certificate of approval pursuant
to RCW 66.24.270(2) from obtaining an endorsement to act as a
distributor of their own product.
(((15))) (16) A domestic winery and a restaurant licensed under RCW
66.24.320 or 66.24.400 from entering an arrangement to waive a corkage
fee.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.28.040 and 2012 c 2 s 116 (Initiative Measure No.
1183) are each amended to read as follows:
Except as permitted by the board under RCW 66.20.010, no domestic
brewery, microbrewery, distributor, distiller, domestic winery,
importer, rectifier, certificate of approval holder, or other
manufacturer of liquor may, within the state of Washington, give to any
person any liquor; but nothing in this section nor in RCW 66.28.305
prevents a domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor, domestic
winery, distiller, certificate of approval holder, or importer from
furnishing samples of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to authorized
licensees for the purpose of negotiating a sale, in accordance with
regulations adopted by the liquor control board, provided that the
samples are subject to taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
nothing in this section prevents a domestic brewery, microbrewery,
domestic winery, distillery, certificate of approval holder, or
distributor from furnishing beer, wine, or spirituous liquor for
instructional purposes under RCW 66.28.150; nothing in this section
prevents a domestic winery, certificate of approval holder, or
distributor from furnishing wine without charge, subject to the taxes
imposed by RCW 66.24.210, to a not-for-profit group organized and
operated solely for the purpose of enology or the study of viticulture
which has been in existence for at least six months and that uses wine
so furnished solely for such educational purposes or a domestic winery,
or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from furnishing wine
without charge or a domestic brewery, or an out-of-state certificate of
approval holder, from furnishing beer without charge, subject to the
taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, or a domestic distiller
licensed under RCW 66.24.140 or an accredited representative of a
distiller, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor
licensed under RCW 66.24.310, from furnishing spirits without charge,
to a nonprofit charitable corporation or association exempt from
taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or (6) of the internal revenue
code of 1986 for use consistent with the purpose or purposes entitling
it to such exemption; nothing in this section prevents a domestic
brewery or microbrewery from serving beer without charge, on the
brewery premises and at other locations subject to section 2 of this
act; nothing in this section prevents donations of wine for the
purposes of RCW 66.12.180; nothing in this section prevents a domestic
winery from serving wine without charge, on the winery premises and at
other locations subject to section 2 of this act; nothing in this
section prevents a craft distillery from serving spirits without
charge, on the distillery premises subject to RCW 66.24.145 and at
other locations subject to section 2 of this act; nothing in this
section prohibits spirits sampling under chapter 186, Laws of 2011;
((and)) nothing in this section prevents a winery or microbrewery from
serving samples at a farmers market under section 1, chapter 62, Laws
of 2011; and nothing in this section shall prevent a manufacturer from
serving spirits without charge, on the manufacturer premises subject to
RCW 66.24.150 and at other locations subject to section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.28.040 and 2012 c 2 s 116 (Initiative Measure No.
1183) are each amended to read as follows:
Except as permitted by the board under RCW 66.20.010, no domestic
brewery, microbrewery, distributor, distiller, domestic winery,
importer, rectifier, certificate of approval holder, or other
manufacturer of liquor may, within the state of Washington, give to any
person any liquor; but nothing in this section nor in RCW 66.28.305
prevents a domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor, domestic
winery, distiller, certificate of approval holder, or importer from
furnishing samples of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to authorized
licensees for the purpose of negotiating a sale, in accordance with
regulations adopted by the liquor control board, provided that the
samples are subject to taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
nothing in this section prevents a domestic brewery, microbrewery,
domestic winery, distillery, certificate of approval holder, or
distributor from furnishing beer, wine, or spirituous liquor for
instructional purposes under RCW 66.28.150; nothing in this section
prevents a domestic winery, certificate of approval holder, or
distributor from furnishing wine without charge, subject to the taxes
imposed by RCW 66.24.210, to a not-for-profit group organized and
operated solely for the purpose of enology or the study of viticulture
which has been in existence for at least six months and that uses wine
so furnished solely for such educational purposes or a domestic winery,
or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from furnishing wine
without charge or a domestic brewery, or an out-of-state certificate of
approval holder, from furnishing beer without charge, subject to the
taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, or a domestic distiller
licensed under RCW 66.24.140 or an accredited representative of a
distiller, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor
licensed under RCW 66.24.310, from furnishing spirits without charge,
to a nonprofit charitable corporation or association exempt from
taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or (6) of the internal revenue
code of 1986 for use consistent with the purpose or purposes entitling
it to such exemption; nothing in this section prevents a domestic
brewery or microbrewery from serving beer without charge, on the
brewery premises and at other locations subject to section 2 of this
act; nothing in this section prevents donations of wine for the
purposes of RCW 66.12.180; nothing in this section prevents a domestic
winery from serving wine without charge, on the winery premises and at
other locations subject to section 2 of this act; and nothing in this
section prevents a craft distillery from serving spirits without
charge, on the distillery premises subject to RCW 66.24.145 and at
other locations subject to section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 4 of this act expires December 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 5 of this act takes effect December
1, 2012.

--- END ---