BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
Law enforcement agencies and fire departments that have probable
cause to believe an individual with the agency, including all employees
and officers of the agency, is involved in the use of illegal drugs
shall immediately suspend that individual from his or her duties until
it is affirmatively determined by the agency either that (1) the person
is not involved with illegal drug use, in which case the person may
resume their duties; or (2) the person was involved in illegal drug
use, in which case the agency must take whatever disciplinary measures
it deems appropriate, including termination, and if the person is not
terminated the person may not resume his or her duties until the agency
is satisfied the person is qualified to do so. The employee may be
subject to random drug testing.

--- END ---