BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that use of force
issues are criminal justice and law enforcement matters left to the
states under the Tenth Amendment to the United States Constitution and
any use of force policies or practices recommended or imposed by the
federal government, other than those clearly and expressly required or
authorized by an act of congress, are not binding on state and local
government agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 State or local law enforcement agencies are
prohibited from adopting any federal recommendations or mandates
regarding use of force other than those clearly and expressly required
or authorized by an act of congress.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The attorney general shall provide legal
assistance to any state or local law enforcement agency sued by the
federal government for the failure to adopt any use of force policies
or practices recommended or mandated by the federal government, other
than those clearly and expressly required or authorized by an act of
congress.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 2 and 3 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

--- END ---