BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that use of force
issues are criminal justice and law enforcement matters left to the
states under the Tenth Amendment to the United States Constitution and
any use of force policies or practices recommended or imposed by the
federal government, other than those clearly and expressly required or
authorized by an act of congress, are not binding on state and local
government agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A task force is hereby created to review
and analyze the methodologies, statistics, and all other procedures and
data used by the United States department of justice in its
investigation of the Seattle police department's use of force policies
to support its findings and conclusions and recommended remedial
measures in its investigation report dated December 16, 2011, and
issued by the United States attorney's office for the western district
of Washington.
(2) The task force includes representatives from the state
legislature, state and local law enforcement, the Washington state
criminal justice training commission, and the attorney general's
office.
(3) Staff support for the task force shall be provided by senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(4) Meetings shall take place in Olympia on the capitol campus.
(5) Legislative members and nonlegislative members of the task
force may not be reimbursed for expenses, but shall participate in a
voluntary capacity.
(6) The task force shall report its findings to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 17, 2012.

--- END ---