BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) School districts must notify parents or guardians of enrolled
students each year with the following information about each assessment
that is required by the state or by the federal government before the
assessment is administered during the school year:
(a) The subject areas covered by the assessment;
(b) When the assessment will be administered;
(c) When the assessment results will be released to parents or
guardians;
(d) How the assessment or assessment results will advance student
learning;
(e) The amount of instructional time lost in administering the
assessment;
(f) The cost to the school district of administering the
assessment;
(g) The cost to the state of administering the assessment; and
(h) Whether the assessment is required by the state, by the federal
government, or by both.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide to school districts the information necessary for the district
to notify parents of the information under subsection (1)(g) of this
section.

--- END ---