BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) There is a continued achievement gap between Washington
students and students in other states in mathematics and science. On
the 2011 national assessment of educational progress, Washington eighth
graders ranked twenty-fourth in science, and fourth graders ranked
nineteenth in mathematics.
(b) There is also a continued achievement gap among Washington
students, particularly for disadvantaged students and certain groups of
minority students. On the 2011 mathematics assessment for fourth
grade, sixty-six percent of white students met the state standard,
compared to forty-five percent of low-income students, thirty-seven
percent of black students, and thirty-five percent of native American
students. On the 2011 science assessment for eighth grade, sixty-nine
percent of white students met the state standards compared to twenty-two percent of students in foster care and thirty-five percent of
Pacific Islander students.
(c) Research indicates that on average, students lose almost three
months of learning in mathematical computational skills during the
summer months. Students tested at the beginning of the school year
typically score at a lower level than they did at the end of the
previous school year, even on the same test. Disadvantaged students
experience greater learning losses during school breaks than middle-income students.
(2) Therefore the legislature intends to establish a goal of making
summer and other breaks in the school year times of learning gains
rather than learning losses by:
(a) Using technology and open source online instructional programs
to engage students in learning during school breaks;
(b) Encouraging local communities, including youth organizations,
business organizations, and service organizations, to provide
assistance and encouragement particularly to disadvantaged students to
enable them to access online instructional programs during school
breaks; and
(c) Focusing learning efforts during school breaks on maintaining
and improving skills in mathematics, science, and financial literacy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) All K-12 students are encouraged to spend at least two hours
per week during summer breaks between school years and other breaks
within the school year using online learning to improve their
mathematics, science, and financial literacy skills.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
identify up to three free, open access online instructional programs in
mathematics, science, and financial literacy suitable for use by K-12
students at all grade levels. An identified online program must have
the following characteristics:
(a) The program offers self-paced instruction that includes
tutorials, work problems to allow students to practice their knowledge
and understanding of the tutorial content, and adaptive formative
assessments.
(b) The program allows students to progress through a sequence of
tutorials, work problems, and assessments based on their ability and
performance on the work problems and assessments.
(c) The program maintains and displays an individualized record of
student progress.
(3) For each online instructional program identified, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction must also identify which
tutorials are appropriate for each grade level in order to assist
students in accessing the appropriate tutorial.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
establish a web page with direct links to the selected online
instructional programs and take other steps to publicize the
availability of the programs and the legislature's encouragement to
students to use them to improve mathematics, science, and financial
literacy skills.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) School districts must publicize the availability of the online
instructional programs identified under section 2 of this act and the
legislature's encouragement to all students to use these resources
during the summer breaks between school years and other breaks within
the school year to improve mathematics, science, and financial literacy
skills. In particular, school districts must conduct outreach to
community-based organizations that provide services and support to
disadvantaged students so that these organizations may encourage
disadvantaged students to access the online instructional programs,
including providing locations for students to access the internet
during school breaks.
(2) School districts must post on the default homepage of the
district web site direct links to the identified online instructional
programs. School districts must also post on the homepage locations in
the community with public internet access, such as public libraries,
worksource centers, public institutions of higher education, community-based organizations, and other locations where students who do not have
other access to the internet may use the online instructional programs.
(3) School districts may encourage or require students to use the
identified programs for additional online instruction beyond the
suggested two hours per week to further improve their mathematics,
science, and financial literacy skills.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 27.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Each public library under this chapter shall post on the default
homepage of the library web site direct links to the online
instructional programs identified under section 2 of this act. Each
library shall also provide signs encouraging K-12 students to use the
online instructional programs during school breaks to improve their
mathematics, science, and financial literacy skills.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
Each institution of higher education shall post on the default
homepage of the institution web site direct links to the online
instructional programs identified under section 2 of this act. Each
institution shall also post on the website locations of the
institution, such as the institution library, where K-12 students may
access the internet during school breaks to use the online
instructional programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 50.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The employment security department and all workforce development
councils shall ensure that the default homepage of each worksource
center web site contains direct links to the online instructional
programs identified under section 2 of this act. Each worksource
center shall also have signs encouraging K-12 students to use the
online instructional programs during school breaks to improve their
mathematics, science, and financial literacy skills.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall submit a report to the state board of education, the
governor, and the education committees of the legislature by December
1, 2014, on the implementation of sections 2 through 6 of this act,
including results from surveys of school districts regarding student
use of the online instructional programs and school district actions to
support students in accessing and using the programs. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall recommend whether
student use of online instructional programs during school breaks
should be required.

--- END ---