BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.08.120 and 2009 c 74 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All material and work required by a port district ((not meeting
the definition of public work in RCW 39.04.010(4))) may be procured in
the open market or by contract and all work ordered may be done by
contract or day labor.
(2)(a) All such contracts for work meeting the definition of
"public work" in RCW 39.04.010(4), the estimated cost of which exceeds
three hundred thousand dollars, shall be awarded using a competitive
bid process. The contract must be awarded at public bidding upon
notice published in a newspaper of general circulation in the district
at least thirteen days before the last date upon which bids will be
received, calling for bids upon the work, plans and specifications for
which shall then be on file in the office of the commission for public
inspection. The same notice may call for bids on such work or material
based upon plans and specifications submitted by the bidder. The
competitive bidding requirements for purchases or public works may be
waived pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that
section applies to the purchase or public work.
(b) For all contracts related to work meeting the definition of
"public work" in RCW 39.04.010(4) that are estimated at three hundred
thousand dollars or less, a port district may let contracts using the
small works roster process under RCW 39.04.155 in lieu of advertising
for bids. Whenever possible, the managing official shall invite at
least one proposal from a minority contractor who shall otherwise
qualify under this section.
When awarding such a contract for work, when utilizing proposals
from the small works roster, the managing official shall give weight to
the contractor submitting the lowest and best proposal, and whenever it
would not violate the public interest, such contracts shall be
distributed equally among contractors, including minority contractors,
on the small works roster.
(c)(i) For contracts for work meeting the definition of "public
work" as defined in RCW 39.04.010(4), the estimated cost of which is
between five thousand dollars and thirty-five thousand dollars, port
districts are exempt from the requirements of RCW 53.08.130 and may
award contracts based on price quotations received from responsible
contractors. Port districts shall reasonably attempt to equitably
distribute the opportunity to provide price quotations among
responsible contractors that perform similar services. Contractors do
not need to be listed on the port district's small works roster to be
eligible. Contracts may not be negotiated after receipt of the price
quotation or be amended by the addition of work that was not included
within the intent of the original price quotation.
(ii) For contracts for work meeting the definition of "public work"
as defined in RCW 39.04.010(4), the estimated cost of which does not
exceed five thousand dollars, port districts are exempt from the
requirements of RCW 53.08.130 and any advertisement and competitive
bidding requirements.
(iii) All price quotations for public work procured under this
subsection (2)(c) must be logged and be open to public inspection and
made available electronically by request.
(iv) Any port district procuring public work under this subsection
(2)(c) shall not break apart larger scopes of work for the purpose of
avoiding the public bidding requirements under RCW 53.08.130.
(d) Any work performed under this subsection (2) is subject to the
requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW. For projects with estimated costs
not exceeding five thousand dollars, a port district may utilize the
alternative prevailing wage procedures as described in RCW
39.12.040(2).
(e) A port district may waive the payment and performance bond
requirements under chapter 39.08 RCW or the retainage requirements
under chapter 60.28 RCW, or both, for projects performed under (c) of
this subsection.
(f) A port district electing to waive payment and performance bonds
under (c) of this subsection assumes the liability for the contractor's
and his or her subcontractors' nonpayment of laborers, mechanics,
subcontractors, materialpersons, and suppliers. The port district has
the right of recovery against the contractor for any payments made on
the contractor's or his or her subcontractors' behalf.
(g) A port district electing to waive the retainage requirements
under (c) of this subsection assumes the liability for the contractor's
or his or her subcontractors' nonpayment of laborers, mechanics,
subcontractors, materialpersons, suppliers, and taxes imposed under
Titles 50, 51, and 82 RCW. The port district has the right of recovery
against the contractor for any payments made on the contractor's or his
or her subcontractors' behalf.
(h) A port district electing to waive payment and performance bonds
or retainage, or both, under (c) of this subsection must establish and
adopt procedures implementing the requirements of this section.
(3) A port district may meet the notification requirements under
RCW 39.04.020 by publishing an annual notification before beginning the
public work that describes the nature and value of the work to be
performed.

Sec. 2 RCW 53.08.135 and 1982 c 92 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Port districts ((shall)) may determine if ((any)) construction
projects over forty thousand dollars can be accomplished ((less
expensively)) more efficiently by contracting out. If contracting out
is ((less expensive)) more efficient, the port district may contract
out such project.

--- END ---