BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the assessor is required by the provisions of this
title to send any assessment, notice, or any other information to
persons by regular mail, the assessor may instead provide the
assessment, notice, or other information electronically if the
following conditions are met:
(a) The person entitled to receive the information has authorized
the assessor in writing, electronically or otherwise, to provide the
assessment, notice, or other information electronically; and
(b) If the assessment, notice, or other information is subject to
the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330, 84.08.210, or
84.40.340, the assessor must use methods reasonably designed to protect
the information from unauthorized disclosure. The provisions of this
subsection (1)(b) may be waived by a taxpayer. The waiver must be in
writing and may be provided to the assessor electronically. A person
may provide a waiver with respect to a particular item of information,
or may give a blanket waiver with respect to any item of information or
certain items of information to be provided electronically. A blanket
waiver continues until revoked in writing by the taxpayer. Such
revocation may be provided to the assessor electronically in a manner
provided or approved by the assessor.
(2) A person may authorize the assessor under subsection (1)(a) of
this section to provide a particular item of information electronically
or may give blanket authorization to provide any item of information or
certain items of information electronically. Such blanket
authorization will continue until revoked in writing by the taxpayer.
Such revocation may be provided to the assessor electronically in a
manner provided or approved by the assessor.
(3) Electronic transmittal may be by electronic mail or other
electronic means reasonably calculated to apprise the person of the
information that is being provided.
(4) Any assessment, notice, or other information provided by the
assessor to a person is deemed to have been mailed by the assessor and
received by the person on the date that the assessor electronically
sends the information to the person or electronically notifies the
person that the information is available to be accessed by the person.
(5) This section also applies to information that is not expressly
required by statute to be sent by regular mail, but is customarily sent
by the assessor using regular mail, to persons entitled to receive the
information.
(6) Information compiled or possessed by the assessor for the
purposes of providing notice under this title, including but not
limited to taxpayer e-mail addresses, waivers, waiver requests, waiver
revocations, and passwords or other methods of protecting taxpayer
information as required in subsection (1)(b) of this section, are not
subject to disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.40.045 and 2001 c 187 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The assessor ((shall)) must give notice of any change in the
true and fair value of real property for the tract or lot of land and
any improvements thereon no later than thirty days after appraisal((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, no such notice ((shall)) may be mailed
during the period from January 15th to February 15th of each year((:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). Furthermore, no notice need be sent with
respect to changes in valuation of publicly owned property exempt from
taxation under provisions of RCW 84.36.010 or of forest land made
pursuant to chapter 84.33 RCW.
(2) The notice ((shall)) must contain a statement of both the prior
and the new true and fair value, stating separately land and
improvement values, and a brief statement of the procedure for appeal
to the board of equalization and the time, date, and place of the
meetings of the board.
(3) Except as provided in section 1 of this act, the notice
((shall)) must be mailed by the assessor to the taxpayer.
(4) If any taxpayer, as shown by the tax rolls, holds solely a
security interest in the real property which is the subject of the
notice, pursuant to a mortgage, contract of sale, or deed of trust,
such taxpayer ((shall)) must, upon written request of the assessor,
supply, within thirty days of receipt of such request, to the assessor
the name and address of the person making payments pursuant to the
mortgage, contract of sale, or deed of trust, and thereafter such
person ((shall)) must also receive a copy of the notice provided for in
this section. Willful failure to comply with such request within the
time limitation provided for ((herein shall make)) in this section
makes such taxpayer subject to a maximum civil penalty of five thousand
dollars. The penalties provided for ((herein shall be)) in this
section are recoverable in an action by the county prosecutor, and when
recovered ((shall)) must be deposited in the county current expense
fund. The assessor ((shall)) must make the request provided for by
this section during the month of January.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.40.175 and 1994 c 124 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
At the time of making the assessment of real property, the assessor
((shall)) must enter each description of property exempt under the
provisions of chapter 84.36 RCW, and value and list the same in the
manner and subject to the same rule as the assessor is required to
assess all other property, designating in each case to whom such
property belongs. ((However, with respect to publicly owned)) The
valuation requirements of this section do not apply to property exempt
from taxation under provisions of RCW 84.36.010((, the assessor shall
value only such property as is leased to or occupied by a private
person under an agreement allowing such person to occupy or use such
property for a private purpose when a request for such valuation is
received from the department of revenue or the lessee of such property
for use in determining the taxable rent as provided for in chapter
82.29A RCW: PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section shall not prohibit any
assessor from valuing any public property leased to or occupied by a
private person for private purposes)). However, when the exempt status
of such property no longer applies as a result of a sale or change in
use, the assessor must value and list such property as of the January
1st assessment date. The owner or person responsible for payment of
taxes may thereafter petition the county board of equalization for a
change in the assessed value in accordance with the timing and
procedures set forth in RCW 84.40.038.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.29A.120 and 1994 c 95 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
After computation of the taxes imposed pursuant to RCW 82.29A.030
and 82.29A.040 ((there shall be allowed)), the following credits are
allowed in determining the tax payable:
(1) ((With respect to a leasehold interest other than a product
lease, executed with an effective date of April 1, 1986, or thereafter,
or a leasehold interest in respect to which the department of revenue
under the authority of RCW 82.29A.020 does adjust the contract rent
base used for computing the tax provided for in RCW 82.29A.030, there
shall be allowed a credit against the tax as otherwise computed equal
to the amount, if any, that such tax exceeds the property tax that
would apply to such leased property without regard to any property tax
exemption under RCW 84.36.381, if it were privately owned by the lessee
or if it were privately owned by any sublessee if the value of the
credit inures to the sublessee.)) For lessees and sublessees who would
qualify for a property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.381 if the
property were privately owned, the tax otherwise due after this credit
shall be reduced by a percentage equal to the percentage reduction in
property tax that would result from the property tax exemption under
RCW 84.36.381((.));
(2) ((With respect to a product lease,)) A credit of thirty-three
percent of the tax otherwise due is allowed with respect to a product
lease.

--- END ---