BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 58.08.040 and 2008 c 17 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Prior to any person recording a plat, replat, or altered plat
subsequent to ((May)) July 31st in any year and prior to the date of
the collection of taxes in the ensuing year, the person ((shall)) must
deposit with the county treasurer a sum equal to the product of the
county assessor's latest valuation on the property less improvements in
such subdivision multiplied by the current year's dollar rate increased
by twenty-five percent on the property platted. The treasurer's
receipt ((shall be)) is evidence of the payment. The treasurer
((shall)) must appropriate so much of the deposit as will pay the taxes
and assessments on the property when the levy rates are certified by
the assessor using the value of the property at the time of filing a
plat, replat, or altered plat((, and in case)). If the sum deposited
is in excess of the amount necessary for the payment of the taxes and
assessments, the treasurer ((shall)) must return, to the party
depositing, the amount of excess. If the sum deposited is insufficient
for the payment of the taxes and assessments, the treasurer must send
the corrected bill to the current taxpayer for the remaining amount to
be paid and such amounts are due and payable pursuant to RCW 84.56.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
May 1, 2012.

--- END ---