BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.185.070 and 2005 c 518 s 1802 and 2005 c 219 s 2
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) During each calendar year in which funds from the housing trust
fund or other legislative appropriations are available for use by the
department for the housing assistance program, the department shall
announce to all known interested parties, and through major media
throughout the state, a grant and loan application period of at least
ninety days' duration. This announcement shall be made as often as the
director deems appropriate for proper utilization of resources. The
department shall then promptly grant as many applications as will
utilize available funds less appropriate administrative costs of the
department. Administrative costs paid out of the housing trust fund
may not exceed five percent of annual revenues available for
distribution to housing trust fund projects.
(2) In awarding funds under this chapter, the department ((shall))
must:
(a) Provide for a geographic distribution on a statewide basis; and
(b) Until June 30, 2013, consider the total cost and per-unit cost
of each project for which an application is submitted for funding under
RCW 43.185.050(2) (a) and (j), as compared to similar housing projects
constructed or renovated within the same geographic area.
(((2))) (3) The department, with advice and input from the
affordable housing advisory board established in RCW 43.185B.020, or a
subcommittee of the affordable housing advisory board, must report
recommendations for awarding funds in a cost-effective manner. The
report must include an implementation plan, timeline, and any other
items the department identifies as important to consider to the
legislature by December 1, 2012.
(4) The department shall give first priority to applications for
projects and activities which utilize existing privately owned housing
stock including privately owned housing stock purchased by nonprofit
public development authorities and public housing authorities as
created in chapter 35.82 RCW. As used in this subsection, privately
owned housing stock includes housing that is acquired by a federal
agency through a default on the mortgage by the private owner. Such
projects and activities shall be evaluated under subsection (((3))) (5)
of this section. Second priority shall be given to activities and
projects which utilize existing publicly owned housing stock. All
projects and activities shall be evaluated by some or all of the
criteria under subsection (((3))) (5) of this section, and similar
projects and activities shall be evaluated under the same criteria.
(((3))) (5) The department shall give preference for applications
based on some or all of the criteria under this subsection, and similar
projects and activities shall be evaluated under the same criteria:
(a) The degree of leveraging of other funds that will occur;
(b) The degree of commitment from programs to provide necessary
habilitation and support services for projects focusing on special
needs populations;
(c) Recipient contributions to total project costs, including
allied contributions from other sources such as professional, craft and
trade services, and lender interest rate subsidies;
(d) Local government project contributions in the form of
infrastructure improvements, and others;
(e) Projects that encourage ownership, management, and other
project-related responsibility opportunities;
(f) Projects that demonstrate a strong probability of serving the
original target group or income level for a period of at least twenty-five years;
(g) The applicant has the demonstrated ability, stability and
resources to implement the project;
(h) Projects which demonstrate serving the greatest need;
(i) Projects that provide housing for persons and families with the
lowest incomes;
(j) Projects serving special needs populations which are under
statutory mandate to develop community housing;
(k) Project location and access to employment centers in the region
or area;
(l) Projects that provide employment and training opportunities for
disadvantaged youth under a youthbuild or youthbuild-type program as
defined in RCW 50.72.020; and
(m) Project location and access to available public transportation
services.
(((4))) (6) The department shall only approve applications for
projects for ((mentally ill)) persons with mental illness that are
consistent with a regional support network six-year capital and
operating plan.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.185A.050 and 1991 c 356 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) During each calendar year in which funds are available for use
by the department for the affordable housing program, the department
shall announce to all known interested parties, and through major media
throughout the state, a grant and loan application period of at least
ninety days' duration. This announcement shall be made as often as the
director deems appropriate for proper utilization of resources. The
department shall then promptly grant as many applications as will
utilize available funds less appropriate administrative costs of the
department, not to exceed five percent of moneys appropriated to the
affordable housing program.
(2) Until June 30, 2013, for applications submitted for funding
under RCW 43.185A.030(2)(a), the department shall consider total cost
and per-unit cost of each project compared to similar housing projects
constructed or renovated within the same geographic area.
(3) The department shall develop, with advice and input from the
((low-income [housing] assistance advisory committee)) affordable
housing advisory board established in RCW ((43.185.110)) 43.185B.020,
or a subcommittee of the affordable housing advisory board:
(a) Additional criteria to evaluate applications for assistance
under this chapter; and
(b) Recommendations for awarding funds under RCW 43.185A.030(2)(a)
in a cost-effective manner, including an implementation plan, timeline,
and any other items the department identifies as important to consider.
The department must submit a report with the recommendations to the
legislature by December 1, 2012.

--- END ---