BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.120 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 9 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall purchase nursing home care by contract and
payment for the care shall be in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 74.46 RCW and rules adopted by the department. No payment
shall be made to a nursing home which does not permit inspection by the
authority and the department of every part of its premises and an
examination of all records, including financial records, methods of
administration, general and special dietary programs, the disbursement
of drugs and methods of supply, and any other records the authority or
the department deems relevant to the regulation of nursing home
operations, enforcement of standards for resident care, and payment for
nursing home services.
(2) The department may purchase nursing home care by contract in
veterans' homes operated by the state department of veterans affairs
and payment for the care shall be in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 74.46 RCW and rules adopted by the department under the
authority of RCW 74.46.800.
(3) The department may purchase care in institutions for persons
with intellectual disabilities, also known as intermediate care
facilities for persons with intellectual disabilities. The department
shall establish rules for reasonable accounting and reimbursement
systems for such care. Institutions for persons with intellectual
disabilities include licensed nursing homes, public institutions,
licensed boarding homes with fifteen beds or less, and hospital
facilities certified as intermediate care facilities for persons with
intellectual disabilities under the federal medicaid program to provide
health, habilitative, or rehabilitative services and twenty-four hour
supervision for persons with intellectual disabilities or related
conditions and includes in the program "active treatment" as federally
defined.
(4) The department may purchase care including, but not limited to,
inpatient mental health and inpatient hospital detoxification of acute
alcohol or other drug intoxication, in institutions for mental diseases
by contract. The department shall establish rules for reasonable
accounting and reimbursement systems for such care. Institutions for
mental diseases are certified under the federal medicaid program and
primarily engaged in providing diagnosis, treatment, or care to persons
with mental diseases, including medical attention, nursing care, and
related services.
(5) Both the department and the authority may each purchase all
other services provided under this chapter by contract or at rates
established by the department or the authority respectively.

--- END ---