BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.50.100 and 2003 c 105 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section governs records not covered by RCW 13.50.050.
(2) Records covered by this section shall be confidential and shall
be released only pursuant to this section and RCW 13.50.010.
(3) Records retained or produced by any juvenile justice or care
agency may be released to other participants in the juvenile justice or
care system only when an investigation or case involving the juvenile
in question is being pursued by the other participant or when that
other participant is assigned the responsibility of supervising the
juvenile. Records covered under this section and maintained by the
juvenile courts which relate to the official actions of the agency may
be entered in the statewide judicial information system. However,
truancy records associated with a juvenile who has no other case
history, and records of a juvenile's parents who have no other case
history, shall be removed from the judicial information system when the
juvenile is no longer subject to the compulsory attendance laws in
chapter 28A.225 RCW. A county clerk is not liable for unauthorized
release of this data by persons or agencies not in his or her employ or
otherwise subject to his or her control, nor is the county clerk liable
for inaccurate or incomplete information collected from litigants or
other persons required to provide identifying data pursuant to this
section.
(4) Subject to (a) of this subsection, the department of social and
health services may release information retained in the course of
conducting child protective services investigations to a family or
juvenile court hearing a petition for custody under chapter 26.10 RCW.
(a) Information that may be released shall be limited to
information regarding investigations in which: (i) The juvenile was an
alleged victim of abandonment or abuse or neglect; or (ii) the
petitioner for custody of the juvenile, or any individual aged sixteen
or older residing in the petitioner's household, is the subject of a
founded or currently pending child protective services investigation
made by the department subsequent to October 1, 1998.
(b) Additional information may only be released with the written
consent of the subject of the investigation and the juvenile alleged to
be the victim of abandonment or abuse and neglect, or the parent,
custodian, guardian, or personal representative of the juvenile, or by
court order obtained with notice to all interested parties.
(5) The children's administration of the department of social and
health services must provide to the department of early learning access
to records and information retained or produced by the children's
administration. These records and information may be used by the
department of early learning for the purpose of determining whether an
individual is of appropriate character, suitability, and competence to
provide child care and early learning services to children as provided
in RCW 43.215.215.
(6) Any disclosure of records or information by the department of
social and health services pursuant to this section shall not be deemed
a waiver of any confidentiality or privilege attached to the records or
information by operation of any state or federal statute or regulation,
and any recipient of such records or information shall maintain it in
such a manner as to comply with such state and federal statutes and
regulations and to protect against unauthorized disclosure.
(((6))) (7) A contracting agency or service provider of the
department of social and health services that provides counseling,
psychological, psychiatric, or medical services may release to the
office of the family and children's ombudsman information or records
relating to services provided to a juvenile who is dependent under
chapter 13.34 RCW without the consent of the parent or guardian of the
juvenile, or of the juvenile if the juvenile is under the age of
thirteen years, unless such release is otherwise specifically
prohibited by law.
(((7))) (8) A juvenile, his or her parents, the juvenile's attorney
and the juvenile's parent's attorney, shall, upon request, be given
access to all records and information collected or retained by a
juvenile justice or care agency which pertain to the juvenile except:
(a) If it is determined by the agency that release of this
information is likely to cause severe psychological or physical harm to
the juvenile or his or her parents the agency may withhold the
information subject to other order of the court: PROVIDED, That if the
court determines that limited release of the information is
appropriate, the court may specify terms and conditions for the release
of the information; or
(b) If the information or record has been obtained by a juvenile
justice or care agency in connection with the provision of counseling,
psychological, psychiatric, or medical services to the juvenile, when
the services have been sought voluntarily by the juvenile, and the
juvenile has a legal right to receive those services without the
consent of any person or agency, then the information or record may not
be disclosed to the juvenile's parents without the informed consent of
the juvenile unless otherwise authorized by law; or
(c) That the department of social and health services may delete
the name and identifying information regarding persons or organizations
who have reported alleged child abuse or neglect.
(((8))) (9) A juvenile or his or her parent denied access to any
records following an agency determination under subsection (((7))) (8)
of this section may file a motion in juvenile court requesting access
to the records. The court shall grant the motion unless it finds
access may not be permitted according to the standards found in
subsection (((7))) (8)(a) and (b) of this section.
(((9))) (10) The person making a motion under subsection (((8)))
(9) of this section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to all
parties to the original action and to any agency whose records will be
affected by the motion.
(((10))) (11) Subject to the rules of discovery in civil cases, any
party to a proceeding seeking a declaration of dependency or a
termination of the parent-child relationship and any party's counsel
and the guardian ad litem of any party, shall have access to the
records of any natural or adoptive child of the parent, subject to the
limitations in subsection (((7))) (8) of this section. A party denied
access to records may request judicial review of the denial. If the
party prevails, he or she shall be awarded attorneys' fees, costs, and
an amount not less than five dollars and not more than one hundred
dollars for each day the records were wrongfully denied.
(((11))) (12) No unfounded allegation of child abuse or neglect as
defined in RCW 26.44.020(((12))) may be disclosed to a child-placing
agency, private adoption agency, or any other licensed provider.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.20A.080 and 1997 c 58 s 1005 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall provide the employment security
department quarterly with the names and social security numbers of all
clients in the WorkFirst program and any successor state welfare
program.
(((2))) (b) The information provided by the employment security
department under RCW 50.13.060 for statistical analysis and welfare
program evaluation purposes may be used only for statistical analysis,
research, and evaluation purposes as provided in RCW 74.08A.410 and
74.08A.420. Through individual matches with accessed employment
security department confidential employer wage files, only aggregate,
statistical, group level data shall be reported. Data sharing by the
employment security department may be extended to include the office of
financial management and other such governmental entities with
oversight responsibility for this program.
(((3))) (c) The department and other agencies of state government
shall protect the privacy of confidential personal data supplied under
RCW 50.13.060 consistent with federal law, chapter 50.13 RCW, and the
terms and conditions of a formal data-sharing agreement between the
employment security department and agencies of state government,
however the misuse or unauthorized use of confidential data supplied by
the employment security department is subject to the penalties in RCW
50.13.080.
(2)(a) The department shall provide access to records and
information retained or produced by the department's children's
administration to the department of early learning. These records and
information may be used by the department of early learning for the
purpose of determining whether an individual is of appropriate
character, suitability, and competence to provide child care and early
learning services to children as provided in RCW 43.215.215.
(b) Any disclosure of records or information by the department
pursuant to this section, RCW 13.50.100(5), or any other law or rule,
may not be deemed a waiver of any confidentiality or privilege attached
to the records or information by operation of any state or federal
statute, rule, or regulation, and the department of early learning, as
the recipient of such records or information, must maintain them in
such a manner as to comply with such state and federal statutes and
rules or regulations and to protect against unauthorized disclosure.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.215.215 and 2011 c 295 s 2 and 2011 c 253 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In determining whether an individual is of appropriate
character, suitability, and competence to provide child care and early
learning services to children, the department may consider the history
of past involvement of child protective services or law enforcement
agencies with the individual for the purpose of establishing a pattern
of conduct, behavior, or inaction with regard to the health, safety, or
welfare of a child. No report of child abuse or neglect that has been
destroyed or expunged under RCW 26.44.031 may be used for such
purposes. No unfounded or inconclusive allegation of child abuse or
neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020 may be disclosed to a provider
licensed under this chapter.
(2) In order to determine the suitability of individuals newly
applying for an agency license, new licensees, their new employees, and
other persons who newly have unsupervised access to children in care,
shall be fingerprinted.
(a) The fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Washington state
patrol and federal bureau of investigation for a criminal history
record check.
(b)(i) Effective July 1, 2012, all individuals applying for first-time agency licenses, all new employees, and other persons who have not
been previously qualified by the department to have unsupervised access
to children in care must be fingerprinted and obtain a criminal history
record check pursuant to this section.
(ii) Persons required to be fingerprinted and obtain a criminal
(([history])) history record check pursuant to this section must pay
for the cost of this check as follows: The fee established by the
Washington state patrol for the criminal background history check,
including the cost of obtaining the fingerprints; and a fee paid to the
department for the cost of administering the individual-based/portable
background check clearance registry. The fee paid to the department
must be deposited into the individual-based/portable background check
clearance account established in RCW 43.215.218. The licensee may, but
need not, pay these costs on behalf of a prospective employee or
reimburse the prospective employee for these costs. The licensee and
the prospective employee may share these costs.
(c) The director shall use the fingerprint criminal history record
check information solely for the purpose of determining eligibility for
a license and for determining the character, suitability, and
competence of those persons or agencies, excluding parents, not
required to be licensed who are authorized to care for children.
(d) Criminal justice agencies shall provide the director such
information as they may have and that the director may require for such
purpose.
(e) No later than July 1, 2013, all agency licensees holding
licenses prior to July 1, 2012, persons who were employees before July
1, 2012, and persons who have been qualified by the department before
July 1, 2012, to have unsupervised access to children in care, must
submit a new background application to the department. The department
must require persons submitting a new background application pursuant
to this subsection (2)(e) to pay a fee to the department for the cost
of administering the individual-based/portable background check
clearance registry. This fee must be paid into the individual-based/portable background check clearance account established in RCW
43.215.218. The licensee may, but need not, pay these costs on behalf
of a prospective employee or reimburse the prospective employee for
these costs. The licensee and the prospective employee may share these
costs.
(f) The department shall issue a background check clearance card or
certificate to the applicant if after the completion of a background
check the department concludes the applicant is qualified for
unsupervised access to children in care. The background check
clearance card or certificate is valid for three years from the date of
issuance. A valid card or certificate must be accepted by a potential
employer as proof that the applicant has successfully completed a
background check as required under this chapter.
(g) The original applicant for an agency license, licensees, their
employees, and other persons who have unsupervised access to children
in care shall submit a new background check application to the
department, on a form and by a date as determined by the department.
(h) The applicant and agency shall maintain on-site for inspection
a copy of the background check clearance card or certificate.
(i) Individuals who have been issued a background check clearance
card or certificate shall report nonconviction and conviction
information to the department within twenty-four hours of the event
constituting the nonconviction or conviction information.
(j) The department shall investigate and conduct a redetermination
of an applicant's or licensee's background clearance if the department
receives a complaint or information from individuals, a law enforcement
agency, or other federal, state, or local government agency. Subject
to the requirements contained in RCW 43.215.300 and 43.215.305 and
based on a determination that an individual lacks the appropriate
character, suitability, or competence to provide child care or early
learning services to children, the department may: (i) Invalidate the
background card or certificate; or (ii) suspend, modify, or revoke any
license authorized by this chapter.
(3) To satisfy the shared background check requirements of the
department of early learning and the department of social and health
services, each department shall share federal fingerprint-based
background check results as permitted under the law. The purpose of
this provision is to allow both departments to fulfill their joint
background check responsibility of checking any individual who may have
unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, children, or juveniles.
Neither department may share the federal background check results with
any other state agency or person.
(4)(a) The department may use records and information obtained from
the children's administration of the department of social and health
services for the purpose of determining whether an individual is of
appropriate character, suitability, and competence to provide child
care and early learning services to children as provided in RCW
43.215.215.
(b) The department must maintain the records and information
obtained from the department of social and health services in such a
manner as to comply with RCW 13.50.100(6) and 43.20A.080(2), and any
other applicable state or federal statute, rule, or regulation relating
to confidentiality or privilege of those records.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---