BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.20.110 and 1988 c 176 s 910 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to provide additional funds for the coordination and
provision of community services for persons with developmental
disabilities or mental health services, the county governing authority
of each county in the state ((shall)) must budget and levy annually a
tax in a sum equal to the amount which would be raised by a levy of two
and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against the
taxable property in the county to be used for such purposes((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, all or part of the funds collected from the
tax levied for the purposes of this section may be transferred to the
state of Washington, department of social and health services, for the
purpose of obtaining federal matching funds to provide and coordinate
community services for persons with developmental disabilities and
mental health services. In the event a county elects to transfer such
tax funds to the state for this purpose, the state ((shall)) must grant
these moneys and the additional funds received as matching funds to
service-providing community agencies or community boards in the county
which has made such transfer, pursuant to the plan approved by the
county, as provided by chapters 71.24 and 71.28 RCW and by chapter
71A.14 RCW, all as now or hereafter amended.
(2) The amount of a levy allocated to the purposes specified in
this section may be reduced in the same proportion as the regular
property tax levy of the county is reduced by chapter 84.55 RCW or may
be increased or reduced in the same proportion as the regular property
tax levy of the county is increased or reduced by action of the county
legislative authority.

Sec. 2 RCW 73.08.080 and 2005 c 250 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority in each county ((shall)) must levy,
in addition to the taxes now levied by law, a tax in a sum equal to the
amount which would be raised by not less than one and one-eighth cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value, and not greater than twenty-seven cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against the taxable
property of their respective counties, to be levied and collected as
now prescribed by law for the assessment and collection of taxes, for
the purpose of creating a veterans' assistance fund. Expenditures from
the veterans' assistance fund, and interest earned on balances from the
fund, may be used only for:
(a) The veterans' assistance programs authorized by RCW 73.08.010;
(b) The burial or cremation of a deceased indigent veteran or
deceased family member of an indigent veteran as authorized by RCW
73.08.070; and
(c) The direct and indirect costs incurred in the administration of
the fund as authorized by subsection (2) of this section.
(2) If the funds on deposit in the veterans' assistance fund, less
outstanding warrants, on the first Tuesday in September exceed the
expected yield of one and one-eighth cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value against the taxable property of the county, the county
legislative authority may levy a lesser amount. The direct and
indirect costs incurred in the administration of the veterans'
assistance fund ((shall)) must be computed by the county auditor, or
the chief financial officer in a county operating under a charter, not
less than annually. Following the computation of these direct and
indirect costs, an amount equal to these costs may then be transferred
from the veterans' assistance fund to the county current expense fund.
(3) The amount of a levy allocated to the purposes specified in
this section may be reduced in the same proportion as the regular
property tax levy of the county is reduced by chapter 84.55 RCW or may
be increased or reduced in the same proportion as the regular property
tax levy of the county is increased or reduced by action of the county
legislative authority.

--- END ---