BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.48.555 and 2009 c 449 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this section apply to the construction and
industrial storm water general permits issued by the department
pursuant to the federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.,
and this chapter.
(1) Effluent limitations shall be included in construction and
industrial storm water general permits as required under the federal
clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., and its implementing
regulations. In accordance with federal clean water act requirements,
pollutant specific, water quality-based effluent limitations shall be
included in construction and industrial storm water general permits if
there is a reasonable potential to cause or contribute to an excursion
of a state water quality standard.
(2) Subject to the provisions of this section, both technology and
water quality-based effluent limitations may be expressed as:
(a) Numeric effluent limitations;
(b) Narrative effluent limitations; or
(c) A combination of numeric and narrative effluent discharge
limitations.
(3) The department must condition storm water general permits for
industrial and construction activities issued under the national
pollutant discharge elimination system of the federal clean water act
to require compliance with numeric effluent discharge limits when such
discharges are subject to:
(a) Numeric effluent limitations established in federally adopted,
industry-specific effluent guidelines;
(b) State developed, industry-specific performance-based numeric
effluent limitations;
(c) Numeric effluent limitations based on a completed total maximum
daily load analysis or other pollution control measures; or
(d) A determination by the department that:
(i) The discharges covered under either the construction or
industrial storm water general permits have a reasonable potential to
cause or contribute to violation of state water quality standards; and
(ii) Effluent limitations based on nonnumeric best management
practices are not effective in achieving compliance with state water
quality standards.
(4) In making a determination under subsection (3)(d) of this
section, the department shall use procedures that account for:
(a) Existing controls on point and nonpoint sources of pollution;
(b) The variability of the pollutant or pollutant parameter in the
storm water discharge; and
(c) As appropriate, the dilution of the storm water in the
receiving waters.
(5) Narrative effluent limitations requiring both the
implementation of best management practices, when designed to satisfy
the technology and water quality-based requirements of the federal
clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., and compliance with water
quality standards, shall be used for construction and industrial storm
water general permits, unless the provisions of subsection (3) of this
section apply.
(6) Compliance with water quality standards shall be presumed,
unless discharge monitoring data or other site specific information
demonstrates that a discharge causes or contributes to violation of
water quality standards, when the permittee is:
(a) In full compliance with all permit conditions, including
planning, sampling, monitoring, reporting, and recordkeeping
conditions; and
(b)(i) Fully implementing storm water best management practices
contained in storm water technical manuals approved by the department,
or practices that are demonstrably equivalent to practices contained in
storm water technical manuals approved by the department, including the
proper selection, implementation, and maintenance of all applicable and
appropriate best management practices for on-site pollution control.
(ii) For the purposes of this section, "demonstrably equivalent"
means that the technical basis for the selection of all storm water
best management practices are documented within a storm water pollution
prevention plan. The storm water pollution prevention plan must
document:
(A) The method and reasons for choosing the storm water best
management practices selected;
(B) The pollutant removal performance expected from the practices
selected;
(C) The technical basis supporting the performance claims for the
practices selected, including any available existing data concerning
field performance of the practices selected;
(D) An assessment of how the selected practices will comply with
state water quality standards; and
(E) An assessment of how the selected practices will satisfy both
applicable federal technology-based treatment requirements and state
requirements to use all known, available, and reasonable methods of
prevention, control, and treatment.
(7)(a) By November 1, 2009, except for discharges identified in (b)
of this subsection, the department shall modify or reissue the
industrial storm water general permit to require compliance with
appropriately derived numeric water quality-based effluent limitations
for existing discharges to water bodies listed as impaired according to
33 U.S.C. Sec. 1313(d) (Sec. 303(d) of the federal clean water act, 33
U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.).
(b) For pollutants other than bacteria, the industrial storm water
general permit must require permittees to comply with appropriately
derived numeric water quality-based effluent limitations in the permit,
as described in (a) of this subsection, by no later than six months
after the effective date of the modified or reissued industrial storm
water general permit. By July 1, 2012, the industrial storm water
general permit must require permittees with discharges to water bodies
listed as impaired for bacteria to comply with nonnumeric, narrative
effluent limitations.
(c) For permittees that the department determines are unable to
comply with the numeric water quality-based effluent limitations
required by (a) of this subsection, within the timeline established in
(b) of this subsection, the department shall establish a compliance
schedule as follows:
(i) Any compliance schedule provided by the department must require
compliance as soon as possible, and must require compliance by no later
than twenty-four months, or two complete wet seasons, after the
effective date of the industrial storm water general permit. For
purposes of this subsection (7)(c)(i), "wet seasons" means October 1st
through June 30th.
(ii) The department shall post on its web site the name, location,
industrial storm water permit number, and the reason for requesting a
compliance schedule for each permittee who requests a compliance
schedule according to this subsection (7)(c). The department shall
post this information no later than thirty days after receiving a
permittee's request for a compliance schedule under this subsection
(7)(c). The department shall also prepare a list of organizations and
individuals seeking to be notified when such requests for compliance
schedules are made, and notify them within thirty days after receiving
a permittee's request for a compliance schedule. Notification under
this subsection may be accomplished electronically.
(d) The department shall report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature specifying how the numeric effluent limitation in (a)
of this subsection would be implemented. The report shall identify the
number of dischargers to impaired water bodies and provide an
assessment of anticipated compliance with the numeric effluent
limitation established by (a) of this subsection.
(8)(a) Construction and industrial storm water general permits
issued by the department shall include an enforceable adaptive
management mechanism that includes appropriate monitoring, evaluation,
and reporting. The adaptive management mechanism shall include
elements designed to result in permit compliance and shall include, at
a minimum, the following elements:
(i) An adaptive management indicator, such as monitoring
benchmarks;
(ii) Monitoring;
(iii) Review and revisions to the storm water pollution prevention
plan;
(iv) Documentation of remedial actions taken; and
(v) Reporting to the department.
(b) Construction and industrial storm water general permits issued
by the department also shall include the timing and mechanisms for
implementation of treatment best management practices.
(9) Construction and industrial storm water discharges authorized
under general permits must not cause or have the reasonable potential
to cause or contribute to a violation of an applicable water quality
standard. Where a discharge has already been authorized under a
national pollutant discharge elimination system storm water permit and
it is later determined to cause or have the reasonable potential to
cause or contribute to the violation of an applicable water quality
standard, the department may notify the permittee of such a violation.
(10) Once notified by the department of a determination of
reasonable potential to cause or contribute to the violation of an
applicable water quality standard, the permittee must take all
necessary actions to ensure future discharges do not cause or
contribute to the violation of a water quality standard and document
those actions in the storm water pollution prevention plan and a report
timely submitted to the department. If violations remain or recur,
coverage under the construction or industrial storm water general
permits may be terminated by the department, and an alternative general
permit or individual permit may be issued. Compliance with the
requirements of this subsection does not preclude any enforcement
activity provided by the federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251
et seq., for the underlying violation.
(11) Receiving water sampling shall not be a requirement of an
industrial or construction storm water general permit except to the
extent that it can be conducted without endangering the health and
safety of persons conducting the sampling.
(12) The department may authorize mixing zones only in compliance
with and after making determinations mandated by the procedural and
substantive requirements of applicable laws and regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act expires January 1,
2015.

--- END ---