BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that previous
directives to develop a comprehensive incident and accident
investigation policy and procedures have not been fully implemented.
Seemingly serious machinery casualties and accidents appear not to have
been properly investigated and not fully disclosed to the public in a
timely manner. The legislature reaffirms the importance, to safe and
efficient ferry system operations, of a rigorous system of
investigation, accountability, corrective action, and public
disclosure, considered an industry safety standard in other public
transportation systems such as the airline industry. The legislature
intends to require the publication of a concise investigations manual
that clearly and concisely, in one document, defines the investigation
process in a format useable by investigators and employees of the ferry
system and understandable by the general public. The legislature
further intends that the resulting investigations manual will provide
clear and fair procedures for assuring that public comments on ferry
system or ferry employee performance be processed in a manner that
assures responsiveness to public concerns, but respects employee
responsibilities for safety in the special maritime conditions in which
the ferry system operates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the
marine highways safety reform act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall develop a comprehensive incident,
accident, and machinery casualty investigation policy and procedures
proposal to submit to the transportation committees of the legislature
by November 1, 2012. The proposal must be accompanied by a summary of
public comments under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) In addition to consulting with ferry system unions and the
United States coast guard, the department is encouraged to solicit
independent outside expertise on incident, accident, and machinery
casualty investigation best practices. The department shall also
review processes for accident investigations by the national
transportation safety board with a view to adopting applicable
processes.
(c) The proposal must contain:
(i) The definition of an incident, accident, and machinery casualty
and the types of investigation that are required for these events;
(ii) The process for appointing an investigating officer and a
description of the authorities and responsibilities of the
investigating officer. The investigating officer must:
(A) Have the appropriate knowledge, training, and experience
required to conduct a comprehensive investigation;
(B) Not have been involved in the incident, accident, or machinery
casualty or to have had or have acted in any role that might reasonably
be found to be a potential contribution factor so as to avoid any
conflict of interest or the perception of a conflict of interest;
(C) Have full access to all persons, records, and relevant
organizations that may have information about or may have contributed
to, directly or indirectly, the incident, accident, or machinery
casualty under investigation, in compliance with any affected
employee's or employees' respective collective bargaining agreement and
state laws and rules regarding public disclosure under chapter 42.56
RCW;
(D) Be provided with, if reasonably requested by the investigating
officer, appropriate outside technical expertise; and
(E) Be provided with staff and legal support as may be appropriate
to the type of investigation;
(iii) The process of working with the affected employee or
employees in accordance with the employee's or employees' respective
collective bargaining agreement and the appropriate union officials,
within protocols afforded to all public employees;
(iv) The process by which the United States coast guard is kept
informed of, interacts with, and reviews the investigation;
(v) The process for review, approval, and implementation of any
approved recommendations within the department; and
(vi) The process for keeping the public informed of the
investigation and its outcomes, in compliance with any affected
employee's or employees' respective collective bargaining agreement and
state laws and rules regarding public disclosure under chapter 42.56
RCW.
(2) The department shall submit to the transportation committees of
the legislature by July 1, 2012, a comprehensive and detailed summary
of all incidents, accidents, and machinery casualties that have
occurred in the ferry system since May 13, 2009. The summary must
include a synopsis of the investigating activities, the results of the
investigation, the cost of repairs and corrective measures, and the
impact on ferry service. Thereafter, the department shall submit the
summary annually on January 15th covering the prior calendar year.
(3) Prior to submitting the proposal to the legislature, the
department must conduct a series of public meetings with the ferry
advisory committees created under RCW 47.60.310. The draft proposal
under subsection (1) of this section and the data under subsection (2)
of this section must be presented and an opportunity for public comment
must be provided.

--- END ---