BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Recognizing that ferry fares comprise a high
proportion of the operating revenue of the Washington state ferry
system and that high ferry fares impose a special burden on ferry users
and impact the economic health of ferry communities, the legislature
intends that a ferry communities advisory committee will take a key
role in the annual process of setting ferry fares by advising the
Washington transportation commission. In addition to providing the
committee full access to ferry system budget data, the legislature also
intends that current, detailed operating and capital budget data be
constantly available to the general public via the Washington state
ferries web site. The legislature further intends to follow this
effort with a review of the ferry advisory committee system to ensure
its viability and relevance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the ferry
accountability reform act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state ferry communities advisory committee is
created to advise the commission in the annual process of setting ferry
fares.
(2) The executive committee of the Washington state ferry users
established under RCW 47.60.310 shall provide the governor with at
least one nominee from each of the ferry advisory committees
established under RCW 47.60.315 to serve on the Washington state ferry
communities advisory committee. By August 1, 2012, the governor shall
select and appoint ten individuals from the nominations to serve on the
advisory committee. Members of the advisory committee shall serve
without compensation.
(3)(a) The advisory committee members must include:
(i) Seven members representing each of the main ferry route
systems;
(ii) One marine or maritime industry representative;
(iii) One ferry service-dependent business representative; and
(iv) One ferry community-related tourism representative.
(b) The advisory committee must also include members who have
knowledge of the Washington state ferry system, budgeting, and
strategic planning.
(c) If the nominees provided by the executive committee of the
Washington state ferry users do not include individuals with the
qualifications outlined in (b) of this subsection, the governor may
appoint individuals who meet these qualifications.
(4) The term of the advisory committee members is three years.
Members may not serve more than two consecutive terms. Three of the
initial advisory committee members must be appointed to serve an
initial term of three years, two must be appointed to serve an initial
term of two years, and the two remaining members must be appointed to
serve an initial term of one year. All subsequent terms are three
years. To ensure that the advisory committee can continue to act, a
member whose term expires shall continue to serve until his or her
replacement is appointed. In the case of any vacancy on the advisory
committee for any reason, the governor shall appoint a new member to
serve out the term of the person whose position has become vacant. An
advisory committee member may be removed for cause by the governor.
(5) Annually, the advisory committee shall choose its chair from
among its membership with the goal of having the chair serve through a
full fare-setting cycle. The chair of the advisory committee is
responsible for scheduling meetings and setting meeting agendas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state ferry communities advisory committee
created in section 3 of this act shall:
(a) Develop a detailed understating of the Washington state ferries
operating and capital budgets;
(b) Review proposals to change the fare schedule provided by the
department;
(c) Request and review operating budget cost savings and efficiency
strategies provided by the department;
(d) Recommend changes in overall fare strategies and polices; and
(e) Recommend fare changes and operating budget cost savings and
efficiency strategies to the commission.
(2)(a) The advisory committee shall serve in an advisory capacity
to the commission on all matters related to changes to the ferry fare
schedule, as well as operating budget cost savings and efficiency
strategies. By August 1, 2013, the commission and the department shall
assist the advisory committee in gaining an understanding and
familiarity with the Washington state ferries operating budget and fare
schedule structure.
(b) By August 1, 2013, and every August 1st thereafter, the
advisory committee shall adopt recommendations regarding the ferry fare
schedule and submit them to the commission.
(c) By November 1, 2013, and every November 1st thereafter, the
advisory committee shall adopt recommendations regarding the Washington
state ferries operating and capital budgets as related to ferry
service, ferry fares, and the life-cycle cost of ownership.
(d) The advisory committee shall solicit perspectives on service
from ferry advisory committees created in RCW 47.60.310. The advisory
committee shall also consider information gathered by the ferry
advisory committees' user surveys and customer feedback. In
consultation with the ferry advisory committees, the advisory committee
may suggest specific customer survey data requirements to the
department and the commission.
(e) The advisory committee, in consultation with the commission,
shall develop a public outreach process that includes public hearings.
(3) A fare change may not be imposed or modified unless the
advisory committee has been given at least twenty days to review and
comment on any proposed fare schedule changes. In setting ferry fares,
the commission shall consider any recommendations of the advisory
committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must:
(1) Provide staff assistance to the Washington state ferry
communities advisory committee created in section 3 of this act; and
(2) Provide the advisory committee with Washington state ferries
operating cost and fare revenue scenario details to meet existing
statutory requirements and the farebox recovery rate as directed in
section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning with the 2013-2015 biennial transportation budget, and
for every biennial transportation budget thereafter, the legislature
shall set a farebox recovery rate in the biennial transportation budget
at a ceiling of no more than seventy-three percent of the total
Washington state ferries operating costs with the long-term goal of
reducing that ceiling by one percent per year for the following ten
years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
Working with the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee and other relevant offices, the Washington state ferries
shall develop an improved online ferry system operating budget display,
as well as an organizational chart of Washington state ferries
personnel assignments. The Washington state ferries shall keep current
the information on the web site. Annually, the Washington state ferry
communities advisory committee shall review the online data
presentations and recommend improvements to the Washington state
ferries and the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.60.315 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall adopt fares and pricing policies by rule,
under chapter 34.05 RCW, according to the following schedule:
(a) Each year, as described under section 4 of this act, the
((department)) Washington state ferry communities advisory committee
created in section 3 of this act shall provide the commission a report
of its review of fares ((and)), pricing policies, and operating budget
cost savings and efficiency strategies, with recommendations for the
revision of fares ((and)), pricing policies, and operating budget cost
savings and efficiency strategies for the ensuing year;
(b) By September 1st of each year, beginning in ((2008)) 2013, the
commission shall adopt by rule fares ((and)), pricing policies, and
operating budget cost savings and efficiency strategies for the ensuing
year. The commission shall notify the legislative transportation
committees, the governor's office, and the department of these fares,
policies, and strategies. The department shall review, analyze, and
submit the operating budget cost savings and efficiency strategies as
part of the department's biennial and supplemental operating budget
requests to the governor.
(2) The department shall submit quarterly cost reports to the
commission on activities that are paid for by fares.
(3) The commission may adopt by rule fares that are effective for
more or less than one year for the purposes of transitioning to the
fare schedule in subsection (1) of this section.
(((3))) (4) The commission may increase ferry fares included in the
schedule of charges adopted under this section by a percentage that
exceeds the fiscal growth factor.
(((4))) (5) The chief executive officer of the ferry system may
authorize the use of promotional, discounted, and special event fares
to the general public and commercial enterprises for the purpose of
maximizing capacity use and the revenues collected by the ferry system.
The department shall report to the commission a summary of the
promotional, discounted, and special event fares offered during each
fiscal year and the financial results from these activities.
(((5))) (6) Fare revenues and other revenues deposited in the Puget
Sound ferry operations account created in RCW 47.60.530 may not be used
to support the Puget Sound capital construction account created in RCW
47.60.505, unless the support for capital is separately identified in
the fare.
(((6))) (7) The commission may not raise fares until the fare rules
contain pricing policies developed under RCW 47.60.290, or September 1,
((2009)) 2012, whichever is later.
(((7))) (8) The commission shall impose a vessel replacement
surcharge of twenty-five cents on every one-way and round-trip ferry
fare sold, including multiride and monthly pass fares. This surcharge
must be clearly indicated to ferry passengers and drivers and, if
possible, on the fare media itself.

--- END ---