BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.303 and 2009 c 381 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) School districts, educational service districts, the Washington
state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, the state school
for the blind, and their contractors hiring employees who will have
regularly scheduled unsupervised access to children shall require a
record check through the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.834, 10.97.030,
and 10.97.050 and through the federal bureau of investigation before
hiring an employee. The record check shall include a fingerprint check
using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint
card. The requesting entity shall provide a copy of the record report
to the applicant. When necessary, applicants may be employed on a
conditional basis pending completion of the investigation. If the
applicant has had a record check within the previous two years, the
district, the Washington state center for childhood deafness and
hearing loss, the state school for the blind, or contractor may waive
the requirement. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the district, pursuant to chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW, the Washington
state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss, the state school
for the blind, or contractor hiring the employee shall determine who
shall pay costs associated with the record check.
(2) Federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded schools may use the
process in subsection (1) of this section to perform record checks for
their employees and applicants for employment.
(3) Individuals who hold a valid portable background check
clearance card issued by the department of early learning consistent
with RCW 43.215.215 are exempt from subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---