BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state's
transportation system is the backbone of Washington's economy and must
be well-coordinated and well-maintained to enable people and goods to
move safely and efficiently throughout the state.
The legislature further finds that the purchasing power of funds to
pay for operations and maintenance continues to decline while costs
have risen. Without additional funding: The state department of
transportation will not be able to preserve the state's highways and
bridges or maintain ferry service; counties will not have funding to
maintain county roads and fix unsound bridges; and cities will not have
sufficient funds to maintain streets and bridges, and pavement
conditions will continue to decline.
The legislature intends that the barrel fee in this act constitutes
a dedicated source of funds for operating and maintaining the state's
highway and ferry system. The legislature further intends that the
barrel fee constitutes state revenue intended to be used for highway
purposes, is levied only for highway purposes provided in Article II,
section 40 of the state Constitution, and is specifically placed in the
motor vehicle fund to be used for those highway purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A fee is imposed on every person who refines petroleum products
in this state. The amount of the fee is one dollar and fifty cents per
barrel on each barrel of petroleum product refined in this state to be
used for transportation purposes in the state of Washington.
(2) The department must collect the fee imposed under this section.
Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the administration, collection, and
enforcement of the fee imposed under this section.
(3) The director shall forward all proceeds from the barrel fee
collected under this section to the state treasurer to be distributed
according to the following method:
(a) Fifty percent must be deposited into the state transportation
operations and maintenance account created in section 3 of this act;
(b) Twenty-five percent must be apportioned monthly as such funds
accrue among the several cities and towns within the state ratably on
the basis of the population last determined by the office of financial
management; and
(c) Twenty-five percent must be apportioned monthly to the several
counties in accordance with RCW 46.68.122 and 46.68.124.
(4) The barrel fee imposed in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) May be used only for maintaining and operating the
transportation system;
(b) May not be used for the general support of state government;
(c) Constitutes state revenue intended to be used for highway
purposes under Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution; and
(d) Is imposed to mitigate the impact of the transportation of oil
on state roads and highways and the use of petroleum product for
transportation purposes on public roads or on Puget Sound.
(5) Any person having paid the fee imposed under this section who
uses petroleum product for a purpose other than a transportation
purpose may claim a refund or credit against the fee paid respective to
petroleum product used for nontransportation purposes. The refund or
credit allowed under this section must be claimed on such forms and is
subject to such requirements as the department may prescribe by rule.
(6) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Barrel" means a unit of measurement of volume equal to forty-two United States gallons of crude oil or petroleum product.
(b) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(c) "Person" has the meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(d) "Petroleum product" means any liquid hydrocarbons at
atmospheric temperature and pressure that are the product of
fractionation, distillation, or other refining or processing of crude
oil, and that are used as, useable as, or may be refined as fuel, or
fuel blendstock, including gasoline, diesel fuel, aviation fuel,
asphalt and road oil, lubricants, and heavy fuel oil.
(e) "Used for transportation purposes" means petroleum products
used as:
(i) A source of fuel to propel motor vehicles on public roads;
(ii) A source of fuel for the delivery of petroleum product; and
(iii) An ingredient or component of substances used to operate,
build, repair, improve, or maintain public roads.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The state transportation operations and maintenance account is
created in the motor vehicle fund established in RCW 46.68.070. All
revenues received by the department for the state from the barrel fee
created in section 2 of this act must be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation.
Consistent with Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution,
expenditures from the account may be used only for the operations and
maintenance of state roads and highways and state ferries.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.84.092 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 6, 2011 1st sp.s.
c 7 s 22, 2011 c 369 s 6, 2011 c 339 s 1, 2011 c 311 s 9, 2011 c 272 s
3, 2011 c 120 s 3, and 2011 c 83 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the budget stabilization account,
the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin
taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin
water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction
fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the Interstate 405
express toll lanes operations account, the education construction fund,
the education legacy trust account, the election account, the energy
freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail
assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the freight
mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account,
the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account,
the health system capacity account, the high capacity transportation
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher
education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the
highway infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high
occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital safety net
assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the
judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold
excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local
sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust
account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
multiagency permitting team account, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public
transportation systems account, the public works assistance account,
the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry
operations account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account,
the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management
cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility
grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the site closure
account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small
city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the
special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the
state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route number 520
civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account,
the state transportation operations and maintenance account, the state
wildlife account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows
toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account,
the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund,
the University of Washington building account, the volunteer
firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund,
the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
economic development commission account, the Washington state health
insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account,
the Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving
fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects account.
Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent
fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent
fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect October 1, 2012.

--- END ---