BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.370 and 2009 c 511 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a rural county may impose a sales
and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is
in addition to other taxes authorized by law and ((shall be)) is
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county. The rate of tax ((shall)) may not exceed 0.09
percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the
article used in the case of a use tax, except that for rural counties
with population densities between sixty and one hundred persons per
square mile, the rate shall not exceed 0.04 percent before January 1,
2000.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section ((shall))
must be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be
collected or paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08
or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue ((shall)) must perform the
collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
county.
(3)(a) Moneys collected under this section ((shall)) may only be
used to finance public facilities serving economic development purposes
in rural counties and finance personnel in economic development
offices. The public facility must be listed as an item in the
officially adopted county overall economic development plan, or the
economic development section of the county's comprehensive plan, or the
comprehensive plan of a city or town located within the county for
those counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040. For those counties that
do not have an adopted overall economic development plan and do not
plan under the growth management act, the public facility must be
listed in the county's capital facilities plan or the capital
facilities plan of a city or town located within the county.
(b) In implementing this section, the county ((shall)) must consult
with cities, towns, and port districts located within the county and
the associate development organization serving the county to ensure
that the expenditure meets the goals of chapter 130, Laws of 2004 and
the requirements of (a) of this subsection. Each county collecting
money under this section ((shall)) must report, as follows, to the
office of the state auditor, within one hundred fifty days after the
close of each fiscal year: (i) A list of new projects begun during the
fiscal year, showing that the county has used the funds for those
projects consistent with the goals of chapter 130, Laws of 2004 and the
requirements of (a) of this subsection; and (ii) expenditures during
the fiscal year on projects begun in a previous year. Any projects
financed prior to June 10, 2004, from the proceeds of obligations to
which the tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section has been
pledged ((shall)) are not ((be)) deemed to be new projects under this
subsection. No new projects funded with money collected under this
section may be for justice system facilities.
(c) The definitions in this section apply throughout this section.
(i) "Public facilities" means bridges, roads, domestic and
industrial water facilities, sanitary sewer facilities, earth
stabilization, storm sewer facilities, railroads, ((electricity))
electrical facilities, natural gas facilities, research, testing,
training, and incubation facilities in innovation partnership zones
designated under RCW 43.330.270, buildings, structures,
telecommunications infrastructure, transportation infrastructure, or
commercial infrastructure, and port facilities in the state of
Washington.
(ii) "Economic development purposes" means those purposes which
facilitate the creation or retention of businesses and jobs in a
county.
(iii) "Economic development office" means an office of a county,
port districts, or an associate development organization as defined in
RCW 43.330.010, which promotes economic development purposes within the
county.
(4) No tax may be collected under this section before July 1, 1998.
(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, no tax may be
collected under this section by a county more than twenty-five years
after the date that a tax is first imposed under this section.
(b) For counties imposing the tax at the rate of 0.09 percent
before August 1, 2009, the tax expires on the date that is twenty-five
years after the date that the 0.09 percent tax rate was first imposed
by that county.
(5) For purposes of this section, "rural county" means a county
with a population density of less than one hundred persons per square
mile or a county smaller than two hundred twenty-five square miles as
determined by the office of financial management and published each
year by the department for the period July 1st to June 30th.

--- END ---