BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.87.060 and 1985 c 369 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On the day fixed for the hearing, the county legislative
authority shall proceed to consider ((the report of the engineer,
together with)) any evidence for or objection against such vacation and
abandonment. If the county road is found useful as a part of the
county road system it shall not be vacated, but if it is not useful and
the public will be benefited by the vacation, the county legislative
authority may vacate the road or any portion thereof. Its decision
shall be entered in the minutes of the hearing.
(2) As an alternative, the county legislative authority may appoint
a hearing officer to conduct a public hearing ((to consider the report
of the engineer and)) to take testimony and evidence relating to the
proposed vacation. Following the hearing, the hearing officer shall
prepare a record of the proceedings and a recommendation to the county
legislative authority concerning the proposed vacation. Their decision
shall be made at a regular or special public meeting of the county
legislative authority.

--- END ---