BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.280 and 2011 c 269 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, school
districts may provide employer fringe benefit contributions after
October 1, 1990, only for basic benefits. However, school districts
may continue payments under contracts with employees or benefit
providers in effect on April 13, 1990, until the contract expires.
(2) School districts may provide employer contributions after
October 1, 1990, for optional benefit plans, in addition to basic
benefits, only for employees included in pooling arrangements under
this subsection. Optional benefits may include direct agreements as
defined in chapter 48.150 RCW, but may not include employee beneficiary
accounts that can be liquidated by the employee on termination of
employment. Optional benefit plans may be offered only if:
(a) The school district pools benefit allocations among employees
using a pooling arrangement that includes ((at least one)) (i) all
employee bargaining units ((and/or)) as one pool and all nonbargaining
group employees as a second pool or (ii) all employees combined in one
pool;
(b) Each full-time employee included in the pooling arrangement is
offered basic benefits, including coverage for dependents((, without a
payroll deduction for premium charges));
(c) Each employee included in the pooling arrangement who elects
medical benefit coverage shall pay a minimum premium charge subject to
bargaining under chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW;
(d) Each full-time employee included in the pooling arrangement,
regardless of the number of dependents receiving basic coverage,
receives the same additional employer contribution for other coverage
or optional benefits; and
(((d))) (e) For part-time employees included in the pooling
arrangement, participation in optional benefit plans shall be governed
by the same eligibility criteria and/or proration of employer
contributions used for allocations for basic benefits.
(3) Savings accruing to school districts due to limitations on
benefit options under this section shall be pooled and made available
by the districts to reduce out-of-pocket premium expenses for employees
needing basic coverage for dependents. School districts are not
intended to divert state benefit allocations for other purposes.

--- END ---