BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.29A.020 and 1999 c 220 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter the following terms shall be defined as
follows, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Leasehold interest" shall mean an interest in publicly owned
real or personal property which exists by virtue of any lease, permit,
license, or any other agreement, written or verbal, between the public
owner of the property and a person who would not be exempt from
property taxes if that person owned the property in fee, granting
possession and use, to a degree less than fee simple ownership:
PROVIDED, That no interest in personal property (excluding land or
buildings) which is owned by the United States, whether or not as
trustee, or by any foreign government shall constitute a leasehold
interest hereunder when the right to use such property is granted
pursuant to a contract solely for the manufacture or production of
articles for sale to the United States or any foreign government. The
term "leasehold interest" shall include the rights of use or occupancy
by others of property which is owned in fee or held in trust by a
public corporation, commission, or authority created under RCW
35.21.730 or 35.21.660 if the property is listed on or is within a
district listed on any federal or state register of historical sites.
The term "leasehold interest" shall not include road or utility
easements, rights of access, occupancy, or use granted solely for the
purpose of removing materials or products purchased from a public owner
or the lessee of a public owner, or rights of access, occupancy, or use
granted solely for the purpose of natural energy resource exploration.
"Leasehold interest" does not include the preferential use of publicly
owned cargo cranes and docks and associated areas used in the loading
and discharging of cargo located at a port district marine facility.
"Preferential use" means that publicly owned real or personal property
is used by a private party under a written agreement with the public
owner, but the public owner or any third party maintains a right to use
the property when not being used by the private party.
(2) "Taxable rent" shall mean contract rent as defined in
subsection (a) of this subsection in all cases where the lease or
agreement has been established or renegotiated through competitive
bidding, or negotiated or renegotiated in accordance with statutory
requirements regarding the rent payable, or negotiated or renegotiated
under circumstances, established by public record, clearly showing that
the contract rent was the maximum attainable by the lessor: PROVIDED,
That after January 1, 1986, with respect to any lease which has been in
effect for ten years or more without renegotiation, taxable rent may be
established by procedures set forth in subsection (b) of this
subsection. All other leasehold interests shall be subject to the
determination of taxable rent under the terms of subsection (b) of this
subsection.
For purposes of determining leasehold excise tax on any lands on
the Hanford reservation subleased to a private or public entity by the
department of ecology, taxable rent shall include only the annual cash
rental payment made by such entity to the department of ecology as
specifically referred to as rent in the sublease agreement between the
parties and shall not include any other fees, assessments, or charges
imposed on or collected by such entity irrespective of whether the
private or public entity pays or collects such other fees, assessments,
or charges as specified in the sublease agreement.
(a) "Contract rent" shall mean the amount of consideration due as
payment for a leasehold interest, including: The total of cash
payments made to the lessor or to another party for the benefit of the
lessor according to the requirements of the lease or agreement,
including any rents paid by a sublessee; expenditures for the
protection of the lessor's interest when required by the terms of the
lease or agreement; and expenditures for improvements to the property
to the extent that such improvements become the property of the lessor.
Where the consideration conveyed for the leasehold interest is made in
combination with payment for concession or other rights granted by the
lessor, only that portion of such payment which represents
consideration for the leasehold interest shall be part of contract
rent.
"Contract rent" shall not include: (i) Expenditures made by the
lessee, which under the terms of the lease or agreement, are to be
reimbursed by the lessor to the lessee or expenditures for improvements
and protection made pursuant to a lease or an agreement which requires
that the use of the improved property be open to the general public and
that no profit will inure to the lessee from the lease; (ii)
expenditures made by the lessee for the replacement or repair of
facilities due to fire or other casualty including payments for
insurance to provide reimbursement for losses or payments to a public
or private entity for protection of such property from damage or loss
or for alterations or additions made necessary by an action of
government taken after the date of the execution of the lease or
agreement; (iii) improvements added to publicly owned property by a
sublessee under an agreement executed prior to January 1, 1976, which
have been taxed as personal property of the sublessee prior to January
1, 1976, or improvements made by a sublessee of the same lessee under
a similar agreement executed prior to January 1, 1976, and such
improvements shall be taxable to the sublessee as personal property;
(iv) improvements added to publicly owned property if such improvements
are being taxed as personal property to any person.
Any prepaid contract rent shall be considered to have been paid in
the year due and not in the year actually paid with respect to
prepayment for a period of more than one year. Expenditures for
improvements with a useful life of more than one year which are
included as part of contract rent shall be treated as prepaid contract
rent and prorated over the useful life of the improvement or the
remaining term of the lease or agreement if the useful life is in
excess of the remaining term of the lease or agreement. Rent prepaid
prior to January 1, 1976, shall be prorated from the date of
prepayment.
With respect to a "product lease", the value shall be that value
determined at the time of sale under terms of the lease.
(b) If it shall be determined by the department of revenue, upon
examination of a lessee's accounts or those of a lessor of publicly
owned property, that a lessee is occupying or using publicly owned
property in such a manner as to create a leasehold interest and that
such leasehold interest has not been established through competitive
bidding, or negotiated in accordance with statutory requirements
regarding the rent payable, or negotiated under circumstances,
established by public record, clearly showing that the contract rent
was the maximum attainable by the lessor, the department may establish
a taxable rent computation for use in determining the tax payable under
authority granted in this chapter based upon the following criteria:
(i) Consideration shall be given to rental being paid to other lessors
by lessees of similar property for similar purposes over similar
periods of time; (ii) consideration shall be given to what would be
considered a fair rate of return on the market value of the property
leased less reasonable deductions for any restrictions on use, special
operating requirements or provisions for concurrent use by the lessor,
another person or the general public.
(3) "Product lease" as used in this chapter shall mean a lease of
property for use in the production of agricultural or marine products
to the extent that such lease provides for the contract rent to be paid
by the delivery of a stated percentage of the production of such
agricultural or marine products to the credit of the lessor or the
payment to the lessor of a stated percentage of the proceeds from the
sale of such products.
(4) "Renegotiated" means a change in the lease agreement which
changes the agreed time of possession, restrictions on use, the rate of
the cash rental or of any other consideration payable by the lessee to
or for the benefit of the lessor, other than any such change required
by the terms of the lease or agreement. In addition "renegotiated"
shall mean a continuation of possession by the lessee beyond the date
when, under the terms of the lease agreement, the lessee had the right
to vacate the premises without any further liability to the lessor.
(5) "City" means any city or town.
(6) "Products" includes natural resource products such as cut or
picked evergreen foliage, Cascara bark, wild edible mushrooms, native
ornamental trees and shrubs, ore and minerals, natural gas, geothermal
water and steam, and forage removed through the grazing of livestock.

--- END ---