BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Pursuant to 23 U.S.C. Sec. 140(b), the department shall expend
one-half of one percent of federal funds apportioned to the state, not
to exceed one million eight hundred thousand dollars, for the surface
transportation program under 23 U.S.C. Sec. 104(b) and the bridge
program under 23 U.S.C. Sec. 144 to increase diversity in the highway
construction workforce and prepare individuals interested in entering
the highway construction workforce by conducting activities in
subsection (3) of this section.
(2) The department shall, in coordination with the apprenticeship
and training council described in chapter 49.04 RCW, expend moneys from
other sources than those specified in subsection (1) of this section
for the activities in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The department shall coordinate with the apprenticeship and
training council to provide any portion of the following services:
(a) Preapprenticeship programs;
(b) Preemployment counseling;
(c) Orientations on the highway construction industry, including
outreach to women, minorities, and other disadvantaged individuals;
(d) Basic skills improvement classes;
(e) Career counseling;
(f) Remedial training;
(g) Entry requirements for training programs;
(h) Supportive services and assistance with transportation;
(i) Child care and special needs;
(j) Job site mentoring and retention services; and
(k) Assistance with tools, protective clothing, and other related
support for employment costs.
(4) The department, in coordination with the apprenticeship and
training council, shall submit a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year beginning in
2012. The report must contain:
(a) An analysis of the results of the activities in subsection (3)
of this section;
(b) The amount available to the department from federal funds for
the activities in subsection (3) of this section and the amount
expended for those activities; and
(c) The performance outcomes achieved from each activity, including
the number of persons receiving services, training, and employment.

--- END ---