BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the replacement
and improvement of the Interstate 5 Columbia river crossing is critical
for the west coast's transportation system and for the safety of
Washington and Oregon drivers. The interstate bridge includes two
side-by-side structures built in 1917 and 1958. In 2005, approximately
one hundred thirty-four thousand vehicles traveled across the
interstate bridge each day, and about forty billion dollars in freight
crosses the river each year. Collisions on and near the bridge occur
at a rate almost twice as high as other similar urban highways, and the
aging bridges are vulnerable to earthquakes. Replacing these
structures and making multimodal improvements to facilitate travel in
the bistate corridor is essential for the economy of the region.
Therefore, the state must develop a comprehensive approach to fund an
Interstate 5 Columbia river crossing project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "Columbia river crossing
project" means the bistate, multimodal corridor improvement program
between the state route number 500 interchange in Vancouver, Washington
and the Victory Boulevard interchange in Portland, Oregon.
(2) The Columbia river crossing project is designated an eligible
toll facility. For the purposes of this section, "eligible toll
facility" means the Interstate 5 transportation corridor between the
state route number 500 interchange in Vancouver, Washington and the
Victory Boulevard interchange in Portland, Oregon. Tolls are
authorized to be charged for travel on the existing and replacement
Interstate 5 Columbia river bridges. Tolls may not be charged for
travel on any portion of Interstate 205.
(3) For the Columbia river crossing project, the tolling authority
may enter into agreements with the Oregon state transportation
commission regarding the mutual or joint setting, adjustment, and
review of toll rates as the tolling authority may find necessary or
convenient to carry out the purposes of this section.
(4) Toll revenue generated on the Columbia river crossing project
must only be expended as allowed under RCW 47.56.820.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect upon, and tolls may
not be collected on the Columbia river crossing project until,
certification of the secretary of transportation to the governor that
the department of transportation has received sufficient funding
authority to initiate construction of the Columbia river crossing
project and the transportation commission has executed an agreement or
agreements described in section 2(3) of this act. If the secretary of
transportation does not provide such certification to the governor by
December 31, 2015, this act is null and void.

--- END ---