BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.565 and 2011 c 300 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A court shall not award penalties under RCW 42.56.550(4) to a
person who was serving a criminal sentence in a state, local, or
privately operated correctional facility on the date the request for
public records was made, unless the court finds that the agency acted
in bad faith in denying the person the opportunity to inspect or copy
a public record.
(2) The inspection or copying of any ((nonexempt)) public record
((by persons serving criminal sentences in state, local, or privately
operated correctional facilities)) may be enjoined pursuant to this
section.
(a) The injunction may be requested by: (i) An agency or its
representative; (ii) a person named in the record or his or her
representative; or (iii) a person to whom the requests specifically
pertains or his or her representative.
(b) The request for injunction must be filed in: (i) The superior
court in which the movant resides; or (ii) the superior court in the
county in which the record is maintained.
(c) In order to issue an injunction, the court must find that:
(i) The public record request was made to harass or intimidate the
agency or its employees;
(ii) Fulfilling the request would likely threaten the security of
correctional facilities;
(iii) Fulfilling the request would likely threaten the safety or
security of staff, inmates, family members of staff, family members of
other inmates, or any other person; ((or))
(iv) Fulfilling the request may assist criminal activity; or
(v) The agency can demonstrate that it faces significant burden in
fulfilling the public record request.
(3) In deciding whether to enjoin a public record request under
subsection (2) of this section, the court may consider all relevant
factors including, but not limited to:
(a) Other public record requests by the requestor;
(b) The type of public record or records sought;
(c) Statements offered by the requestor concerning the purpose for
the public record request;
(d) Whether disclosure of the requested public records would likely
harm any person or vital government interest;
(e) Whether the public record request seeks a significant and
burdensome number of documents;
(f) The impact of disclosure on ((correctional facility)) security
and order at an agency, the safety or security of ((correctional
facility)) agency staff, inmates, or others; and
(g) The deterrence of criminal activity.
(4) The motion proceeding described in this section shall be a
summary proceeding based on affidavits or declarations, unless the
court orders otherwise. Upon a showing by a preponderance of the
evidence, the court may enjoin all or any part of a request or
requests. Based on the evidence, the court may also enjoin, for a
period of time the court deems reasonable, future requests by:
(a) The same requestor; or
(b) An entity owned or controlled in whole or in part by the same
requestor.
(5) Before filing a request for an injunction pursuant to
subsection (2)(c)(v) of this section, an agency shall notify the public
record requestor that it intends to seek an injunction. The requestor
shall be allowed fifteen days to revise its public record request. If
the requestor submits a revised public record request, the agency may
still seek judicial review without allowing the requestor to further
revise the request.
(6) The agency shall continue to fulfill the request in a manner
consistent with the public records act until the court issues a
decision on the injunction request, unless the court orders otherwise.
(7) An agency shall not be liable for penalties under RCW
42.56.550(4) for any period during which an order under this section is
in effect, including during an appeal of an order under this section,
regardless of the outcome of the appeal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) An agency may adopt a policy limiting the number of hours
that agency must devote to responding to public records requests to
prevent excessive interference with its other essential functions if it
makes the following documents publicly available:
(i) Agency budgets for the current and past three fiscal years;
(ii) Agendas and minutes for all public meetings for the past three
fiscal years;
(iii) Salary schedule for all current positions and the names of
all employees;
(iv) Resolutions and ordinances; and
(v) Contracts that exceed thirty-five thousand dollars that are
currently in place or that terminated in the past three fiscal years.
(b) For a local agency this policy must be in the form of adopted
legislation and for state agencies it must be in the form of an adopted
rule.
(2) Tasks subject to the limit in this subsection include the time
it takes to search for responsive records and review and redact
responsive records. It does not include time spent in litigation or
time spent by an attorney providing legal advice regarding records.
The policy may include rules on setting priorities on what requests
will be fulfilled in what order based on the size of the request and
the number of other requests from that requester made in the preceding
twelve months.
(3) When an agency adopts rules pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of
this section, any time that agency anticipates that it will take more
than sixty calendar days to fulfill a request, the agency must inform
the requester of the factors that go into this time estimate, including
a list of all other pending requests. The agency's time estimate is
subject to court challenge pursuant to RCW 42.56.550(2).
(4) For any legislation or rule adopted pursuant to subsection
(1)(b) of this section, the value of the time allotted may not equal
less than one percent of the agency's annual operations and maintenance
budget and must be based on the average salary of the person primarily
assigned to process requests. In no case may an agency adopt a rule
that allows it to spend fewer than five hours per month responding to
requests.
(5) For agencies with a general fund budget that exceeds one
million dollars, documents are publicly available if they are
accessible through a central web site. For agencies with budgets under
one million dollars, documents are publicly available if they are
produced for inspection within five business days of being requested.

--- END ---