BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that outcomes for children and families who
engage with state child welfare agencies can be improved by: (1)
Increasing quality, efficiency, and accountability in service delivery
systems; (2) investing in efforts to prevent children and families from
entering the system; and (3) reinvesting savings realized through
prevention efforts.

--- END ---