BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state
operating budget includes numerous programs and activities intended to
achieve a variety of policy goals for the public interest. To measure
the effectiveness of these programs and activities in meeting these
goals, the legislature intends to adopt accountability processes and
measures to evaluate all new state programs. The legislature also
finds that it is unreasonable and not in the interest of providing
quality public service for state agencies to administer programs that
the legislature has established but is unwilling to fund. Therefore,
it is also the intent of this act to provide a means of substantive
legislative review of unfunded programs in order to debate the merits
of funding or repealing those programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 For the purposes of this chapter, section 7
of this act, RCW 43.88.030, and 43.88.090, the following definitions
apply unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "New program" means a newly created state agency, services not
supported in the previous biennium by the state, services to a
population or other entity not served by the state in the previous
biennium, or any activity not undertaken by the state in the previous
biennium. "Activity" means a discrete work element carried out by
state government agencies.
(2) "State program" means a group of agency services designed to
accomplish specific public goals and result in specific public
benefits. The term also includes a "new program."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) On July 1st of each calendar year, the
state auditor shall publish a draft list on its web site of all new
programs funded by any appropriation or allotment of state funds during
the previous fiscal year. The state auditor shall provide written
notice of publication to the appropriate fiscal committees of the house
of representatives and the senate and to the office of financial
management.
(2) The list shall include:
(a) The name of the program;
(b) A brief description of the program and the expected result;
(c) The name of the agencies receiving the funding; and
(d) The amounts appropriated, by fund or account.
(3) Within thirty days of the publication of the draft list of new
programs, the legislature and the office of financial management may
provide any comments it may have on the draft list to the state
auditor's office.
(4) Within sixty days after the publication of the draft list, the
state auditor shall publish a final list of new programs on its web
site. The state auditor shall provide written notice of the final
publication to the appropriate fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and the senate and to the office of financial
management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Three years after the initial funding of
any new program, as defined in section 2 of this act, the state auditor
shall conduct a fiscal and performance audit of each new program.
(2) The audit shall:
(a) Identify the original objective or objectives of the new
program;
(b) Identify the data collected by the program and the performance
measures;
(c) Assess how effective the program was at meeting the objective
or objectives;
(d) Determine how efficiently the resources were used; and
(e) Suggest changes to the program to increase effectiveness and
efficiency, including alternative approaches or termination of the
program.
(3) The state auditor shall provide a final copy of the audit to
the appropriate fiscal committees of the house of representatives and
the senate and to the office of financial management by December 31st
of the calendar year for that audit period.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.88.090 and 2005 c 386 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of developing budget proposals to the legislature,
the governor shall have the power, and it shall be the governor's duty,
to require from proper agency officials such detailed estimates and
other information in such form and at such times as the governor shall
direct. The governor shall communicate statewide priorities to
agencies for use in developing biennial budget recommendations for
their agency and shall seek public involvement and input on these
priorities. The estimates for the legislature and the judiciary shall
be transmitted to the governor and shall be included in the budget
without revision. The estimates for state pension contributions shall
be based on the rates provided in chapter 41.45 RCW. Copies of all
such estimates shall be transmitted to the standing committees on ways
and means of the house and senate at the same time as they are filed
with the governor and the office of financial management.
The estimates shall include statements or tables which indicate, by
agency, the state funds which are required for the receipt of federal
matching revenues. The budget document must also include a listing of
all new programs funded in the previous two years. For each new
program, the list shall include: Program name; program objective; a
brief description of the program; performance measures; current annual
funding levels by agency; and the funding level proposed in the
governor's biennial budget request. The list shall include all new
programs funded in the previous two years regardless of whether the
governor proposes funding those programs for the ensuing biennium. The
estimates shall be revised as necessary to reflect legislative
enactments and adopted appropriations and shall be included with the
initial biennial allotment submitted under RCW 43.88.110. The
estimates must reflect that the agency considered any alternatives to
reduce costs or improve service delivery identified in the findings of
a performance audit of the agency by the joint legislative audit and
review committee. Nothing in this subsection requires performance
audit findings to be published as part of the budget.
(2) Each state agency shall define its mission and establish
measurable goals for achieving desirable results for those who receive
its services and the taxpayers who pay for those services. Each agency
shall also develop clear strategies and timelines to achieve its goals.
This section does not require an agency to develop a new mission or
goals in place of identifiable missions or goals that meet the intent
of this section. The mission and goals of each agency must conform to
statutory direction and limitations.
(3) For the purpose of assessing activity performance, each state
agency shall establish quality and productivity objectives for each
major activity in its budget. The objectives must be consistent with
the missions and goals developed under this section. The objectives
must be expressed to the extent practicable in outcome-based,
objective, and measurable form unless an exception to adopt a different
standard is granted by the office of financial management and approved
by the legislative committee on performance review. Objectives must
specifically address the statutory purpose or intent of the program or
activity and focus on data that measure whether the agency is achieving
or making progress toward the purpose of the activity and toward
statewide priorities. The office of financial management shall provide
necessary professional and technical assistance to assist state
agencies in the development of strategic plans that include the mission
of the agency and its programs, measurable goals, strategies, and
performance measurement systems.
(4) Each state agency shall adopt procedures for and perform
continuous self-assessment of each activity, using the mission, goals,
objectives, and measurements required under subsections (2) and (3) of
this section. The assessment of the activity must also include an
evaluation of major information technology systems or projects that may
assist the agency in achieving or making progress toward the activity
purpose and statewide priorities. The evaluation of proposed major
information technology systems or projects shall be in accordance with
the standards and policies established by the ((information services
board)) office of the chief information officer. Agencies' progress
toward the mission, goals, objectives, and measurements required by
subsections (2) and (3) of this section is subject to review as set
forth in this subsection.
(a) The office of financial management shall regularly conduct
reviews of selected activities to analyze whether the objectives and
measurements submitted by agencies demonstrate progress toward
statewide results.
(b) The office of financial management shall consult with the
((higher education coordinating board and the)) state board for
community and technical colleges in those reviews that involve
institutions of higher education.
(c) The goal is for all major activities to receive at least one
review each year.
(d) The office of financial management shall consult with the
((information services board)) office of the chief information officer
when conducting reviews of major information technology systems in use
by state agencies. The goal is that reviews of these information
technology systems occur periodically.
(5) It is the policy of the legislature that each agency's budget
recommendations must be directly linked to the agency's stated mission
and program, quality, and productivity goals and objectives.
Consistent with this policy, agency budget proposals must include
integration of performance measures that allow objective determination
of an activity's success in achieving its goals. When a review under
subsection (4) of this section or other analysis determines that the
agency's objectives demonstrate that the agency is making insufficient
progress toward the goals of any particular program or is otherwise
underachieving or inefficient, the agency's budget request shall
contain proposals to remedy or improve the selected programs. The
office of financial management shall develop a plan to merge the budget
development process with agency performance assessment procedures. The
plan must include a schedule to integrate agency strategic plans and
performance measures into agency budget requests and the governor's
budget proposal over three fiscal biennia. The plan must identify
those agencies that will implement the revised budget process in the
1997-1999 biennium, the 1999-2001 biennium, and the 2001-2003 biennium.
In consultation with the legislative fiscal committees, the office of
financial management shall recommend statutory and procedural
modifications to the state's budget, accounting, and reporting systems
to facilitate the performance assessment procedures and the merger of
those procedures with the state budget process. The plan and
recommended statutory and procedural modifications must be submitted to
the legislative fiscal committees by September 30, 1996.
(6) In reviewing agency budget requests in order to prepare the
governor's biennial budget request, the office of financial management
shall consider the extent to which the agency's activities demonstrate
progress toward the statewide budgeting priorities, along with any
specific review conducted under subsection (4) of this section.
(7) In the year of the gubernatorial election, the governor shall
invite the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee to attend
all hearings provided in RCW 43.88.100; and the governor shall furnish
the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee with such
information as will enable the governor-elect or the governor-elect's
designee to gain an understanding of the state's budget requirements.
The governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee may ask such
questions during the hearings and require such information as the
governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee deems necessary and may
make recommendations in connection with any item of the budget which,
with the governor-elect's reasons therefor, shall be presented to the
legislature in writing with the budget document. Copies of all such
estimates and other required information shall also be submitted to the
standing committees on ways and means of the house and senate.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.88.030 and 2006 c 334 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director of financial management shall provide all agencies
with a complete set of instructions for submitting biennial budget
requests to the director at least three months before agency budget
documents are due into the office of financial management. The budget
document or documents shall consist of the governor's budget message
which shall be explanatory of the budget and shall contain an outline
of the proposed financial policies of the state for the ensuing fiscal
period, as well as an outline of the proposed six-year financial
policies where applicable, and shall describe in connection therewith
the important features of the budget. The biennial budget document or
documents shall also describe performance indicators that demonstrate
measurable progress towards priority results. The message shall set
forth the reasons for salient changes from the previous fiscal period
in expenditure and revenue items and shall explain any major changes in
financial policy. Attached to the budget message shall be such
supporting schedules, exhibits and other explanatory material in
respect to both current operations and capital improvements as the
governor shall deem to be useful to the legislature. The budget
document or documents shall set forth a proposal for expenditures in
the ensuing fiscal period, or six-year period where applicable, based
upon the estimated revenues and caseloads as approved by the economic
and revenue forecast council and caseload forecast council or upon the
estimated revenues and caseloads of the office of financial management
for those funds, accounts, sources, and programs for which the forecast
councils do not prepare an official forecast. Revenues shall be
estimated for such fiscal period from the source and at the rates
existing by law at the time of submission of the budget document,
including the supplemental budgets submitted in the even-numbered years
of a biennium. However, the estimated revenues and caseloads for use
in the governor's budget document may be adjusted to reflect budgetary
revenue transfers and revenue and caseload estimates dependent upon
budgetary assumptions of enrollments, workloads, and caseloads. All
adjustments to the approved estimated revenues and caseloads must be
set forth in the budget document. The governor may additionally
submit, as an appendix to each supplemental, biennial, or six-year
agency budget or to the budget document or documents, a proposal for
expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period from revenue sources derived
from proposed changes in existing statutes.
The budget document or documents shall also contain:
(a) Revenues classified by fund and source for the immediately past
fiscal period, those received or anticipated for the current fiscal
period, and those anticipated for the ensuing biennium;
(b) The undesignated fund balance or deficit, by fund;
(c) Such additional information dealing with expenditures,
revenues, workload, performance, and personnel as the legislature may
direct by law or concurrent resolution;
(d) Such additional information dealing with revenues and
expenditures as the governor shall deem pertinent and useful to the
legislature;
(e) Tabulations showing expenditures classified by fund, function,
and agency;
(f)(i) The expenditures that include nonbudgeted, nonappropriated
accounts outside the state treasury; and
(ii) A listing of each agency's inactive, unfunded state programs
for which no specific funding was provided in the preceding fiscal
year;
(g) Identification of all proposed direct expenditures to implement
the Puget Sound water quality plan under chapter 90.71 RCW, shown by
agency and in total; and
(h) Tabulations showing each postretirement adjustment by
retirement system established after fiscal year 1991, to include, but
not be limited to, estimated total payments made to the end of the
previous biennial period, estimated payments for the present biennium,
and estimated payments for the ensuing biennium.
(2) The budget document or documents shall include detailed
estimates of all anticipated revenues applicable to proposed operating
or capital expenditures and shall also include all proposed operating
or capital expenditures. The total of beginning undesignated fund
balance and estimated revenues less working capital and other reserves
shall equal or exceed the total of proposed applicable expenditures.
The budget document or documents shall further include:
(a) Interest, amortization and redemption charges on the state
debt;
(b) Payments of all reliefs, judgments, and claims;
(c) Other statutory expenditures;
(d) Expenditures incident to the operation for each agency;
(e) Revenues derived from agency operations;
(f) Expenditures and revenues shall be given in comparative form
showing those incurred or received for the immediately past fiscal
period and those anticipated for the current biennium and next ensuing
biennium;
(g) A showing and explanation of amounts of general fund and other
funds obligations for debt service and any transfers of moneys that
otherwise would have been available for appropriation;
(h) Common school expenditures on a fiscal-year basis;
(i) A showing, by agency, of the value and purpose of financing
contracts for the lease/purchase or acquisition of personal or real
property for the current and ensuing fiscal periods; and
(j) A showing and explanation of anticipated amounts of general
fund and other funds required to amortize the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability of the retirement system specified under chapter
41.45 RCW, and the contributions to meet such amortization, stated in
total dollars and as a level percentage of total compensation.
(3) The governor's operating budget document or documents shall
reflect the statewide priorities as required by RCW 43.88.090.
(4) The governor's operating budget document or documents shall
identify activities that are not addressing the statewide priorities.
(5) A separate capital budget document or schedule shall be
submitted that will contain the following:
(a) A statement setting forth a long-range facilities plan for the
state that identifies and includes the highest priority needs within
affordable spending levels;
(b) A capital program consisting of proposed capital projects for
the next biennium and the two biennia succeeding the next biennium
consistent with the long-range facilities plan. Insomuch as is
practical, and recognizing emergent needs, the capital program shall
reflect the priorities, projects, and spending levels proposed in
previously submitted capital budget documents in order to provide a
reliable long-range planning tool for the legislature and state
agencies;
(c) A capital plan consisting of proposed capital spending for at
least four biennia succeeding the next biennium;
(d) A strategic plan for reducing backlogs of maintenance and
repair projects. The plan shall include a prioritized list of specific
facility deficiencies and capital projects to address the deficiencies
for each agency, cost estimates for each project, a schedule for
completing projects over a reasonable period of time, and
identification of normal maintenance activities to reduce future
backlogs;
(e) A statement of the reason or purpose for a project;
(f) Verification that a project is consistent with the provisions
set forth in chapter 36.70A RCW;
(g) A statement about the proposed site, size, and estimated life
of the project, if applicable;
(h) Estimated total project cost;
(i) For major projects valued over five million dollars, estimated
costs for the following project components: Acquisition, consultant
services, construction, equipment, project management, and other costs
included as part of the project. Project component costs shall be
displayed in a standard format defined by the office of financial
management to allow comparisons between projects;
(j) Estimated total project cost for each phase of the project as
defined by the office of financial management;
(k) Estimated ensuing biennium costs;
(l) Estimated costs beyond the ensuing biennium;
(m) Estimated construction start and completion dates;
(n) Source and type of funds proposed;
(o) Estimated ongoing operating budget costs or savings resulting
from the project, including staffing and maintenance costs;
(p) For any capital appropriation requested for a state agency for
the acquisition of land or the capital improvement of land in which the
primary purpose of the acquisition or improvement is recreation or
wildlife habitat conservation, the capital budget document, or an
omnibus list of recreation and habitat acquisitions provided with the
governor's budget document, shall identify the projected costs of
operation and maintenance for at least the two biennia succeeding the
next biennium. Omnibus lists of habitat and recreation land
acquisitions shall include individual project cost estimates for
operation and maintenance as well as a total for all state projects
included in the list. The document shall identify the source of funds
from which the operation and maintenance costs are proposed to be
funded;
(q) Such other information bearing upon capital projects as the
governor deems to be useful;
(r) Standard terms, including a standard and uniform definition of
normal maintenance, for all capital projects;
(s) Such other information as the legislature may direct by law or
concurrent resolution.
For purposes of this subsection (5), the term "capital project"
shall be defined subsequent to the analysis, findings, and
recommendations of a joint committee comprised of representatives from
the house capital appropriations committee, senate ways and means
committee, legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
and office of financial management.
(6) No change affecting the comparability of agency or program
information relating to expenditures, revenues, workload, performance
and personnel shall be made in the format of any budget document or
report presented to the legislature under this section or RCW
43.88.160(1) relative to the format of the budget document or report
which was presented to the previous regular session of the legislature
during an odd-numbered year without prior legislative concurrence.
Prior legislative concurrence shall consist of (a) a favorable majority
vote on the proposal by the standing committees on ways and means of
both houses if the legislature is in session or (b) a favorable
majority vote on the proposal by members of the legislative evaluation
and accountability program committee if the legislature is not in
session.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
Any state program as defined in section 2 of this act taking effect
on or after July 1, 2012, that does not receive specific funding as
provided in the enacted bill's fiscal note prepared pursuant to RCW
43.88A.020 expires three years after the effective date, unless an
earlier expiration date is specified in the enacting legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.09 RCW.

--- END ---