BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this
chapter applies to:
(a) The University of Washington with respect to postdoctoral
researchers in a classification in subsection (2) of this section on
any University of Washington campus; and
(b) Washington State University with respect to postdoctoral
researchers in a classification in subsection (3) of this section on
any Washington State University campus.
(2) The employees in this subsection constitute an appropriate
bargaining unit at the University of Washington:
(a) Research associate;
(b) Research associate trainee;
(c) Senior fellow;
(d) Senior fellow trainee; and
(e) All employees whose duties and responsibilities are
substantially equivalent to those employees in (a) through (d) of this
subsection.
(3) The employees in this subsection constitute an appropriate
bargaining unit at Washington State University:
(a) Postdoctoral research associate; and
(b) All employees whose duties and responsibilities are
substantially equivalent to those employees in (a) of this subsection.

--- END ---