BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.437 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 7 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish for each medicaid nursing
facility a financing allowance component rate allocation. The
financing allowance component rate shall be rebased annually, effective
July 1st, in accordance with the provisions of this section and this
chapter.
(2) The financing allowance is determined by multiplying the net
invested funds of each facility by ((.04)) the applicable financing
allowance factor, and dividing by the greater of a nursing facility's
total resident days from the most recent cost report period or resident
days calculated on eighty-seven percent facility occupancy for
essential community providers, ninety-two percent facility occupancy
for small nonessential community providers, or ninety-five percent
occupancy for large nonessential community providers. If a capitalized
addition, renovation, replacement, or retirement of an asset will
result in a different licensed bed capacity during the ensuing period,
the prior period total resident days used in computing the financing
allowance shall be adjusted to the greater of the anticipated resident
day level or eighty-seven percent of the new licensed bed capacity for
essential community providers, ninety-two percent facility occupancy
for small nonessential community providers, or ninety-five percent
occupancy for large nonessential community providers. The financing
allowance factor of .085 shall be applied to assets acquired on or
before June 30, 2011. The financing allowance factor of .04 shall be
applied to assets acquired on or after July 1, 2011.
(3) In computing the portion of net invested funds representing the
net book value of tangible fixed assets, the same assets, depreciation
bases, lives, and methods referred to in department rule, including
owned and leased assets, shall be utilized, except that the capitalized
cost of land upon which the facility is located and such other
contiguous land which is reasonable and necessary for use in the
regular course of providing resident care must also be included.
Subject to provisions and limitations contained in this chapter, for
land purchased by owners or lessors before July 18, 1984, capitalized
cost of land is the buyer's capitalized cost. For all partial or whole
rate periods after July 17, 1984, if the land is purchased after July
17, 1984, capitalized cost is that of the owner of record on July 17,
1984, or buyer's capitalized cost, whichever is lower. In the case of
leased facilities where the net invested funds are unknown or the
contractor is unable to provide necessary information to determine net
invested funds, the secretary has the authority to determine an amount
for net invested funds based on an appraisal conducted according to
department rule.
(4) The financing allowance rate allocation calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

--- END ---