BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the need to
increase government efficiency and that greater government efficiency
may be achieved by consolidating agencies, merging similar and
duplicative functions, and privatizing state functions when possible.
Recently, citizens passed Initiative Measure No. 1183, which will soon
significantly reduce the functions of the liquor control board.
Privatizing lottery functions may generate savings and new revenue for
the state. This act, which consolidates the horse racing commission,
gambling commission, state lottery commission, and liquor control board
into a single agency, and seeks revenue opportunities through private
management of the state lottery, is intended to increase efficiency by
streamlining government.

PART I
GAMING AND LIQUOR CONTROL COMMISSION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 There is created a gaming and liquor
control commission that is vested with all powers and duties
transferred to it under this chapter and such other powers and duties
as may be authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 As used in this chapter, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, "commission" means the gaming and
liquor control commission.

Sec. 103 RCW 9.46.040 and 1974 ex.s. c 155 s 12 are each amended
to read as follows:
There shall be a commission, known as the (("Washington state
gambling commission")) gaming and liquor control commission, consisting
of five members appointed by the governor with the consent of the
senate. The members of the commission shall be appointed ((within
thirty days of July 16, 1973)) for terms beginning ((July 1, 1973))
October 1, 2012, and expiring as follows: One member of the commission
for a term expiring July 1, ((1975)) 2014; one member of the commission
for a term expiring July 1, ((1976)) 2015; one member of the commission
for a term expiring July 1, ((1977)) 2016; one member of the commission
for a term expiring July 1, ((1978)) 2017; and one member of the
commission for a term expiring July 1, ((1979)) 2018; each as the
governor so determines. Their successors, all of whom shall be citizen
members appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate, upon
being appointed and qualified, shall serve six year terms: PROVIDED,
That no member of the commission who has served a full six year term
shall be eligible for reappointment. In case of a vacancy, it shall be
filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired portion of the
term in which said vacancy occurs. No vacancy in the membership of the
commission shall impair the right of the remaining member or members to
act, except as provided in RCW 9.46.050(2) ((provided)) (as recodified
by this act).
In addition to the members of the commission there shall be four ex
officio members without vote from the legislature consisting of: (1)
Two members of the senate, one from the majority political party and
one from the minority political party, both to be appointed by the
president of the senate; (2) two members of the house of
representatives, one from the majority political party and one from the
minority political party, both to be appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives; such appointments shall be for the term of
two years or for the period in which the appointee serves as a
legislator, whichever expires first; members may be reappointed;
vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments
are made. Such ex officio members who shall collect data deemed
essential to future legislative proposals and exchange information with
the ((board)) commission shall be deemed engaged in legislative
business while in attendance upon the business of the ((board))
commission and shall be limited to such allowances therefor as
otherwise provided in RCW 44.04.120, the same to be paid from the
(("))gambling revolving fund((")) as being expenses relative to
commission business.

Sec. 104 RCW 9.46.050 and 2011 c 336 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon appointment of the initial membership the commission shall
meet at a time and place designated by the governor and proceed to
organize, electing one of such members as chair of the commission who
shall serve until July 1, ((1974)) 2014; thereafter a chair shall be
elected annually.
(2) A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum of the
commission: PROVIDED, That all actions of the commission ((relating to
the regulation of licensing under this chapter shall)) require an
affirmative vote by three or more members of the commission.
(3) The principal office of the commission shall be at the state
capitol, and meetings shall be held at least ((quarterly)) monthly and
at such other times as may be called by the chair or upon written
request to the chair of a majority of the commission.
(4) Members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250
and shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) Before entering upon the duties of his or her office, each of
the members of the commission shall enter into a surety bond executed
by a surety company authorized to do business in this state, payable to
the state of Washington, to be approved by the governor, in the penal
sum of fifty thousand dollars, conditioned upon the faithful
performance of his or her duties, and shall take and subscribe to the
oath of office prescribed for elective state officers, which oath and
bond shall be filed with the secretary of state. The premium for said
bond shall be paid by the commission.
(6) Any member of the commission may be removed ((for inefficiency,
malfeasance, or misfeasance in office, upon specific written charges
filed by the governor, who shall transmit such written charges to the
member accused and to the chief justice of the supreme court. The
chief justice shall thereupon designate a tribunal composed of three
judges of the superior court to hear and adjudicate the charges. Such
tribunal shall fix the time of the hearing, which shall be public, and
the procedure for the hearing, and the decision of such tribunal shall
be final. Removal of any member of the commission by the tribunal
shall disqualify such member for reappointment)) at any time at the
pleasure of the governor.

Sec. 105 RCW 9.46.080 and 1994 c 218 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The governor shall recommend and the commission shall employ a full
time director, who shall be the administrator for the commission in
carrying out its powers and duties and who shall issue rules ((and
regulations)) adopted by the commission governing the activities
authorized ((hereunder)) under this chapter and shall supervise
commission employees in carrying out the purposes and provisions of
this chapter. In addition, the director shall employ ((a deputy
director, not more than three assistant directors, together with such
investigators and enforcement officers and)) such staff as the
commission determines is necessary to carry out the purposes and
provisions of this chapter. The director((, the)) and any deputy
directors((, the)) and assistant directors, and personnel occupying
positions requiring the performing of undercover investigative work
shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW, as now law or
hereafter amended. ((Neither the director nor any commission employee
working therefor shall be an officer or manager of any bona fide
charitable or bona fide nonprofit organization, or of any organization
which conducts gambling activity in this state.))
The director, subject to the approval of the commission, is
authorized to enter into agreements on behalf of the commission for
mutual assistance and services, based upon actual costs, with any state
or federal agency or with any city, town, or county, and such state or
local agency is authorized to enter into such an agreement with the
commission. If a needed service is not available from another agency
of state government within a reasonable time, the director may obtain
that service from private industry.

Sec. 106 RCW 9.46.085 and 1986 c 4 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A member or employee of the ((gambling)) commission shall not:
(1) Serve as an officer or manager of any corporation or
organization which conducts a lottery or gambling activity;
(2) Receive or share in, directly or indirectly, the gross profits
of any gambling activity regulated by the commission;
(3) Be beneficially interested in any contract for the manufacture
or sale of gambling devices, the conduct of (([a])) a gambling
activity, or the provision of independent consultant services in
connection with a gambling activity.

Sec. 107 RCW 9.46.360 and 1992 c 172 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The negotiation process for compacts with federally recognized
Indian tribes for conducting class III gaming, as defined in the Indian
Gaming Regulatory Act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq., on federal Indian
lands is governed by this section.
(2) The ((gambling)) commission through the director or the
director's designee shall negotiate compacts for class III gaming on
behalf of the state with federally recognized Indian tribes in the
state of Washington.
(3) When a tentative agreement with an Indian tribe on a proposed
compact is reached, the director shall immediately transmit a copy of
the proposed compact to all voting and ex officio members of the
((gambling)) commission and to the standing committees designated
pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.
(4) Notwithstanding RCW 9.46.040 (as recodified by this act), the
four ex officio members of the ((gambling)) commission shall be deemed
voting members of the ((gambling)) commission for the sole purpose of
voting on proposed compacts submitted under this section.
(5) Within thirty days after receiving a proposed compact from the
director, one standing committee from each house of the legislature
shall hold a public hearing on the proposed compact and forward its
respective comments to the ((gambling)) commission. The president of
the senate shall designate the senate standing committee that is to
carry out the duties of this section, and the speaker of the house of
representatives shall designate the house standing committee that is to
carry out the duties of this section. The designated committees shall
continue to perform under this section until the president of the
senate or the speaker of the house of representatives, as the case may
be, designates a different standing committee.
(6) The ((gambling)) commission may hold public hearings on the
proposed compact any time after receiving a copy of the compact from
the director. Within forty-five days after receiving the proposed
compact from the director, the ((gambling)) commission, including the
four ex officio members, shall vote on whether to return the proposed
compact to the director with instructions for further negotiation or to
forward the proposed compact to the governor for review and final
execution.
(7) Notwithstanding provisions in this section to the contrary, if
the director forwards a proposed compact to the ((gambling)) commission
and the designated standing committees within ten days before the
beginning of a regular session of the legislature, or during a regular
or special session of the legislature, the thirty-day time limit set
forth in subsection (5) of this section and the forty-five day limit
set forth in subsection (6) of this section are each forty-five days
and sixty days, respectively.
(8) Funding for the negotiation process under this section must
come from the gambling revolving fund.
(9) In addition to the powers granted under this chapter, the
commission, consistent with the terms of any compact, is authorized and
empowered to enforce the provisions of any compact between a federally
recognized Indian tribe and the state of Washington.

Sec. 108 RCW 67.70.050 and 2012 c --- s 205 (section 205 of this
act) are each amended to read as follows:
((There is created the office of director of the state lottery.
The director shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the
senate. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and
shall receive such salary as is determined by the governor, but in no
case may the director's salary be more than ninety percent of the
salary of the governor.)) The director shall:
(1) Supervise and administer the operation of the lottery in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter and with the rules of
the commission.
(2) ((Appoint such deputy and assistant directors as may be
required to carry out the functions and duties of his or her office.
The provisions of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, shall
not apply to such deputy and assistant directors.
(3) Appoint such professional, technical, and clerical assistants
and employees as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed by this
chapter. The provisions of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06
RCW, shall not apply to such employees as are engaged in undercover
audit or investigative work or security operations but shall apply to
other employees appointed by the director, except as provided for in
subsection (2) of this section.
(4))) In accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the
rules of the commission, license as agents to sell or distribute
lottery tickets such persons as in ((his)) the director's opinion will
best serve the public convenience and promote the sale of tickets or
shares. The director may require a bond from any licensed agent, in
such amount as provided in the rules of the commission. Every licensed
agent shall prominently display ((his)) the agent's license, or a copy
thereof, as provided in the rules of the commission. License fees may
be established by the commission, and, if established, shall be
deposited in the state lottery account created by RCW 67.70.230.
(((5))) (3) Confer regularly as necessary or desirable with the
commission on the operation and administration of the lottery; make
available for inspection by the commission, upon request, all books,
records, files, and other information and documents of the lottery; and
advise the commission and recommend such matters as the director deems
necessary and advisable to improve the operation and administration of
the lottery.
(((6))) (4) Subject to the applicable laws relating to public
contracts, enter into contracts for the operation of the lottery, or
any part thereof, and into contracts for the promotion of the lottery.
No contract awarded or entered into by the director may be assigned by
the holder thereof except by specific approval of the commission.
(((7))) (5) Certify quarterly to the state treasurer and the
commission a full and complete statement of lottery revenues, prize
disbursements, and other expenses for the preceding quarter.
(((8))) (6) Carry on a continuous study and investigation of the
lottery throughout the state: (a) For the purpose of ascertaining any
defects in this chapter or in the rules issued thereunder by reason
whereof any abuses in the administration and operation of the lottery
or any evasion of this chapter or the rules may arise or be practiced,
(b) for the purpose of formulating recommendations for changes in this
chapter and the rules ((promulgated)) adopted thereunder to prevent
such abuses and evasions, (c) to guard against the use of this chapter
and the rules ((issued)) adopted thereunder as a cloak for the carrying
on of professional gambling and crime, and (d) to ensure that this
chapter and rules shall be in such form and be so administered as to
serve the true purposes of this chapter.
(((9))) (7) Make a continuous study and investigation of: (a) The
operation and the administration of similar laws which may be in effect
in other states or countries, (b) the operation of an additional game
or games for the benefit of a particular program or purpose, (c) any
literature on the subject which from time to time may be published or
available, (d) any federal laws which may affect the operation of the
lottery, and (e) the reaction of the citizens of this state to existing
and potential features of the lottery with a view to recommending or
effecting changes that will tend to serve the purposes of this chapter.
(((10))) (8) Have all enforcement powers granted in chapter 9.46
RCW.
(((11))) (9) Perform all other matters and things necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 109 RCW 42.17A.705 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 109 are each
amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.700, "executive state officer"
includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the director of the department of services for the blind,
the chief information officer of the office of chief information
officer, the director of the state system of community and technical
colleges, the director of commerce, the director of the consolidated
technology services agency, the secretary of corrections, the director
of early learning, the director of ecology, the commissioner of
employment security, the chair of the energy facility site evaluation
council, the director of enterprise services, the secretary of the
state finance committee, the director of financial management, the
director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest
practices appeals board, the director of the ((gambling)) gaming and
liquor control commission, the secretary of health, the administrator
of the Washington state health care authority, the executive secretary
of the health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of the
higher education facilities authority, ((the executive secretary of the
horse racing commission,)) the human resources director, the executive
secretary of the human rights commission, the executive secretary of
the indeterminate sentence review board, the executive director of the
state investment board, the director of labor and industries, the
director of licensing, ((the director of the lottery commission,)) the
director of the office of minority and women's business enterprises,
the director of parks and recreation, the executive director of the
public disclosure commission, the executive director of the Puget Sound
partnership, the director of the recreation and conservation office,
the director of retirement systems, the director of revenue, the
secretary of social and health services, the chief of the Washington
state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the
secretary of transportation, the secretary of the utilities and
transportation commission, the director of veterans affairs, the
president of each of the regional and state universities and the
president of The Evergreen State College, and each district and each
campus president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, Eastern Washington
University board of trustees, Washington economic development finance
authority, Washington energy northwest executive board, The Evergreen
State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, fish and
wildlife commission, forest practices appeals board, forest practices
board, ((gambling)) gaming and liquor control commission, Washington
health care facilities authority, higher education coordinating board,
higher education facilities authority, ((horse racing commission,))
state housing finance commission, human rights commission,
indeterminate sentence review board, board of industrial insurance
appeals, state investment board, commission on judicial conduct,
legislative ethics board, life sciences discovery fund authority board
of trustees, ((liquor control board, lottery commission,)) Pacific
Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and
recreation commission, Washington personnel resources board, board of
pilotage commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public
disclosure commission, public employees' benefits board, recreation and
conservation funding board, salmon recovery funding board, shorelines
hearings board, board of tax appeals, transportation commission,
University of Washington board of regents, utilities and transportation
commission, Washington State University board of regents, and Western
Washington University board of trustees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 66.08.012 (Creation of board -- Chairman -- Quorum -- Salary) and
1961 c 307 s 7, 1949 c 5 s 8, 1945 c 208 s 1, 1937 c 225 s 1, & 1933
ex.s. c 62 s 63;
(2) RCW 66.08.014 (Terms of members -- Vacancies -- Principal office--
Removal -- Devotion of time to duties -- Bond -- Oath) and 1986 c 105 s 1,
1949 c 5 s 9, 1947 c 113 s 1, 1945 c 208 s 2, & 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 64;
(3) RCW 66.08.016 (Employees of the board) and 1961 c 1 s 30, 1947
c 113 s 2, & 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 65;
(4) RCW 66.08.080 (Interest in manufacture or sale of liquor
prohibited) and 1994 c 154 s 313, 1981 1st ex.s. c 5 s 3, & 1933 ex.s.
c 62 s 68;
(5) RCW 67.16.012 (Washington horse racing commission -- Creation--Terms -- Vacancies -- Bonds -- Oaths) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 13, 1998 c
345 s 4, 1987 c 453 s 2, 1973 1st ex.s. c 216 s 1, 1969 ex.s. c 233 s
1, & 1933 c 55 s 2;
(6) RCW 67.16.014 (Washington horse racing commission -- Ex officio
nonvoting members) and 1991 c 270 s 2 & 1987 c 453 s 3;
(7) RCW 67.16.015 (Washington horse racing commission--Organization -- Secretary -- Records -- Annual reports) and 1977 c 75 s 80 &
1933 c 55 s 3;
(8) RCW 67.16.017 (Washington horse racing commission -- Compensation
and travel expenses) and 1984 c 287 s 100, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s
155, & 1969 ex.s. c 233 s 2;
(9) RCW 67.16.140 (Employees of commission -- Employment restriction)
and 1973 1st ex.s. c 216 s 3;
(10) RCW 67.16.150 (Employees of commission -- Commissioners--Financial interest restrictions) and 1973 1st ex.s. c 216 s 4;
(11) RCW 67.16.160 (Rules implementing conflict of interest laws--Wagers by commissioner) and 2004 c 274 s 3, 1994 c 154 s 314, & 1973
1st ex.s. c 216 s 5;
(12) RCW 67.70.030 (State lottery commission created -- Membership--Terms -- Vacancies -- Chairman -- Quorum) and 1982 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 3;
(13) RCW 67.70.055 (Activities prohibited to officers, employees,
and members) and 1987 c 511 s 4 & 1986 c 4 s 2; and
(14) RCW 67.70.270 (Members of commission -- Compensation -- Travel
expenses) and 1984 c 287 s 101 & 1982 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 27.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 (1) The gambling commission, horse racing
commission, lottery commission, and liquor control board are hereby
abolished and their powers, duties, and functions are hereby
transferred to the gaming and liquor control commission. All
references to the director of the gambling commission, the executive
secretary of the horse racing commission, the director of the lottery
commission, or the chairman of the liquor control board or the gambling
commission, horse racing commission, lottery commission, or liquor
control board in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to
mean the director or the gaming and liquor control commission.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the gambling
commission, horse racing commission, lottery commission, or liquor
control board shall be delivered to the custody of the gaming and
liquor control commission. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment,
motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the gambling
commission, horse racing commission, lottery commission, or liquor
control board shall be made available to the gaming and liquor control
commission. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the gambling
commission, horse racing commission, lottery commission, or liquor
control board shall be assigned to the gaming and liquor control
commission.
(b) Any appropriations made to the gambling commission, horse
racing commission, lottery commission, or liquor control board shall,
on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to
the gaming and liquor control commission.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the gambling commission, horse racing
commission, lottery commission, or liquor control board are transferred
to the jurisdiction of the gaming and liquor control commission. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service
law, are assigned to the gaming and liquor control commission to
perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any
loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate
thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil
service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the gambling
commission, horse racing commission, lottery commission, or liquor
control board shall be continued and acted upon by the gaming and
liquor control commission. All existing contracts and obligations
shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the gaming and
liquor control commission.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the gambling commission, horse racing commission, lottery commission,
or liquor control board shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 RCW 9.46.040, 9.46.050, 9.46.060,
9.46.070, 9.46.080, and 9.46.085 are each recodified as sections in
chapter 43.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 301 of this
act).

PART II
STATE LOTTERY MANAGEMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 (1) The department of enterprise services,
in consultation with the office of financial management and the
Washington state lottery, must establish and conduct a competitive
process for the selection of a private sector entity to manage the
state lottery. The department of enterprise services may enter into a
contract if it determines that it is in the best interest of the state
following the competitive process. The competitive process must assume
that the Washington state lottery or its successor state entity retains
its ownership, control over, and the authority to regulate the lottery
system in Washington state.
(2)(a) Pursuant to the required competitive process under
subsection (1) of this section, the department of enterprise services
must request proposals to establish a contract between the state
lottery and a private manager, as an independent contractor, to provide
management services to the state lottery for compensation.
(b) The request for proposals must include without limitation:
(i) A requirement that proposals demonstrate to the satisfaction of
the department of enterprise services relevant previous experience as
well as the financial capacity to perform obligations under the
contract;
(ii) A requirement that proposals demonstrate, to the satisfaction
of the office of financial management, a net positive financial benefit
to the state of Washington over the term of the proposed contract;
(iii) A requirement that proposals include a commitment to offer
employment to the state employees currently in affected positions at
the state lottery and to recognize and bargain with any existing
bargaining representative of such employees with respect to terms and
conditions of employment;
(iv) Measurable standards for the performance of the contract; and
(v) A requirement that lottery games may not be marketed to minors
or conducted over the internet.
(c) The office of financial management must publicly disclose an
analysis of the fiscal impacts to the state of each of the offers in
the procurement process.
(d) After consultation with the office of financial management and
the state lottery, the department of enterprise services is authorized
to enter into a contract on behalf of the state with the apparent
successful proposer that it determines best meets the criteria required
under this subsection (2), in the best interests of the state. If, in
the determination of the department of enterprise services, after
consultation with the office of financial management and the state
lottery, there is no proposal that meets the best interest of the
state, no contract may be entered into.
(3) Any challenge to or protest of the determination of an apparent
successful proposer by the department of enterprise services must be
filed by a respondent that submitted a proposal with the department of
enterprise services within five days after such determination and
acceptance. The department of enterprise services may require a bid
protest bond in an amount specified in the request for proposals. The
grounds for such challenge or protest are limited to claims that the
determination and acceptance were arbitrary or capricious. The
department of enterprise services must, within five days, render its
decision on the protest.
The respondent that filed the protest may, within five days after
such decision, appeal to the superior court of Thurston county by
petition setting forth objections to the decision. A copy of the
petition on appeal together with a notice that an appeal has been taken
must be served upon the secretary of state, the attorney general, the
department of enterprise services, and the proposer that submitted the
apparently successful proposal. The court must accord first priority
to examining the objections, may hear arguments, and must, within ten
days, render its decision. The court shall grant relief to the
petitioner only if the court determines that the department's decision
is arbitrary or capricious. The decision of the superior court is
final.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 The department of enterprise services may
retain the services of an advisor or advisors, including legal counsel,
experienced and qualified in the field of financial services or the
management and operation of a government run lottery to assist in the
preparation of the terms of the request for proposal and selection of
the private manager. Any advisor seeking to provide services under
this section shall disclose any relationship during the past three
years with any potential responder to the request for proposal or with
a contractor or subcontractor presently providing goods, services, or
equipment to the department of enterprise services to support the
lottery. The department of enterprise services shall not select any
advisor with a substantial business or financial relationship that the
department of enterprise services deems to impair the objectivity of
the services to be provided by the prospective advisor. During the
course of the advisor's engagement by the department of enterprise
services, and for a period of one year thereafter, the advisor shall
not enter into any business or financial relationship with any entity
responding to the request for proposal. Any advisor retained by the
department of enterprise services is disqualified from responding to
the request for proposal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 (1) After the acceptance of the apparently
successful proposal under section 201 of this act, the department of
enterprise services shall enter into a contract with that entity for
the management of the state lottery. The contract must grant the
exclusive right to manage the lottery under supervision of the lottery
director for the period of the contract. The contract must include
enforceable performance standards and minimum financial returns to the
state. The contract must include a provision that allows the state to
terminate the contract should specific performance standards or
financial returns to the state not be realized. The contract must
provide for a reasonable termination notification process as well as
financial terms of termination should termination of contract take
place.
(2) The contract must also include provisions specifying that:
(a) The state lottery shall exercise actual control over all
significant business decisions of the lottery;
(b) The state lottery retains the authority to direct or overrule
operating decisions made by the private manager;
(c) The state lottery has full access to information regarding
lottery operations and the right to demand and receive information from
the private manager regarding the operation of the lottery;
(d) The state lottery retains ownership of all trade names,
trademarks, and intellectual property associated with the lottery;
(e) The state lottery shall monitor and oversee the private
manager's practices and take action that the commission deems
appropriate to ensure that the private manager is complying with its
obligations under the contract;
(f) The private manager shall file, at least annually, financial
statements in a form and manner acceptable to the commission;
(g) The private manager must receive the prior approval of the
commission when the contract or an interest in the contract is sold,
assigned, transferred, or pledged as collateral to secure financing;
(h) The private manager has an affirmative duty to timely provide
the state lottery with any information the private manager possesses,
regardless of form, that the state lottery reasonably needs to enable
it to properly perform its duties.
(i) The use of any copyrights, trademarks, and service marks held
by the state lottery shall only be used for the purpose of fulfilling
the manager's obligations under the contract;
(j) The Washington state lottery maintains the exclusive ownership,
control over, and authority to regulate the state lottery; and
(k) Any financial deficiencies or losses of the private entity
contracting for the management of the lottery in the state must not be
compensated for in any way by the state.

Sec. 204 RCW 67.70.010 and 2002 c 349 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Commission" means the state lottery commission established by
this chapter;
(2) "Director" means the director of the state lottery established
by this chapter;
(3) "Lottery" or "state lottery" means the lottery established and
operated pursuant to this chapter;
(4) "Online game" means a lottery game in which a player pays a fee
to a lottery retailer and selects a combination of digits, numbers, or
symbols, type and amount of play, and receives a computer-generated
ticket with those selections, and the lottery separately draws or
selects the winning combination or combinations;
(5) "Private manager" means an entity that provides management
services to the state lottery under a contract.
(6) "Shared game lottery" means any lottery activity in which the
commission participates under written agreement between the commission,
on behalf of the state, and any other state or states.

Sec. 205 RCW 67.70.050 and 1998 c 245 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created the office of director of the state lottery. The
director shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the
senate. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and
shall receive such salary as is determined by the governor, but in no
case may the director's salary be more than ninety percent of the
salary of the governor. The director shall:
(1) Supervise and administer the operation of the lottery in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter and with the rules of
the commission.
(2) Appoint such deputy and assistant directors as may be required
to carry out the functions and duties of his or her office((:
PROVIDED, That)). The provisions of the state civil service law,
chapter 41.06 RCW, shall not apply to such deputy and assistant
directors.
(3) Appoint such professional, technical, and clerical assistants
and employees as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed by this
chapter((: PROVIDED, That)). The provisions of the state civil
service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, shall not apply to such employees as
are engaged in undercover audit or investigative work or security
operations but shall apply to other employees appointed by the
director, except as provided for in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) In accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules
of the commission, license as agents to sell or distribute lottery
tickets such persons as in his opinion will best serve the public
convenience and promote the sale of tickets or shares. The director
may require a bond from any licensed agent, in such amount as provided
in the rules of the commission. Every licensed agent shall prominently
display his license, or a copy thereof, as provided in the rules of the
commission. License fees may be established by the commission, and, if
established, shall be deposited in the state lottery account created by
RCW 67.70.230.
(5) Confer regularly as necessary or desirable with the commission
on the operation and administration of the lottery; make available for
inspection by the commission, upon request, all books, records, files,
and other information and documents of the lottery; and advise the
commission and recommend such matters as the director deems necessary
and advisable to improve the operation and administration of the
lottery.
(6) Subject to the applicable laws relating to public contracts,
enter into contracts for the operation of the lottery, or any part
thereof, and into contracts for the promotion of the lottery. No
contract awarded or entered into by the director may be assigned by the
holder thereof except by specific approval of the commission((:
PROVIDED, That nothing in this chapter authorizes the director to enter
into public contracts for the regular and permanent administration of
the lottery after the initial development and implementation)).
(7) Certify quarterly to the state treasurer and the commission a
full and complete statement of lottery revenues, prize disbursements,
and other expenses for the preceding quarter.
(8) Carry on a continuous study and investigation of the lottery
throughout the state: (a) For the purpose of ascertaining any defects
in this chapter or in the rules issued thereunder by reason whereof any
abuses in the administration and operation of the lottery or any
evasion of this chapter or the rules may arise or be practiced, (b) for
the purpose of formulating recommendations for changes in this chapter
and the rules promulgated thereunder to prevent such abuses and
evasions, (c) to guard against the use of this chapter and the rules
issued thereunder as a cloak for the carrying on of professional
gambling and crime, and (d) to ensure that this chapter and rules shall
be in such form and be so administered as to serve the true purposes of
this chapter.
(9) Make a continuous study and investigation of: (a) The
operation and the administration of similar laws which may be in effect
in other states or countries, (b) the operation of an additional game
or games for the benefit of a particular program or purpose, (c) any
literature on the subject which from time to time may be published or
available, (d) any federal laws which may affect the operation of the
lottery, and (e) the reaction of the citizens of this state to existing
and potential features of the lottery with a view to recommending or
effecting changes that will tend to serve the purposes of this chapter.
(10) Have all enforcement powers granted in chapter 9.46 RCW.
(11) Perform all other matters and things necessary to carry out
the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 206 RCW 67.70.180 and 1987 c 511 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A ticket or share shall not be purchased by, and a prize shall
not be paid to any member of the commission, the director, or an
employee of the lottery or to any spouse, child, brother, sister, or
parent residing as a member of the same household in the principal
place of abode of any member of the commission, the director or an
employee of the lottery.
(2) A ticket or share shall not be purchased by, and a prize shall
not be paid to any officer or employee of a private manager or to any
spouse, child, brother, sister, or parent residing as a member of the
same household in the principal place of abode of any officer or
employee of a private manager.
A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 207 RCW 67.70.240 and 2011 c 352 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:
(1) For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery
tickets or shares;
(2) For purposes of making deposits into the reserve account
created by RCW 67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260;
(3) For purposes of making deposits into the education construction
fund created in RCW 43.135.045 and the Washington opportunity pathways
account created in RCW 28B.76.526. On and after July 1, 2010, all
deposits not otherwise obligated under this section shall be placed in
the Washington opportunity pathways account. Moneys in the state
lottery account deposited in the Washington opportunity pathways
account are included in "general state revenues" under RCW 39.42.070;
(4) For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying the
principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the county to
construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including
reasonably necessary preconstruction costs. Three million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during calendar year 1996.
During subsequent years, such distributions shall equal the prior
year's distributions increased by four percent. Distributions under
this subsection shall cease when the bonds issued for the construction
of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than twenty years
after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;
(5) For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account,
created in RCW 43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW
43.99N.070, six million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during the calendar year 1998. During subsequent years,
such distribution shall equal the prior year's distributions increased
by four percent. No distribution may be made under this subsection
after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of the
bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this
subsection shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than
December 31, 2020;
(6) For transfer to the veterans innovations program account. The
net revenues received from the sale of the annual Veteran's Day lottery
raffle conducted under RCW 67.70.500 must be deposited into the
veterans innovations program account created in RCW 43.60A.185 for
purposes of serving veterans and their families. For purposes under
this subsection, "net revenues" means all revenues received from the
sale of veteran lottery raffle tickets less the sum of the amount paid
out in prizes and the actual administration expenses of the lottery
solely related to the veteran lottery raffle;
(7) For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; ((and))
(8) For the payment of agent compensation; and
(9) For the payment of private manager compensation.
The office of financial management shall require the allotment of
all expenses paid from the account and shall report to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives any changes
in the allotments.

Sec. 208 RCW 67.70.260 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 962 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is hereby created the lottery administrative account in the
state treasury. The account shall be managed, controlled, and
maintained by the director. The legislature may appropriate from the
account for the payment of costs incurred in the operation and
administration of the lottery. During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer from the lottery administrative account to
the state general fund such amounts as reflect the appropriations
reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for
administrative efficiencies and savings. During the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, the lottery administrative account may also be used to fund
an independent forecast of the lottery revenues conducted by the
economic and revenue forecast council. The lottery administrative
account may also be used to fund the competitive process and contract
award activities under this act conducted by the department of
enterprise services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 Contracting for services under this
chapter is not subject to the processes of RCW 41.06.142 (1), (4), and
(5).

PART III
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 Sections 1, 101, 102, and 111 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 Sections 201 through 203 and 209 of this
act are each added to chapter 67.70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 Sections 1 and 101 through 111 of this act
take effect October 1, 2012.

--- END ---