BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.015 and 2009 c 362 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agricultural structure" means a structure designed and
constructed to house farm implements, hay, grain, poultry, livestock,
or other horticultural products. This structure may not be a place of
human habitation or a place of employment where agricultural products
are processed, treated, or packaged, nor may it be a place used by the
public((;)).
(2) "City" means a city or town((;)).
(3) "Multifamily residential building" means common wall
residential buildings that consist of four or fewer units, that do not
exceed two stories in height, that are less than five thousand square
feet in area, and that have a one-hour fire-resistive occupancy
separation between units((; and)).
(4) "State building code" means the set of nationally recognized
model codes and standards developed under consensus processes by
nationally recognized consensus bodies and as adopted by the state
building code council for statewide applicability.
(5) "Temporary growing structure" means a structure that has the
sides and roof covered with polyethylene, polyvinyl, or similar
flexible synthetic material and is used to provide plants with either
frost protection or increased heat retention.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27.031 and 2003 c 291 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, there shall be in
effect in all counties and cities the state building code which shall
consist of the following referenced codes which are hereby adopted ((by
reference)):
(1)(a) The International Building Code, published by the
International Code Council(([,])), Inc.;
(b) The International Residential Code, published by the
International Code Council, Inc.;
(2) The International Mechanical Code, published by the
International Code Council(([,])), Inc., except that the standards for
liquified petroleum gas installations shall be NFPA 58 (Storage and
Handling of Liquified Petroleum Gases) and ANSI Z223.1/NFPA 54
(National Fuel Gas Code);
(3) The International Fire Code, published by the International
Code Council(([,])), Inc., including those standards of the National
Fire Protection Association specifically referenced in the
International Fire Code: PROVIDED, That, notwithstanding any wording
in this code, participants in religious ceremonies shall not be
precluded from carrying hand-held candles;
(4) Except as provided in RCW 19.27.170, the Uniform Plumbing Code
and Uniform Plumbing Code Standards, published by the International
Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials: PROVIDED, That any
provisions of such code affecting sewers or fuel gas piping are not
adopted; ((and))
(5) The rules adopted by the council establishing standards for
making buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by ((the
physically disabled)) individuals with disabilities or elderly persons
as provided in RCW 70.92.100 through 70.92.160; and
(6) The International Energy Conservation Code, published by the
International Code Council, Inc.
In case of conflict among the codes and rules enumerated in
subsections (1)((, (2), (3), and (4))) through (6) of this section, the
first named code or rules shall govern over those following.
The codes enumerated in this section shall be adopted by the
council as provided in RCW 19.27.074. The council shall solicit input
from first responders to ensure that firefighter safety issues are
addressed during the code adoption process.
The council may issue opinions relating to the codes at the request
of a local official charged with the duty to enforce the enumerated
codes.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.27.080 and 2003 c 291 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter affects the provisions of chapters
((19.27A,)) 19.28, 43.22, 70.77, 70.79, 70.87, ((48.48)) 43.44, 18.20,
18.46, 18.51, 28A.305, 70.41, 70.62, 70.75, 70.108, 71.12, 74.15,
70.94, 76.04, 90.76 RCW, or RCW 28A.195.010, or grants rights to
duplicate the authorities provided under chapters 70.94 or 76.04 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.27A.015 and 1990 c 2 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 19.27A.020(((7))) (6), the Washington
state energy code for residential buildings shall be the maximum and
minimum energy code for residential buildings in each city, town, and
county and shall be enforced under the authority of chapter 19.27 RCW
by each city, town, and county no later than July 1, 1991. The
Washington state energy code for nonresidential buildings shall be the
minimum energy code for nonresidential buildings enforced by each city,
town, and county under the authority of chapter 19.27 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.27A.020 and 2010 c 271 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state building code council shall adopt ((rules)) by rule
the international energy conservation code, published by the
International Code Council, Inc., to be known as the Washington state
energy code and included as part of the state building code, chapter
19.27 RCW.
(2) The council shall follow the legislature's standards set forth
in this section to adopt rules to be known as the Washington state
energy code. The Washington state energy code shall be designed to:
(a) Construct increasingly energy efficient homes and buildings
that help achieve the broader goal of building zero fossil-fuel
greenhouse gas emission homes and buildings by the year 2031;
(b) Require new buildings to meet a certain level of energy
efficiency, but allow flexibility in building design, construction, and
heating equipment efficiencies within that framework; ((and))
(c) Allow space heating equipment efficiency to offset or
substitute for building envelope thermal performance; and
(d) Incorporate the 2012 international energy conservation code in
total with the following revisions to table C402.1.2, table C402.2,
table R402.1.1, and table R402.1.3 and the default tables of chapter 10
of the 2009 Washington state energy code appendix to the code to comply
with the small business provisions of chapter 19.85 RCW and to meet
equivalency with the building envelope requirements of the 2009
Washington state energy code and create parity between the prescriptive
design approach as the base assumptions and the U-factor alternative
design approach.
(i)(A)

2012 IECC, Energy Code, Zone 5, and 4 Marine

Assembly U-Factors

Reference Table C402.1.2

Opaque Building Component All Other Group R Multifamily

U-Factor U-Factor

Roofs

Insulation entirely above roof deck 0.034 0.031

Metal Building 0.031 0.031

Single Rafter 0.027 0.027

Attic or other 0.027 0.027

Walls, Above Grade

Mass, Exterior and integral insulation 0.150 0.090

Metal building 0.064 0.052

Steel Framed, Metal Stud Walls 0.064 0.057

Wood Framed and other 0.057 0.057

Walls Below Grade Same As Above Grade Walls Same As Above Grade Walls

Floors

Mass 0.029 0.029

Steel Joists 0.029 0.029

Wood Framed or other 0.029 0.029

Slab on Grade Floors

Unheated 0.54 0.54

Heated 0.36 0.36

Opaque Doors

Swinging/Operating 0.6 0.4

Nonswinging/fixed 0.6 0.4

Vertical Fenestration
(vertical & Overhead glazing
0-40% of Gross Wall)

Nonmetal framing 0.320 0.320

Metal Framing/fixed and operable windows 0.400 0.400

Entrance Doors 0.600 0.600

Skylights

Without curb (i.e. sloped glazing) 0.50 0.500

With curb (i.e. individual skylights) 0.60 0.600

(B)
Table C402.1.2*, as it relates to climate zone 6, is modified as
follows:

Building Component All Other Group R Multifamily

Roofs

Insulation entirely above deck U-0.034 U-0.031

Metal building U-0.031 U-0.031

Single rafter U-0.027 U-0.027

Attic or other U-0.027 U-0.027

Walls, Above Grade

Mass, exterior and integral insulation U-0.123 U-0.080

Metal building U-0.064 U-0.044

Steel framed, metal stud walls U-0.064 U-0.044

Wood framed and other U-0.051 U-0.044

Walls Below Grade

Same as Walls, Above Grade

Floors

Mass U-0.029 U-0.029

Steel joists U-0.029 U-0.029

Wood framed or other U-0.029 U-0.029

Slab on Grade Floors

Unheated F-0.54 F-0.54

Heated F-0.36 F-0.36

Opaque Doors

Swinging/operating U-0.60 U-0.40

Nonswinging U-0.60 U-0.40

Vertical Fenestration (Vertical and Overhead Glazing 0-40% of Gross Wall)

Nonmetal framing U-0.32 U-0.32

Metal framing/fixed and operable windows U-0.40 U-0.40

Entrance doors U-0.60 U-0.60

Skylights

Without curb (i.e. sloped glazing) U-0.50 U-0.50

With curb (i.e. individual skylights) U-0.60 U-0.60

*Table footnotes remain unchanged.

(ii)(A)

2012 IECC, Energy Code, Zone 5, and 4 Marine

Assembly R-Factors

Reference Table C402.2

Opaque Building Component
All Other Group R Multifamily

Assembly R-Factors Assembly R-Factors

Roofs

Insulation entirely above roof deck R25ci R25ci

Metal Building R19 + R11 LS R19 + R11 LS

Single Rafter R38 Advanced Framing R38 Advanced Framing

Attic or other R49, or R38 Advanced R49, or R38 Advanced

Walls, Above Grade

Mass, Exterior and integral insulation R5.7ci R11.4ci

Metal building R13 + R13ci 0.052

Steel Framed, Metal Stud Walls (4" LGS R13+R7.5ci), (6" LGS,
R19+R7.5ci) (4" LGS R13+R9ci), (6"
LGS, R19+R9ci)

Wood Framed and other 2x6 Std Wood Frame R21 2x6 Std Wood Frame R21

Walls Below Grade Same As Above Grade Walls Same As Above Grade
Walls

Floors

Mass R30 R30

Steel Joists R30 R30

Wood Framed or other R30 R30

Slab on Grade Floors

Unheated R10 Rigid, with Thermal Break R10 Rigid, with Thermal
Break

Heated Fully Insulated, R10 Fully Insulated, R10

Below are all U-Factors

Opaque Doors

Swinging/Operating 0.600 0.400

Nonswinging/fixed 0.600 0.400

Vertical Fenestration
(vertical & Overhead glazing
0-40% of Gross Wall)

Nonmetal framing 0.320 0.320

Metal framing/fixed and operable windows 0.400 0.400

Entrance Doors 0.600 0.600

Skylights

Without curb (i.e. sloped glazing) 0.50 0.500

With curb (i.e. individual skylights) 0.60 0.600

(B)
Table C402.2*, as it relates to climate zone 6, is modified as
follows:

Building Component
All Other Group R Multifamily

Roofs

Insulation entirely above deck R30ci R38ci

Metal building R25 + R11 LS R25 + R11 LS

Single rafter R38 advanced framing R38 advanced framing

Attic or other R49 or R38 adv. framing R49 or R38 adv. framing

Walls, Above Grade

Mass, exterior and integral insulation R7.6ci R13.3ci

Metal building R13 + R13ci R19 + R16ci

Steel framed, metal stud walls R13 + R7.5ci R19 + R14ci

Wood framed and other R13 + R7.5ci or R21 + R2.5 R21 + R5ci

Walls Below Grade

Same as Walls, Above Grade

Floors

Mass R30 R30

Steel joists R38 + R4ci R38 + R4ci

Wood framed or other R30 R30

Slab on Grade Floors

Unheated R10 rigid with thermal break or
R15 for 36" below R10 rigid with thermal break or
R15 for 36" below

Heated Fully insulated, R10 or
R15 for 36" below Fully insulated, R10 or
R20 for 48" below

Opaque doors

Swinging/operating U-0.60 U-0.40

Nonswinging U-0.60 U-0.40

Vertical Fenestration (Vertical and Overhead Glazing 0-40% of Gross Wall)

Nonmetal framing U-0.32 U-0.32

Metal framing/fixed and operable windows U-0.40 U-0.40

Entrance doors U-0.60 U-0.60

Skylights

Without curb (i.e. sloped glazing) U-0.50 U-0.50

With curb (i.e. individual skylights) U-0.60 U-0.60

*Table footnotes remain unchanged.

(iii)(A)

Residential Construction, as defined by the IRC

Reference Table R402.1.1, Pg R-29, 2012 IECC R-Value Table

Climate
Zone Fenestration
U-Factor Skylight U-
Factor Glazed
Fenestration
SHGC Ceiling R-
Value Wood
Frame Wall
R-Value Mass Wall
R-Value Floor R-Value Basement
Wall R-Value Slab R-Value and
Depth

5 and Marine
4 0.30 0.50 N/R 49 R21 R21 30 15/21 R10, 2', with
T-Break

(B)
Table R402.1.1* as it relates to climate zone 6, is modified as
follows:

Component Standard

Fenestration U-Factor 0.30

Skylight U-Factor 0.50

Glazed Fenestration SHGC N/R

Ceiling R-Value R49

Wood Frame Wall R-Value R21+5 or R13+10

Mass Wall R-Value R21

Floor R-Value R30

Basement Wall R-Value 15/21

Slab R-Value and Depth R10, 4', with T-break

*Table footnotes remain unchanged.

(iv)(A)

Residential Construction, as defined by the IRC

Reference Table R402.1.3, Pg R-30, 2012 IECC U-Value Table

Climate
Zone Fenestration
U-Factor Skylight U-
Factor Glazed
Fenestration
SHGC Ceiling R-
Value Wood
Frame Wall
R-Value Mass Wall
R-Value Floor R-
Value Basement
Wall R-Value Slab R-Value and
Depth

5 and Marine
4 0.30 0.50 N/R 0.027 0.057 0.057 0.029 0.050 F-.54

(B)
Table R402.1.3* as it relates to climate zone 6, is modified as
follows:

Component Standard

Fenestration U-Factor 0.300

Skylight U-Factor 0.500

Ceiling U-Factor 0.027

Wood Frame Wall U-Factor 0.057

Mass Wall U-Factor 0.057

Floor U-Factor 0.029

Basement Wall U-Factor 0.050

Slab Floor F-Factor F-.54

*Table footnotes remain unchanged.

(3) The Washington state energy code shall take into account
regional climatic conditions((. Climate zone 1 shall include all
counties not included in climate zone 2. Climate zone 2 includes:
Adams, Chelan, Douglas, Ferry, Grant, Kittitas, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend
Oreille, Spokane, Stevens, and Whitman counties)) and assign
appropriate climate zone designations as outlined in the international
energy conservation code.
(4) The Washington state energy code for residential buildings
shall be the ((2006 edition of the Washington state energy code, or as
amended by rule by the council)) 2012 international energy conservation
code, published by the International Code Council, Inc. or as amended
in the future.
(5) The minimum state energy code for new nonresidential buildings
shall be the ((Washington state energy code, 2006 edition, or as
amended by the council by rule)) 2012 international energy conservation
code, published by the International Code Council, Inc. or as amended
in the future.
(6)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the Washington
state energy code for residential structures shall preempt the
residential energy code of each city, town, and county in the state of
Washington.
(b) The state energy code for residential structures does not
preempt a city, town, or county's energy code for residential
structures which exceeds the requirements of the state energy code and
which was adopted by the city, town, or county prior to March 1, 1990.
Such cities, towns, or counties may not subsequently amend their energy
code for residential structures to exceed the requirements adopted
prior to March 1, 1990.
(7) The state building code council shall ((consult with the
department of general administration as provided in RCW 34.05.310 prior
to publication of proposed rules. The director of the department of
general administration shall recommend to the state building code
council any changes necessary to conform the proposed rules to the
requirements of this section)), in order to meet the intent of
providing greater public access to administrative rule making and to
promote consensus among interested parties, solicit comments from the
public before filing with the code reviser's office a notice of
proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320.
(8) The state building code council shall evaluate and consider
comments from interested parties as outlined in subsection (7) of this
section prior to the adoption of the international energy conservation
code in Washington state in place of the existing state energy code.
(((9) The definitions in RCW 19.27A.140 apply throughout this
section.))

Sec. 6 RCW 19.27A.025 and 1991 c 122 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The minimum state energy code for new nonresidential
buildings shall be the ((Washington state energy code, 1986 edition, as
amended)) 2012 international energy conservation code, published by the
International Code Council, Inc. or as amended in the future. The
state building code council may, by rule adopted pursuant to chapter
34.05 RCW, amend that code's requirements for new nonresidential
buildings provided that:
(((a))) (i) Such amendments increase the energy efficiency of
typical newly constructed nonresidential buildings and maintain and
promote a competitive business climate to build a strong state economy;
and
(((b))) (ii) Any new measures, standards, or requirements adopted
as amendments to the international energy conservation code must be
technically feasible, commercially available, and cost-effective to
building owners and tenants and must, prior to filing the rule-making
order, first be evaluated according to national consensus standards
such as: (A) ASTM E917 practice for measuring life-cycle costs of
buildings and building systems; (B) ASTM E1074 practice for measuring
net benefits and net savings for investments in buildings and building
systems; and (C) ASTM E1121 practice for measuring payback for
investments in buildings and building systems, for the purpose of
assessing the impact of proposed amendments to the code.
(b) The state building code council shall adopt rules consistent
with chapter 19.85 RCW and evaluate impacts resulting from adoption of
the energy code based on the extent of disproportionate impact on small
business and reduce the costs imposed by the rule on small business.
(2) In considering amendments to the state energy code for
nonresidential buildings, the state building code council shall
establish and consult with a technical advisory committee including
representatives of appropriate state agencies, local governments,
general contractors, building owners and managers, design
professionals, utilities, and other interested and affected parties.
(3) Decisions to amend the Washington state energy code for new
nonresidential buildings shall be made prior to December 15th of any
year and shall not take effect before the end of the regular
legislative session in the next year. Any disputed provisions within
an amendment presented to the legislature shall be approved by the
legislature before going into effect. A disputed provision is one
which was adopted by the state building code council with less than a
two-thirds majority vote. Substantial amendments to the code shall be
adopted no more frequently than every three years.

Sec. 7 RCW 19.27A.045 and 1990 c 2 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state building code council shall maintain the state energy
code for residential structures in a status which is consistent with
the state's interest as set forth in section 1, chapter 2, Laws of
1990. In maintaining the Washington state energy code for residential
structures, beginning in 1996 the council shall review the Washington
state energy code every three years. After January 1, 1996, by rule
adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, the council may ((amend any
provisions of)) adopt a new edition of the international energy
conservation code as the Washington state energy code to increase the
energy efficiency of newly constructed residential buildings. The
state building code council shall adopt rules consistent with chapter
19.85 RCW and evaluate impacts resulting from adoption of the energy
code based on the extent of disproportionate impact on small business
and reduce the costs imposed by the rule on small business. Prior to
filing the rule-making order, the Washington state building code
council's proposed rules must first be evaluated according to national
consensus standards such as: (1) ASTM E917 practice for measuring
life-cycle costs of buildings and building systems; (2) ASTM E1074
practice for measuring net benefits and net savings for investments in
buildings and building systems; and (3) ASTM E1121 practice for
measuring payback for investments in buildings and building systems,
for the purpose of assessing the impact of proposed amendments to the
code. Decisions to ((amend)) adopt a new edition of the Washington
state energy code for residential structures shall be made prior to
December 1st of any year and shall not take effect before the end of
the regular legislative session in the next year.

Sec. 8 RCW 19.27A.150 and 2010 c 271 s 306 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To the extent that funding is appropriated specifically for the
purposes of this section, the department of commerce shall develop and
implement a strategic plan for enhancing energy efficiency in and
reducing greenhouse gas emissions from homes, buildings, districts, and
neighborhoods. The strategic plan must be used to help direct the
future code increases in RCW 19.27A.020, with targets for new buildings
consistent with RCW 19.27A.160. The strategic plan will identify
barriers to achieving net zero energy use in homes and buildings and
identify how to overcome these barriers in future energy code updates
and through complementary policies.
(2) The department of commerce must complete and release the
strategic plan to the legislature and the council by December 31, 2010,
and update the plan every three years.
(3) The strategic plan must include ((recommendations)) a report to
the council on potential energy code upgrades as provided in RCW
19.27A.020. At a minimum, the strategic plan must:
(a) Consider ((development of aspirational codes separate from the
state energy code that contain economically and technically feasible
optional standards that could achieve higher energy efficiency for
those builders that elected to follow the aspirational codes in lieu of
or in addition to complying with the standards set forth in the state
energy code)) the positive benefits of adopting the international green
construction code, for commercial construction, and the national green
building standard and recognized built-green programs, for residential
construction, as optional codes separate from the state energy code
since those codes contain economically and technically feasible
standards that achieve higher energy efficiency than the state energy
code;
(b) Determine the appropriate methodology to measure achievement of
state energy code targets using the United States environmental
protection agency's target finder program or equivalent methodology;
(c) Address the need for enhanced code training and ((enforcement))
administration as well as industry and community outreach and training;
(d) Include state strategies to support research, demonstration,
and education programs designed to achieve a seventy percent reduction
in annual net energy consumption as specified in RCW 19.27A.160 and
enhance energy efficiency and on-site renewable energy production in
buildings;
(e) Recommend incentives, education, training programs and
certifications, particularly state-approved training or certification
programs, joint apprenticeship programs, or labor-management
partnership programs that train workers for energy-efficiency projects
to ensure proposed programs are designed to increase building
professionals' ability to design, construct, and operate buildings that
will meet the seventy percent reduction in annual net energy
consumption as specified in RCW 19.27A.160;
(f) Address barriers for utilities to serve net zero energy homes
and buildings and policies to overcome those barriers;
(g) Address the limits of a prescriptive code in achieving net zero
energy use homes and buildings and propose a transition to performance-based codes commensurate with RCW 19.27A.025(1)(a)(ii) and 19.27A.045;
(h) Identify financial mechanisms such as tax incentives, rebates,
and innovative financing to motivate energy consumers to take action to
increase energy efficiency and their use of on-site renewable energy.
Such incentives, rebates, or financing options may consider the role of
government programs as well as utility-sponsored programs;
(i) Address the adequacy of education and technical assistance,
including school curricula, technical training, and peer-to-peer
exchanges for professional and trade audiences;
(j) Develop strategies to develop and install district and
neighborhood-wide energy systems that help meet net zero energy use in
homes and buildings;
(k) Identify costs and benefits of energy efficiency measures on
residential and nonresidential construction using national consensus
standards such as: (i) ASTM E917 practice for measuring life-cycle
costs of buildings and building systems; (ii) ASTM E1074 practice for
measuring net benefits and net savings for investments in buildings and
building systems; and (iii) ASTM E1121 practice for measuring payback
for investments in buildings and building systems, for the purpose of
assessing the impact of proposed amendments to the code; and
(l) Investigate methodologies and standards for the measurement of
the amount of embodied energy used in building materials.
(4) The department of commerce and the council shall convene a work
group with the affected parties to inform the initial development of
the strategic plan.

Sec. 9 RCW 19.27A.160 and 2009 c 423 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
residential and nonresidential construction permitted under the 2031
state energy code must achieve a seventy percent reduction in annual
net energy consumption, using the adopted 2006 Washington state energy
code as a baseline.
(2) The council shall adopt state energy codes from 2013 through
2031 that incrementally move towards achieving the seventy percent
reduction in annual net energy consumption as specified in subsection
(1) of this section. The council shall report its progress by December
31, 2012, and every three years thereafter. If the council determines
that economic, technological, or process factors would significantly
impede adoption of or compliance with this subsection, the council may
defer the implementation of the proposed energy code update and shall
report its findings to the legislature by December 31st of the year
prior to the year in which those codes would otherwise be enacted. In
order to arrive at a determination, the council shall use national
consensus standards such as: (a) ASTM E917 practice for measuring
life-cycle costs of buildings and building systems; (b) ASTM E1074
practice for measuring net benefits and net savings for investments in
buildings and building systems; and (c) ASTM E1121 practice for
measuring payback for investments in buildings and building systems,
for the purpose of assessing the impact of complying with this section.

--- END ---