BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.490 and 1995 c 347 s 115 are each amended to
read as follows:
The growth management planning and environmental review fund is
hereby established in the state treasury. Moneys may be placed in the
fund from the proceeds of bond sales, tax revenues, budget transfers,
federal appropriations, gifts, or any other lawful source. Moneys in
the fund may be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the fund
shall be used to make grants or loans to local governments for the
purposes set forth in RCW 43.21C.240, 43.21C.031, or 36.70A.500. Any
payment of either principal or interest, or both, derived from loans
made from this fund must be deposited into the fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.500 and 1997 c 429 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce shall provide management services for the growth
management planning and environmental review fund created by RCW
36.70A.490. The department shall establish procedures for fund
management. The department shall encourage participation in the grant
or loan program by other public agencies. The department shall develop
the grant or loan criteria, monitor the grant or loan program, and
select grant or loan recipients in consultation with state agencies
participating in the grant or loan program through the provision of
grant or loan funds or technical assistance.
(2) A grant or loan may be awarded to a county or city that is
required to or has chosen to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 and that is
qualified pursuant to this section. The grant or loan shall be
provided to assist a county or city in paying for the cost of preparing
an environmental analysis under chapter 43.21C RCW, that is integrated
with a comprehensive plan, subarea plan, plan element, countywide
planning policy, development regulation, monitoring program, or other
planning activity adopted under or implementing this chapter that:
(a) Improves the process for project permit review while
maintaining environmental quality; or
(b) Encourages use of plans and information developed for purposes
of complying with this chapter to satisfy requirements of other state
programs.
(3) In order to qualify for a grant or loan, a county or city
shall:
(a) Demonstrate that it will prepare an environmental analysis
pursuant to chapter 43.21C RCW and subsection (2) of this section that
is integrated with a comprehensive plan, subarea plan, plan element,
countywide planning policy, development regulations, monitoring
program, or other planning activity adopted under or implementing this
chapter;
(b) Address environmental impacts and consequences, alternatives,
and mitigation measures in sufficient detail to allow the analysis to
be adopted in whole or in part by applicants for development permits
within the geographic area analyzed in the plan;
(c) Demonstrate that procedures for review of development permit
applications will be based on the integrated plans and environmental
analysis;
(d) Include mechanisms to monitor the consequences of growth as it
occurs in the plan area and to use the resulting data to update the
plan, policy, or implementing mechanisms and associated environmental
analysis;
(e) Demonstrate substantial progress towards compliance with the
requirements of this chapter. A county or city that is more than six
months out of compliance with a requirement of this chapter is deemed
not to be making substantial progress towards compliance; and
(f) Provide local funding, which may include financial
participation by the private sector.
(4) In awarding grants or loans, the department shall give
preference to proposals that include one or more of the following
elements:
(a) Financial participation by the private sector, or a
public/private partnering approach;
(b) Identification and monitoring of system capacities for elements
of the built environment, and to the extent appropriate, of the natural
environment;
(c) Coordination with state, federal, and tribal governments in
project review;
(d) Furtherance of important state objectives related to economic
development, protection of areas of statewide significance, and siting
of essential public facilities;
(e) Programs to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of the
permitting process by greater reliance on integrated plans and
prospective environmental analysis;
(f) Programs for effective citizen and neighborhood involvement
that contribute to greater likelihood that planning decisions can be
implemented with community support; ((and))
(g) Programs to identify environmental impacts and establish
mitigation measures that provide effective means to satisfy concurrency
requirements and establish project consistency with the plans; or
(h) Environmental review that addresses the impacts of increased
density or intensity of comprehensive plans, subarea plans, or
receiving areas designated by a city or town under the regional
transfer of development rights program in chapter 43.362 RCW.
(5) If the local funding includes funding provided by other state
functional planning programs, including open space planning and
watershed or basin planning, the functional plan shall be integrated
into and be consistent with the comprehensive plan.
(6) State agencies shall work with grant or loan recipients to
facilitate state and local project review processes that will implement
the projects receiving grants or loans under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Detailed environmental analysis integrated with comprehensive
plans, subarea plans, and development regulations will facilitate
planning for and managing growth, allow greater protection of the
environment, and benefit both the general public and private property
owners;
(b) Compact development in urban growth areas, or transfer of
development rights programs, will assist in the conservation of rural,
agricultural, and forest land by redirecting growth from this land to
areas designated for compact development or receiving areas in cities
and towns where growth should occur;
(c) Cities and towns planning for increased growth in receiving
areas under chapter 43.362 RCW must comply with chapter 43.21C RCW;
(d) Planning for compact or increased growth in urban growth areas,
or receiving areas under chapter 43.362 RCW in compliance with chapter
43.21C RCW, presents a financial burden on cities and towns;
(e) Planning for compact or increased growth in urban growth areas,
or receiving areas under chapter 43.362 RCW in compliance with chapter
43.21C RCW, should be encouraged to ensure that the quality of life in
receiving neighborhoods and the protection of environmental values over
time are maintained by providing financial assistance through the
growth management planning and environmental review fund created in RCW
36.70A.490;
(f) Access to financial assistance through the growth management
planning and environmental review fund created in RCW 36.70A.490 may be
increased by allowing the fund to become a revolving loan program
rather than only a grant program; and
(g) Counties, cities, and towns will have the ability to repay
loans from the growth management planning and environmental review fund
created in RCW 36.70A.490, or recoup their own costs associated with
environmental review conducted at a comprehensive plan or subarea plan
level, with fees they collect from developers who will benefit from the
environmental review that the city or county has already conducted
under chapter 43.21C RCW on a comprehensive plan or subarea plan, or in
conjunction with the designation of a receiving area under chapter
43.362 RCW, and that addresses the impacts of compact development or
projects using transferable development rights.
(2) Counties, cities, and towns that conduct detailed environmental
review under chapter 43.21C RCW, integrated with a comprehensive plan
or subarea plan within urban growth areas, are authorized to impose
environmental fees on development activity as part of the financing for
environmental review conducted under chapter 43.21C RCW on a
comprehensive plan or subarea plan.
(3) The environmental fees:
(a) May only be imposed for environmental review costs that have
been identified as reasonably related to the new development;
(b) May not exceed the proportionate share of the costs of
environmental review conducted for a comprehensive plan or subarea
plan; and
(c) May, if applicable, be used to repay a loan from the growth
management planning and environmental review fund created in RCW
36.70A.490.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.02.020 and 2010 c 153 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except only as expressly provided in chapters 67.28, 81.104, and
82.14 RCW, the state preempts the field of imposing retail sales and
use taxes and taxes upon parimutuel wagering authorized pursuant to RCW
67.16.060, conveyances, and cigarettes, and no county, town, or other
municipal subdivision shall have the right to impose taxes of that
nature. Except as provided in RCW 64.34.440, section 3 of this act,
and RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090, no county, city, town, or other
municipal corporation shall impose any tax, fee, or charge, either
direct or indirect, on the construction or reconstruction of
residential buildings, commercial buildings, industrial buildings, or
on any other building or building space or appurtenance thereto, or on
the development, subdivision, classification, or reclassification of
land. However, this section does not preclude dedications of land or
easements within the proposed development or plat which the county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation can demonstrate are
reasonably necessary as a direct result of the proposed development or
plat to which the dedication of land or easement is to apply.
This section does not prohibit voluntary agreements with counties,
cities, towns, or other municipal corporations that allow a payment in
lieu of a dedication of land or to mitigate a direct impact that has
been identified as a consequence of a proposed development,
subdivision, or plat. A local government shall not use such voluntary
agreements for local off-site transportation improvements within the
geographic boundaries of the area or areas covered by an adopted
transportation program authorized by chapter 39.92 RCW. Any such
voluntary agreement is subject to the following provisions:
(1) The payment shall be held in a reserve account and may only be
expended to fund a capital improvement agreed upon by the parties to
mitigate the identified, direct impact;
(2) The payment shall be expended in all cases within five years of
collection; and
(3) Any payment not so expended shall be refunded with interest to
be calculated from the original date the deposit was received by the
county and at the same rate applied to tax refunds pursuant to RCW
84.69.100; however, if the payment is not expended within five years
due to delay attributable to the developer, the payment shall be
refunded without interest.
No county, city, town, or other municipal corporation shall require
any payment as part of such a voluntary agreement which the county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation cannot establish is
reasonably necessary as a direct result of the proposed development or
plat.
Nothing in this section prohibits cities, towns, counties, or other
municipal corporations from collecting reasonable fees from an
applicant for a permit or other governmental approval to cover the cost
to the city, town, county, or other municipal corporation of processing
applications, inspecting and reviewing plans, or preparing detailed
statements required by chapter 43.21C RCW, including reasonable fees
that are consistent with RCW 43.21C.420(6).
This section does not limit the existing authority of any county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation to impose special
assessments on property specifically benefited thereby in the manner
prescribed by law.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
imposing or permits counties, cities, or towns to impose water, sewer,
natural gas, drainage utility, and drainage system charges. However,
no such charge shall exceed the proportionate share of such utility or
system's capital costs which the county, city, or town can demonstrate
are attributable to the property being charged. Furthermore, these
provisions may not be interpreted to expand or contract any existing
authority of counties, cities, or towns to impose such charges.
Nothing in this section prohibits a transportation benefit district
from imposing fees or charges authorized in RCW 36.73.120 nor prohibits
the legislative authority of a county, city, or town from approving the
imposition of such fees within a transportation benefit district.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
imposing transportation impact fees authorized pursuant to chapter
39.92 RCW.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
requiring property owners to provide relocation assistance to tenants
under RCW 59.18.440 and 59.18.450.
Nothing in this section limits the authority of counties, cities,
or towns to implement programs consistent with RCW 36.70A.540, nor to
enforce agreements made pursuant to such programs.
This section does not apply to special purpose districts formed and
acting pursuant to Title 54, 57, or 87 RCW, nor is the authority
conferred by these titles affected.

--- END ---