BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.21C.031 and 1995 c 347 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An environmental impact statement (the detailed statement
required by RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c)) shall be prepared on proposals for
legislation and other major actions having a probable significant,
adverse environmental impact. The environmental impact statement may
be combined with the recommendation or report on the proposal or issued
as a separate document. The substantive decisions or recommendations
shall be clearly identifiable in the combined document. Actions
categorically exempt under RCW 43.21C.110(1)(a) do not require
environmental review or the preparation of an environmental impact
statement under this chapter. ((In a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040, a planned action, as provided for in subsection
(2) of this section, does not require a threshold determination or the
preparation of an environmental impact statement under this chapter,
but is subject to environmental review and mitigation as provided in
this chapter.))
(2) An environmental impact statement is required to analyze only
those probable adverse environmental impacts which are significant.
Beneficial environmental impacts may be discussed. The responsible
official shall consult with agencies and the public to identify such
impacts and limit the scope of an environmental impact statement. The
subjects listed in RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c) need not be treated as separate
sections of an environmental impact statement. Discussions of
significant short-term and long-term environmental impacts, significant
irrevocable commitments of natural resources, significant alternatives
including mitigation measures, and significant environmental impacts
which cannot be mitigated should be consolidated or included, as
applicable, in those sections of an environmental impact statement
where the responsible official decides they logically belong.
(((2)(a) For purposes of this section, a planned action means one
or more types of project action that:
(i) Are designated planned actions by an ordinance or resolution
adopted by a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040;
(ii) Have had the significant impacts adequately addressed in an
environmental impact statement prepared in conjunction with (A) a
comprehensive plan or subarea plan adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW, or
(B) a fully contained community, a master planned resort, a master
planned development, or a phased project;
(iii) Are subsequent or implementing projects for the proposals
listed in (a)(ii) of this subsection;
(iv) Are located within an urban growth area, as defined in RCW
36.70A.030;
(v) Are not essential public facilities, as defined in RCW
36.70A.200; and
(vi) Are consistent with a comprehensive plan adopted under chapter
36.70A RCW.
(b) A county, city, or town shall limit planned actions to certain
types of development or to specific geographical areas that are less
extensive than the jurisdictional boundaries of the county, city, or
town and may limit a planned action to a time period identified in the
environmental impact statement or the ordinance or resolution adopted
under this subsection.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter, a planned action means one or
more types of development or redevelopment that meet the following
criteria:
(a) Are designated as planned actions by an ordinance or resolution
adopted by a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040;
(b) Have had the significant impacts adequately addressed in an
environmental impact statement under the requirements of this chapter
in conjunction with, or to implement, a comprehensive plan or subarea
plan adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW, or a fully contained community,
a master planned resort, a master planned development, or a phased
project;
(c) Are subsequent or implementing projects for the proposals
listed in (b) of this subsection;
(d) Are located within an urban growth area designated pursuant to
RCW 36.70A.110;
(e) Are not essential public facilities, as defined in RCW
36.70A.200, unless an essential public facility is accessory to or part
of a residential, office, school, commercial, recreational, service, or
industrial development that is designated a planned action under this
subsection; and
(f) Are consistent with a comprehensive plan or subarea plan
adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW.
(2) A county, city, or town shall define the types of development
included in the planned action or a specific geographical area that is
less extensive than the jurisdictional boundaries of the county, city,
or town, and may limit a planned action to a time period identified in
the ordinance or resolution adopted under this subsection.
(3)(a) A county, city, or town shall determine during permit review
whether a proposal is consistent with a planned action ordinance
adopted by the jurisdiction. To determine project consistency with a
planned action ordinance, a county, city, or town may utilize the
environmental checklist, a modified checklist pursuant to the rules
adopted to implement RCW 43.21C.110, a form that is designated within
the planned action ordinance, or a form contained in agency rules
adopted pursuant to RCW 43.21C.120.
(b) Except for impacts that are specifically deferred for
consideration at the project level, a county, city, or town is not
required to make a threshold determination and may not require
additional environmental review for a proposal that is determined to be
consistent with the development or redevelopment described in the
planned action ordinance. The determination of consistency, and the
adequacy of any environmental review that was specifically deferred, is
subject to any administrative appeal that the county, city, or town
provides consistent with RCW 36.70B.060.

--- END ---