BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.102.100 and 2009 c 104 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) With respect to each policy issued by an insurance company, the
insurance company shall notify the owner of an individual life
insurance policy when the insured person under such a policy is age
sixty or older, or is known to be terminally ill or chronically ill,
that there may be alternative transactions available to that owner at
the time of each of the following:
(a) When a life insurance company receives from such an owner a
request to surrender, in whole or in part, an individual policy;
(b) When a life insurance company receives from such an owner a
request to receive an accelerated death benefit under an individual
policy;
(c) When a life insurance company sends to such an owner all
notices of lapse of an individual policy; or
(d) At any other time that the commissioner may require by rule.
(2)(a) The commissioner shall approve a document calculated to
appraise the consumer of his or her rights as an owner of a life
insurance policy. The document shall be made available at no cost to
all insurance companies and life insurance producers and written in lay
terms.
(b) The document shall advise the consumer:
(i) That life insurance is a critical part of a broader financial
plan, and that the consumer is encouraged, and has a right, to seek
additional financial advice and opinions;
(ii) That possible alternatives to lapse exist; and
(iii) Of the definitions of common industry terms.
(c) In addition to the information described in (a) and (b) of this
subsection, the document must contain the following statement in large,
bold, or otherwise conspicuous typeface calculated to draw the eye:
"Life insurance is a critical part of a broader financial plan. There
are many options available, and you have the right to shop around and
seek advice from different financial advisers in order to find the
option best suited to your needs."
(d) The document may include brief descriptions of common products
available from providers. These products must be discussed in general
terms for informative purposes only, and not identifiable to any
specific provider.
(e) The document will be considered part of the notice required in
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The requirements of this section do not apply to term life
insurance policies, except when in the process of converting into a
policy other than a term life policy.

--- END ---