BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.09.260 and 2009 c 564 s 927 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The examination of the financial affairs of all local
governments shall be made at such reasonable, periodic intervals as the
state auditor shall determine, except as provided in subsection (3) of
this section regarding school districts. However, an examination of
the financial affairs of all local governments shall be made at least
once in every three years, and an examination of individual local
government health and welfare benefit plans and local government self-insurance programs shall be made at least once every two years.
(2) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the state auditor shall
conduct audits no more often than once every two years of local
governments with annual general fund revenues of ten million dollars or
less and no findings of impropriety for the three-year period
immediately preceding the audit period. This subsection does not
prohibit the state auditor from conducting audits: (a) To address
suspected fraud or irregular conduct; (b) at the request of the local
government governing body; or (c) as required by federal laws or
regulations.
(3)(a) Beginning in the 2012-13 school year, a school district is
subject to an examination of its financial affairs at least once every
three years, but more frequent periodic audits may occur only as
provided in this subsection (3):
(i) If the previous financial or accountability audit or audit
assessment of the school district resulted in no findings of
impropriety, the state auditor may not conduct an audit, but the school
district shall apply for a full evaluation from the Baldrige
performance excellence program or the Washington state quality award.
The goal for the evaluation is for the school district to achieve an
overall score of sixty percent. In the next succeeding school year,
the state auditor may not conduct an audit.
(ii) If the previous accountability audit or audit assessment of
the school district resulted in findings of impropriety, the state
auditor may conduct an audit, and the school district shall also apply
for a full evaluation from the Baldrige performance excellence program
or the Washington state quality award. However, in no case is a school
district required to apply for a Baldrige or Washington state quality
award evaluation more than once every two years.
(b) This subsection (3) does not prohibit the state auditor from
conducting audits: (i) To address suspected fraud or irregular
conduct; (ii) at the request of the local government governing body; or
(iii) as required by federal laws or regulations.
(4) The term local governments for purposes of this chapter
includes but is not limited to all counties, cities, and other
political subdivisions, municipal corporations, and quasi-municipal
corporations, however denominated.
(((4))) (5) The state auditor shall establish a schedule to govern
the auditing of local governments which shall include: A designation
of the various classifications of local governments; a designation of
the frequency for auditing each type of local government; and a
description of events which cause a more frequent audit to be
conducted.
(((5))) (6) On every such examination, inquiry shall be made as to
the financial condition and resources of the local government; whether
the Constitution and laws of the state, the ordinances and orders of
the local government, and the requirements of the state auditor have
been properly complied with; and into the methods and accuracy of the
accounts and reports.
(((6))) (7) A report of such examination shall be made and filed in
the office of state auditor, and one copy shall be transmitted to the
local government. A copy of any report containing findings of
noncompliance with state law shall be transmitted to the attorney
general. If any such report discloses malfeasance, misfeasance, or
nonfeasance in office on the part of any public officer or employee,
within thirty days from the receipt of his or her copy of the report,
the attorney general shall institute, in the proper county, such legal
action as is proper in the premises by civil process and prosecute the
same to final determination to carry into effect the findings of the
examination.
(((7))) (8) It shall be unlawful for any local government or the
responsible head thereof, to make a settlement or compromise of any
claim arising out of such malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance, or
any action commenced therefor, or for any court to enter upon any
compromise or settlement of such action, without the written approval
and consent of the attorney general and the state auditor.

--- END ---