BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Adult family home provider" means a provider as defined in RCW
70.128.010 who receives payments from the medicaid and state-funded
long-term care programs.
(2) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which
has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in
their employment relations with employers.
(3) "Child care subsidy" means a payment from the state through a
child care subsidy program established pursuant to RCW 74.12.340 or
74.08A.340, 45 C.F.R. Sec. 98.1 through 98.17, or any successor
program.
(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in
good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters,
including wages, hours and working conditions, which may be peculiar to
an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that by
such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal
or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.
(7) "Family child care provider" means a person who: (a) Provides
regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home of the
provider or in the home of the child or children for periods of less
than twenty-four hours or, if necessary due to the nature of the
parent's work, for periods equal to or greater than twenty-four hours;
(b) receives child care subsidies; and (c) is either licensed by the
state under RCW 74.15.030 or is exempt from licensing under chapter
74.15 RCW.
(8) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240(4) who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, is a public employee as provided in RCW 74.39A.270.
(9) "Institution of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.
(10)(a) "Language access provider" means any independent contractor
who provides spoken language interpreter services, whether paid by a
language access agency, broker, or the respective department: (i) For
department of social and health services appointments or medicaid
enrollee appointments, or who provided these services on or after
January 1, 2009, and before June 10, 2010((, whether paid by a broker,
language access agency, or the department)); or (ii) for department of
labor and industries appointments, or who provided these services on or
after January 1, 2011, and before the effective date of this section.
(b) "Language access provider" does not mean an owner, manager, or
employee of a broker or a language access agency.
(11) "Public employee" means any employee of a public employer
except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to
office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy, administrative
assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential relationship to
(i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining unit, or
(ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed
to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner or a court
magistrate of superior court, district court, or a department of a
district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who is a
personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or
court commissioner. For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more
than one assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from
a bargaining unit.
(12) "Public employer" means any officer, board, commission,
council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any public body
governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public body. For
the purposes of this section, the public employer of district court or
superior court employees for wage-related matters is the respective
county legislative authority, or person or body acting on behalf of the
legislative authority, and the public employer for nonwage-related
matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective district
court or superior court.
(13) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as
defined in RCW 41.26.030 employed by the governing body of any city or
town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more and law
enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any county with
a population of ten thousand or more; (b) correctional employees who
are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and noncommissioned
security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020(9),
by a county with a population of seventy thousand or more, and who are
trained for and charged with the responsibility of controlling and
maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and safeguarding inmates
from other inmates; (c) general authority Washington peace officers as
defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a port district in a county with
a population of one million or more; (d) security forces established
under RCW 43.52.520; (e) firefighters as that term is defined in RCW
41.26.030; (f) employees of a port district in a county with a
population of one million or more whose duties include crash fire
rescue or other firefighting duties; (g) employees of fire departments
of public employers who dispatch exclusively either fire or emergency
medical services, or both; or (h) employees in the several classes of
advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, who are
employed by a public employer.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.56.510 and 2010 c 296 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this
chapter applies to the governor with respect to language access
providers. Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the public employer of language access providers who,
solely for the purposes of collective bargaining, are public employees.
The governor or the governor's designee shall represent the public
employer for bargaining purposes.
(2) There shall be collective bargaining, as defined in RCW
41.56.030, between the governor and language access providers, except
as follows:
(a) ((A statewide unit of all language access providers is)) The
only units appropriate for purposes of collective bargaining under RCW
41.56.060 are:
(i) A statewide unit for language access providers who provide
spoken language interpreter services for department of social and
health services appointments or medicaid enrollee appointments; and
(ii) A statewide unit for language access providers who provide
spoken language interpreter services for department of labor and
industries appointments;
(b) The exclusive bargaining representatives of language access
providers in the units specified in (a) of this subsection shall be the
representatives chosen in ((an)) elections conducted pursuant to RCW
41.56.070.
Bargaining authorization cards furnished as the showing of interest
in support of any representation petition or motion for intervention
filed under this section are exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56
RCW;
(c) Notwithstanding the definition of "collective bargaining" in
RCW 41.56.030(4), the scope of collective bargaining for language
access providers under this section is limited solely to: (i) Economic
compensation((, such as)) including, but not limited to, the manner and
rate of payments and scheduling and distribution of appointments; (ii)
health and welfare benefits; (iii) professional development and
training and certification requirements; (((iii))) (iv) labor-management committees; ((and (iv))) (v) grievance procedures; and (vi)
complaints against language access providers including, but not limited
to, corrective actions. Retirement benefits are not subject to
collective bargaining. By such obligation neither party may be
compelled to agree to a proposal or be required to make a concession
unless otherwise provided in this chapter;
(d) In addition to the entities listed in the mediation and
interest arbitration provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and
41.56.480, the provisions apply to the governor or the governor's
designee and the exclusive bargaining representatives of language
access providers, except that:
(i) In addition to the factors to be taken into consideration by an
interest arbitration panel under RCW 41.56.465, the panel shall
consider the financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement;
(ii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and benefit provisions of
the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, the decision is not
binding on the state;
(e) Language access providers do not have the right to strike.
(3) Language access providers who are public employees solely for
the purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this
section are not, for that reason, employees of the state for any other
purpose. This section applies only to the governance of the collective
bargaining relationship between the employer and language access
providers as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) Each party with whom the department of social and health
services and the department of labor and industries contract((s)) for
language access services and each of their subcontractors shall provide
to the departments an accurate list of language access providers, as
defined in RCW 41.56.030, including their names, addresses, and other
contact information, annually by January 30th, except that initially
for language access providers as defined in RCW 41.56.030(10)(a)(ii)
the lists must be provided within thirty days of ((June 10, 2010)) the
effective date of this section. The departments shall, upon request,
provide a list of all language access providers, including their names,
addresses, and other contact information, to a labor union seeking to
represent language access providers.
(5) This section does not create or modify:
(a) The ((department's)) obligation of the department of social and
health services or the department of labor and industries to comply
with the federal statute and regulations; and
(b) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to
the delivery of state services under chapter 74.04 RCW or Title 51 RCW.
The governor may not enter into, extend, or renew any agreement under
this chapter that does not expressly reserve the legislative rights
described in this subsection.
(6) Upon meeting the requirements of subsection (7) of this
section, the governor must submit, as a part of the proposed biennial
or supplemental operating budget submitted to the legislature under RCW
43.88.030, a request for funds necessary to implement the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered
into under this section or for legislation necessary to implement the
agreement.
(7) A request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and
benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into
under this section may not be submitted by the governor to the
legislature unless the request has been:
(a) Submitted to the director of financial management by October
1st prior to the legislative session at which the requests are to be
considered, except that, for initial negotiations under this section
for the unit defined in subsection (2)(a)(ii) of this section, the
request ((may not)) must be submitted ((before July 1, 2011)) by
December 1, 2012; and
(b) Certified by the director of financial management as
financially feasible for the state or reflective of a binding decision
of an arbitration panel reached under subsection (2)(d) of this
section.
(8) The legislature must approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds as a whole. If the legislature rejects or fails to
act on the submission, any collective bargaining agreement must be
reopened for the sole purpose of renegotiating the funds necessary to
implement the agreement.
(9) If, after the compensation and benefit provisions of an
agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue
shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by
proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both
parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a
mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.
(10) After the expiration date of any collective bargaining
agreement entered into under this section, all of the terms and
conditions specified in the agreement remain in effect until the
effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from
the expiration date stated in the agreement.
(11) In enacting this section, the legislature intends to provide
state action immunity under federal and state antitrust laws for the
joint activities of language access providers and their exclusive
bargaining representatives to the extent the activities are authorized
by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---