BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the state
has an interest in ensuring that children are supported by their
parents. It benefits the children and the state for the state to have
an effective child support enforcement program. Therefore, the
legislature intends to create new tools to increase the collection of
child support obligations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.23 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person or entity doing business in the state of Washington
who is required to file a report with the internal revenue service for
services received from an independent contractor shall report to the
Washington state support registry the hiring of any independent
contractor who resides or works in this state to whom the person or
entity anticipates paying compensation.
(2) Persons or entities may report by any means authorized by the
registry which will result in timely reporting. The following
information must be reported:
(a) The independent contractor's name, address, social security
number, and date of birth; and
(b) The person or entity's name, address, and, if applicable, the
identifying number assigned under section 6109 of the internal revenue
code of 1986.
(3) Persons or entities shall submit reports within twenty days of
either entering into a contract with the independent contractor for
compensation of six hundred dollars or more or making payments to the
independent contractor totaling six hundred dollars or more.
(4) A person or entity who fails to report as required under this
section is subject to a civil penalty of:
(a) Twenty-five dollars; or
(b) Five hundred dollars, if the failure to report is the result of
a conspiracy between the person or entity and the independent
contractor not to supply the required report, or to supply a false
report. The penalty may be imposed and collected by the division of
child support under RCW 74.20A.350.
(5)(a) The registry must retain the information for a particular
independent contractor only if the registry is responsible for
establishing, enforcing, or collecting a support debt of the
independent contractor. The registry may, however, retain information
for a particular independent contractor for as long as may be necessary
to:
(i) Transmit the information to the national directory of new hires
as required under federal law; or
(ii) Provide the information to other state agencies for comparison
with records or information possessed by those agencies as required by
law.
(b) Information that is not permitted to be retained must be
promptly destroyed. Agencies that obtain information from the
department of social and health services under this section shall
maintain the confidentiality of the information received, except as
necessary to implement the agencies' responsibilities.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "independent contractor"
means an individual who:
(a) Is customarily engaged in an independently established trade,
occupation, profession, or business, of the same nature as that
involved in the contract of service, or the individual has a principal
place of business for the business the individual is conducting that is
eligible for a business deduction for federal income tax purposes; and
(b) On the effective date of the contract of service, is
responsible for filing at the next applicable filing period, both under
the contract of service and in fact, a schedule of expenses with the
internal revenue service for the type of business the individual is
conducting; and
(c) On the effective date of the contract of service, or within a
reasonable period after the effective date of the contract, has
established an account with the department of revenue, and other state
agencies as required by the particular case, for the business the
individual is conducting for the payment of all state taxes normally
paid by employers and businesses and has registered for and received a
unified business identifier number from the state of Washington; and
(d) On the effective date of the contract of service, is
maintaining a separate set of books or records that reflect all items
of income and expenses of the business which the individual is
conducting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 26.23 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall develop rules to implement a gambling
payment intercept program. The gambling payment intercept program must
require cardrooms and casinos to withhold cash payments from a winning
player if the player is a parent with a child support obligation in
arrears. The department shall develop a process for the cardrooms and
casinos to search a database or list of obligor parents in arrears
provided to the cardroom and casino by the department and report to the
department.
(2) The department shall work with the Washington state gambling
commission to make every effort to negotiate tribal gaming compacts
with the tribes that include gambling payment intercept programs.

--- END ---