BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) An efficient and effective transportation system is critical
for Washington's economy and quality of life. Continued efficiency and
effectiveness depend on a stable and reliable source of revenue to fund
the system's maintenance, operation, preservation, and improvements.
(b) The motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes have been a
fundamental means of paying for state roads, ferries, and the
Washington state patrol for over ninety years, and the taxes still
provide well over fifty percent of ongoing state revenue for
transportation purposes. Until recently, these taxes have been a
source of revenue that has had stable growth.
(c) Since the year 2000, the average annual growth in the
consumption of gasoline and diesel in Washington, upon which the motor
vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes are based, has been less than one-
twentieth of one percent. At the same time, the average annual growth
in the cost of maintaining one lane mile in the state highway system
has been 2.8 percent.
(d) Changing conditions in the fuel market since the year 2000 have
driven changes in consumers' tastes in the vehicle market, with an
emphasis toward vehicles with superior fuel economy and vehicles that
rely on alternative fuels.
(e) The Washington transportation revenue forecasts anticipate
continued movement towards vehicles with improved fuel economies,
contributing to an expected decline in gasoline consumption over time.
(f) Washington transportation forecasters expect slow but positive
growth in vehicle miles traveled upon the state and local
transportation system to continue.
(g) Those persons and businesses that use the transportation system
have an obligation to help support the system through taxes or fees.
Until recently, fuel taxes have served as a good proxy for user fees
for the system. With increasing fuel economy in many newer vehicle
models, including some that do not rely on conventional fuels at all,
there is a growing discrepancy between the use of the transportation
system and payments to support the system.
(h) The public needs information on how the transportation system
in the state is funded, and the public needs to understand various
funding approaches and options.
(i) Other states and the federal government face the same
difficulty of stagnating fuel tax revenues. A number of other states,
as well as the Puget Sound regional council, have embarked on pilot
projects and other efforts over the last decade to evaluate potential
new systems for the assessment and collection of taxes or fees for the
use of a transportation system. Such efforts have shown that new
systems to assess a fee based on usage of state and local roads are
indeed technologically feasible today.
(j) Despite the technological success of recent pilot projects in
Washington and elsewhere, the transition away from the current system
of fuel taxation to a new system is likely to create a number of
fiscal, legal, constitutional, implementation, and public concern
issues, requiring a number of years to resolve.
(k) The transportation commission is tasked with transportation
policy development under RCW 47.01.075 and should continue to play a
vital role in the development of a new revenue collection system.
(2) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to establish the
governance structure and groundwork needed to transition from the
current system of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxation to a new
system of revenue collection. To this end, this act provides for the
creation of a statutory task force to guide the first stages of the
transition, focusing on determining the feasibility and optimal methods
of implementation for a road user assessment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A road user future funding task force is established, the
purpose of which is to assist the legislature in developing the policy
for a new system of revenue collection for Washington's roads and
highways.
(2) The task force must consist of fifteen voting members and two
nonvoting members appointed as provided in this subsection:
(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) One member from the commission, appointed by the commission,
who shall serve as chair of the task force;
(d) The following ten members appointed by the governor:
(i) One representative of county government;
(ii) One representative of city government;
(iii) One representative from an association that represents the
interests of the motoring public;
(iv) One representative from an association that represents
businesses at large;
(v) One representative from an association that represents trucking
interests;
(vi) One representative from an association that represents public
transportation interests;
(vii) One representative from an association that represents
environmental interests;
(viii) One representative from an association or group that
represents vehicle tolling or user fee technology development;
(ix) One representative from an association that represents
interests of automobile and light truck manufacturers; and
(x) One citizen at large; and
(e) The secretary or his or her designee and the director of the
department of licensing or his or her designee shall serve as nonvoting
members of the task force.
(3) The task force shall meet as often as deemed necessary by its
membership, but no less than three times each year.
(4) The commission shall convene the task force and provide primary
staff support for the task force.
(5) In coordination with the task force, the department, with
assistance as needed by the department of licensing, is responsible for
work elements related to assessing operational feasibility, including
technology, agency administration, multistate and federal standards,
and other tasks as deemed necessary by the task force.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a
majority of the members of the task force.
(7) Legislative members of the task force may be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.220 and 43.03.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The task force created under section 2 of this act shall:
(a) Research and review relevant reports, data, and efforts in
other states, at the federal level, and in other nations in regards to
models of road user assessments and methods of transitioning to a road
user assessment system of paying for transportation and analyze the
research to identify issues for policy decisions in Washington;
(b) Make recommendations on the design for a system trial or
trials. The recommendations must be submitted to the governor and the
transportation committees of the legislature by October 1, 2014; and
(c) In arriving at its recommendations:
(i) Enumerate and characterize potential road user assessment
implementation options, such as metering mileage, collecting fees, and
protecting privacy;
(ii) Determine and apply criteria for identifying the most
promising road user assessment implementation options to evaluate in
the trials;
(iii) Identify uncertainties that would need to be resolved in
order to develop a technically feasible, politically viable, and cost-effective system of road user assessments;
(iv) Determine which of these issues could be resolved or informed
through suitably structured trials;
(v) Consider broader views and potential implications of a road
user assessment on different system users by soliciting input from
stakeholders, the public, and subject matter experts;
(vi) Create a plan to assess public perspectives concerning a road
user assessment and to educate the public on the current transportation
financing system and options for a new revenue collection system;
(vii) Sequence the trials as necessary to build public acceptance
in a new system;
(viii) Synthesize findings to outline possible options for funding,
organizing, structuring, managing, and conducting the trials;
(ix) Address the possibility of joint trials with neighboring
states; and
(x) Propose legislation that would enable the conduct of the trial
or trials.
(2) In order to assist the task force in making its
recommendations, the department may participate in studies and limited
pilot projects to test technical feasibility that can be accomplished
within existing resources. The department must coordinate with the
task force and shall report regularly to the task force on these
activities, and the task force must consider the outcomes of these
activities in making its recommendations.
(3) The task force shall report by January 1st of each year
beginning in 2013 to the governor and to the transportation committees
of the legislature on the work of the task force.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The budget for the task force created under section 2 of this
act must be submitted by the commission.
(2) The commission and the department may solicit and accept grants
and assistance from the United States government and its agencies and
from any other source, public or private, for the purposes of the task
force.
(3) The commission and the department may accept gifts or donations
of equipment necessary to carry out research under section 3 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act expire June
30, 2015.

--- END ---