BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that state government
should be operated in an efficient and effective manner. It is the
intent of the legislature to create the office of legislative support
services to make effective and efficient use of the public's resources,
improve the delivery and quality of services, standardize practices,
and achieve cost savings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Director" means the director of the office of legislative
support services employed under section 4 of this act.
(2) "Legislative agencies" means: The joint legislative audit and
review committee, the joint transportation committee, the office of the
state actuary, the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee, the office of legislative support services, the joint
legislative systems committee, and the statute law committee.
(3) "Office" means the office of legislative support services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The office of legislative support
services is created to provide administrative and support services to
the senate, house of representatives, and legislative agencies. All
operations of the office are subject to RCW 44.04.260.
(2) The office shall provide support to the senate, the house of
representatives, and legislative agencies for facilities operations,
asset management, production services, audio-visual needs, the
distribution of information about the legislature and the legislative
process to the public, and other administrative or support services of
the senate, the house of representatives, and legislative agencies
authorized by the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the
house of representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The secretary of the senate and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives, in consultation with the
senate facilities and operations committee and the house executive
rules committee, shall employ a director of the office. The director
serves at the pleasure of the secretary of the senate and the chief
clerk of the house of representatives, who shall fix the director's
salary.
(2)(a) The director serves as the executive and administrative head
of the office.
(b) In accordance with an adopted personnel plan, the director
shall employ and fix the compensation for personnel required to carry
out the purposes of this chapter.
(c) The director may enter into contracts for: (i) The sale,
exchange, or acquisition of equipment, supplies, services, and
facilities required to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and (ii)
the distribution of legislative information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Subject to RCW 44.04.260, all expenses
incurred, including salaries and expenses of employees, shall be paid
upon voucher forms as provided and signed by the director. Vouchers
may be drawn on funds appropriated by law for the office. The senate
and house of representatives may transfer moneys appropriated for
legislative expenses to the office.

Sec. 6 RCW 44.04.260 and 2005 c 319 s 112 are each amended to
read as follows:
The joint legislative audit and review committee, the joint
transportation committee, the select committee on pension policy, the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the office
of legislative support services, and the joint legislative systems
committee are subject to such operational policies, procedures, and
oversight as are deemed necessary by the facilities and operations
committee of the senate and the executive rules committee of the house
of representatives to ensure operational adequacy of the agencies of
the legislative branch. As used in this section, "operational
policies, procedures, and oversight" includes the development process
of biennial budgets, contracting procedures, personnel policies, and
compensation plans, selection of a chief administrator, facilities, and
expenditures. This section does not grant oversight authority to the
facilities and operations committee of the senate over any standing
committee of the house of representatives or oversight authority to the
executive rules committee of the house of representatives over any
standing committee of the senate.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.88.230 and 2005 c 319 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, the statute law committee, the
joint legislative audit and review committee, the joint transportation
committee, the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee, the office of legislative support services, the office of
state actuary, and all legislative standing committees of both houses
shall be deemed a part of the legislative branch of state government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 44 RCW.

--- END ---