BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that petroleum is a
vital part of our state's economy. In light of ongoing volatility and
increasing demand in the world market for petroleum, it is important
for our state to diversify its resources. Therefore, it is the intent
of the legislature to examine the feasibility of creating a strategic
petroleum reserve and petroleum refinery to ensure that the state has
continued and reliable access to such an important resource.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) The joint legislative task force on
a Washington strategic petroleum reserve is established, with nine
members as provided in this subsection:
(i) The majority leader of the senate shall appoint one member from
each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives; and
(iii) The governor shall appoint five members from the executive
branch including, but not limited to, representation from the energy
facility site evaluation council, the utilities and transportation
commission, the department of natural resources, and the state energy
office within the department of commerce.
(b) The majority leader of the senate and the speaker of the house
of representatives shall jointly appoint the cochairs of the task force
from among the legislative members of the task force. The cochairs
shall convene the initial meeting of the task force. A steering
committee consisting of the legislative members of the task force shall
advise the cochairs on the meetings and other activities of the task
force.
(2) The task force shall study the feasibility of establishing a
strategic petroleum reserve and a state-owned petroleum refinery.
(a) In studying the feasibility of establishing a strategic
petroleum reserve, the task force shall consider and make
recommendations on, but not be limited to, the following:
(i) The amount of strategic petroleum reserves necessary to supply
refineries in Washington to meet thirty days of state demand of
gasoline, diesel fuel, aviation fuel, and home heating oil;
(ii) Above ground storage and underground storage options in
geologically stable parts of the state;
(iii) Petroleum infrastructure requirements to deliver strategic
petroleum reserves to privately owned and state-owned refineries for
processing;
(iv) A forecast of the annual costs to operate the strategic
petroleum reserve;
(v) The circumstances that would authorize the governor to access
the strategic petroleum reserves; and
(vi) The licensing, permitting, or other regulatory costs
associated with the construction and operation of a strategic petroleum
reserve.
(b) In studying the feasibility of establishing a state-owned
petroleum refinery, the task force shall consider and make
recommendations on, but not be limited to, the following:
(i) The location of the state-owned refinery in relationship to the
strategic petroleum reserve;
(ii) The licensing, permitting, or other regulatory costs
associated with the construction and operation of a state-owned
petroleum refinery to supply the daily needs. As part of this
forecast, a comparison must be presented on the costs and benefits to
the state of operating the refinery versus the state contracting with
a private entity to operate the refinery; and
(iii) The circumstances that would authorize the governor to
activate operations of the state-owned petroleum refinery.
(3) Staff support for the task force will be provided by senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research. The task force may hire additional staff with specific
technical expertise if such expertise is necessary to carry out the
mandates of this study, and only if an appropriation is specifically
provided for this purpose.
(4) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
senate and house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the legislature by December 1, 2012.
(7) This section expires July 1, 2013.

--- END ---