BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.010 and 2006 c 184 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in this chapter, the levy for a taxing district
in any year ((shall)) must be set so that the regular property taxes
payable in the following year ((shall)) does not exceed the limit
factor multiplied by the amount of regular property taxes lawfully
levied for such district in the highest of the three most recent years
in which such taxes were levied for such district plus an additional
dollar amount calculated by multiplying the regular property tax levy
rate of that district for the preceding year by the increase in
assessed value in that district resulting from:
(1) New construction((,));
(2) Increases in assessed value due to construction of ((electric
generation)) wind turbine, solar, biomass, and geothermal facilities
((classified as personal property)), if such facilities generate
electricity and the property is not included elsewhere under this
section for purposes of providing an additional dollar amount. The
property may be classified as real or personal property;
(3) Improvements to property((,)); and
(4) Any increase in the assessed value of state-assessed property
((by the regular property tax levy rate of that district for the
preceding year)).

Sec. 2 RCW 84.55.015 and 2006 c 184 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a taxing district has not levied since 1985 and elects to
restore a regular property tax levy subject to applicable statutory
limitations then such first restored levy ((shall)) must be set so that
the regular property tax payable ((shall)) does not exceed the amount
which was last levied, plus an additional dollar amount calculated by
multiplying the property tax rate which is proposed to be restored, or
the maximum amount which could be lawfully levied in the year such a
restored levy is proposed, by the increase in assessed value in the
district since the last levy resulting from:
(1) New construction((,));
(2) Increases in assessed value due to construction of ((electric
generation)) wind turbine, solar, biomass, and geothermal facilities
((classified as personal property)), if such facilities generate
electricity and the property is not included elsewhere under this
section for purposes of providing an additional dollar amount. The
property may be classified as real or personal property;
(3) Improvements to property((,)); and
(4) Any increase in the assessed value of state-assessed property
((by the property tax rate which is proposed to be restored, or the
maximum amount which could be lawfully levied in the year such a
restored levy is proposed)).

Sec. 3 RCW 84.55.020 and 2006 c 184 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding the limitation set forth in RCW 84.55.010, the
first levy for a taxing district created from consolidation of similar
taxing districts ((shall)) must be set so that the regular property
taxes payable in the following year ((shall)) do not exceed the limit
factor multiplied by the sum of the amount of regular property taxes
lawfully levied for each component taxing district in the highest of
the three most recent years in which such taxes were levied for such
district plus the additional dollar amount calculated by multiplying
the regular property tax rate of each component district for the
preceding year by the increase in assessed value in each component
district resulting from:
(1) New construction((,));
(2) Increases in assessed value due to construction of ((electric
generation)) wind turbine, solar, biomass, and geothermal facilities
((classified as personal property)), if such facilities generate
electricity and the property is not included elsewhere under this
section for purposes of providing an additional dollar amount. The
property may be classified as real or personal property;
(3) Improvements to property((,)); and
(4) Any increase in the assessed value of state-assessed property
((by the regular property tax rate of each component district for the
preceding year)).

Sec. 4 RCW 84.55.030 and 2006 c 184 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the first levy for a taxing district following annexation of
additional property, the limitation set forth in RCW 84.55.010
((shall)) must be increased by an amount equal to (((1))) the aggregate
assessed valuation of the newly annexed property as shown by the
current completed and balanced tax rolls of the county or counties
within which such property lies, multiplied by (((2))) the dollar rate
that would have been used by the annexing unit in the absence of such
annexation, plus (((3))) the additional dollar amount calculated by
multiplying the regular property tax levy rate of that annexing taxing
district for the preceding year by the increase in assessed value in
the annexing district resulting from:
(1) New construction((,));
(2) Increases in assessed value due to construction of ((electric
generation)) wind turbine, solar, biomass, and geothermal facilities
((classified as personal property)), if such facilities generate
electricity and the property is not included elsewhere under this
section for purposes of providing an additional dollar amount. The
property may be classified as real or personal property;
(3) Improvements to property((,)); and
(4) Any increase in the assessed value of state-assessed property
((by the regular property tax levy rate of that annexing taxing
district for the preceding year)).

Sec. 5 RCW 84.55.120 and 2006 c 184 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A taxing district, other than the state, that collects regular
levies ((shall)) must hold a public hearing on revenue sources for the
district's following year's current expense budget. The hearing must
include consideration of possible increases in property tax revenues
and ((shall)) must be held prior to the time the taxing district levies
the taxes or makes the request to have the taxes levied. The county
legislative authority, or the taxing district's governing body if the
district is a city, town, or other type of district, ((shall)) must
hold the hearing. For purposes of this section, "current expense
budget" means that budget which is primarily funded by taxes and
charges and reflects the provision of ongoing services. It does not
mean the capital, enterprise, or special assessment budgets of cities,
towns, counties, or special purpose districts.
(2) If the taxing district is otherwise required to hold a public
hearing on its proposed regular tax levy, a single public hearing may
be held on this matter.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection (3), no
increase in property tax revenue((, other than that resulting from the
addition of new construction, increases in assessed value due to
construction of electric generation wind turbine facilities classified
as personal property, and improvements to property and any increase in
the value of state-assessed property, may be authorized by a taxing
district, other than the state, except by adoption of a separate
ordinance or resolution, pursuant to notice, specifically authorizing
the increase in terms of both dollars and percentage. The ordinance or
resolution may cover a period of up to two years, but the ordinance
shall specifically state for each year the dollar increase and
percentage change in the levy from the previous year)) may be
authorized by a taxing district, other than the state, except by
adoption of a separate ordinance or resolution, pursuant to notice,
specifically authorizing the increase in terms of both dollars and
percentage. The ordinance or resolution may cover a period of up to
two years, but the ordinance must specifically state for each year the
dollar increase and percentage change in the levy from the previous
year.
(b) Exempt from the requirements of (a) of this subsection are
increases in revenue resulting from the addition of:
(i) New construction;
(ii) Increases in assessed value due to construction of wind
turbine, solar, biomass, and geothermal facilities, if such facilities
generate electricity and the property is not included elsewhere under
this section for purposes of providing an additional dollar amount.
The property may be classified as real or personal property;
(iii) Improvements to property; and
(iv) Any increase in the value of state-assessed property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2013 and thereafter.

--- END ---