BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.20.100 and 2006 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of the University of Washington shall be vested
in a board of regents to consist of ((ten)) eleven members, one of whom
shall be ((a)) an undergraduate student and one of whom shall be a
graduate or professional student. The governor shall select the
student members from a list of candidates, of at least three and not
more than five, submitted by the governing body of the associated
students. They shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of
the senate, and, except for the student members, shall hold their
offices for a term of six years from the first day of October and until
their successors shall be appointed and qualified. The student members
shall hold ((his or her)) their offices for a term of one year from the
first day of July until the first day of July of the following year or
until ((his or her)) their successors ((is)) are appointed and
qualified, whichever is later. The student members shall be ((a))
full-time students in good standing at the university at the time of
appointment.
(2) Six members of said board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In the case of a vacancy, or when an
appointment is made after the date of the expiration of a term, the
governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the
regent whose office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student members, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.

--- END ---