BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of ecology must, by
December 31, 2012, amend WAC 197-11-960, as it existed on the effective
date of this section, to add the following to the checklist:
(a) Potential downstream or down-gradient impacts to waters or
waterways, including, but not limited to, flooding, erosion,
sedimentation, habitat loss or impacts, and increased burdens on
downstream jurisdictions from a project or proposal;
(b) Potential adverse impacts to the ability of local transit
agencies to meet relevant transit service standards and whether
mitigation measures may alleviate or restore transit service to meet
these standards; and
(c) Potential adverse impacts to the ability of school districts to
meet capacity standards or plans developed by school districts for
kindergarten through grade twelve public schools, and whether
mitigation measures may alleviate or restore transit service to meet
these standards.
(2) This section expires July 31, 2013.

--- END ---