BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
clarify that state collective bargaining rights of language access
providers is limited to providers paid, in whole or in part, with an
expenditure of state funds and is not intended to cover providers in
legal proceedings. As a clarification of current law, this act is
intended to apply both prospectively and retroactively.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.56.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Adult family home provider" means a provider as defined in RCW
70.128.010 who receives payments from the medicaid and state-funded
long-term care programs.
(2) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which
has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in
their employment relations with employers.
(3) "Child care subsidy" means a payment from the state through a
child care subsidy program established pursuant to RCW 74.12.340 or
74.08A.340, 45 C.F.R. Sec. 98.1 through 98.17, or any successor
program.
(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in
good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters,
including wages, hours and working conditions, which may be peculiar to
an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that by
such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal
or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.
(7) "Family child care provider" means a person who: (a) Provides
regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home of the
provider or in the home of the child or children for periods of less
than twenty-four hours or, if necessary due to the nature of the
parent's work, for periods equal to or greater than twenty-four hours;
(b) receives child care subsidies; and (c) is either licensed by the
state under RCW 74.15.030 or is exempt from licensing under chapter
74.15 RCW.
(8) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240(4) who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, is a public employee as provided in RCW 74.39A.270.
(9) "Institution of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.
(10)(a) "Language access provider" means any independent contractor
who provides spoken language interpreter services for department of
social and health services appointments or medicaid enrollee
appointments, or provided these services on or after January 1, 2009,
and before June 10, 2010, whether paid by a broker, language access
agency, or the department.
(b) "Language access provider" does not mean: An owner, manager,
or employee of a broker or a language access agency; an interpreter
appointed or required in legal proceedings pursuant to RCW 2.43.030; or
an interpreter under the medicaid administrative match program.
(c) "Department of social and health services appointments" does
not include legal proceedings of any nature, including criminal, civil,
or administrative proceedings at any level.
(d) "Medicaid enrollee appointments" does not include medicaid
administrative match program appointments or any other service provided
pursuant to that program.
(11) "Public employee" means any employee of a public employer
except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to
office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy, administrative
assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential relationship to
(i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining unit, or
(ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed
to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner or a court
magistrate of superior court, district court, or a department of a
district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who is a
personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or
court commissioner. For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more
than one assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from
a bargaining unit.
(12) "Public employer" means any officer, board, commission,
council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any public body
governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public body. For
the purposes of this section, the public employer of district court or
superior court employees for wage-related matters is the respective
county legislative authority, or person or body acting on behalf of the
legislative authority, and the public employer for nonwage-related
matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective district
court or superior court.
(13) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as
defined in RCW 41.26.030 employed by the governing body of any city or
town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more and law
enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any county with
a population of ten thousand or more; (b) correctional employees who
are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and noncommissioned
security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020(9),
by a county with a population of seventy thousand or more, and who are
trained for and charged with the responsibility of controlling and
maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and safeguarding inmates
from other inmates; (c) general authority Washington peace officers as
defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a port district in a county with
a population of one million or more; (d) security forces established
under RCW 43.52.520; (e) firefighters as that term is defined in RCW
41.26.030; (f) employees of a port district in a county with a
population of one million or more whose duties include crash fire
rescue or other firefighting duties; (g) employees of fire departments
of public employers who dispatch exclusively either fire or emergency
medical services, or both; or (h) employees in the several classes of
advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, who are
employed by a public employer.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.04.025 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 63 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department, the authority, and the office of administrative
hearings shall ensure that bilingual services are provided to non-English speaking applicants and recipients. The services shall be
provided to the extent necessary to assure that non-English speaking
persons are not denied, or unable to obtain or maintain, services or
benefits because of their inability to speak English.
(2) If the number of non-English speaking applicants or recipients
sharing the same language served by any community service office client
contact job classification equals or exceeds fifty percent of the
average caseload of a full-time position in such classification, the
department shall, through attrition, employ bilingual personnel to
serve such applicants or recipients.
(3) Regardless of the applicant or recipient caseload of any
community service office, each community service office shall ensure
that bilingual services required to supplement the community service
office staff are provided through contracts with language access
providers, local agencies, or other community resources.
(4) The department shall certify, authorize, and qualify language
access providers as needed to maintain an adequate pool of providers.
(5) The department shall require compliance with RCW 41.56.113(2)
through its contracts with third parties.
(6) Initial client contact materials shall inform clients in all
primary languages of the availability of interpretation services for
non-English speaking persons. Basic informational pamphlets shall be
translated into all primary languages.
(7) To the extent all written communications directed to applicants
or recipients are not in the primary language of the applicant or
recipient, the department and the office of administrative hearings
shall include with the written communication a notice in all primary
languages of applicants or recipients describing the significance of
the communication and specifically how the applicants or recipients may
receive assistance in understanding, and responding to if necessary,
the written communication. The department shall assure that sufficient
resources are available to assist applicants and recipients in a timely
fashion with understanding, responding to, and complying with the
requirements of all such written communications.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) "Language access provider" means any independent contractor who
provides spoken language interpreter services for department
appointments or medicaid enrollee appointments, or provided these
services on or after January 1, 2009, and before June 10, 2010, whether
paid by a broker, language access agency, or the department. "Language
access provider" does not mean: An owner, manager, or employee of a
broker or a language access agency; an interpreter appointed or
required in legal proceedings pursuant to RCW 2.43.030; or an
interpreter under the medicaid administrative match program.
(b) "Department appointments" does not include legal proceedings of
any nature, including criminal, civil, or administrative proceedings at
any level.
(c) "Medicaid enrollee appointments" does not include medicaid
administrative match program appointments or any other service provided
pursuant to that program.
(((b))) (d) "Primary languages" includes, but is not limited to,
Spanish, Vietnamese, Cambodian, Laotian, and Chinese.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies both prospectively and
retroactively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---