BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.112.120 and 1992 c 101 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of an authority, by resolution, shall designate a person
having experience in financial or fiscal matters as treasurer of the
authority. The board may designate, with the concurrence of the
treasurer, the treasurer of a county within which the authority is
located. Such a treasurer shall possess all of the powers,
responsibilities, and duties the county treasurer possesses for a
public transportation benefit area authority related to investing
surplus authority funds. The board shall require a bond with a surety
company authorized to do business in the state of Washington in an
amount and under the terms and conditions the board, by resolution,
from time to time finds will protect the authority against loss. The
premium on any such bond shall be paid by the authority.
All authority funds shall be paid to the treasurer and shall be
disbursed by the treasurer only on warrants issued by the authority
upon orders or vouchers approved by the board.
The treasurer shall establish a special fund, into which shall be
paid all authority funds, and the treasurer shall maintain such special
accounts as may be created by the authority into which shall be placed
all money as the board may, by resolution, direct.
If the treasurer of the authority is the treasurer of a county, all
authority funds shall be deposited with the county depositary under the
same restrictions, contracts, and security as provided for county
depositaries. If the treasurer of the authority is some other person,
all funds shall be deposited in such bank or banks authorized to do
business in this state that have qualified for insured deposits under
any federal deposit insurance act as the board, by resolution, shall
designate.
The authority may by resolution designate a person having
experience in financial or fiscal matters, as the auditor of the
authority. Such auditor shall possess all of the powers,
responsibilities, and duties related to creating and maintaining funds,
issuing warrants, and maintaining a record of receipts and
disbursements.
The board may provide and require a reasonable bond of any other
person handling moneys or securities of the authority, but the
authority shall pay the premium on the bond.
The authority shall fund a comprehensive performance audit by the
state auditor annually.

--- END ---