BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that: (a) Longer-term economic trends, accelerated by the recession, are changing and
enlarging the public's requirements for higher education; (b) the
future of state's citizens and businesses requires a radical increase
in high quality educational attainment; and (c) an increasing
proportion of jobs require baccalaureate degrees while prospects are
minimal for those with only a high school diploma or less.
(2) The legislature also finds that in addition to a general
requirement to rapidly increase educational attainment at all levels,
innovative approaches are needed to meet the educational needs of two
particular groups of citizens: (a) To retain or increase their earning
power, large numbers of workers need to meet the economy's growing
demands for baccalaureate-level skills, which may need to be frequently
refreshed by additional baccalaureate-level study and training; and (b)
large numbers of underskilled, under and unemployed persons need a
practical, affordable path to gaining the entry-level academic skills
prerequisite for college and university education and training.
(3) Recognizing innovations by several of the state's baccalaureate
universities and community and technical colleges to address these
emerging needs, the legislature intends to launch two pilot projects.
The legislature intends that one project, to be led by baccalaureate
institutions, will design and demonstrate innovative approaches to
baccalaureate-level instruction able to meet the needs of workers and
businesses in the growth sectors of the state's economy. The
legislature intends that another project, to be led by community and
technical college institutions, will design and demonstrate innovative
approaches to meeting the remedial and developmental education needs of
potential workers to prepare to be successful higher education
students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Working with the higher education
coordinating board or successor agency, the state board for community
and technical colleges, faculty, students, business, and other partners
as may be appropriate, the four-year institutions of higher education
are encouraged to work together in order to design innovative
approaches to greatly increase the number of resident students working
toward and gaining baccalaureate degrees or further updating or
advancing their academic credentials. The four-year institutions of
higher education shall submit to the governor and the higher education
and education fiscal committees of the legislature an interim report by
August 1, 2012, and a final report and proposals for implementation by
December 1, 2012. The four-year institutions of higher education must
include in the interim report a survey of relevant innovations by any
of the institutions. The final report shall propose a comprehensive
plan for implementing further, system-wide innovations designed to
rapidly and substantially increase baccalaureate-level educational
attainment by Washington residents employed or seeking employment in
the high growth sectors of the state's economy. The four-year
institutions of higher education are encouraged to include in the final
report innovative methods for enabling students to gain credit for
prior learning including recognition of coursework and academic
credentials obtained by students in other states, other countries, or
the military; and innovative programs, such as bridge programs, that
reduce duplication of coursework and decrease time to completion of
their degree or credential.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Working with the higher education
coordinating board or successor agency, faculty, students, business,
and other agencies and partners as may be appropriate, the state board
for community and technical colleges is encouraged to charter a
consortium of volunteer community and technical colleges to design
innovative approaches to rapidly and substantially increase the cost-effective delivery of developmental and remedial education. Wherever
possible those innovations are to be tested in immediate pilot
projects. The state board for community and technical colleges shall
submit to the governor and the higher education and education fiscal
committees of the legislature an interim report by August 1, 2012, and
a final report and proposals for implementation by December 1, 2012,
with the final efficiency study report in RCW 28B.50.216. The state
board for community and technical colleges must include in the interim
report a survey of relevant innovations by any of the colleges. The
final report shall propose a comprehensive plan for implementing
further, system-wide innovations designed to rapidly and substantially
increase the cost-effectiveness of remedial and developmental education
instruction for the full range of students seeking access to college
and university education. The state board for community and technical
colleges is encouraged to include in the final report innovative
methods for enabling students to gain credit for prior learning
including recognition of coursework and academic credentials obtained
by students in other states, other countries, or the military; and
innovative programs, such as bridge programs, that reduce duplication
of coursework and decrease time to completion of their degree or
credential.

--- END ---