BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.36 RCW
to read as follows:
There shall be established and maintained in this state a branch of
the state soldiers' home, under the name of the "Walla Walla state
veterans' home," which shall be a home for veterans and their spouses
who meet admission requirements contained in RCW 72.36.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect upon certification by
the director of the office of financial management that sufficient and
specific funding, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, has
been provided by June 30, 2012, in the omnibus capital appropriations
act for the state funds required by the United States department of
veterans affairs state home construction grant program for the
construction of the state soldiers' home created in section 1 of this
act. A notice of certification must be filed with the code reviser for
publication in the state register. If a certificate is not filed by
the director of the office of financial management by June 30, 2012,
this act is null and void.

--- END ---