BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.392 and 2009 c 548 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To the extent necessary, funds shall be made available for
safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special
education funding beyond the amounts provided through the special
education funding formula under RCW 28A.150.390. If the federal safety
net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the
federal appropriation in any fiscal year, then the superintendent shall
expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this
need. Safety net funds shall be awarded by the state safety net
oversight committee subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider additional funds for districts
that can convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for
special education exceed all available revenues from state funding
formulas. Notwithstanding the requirements of RCW 28A.190.050,
priority for safety net funding shall be given to districts that have
the primary duty for providing basic education to individuals who
reside in residential habilitation centers. In the determination of
need, the committee shall also consider additional available revenues
from federal sources. Differences in program costs attributable to
district philosophy, service delivery choice, or accounting practices
are not a legitimate basis for safety net awards. In the determination
of need, the committee shall require that districts demonstrate that
they are maximizing their eligibility for all state revenues related to
services for special education-eligible students and all federal
revenues from federal impact aid, medicaid, and the individuals with
disabilities education act-Part B and appropriate special projects.
Awards associated with (b) and (c) of this subsection shall not exceed
the total of a district's specific determination of need.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) Using criteria developed by the committee, the committee shall
then consider extraordinary costs associated with communities that draw
a larger number of families with children in need of special education
services, which may include consideration of proximity to group homes,
military bases, and regional hospitals. Safety net awards under this
subsection (1)(c) shall be adjusted to reflect amounts awarded under
(b) of this subsection.
(d) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(e) Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of
potential medicaid eligible students billed as calculated by the
superintendent of public instruction in accordance with chapter 318,
Laws of 1999.
(f) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Before revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
In adopting and revising the rules, the superintendent shall ensure the
application process to access safety net funding is streamlined,
timelines for submission are not in conflict, feedback to school
districts is timely and provides sufficient information to allow school
districts to understand how to correct any deficiencies in a safety net
application, and that there is consistency between awards approved by
school district and by application period. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall also provide technical
assistance to school districts in preparing and submitting special
education safety net applications.
(3) On an annual basis, the superintendent shall survey districts
regarding their satisfaction with the safety net process and consider
feedback from districts to improve the safety net process. Each year
by December 1st, the superintendent shall prepare and submit a report
to the office of financial management and the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature that summarizes the survey results
and those changes made to the safety net process as a result of the
school district feedback.
(4) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff member from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor who shall be nonvoting
members of the committee; and
(c) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---