BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.82.010 and 2007 c 506 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services,
on behalf of the agency involved and after consultation with the office
of financial management, shall purchase, lease, lease purchase, rent,
or otherwise acquire all real estate, improved or unimproved, as may be
required by elected state officials, institutions, departments,
commissions, boards, and other state agencies, or federal agencies
where joint state and federal activities are undertaken and may grant
easements and transfer, exchange, sell, lease, or sublease all or part
of any surplus real estate for those state agencies which do not
otherwise have the specific authority to dispose of real estate. This
section does not transfer financial liability for the acquired property
to the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services.
(2) Except for real estate occupied by federal agencies, the
director shall determine the location, size, and design of any real
estate or improvements thereon acquired or held pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section. Facilities acquired or held pursuant to this
chapter, and any improvements thereon, shall conform to standards
adopted by the director and approved by the office of financial
management governing facility efficiency unless a specific exemption
from such standards is provided by the director of ((general
administration)) enterprise services. The director of ((general
administration)) enterprise services shall report to the office of
financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature
annually on any exemptions granted pursuant to this subsection.
(3) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services
may fix the terms and conditions of each lease entered into under this
chapter, except that no lease shall extend greater than twenty years in
duration. The director of ((general administration)) enterprise
services may enter into a long-term lease greater than ten years in
duration upon a determination by the director of the office of
financial management that the long-term lease provides a more favorable
rate than would otherwise be available, it appears to a substantial
certainty that the facility is necessary for use by the state for the
full length of the lease term, and the facility meets the standards
adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The director of
((general administration)) enterprise services may enter into a long-term lease greater than ten years in duration if an analysis shows that
the life-cycle cost of leasing the facility is less than the life-cycle
cost of purchasing or constructing a facility in lieu of leasing the
facility.
(4) Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease for or on
behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as collateral or
security for the payment of securities offered for sale through a
public offering. Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease
for or on behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as
collateral or security for the payment of securities offered for sale
through a private placement without the prior written approval of the
state treasurer. However, this limitation shall not prevent a lessor
from assigning or encumbering its interest in a lease as security for
the repayment of a promissory note provided that the transaction would
otherwise be an exempt transaction under RCW 21.20.320. The state
treasurer shall adopt rules that establish the criteria under which any
such approval may be granted. In establishing such criteria the state
treasurer shall give primary consideration to the protection of the
state's credit rating and the integrity of the state's debt management
program. If it appears to the state treasurer that any lease has been
used or referred to in violation of this subsection or rules adopted
under this subsection, then he or she may recommend that the governor
cause such lease to be terminated. The department of ((general
administration)) enterprise services shall promptly notify the state
treasurer whenever it may appear to the department that any lease has
been used or referred to in violation of this subsection or rules
adopted under this subsection.
(5) It is the policy of the state to encourage the colocation and
consolidation of state services into single or adjacent facilities,
whenever appropriate, to improve public service delivery, minimize
duplication of facilities, increase efficiency of operations, and
promote sound growth management planning.
(6) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services
shall provide coordinated long-range planning services to identify and
evaluate opportunities for colocating and consolidating state
facilities. Upon the renewal of any lease, the inception of a new
lease, or the purchase of a facility, the director of ((general
administration)) enterprise services shall determine whether an
opportunity exists for colocating the agency or agencies in a single
facility with other agencies located in the same geographic area. If
a colocation opportunity exists, the director of ((general
administration)) enterprise services shall consult with the affected
state agencies and the office of financial management to evaluate the
impact colocation would have on the cost and delivery of agency
programs, including whether program delivery would be enhanced due to
the centralization of services. The director of ((general
administration)) enterprise services, in consultation with the office
of financial management, shall develop procedures for implementing
colocation and consolidation of state facilities.
(7) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services
is authorized to purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire improved
or unimproved real estate as owner or lessee and to lease or sublet all
or a part of such real estate to state or federal agencies. The
director of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall charge
each using agency its proportionate rental which shall include an
amount sufficient to pay all costs, including, but not limited to,
those for utilities, janitorial and accounting services, and sufficient
to provide for contingencies; which shall not exceed five percent of
the average annual rental, to meet unforeseen expenses incident to
management of the real estate.
(8) If the director of ((general administration)) enterprise
services determines that it is necessary or advisable to undertake any
work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement on any real
estate acquired pursuant to subsection (1) or (7) of this section, the
director shall cause plans and specifications thereof and an estimate
of the cost of such work to be made and filed in his or her office and
the state agency benefiting thereby is hereby authorized to pay for
such work out of any available funds: PROVIDED, That the cost of
executing such work shall not exceed the sum of twenty-five thousand
dollars. Work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement in
excess of twenty-five thousand dollars, other than that done by the
owner of the property if other than the state, shall be performed in
accordance with the public works law of this state.
(9) In order to obtain maximum utilization of space, the director
of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall make space
utilization studies, and shall establish standards for use of space by
state agencies. Such studies shall include the identification of
opportunities for colocation and consolidation of state agency office
and support facilities.
(10) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services
may construct new buildings on, or improve existing facilities, and
furnish and equip, all real estate under his or her management. Prior
to the construction of new buildings or major improvements to existing
facilities or acquisition of facilities using a lease purchase
contract, the director of ((general administration)) enterprise
services shall conduct an evaluation of the facility design and budget
using life-cycle cost analysis, value-engineering, and other techniques
to maximize the long-term effectiveness and efficiency of the facility
or improvement.
(11) All conveyances and contracts to purchase, lease, rent,
transfer, exchange, or sell real estate and to grant and accept
easements shall be approved as to form by the attorney general, signed
by the director of ((general administration)) enterprise services or
the director's designee, and recorded with the county auditor of the
county in which the property is located.
(12) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services
may delegate any or all of the functions specified in this section to
any agency upon such terms and conditions as the director deems
advisable. By January 1st of each year, beginning January 1, 2008, the
department shall submit an annual report to the office of financial
management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on all
delegated leases.
(13) This section does not apply to the acquisition of real estate
by:
(a) The state college and universities for research or experimental
purposes;
(b) The state liquor control board for liquor stores and
warehouses; and
(c) The department of natural resources, the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of transportation, and the state parks and
recreation commission for purposes other than the leasing of offices,
warehouses, and real estate for similar purposes.
(14) Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary,
the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services may
negotiate ground leases for public lands on which property is to be
acquired under a financing contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW under
terms approved by the state finance committee.
(15) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services shall report annually to the office of financial management
and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on facility
leases executed for all state agencies for the preceding year, lease
terms, and annual lease costs. The report must include leases executed
under RCW 43.82.045 and subsection (12) of this section.
(16) The department of enterprise services shall report the status
of any surplus property that is actively being listed for sale
including the date the property was listed and listing price, and any
surplus property that has sold including the approximate value, sale
price, and fund into which the proceeds will be deposited to the office
of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature by January 1st of odd-numbered years. At least nine months
prior to being actively listed for sale, the department shall notify
the fiscal committees of the legislature and the office of financial
management.

--- END ---