BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.04.010 and 2011 c 325 s 2 and 2011 c 195 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
In this title, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Alcohol" is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated
oxide of ethyl, or spirit of wine, which is commonly produced by the
fermentation or distillation of grain, starch, molasses, or sugar, or
other substances including all dilutions and mixtures of this
substance. The term "alcohol" does not include alcohol in the
possession of a manufacturer or distiller of alcohol fuel, as described
in RCW 66.12.130, which is intended to be denatured and used as a fuel
for use in motor vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements
of husbandry.
(2) "Authorized representative" means a person who:
(a) Is required to have a federal basic permit issued pursuant to
the federal alcohol administration act, 27 U.S.C. Sec. 204;
(b) Has its business located in the United States outside of the
state of Washington;
(c) Acquires ownership of beer or wine for transportation into and
resale in the state of Washington; and which beer or wine is produced
by a brewery or winery in the United States outside of the state of
Washington; and
(d) Is appointed by the brewery or winery referenced in (c) of this
subsection as its authorized representative for marketing and selling
its products within the United States in accordance with a written
agreement between the authorized representative and such brewery or
winery pursuant to this title.
(3) "Beer" means any malt beverage, flavored malt beverage, or malt
liquor as these terms are defined in this chapter.
(4) "Beer distributor" means a person who buys beer from a domestic
brewery, microbrewery, beer certificate of approval holder, or beer
importers, or who acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to
this title, or who represents such brewer or brewery as agent.
(5) "Beer importer" means a person or business within Washington
who purchases beer from a beer certificate of approval holder or who
acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside of the United
States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.
(6) (("Board" means the liquor control board, constituted under
this title.
(7))) "Brewer" or "brewery" means any person engaged in the
business of manufacturing beer and malt liquor. Brewer includes a
brand owner of malt beverages who holds a brewer's notice with the
federal bureau of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms at a location outside
the state and whose malt beverage is contract-produced by a licensed
in-state brewery, and who may exercise within the state, under a
domestic brewery license, only the privileges of storing, selling to
licensed beer distributors, and exporting beer from the state.
(((8))) (7) "Club" means an organization of persons, incorporated
or unincorporated, operated solely for fraternal, benevolent,
educational, athletic or social purposes, and not for pecuniary gain.
(((9))) (8) "Confection" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or
other natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate,
fruits, nuts, dairy products, or flavorings, in the form of bars,
drops, or pieces.
(((10))) (9) "Consume" includes the putting of liquor to any use,
whether by drinking or otherwise.
(((11))) (10) "Contract liquor store" means a business that sells
liquor on behalf of the ((board)) office through a contract with a
contract liquor store manager.
(((12))) (11) "Craft distillery" means a distillery that pays the
reduced licensing fee under RCW 66.24.140.
(((13))) (12) "Dentist" means a practitioner of dentistry duly and
regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his or her profession
within the state pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.
(((14))) (13) "Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of
distilling spirits.
(((15))) (14) "Domestic brewery" means a place where beer and malt
liquor are manufactured or produced by a brewer within the state.
(((16))) (15) "Domestic winery" means a place where wines are
manufactured or produced within the state of Washington.
(((17))) (16) "Druggist" means any person who holds a valid
certificate and is a registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly
engaged in carrying on the business of pharmaceutical chemistry
pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW.
(((18))) (17) "Drug store" means a place whose principal business
is, the sale of drugs, medicines and pharmaceutical preparations and
maintains a regular prescription department and employs a registered
pharmacist during all hours the drug store is open.
(((19))) (18) "Employee" means any person employed by the ((board))
office.
(((20))) (19) "Flavored malt beverage" means:
(a) A malt beverage containing six percent or less alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than forty-nine
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content; or
(b) A malt beverage containing more than six percent alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than one and one-half
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content.
(((21))) (20) "Fund" means 'liquor revolving fund.'
(((22))) (21) "Hotel" means buildings, structures, and grounds,
having facilities for preparing, cooking, and serving food, that are
kept, used, maintained, advertised, or held out to the public to be a
place where food is served and sleeping accommodations are offered for
pay to transient guests, in which twenty or more rooms are used for the
sleeping accommodation of such transient guests. The buildings,
structures, and grounds must be located on adjacent property either
owned or leased by the same person or persons.
(((23))) (22) "Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits
from a distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such
spirituous liquor into the state for sale ((to the board)) or for
export.
(((24))) (23) "Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.
(((25))) (24) "Liquor" includes the four varieties of liquor herein
defined (alcohol, spirits, wine and beer), and all fermented,
spirituous, vinous, or malt liquor, or combinations thereof, and mixed
liquor, a part of which is fermented, spirituous, vinous or malt
liquor, or otherwise intoxicating; and every liquid or solid or
semisolid or other substance, patented or not, containing alcohol,
spirits, wine or beer, and all drinks or drinkable liquids and all
preparations or mixtures capable of human consumption, and any liquid,
semisolid, solid, or other substance, which contains more than one
percent of alcohol by weight shall be conclusively deemed to be
intoxicating. Liquor does not include confections or food products
that contain one percent or less of alcohol by weight.
(((26))) (25) "Malt beverage" or "malt liquor" means any beverage
such as beer, ale, lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the
alcoholic fermentation of an infusion or decoction of pure hops, or
pure extract of hops and pure barley malt or other wholesome grain or
cereal in pure water containing not more than eight percent of alcohol
by weight, and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by
volume. For the purposes of this title, any such beverage containing
more than eight percent of alcohol by weight shall be referred to as
"strong beer."
(((27))) (26) "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the
preparation of liquor for sale, in any form whatsoever.
(((28))) (27) "Nightclub" means an establishment that provides
entertainment and has as its primary source of revenue (a) the sale of
alcohol for consumption on the premises, (b) cover charges, or (c)
both.
(28) "Office" means the office of alcohol beverage control.
(29) "Package" means any container or receptacle used for holding
liquor.
(30) "Passenger vessel" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or
other floating craft of any kind carrying passengers for compensation.
(31) "Permit" means a permit for the purchase of liquor under this
title.
(32) "Person" means an individual, copartnership, association, or
corporation.
(33) "Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and regularly
licensed and engaged in the practice of his or her profession within
the state pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW.
(34) "Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a physician and
given by him or her to a patient for the obtaining of liquor pursuant
to this title for medicinal purposes.
(35) "Public place" includes streets and alleys of incorporated
cities and towns; state or county or township highways or roads;
buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance halls and
grounds adjacent thereto; those parts of establishments where beer may
be sold under this title, soft drink establishments, public buildings,
public meeting halls, lobbies, halls and dining rooms of hotels,
restaurants, theatres, stores, garages and filling stations which are
open to and are generally used by the public and to which the public is
permitted to have unrestricted access; railroad trains, stages, and
other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and the depots and
waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are open to
unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned bathing
beaches, parks, and/or playgrounds; and all other places of like or
similar nature to which the general public has unrestricted right of
access, and which are generally used by the public.
(36) "Regulations" means regulations made by the ((board)) office
under the powers conferred by this title.
(37) "Restaurant" means any establishment provided with special
space and accommodations where, in consideration of payment, food,
without lodgings, is habitually furnished to the public, not including
drug stores and soda fountains.
(38) "Sale" and "sell" include exchange, barter, and traffic; and
also include the selling or supplying or distributing, by any means
whatsoever, of liquor, or of any liquid known or described as beer or
by any name whatever commonly used to describe malt or brewed liquor or
of wine, by any person to any person; and also include a sale or
selling within the state to a foreign consignee or his or her agent in
the state. "Sale" and "sell" shall not include the giving, at no
charge, of a reasonable amount of liquor by a person not licensed by
the ((board)) office to a person not licensed by the ((board)) office,
for personal use only. "Sale" and "sell" also does not include a
raffle authorized under RCW 9.46.0315: PROVIDED, That the nonprofit
organization conducting the raffle has obtained the appropriate permit
from the ((board)) office.
(39) "Service bar" means a fixed or portable table, counter, cart,
or similar work station primarily used to prepare, mix, serve, and sell
alcohol that is picked up by employees or customers. Customers may not
be seated or allowed to consume food or alcohol at a service bar.
(40) "Soda fountain" means a place especially equipped with
apparatus for the purpose of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed or
otherwise.
(41) "Spirits" means any beverage which contains alcohol obtained
by distillation, except flavored malt beverages, but including wines
exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume.
(42) "Store" means a state liquor store established under this
title.
(43) "Tavern" means any establishment with special space and
accommodation for sale by the glass and for consumption on the
premises, of beer, as herein defined.
(44) "VIP airport lounge" means an establishment within an
international airport located beyond security checkpoints that provides
a special space to sit, relax, read, work, and enjoy beverages where
access is controlled by the VIP airport lounge operator and is
generally limited to the following classifications of persons:
(a) Airline passengers of any age whose admission is based on a
first-class, executive, or business class ticket;
(b) Airline passengers of any age who are qualified members or
allowed guests of certain frequent flyer or other loyalty incentive
programs maintained by airlines that have agreements describing the
conditions for access to the VIP airport lounge;
(c) Airline passengers of any age who are qualified members or
allowed guests of certain enhanced amenities programs maintained by
companies that have agreements describing the conditions for access to
the VIP airport lounge;
(d) Airport and airline employees, government officials, foreign
dignitaries, and other attendees of functions held by the airport
authority or airlines related to the promotion of business objectives
such as increasing international air traffic and enhancing foreign
trade where access to the VIP airport lounge will be controlled by the
VIP airport lounge operator; and
(e) Airline passengers of any age or airline employees whose
admission is based on a pass issued or permission given by the airline
for access to the VIP airport lounge.
(45) "VIP airport lounge operator" means an airline, port district,
or other entity operating a VIP airport lounge that: Is accountable
for compliance with the alcohol beverage control act under this title
((66 RCW)); holds the license under chapter 66.24 RCW issued to the VIP
airport lounge; and provides a point of contact for addressing any
licensing and enforcement by the ((board)) office.
(46)(a) "Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by
fermentation of fruits (grapes, berries, apples, et cetera) or other
agricultural product containing sugar, to which any saccharine
substances may have been added before, during or after fermentation,
and containing not more than twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume,
including sweet wines fortified with wine spirits, such as port,
sherry, muscatel and angelica, not exceeding twenty-four percent of
alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol
by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage containing no more
than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when bottled or packaged by
the manufacturer shall be referred to as "table wine," and any beverage
containing alcohol in an amount more than fourteen percent by volume
when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as
"fortified wine." However, "fortified wine" shall not include: (i)
Wines that are both sealed or capped by cork closure and aged two years
or more; and (ii) wines that contain more than fourteen percent alcohol
by volume solely as a result of the natural fermentation process and
that have not been produced with the addition of wine spirits, brandy,
or alcohol.
(b) This subsection shall not be interpreted to require that any
wine be labeled with the designation "table wine" or "fortified wine."
(47) "Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from a
domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, or wine importer,
or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of the
United States, for the purpose of selling the same not in violation of
this title, or who represents such vintner or winery as agent.
(48) "Wine importer" means a person or business within Washington
who purchases wine from a wine certificate of approval holder or who
acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of the United
States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.
(49) "Winery" means a business conducted by any person for the
manufacture of wine for sale, other than a domestic winery.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.04.011 and 1977 ex.s. c 219 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Public place" as defined in this title shall not include (a) any
of those parks under the control of the state parks and recreation
commission, nor, (b) parks and picnic areas adjacent to and held by the
same ownership as licensed brewers and domestic wineries for the
consumption of beer and wine produced by the respective brewery or
winery, as prescribed by regulation adopted by the ((board)) office
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.08.012 and 1961 c 307 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be ((a board)) an executive branch agency, known as the
(("Washington state liquor control board," consisting of three members,
to be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, who))
"office of alcohol beverage control." The executive head and
appointing authority of the office is the director. The director is
appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by the senate. The
director serves at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall
((each)) be paid an annual salary to be fixed by the governor in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040. ((The governor may,
in his discretion, appoint one of the members as chairman of the board,
and a majority of the members shall constitute a quorum of the board.))
If a vacancy occurs in the position of the director while the senate is
not in session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until
the next meeting of the senate at which time he or she shall present to
the senate the nomination for the position.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.08.014 and 1986 c 105 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) The members of the board to be appointed after December 2,
1948 shall be appointed for terms beginning January 15, 1949, and
expiring as follows: One member of the board for a term of three years
from January 15, 1949; one member of the board for a term of six years
from January 15, 1949; and one member of the board for a term of nine
years from January 15, 1949. Each of the members of the board
appointed hereunder shall hold office until his successor is appointed
and qualified. After June 11, 1986, the term that began on January 15,
1985, will end on January 15, 1989, the term beginning on January 15,
1988, will end on January 15, 1993, and the term beginning on January
15, 1991, will end on January 15, 1997. Thereafter, upon the
expiration of the term of any member appointed after June 11, 1986,
each succeeding member of the board shall be appointed and hold office
for the term of six years. In case of a vacancy, it shall be filled by
appointment by the governor for the unexpired portion of the term in
which said vacancy occurs. No vacancy in the membership of the board
shall impair the right of the remaining member or members to act,
except as herein otherwise provided.
(2))) The ((principal office)) headquarters of the ((board)) office
shall be at the state capitol, and it may establish such other offices
as it may deem necessary.
(((3) Any member of the board may be removed for inefficiency,
malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific written charges
filed by the governor, who shall transmit such written charges to the
member accused and to the chief justice of the supreme court. The
chief justice shall thereupon designate a tribunal composed of three
judges of the superior court to hear and adjudicate the charges. Such
tribunal shall fix the time of the hearing, which shall be public, and
the procedure for the hearing, and the decision of such tribunal shall
be final and not subject to review by the supreme court. Removal of
any member of the board by the tribunal shall disqualify such member
for reappointment.
(4) Each member of the board shall devote his entire time to the
duties of his office and no member of the board shall hold any other
public office. Before entering upon the duties of his office, each of
said members of the board shall enter into a surety bond executed by a
surety company authorized to do business in this state, payable to the
state of Washington, to be approved by the governor in the penal sum of
fifty thousand dollars conditioned upon the faithful performance of his
duties, and shall take and subscribe to the oath of office prescribed
for elective state officers, which oath and bond shall be filed with
the secretary of state. The premium for said bond shall be paid by the
board.))

Sec. 5 RCW 66.08.016 and 1961 c 1 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((board)) director may employ such ((number of employees as in
its judgment are required from time to time)) personnel as may be
necessary to perform the duties of this title and such other duties as
may be authorized by law. The director may delegate any power or duty
vested in him or her by this act or other law.

Sec. 6 RCW 66.08.020 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 202 are each amended to read as follows:
The administration of this title is vested in the ((liquor)) office
of alcohol beverage control ((board)), constituted under this title.

Sec. 7 RCW 66.08.022 and 1961 ex.s. c 6 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The attorney general shall be the general counsel of the ((liquor
control board)) office and he or she shall institute and prosecute all
actions and proceedings which may be necessary in the enforcement and
carrying out of the provisions of this chapter and this title ((66
RCW)).
((He)) The attorney general shall assign such assistants as may be
necessary to the exclusive duty of assisting the ((liquor control
board)) office in the enforcement of this title ((66 RCW)).

Sec. 8 RCW 66.08.024 and 1987 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state auditor shall audit the books, records, and affairs of
the ((board)) office annually. The ((board)) office may provide for
additional audits by certified public accountants. All such audits
shall be public records of the state. The payment of the audits
provided for in this section shall be paid as provided in RCW 66.08.026
for other administrative expenses.

Sec. 9 RCW 66.08.026 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 203 are each amended to read as follows:
Administrative expenses of the ((board)) office must be
appropriated and paid from the liquor revolving fund. These
administrative expenses include, but are not ((be)) limited to: The
salaries and expenses of the ((board)) office and its employees, legal
services, pilot projects, annual or other audits, and other general
costs of conducting the business of the ((board)) office. The
administrative expenses do not include those amounts distributed
pursuant to RCW 66.08.180, 66.08.190, 66.08.200, or 66.08.210. Agency
commissions for contract liquor stores must be established by the
((liquor control board)) office after consultation with and approval by
the director of the office of financial management. All expenditures
and payment of obligations authorized by this section are subject to
the allotment requirements of chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 10 RCW 66.08.030 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 204 are each amended to read as follows:
The power of the ((board)) office to make regulations under chapter
34.05 RCW extends to:
(1) Prescribing the duties of the employees of the ((board))
office, and regulating their conduct in the discharge of their duties;
(2) Prescribing an official seal and official labels and stamps and
determining the manner in which they must be attached to every package
of liquor sold or sealed under this title, including the prescribing of
different official seals or different official labels for different
classes of liquor;
(3) Prescribing forms to be used for purposes of this title or the
regulations, and the terms and conditions to be contained in permits
and licenses issued under this title, and the qualifications for
receiving a permit or license issued under this title, including a
criminal history record information check. The ((board)) office may
submit the criminal history record information check to the Washington
state patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau
of investigation in order that these agencies may search their records
for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who
filled out the forms. The ((board)) office must require fingerprinting
of any applicant whose criminal history record information check is
submitted to the federal bureau of investigation;
(4) Prescribing the fees payable in respect of permits and licenses
issued under this title for which no fees are prescribed in this title,
and prescribing the fees for anything done or permitted to be done
under the regulations;
(5) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor which may be
kept on hand by the holder of a special permit for the purposes named
in the permit, regulating the manner in which the same is kept and
disposed of, and providing for the inspection of the same at any time
at the instance of the ((board)) office;
(6) Regulating the sale of liquor kept by the holders of licenses
which entitle the holder to purchase and keep liquor for sale;
(7) Prescribing the records of purchases or sales of liquor kept by
the holders of licenses, and the reports to be made thereon to the
((board)) office, and providing for inspection of the records so kept;
(8) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor for which a
prescription may be given, and the number of prescriptions which may be
given to the same patient within a stated period;
(9) Prescribing the manner of giving and serving notices required
by this title or the regulations, where not otherwise provided for in
this title;
(10) Regulating premises in which liquor is kept for export from
the state, or from which liquor is exported, prescribing the books and
records to be kept therein and the reports to be made thereon to the
((board)) office, and providing for the inspection of the premises and
the books, records and the liquor so kept;
(11) Prescribing the conditions and qualifications requisite for
the obtaining of club licenses and the books and records to be kept and
the returns to be made by clubs, prescribing the manner of licensing
clubs in any municipality or other locality, and providing for the
inspection of clubs;
(12) Prescribing the conditions, accommodations, and qualifications
requisite for the obtaining of licenses to sell beer, wines, and
spirits, and regulating the sale of beer, wines, and spirits
thereunder;
(13) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when, and the
manner, methods and means by which manufacturers must deliver liquor
within the state; and the time and periods when, and the manner,
methods and means by which liquor may lawfully be conveyed or carried
within the state;
(14) Providing for the making of returns by brewers of their sales
of beer shipped within the state, or from the state, showing the gross
amount of such sales and providing for the inspection of brewers' books
and records, and for the checking of the accuracy of any such returns;
(15) Providing for the making of returns by the wholesalers of beer
whose breweries are located beyond the boundaries of the state;
(16) Providing for the making of returns by any other liquor
manufacturers, showing the gross amount of liquor produced or
purchased, the amount sold within and exported from the state, and to
whom so sold or exported, and providing for the inspection of the
premises of any such liquor manufacturers, their books and records, and
for the checking of any such return;
(17) Providing for the giving of fidelity bonds by any or all of
the employees of the ((board)) office. However, the premiums therefor
must be paid by the ((board)) office;
(18) Providing for the shipment of liquor to any person holding a
permit and residing in any unit which has, by election pursuant to this
title, prohibited the sale of liquor therein;
(19) Prescribing methods of manufacture, conditions of sanitation,
standards of ingredients, quality and identity of alcoholic beverages
manufactured, sold, bottled, or handled by licensees and the ((board))
office; and conducting from time to time, in the interest of the public
health and general welfare, scientific studies and research relating to
alcoholic beverages and the use and effect thereof;
(20) Seizing, confiscating and destroying all alcoholic beverages
manufactured, sold or offered for sale within this state which do not
conform in all respects to the standards prescribed by this title or
the regulations of the ((board)) office. However, nothing herein
contained may be construed as authorizing the ((liquor board)) office
to prescribe, alter, limit or in any way change the present law as to
the quantity or percentage of alcohol used in the manufacturing of wine
or other alcoholic beverages.

Sec. 11 RCW 66.08.050 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 107 are each amended to read as follows:
The ((board)) office, subject to the provisions of this title and
the rules, must:
(1) Determine the nature, form and capacity of all packages to be
used for containing liquor kept for sale under this title;
(2) Execute or cause to be executed, all contracts, papers, and
documents in the name of the ((board)) office, under such regulations
as the ((board)) office may fix;
(3) Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges and obligations
whatsoever relating to the business of the ((board)) office;
(4) Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of the
((board)) office, and to determine the amount of fidelity bond of each
such employee;
(5) Perform services for the state lottery commission to such
extent, and for such compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon
between the ((board)) office and the commission;
(6) Accept and deposit into the general fund-local account and
disburse, subject to appropriation, federal grants or other funds or
donations from any source for the purpose of improving public awareness
of the health risks associated with alcohol consumption by youth and
the abuse of alcohol by adults in Washington state. The ((board's))
office's alcohol awareness program must cooperate with federal and
state agencies, interested organizations, and individuals to effect an
active public beverage alcohol awareness program;
(7) Perform all other matters and things, whether similar to the
foregoing or not, to carry out the provisions of this title, and has
full power to do each and every act necessary to the conduct of its
regulatory functions, including all supplies procurement, preparation
and approval of forms, and every other undertaking necessary to perform
its regulatory functions whatsoever, subject only to audit by the state
auditor. However, the ((board)) office has no authority to regulate
the content of spoken language on licensed premises where wine and
other liquors are served and where there is not a clear and present
danger of disorderly conduct being provoked by such language or to
restrict advertising of lawful prices.

Sec. 12 RCW 66.08.0501 and 1997 c 321 s 56 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((liquor control board)) office may adopt appropriate rules
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW for the purpose of carrying out the
provisions of chapter 321, Laws of 1997.

Sec. 13 RCW 66.08.055 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 80 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every ((member of the board, and every)) employee authorized by the
((board)) office to issue permits under this title may administer any
oath and take and receive any affidavit or declaration required under
this title or the regulations.

Sec. 14 RCW 66.08.060 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 108 are each amended to read as follows:
The ((board)) office has power to adopt any and all reasonable
rules as to the kind, character, and location of advertising of liquor.

Sec. 15 RCW 66.08.080 and 1994 c 154 s 313 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided by chapter 42.52 RCW, no ((member of the board
and no)) employee of the ((board)) office shall have any interest,
directly or indirectly, in the manufacture of liquor or in any liquor
sold under this title, or derive any profit or remuneration from the
sale of liquor, other than the salary or wages payable to him or her in
respect of his or her office or position, and shall receive no gratuity
from any person in connection with such business.

Sec. 16 RCW 66.08.090 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 31 are each amended
to read as follows:
No employee shall sell liquor in any other place, nor at any other
time, nor otherwise than as authorized by the ((board)) office under
this title and the regulations.

Sec. 17 RCW 66.08.095 and 1993 c 26 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((liquor control board)) office may provide liquor at no
charge, including liquor forfeited under chapter 66.32 RCW, to
recognized law enforcement agencies within the state when the law
enforcement agency will be using the liquor for bona fide law
enforcement training or investigation purposes.

Sec. 18 RCW 66.08.100 and 1935 c 174 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
No court of the state of Washington other than the superior court
of Thurston county shall have jurisdiction over any action or
proceeding against the ((board or any member thereof)) office for
anything done or omitted to be done in or arising out of the
performance of ((his or their)) the office's duties under this title.
Neither the liquor control board nor any member or members thereof
shall be personally liable in any action at law for damages sustained
by any person because of any acts performed or done or omitted to be
done by the board or any employee of the board in the performance of
his or her duties and in the administration of this title.

Sec. 19 RCW 66.08.120 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 29 are each amended
to read as follows:
No municipality or county shall have power to license the sale of,
or impose an excise tax upon, liquor as defined in this title, or to
license the sale or distribution thereof in any manner; and any power
now conferred by law on any municipality or county to license premises
which may be licensed under this section, or to impose an excise tax
upon liquor, or to license the sale and distribution thereof, as
defined in this title, shall be suspended and shall be of no further
effect: PROVIDED, That municipalities and counties shall have power to
adopt police ordinances and regulations not in conflict with this title
or with the regulations made by the ((board)) office.

Sec. 20 RCW 66.08.130 and 1981 1st ex.s. c 5 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
For the purpose of obtaining information concerning any matter
relating to the administration or enforcement of this title, the
((board)) office, or any person appointed by it in writing for the
purpose, may inspect the books and records of
(1) Any manufacturer;
(2) Any license holder;
(3) Any drug store holding a permit to sell on prescriptions;
(4) The freight and express books and records and all waybills,
bills of lading, receipts and documents in the possession of any common
carrier doing business within the state, containing any information or
record relating to any goods shipped or carried, or consigned or
received for shipment or carriage within the state. Every
manufacturer, license holder, drug store holding a permit to sell on
prescriptions, and common carrier, and every owner or officer or
employee of the foregoing, who neglects or refuses to produce and
submit for inspection any book, record or document referred to in this
section when requested to do so by the ((board)) office or by a person
so appointed by it shall be guilty of a violation of this title.

Sec. 21 RCW 66.08.140 and 1945 c 48 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of obtaining information concerning any matter
relating to the administration or enforcement of this title, the
((board)) office, or any person appointed by it in writing for the
purpose, may inspect the books, documents and records of any person
lending money to or in any manner financing any license, holder or
applicant for license insofar as such books, documents and/or records
pertain to the financial transaction involved. Every person who
neglects or refuses to produce and submit for inspection any book,
record or document as required by this section when requested to do so
by the ((board)) office or by a person duly appointed by it shall be
guilty of a violation of this title.

Sec. 22 RCW 66.08.145 and 2007 c 221 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((liquor control board)) office may issue subpoenas in
connection with any investigation, hearing, or proceeding for the
production of books, records, and documents held under this chapter or
chapters 70.155, 70.158, 82.24, and 82.26 RCW, and books and records of
common carriers as defined in RCW 81.80.010, or vehicle rental agencies
relating to the transportation or possession of cigarettes or other
tobacco products.
(2) The ((liquor control board)) office may designate individuals
authorized to sign subpoenas.
(3) If any person is served a subpoena from the ((board)) office
for the production of records, documents, and books, and fails or
refuses to obey the subpoena for the production of records, documents,
and books when required to do so, the person is subject to proceedings
for contempt, and the ((board)) office may institute contempt of court
proceedings in the superior court of Thurston county or in the county
in which the person resides.

Sec. 23 RCW 66.08.150 and 2007 c 370 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The action, order, or decision of the ((board)) office as to any
denial of an application for the reissuance of a permit or license or
as to any revocation, suspension, or modification of any permit or
license shall be an adjudicative proceeding and subject to the
applicable provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(1) An opportunity for a hearing may be provided an applicant for
the reissuance of a permit or license prior to the disposition of the
application, and if no such opportunity for a prior hearing is provided
then an opportunity for a hearing to reconsider the application must be
provided the applicant.
(2) An opportunity for a hearing must be provided a permittee or
licensee prior to a revocation or modification of any permit or license
and, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, prior to the
suspension of any permit or license.
(3) No hearing shall be required until demanded by the applicant,
permittee, or licensee.
(4) The ((board)) office may summarily suspend a license or permit
for a period of up to one hundred eighty days without a prior hearing
if it finds that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively require
emergency action, and it incorporates a finding to that effect in its
order. Proceedings for revocation or other action must be promptly
instituted and determined. An administrative law judge may extend the
summary suspension period for up to one calendar year in the event the
proceedings for revocation or other action cannot be completed during
the initial one hundred eighty day period due to actions by the
licensee or permittee. The ((board's)) office's enforcement division
shall complete a preliminary staff investigation of the violation
before requesting an emergency suspension by the ((board)) office.

Sec. 24 RCW 66.08.170 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 959 are each
amended to read as follows:
There shall be a fund, known as the "liquor revolving fund", which
shall consist of all license fees, permit fees, penalties, forfeitures,
and all other moneys, income, or revenue received by the ((board))
office. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All
moneys received by the ((board)) office or any employee thereof, except
for change funds and an amount of petty cash as fixed by the ((board))
office within the authority of law shall be deposited each day in a
depository approved by the state treasurer and transferred to the state
treasurer to be credited to the liquor revolving fund. ((During the
2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer funds from the
liquor revolving account [fund] to the state general fund and may
direct an additional amount of liquor profits to be distributed to
local governments. Neither the transfer of funds nor the additional
distribution of liquor profits to local governments during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium may reduce the excess fund distributions that
otherwise would occur under RCW 66.08.190.)) During the 2011-2013
fiscal biennium, the state treasurer shall transfer from the liquor
revolving fund to the state general fund forty-two million five hundred
thousand dollars for fiscal year 2012 and forty-two million five
hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 2013. The transfer during the
2011-2013 fiscal biennium may not reduce the excess fund distributions
that otherwise would occur under RCW 66.08.190. Sales to licensees are
exempt from any liquor price increases that may result from the
transfer of funds from the liquor revolving fund to the state general
fund during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium. Disbursements from the
revolving fund shall be on authorization of the ((board)) office or a
duly authorized representative thereof. In order to maintain an
effective expenditure and revenue control the liquor revolving fund
shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no
appropriation shall be required to permit expenditures and payment of
obligations from such fund.

Sec. 25 RCW 66.08.180 and 2011 c 325 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 66.24.290(1), moneys in the liquor
revolving fund shall be distributed by the ((board)) office at least
once every three months in accordance with RCW 66.08.190, 66.08.200 and
66.08.210. However, the ((board)) office shall reserve from
distribution such amount not exceeding five hundred thousand dollars as
may be necessary for the proper administration of this title.
(1) All license fees, penalties, and forfeitures derived under
chapter 13, Laws of 1935 from spirits, beer, and wine restaurant;
spirits, beer, and wine private club; hotel; spirits, beer, and wine
nightclub; spirits, beer, and wine VIP airport lounge; and sports
entertainment facility licenses shall every three months be disbursed
by the ((board)) office as follows:
(a) Three hundred thousand dollars per biennium, to the death
investigations account for the state toxicology program pursuant to RCW
68.50.107; and
(b) Of the remaining funds:
(i) 6.06 percent to the University of Washington and 4.04 percent
to Washington State University for alcoholism and drug abuse research
and for the dissemination of such research; and
(ii) 89.9 percent to the general fund to be used by the department
of social and health services solely to carry out the purposes of RCW
70.96A.050;
(2) The first fifty-five dollars per license fee provided in RCW
66.24.320 and 66.24.330 up to a maximum of one hundred fifty thousand
dollars annually shall be disbursed every three months by the ((board))
office to the general fund to be used for juvenile alcohol and drug
prevention programs for kindergarten through third grade to be
administered by the superintendent of public instruction;
(3) Twenty percent of the remaining total amount derived from
license fees pursuant to RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, and
66.24.360, shall be transferred to the general fund to be used by the
department of social and health services solely to carry out the
purposes of RCW 70.96A.050; and
(4) One-fourth cent per liter of the tax imposed by RCW 66.24.210
shall every three months be disbursed by the ((board)) office to
Washington State University solely for wine and wine grape research,
extension programs related to wine and wine grape research, and
resident instruction in both wine grape production and the processing
aspects of the wine industry in accordance with RCW 28B.30.068. The
director of financial management shall prescribe suitable accounting
procedures to ensure that the funds transferred to the general fund to
be used by the department of social and health services and
appropriated are separately accounted for.

Sec. 26 RCW 66.08.230 and 1987 c 452 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
To provide for the operation of the wine commission prior to its
first quarterly disbursement, the ((liquor control board)) office
shall, on July 1, 1987, disburse one hundred ten thousand dollars to
the wine commission. However, such disbursement shall be repaid to the
((liquor control board)) office by a reduction from the quarterly
disbursements to the wine commission under RCW 66.24.210 of twenty-seven thousand five hundred dollars each quarter until such amount is
repaid. These funds shall be used to establish the Washington wine
commission and the other purposes delineated in chapter 15.88 RCW.

Sec. 27 RCW 66.12.020 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 48 are each amended
to read as follows:
Nothing in this title shall apply to or prevent the sale of liquor
by any person to the ((board)) office.

Sec. 28 RCW 66.12.030 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 49 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Nothing in this title shall prevent any person licensed to
manufacture liquor from keeping liquor in his or her warehouse or place
of business.
(2) Nothing in this title shall prevent the transshipment of liquor
in interstate and foreign commerce; but no person shall import liquor
into the state from any other state or country, except, as herein
otherwise provided, for use or sale in the state, except the ((board))
office.
(3) Every provision of this title which may affect transactions in
liquor between a person in this state and a person in another state or
in a foreign country shall be construed to affect such transactions so
far only as the legislature has power to make laws in relation thereto.

Sec. 29 RCW 66.12.070 and 1999 c 88 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Where a medicinal preparation contains liquor as one of the
necessary ingredients thereof, and also contains sufficient medication
to prevent its use as an alcoholic beverage, nothing in this title
shall apply to or prevent its composition or sale by a druggist when
compounded from liquor purchased by the druggist under a special permit
held by him or her, nor apply to or prevent the purchase or consumption
of the preparation by any person for strictly medicinal purposes.
(2) Where a toilet or culinary preparation, that is to say, any
perfume, lotion, or flavoring extract or essence, or dietary supplement
as defined by the federal food and drug administration, contains liquor
and also contains sufficient ingredient or medication to prevent its
use as a beverage, nothing in this title shall apply to or prevent the
sale or purchase of that preparation by any druggist or other person
who manufactures or deals in the preparation, nor apply to or prevent
the purchase or consumption of the preparation by any person who
purchases or consumes it for any toilet or culinary purpose.
(3) In order to determine whether any particular medicinal, toilet,
dietary supplement, or culinary preparation referred to in this section
contains sufficient ingredient or medication to prevent its use as an
alcoholic beverage, the ((board)) office may cause a sample of the
preparation, purchased or obtained from any person whomsoever, to be
analyzed by an analyst appointed or designated by the ((board)) office;
and if it appears from a certificate signed by the analyst that he or
she finds the sample so analyzed by him or her did not contain
sufficient ingredient or medication to prevent its use as an alcoholic
beverage, the certificate shall be conclusive evidence that the
preparation, the sample of which was so analyzed, is not a preparation
the sale or purchase of which is permitted by this section.
(4) Dietary supplements that contain more than one-half of one
percent alcohol which are prepared and sold under this section shall be
clearly labeled and the ingredients listed on the label in accordance
with the provisions of the federal food, drug, and cosmetics act (21
U.S.C. Sec. 321) as now or hereafter amended.

Sec. 30 RCW 66.12.110 and 1999 c 281 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person twenty-one years of age or over may bring into the state
from without the United States, free of tax and markup, for his or her
personal or household use such alcoholic beverages as have been
declared and permitted to enter the United States duty free under
federal law.
Such entry of alcoholic beverages in excess of that herein provided
may be authorized by the ((board)) office upon payment of an equivalent
markup and tax as would be applicable to the purchase of the same or
similar liquor at retail from a Washington state liquor store. The
((board)) office shall adopt appropriate regulations pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of
this section. The ((board)) office may issue a spirits, beer, and wine
private club license to a charitable or nonprofit corporation of the
state of Washington, the majority of the officers and directors of
which are United States citizens and the minority of the officers and
directors of which are citizens of the Dominion of Canada, and where
the location of the premises for such spirits, beer, and wine private
club license is not more than ten miles south of the border between the
United States and the province of British Columbia.

Sec. 31 RCW 66.12.120 and 1995 c 100 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of this title ((66 RCW)), a
person twenty-one years of age or over may, free of tax and markup, for
personal or household use, bring into the state of Washington from
another state no more than once per calendar month up to two liters of
spirits or wine or two hundred eighty-eight ounces of beer.
Additionally, such person may be authorized by the ((board)) office to
bring into the state of Washington from another state a reasonable
amount of alcoholic beverages in excess of that provided in this
section for personal or household use only upon payment of an
equivalent markup and tax as would be applicable to the purchase of the
same or similar liquor at retail from a state liquor store. The
((board)) office shall adopt appropriate regulations pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW for the purpose of carrying into effect the
provisions of this section.

Sec. 32 RCW 66.12.140 and 1982 c 85 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing in this title shall prevent the use of beer, wine,
and/or spirituous liquor, for cooking purposes only, in conjunction
with a culinary or restaurant course offered by a college, university,
community college, area vocational technical institute, or private
vocational school. Further, nothing in this title shall prohibit the
making of beer or wine in food fermentation courses offered by a
college, university, community college, area vocational technical
institute, or private vocational school.
(2) "Culinary or restaurant course" as used in this section means
a course of instruction which includes practical experience in food
preparation under the supervision of an instructor who is twenty-one
years of age or older.
(3) Persons under twenty-one years of age participating in culinary
or restaurant courses may handle beer, wine, or spirituous liquor for
purposes of participating in the courses, but nothing in this section
shall be construed to authorize consumption of liquor by persons under
twenty-one years of age or to authorize possession of liquor by persons
under twenty-one years of age at any time or place other than while
preparing food under the supervision of the course instructor.
(4) Beer, wine, and/or spirituous liquor to be used in culinary or
restaurant courses shall be purchased at retail from the ((board))
office or a retailer licensed under this title. All such liquor shall
be securely stored in the food preparation area and shall not be
displayed in an area open to the general public.
(5) Colleges, universities, community colleges, area vocational
technical institutes, and private vocational schools shall obtain the
prior written approval of the ((board)) office for use of beer, wine,
and/or spirituous liquor for cooking purposes in their culinary or
restaurant courses.

Sec. 33 RCW 66.16.090 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 89 are each amended
to read as follows:
All records whatsoever of the ((board)) office showing purchases by
any individual of liquor shall be deemed confidential, and, except
subject to audit by the state auditor, shall not be permitted to be
inspected by any person whatsoever, except by employees of the
((board)) office to the extent permitted by the regulations; and no
((member)) employee of the ((board and no employee whatsoever)) office
shall give out any information concerning such records and neither such
records nor any information relative thereto which shall make known the
name of any individual purchaser shall be competent to be admitted as
evidence in any court or courts except in prosecutions for illegal
possession of and/or sale of liquor. Any person violating the
provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 34 RCW 66.20.010 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 109 are each amended to read as follows:
Upon application in the prescribed form being made to any employee
authorized by the ((board)) office to issue permits, accompanied by
payment of the prescribed fee, and upon the employee being satisfied
that the applicant should be granted a permit under this title, the
employee must issue to the applicant under such regulations and at such
fee as may be prescribed by the ((board)) office a permit of the class
applied for, as follows:
(1) Where the application is for a special permit by a physician or
dentist, or by any person in charge of an institution regularly
conducted as a hospital or sanitorium for the care of persons in ill
health, or as a home devoted exclusively to the care of aged people, a
special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the
requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection
pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);
(2) Where the application is for a special permit by a person
engaged within the state in mechanical or manufacturing business or in
scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use therein, or by any
private individual, a special permit to purchase alcohol for the
purpose named in the permit, except that the governor may waive the
requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection
pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);
(3) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor
at a banquet, at a specified date and place, a special permit to
purchase liquor for consumption at such banquet, to such applicants as
may be fixed by the ((board)) office;
(4) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor
on the premises of a business not licensed under this title, a special
permit to purchase liquor for consumption thereon for such periods of
time and to such applicants as may be fixed by the ((board)) office;
(5) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer
to import or purchase within the state alcohol, malt, and other
materials containing alcohol to be used in the manufacture of liquor,
or other products, a special permit;
(6) Where the application is for a special permit by a person
operating a drug store to purchase liquor at retail prices only, to be
thereafter sold by such person on the prescription of a physician, a
special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the
requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection
pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);
(7) Where the application is for a special permit by an authorized
representative of a military installation operated by or for any of the
armed forces within the geographical boundaries of the state of
Washington, a special permit to purchase liquor for use on such
military installation;
(8) Where the application is for a special permit by a vendor that
manufactures or sells a product which cannot be effectively presented
to potential buyers without serving it with liquor or by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at a convention of
a trade association composed of licensees of the ((board)) office, when
the said liquor is served in a hospitality room or from a booth in a
((board)) office-approved suppliers' display room at the convention,
and when the liquor so served is for consumption in the said
hospitality room or display room during the convention, anything in
this title to the contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor
must be purchased from a spirits retailer or distributor, and any such
liquor is subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
(9) Where the application is for a special permit by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
donate liquor for a reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner for
delegates and guests at a convention of a trade association composed of
licensees of the ((board)) office, when the liquor so donated is for
consumption at the said reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner
during the convention, anything in this title to the contrary
notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a
spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the
taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
(10) Where the application is for a special permit by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
donate and/or serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at an
international trade fair, show, or exposition held under the auspices
of a federal, state, or local governmental entity or organized and
promoted by a nonprofit organization, anything in this title to the
contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased
from a liquor spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is
subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
(11) Where the application is for an annual special permit by a
person operating a bed and breakfast lodging facility to donate or
serve wine or beer without charge to overnight guests of the facility
if the wine or beer is for consumption on the premises of the facility.
"Bed and breakfast lodging facility," as used in this subsection, means
a facility offering from one to eight lodging units and breakfast to
travelers and guests.

Sec. 35 RCW 66.20.020 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Every permit shall be issued in the name of the applicant
therefor, and no permit shall be transferable, nor shall the holder of
any permit allow any other person to use the permit.
(2) No person shall apply in any false or fictitious name for the
issuance to him or her of a permit, and no person shall furnish a false
or fictitious address in his or her application for a permit.
(3) Nothing in this title shall be construed as limiting the right
of any minister, priest or rabbi, or religious organization from
obtaining wine for sacramental purposes directly from any source
whatsoever, whether from within the limits of the state of Washington
or from outside the state; nor shall any fee be charged, directly or
indirectly, for the exercise of this right. The ((board)) office shall
have the power and authority to make reasonable rules and regulations
concerning the importing of any such liquor or wine, for the purpose of
preventing any unlawful use of such right.

Sec. 36 RCW 66.20.070 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 17 are each amended
to read as follows:
Where the holder of any permit issued under this title violates any
provision of this title or of the regulations, or is an interdicted
person, or is otherwise disqualified from holding a permit, the
((board)) office, upon proof to its satisfaction of the fact or
existence of such violation, interdiction, or disqualification, and in
its discretion, may with or without any hearing, suspend the permit and
all rights of the holder thereunder for such period as the ((board))
office sees fit, or may cancel the permit.

Sec. 37 RCW 66.20.080 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 18 are each amended
to read as follows:
Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of his or
her permit, the holder of the permit shall forthwith deliver up the
permit to the ((board)) office. Where the permit has been suspended
only, the ((board)) office shall return the permit to the holder at the
expiration or termination of the period of suspension. Where the
permit has been suspended or canceled, no employee shall knowingly
issue to the person whose permit is suspended or canceled a permit
under this title until the end of the period of suspension or within
the period of one year from the date of cancellation.

Sec. 38 RCW 66.20.085 and 1997 c 58 s 861 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((board)) office shall immediately suspend the license of a
person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the
department of social and health services as a person who is not in
compliance with a support order or a residential or visitation order.
If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for
reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license shall be
automatic upon the ((board's)) office's receipt of a release issued by
the department of social and health services stating that the licensee
is in compliance with the order.

Sec. 39 RCW 66.20.090 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 19 are each amended
to read as follows:
Where any permit is presented to an employee by a person who is not
the holder of the permit, or where any permit which is suspended or
canceled is presented to an employee, the employee shall retain the
permit in his or her custody and shall forthwith notify the ((board))
office of the fact of its retention.

Sec. 40 RCW 66.20.160 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 110 are each amended to read as follows:
As used in RCW 66.20.160 through 66.20.210, inclusive, "licensee"
means the holder of a retail liquor license issued by the ((board))
office, and includes any employee or agent of the licensee.

Sec. 41 RCW 66.20.170 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 209 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
A card of identification may for the purpose of this title and for
the purpose of procuring liquor, be accepted as an identification card
by any licensee or store employee and as evidence of legal age of the
person presenting such card, provided the licensee or store employee
complies with the conditions and procedures prescribed herein and such
regulations as may be made by the ((board)) office.

Sec. 42 RCW 66.20.180 and 2005 c 151 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
A card of identification shall be presented by the holder thereof
upon request of any licensee, store employee, contract liquor store
manager, contract liquor store employee, peace officer, or enforcement
officer of the ((board)) office for the purpose of aiding the licensee,
store employee, contract liquor store manager, contract liquor store
employee, peace officer, or enforcement officer of the ((board)) office
to determine whether or not such person is of legal age to purchase
liquor when such person desires to procure liquor from a licensed
establishment or state liquor store or contract liquor store.

Sec. 43 RCW 66.20.190 and 1981 1st ex.s. c 5 s 9 are each amended
to read as follows:
In addition to the presentation by the holder and verification by
the licensee or store employee of such card of identification, the
licensee or store employee who is still in doubt about the true age of
the holder shall require the person whose age may be in question to
sign a certification card and record an accurate description and serial
number of his or her card of identification thereon. Such statement
shall be upon a five-inch by eight-inch file card, which card shall be
filed alphabetically by the licensee or store employee at or before the
close of business on the day on which the statement is executed, in the
file box containing a suitable alphabetical index and the card shall be
subject to examination by any peace officer or agent or employee of the
((board)) office at all times. The certification card shall also
contain in bold-face type a statement stating that the signer
understands that conviction for unlawful purchase of alcoholic
beverages or misuse of the certification card may result in criminal
penalties including imprisonment or fine or both.

Sec. 44 RCW 66.20.200 and 2003 c 53 s 295 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for the owner of a card of identification
to transfer the card to any other person for the purpose of aiding such
person to procure alcoholic beverages from any licensee or store
employee. Any person who shall permit his or her card of
identification to be used by another or transfer such card to another
for the purpose of aiding such transferee to obtain alcoholic beverages
from a licensee or store employee or gain admission to a premises or
portion of a premises classified by the ((board)) office as off-limits
to persons under twenty-one years of age, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a
minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars shall be imposed and any
sentence requiring community restitution shall require not fewer than
twenty-five hours of community restitution.
(2) Any person not entitled thereto who unlawfully procures or has
issued or transferred to him or her a card of identification, and any
person who possesses a card of identification not issued to him or her,
and any person who makes any false statement on any certification card
required by RCW 66.20.190, to be signed by him or her, shall be guilty
of a misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that
a minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars shall be imposed and any
sentence requiring community restitution shall require not fewer than
twenty-five hours of community restitution.

Sec. 45 RCW 66.20.210 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 209 s 9 are each
amended to read as follows:
No licensee or the agent or employee of the licensee, or store
employee, shall be prosecuted criminally or be sued in any civil action
for serving liquor to a person under legal age to purchase liquor if
such person has presented a card of identification in accordance with
RCW 66.20.180, and has signed a certification card as provided in RCW
66.20.190.
Such card in the possession of a licensee may be offered as a
defense in any hearing held by the ((board)) office for serving liquor
to the person who signed the card and may be considered by the
((board)) office as evidence that the licensee acted in good faith.

Sec. 46 RCW 66.20.300 and 2011 c 325 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 66.20.310 through 66.20.350.
(1) "Alcohol" has the same meaning as "liquor" in RCW 66.04.010.
(2) "Alcohol server" means any person who as part of his or her
employment participates in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages
for on-premise consumption at a retail licensed premise as a regular
requirement of his or her employment, and includes those persons
eighteen years of age or older permitted by the liquor laws of this
state to serve alcoholic beverages with meals.
(3) (("Board")) "Office" means the Washington state ((liquor))
office of alcohol beverage control ((board)).
(4) "Training entity" means any liquor licensee associations,
independent contractors, private persons, and private or public
schools, that have been certified by the ((board)) office.
(5) "Retail licensed premises" means any:
(a) Premises licensed to sell alcohol by the glass or by the drink,
or in original containers primarily for consumption on the premises as
authorized by RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, 66.24.400,
66.24.425, 66.24.450, 66.24.570, and 66.24.610;
(b) Distillery licensed pursuant to RCW 66.24.140 that is
authorized to serve samples of its own production;
(c) Facility established by a domestic winery for serving and
selling wine pursuant to RCW 66.24.170(4); and
(d) Grocery store licensed under RCW 66.24.360, but only with
respect to employees whose duties include serving during tasting
activities under RCW 66.24.363.

Sec. 47 RCW 66.20.310 and 2011 c 325 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) There shall be an alcohol server permit, known as a class 12
permit, for a manager or bartender selling or mixing alcohol, spirits,
wines, or beer for consumption at an on-premises licensed facility.
(b) There shall be an alcohol server permit, known as a class 13
permit, for a person who only serves alcohol, spirits, wines, or beer
for consumption at an on-premises licensed facility.
(c) As provided by rule by the ((board)) office, a class 13 permit
holder may be allowed to act as a bartender without holding a class 12
permit.
(2)(a) Effective January 1, 1997, except as provided in (d) of this
subsection, every alcohol server employed, under contract or otherwise,
at a retail licensed premise shall be issued a class 12 or class 13
permit.
(b) Every class 12 and class 13 permit issued shall be issued in
the name of the applicant and no other person may use the permit of
another permit holder. The holder shall present the permit upon
request to inspection by a representative of the ((board)) office or a
peace officer. The class 12 or class 13 permit shall be valid for
employment at any retail licensed premises described in (a) of this
subsection.
(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, no licensee
holding a license as authorized by RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350,
66.24.400, 66.24.425, 66.24.450, 66.24.570, 66.24.600, and 66.24.610
may employ or accept the services of any person without the person
first having a valid class 12 or class 13 permit.
(d) Within sixty days of initial employment, every person whose
duties include the compounding, sale, service, or handling of liquor
shall have a class 12 or class 13 permit.
(e) No person may perform duties that include the sale or service
of alcoholic beverages on a retail licensed premises without possessing
a valid alcohol server permit.
(3) A permit issued by a training entity under this section is
valid for employment at any retail licensed premises described in
subsection (2)(a) of this section for a period of five years unless
suspended by the ((board)) office.
(4) The ((board)) office may suspend or revoke an existing permit
if any of the following occur:
(a) The applicant or permittee has been convicted of violating any
of the state or local intoxicating liquor laws of this state or has
been convicted at any time of a felony; or
(b) The permittee has performed or permitted any act that
constitutes a violation of this title or of any rule of the ((board))
office.
(5) The suspension or revocation of a permit under this section
does not relieve a licensee from responsibility for any act of the
employee or agent while employed upon the retail licensed premises.
The ((board)) office may, as appropriate, revoke or suspend either the
permit of the employee who committed the violation or the license of
the licensee upon whose premises the violation occurred, or both the
permit and the license.
(6)(a) After January 1, 1997, it is a violation of this title for
any retail licensee or agent of a retail licensee as described in
subsection (2)(a) of this section to employ in the sale or service of
alcoholic beverages, any person who does not have a valid alcohol
server permit or whose permit has been revoked, suspended, or denied.
(b) It is a violation of this title for a person whose alcohol
server permit has been denied, suspended, or revoked to accept
employment in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages.
(7) Grocery stores licensed under RCW 66.24.360, the primary
commercial activity of which is the sale of grocery products and for
which the sale and service of beer and wine for on-premises consumption
with food is incidental to the primary business, and employees of such
establishments, are exempt from RCW 66.20.300 through 66.20.350, except
for employees whose duties include serving during tasting activities
under RCW 66.24.363.

Sec. 48 RCW 66.20.320 and 1996 c 311 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((board)) office shall regulate a required alcohol server
education program that includes:
(a) Development of the curriculum and materials for the education
program;
(b) Examination and examination procedures;
(c) Certification procedures, enforcement policies, and penalties
for education program instructors and providers;
(d) The curriculum for an approved class 12 alcohol permit training
program that includes but is not limited to the following subjects:
(i) The physiological effects of alcohol including the effects of
alcohol in combination with drugs;
(ii) Liability and legal information;
(iii) Driving while intoxicated;
(iv) Intervention with the problem customer, including ways to stop
service, ways to deal with the belligerent customer, and alternative
means of transportation to get the customer safely home;
(v) Methods for checking proper identification of customers;
(vi) Nationally recognized programs, such as TAM (Techniques in
Alcohol Management) and TIPS (Training for Intervention Programs)
modified to include Washington laws and regulations.
(2) The ((board)) office shall provide the program through liquor
licensee associations, independent contractors, private persons,
private or public schools certified by the ((board)) office, or any
combination of such providers.
(3) Each training entity shall provide a class 12 permit to the
manager or bartender who has successfully completed a course the
((board)) office has certified. A list of the individuals receiving
the class 12 permit shall be forwarded to the ((board)) office on the
completion of each course given by the training entity.
(4) After January 1, 1997, the ((board)) office shall require all
alcohol servers applying for a class 13 alcohol server permit to view
a video training session. Retail liquor licensees shall fully
compensate employees for the time spent participating in this training
session.
(5) When requested by a retail liquor licensee, the ((board))
office shall provide copies of videotaped training programs that have
been produced by private vendors and make them available for a nominal
fee to cover the cost of purchasing and shipment, with the fees being
deposited in the liquor revolving fund for distribution to the
((board)) office as needed.
(6) Each training entity may provide the ((board)) office with a
video program of not less than one hour that covers the subjects in
subsection (1)(d)(i) through (v) of this section that will be made
available to a licensee for the training of a class 13 alcohol server.
(7) Applicants shall be given a class 13 permit upon the successful
completion of the program.
(8) A list of the individuals receiving the class 13 permit shall
be forwarded to the ((board)) office on the completion of each video
training program.
(9) The ((board)) office shall develop a model permit for the class
12 and 13 permits. The ((board)) office may provide such permits to
training entities or licensees for a nominal cost to cover production.
(10)(a) Persons who have completed a nationally recognized alcohol
management or intervention program since July 1, 1993, may be issued a
class 12 or 13 permit upon providing proof of completion of such
training to the ((board)) office.
(b) Persons who completed the ((board's)) office's alcohol server
training program after July 1, 1993, but before July 1, 1995, may be
issued a class 13 permit upon providing proof of completion of such
training to the ((board)) office.

Sec. 49 RCW 66.20.330 and 1995 c 51 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((board)) office shall adopt rules to implement RCW 66.20.300
through 66.20.350 including, but not limited to, procedures and grounds
for denying, suspending, or revoking permits.

Sec. 50 RCW 66.20.340 and 1995 c 51 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
A violation of any of the rules of the ((board)) office adopted to
implement RCW 66.20.300 through 66.20.350 is a misdemeanor, punishable
by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars for a first
offense. A subsequent offense is punishable by a fine of not more than
five hundred dollars, or imprisonment for not more than ninety days, or
both the fine and imprisonment.

Sec. 51 RCW 66.20.350 and 1995 c 51 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Fees collected by the ((board)) office under RCW 66.20.300 through
66.20.350 shall be deposited in the liquor revolving fund in accordance
with RCW 66.08.170.

Sec. 52 RCW 66.20.365 and 2006 c 49 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Before wine may be shipped by a domestic winery or an out-of-state
winery to a person who is a resident of Washington, the winery must:
(1) Obtain a wine shipper's permit under procedures prescribed by
the ((board)) office by rule and pay a fee established by the ((board))
office, if the winery is located outside the state; or
(2) Be licensed as a domestic winery by the ((board)) office and
have paid the annual license fee.

Sec. 53 RCW 66.20.370 and 2006 c 49 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant for a wine shipper's permit under RCW 66.20.365
must:
(a) Operate a winery located in the United States;
(b) Provide the ((board)) office a copy of its valid license to
manufacture wine issued by another state;
(c) Certify that it holds all state and federal licenses and
permits necessary to operate a winery; and
(d) Register with the department of revenue under RCW 82.32.030.
(2) Holders of a winery certificate of approval under RCW
66.24.206(1)(a) are deemed to hold a wine shipper's permit without
further application or fee, if the holder meets all requirements for a
wine shipper's permit. A winery certificate of approval holder who
wants to ship wine under its wine shipper's permit privilege must
notify the ((liquor control board)) office in a manner determined by
the ((board)) office before shipping any wine to a Washington consumer.
(3) Holders of a wine shipper's permit must:
(a) Pay the tax under RCW 66.24.210 for sales of wine to Washington
state residents; and
(b) Collect and remit to the department of revenue all applicable
state and local sales and use taxes imposed by or under the authority
of chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on all sales of wine delivered
to buyers in this state, regardless of whether the permit holder has a
physical presence in this state.

Sec. 54 RCW 66.20.380 and 2006 c 49 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A wine shipper's permit holder and a domestic winery must
report to the ((board)) office, on or before the twentieth day of each
month, all shipments of wine made during the preceding calendar month
directly to Washington consumers under a wine shipper's permit or a
domestic winery license in effect for all or any portion of the
preceding year. All reports will be on forms prescribed by the
((board)) office.
(2) A wine shipper's permit holder, a winery certificate of
approval holder, or domestic winery who advertises or offers wine for
direct shipment to customers within this state must clearly and
conspicuously display the permit or license number in its advertising.

Sec. 55 RCW 66.20.385 and 2006 c 49 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
A fee for a wine shipper's permit may be established by the
((board)) office.

Sec. 56 RCW 66.24.010 and 2011 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, and
the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license.
(2) For the purpose of considering any application for a license,
or the renewal of a license, the ((board)) office may cause an
inspection of the premises to be made, and may inquire into all matters
in connection with the construction and operation of the premises. For
the purpose of reviewing any application for a license and for
considering the denial, suspension, revocation, or renewal or denial
thereof, of any license, the ((liquor control board)) office may
consider any prior criminal conduct of the applicant including an
administrative violation history record with the ((board)) office and
a criminal history record information check. The ((board)) office may
submit the criminal history record information check to the Washington
state patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau
of investigation in order that these agencies may search their records
for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who
filled out the forms. The ((board)) office shall require
fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record
information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation.
The provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and of chapter 9.96A RCW shall not apply
to such cases. Subject to the provisions of this section, the
((board)) office may, in its discretion, grant or deny the renewal or
license applied for. Denial may be based on, without limitation, the
existence of chronic illegal activity documented in objections
submitted pursuant to subsections (8)(d) and (12) of this section.
Authority to approve an uncontested or unopposed license may be granted
by the ((board)) office to any staff member the ((board)) office
designates in writing. Conditions for granting such authority shall be
adopted by rule. No retail license of any kind may be issued to:
(a) A person doing business as a sole proprietor who has not
resided in the state for at least one month prior to receiving a
license, except in cases of licenses issued to dining places on
railroads, boats, or aircraft;
(b) A copartnership, unless all of the members thereof are
qualified to obtain a license, as provided in this section;
(c) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager or
agent, unless such manager or agent possesses the same qualifications
required of the licensee;
(d) A corporation or a limited liability company, unless it was
created under the laws of the state of Washington or holds a
certificate of authority to transact business in the state of
Washington.
(3)(a) The ((board)) office may, in its discretion, subject to the
provisions of RCW 66.08.150, suspend or cancel any license; and all
rights of the licensee to keep or sell liquor thereunder shall be
suspended or terminated, as the case may be.
(b) The ((board)) office shall immediately suspend the license or
certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW
74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person
who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has
continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the
suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic
upon the ((board's)) office's receipt of a release issued by the
department of social and health services stating that the licensee is
in compliance with the order.
(c) The ((board)) office may request the appointment of
administrative law judges under chapter 34.12 RCW who shall have power
to administer oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses
and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and
testimony, examine witnesses, and to receive testimony in any inquiry,
investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under
such rules and regulations as the ((board)) office may adopt.
(d) Witnesses shall be allowed fees and mileage each way to and
from any such inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding at the
rate authorized by RCW 34.05.446. Fees need not be paid in advance of
appearance of witnesses to testify or to produce books, records, or
other legal evidence.
(e) In case of disobedience of any person to comply with the order
of the ((board)) office or a subpoena issued by the ((board, or any of
its members,)) office or an administrative law judge((s)), or on the
refusal of a witness to testify to any matter regarding which he or she
may be lawfully interrogated, the judge of the superior court of the
county in which the person resides, on application of ((any member of))
the ((board)) office or an administrative law judge, shall compel
obedience by contempt proceedings, as in the case of disobedience of
the requirements of a subpoena issued from said court or a refusal to
testify therein.
(4) Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of a
license, the licensee shall forthwith deliver up the license to the
((board)) office. Where the license has been suspended only, the
((board)) office shall return the license to the licensee at the
expiration or termination of the period of suspension. The ((board))
office shall notify all vendors in the city or place where the licensee
has its premises of the suspension or cancellation of the license; and
no employee may allow or cause any liquor to be delivered to or for any
person at the premises of that licensee.
(5)(a) At the time of the original issuance of a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license, the ((board)) office shall prorate the license
fee charged to the new licensee according to the number of calendar
quarters, or portion thereof, remaining until the first renewal of that
license is required.
(b) Unless sooner canceled, every license issued by the ((board))
office shall expire at midnight of the thirtieth day of June of the
fiscal year for which it was issued. However, if the ((board)) office
deems it feasible and desirable to do so, it may establish, by rule
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, a system for staggering the annual
renewal dates for any and all licenses authorized by this chapter. If
such a system of staggered annual renewal dates is established by the
((board)) office, the license fees provided by this chapter shall be
appropriately prorated during the first year that the system is in
effect.
(6) Every license issued under this section shall be subject to all
conditions and restrictions imposed by this title or by rules adopted
by the ((board)) office. All conditions and restrictions imposed by
the ((board)) office in the issuance of an individual license may be
listed on the face of the individual license along with the trade name,
address, and expiration date. Conditions and restrictions imposed by
the ((board)) office may also be included in official correspondence
separate from the license.
(7) Every licensee shall post and keep posted its license, or
licenses, and any additional correspondence containing conditions and
restrictions imposed by the ((board)) office in a conspicuous place on
the premises.
(8)(a) Unless (b) of this subsection applies, before the ((board))
office issues a new or renewal license to an applicant it shall give
notice of such application to the chief executive officer of the
incorporated city or town, if the application is for a license within
an incorporated city or town, or to the county legislative authority,
if the application is for a license outside the boundaries of
incorporated cities or towns.
(b) If the application for a special occasion license is for an
event held during a county, district, or area fair as defined by RCW
15.76.120, and the county, district, or area fair is located on
property owned by the county but located within an incorporated city or
town, the county legislative authority shall be the entity notified by
the ((board)) office under (a) of this subsection. The ((board))
office shall send a duplicate notice to the incorporated city or town
within which the fair is located.
(c) The incorporated city or town through the official or employee
selected by it, or the county legislative authority or the official or
employee selected by it, shall have the right to file with the
((board)) office within twenty days after the date of transmittal of
such notice for applications, or at least thirty days prior to the
expiration date for renewals, written objections against the applicant
or against the premises for which the new or renewal license is asked.
The ((board)) office may extend the time period for submitting written
objections.
(d) The written objections shall include a statement of all facts
upon which such objections are based, and in case written objections
are filed, the city or town or county legislative authority may request
and the ((liquor control board)) office may in its discretion hold a
hearing subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If the
((board)) office makes an initial decision to deny a license or renewal
based on the written objections of an incorporated city or town or
county legislative authority, the applicant may request a hearing
subject to the applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If such a
hearing is held at the request of the applicant, ((liquor control
board)) office representatives shall present and defend the ((board's))
office's initial decision to deny a license or renewal.
(e) Upon the granting of a license under this title the ((board))
office shall send written notification to the chief executive officer
of the incorporated city or town in which the license is granted, or to
the county legislative authority if the license is granted outside the
boundaries of incorporated cities or towns. When the license is for a
special occasion license for an event held during a county, district,
or area fair as defined by RCW 15.76.120, and the county, district, or
area fair is located on county-owned property but located within an
incorporated city or town, the written notification shall be sent to
both the incorporated city or town and the county legislative
authority.
(9)(a) Before the ((board)) office issues any license to any
applicant, it shall give (i) due consideration to the location of the
business to be conducted under such license with respect to the
proximity of churches, schools, and public institutions and (ii)
written notice, with receipt verification, of the application to public
institutions identified by the ((board)) office as appropriate to
receive such notice, churches, and schools within five hundred feet of
the premises to be licensed. The ((board)) office shall not issue a
liquor license for either on-premises or off-premises consumption
covering any premises not now licensed, if such premises are within
five hundred feet of the premises of any tax-supported public
elementary or secondary school measured along the most direct route
over or across established public walks, streets, or other public
passageway from the main entrance of the school to the nearest public
entrance of the premises proposed for license, and if, after receipt by
the school of the notice as provided in this subsection, the ((board))
office receives written objection, within twenty days after receiving
such notice, from an official representative or representatives of the
school within five hundred feet of said proposed licensed premises,
indicating to the ((board)) office that there is an objection to the
issuance of such license because of proximity to a school. The
((board)) office may extend the time period for submitting objections.
For the purpose of this section, "church" means a building erected for
and used exclusively for religious worship and schooling or other
activity in connection therewith. For the purpose of this section,
"public institution" means institutions of higher education, parks,
community centers, libraries, and transit centers.
(b) No liquor license may be issued or reissued by the ((board))
office to any motor sports facility or licensee operating within the
motor sports facility unless the motor sports facility enforces a
program reasonably calculated to prevent alcohol or alcoholic beverages
not purchased within the facility from entering the facility and such
program is approved by local law enforcement agencies.
(c) It is the intent under this subsection (9) that a retail
license shall not be issued by the ((board)) office where doing so
would, in the judgment of the ((board)) office, adversely affect a
private school meeting the requirements for private schools under Title
28A RCW, which school is within five hundred feet of the proposed
licensee. The ((board)) office shall fully consider and give
substantial weight to objections filed by private schools. If a
license is issued despite the proximity of a private school, the
((board)) office shall state in a letter addressed to the private
school the ((board's)) office's reasons for issuing the license.
(10) The restrictions set forth in subsection (9) of this section
shall not prohibit the ((board)) office from authorizing the assumption
of existing licenses now located within the restricted area by other
persons or licenses or relocations of existing licensed premises within
the restricted area. In no case may the licensed premises be moved
closer to a church or school than it was before the assumption or
relocation.
(11)(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the ((board)) office, in
its discretion, from issuing a temporary retail or distributor license
to an applicant to operate the retail or distributor premises during
the period the application for the license is pending. The ((board))
office may establish a fee for a temporary license by rule.
(b) A temporary license issued by the ((board)) office under this
section shall be for a period not to exceed sixty days. A temporary
license may be extended at the discretion of the ((board)) office for
additional periods of sixty days upon payment of an additional fee and
upon compliance with all conditions required in this section.
(c) Refusal by the ((board)) office to issue or extend a temporary
license shall not entitle the applicant to request a hearing. A
temporary license may be canceled or suspended summarily at any time if
the ((board)) office determines that good cause for cancellation or
suspension exists. RCW 66.08.130 applies to temporary licenses.
(d) Application for a temporary license shall be on such form as
the ((board)) office shall prescribe. If an application for a
temporary license is withdrawn before issuance or is refused by the
((board)) office, the fee which accompanied such application shall be
refunded in full.
(12) In determining whether to grant or deny a license or renewal
of any license, the ((board)) office shall give substantial weight to
objections from an incorporated city or town or county legislative
authority based upon chronic illegal activity associated with the
applicant's operations of the premises proposed to be licensed or the
applicant's operation of any other licensed premises, or the conduct of
the applicant's patrons inside or outside the licensed premises.
"Chronic illegal activity" means (a) a pervasive pattern of activity
that threatens the public health, safety, and welfare of the city,
town, or county including, but not limited to, open container
violations, assaults, disturbances, disorderly conduct, or other
criminal law violations, or as documented in crime statistics, police
reports, emergency medical response data, calls for service, field
data, or similar records of a law enforcement agency for the city,
town, county, or any other municipal corporation or any state agency;
or (b) an unreasonably high number of citations for violations of RCW
46.61.502 associated with the applicant's or licensee's operation of
any licensed premises as indicated by the reported statements given to
law enforcement upon arrest.

Sec. 57 RCW 66.24.012 and 1997 c 58 s 862 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((board)) office shall immediately suspend the license of a
person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the
department of social and health services as a person who is not in
compliance with a support order or a residential or visitation order.
If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for
reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license shall be
automatic upon the ((board's)) office's receipt of a release issued by
the department of social and health services stating that the licensee
is in compliance with the order.

Sec. 58 RCW 66.24.013 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 42 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
The ((board)) office shall immediately suspend the license of a
business that has been issued a license under RCW 66.24.330, 66.24.371,
or 66.24.600 if the ((board)) office receives information that the
business has not complied with RCW 74.08.580(2). If the licensee has
remained otherwise eligible to be licensed, the ((board)) office may
reinstate the suspended license when the business has complied with RCW
74.08.580(2).

Sec. 59 RCW 66.24.025 and 2002 c 119 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the ((board)) office approves, a license may be transferred,
without charge, to the surviving spouse only of a deceased licensee if
the parties were maintaining a marital community and the license was
issued in the names of one or both of the parties. For the purpose of
considering the qualifications of the surviving party or parties to
receive a liquor license, the ((liquor control board)) office may
require a criminal history record information check. The ((board))
office may submit the criminal history record information check to the
Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the
federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search
their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or
individuals who filled out the forms. The ((board)) office shall
require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record
information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation.
(2) The proposed sale of more than ten percent of the outstanding
and/or issued stock of a licensed corporation or any proposed change in
the officers of a licensed corporation must be reported to the
((board)) office, and ((board)) office approval must be obtained before
such changes are made. A fee of seventy-five dollars will be charged
for the processing of such change of stock ownership and/or corporate
officers.

Sec. 60 RCW 66.24.120 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 209 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
The ((board)) office in suspending any license may further provide
in the order of suspension that such suspension shall be vacated upon
payment to the ((board)) office by the licensee of a monetary penalty
in an amount then fixed by the ((board)) office.

Sec. 61 RCW 66.24.140 and 2010 c 290 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a license to distillers, including blending,
rectifying and bottling; fee two thousand dollars per annum, unless
provided otherwise as follows:
(1) For distillers producing sixty thousand gallons or less of
spirits with at least half of the raw materials used in the production
grown in Washington, the license fee shall be reduced to one hundred
dollars per annum;
(2) The ((board)) office shall license stills used and to be used
solely and only by a commercial chemist for laboratory purposes, and
not for the manufacture of liquor for sale, at a fee of twenty dollars
per annum;
(3) The ((board)) office shall license stills used and to be used
solely and only for laboratory purposes in any school, college or
educational institution in the state, without fee; and
(4) The ((board)) office shall license stills which shall have been
duly licensed as fruit and/or wine distilleries by the federal
government, used and to be used solely as fruit and/or wine
distilleries in the production of fruit brandy and wine spirits, at a
fee of two hundred dollars per annum.

Sec. 62 RCW 66.24.145 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 205 are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Any craft distillery may sell spirits of its own production for
consumption off the premises, up to two liters per person per day. A
craft distillery selling spirits under this subsection must comply with
the applicable laws and rules relating to retailers.
(2) Any craft distillery may contract distill spirits for, and sell
contract distilled spirits to, holders of distillers' or manufacturers'
licenses, including licenses issued under RCW 66.24.520, or for export.
(3) Any craft distillery licensed under this section may provide,
free of charge, one-half ounce or less samples of spirits of its own
production to persons on the premises of the distillery. The maximum
total per person per day is two ounces. Every person who participates
in any manner in the service of samples must obtain a class 12 alcohol
server permit.
(4) The ((board)) office must adopt rules to implement the alcohol
server permit requirement and may adopt additional rules to implement
this section.
(5) Distilling is an agricultural practice.

Sec. 63 RCW 66.24.--- and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 206 are each amended to read as follows:
Any distiller licensed under this title may act as a retailer
and/or distributor to retailers selling for consumption on or off the
licensed premises of spirits of its own production, and any
manufacturer, importer, or bottler of spirits holding a certificate of
approval may act as a distributor of spirits it is entitled to import
into the state under such certificate. The ((board)) office must by
rule provide for issuance of certificates of approval to spirits
suppliers. An industry member operating as a distributor and/or
retailer under this section must comply with the applicable laws and
rules relating to distributors and/or retailers, except that an
industry member operating as a distributor under this section may
maintain a warehouse off the distillery premises for the distribution
of spirits of its own production to spirits retailers within the state,
if the warehouse is within the United States and has been approved by
the ((board)) office.

Sec. 64 RCW 66.24.160 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 207 are each amended to read as follows:
A spirits importer's license may be issued to any qualified person,
firm or corporation, entitling the holder thereof to import into the
state any liquor other than beer or wine; to store the same within the
state, and to sell and export the same from the state; fee six hundred
dollars per annum. Such spirits importer's license is subject to all
conditions and restrictions imposed by this title or by the rules and
regulations of the ((board)) office, and is issued only upon such terms
and conditions as may be imposed by the ((board)) office.

Sec. 65 RCW 66.24.170 and 2011 c 62 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for domestic wineries; fee to be
computed only on the liters manufactured: Less than two hundred fifty
thousand liters per year, one hundred dollars per year; and two hundred
fifty thousand liters or more per year, four hundred dollars per year.
(2) The license allows for the manufacture of wine in Washington
state from grapes or other agricultural products.
(3) Any domestic winery licensed under this section may also act as
a retailer of wine of its own production. Any domestic winery licensed
under this section may act as a distributor of its own production.
Notwithstanding any language in this title to the contrary, a domestic
winery may use a common carrier to deliver up to one hundred cases of
its own production, in the aggregate, per month to licensed Washington
retailers. A domestic winery may not arrange for any such common
carrier shipments to licensed retailers of wine not of its own
production. Except as provided in this section, any winery operating
as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection shall comply
with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or
retailers, except that a winery operating as a distributor may maintain
a warehouse off the premises of the winery for the distribution of wine
of its own production provided that: (a) The warehouse has been
approved by the ((board)) office under RCW 66.24.010; and (b) the
number of warehouses off the premises of the winery does not exceed
one.
(4) A domestic winery licensed under this section, at locations
separate from any of its production or manufacturing sites, may serve
samples of its own products, with or without charge, and sell wine of
its own production at retail, provided that: (a) Each additional
location has been approved by the ((board)) office under RCW 66.24.010;
(b) the total number of additional locations does not exceed two; (c)
a winery may not act as a distributor at any such additional location;
and (d) any person selling or serving wine at an additional location
for on-premise consumption must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol
server permit. Each additional location is deemed to be part of the
winery license for the purpose of this title. At additional locations
operated by multiple wineries under this section, if the ((board))
office cannot connect a violation of RCW 66.44.200 or 66.44.270 to a
single licensee, the ((board)) office may hold all licensees operating
the additional location jointly liable. Nothing in this subsection
shall be construed to prevent a domestic winery from holding multiple
domestic winery licenses.
(5)(a) A domestic winery licensed under this section may apply to
the ((board)) office for an endorsement to sell wine of its own
production at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying
farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five
dollars. An endorsement issued pursuant to this subsection does not
count toward the two additional retail locations limit specified in
this section.
(b) For each month during which a domestic winery will sell wine at
a qualifying farmers market, the winery must provide the ((board))
office or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at
which bottled wine may be offered for sale. This list must be received
by the ((board)) office before the winery may offer wine for sale at a
qualifying farmers market.
(c) The wine sold at qualifying farmers markets must be made
entirely from grapes grown in a recognized Washington appellation or
from other agricultural products grown in this state.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. Except
as provided in section 1, chapter 62, Laws of 2011, the approved
locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection do not
include the tasting or sampling privilege of a winery. The winery may
not store wine at a farmers market beyond the hours that the winery
offers bottled wine for sale. The winery may not act as a distributor
from a farmers market location.
(e) Before a winery may sell bottled wine at a qualifying farmers
market, the farmers market must apply to the ((board)) office for
authorization for any winery with an endorsement approved under this
subsection to sell bottled wine at retail at the farmers market. This
application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers
market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at
which an approved winery may sell bottled wine; and (ii) the name and
contact information for the on-site market managers who may be
contacted by the ((board)) office or its designee to verify the
locations at which bottled wine may be sold. Before authorizing a
qualifying farmers market to allow an approved winery to sell bottled
wine at retail at its farmers market location, the ((board)) office
shall notify the persons or entities of such application for
authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization
granted under this subsection (5)(e) may be withdrawn by the ((board))
office for any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this
title.
(f) The ((board)) office may adopt rules establishing the
application and approval process under this section and such additional
rules as may be necessary to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.
(6) Wine produced in Washington state by a domestic winery licensee
may be shipped out-of-state for the purpose of making it into sparkling
wine and then returned to such licensee for resale. Such wine shall be
deemed wine manufactured in the state of Washington for the purposes of
RCW 66.24.206, and shall not require a special license.

Sec. 66 RCW 66.24.170 and 2009 c 373 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for domestic wineries; fee to be
computed only on the liters manufactured: Less than two hundred fifty
thousand liters per year, one hundred dollars per year; and two hundred
fifty thousand liters or more per year, four hundred dollars per year.
(2) The license allows for the manufacture of wine in Washington
state from grapes or other agricultural products.
(3) Any domestic winery licensed under this section may also act as
a retailer of wine of its own production. Any domestic winery licensed
under this section may act as a distributor of its own production.
Notwithstanding any language in this title to the contrary, a domestic
winery may use a common carrier to deliver up to one hundred cases of
its own production, in the aggregate, per month to licensed Washington
retailers. A domestic winery may not arrange for any such common
carrier shipments to licensed retailers of wine not of its own
production. Except as provided in this section, any winery operating
as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection shall comply
with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or
retailers, except that a winery operating as a distributor may maintain
a warehouse off the premises of the winery for the distribution of wine
of its own production provided that: (a) The warehouse has been
approved by the ((board)) office under RCW 66.24.010; and (b) the
number of warehouses off the premises of the winery does not exceed
one.
(4) A domestic winery licensed under this section, at locations
separate from any of its production or manufacturing sites, may serve
samples of its own products, with or without charge, and sell wine of
its own production at retail, provided that: (a) Each additional
location has been approved by the ((board)) office under RCW 66.24.010;
(b) the total number of additional locations does not exceed two; (c)
a winery may not act as a distributor at any such additional location;
and (d) any person selling or serving wine at an additional location
for on-premise consumption must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol
server permit. Each additional location is deemed to be part of the
winery license for the purpose of this title. At additional locations
operated by multiple wineries under this section, if the ((board))
office cannot connect a violation of RCW 66.44.200 or 66.44.270 to a
single licensee, the ((board)) office may hold all licensees operating
the additional location jointly liable. Nothing in this subsection
shall be construed to prevent a domestic winery from holding multiple
domestic winery licenses.
(5)(a) A domestic winery licensed under this section may apply to
the ((board)) office for an endorsement to sell wine of its own
production at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying
farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five
dollars. An endorsement issued pursuant to this subsection does not
count toward the two additional retail locations limit specified in
this section.
(b) For each month during which a domestic winery will sell wine at
a qualifying farmers market, the winery must provide the ((board))
office or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at
which bottled wine may be offered for sale. This list must be received
by the ((board)) office before the winery may offer wine for sale at a
qualifying farmers market.
(c) The wine sold at qualifying farmers markets must be made
entirely from grapes grown in a recognized Washington appellation or
from other agricultural products grown in this state.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. The
approved locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection
do not include the tasting or sampling privilege of a winery. The
winery may not store wine at a farmers market beyond the hours that the
winery offers bottled wine for sale. The winery may not act as a
distributor from a farmers market location.
(e) Before a winery may sell bottled wine at a qualifying farmers
market, the farmers market must apply to the ((board)) office for
authorization for any winery with an endorsement approved under this
subsection to sell bottled wine at retail at the farmers market. This
application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers
market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at
which an approved winery may sell bottled wine; and (ii) the name and
contact information for the on-site market managers who may be
contacted by the ((board)) office or its designee to verify the
locations at which bottled wine may be sold. Before authorizing a
qualifying farmers market to allow an approved winery to sell bottled
wine at retail at its farmers market location, the ((board)) office
shall notify the persons or entities of such application for
authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization
granted under this subsection (5)(e) may be withdrawn by the ((board))
office for any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this
title.
(f) The ((board)) office may adopt rules establishing the
application and approval process under this section and such additional
rules as may be necessary to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.
(6) Wine produced in Washington state by a domestic winery licensee
may be shipped out-of-state for the purpose of making it into sparkling
wine and then returned to such licensee for resale. Such wine shall be
deemed wine manufactured in the state of Washington for the purposes of
RCW 66.24.206, and shall not require a special license.

Sec. 67 RCW 66.24.185 and 2008 c 41 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for bonded wine warehouses which shall
authorize the storage and handling of bottled wine. Under this license
a licensee may maintain a warehouse for the storage of wine off the
premises of a winery.
(2) The ((board)) office shall adopt similar qualifications for a
bonded wine warehouse license as required for obtaining a domestic
winery license as specified in RCW 66.24.010 and 66.24.170. A licensee
must be a sole proprietor, a partnership, a limited liability company,
or a corporation. One or more domestic wineries may operate as a
partnership, corporation, business co-op, or agricultural co-op for the
purposes of obtaining a bonded wine warehouse license.
(3) All bottled wine shipped to a bonded wine warehouse from a
winery or another bonded wine warehouse shall remain under bond and no
tax imposed under RCW 66.24.210 shall be due, unless the wine is
removed from bond and shipped to a licensed Washington wine
distributor. Wine may be removed from a bonded wine warehouse only for
the purpose of being (a) exported from the state, (b) shipped to a
licensed Washington wine distributor, (c) returned to a winery or
bonded wine warehouse, or (([(d)])) (d) shipped to a consumer pursuant
to RCW 66.20.360 through 66.20.390.
(4) Warehousing of wine by any person other than (a) a licensed
domestic winery or a bonded wine warehouse licensed under the
provisions of this section, (b) a licensed Washington wine distributor,
(c) a licensed Washington wine importer, (d) a wine certificate of
approval holder (W7), or (e) the ((liquor control board)) office, is
prohibited.
(5) A license applicant shall hold a federal permit for a bonded
wine cellar and may be required to post a continuing wine tax bond of
such an amount and in such a form as may be required by the ((board))
office prior to the issuance of a bonded wine warehouse license. The
fee for this license shall be one hundred dollars per annum.
(6) The ((board)) office shall adopt rules requiring a bonded wine
warehouse to be physically secure, zoned for the intended use and
physically separated from any other use.
(7) Every licensee shall submit to the ((board)) office a monthly
report of movement of bottled wines to and from a bonded wine warehouse
in a form prescribed by the ((board)) office. The ((board)) office may
adopt other necessary procedures by which bonded wine warehouses are
licensed and regulated.
(8) Handling of bottled wine, as provided for in this section,
includes packaging and repackaging services; bottle labeling services;
creating baskets or variety packs that may or may not include nonwine
products; and picking, packing, and shipping wine orders direct to
consumer. A winery contracting with a bonded wine warehouse for
handling bottled wine must comply with all applicable state and federal
laws and shall be responsible for financial transactions in direct to
consumer shipping activities.

Sec. 68 RCW 66.24.203 and 2004 c 160 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a license for wine importers that authorizes the
licensee to import wine purchased from certificate of approval holders
into the state of Washington. The licensee may also import, from
suppliers located outside of the United States, wine manufactured
outside the United States.
(1) Wine so imported may be sold to licensed wine distributors or
exported from the state.
(2) Every person, firm, or corporation licensed as a wine importer
shall establish and maintain a principal office within the state at
which shall be kept proper records of all wine imported into the state
under this license.
(3) No wine importer's license shall be granted to a nonresident of
the state nor to a corporation whose principal place of business is
outside the state until such applicant has established a principal
office and agent within the state upon which service can be made.
(4) As a requirement for license approval, a wine importer shall
enter into a written agreement with the ((board)) office to furnish on
or before the twentieth day of each month, a report under oath,
detailing the quantity of wine sold or delivered to each licensed wine
distributor. Failure to file such reports may result in the suspension
or cancellation of this license.
(5) Wine imported under this license must conform to the provisions
of RCW 66.28.110 and have received label approval from the ((board))
office. The ((board)) office shall not certify wines labeled with
names that may be confused with other nonalcoholic beverages whether
manufactured or produced from a domestic winery or imported nor wines
that fail to meet quality standards established by the ((board))
office.
(6) The license fee shall be one hundred sixty dollars per year.

Sec. 69 RCW 66.24.206 and 2007 c 16 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A United States winery located outside the state of
Washington must hold a certificate of approval to allow sales and
shipment of the certificate of approval holder's wine to licensed
Washington wine distributors, importers, or retailers. A certificate
of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement may act as a
distributor of its own production. Notwithstanding any language in
this title to the contrary, a certificate of approval holder with a
direct shipment endorsement may use a common carrier to deliver up to
one hundred cases of its own production, in the aggregate, per month to
licensed Washington retailers. A certificate of approval holder may
not arrange for any such common carrier shipments to licensed retailers
of wine not of its own production.
(b) Authorized representatives must hold a certificate of approval
to allow sales and shipment of United States produced wine to licensed
Washington wine distributors or importers.
(c) Authorized representatives must also hold a certificate of
approval to allow sales and shipments of foreign produced wine to
licensed Washington wine distributors or importers.
(2) The certificate of approval shall not be granted unless and
until such winery or authorized representative shall have made a
written agreement with the ((board)) office to furnish to the ((board))
office, on or before the twentieth day of each month, a report under
oath, on a form to be prescribed by the ((board)) office, showing the
quantity of wine sold or delivered to each licensed wine distributor,
importer, or retailer, during the preceding month, and shall further
have agreed with the ((board)) office, that such wineries,
manufacturers, or authorized representatives, and all general sales
corporations or agencies maintained by them, and all of their trade
representatives, shall and will faithfully comply with all laws of the
state of Washington pertaining to the sale of intoxicating liquors and
all rules and regulations of the ((Washington state liquor control
board)) office. A violation of the terms of this agreement will cause
the ((board)) office to take action to suspend or revoke such
certificate.
(3) The fee for the certificate of approval and related
endorsements, issued pursuant to the provisions of this title, shall be
from time to time established by the ((board)) office at a level that
is sufficient to defray the costs of administering the certificate of
approval program. The fee shall be fixed by rule by the ((board))
office in accordance with the provisions of the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) Certificate of approval holders are deemed to have consented to
the jurisdiction of Washington concerning enforcement of this chapter
and all laws and rules related to the sale and shipment of wine.

Sec. 70 RCW 66.24.210 and 2009 c 479 s 42 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby imposed upon all wines except cider sold to
wine distributors and the ((Washington state liquor control board))
office, within the state a tax at the rate of twenty and one-fourth
cents per liter. Any domestic winery or certificate of approval holder
acting as a distributor of its own production shall pay taxes imposed
by this section. There is hereby imposed on all cider sold to wine
distributors and the ((Washington state liquor control board)) office
within the state a tax at the rate of three and fifty-nine one-hundredths cents per liter. However, wine sold or shipped in bulk from
one winery to another winery shall not be subject to such tax.
(a) The tax provided for in this section shall be collected by
direct payments based on wine purchased by wine distributors.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, every
person purchasing wine under the provisions of this section shall on or
before the twentieth day of each month report to the ((board)) office
all purchases during the preceding calendar month in such manner and
upon such forms as may be prescribed by the ((board)) office, and with
such report shall pay the tax due from the purchases covered by such
report unless the same has previously been paid. Any such purchaser of
wine whose applicable tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth
day following the month of purchase will be assessed a penalty at the
rate of two percent a month or fraction thereof. The ((board)) office
may require that every such person shall execute to and file with the
((board)) office a bond to be approved by the ((board)) office, in such
amount as the ((board)) office may fix, securing the payment of the
tax. If any such person fails to pay the tax when due, the ((board))
office may forthwith suspend or cancel the license until all taxes are
paid.
(c) Any licensed retailer authorized to purchase wine from a
certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement or a
domestic winery shall make monthly reports to the ((liquor control
board)) office on wine purchased during the preceding calendar month in
the manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the ((board))
office.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section. All revenues collected during any month from this additional
tax shall be transferred to the state general fund by the twenty-fifth
day of the following month.
(3) An additional tax is imposed on wines subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section, at the rate of one-fourth of one cent
per liter for wine sold after June 30, 1987. After June 30, 1996, such
additional tax does not apply to cider. An additional tax of five one-hundredths of one cent per liter is imposed on cider sold after June
30, 1996. All revenues collected under this subsection (3) shall be
disbursed quarterly to the Washington wine commission for use in
carrying out the purposes of chapter 15.88 RCW.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all wine subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to twenty-three and forty-four one-hundredths cents per liter on fortified wine
as defined in RCW 66.04.010 when bottled or packaged by the
manufacturer, one cent per liter on all other wine except cider, and
eighteen one-hundredths of one cent per liter on cider. All revenues
collected during any month from this additional tax shall be deposited
in the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month.
(5)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all cider subject to tax
under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to
two and four one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June
30, 1996, and before July 1, 1997, and is equal to four and seven one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1997.
(b) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (5) shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "cider" means table wine that
contains not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume and
not more than seven percent of alcohol by volume and is made from the
normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe apples or
pears. "Cider" includes, but is not limited to, flavored, sparkling,
or carbonated cider and cider made from condensed apple or pear must.
(7) For the purposes of this section, out-of-state wineries shall
pay taxes under this section on wine sold and shipped directly to
Washington state residents in a manner consistent with the requirements
of a wine distributor under subsections (1) through (4) of this
section, except wineries shall be responsible for the tax and not the
resident purchaser.

Sec. 71 RCW 66.24.215 and 1988 c 257 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To provide for permanent funding of the wine commission after
July 1, 1989, agricultural commodity assessments shall be levied by the
((board)) office on wine producers and growers as follows:
(a) Beginning on July 1, 1989, the assessment on wine producers
shall be two cents per gallon on sales of packaged Washington wines.
(b) Beginning on July 1, 1989, the assessment on growers of
Washington vinifera wine grapes shall be levied as provided in RCW
15.88.130.
(c) After July 1, 1993, assessment rates under subsection (1)(a) of
this section may be changed pursuant to a referendum conducted by the
Washington wine commission and approved by a majority vote of wine
producers. The weight of each producer's vote shall be equal to the
percentage of that producer's share of Washington vinifera wine
production in the prior year.
(d) After July 1, 1993, assessment amounts under subsection (1)(b)
of this section may be changed pursuant to a referendum conducted by
the Washington wine commission and approved by a majority vote of grape
growers. The weight of each grower's vote shall be equal to the
percentage of that grower's share of Washington vinifera grape sales in
the prior year.
(2) Assessments collected under this section shall be disbursed
quarterly to the Washington wine commission for use in carrying out the
purposes of chapter 15.88 RCW.
(3) Prior to July 1, 1996, a referendum shall be conducted to
determine whether to continue the Washington wine commission as
representing both wine producers and grape growers. The voting shall
not be weighted. The wine producers shall vote whether to continue the
commission's coverage of wineries and wine production. The grape
producers shall vote whether to continue the commission's coverage of
issues pertaining to grape growing. If a majority of both wine and
grape producers favor the continuation of the commission, the
assessments shall continue as provided in subsection (2)(b) and (d) of
this section. If only one group of producers favors the continuation,
the assessments shall only be levied on the group which favored the
continuation.

Sec. 72 RCW 66.24.230 and 2004 c 160 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, wine
importer, and wine distributor licensed under this title shall make
monthly reports to the ((board)) office pursuant to the regulations.
Such domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, wine
importer, and wine distributor shall make no sales of wine within the
state of Washington except to the ((board)) office, or as otherwise
provided in this title.

Sec. 73 RCW 66.24.240 and 2011 c 195 s 6 and 2011 c 119 s 212 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for domestic breweries; fee to be two
thousand dollars for production of sixty thousand barrels or more of
malt liquor per year.
(2) Any domestic brewery, except for a brand owner of malt
beverages under RCW 66.04.010(((7))) (6), licensed under this section
may also act as a distributor and/or retailer for beer of its own
production. Any domestic brewery operating as a distributor and/or
retailer under this subsection shall comply with the applicable laws
and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers. A domestic
brewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license may sell
beer of its own production for off-premises consumption from its
restaurant premises in kegs or in a sanitary container brought to the
premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at
the tap by the licensee at the time of sale.
(3) Any domestic brewery licensed under this section may also sell
beer produced by another domestic brewery or a microbrewery for on and
off-premises consumption from its premises as long as the other
breweries' brands do not exceed twenty-five percent of the domestic
brewery's on-tap offering of its own brands.
(4) A domestic brewery may hold up to two retail licenses to
operate an on or off-premise tavern, beer and/or wine restaurant, or
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant. This retail license is separate
from the brewery license. A brewery that holds a tavern license, a
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, or a beer and/or wine
restaurant license shall hold the same privileges and endorsements as
permitted under RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, and 66.24.420.
(5) Any domestic brewery licensed under this section may contract-produce beer for a brand owner of malt beverages defined under RCW
66.04.010(((7))) (6), and this contract-production is not a sale for
the purposes of RCW 66.28.170 and 66.28.180.
(6)(a) A domestic brewery licensed under this section and qualified
for a reduced rate of taxation pursuant to RCW 66.24.290(3)(b) may
apply to the ((board)) office for an endorsement to sell bottled beer
of its own production at retail for off-premises consumption at a
qualifying farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is
seventy-five dollars.
(b) For each month during which a domestic brewery will sell beer
at a qualifying farmers market, the domestic brewery must provide the
((board)) office or its designee a list of the dates, times, and
locations at which bottled beer may be offered for sale. This list
must be received by the ((board)) office before the domestic brewery
may offer beer for sale at a qualifying farmers market.
(c) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in
Washington.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the domestic brewery license for the purpose of this
title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this
subsection do not include the tasting or sampling privilege of a
domestic brewery. The domestic brewery may not store beer at a farmers
market beyond the hours that the domestic brewery offers bottled beer
for sale. The domestic brewery may not act as a distributor from a
farmers market location.
(e) Before a domestic brewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying
farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the ((board)) office
for authorization for any domestic brewery with an endorsement approved
under this subsection to sell bottled beer at retail at the farmers
market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of
the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated
locations at which an approved domestic brewery may sell bottled beer;
and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market
managers who may be contacted by the ((board)) office or its designee
to verify the locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before
authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved domestic
brewery to sell bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location,
the ((board)) office shall notify the persons or entities of such
application for authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9).
An authorization granted under this subsection (6)(e) may be withdrawn
by the ((board)) office for any violation of this title or any rules
adopted under this title.
(f) The ((board)) office may adopt rules establishing the
application and approval process under this section and such additional
rules as may be necessary to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.

Sec. 74 RCW 66.24.244 and 2011 c 195 s 5 and 2011 c 62 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for microbreweries; fee to be one
hundred dollars for production of less than sixty thousand barrels of
malt liquor, including strong beer, per year.
(2) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may also act as a
distributor and/or retailer for beer and strong beer of its own
production. Strong beer may not be sold at a farmers market or under
any endorsement which may authorize microbreweries to sell beer at
farmers markets. Any microbrewery operating as a distributor and/or
retailer under this subsection shall comply with the applicable laws
and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers, except that a
microbrewery operating as a distributor may maintain a warehouse off
the premises of the microbrewery for the distribution of beer provided
that (a) the warehouse has been approved by the ((board)) office under
RCW 66.24.010 and (b) the number of warehouses off the premises of the
microbrewery does not exceed one. A microbrewery holding a spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant license may sell beer of its own production
for off-premises consumption from its restaurant premises in kegs or in
a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser or
furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the licensee at the
time of sale.
(3) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may also sell beer
produced by another microbrewery or a domestic brewery for on and off-premises consumption from its premises as long as the other breweries'
brands do not exceed twenty-five percent of the microbrewery's on-tap
offering of its own brands.
(4) The ((board)) office may issue up to two retail licenses
allowing a microbrewery to operate an on or off-premise tavern, beer
and/or wine restaurant, or spirits, beer, and wine restaurant.
(5) A microbrewery that holds a tavern license, spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license, or a beer and/or wine restaurant license shall
hold the same privileges and endorsements as permitted under RCW
66.24.320, 66.24.330, and 66.24.420.
(6)(a) A microbrewery licensed under this section may apply to the
((board)) office for an endorsement to sell bottled beer of its own
production at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying
farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five
dollars.
(b) For each month during which a microbrewery will sell beer at a
qualifying farmers market, the microbrewery must provide the ((board))
office or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at
which bottled beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received
by the ((board)) office before the microbrewery may offer beer for sale
at a qualifying farmers market.
(c) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in
Washington.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the microbrewery license for the purpose of this title.
Except as provided in section 1, chapter 62, Laws of 2011, the approved
locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection (6) do not
constitute the tasting or sampling privilege of a microbrewery. The
microbrewery may not store beer at a farmers market beyond the hours
that the microbrewery offers bottled beer for sale. The microbrewery
may not act as a distributor from a farmers market location.
(e) Before a microbrewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying
farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the ((board)) office
for authorization for any microbrewery with an endorsement approved
under this subsection (6) to sell bottled beer at retail at the farmers
market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of
the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated
locations at which an approved microbrewery may sell bottled beer; and
(ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers
who may be contacted by the ((board)) office or its designee to verify
the locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a
qualifying farmers market to allow an approved microbrewery to sell
bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the ((board))
office shall notify the persons or entities of the application for
authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization
granted under this subsection (6)(e) may be withdrawn by the ((board))
office for any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this
title.
(f) The ((board)) office may adopt rules establishing the
application and approval process under this section and any additional
rules necessary to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection (6):
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.
(7) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may
contract-produce beer for another microbrewer. This contract-production is not a sale for the purposes of RCW 66.28.170 and
66.28.180.

Sec. 75 RCW 66.24.244 and 2011 c 195 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for microbreweries; fee to be one
hundred dollars for production of less than sixty thousand barrels of
malt liquor, including strong beer, per year.
(2) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may also act as a
distributor and/or retailer for beer and strong beer of its own
production. Strong beer may not be sold at a farmers market or under
any endorsement which may authorize microbreweries to sell beer at
farmers markets. Any microbrewery operating as a distributor and/or
retailer under this subsection shall comply with the applicable laws
and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers, except that a
microbrewery operating as a distributor may maintain a warehouse off
the premises of the microbrewery for the distribution of beer provided
that (a) the warehouse has been approved by the ((board)) office under
RCW 66.24.010 and (b) the number of warehouses off the premises of the
microbrewery does not exceed one. A microbrewery holding a spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant license may sell beer of its own production
for off-premises consumption from its restaurant premises in kegs or in
a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser or
furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the licensee at the
time of sale.
(3) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may also sell beer
produced by another microbrewery or a domestic brewery for on and off-premises consumption from its premises as long as the other breweries'
brands do not exceed twenty-five percent of the microbrewery's on-tap
offering of its own brands.
(4) The ((board)) office may issue up to two retail licenses
allowing a microbrewery to operate an on or off-premise tavern, beer
and/or wine restaurant, or spirits, beer, and wine restaurant.
(5) A microbrewery that holds a tavern license, spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license, or a beer and/or wine restaurant license shall
hold the same privileges and endorsements as permitted under RCW
66.24.320, 66.24.330, and 66.24.420.
(6)(a) A microbrewery licensed under this section may apply to the
((board)) office for an endorsement to sell bottled beer of its own
production at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying
farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five
dollars.
(b) For each month during which a microbrewery will sell beer at a
qualifying farmers market, the microbrewery must provide the ((board))
office or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at
which bottled beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received
by the ((board)) office before the microbrewery may offer beer for sale
at a qualifying farmers market.
(c) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in
Washington.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the microbrewery license for the purpose of this title.
The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this
subsection (6) do not constitute the tasting or sampling privilege of
a microbrewery. The microbrewery may not store beer at a farmers
market beyond the hours that the microbrewery offers bottled beer for
sale. The microbrewery may not act as a distributor from a farmers
market location.
(e) Before a microbrewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying
farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the ((board)) office
for authorization for any microbrewery with an endorsement approved
under this subsection (6) to sell bottled beer at retail at the farmers
market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of
the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated
locations at which an approved microbrewery may sell bottled beer; and
(ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers
who may be contacted by the ((board)) office or its designee to verify
the locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a
qualifying farmers market to allow an approved microbrewery to sell
bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the ((board))
office shall notify the persons or entities of the application for
authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization
granted under this subsection (6)(e) may be withdrawn by the ((board))
office for any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this
title.
(f) The ((board)) office may adopt rules establishing the
application and approval process under this section and any additional
rules necessary to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection (6):
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.
(7) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may
contract-produce beer for another microbrewer. This contract-production is not a sale for the purposes of RCW 66.28.170 and
66.28.180.

Sec. 76 RCW 66.24.261 and 2004 c 160 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a license for beer importers that authorizes the
licensee to import beer and strong beer purchased from beer certificate
of approval holders into the state of Washington. The licensee may
also import, from suppliers located outside of the United States, beer
and strong beer manufactured outside the United States.
(1) Beer and strong beer so imported may be sold to licensed beer
distributors or exported from the state.
(2) Every person, firm, or corporation licensed as a beer importer
shall establish and maintain a principal office within the state at
which shall be kept proper records of all beer and strong beer imported
into the state under this license.
(3) No beer importer's license shall be granted to a nonresident of
the state nor to a corporation whose principal place of business is
outside the state until such applicant has established a principal
office and agent within the state upon which service can be made.
(4) As a requirement for license approval, a beer importer shall
enter into a written agreement with the ((board)) office to furnish on
or before the twentieth day of each month, a report under oath,
detailing the quantity of beer and strong beer sold or delivered to
each licensed beer distributor. Failure to file such reports may
result in the suspension or cancellation of this license.
(5) Beer and strong beer imported under this license must conform
to the provisions of RCW 66.28.120 and have received label approval
from the ((board)) office. The ((board)) office shall not certify beer
or strong beer labeled with names which may be confused with other
nonalcoholic beverages whether manufactured or produced from a domestic
brewery or imported nor shall it certify beer or strong beer which
fails to meet quality standards established by the ((board)) office.
(6) The license fee shall be one hundred sixty dollars per year.

Sec. 77 RCW 66.24.270 and 2006 c 302 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person, firm or corporation, holding a license to
manufacture malt liquors or strong beer within the state of Washington,
shall, on or before the twentieth day of each month, furnish to the
((Washington state liquor control board)) office, on a form to be
prescribed by the ((board)) office, a statement showing the quantity of
malt liquors and strong beer sold for resale during the preceding
calendar month to each beer distributor within the state of Washington.
(2)(a) A United States brewery or manufacturer of beer or strong
beer, located outside the state of Washington, must hold a certificate
of approval to allow sales and shipment of the certificate of approval
holder's beer or strong beer to licensed Washington beer distributors,
importers, or retailers. A certificate of approval holder with a
direct shipment endorsement may act as a distributor for beer of its
own production.
(b) Authorized representatives must hold a certificate of approval
to allow sales and shipment of United States produced beer or strong
beer to licensed Washington beer distributors or importers.
(c) Authorized representatives must also hold a certificate of
approval to allow sales and shipments of foreign produced beer or
strong beer to licensed Washington beer distributors or importers.
(3) The certificate of approval shall not be granted unless and
until such brewer or manufacturer of beer or strong beer or authorized
representative shall have made a written agreement with the ((board))
office to furnish to the ((board)) office, on or before the twentieth
day of each month, a report under oath, on a form to be prescribed by
the ((board)) office, showing the quantity of beer and strong beer sold
or delivered to each licensed beer distributor, importer, or retailer
during the preceding month, and shall further have agreed with the
((board)) office, that such brewer or manufacturer of beer or strong
beer or authorized representative and all general sales corporations or
agencies maintained by them, and all of their trade representatives,
corporations, and agencies, shall and will faithfully comply with all
laws of the state of Washington pertaining to the sale of intoxicating
liquors and all rules and regulations of the ((Washington state liquor
control board)) office. A violation of the terms of this agreement
will cause the ((board)) office to take action to suspend or revoke
such certificate.
(4) The fee for the certificate of approval and related
endorsements, issued pursuant to the provisions of this title, shall be
from time to time established by the ((board)) office at a level that
is sufficient to defray the costs of administering the certificate of
approval program. The fee shall be fixed by rule by the ((board))
office in accordance with the provisions of the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(5) Certificate of approval holders are deemed to have consented to
the jurisdiction of Washington concerning enforcement of this chapter
and all laws and rules related to the sale and shipment of beer.

Sec. 78 RCW 66.24.290 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1301 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any microbrewer or domestic brewery or beer distributor
licensed under this title may sell and deliver beer and strong beer to
holders of authorized licenses direct, but to no other person, other
than the ((board)) office. Any certificate of approval holder
authorized to act as a distributor under RCW 66.24.270 shall pay the
taxes imposed by this section.
(a) Every such brewery or beer distributor shall report all sales
to the ((board)) office monthly, pursuant to the regulations, and shall
pay to the ((board)) office as an added tax for the privilege of
manufacturing and selling the beer and strong beer within the state a
tax of one dollar and thirty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons on
sales to licensees within the state and on sales to licensees within
the state of bottled and canned beer, including strong beer, shall pay
a tax computed in gallons at the rate of one dollar and thirty cents
per barrel of thirty-one gallons.
(b) Any brewery or beer distributor whose applicable tax payment is
not postmarked by the twentieth day following the month of sale will be
assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent per month or fraction
thereof. Beer and strong beer shall be sold by breweries and
distributors in sealed barrels or packages.
(c) The moneys collected under this subsection shall be distributed
as follows: (i) Three-tenths of a percent shall be distributed to
border areas under RCW 66.08.195; and (ii) of the remaining moneys:
(A) Twenty percent shall be distributed to counties in the same manner
as under RCW 66.08.200; and (B) eighty percent shall be distributed to
incorporated cities and towns in the same manner as under RCW
66.08.210.
(d) Any licensed retailer authorized to purchase beer from a
certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement or a
brewery or microbrewery shall make monthly reports to the ((liquor
control board)) office on beer purchased during the preceding calendar
month in the manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the
((board)) office.
(2) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to two dollars per barrel of thirty-one gallons. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month.
(3)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to ninety-six cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons
through June 30, 1995, two dollars and thirty-nine cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
and four dollars and seventy-eight cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons thereafter.
(b) The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply
to the sale of the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by
breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may
be provided by the board by rule consistent with the purposes of this
exemption.
(c) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (3) shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer that
is subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section that is in the
first sixty thousand barrels of beer and strong beer by breweries that
are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as
existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by
the ((board)) office by rule consistent with the purposes of the
exemption under subsection (3)(b) of this section. The additional tax
is equal to one dollar and forty-eight and two-tenths cents per barrel
of thirty-one gallons. By the twenty-fifth day of the following month,
three percent of the revenues collected from this additional tax shall
be distributed to border areas under RCW 66.08.195 and the remaining
moneys shall be transferred to the state general fund.
(5)(a) From June 1, 2010, through June 30, 2013, an additional tax
is imposed on all beer and strong beer subject to tax under subsection
(1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to fifteen dollars
and fifty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons.
(b) The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply
to the sale of the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by
breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 5051 of the federal internal revenue code, as existing on July 1,
1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the ((board))
office by rule consistent with the purposes of this exemption.
(c) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(6) The ((board)) office may make refunds for all taxes paid on
beer and strong beer exported from the state for use outside the state.
(7) The ((board)) office may require filing with the ((board))
office of a bond to be approved by it, in such amount as the ((board))
office may fix, securing the payment of the tax. If any licensee fails
to pay the tax when due, the ((board)) office may forthwith suspend or
cancel his or her license until all taxes are paid.

Sec. 79 RCW 66.24.305 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 173 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
The ((board)) office may refund the tax on wine imposed by RCW
66.24.210, and the tax on beer imposed by RCW 66.24.290, when such
taxpaid products have been deemed to be unsalable and are destroyed
within the state in accordance with procedures established by the
((board)) office.

Sec. 80 RCW 66.24.310 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 111 are each amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, no person may
canvass for, solicit, receive, or take orders for the purchase or sale
of liquor, nor contact any licensees of the ((board)) office in
goodwill activities, unless the person is the representative of a
licensee or certificate holder authorized by this title to sell liquor
for resale in the state and has applied for and received a
representative's license.
(b) (a) of this subsection does not apply to: (i) Drivers who
deliver spirits, beer, or wine; or (ii) domestic wineries or their
employees.
(2) Every representative's license issued under this title is
subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed by this title or by
the rules and regulations of the ((board)) office; the ((board))
office, for the purpose of maintaining an orderly market, may limit the
number of representative's licenses issued for representation of
specific classes of eligible employers.
(3) Every application for a representative's license must be
approved by a holder of a certificate of approval, a licensed beer
distributor, a licensed domestic brewer, a licensed beer importer, a
licensed microbrewer, a licensed domestic winery, a licensed wine
importer, a licensed wine distributor, or by a distiller, manufacturer,
importer, or distributor of spirits, or of foreign-produced beer or
wine, as required by the rules and regulations of the ((board)) office.
(4) The fee for a representative's license is twenty-five dollars
per year.

Sec. 81 RCW 66.24.320 and 2007 c 370 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a beer and/or wine restaurant license to sell beer,
including strong beer, or wine, or both, at retail, for consumption on
the premises. A patron of the licensee may remove from the premises,
recorked or recapped in its original container, any portion of wine
that was purchased for consumption with a meal.
(1) The annual fee shall be two hundred dollars for the beer
license, two hundred dollars for the wine license, or four hundred
dollars for a combination beer and wine license.
(2)(a) The ((board)) office may issue a caterer's endorsement to
this license to allow the licensee to remove from the liquor stocks at
the licensed premises, only those types of liquor that are authorized
under the on-premises license privileges for sale and service at event
locations at a specified date and, except as provided in subsection (3)
of this section, place not currently licensed by the ((board)) office.
If the event is open to the public, it must be sponsored by a society
or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If attendance at the
event is limited to members or invited guests of the sponsoring
individual, society, or organization, the requirement that the sponsor
must be a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375 is
waived. Cost of the endorsement is three hundred fifty dollars.
(b) The holder of this license with (([a])) a catering endorsement
shall, if requested by the ((board)) office, notify the ((board))
office or its designee of the date, time, place, and location of any
catered event. Upon request, the licensee shall provide to the
((board)) office all necessary or requested information concerning the
society or organization that will be holding the function at which the
endorsed license will be utilized.
(c) The holder of this license with a caterer's endorsement may,
under conditions established by the ((board)) office, store liquor on
the premises of another not licensed by the ((board)) office so long as
there is a written agreement between the licensee and the other party
to provide for ongoing catering services, the agreement contains no
exclusivity clauses regarding the alcoholic beverages to be served, and
the agreement is filed with the ((board)) office.
(d) The holder of this license with a caterer's endorsement may,
under conditions established by the ((board)) office, store liquor on
other premises operated by the licensee so long as the other premises
are owned or controlled by a leasehold interest by that licensee. A
duplicate license may be issued for each additional premises. A
license fee of twenty dollars shall be required for such duplicate
licenses.
(3) Licensees under this section that hold a caterer's endorsement
are allowed to use this endorsement on a domestic winery premises or on
the premises of a passenger vessel and may store liquor at such
premises under conditions established by the ((board)) office under the
following conditions:
(a) Agreements between the domestic winery or the passenger vessel,
as the case may be, and the retail licensee shall be in writing,
contain no exclusivity clauses regarding the alcoholic beverages to be
served, and be filed with the ((board)) office; and
(b) The domestic winery or passenger vessel, as the case may be,
and the retail licensee shall be separately contracted and compensated
by the persons sponsoring the event for their respective services.
(4) The holder of this license or its manager may furnish beer or
wine to the licensee's employees free of charge as may be required for
use in connection with instruction on beer and wine. The instruction
may include the history, nature, values, and characteristics of beer or
wine, the use of wine lists, and the methods of presenting, serving,
storing, and handling beer or wine. The beer and/or wine licensee must
use the beer or wine it obtains under its license for the sampling as
part of the instruction. The instruction must be given on the premises
of the beer and/or wine licensee.
(5) If the license is issued to a person who contracts with the
Washington state ferry system to provide food and alcohol service on a
designated ferry route, the license shall cover any vessel assigned to
the designated route. A separate license is required for each
designated ferry route.

Sec. 82 RCW 66.24.354 and 1997 c 321 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be a beer and wine retailer's license that may be
combined only with the on-premises licenses described in either RCW
66.24.320 or 66.24.330. The combined license permits the sale of beer
and wine for consumption off the premises.
(1) Beer and wine sold for consumption off the premises must be in
original sealed packages of the manufacturer or bottler.
(2) Beer may be sold to a purchaser in a sanitary container brought
to the premises by the purchaser and filled at the tap by the retailer
at the time of sale.
(3) Licensees holding this type of license also may sell malt
liquor in kegs or other containers that are capable of holding four
gallons or more of liquid and are registered in accordance with RCW
66.28.200.
(4) The ((board)) office may impose conditions upon the issuance of
this license to best protect and preserve the health, safety, and
welfare of the public.
(5) The annual fee for this license shall be one hundred twenty
dollars.

Sec. 83 RCW 66.24.360 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 104 are each amended to read as follows:
(1) There is a grocery store license to sell wine and/or beer,
including without limitation strong beer at retail in original
containers, not to be consumed upon the premises where sold.
(2) There is a wine retailer reseller endorsement of a grocery
store license, to sell wine at retail in original containers to
retailers licensed to sell wine for consumption on the premises, for
resale at their licensed premises according to the terms of the
license. However, no single sale may exceed twenty-four liters, unless
the sale is made by a licensee that was a contract liquor store manager
of a contract-operated liquor store at the location from which such
sales are made. For the purposes of this title, a grocery store
license is a retail license, and a sale by a grocery store licensee
with a reseller endorsement is a retail sale only if not for resale.
(3) Licensees obtaining a written endorsement from the ((board))
office may also sell malt liquor in kegs or other containers capable of
holding less than five and one-half gallons of liquid.
(4) The annual fee for the grocery store license is one hundred
fifty dollars for each store.
(5) The annual fee for the wine retailer reseller endorsement is
one hundred sixty-six dollars for each store.
(6) The ((board)) office must issue a restricted grocery store
license authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table wine, if
the ((board)) office finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that
the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public
interest. In determining the public interest, the ((board)) office
must consider at least the following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or
fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;
(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's
establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or
fortified wine at the establishment; and
(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded
alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.
If the ((board)) office receives no evidence or objection that the
sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public
interest, it must issue or renew the license without restriction, as
applicable. The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or
fortified wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is
on those persons objecting.
(7) Licensees holding a grocery store license must maintain a
minimum three thousand dollar inventory of food products for human
consumption, not including pop, beer, strong beer, or wine.
(8) A grocery store licensee with a wine retailer reseller
endorsement may accept delivery of wine at its licensed premises or at
one or more warehouse facilities registered with the ((board)) office,
which facilities may also warehouse and distribute nonliquor items, and
from which it may deliver to its own licensed premises and, pursuant to
sales permitted by this title, to other licensed premises, to other
registered facilities, or to lawful purchasers outside the state.
Facilities may be registered and utilized by associations,
cooperatives, or comparable groups of grocery store licensees.
(9) Upon approval by the ((board)) office, the grocery store
licensee may also receive an endorsement to permit the international
export of beer, strong beer, and wine.
(a) Any beer, strong beer, or wine sold under this endorsement must
have been purchased from a licensed beer or wine distributor licensed
to do business within the state of Washington.
(b) Any beer, strong beer, and wine sold under this endorsement
must be intended for consumption outside the state of Washington and
the United States and appropriate records must be maintained by the
licensee.
(c) Any beer, strong beer, or wine sold under this endorsement must
be sold at a price no less than the acquisition price paid by the
holder of the license.
(d) The annual cost of this endorsement is five hundred dollars and
is in addition to the license fees paid by the licensee for a grocery
store license.
(10) A grocery store licensee holding a snack bar license under RCW
66.24.350 may receive an endorsement to allow the sale of confections
containing more than one percent but not more than ten percent alcohol
by weight to persons twenty-one years of age or older.

Sec. 84 RCW 66.24.--- and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 105 are each amended to read as follows:
(1) There is a license for spirits distributors to (a) sell spirits
purchased from manufacturers, distillers, or suppliers including,
without limitation, licensed Washington distilleries, licensed spirits
importers, other Washington spirits distributors, or suppliers of
foreign spirits located outside of the United States, to spirits
retailers including, without limitation, spirits retail licensees,
special occasion license holders, interstate common carrier license
holders, restaurant spirits retailer license holders, spirits, beer,
and wine private club license holders, hotel license holders, sports
entertainment facility license holders, and spirits, beer, and wine
nightclub license holders, and to other spirits distributors; and (b)
export the same from the state.
(2) By January 1, 2012, the ((board)) office must issue spirits
distributor licenses to all applicants who, upon December 8, 2011, have
the right to purchase spirits from a spirits manufacturer, spirits
distiller, or other spirits supplier for resale in the state, or are
agents of such supplier authorized to sell to licensees in the state,
unless the ((board)) office determines that issuance of a license to
such applicant is not in the public interest.
(3)(a) As limited by (b) of this subsection and subject to (c) of
this subsection, each spirits distributor licensee must pay to the
((board)) office for deposit into the liquor revolving fund, a license
issuance fee calculated as follows:
(i) In each of the first two years of licensure, ten percent of the
total revenue from all the licensee's sales of spirits made during the
year for which the fee is due, respectively; and
(ii) In the third year of licensure and each year thereafter, five
percent of the total revenue from all the licensee's sales of spirits
made during the year for which the fee is due, respectively.
(b) The fee required under this subsection (3) is calculated only
on sales of items which the licensee was the first spirits distributor
in the state to have received:
(i) In the case of spirits manufactured in the state, from the
distiller; or
(ii) In the case of spirits manufactured outside the state, from an
authorized out-of-state supplier.
(c) By March 31, 2013, all persons holding spirits distributor
licenses on or before March 31, 2013, must have paid collectively one
hundred fifty million dollars or more in spirits distributor license
fees. If the collective payment through March 31, 2013, totals less
than one hundred fifty million dollars, the ((board)) office must,
according to rules adopted by the ((board)) office for the purpose,
collect by May 31, 2013, as additional spirits distributor license fees
the difference between one hundred fifty million dollars and the actual
receipts, allocated among persons holding spirits distributor licenses
at any time on or before March 31, 2013, ratably according to their
spirits sales made during calendar year 2012. Any amount by which such
payments exceed one hundred fifty million dollars by March 31, 2013,
must be credited to future license issuance fee obligations of spirits
distributor licensees according to rules adopted by the ((board))
office.
(d) A retail licensee selling for resale must pay a distributor
license fee under the terms and conditions in this section on resales
of spirits the licensee has purchased on which no other distributor
license fee has been paid. The ((board)) office must establish rules
setting forth the frequency and timing of such payments and reporting
of sales dollar volume by the licensee, with payments due quarterly in
arrears.
(e) No spirits inventory may be subject to calculation of more than
a single spirits distributor license issuance fee.
(4) In addition to the payment set forth in subsection (3) of this
section, each spirits distributor licensee renewing its annual license
must pay an annual license renewal fee of one thousand three hundred
twenty dollars for each licensed location.
(5) There is no minimum facility size or capacity for spirits
distributor licenses, and no limit on the number of such licenses
issued to qualified applicants. License applicants must provide
physical security of the product that is substantially as effective as
the physical security of the distribution facilities currently operated
by the ((board)) office with respect to preventing pilferage. License
issuances and renewals are subject to RCW 66.24.010 and the regulations
promulgated thereunder, including without limitation rights of cities,
towns, county legislative authorities, the public, churches, schools,
and public institutions to object to or prevent issuance of local
liquor licenses. However, existing distributor premises licensed to
sell beer and/or wine are deemed to be premises "now licensed" under
RCW 66.24.010(9)(a) for the purpose of processing applications for
spirits distributor licenses.

Sec. 85 RCW 66.24.363 and 2010 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A grocery store licensed under RCW 66.24.360 may apply for an
endorsement to offer beer and wine tasting under this section.
(2) To be issued an endorsement, a licensee must meet the following
criteria:
(a) The licensee has retail sales of grocery products for off-premises consumption that are more than fifty percent of the licensee's
gross sales or the licensee is a membership organization that requires
members to be at least eighteen years of age;
(b) The licensee operates a fully enclosed retail area encompassing
at least nine thousand square feet, except that the ((board)) office
may issue an endorsement to a licensee with a retail area encompassing
less than nine thousand square feet if the ((board)) office determines
that no licensee in the community the licensee serves meets the square
footage requirement and the licensee meets operational requirements
established by the ((board)) office by rule; and
(c) The licensee has not had more than one public safety violation
within the past two years.
(3) A tasting must be conducted under the following conditions:
(a) Each sample must be two ounces or less, up to a total of four
ounces, per customer during any one visit to the premises;
(b) No more than one sample of the same product offering of beer or
wine may be provided to a customer during any one visit to the
premises;
(c) The licensee must have food available for the tasting
participants;
(d) Customers must remain in the service area while consuming
samples; and
(e) The service area and facilities must be located within the
licensee's fully enclosed retail area and must be of a size and design
such that the licensee can observe and control persons in the area to
ensure that persons under twenty-one years of age and apparently
intoxicated persons cannot possess or consume alcohol.
(4) Employees of licensees whose duties include serving during
tasting activities under this section must hold a class 12 alcohol
server permit.
(5) Tasting activities under this section are subject to RCW
66.28.305 and 66.28.040 and the cost of sampling may not be borne,
directly or indirectly, by any liquor manufacturer, importer, or
distributor.
(6) A licensee may advertise a tasting event only within the store,
on a store web site, in store newsletters and flyers, and via e-mail
and mail to customers who have requested notice of events. Advertising
under this subsection may not be targeted to or appeal principally to
youth.
(7)(a) If a licensee is found to have committed a public safety
violation in conjunction with tasting activities, the ((board)) office
may suspend the licensee's tasting endorsement and not reissue the
endorsement for up to two years from the date of the violation. If
mitigating circumstances exist, the ((board)) office may offer a
monetary penalty in lieu of suspension during a settlement conference.
(b) The ((board)) office may revoke an endorsement granted to a
licensee that is located within the boundaries of an alcohol impact
area recognized by resolution of the ((board)) office if the ((board))
office finds that the tasting activities by the licensee are having an
adverse effect on the reduction of chronic public inebriation in the
area.
(c) RCW 66.08.150 applies to the suspension or revocation of an
endorsement.
(8) The ((board)) office may establish additional requirements
under this section to assure that persons under twenty-one years of age
and apparently intoxicated persons cannot possess or consume alcohol.
(9) The annual fee for the endorsement is two hundred dollars. The
((board)) office shall review the fee annually and may increase the fee
by rule to a level sufficient to defray the cost of administration and
enforcement of the endorsement, except that the ((board)) office may
not increase the fee by more than ten percent annually.
(10) The ((board)) office must adopt rules to implement this
section.

Sec. 86 RCW 66.24.371 and 2011 c 195 s 4 and 2011 c 119 s 204 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a beer and/or wine retailer's license to be
designated as a beer and/or wine specialty shop license to sell beer,
strong beer, and/or wine at retail in bottles, cans, and original
containers, not to be consumed upon the premises where sold, at any
store other than the state liquor stores. Licensees obtaining a
written endorsement from the ((board)) office may also sell malt liquor
in kegs or other containers capable of holding four gallons or more of
liquid. The annual fee for the beer and/or wine specialty shop license
is one hundred dollars for each store. The sale of any container
holding four gallons or more must comply with RCW 66.28.200 and
66.28.220.
(2) Licensees under this section may provide, free or for a charge,
single-serving samples of two ounces or less to customers for the
purpose of sales promotion. Sampling activities of licensees under
this section are subject to RCW 66.28.305 and 66.28.040 and the cost of
sampling under this section may not be borne, directly or indirectly,
by any manufacturer, importer, or distributor of liquor.
(3) Upon approval by the ((board)) office, the beer and/or wine
specialty shop licensee that exceeds fifty percent beer and/or wine
sales may also receive an endorsement to permit the sale of beer to a
purchaser in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the
purchaser, or provided by the licensee or manufacturer, and fill at the
tap by the licensee at the time of sale. If the beer and/or wine
specialty shop licensee does not exceed fifty percent beer and/or wine
sales, the ((board)) office may waive the fifty percent beer and/or
wine sale criteria if the beer and/or wine specialty shop maintains
alcohol inventory that exceeds fifteen thousand dollars.
(4) The ((board)) office shall issue a restricted beer and/or wine
specialty shop license, authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only
table wine, if the ((board)) office finds upon issuance or renewal of
the license that the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
against the public interest. In determining the public interest, the
((board)) office shall consider at least the following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or
fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;
(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's
establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or
fortified wine at the establishment; and
(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded
alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.
If the ((board)) office receives no evidence or objection that the
sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public
interest, it shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as
applicable. The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or
fortified wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is
on those persons objecting.
(5) Licensees holding a beer and/or wine specialty shop license
must maintain a minimum three thousand dollar wholesale inventory of
beer, strong beer, and/or wine.
(6) The ((board)) office may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 87 RCW 66.24.380 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 112 are each amended to read as follows:
There is a retailer's license to be designated as a special
occasion license to be issued to a not-for-profit society or
organization to sell spirits, beer, and wine by the individual serving
for on-premises consumption at a specified event, such as at picnics or
other special occasions, at a specified date and place; fee sixty
dollars per day.
(1) The not-for-profit society or organization is limited to sales
of no more than twelve calendar days per year. For the purposes of
this subsection, special occasion licensees that are "agricultural area
fairs" or "agricultural county, district, and area fairs," as defined
by RCW 15.76.120, that receive a special occasion license may, once per
calendar year, count as one event fairs that last multiple days, so
long as alcohol sales are at set dates, times, and locations, and the
((board)) office receives prior notification of the dates, times, and
locations. The special occasion license applicant will pay the sixty
dollars per day for this event.
(2) The licensee may sell spirits, beer, and/or wine in original,
unopened containers for off-premises consumption if permission is
obtained from the ((board)) office prior to the event.
(3) Sale, service, and consumption of spirits, beer, and wine is to
be confined to specified premises or designated areas only.
(4) Liquor sold under this special occasion license must be
purchased from a licensee of the ((board)) office.
(5) Any violation of this section is a class 1 civil infraction
having a maximum penalty of two hundred fifty dollars as provided for
in chapter 7.80 RCW.

Sec. 88 RCW 66.24.395 and 1997 c 321 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) There shall be a license that may be issued to corporations,
associations, or persons operating as federally licensed commercial
common passenger carriers engaged in interstate commerce, in or over
territorial limits of the state of Washington on passenger trains,
vessels, or airplanes. Such license shall permit the sale of
spirituous liquor, wine, and beer at retail for passenger consumption
within the state upon one such train passenger car, vessel, or
airplane, while in or over the territorial limits of the state. Such
license shall include the privilege of transporting into and storing
within the state such liquor for subsequent retail sale to passengers
in passenger train cars, vessels or airplanes. The fees for such
master license shall be seven hundred fifty dollars per annum (class
CCI-1): PROVIDED, That upon payment of an additional sum of five
dollars per annum per car, or vessel, or airplane, the privileges
authorized by such license classes shall extend to additional cars, or
vessels, or airplanes operated by the same licensee within the state,
and a duplicate license for each additional car, or vessel, or airplane
shall be issued: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That such licensee may make such
sales and/or service upon cars, or vessels, or airplanes in emergency
for not more than five consecutive days without such license: AND
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That such license shall be valid only while such
cars, or vessels, or airplanes are actively operated as common carriers
for hire in interstate commerce and not while they are out of such
common carrier service.
(b) Alcoholic beverages sold and/or served for consumption by such
interstate common carriers while within or over the territorial limits
of this state shall be subject to such ((board)) office markup and
state liquor taxes in an amount to approximate the revenue that would
have been realized from such markup and taxes had the alcoholic
beverages been purchased in Washington: PROVIDED, That the ((board's))
office's markup shall be applied on spirituous liquor only. Such
common carriers shall report such sales and/or service and pay such
markup and taxes in accordance with procedures prescribed by the
((board)) office.
(2) Alcoholic beverages sold and delivered in this state to
interstate common carriers for use under the provisions of this section
shall be considered exported from the state, subject to the conditions
provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section. The storage facilities
for liquor within the state by common carriers licensed under this
section shall be subject to written approval by the ((board)) office.

Sec. 89 RCW 66.24.400 and 2011 c 119 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There shall be a retailer's license, to be known and designated
as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, to sell spirituous
liquor by the individual glass, beer, and wine, at retail, for
consumption on the premises, including mixed drinks and cocktails
compounded or mixed on the premises only. A club licensed under
chapter 70.62 RCW with overnight sleeping accommodations, that is
licensed under this section may sell liquor by the bottle to registered
guests of the club for consumption in guest rooms, hospitality rooms,
or at banquets in the club. A patron of a bona fide restaurant or club
licensed under this section may remove from the premises recorked or
recapped in its original container any portion of wine which was
purchased for consumption with a meal, and registered guests who have
purchased liquor from the club by the bottle may remove from the
premises any unused portion of such liquor in its original container.
Such license may be issued only to bona fide restaurants and clubs, and
to dining, club and buffet cars on passenger trains, and to dining
places on passenger boats and airplanes, and to dining places at civic
centers with facilities for sports, entertainment, and conventions, and
to such other establishments operated and maintained primarily for the
benefit of tourists, vacationers and travelers as the ((board)) office
shall determine are qualified to have, and in the discretion of the
((board)) office should have, a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license under the provisions and limitations of this title.
(2) The ((board)) office may issue an endorsement to the spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant license to sell bottled wine for off-premises
consumption. Spirits and beer may not be sold for off-premises
consumption under this section except as provided in subsection (4) of
this section. The annual fee for the endorsement under this subsection
is one hundred twenty dollars.
(3) The holder of a spirits, beer, and wine license or its manager
may furnish beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to the licensee's
employees free of charge as may be required for use in connection with
instruction on beer, wine, or spirituous liquor. The instruction may
include the history, nature, values, and characteristics of beer, wine,
or spirituous liquor, the use of wine lists, and the methods of
presenting, serving, storing, and handling beer, wine, and spirituous
liquor. The spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee must use the
beer, wine, or spirituous liquor it obtains under its license for the
sampling as part of the instruction. The instruction must be given on
the premises of the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee.
(4) The ((board)) office may issue an endorsement to the spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant license to sell for off-premises consumption
malt liquor in kegs or other containers that are capable of holding
four gallons or more of liquid and are registered in accordance with
RCW 66.28.200. Beer may also be sold under the endorsement to a
purchaser in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the
purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the
retailer at the time of sale. The annual fee for the endorsement under
this subsection is one hundred twenty dollars.

Sec. 90 RCW 66.24.410 and 2011 c 195 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Spirituous liquor," as used in RCW 66.24.400 ((to)) through
66.24.450, inclusive, means "liquor" as defined in RCW 66.04.010,
except "wine" and "beer" sold as such.
(2) "Restaurant" as used in RCW 66.24.400 ((to)) through 66.24.450,
inclusive, means an establishment provided with special space and
accommodations where, in consideration of payment, food, without
lodgings, is habitually furnished to the public, not including drug
stores and soda fountains: PROVIDED, That such establishments shall be
approved by the ((board)) office and that the ((board)) office shall be
satisfied that such establishment is maintained in a substantial manner
as a place for preparing, cooking and serving of complete meals.
Requirements for complete meals shall be determined by the ((board))
office in rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) "Hotel," "clubs," "wine" and "beer" are used in RCW 66.24.400
((to)) through 66.24.450, inclusive, with the meaning given in chapter
66.04 RCW.

Sec. 91 RCW 66.24.420 and 2009 c 271 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license shall be issued
in accordance with the following schedule of annual fees:
(a) The annual fee for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license
shall be graduated according to the dedicated dining area and type of
service provided as follows:

(b) The annual fee for the license when issued to any other
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee outside of incorporated
cities and towns shall be prorated according to the calendar quarters,
or portion thereof, during which the licensee is open for business,
except in case of suspension or revocation of the license.
(c) Where the license shall be issued to any corporation,
association or person operating a bona fide restaurant in an airport
terminal facility providing service to transient passengers with more
than one place where liquor is to be dispensed and sold, such license
shall be issued upon the payment of the annual fee, which shall be a
master license and shall permit such sale within and from one such
place. Such license may be extended to additional places on the
premises at the discretion of the ((board)) office and a duplicate
license may be issued for each such additional place. The holder of a
master license for a restaurant in an airport terminal facility must
maintain in a substantial manner at least one place on the premises for
preparing, cooking, and serving of complete meals, and such food
service shall be available on request in other licensed places on the
premises. An additional license fee of twenty-five percent of the
annual master license fee shall be required for such duplicate
licenses.
(d) Where the license shall be issued to any corporation,
association, or person operating dining places at a publicly or
privately owned civic or convention center with facilities for sports,
entertainment, or conventions, or a combination thereof, with more than
one place where liquor is to be dispensed and sold, such license shall
be issued upon the payment of the annual fee, which shall be a master
license and shall permit such sale within and from one such place.
Such license may be extended to additional places on the premises at
the discretion of the ((board)) office and a duplicate license may be
issued for each such additional place. The holder of a master license
for a dining place at such a publicly or privately owned civic or
convention center must maintain in a substantial manner at least one
place on the premises for preparing, cooking, and serving of complete
meals, and food service shall be available on request in other licensed
places on the premises. An additional license fee of ten dollars shall
be required for such duplicate licenses.
(2) The ((board)) office, so far as in its judgment is reasonably
possible, shall confine spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses to
the business districts of cities and towns and other communities, and
not grant such licenses in residential districts, nor within the
immediate vicinity of schools, without being limited in the
administration of this subsection to any specific distance
requirements.
(3) The ((board)) office shall have discretion to issue spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant licenses outside of cities and towns in the
state of Washington. The purpose of this subsection is to enable the
((board)) office, in its discretion, to license in areas outside of
cities and towns and other communities, establishments which are
operated and maintained primarily for the benefit of tourists,
vacationers and travelers, and also golf and country clubs, and common
carriers operating dining, club and buffet cars, or boats.
(4) The combined total number of spirits, beer, and wine nightclub
licenses, and spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses issued in the
state of Washington by the ((board)) office, not including spirits,
beer, and wine private club licenses, shall not in the aggregate at any
time exceed one license for each one thousand two hundred of population
in the state, determined according to the yearly population
determination developed by the office of financial management pursuant
to RCW 43.62.030.
(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (4) of this
section, the ((board)) office shall refuse a spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant license to any applicant if in the opinion of the ((board))
office the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses already granted
for the particular locality are adequate for the reasonable needs of
the community.
(6)(a) The ((board)) office may issue a caterer's endorsement to
this license to allow the licensee to remove the liquor stocks at the
licensed premises, for use as liquor for sale and service at event
locations at a specified date and, except as provided in subsection (7)
of this section, place not currently licensed by the ((board)) office.
If the event is open to the public, it must be sponsored by a society
or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If attendance at the
event is limited to members or invited guests of the sponsoring
individual, society, or organization, the requirement that the sponsor
must be a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375 is
waived. Cost of the endorsement is three hundred fifty dollars.
(b) The holder of this license with a catering endorsement shall,
if requested by the ((board)) office, notify the ((board)) office or
its designee of the date, time, place, and location of any catered
event. Upon request, the licensee shall provide to the ((board))
office all necessary or requested information concerning the society or
organization that will be holding the function at which the endorsed
license will be utilized.
(c) The holder of this license with a caterer's endorsement may,
under conditions established by the ((board)) office, store liquor on
the premises of another not licensed by the ((board)) office so long as
there is a written agreement between the licensee and the other party
to provide for ongoing catering services, the agreement contains no
exclusivity clauses regarding the alcoholic beverages to be served, and
the agreement is filed with the ((board)) office.
(d) The holder of this license with a caterer's endorsement may,
under conditions established by the ((board)) office, store liquor on
other premises operated by the licensee so long as the other premises
are owned or controlled by a leasehold interest by that licensee. A
duplicate license may be issued for each additional premises. A
license fee of twenty dollars shall be required for such duplicate
licenses.
(7) Licensees under this section that hold a caterer's endorsement
are allowed to use this endorsement on a domestic winery premises or on
the premises of a passenger vessel and may store liquor at such
premises under conditions established by the ((board)) office under the
following conditions:
(a) Agreements between the domestic winery or passenger vessel, as
the case may be, and the retail licensee shall be in writing, contain
no exclusivity clauses regarding the alcoholic beverages to be served,
and be filed with the ((board)) office; and
(b) The domestic winery or passenger vessel, as the case may be,
and the retail licensee shall be separately contracted and compensated
by the persons sponsoring the event for their respective services.

Sec. 92 RCW 66.24.425 and 2001 c 199 s 3 and 2001 c 198 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The ((board)) office may, in its discretion, issue a spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant license to a business which qualifies as a
"restaurant" as that term is defined in RCW 66.24.410 in all respects
except that the business does not serve the general public but, through
membership qualification, selectively restricts admission to the
business. For purposes of RCW 66.24.400 and 66.24.420, all licenses
issued under this section shall be considered spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant licenses and shall be subject to all requirements, fees, and
qualifications in this title, or in rules adopted by the ((board))
office, as are applicable to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
licenses generally except that no service to the general public may be
required.
(2) No license shall be issued under this section to a business:
(a) Which shall not have been in continuous operation for at least
one year immediately prior to the date of its application; or
(b) Which denies membership or admission to any person because of
race, creed, color, national origin, sex, or the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical handicap.
(3) The ((board)) office may issue an endorsement to the spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant license issued under this section that allows
up to forty nonclub, member-sponsored events using club liquor.
Visitors and guests may attend these events only by invitation of the
sponsoring member or members. These events may not be open to the
general public. The fee for the endorsement is an annual fee of nine
hundred dollars. Upon the ((board's)) office's request, the holder of
the endorsement must provide the ((board)) office or the ((board's))
office's designee with the following information at least seventy-two
hours before the event: The date, time, and location of the event; the
name of the sponsor of the event; and a brief description of the
purpose of the event.
(4) The ((board)) office may issue an endorsement to the spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant license to sell for off-premises consumption
wine vinted and bottled in the state of Washington and carrying a label
exclusive to the license holder selling the wine. Spirits and beer may
not be sold for off-premises consumption under this section. The
annual fee for the endorsement under this ((chapter [section])) section
is one hundred twenty dollars.

Sec. 93 RCW 66.24.440 and 2011 c 325 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each spirits, beer, and wine restaurant, spirits, beer, and wine
private club, hotel, spirits, beer, and wine nightclub, sports
entertainment facility ((licensee)), and VIP airport lounge licensee
shall be entitled to purchase any spirituous liquor items salable under
such license from the ((board)) office at a discount of not less than
fifteen percent from the retail price fixed by the ((board)) office,
together with all taxes.

Sec. 94 RCW 66.24.450 and 2011 c 119 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No club shall be entitled to a spirits, beer, and wine private
club license:
(a) Unless such private club has been in continuous operation for
at least one year immediately prior to the date of its application for
such license;
(b) Unless the private club premises be constructed and equipped,
conducted, managed, and operated to the satisfaction of the ((board))
office and in accordance with this title and the regulations made
thereunder;
(c) Unless the ((board)) office shall have determined pursuant to
any regulations made by it with respect to private clubs, that such
private club is a bona fide private club; it being the intent of this
section that license shall not be granted to a club which is, or has
been, primarily formed or activated to obtain a license to sell liquor,
but solely to a bona fide private club, where the sale of liquor is
incidental to the main purposes of the spirits, beer, and wine private
club, as defined in RCW 66.04.010(((8))) (7).
(2) The annual fee for a spirits, beer, and wine private club
license, whether inside or outside of an incorporated city or town, is
seven hundred twenty dollars per year.
(3) The ((board)) office may issue an endorsement to the spirits,
beer, and wine private club license that allows nonclub, member-sponsored events using club liquor. Visitors and guests may attend
these events only by invitation of the sponsoring member or members.
These events may not be open to the general public. The fee for the
endorsement shall be an annual fee of nine hundred dollars. Upon the
((board's)) office's request, the holder of the endorsement must
provide the ((board)) office or the ((board's)) office's designee with
the following information at least seventy-two hours prior to the
event: The date, time, and location of the event; the name of the
sponsor of the event; and a brief description of the purpose of the
event.
(4) The ((board)) office may issue an endorsement to the spirits,
beer, and wine private club license that allows the holder of a
spirits, beer, and wine private club license to sell bottled wine for
off-premises consumption. Spirits and beer may not be sold for off-premises consumption under this section. The annual fee for the
endorsement under this section is one hundred twenty dollars.

Sec. 95 RCW 66.24.452 and 2009 c 373 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a beer and wine license to be issued to a
private club for sale of beer, strong beer, and wine for on-premises
consumption.
(2) Beer, strong beer, and wine sold by the licensee may be on tap
or by open bottles or cans.
(3) The fee for the private club beer and wine license is one
hundred eighty dollars per year.
(4) The ((board)) office may issue an endorsement to the private
club beer and wine license that allows the holder of a private club
beer and wine license to sell bottled wine for off-premises
consumption. Spirits, strong beer, and beer may not be sold for off-premises consumption under this section. The annual fee for the
endorsement under this section is one hundred twenty dollars.

Sec. 96 RCW 66.24.455 and 1998 c 126 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to approval by the ((board)) office, holders of beer and/or
wine restaurant, tavern, snack bar, spirits, beer, and wine restaurant,
spirits, beer, and wine private club, or beer and wine private club
licenses may extend their premises for the sale, service, and
consumption of liquor authorized under their respective licenses to the
concourse or lane areas in a bowling establishment where the concourse
or lane areas are adjacent to the food preparation service facility.

Sec. 97 RCW 66.24.480 and 1951 c 120 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Bottle club" means a club or association operating for profit or
otherwise and conducting or maintaining premises in which the members
or other persons may resort for the primary or incidental purpose of
keeping or consuming liquor on the premises.
Except as permitted under a license issued by the ((Washington
state liquor control board)) office, it is unlawful for any person to
conduct or maintain by himself or herself or by associating with
others, or to in any manner aid, assist, or abet in conducting or
maintaining a bottle club.

Sec. 98 RCW 66.24.481 and 2008 c 94 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
No public place or club, or agent, servant or employee thereof,
shall keep or allow to be kept, either by itself, its agent, servant or
employee, or any other person, any liquor in any place maintained or
conducted by such public place or club, nor shall it permit the
drinking of any liquor in any such place, unless the sale of liquor in
said place is authorized by virtue of a valid and subsisting license
issued by the ((Washington state liquor control board)) office, or the
consumption of liquor in said place is authorized by a special banquet
permit issued by said ((board)) office. Every person who violates any
provision of this section shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
"Public place," for purposes of this section only, shall mean in
addition to the definition set forth in RCW 66.04.010, any place to
which admission is charged or in which any pecuniary gain is realized
by the owner or operator of such place in selling or vending food or
soft drinks.

Sec. 99 RCW 66.24.495 and 1997 c 321 s 33 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There shall be a license to be designated as a nonprofit arts
organization license. This shall be a special license to be issued to
any nonprofit arts organization which sponsors and presents productions
or performances of an artistic or cultural nature in a specific theater
or other appropriate designated indoor premises approved by the
((board)) office. The license shall permit the licensee to sell liquor
to patrons of productions or performances for consumption on the
premises at these events. The fee for the license shall be two hundred
fifty dollars per annum.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the term "nonprofit arts
organization" means an organization which is organized and operated for
the purpose of providing artistic or cultural exhibitions,
presentations, or performances or cultural or art education programs,
as defined in subsection (3) of this section, for viewing or attendance
by the general public. The organization must be a not-for-profit
corporation under chapter 24.03 RCW and managed by a governing board of
not less than eight individuals none of whom is a paid employee of the
organization or by a corporation sole under chapter 24.12 RCW. In
addition, the corporation must satisfy the following conditions:
(a) No part of its income may be paid directly or indirectly to its
members, stockholders, officers, directors, or trustees except in the
form of services rendered by the corporation in accordance with its
purposes and bylaws;
(b) Salary or compensation paid to its officers and executives must
be only for actual services rendered, and at levels comparable to the
salary or compensation of like positions within the state;
(c) Assets of the corporation must be irrevocably dedicated to the
activities for which the license is granted and, on the liquidation,
dissolution, or abandonment by the corporation, may not inure directly
or indirectly to the benefit of any member or individual except a
nonprofit organization, association, or corporation;
(d) The corporation must be duly licensed or certified when
licensing or certification is required by law or regulation;
(e) The proceeds derived from sales of liquor, except for
reasonable operating costs, must be used in furtherance of the purposes
of the organization;
(f) Services must be available regardless of race, color, national
origin, or ancestry; and
(g) The ((liquor control board)) office shall have access to its
books in order to determine whether the corporation is entitled to a
license.
(3) The term "artistic or cultural exhibitions, presentations, or
performances or cultural or art education programs" includes and is
limited to:
(a) An exhibition or presentation of works of art or objects of
cultural or historical significance, such as those commonly displayed
in art or history museums;
(b) A musical or dramatic performance or series of performances; or
(c) An educational seminar or program, or series of such programs,
offered by the organization to the general public on an artistic,
cultural, or historical subject.

Sec. 100 RCW 66.24.540 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 114 are each amended to read as follows:
(1) There is a retailer's license to be designated as a motel
license. The motel license may be issued to a motel regardless of
whether it holds any other class of license under this title. No
license may be issued to a motel offering rooms to its guests on an
hourly basis. The license authorizes the licensee to:
(a) Sell, at retail, in locked honor bars, spirits in individual
bottles not to exceed fifty milliliters, beer in individual cans or
bottles not to exceed twelve ounces, and wine in individual bottles not
to exceed one hundred eighty-seven milliliters, to registered guests of
the motel for consumption in guest rooms.
(i) Each honor bar must also contain snack foods. No more than
one-half of the guest rooms may have honor bars.
(ii) All spirits to be sold under the license must be purchased
from a spirits retailer or a spirits distributor licensee of the
((board)) office.
(iii) The licensee must require proof of age from the guest renting
a guest room and requesting the use of an honor bar. The guest must
also execute an affidavit verifying that no one under twenty-one years
of age has access to the spirits, beer, and wine in the honor bar.
(b) Provide without additional charge, to overnight guests of the
motel, spirits, beer, and wine by the individual serving for on-premises consumption at a specified regular date, time, and place as
may be fixed by the ((board)) office. Self-service by attendees is
prohibited. All spirits, beer, and wine service must be done by an
alcohol server as defined in RCW 66.20.300 and comply with RCW
66.20.310.
(2) The annual fee for a motel license is five hundred dollars.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "motel" means a transient
accommodation licensed under chapter 70.62 RCW.

Sec. 101 RCW 66.24.550 and 1997 c 321 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be a beer and wine retailer's license to be designated
as a beer and wine gift delivery license to solicit, take orders for,
sell, and deliver beer and/or wine in bottles and original packages to
persons other than the person placing the order. A beer and wine gift
delivery license may be issued only to a business solely engaged in the
sale or sale and delivery of gifts at retail which holds no other class
of license under this title or to a person in the business of selling
flowers or floral arrangements at retail. No minimum beer and/or wine
inventory requirement shall apply to holders of beer and wine gift
delivery licenses. The fee for this license is seventy-five dollars
per year. Delivery of beer and/or wine under a beer and wine gift
delivery license shall be made in accordance with all applicable
provisions of this title and the rules of the ((board)) office, and no
beer and/or wine so delivered shall be opened on any premises licensed
under this title. A beer and wine gift delivery license does not
authorize door-to-door solicitation of gift wine delivery orders.
Deliveries of beer and/or wine under a beer and wine gift delivery
license shall be made only in conjunction with gifts or flowers.

Sec. 102 RCW 66.24.570 and 2011 c 119 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is a license for sports entertainment facilities to be
designated as a sports entertainment facility license to sell beer,
wine, and spirits at retail, for consumption upon the premises only,
the license to be issued to the entity providing food and beverage
service at a sports entertainment facility as defined in this section.
The cost of the license is two thousand five hundred dollars per annum.
(2) For purposes of this section, a sports entertainment facility
includes a publicly or privately owned arena, coliseum, stadium, or
facility where sporting events are presented for a price of admission.
The facility does not have to be exclusively used for sporting events.
(3) The ((board)) office may impose reasonable requirements upon a
licensee under this section, such as requirements for the availability
of food and victuals including but not limited to hamburgers,
sandwiches, salads, or other snack food. The ((board)) office may also
restrict the type of events at a sports entertainment facility at which
beer, wine, and spirits may be served. When imposing conditions for a
licensee, the ((board)) office must consider the seating
accommodations, eating facilities, and circulation patterns in such a
facility, and other amenities available at a sports entertainment
facility.
(4)(a) The ((board)) office may issue a caterer's endorsement to
the license under this section to allow the licensee to remove from the
liquor stocks at the licensed premises, for use as liquor for sale and
service at event locations at a specified date and place not currently
licensed by the ((board)) office. If the event is open to the public,
it must be sponsored by a society or organization as defined by RCW
66.24.375. If attendance at the event is limited to members or invited
guests of the sponsoring individual, society, or organization, the
requirement that the sponsor must be a society or organization as
defined by RCW 66.24.375 is waived. Cost of the endorsement is three
hundred fifty dollars.
(b) The holder of this license with catering endorsement shall, if
requested by the ((board)) office, notify the ((board)) office or its
designee of the date, time, place, and location of any catered event.
Upon request, the licensee shall provide to the ((board)) office all
necessary or requested information concerning the society or
organization that will be holding the function at which the endorsed
license will be utilized.
(5) The ((board)) office may issue an endorsement to the beer,
wine, and spirits sports entertainment facility license that allows the
holder of a beer, wine, and spirits sports entertainment facility
license to sell for off-premises consumption wine vinted and bottled in
the state of Washington and carrying a label exclusive to the license
holder selling the wine. Spirits and beer may not be sold for off-premises consumption under this section. The annual fee for the
endorsement under this section is one hundred twenty dollars.
(6)(a) A licensee and an affiliated business may enter into
arrangements with a manufacturer, importer, or distributor for brand
advertising at the sports entertainment facility or promotion of events
held at the sports entertainment facility, with a capacity of five
thousand people or more. The financial arrangements providing for the
brand advertising or promotion of events shall not be used as an
inducement to purchase the products of the manufacturer, importer, or
distributor entering into the arrangement nor shall it result in the
exclusion of brands or products of other companies.
(b) The arrangements allowed under this subsection (6) are an
exception to arrangements prohibited under RCW 66.28.305. The
((board)) office shall monitor the impacts of these arrangements. The
((board)) office may conduct audits of the licensee and the affiliated
business to determine compliance with this subsection (6). Audits may
include but are not limited to product selection at the facility;
purchase patterns of the licensee; contracts with the liquor
manufacturer, importer, or distributor; and the amount allocated or
used for liquor advertising by the licensee, affiliated business,
manufacturer, importer, or distributor under the arrangements.
(c) The ((board)) office shall report to the appropriate committees
of the legislature by December 30, 2008, and biennially thereafter, on
the impacts of arrangements allowed between sports entertainment
licensees and liquor manufacturers, importers, and distributors for
brand advertising and promotion of events at the facility.

Sec. 103 RCW 66.24.580 and 2011 c 119 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A public house license allows the licensee:
(a) To annually manufacture no less than two hundred fifty gallons
and no more than two thousand four hundred barrels of beer on the
licensed premises;
(b) To sell product, that is produced on the licensed premises, at
retail on the licensed premises for consumption on the licensed
premises;
(c) To sell beer or wine not of its own manufacture for consumption
on the licensed premises if the beer or wine has been purchased from a
licensed beer or wine wholesaler;
(d) To apply for and, if qualified and upon the payment of the
appropriate fee, be licensed as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant to
do business at the same location. This fee is in addition to the fee
charged for the basic public house license.
(2) RCW 66.28.305 applies to a public house license.
(3) A public house licensee must pay all applicable taxes on
production as are required by law, and all appropriate taxes must be
paid for any product sold at retail on the licensed premises.
(4) The employees of the licensee must comply with the provisions
of mandatory server training in RCW 66.20.300 through 66.20.350.
(5) The holder of a public house license may not hold a
wholesaler's or importer's license, act as the agent of another
manufacturer, wholesaler, or importer, or hold a brewery or winery
license.
(6) The annual license fee for a public house is one thousand
dollars.
(7) The holder of a public house license may hold other licenses at
other locations if the locations are approved by the ((board)) office.
(8) Existing holders of annual retail liquor licenses may apply for
and, if qualified, be granted a public house license at one or more of
their existing liquor licensed locations without discontinuing business
during the application or construction stages.

Sec. 104 RCW 66.24.590 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 115 are each amended to read as follows:
(1) There is a retailer's license to be designated as a hotel
license. No license may be issued to a hotel offering rooms to its
guests on an hourly basis. Food service provided for room service,
banquets or conferences, or restaurant operation under this license
must meet the requirements of rules adopted by the ((board)) office.
(2) The hotel license authorizes the licensee to:
(a) Sell spirituous liquor, beer, and wine, by the individual
glass, at retail, for consumption on the premises, including mixed
drinks and cocktails compounded and mixed on the premises;
(b) Sell, at retail, from locked honor bars, in individual units,
spirits not to exceed fifty milliliters, beer in individual units not
to exceed twelve ounces, and wine in individual bottles not to exceed
three hundred eighty-five milliliters, to registered guests of the
hotel for consumption in guest rooms. The licensee must require proof
of age from the guest renting a guest room and requesting the use of an
honor bar. The guest must also execute an affidavit verifying that no
one under twenty-one years of age will have access to the spirits,
beer, and wine in the honor bar;
(c) Provide without additional charge, to overnight guests,
spirits, beer, and wine by the individual serving for on-premises
consumption at a specified regular date, time, and place as may be
fixed by the ((board)) office. Self-service by attendees is
prohibited;
(d) Sell beer, including strong beer, wine, or spirits, in the
manufacturer's sealed container or by the individual drink to guests
through room service, or through service to occupants of private
residential units which are part of the buildings or complex of
buildings that include the hotel;
(e) Sell beer, including strong beer, spirits, or wine, in the
manufacturer's sealed container at retail sales locations within the
hotel premises;
(f) Sell beer to a purchaser in a sanitary container brought to the
premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at
the tap in the restaurant area by the licensee at the time of sale;
(g) Sell for on or off-premises consumption, including through room
service and service to occupants of private residential units managed
by the hotel, wine carrying a label exclusive to the hotel license
holder;
(h) Place in guest rooms at check-in, a complimentary bottle of
liquor in a manufacturer-sealed container, and make a reference to this
service in promotional material.
(3) If all or any facilities for alcoholic beverage service and the
preparation, cooking, and serving of food are operated under contract
or joint venture agreement, the operator may hold a license separate
from the license held by the operator of the hotel. Food and beverage
inventory used in separate licensed operations at the hotel may not be
shared and must be separately owned and stored by the separate
licensees.
(4) All spirits to be sold under this license must be purchased
from a spirits retailer or spirits distributor licensee of the
((board)) office.
(5) All on-premise alcoholic beverage service must be done by an
alcohol server as defined in RCW 66.20.300 and must comply with RCW
66.20.310.
(6)(a) The hotel license allows the licensee to remove from the
liquor stocks at the licensed premises, liquor for sale and service at
event locations at a specified date and place not currently licensed by
the ((board)) office. If the event is open to the public, it must be
sponsored by a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If
attendance at the event is limited to members or invited guests of the
sponsoring individual, society, or organization, the requirement that
the sponsor must be a society or organization as defined by RCW
66.24.375 is waived.
(b) The holder of this license must, if requested by the ((board))
office, notify the ((board)) office or its designee of the date, time,
place, and location of any event. Upon request, the licensee must
provide to the ((board)) office all necessary or requested information
concerning the society or organization that will be holding the
function at which the endorsed license will be utilized.
(c) Licensees may cater events on a domestic winery, brewery, or
distillery premises.
(7) The holder of this license or its manager may furnish spirits,
beer, or wine to the licensee's employees who are twenty-one years of
age or older free of charge as may be required for use in connection
with instruction on spirits, beer, and wine. The instruction may
include the history, nature, values, and characteristics of spirits,
beer, or wine, the use of wine lists, and the methods of presenting,
serving, storing, and handling spirits, beer, or wine. The licensee
must use the liquor it obtains under its license for the sampling as
part of the instruction. The instruction must be given on the premises
of the licensee.
(8) Minors may be allowed in all areas of the hotel where liquor
may be consumed; however, the consumption must be incidental to the
primary use of the area. These areas include, but are not limited to,
tennis courts, hotel lobbies, and swimming pool areas. If an area is
not a mixed use area, and is primarily used for alcohol service, the
area must be designated and restricted to access by persons of lawful
age to purchase liquor.
(9) The annual fee for this license is two thousand dollars.
(10) As used in this section, "hotel," "spirits," "beer," and
"wine" have the meanings defined in RCW 66.24.410 and 66.04.010.

Sec. 105 RCW 66.24.600 and 2009 c 271 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There shall be a spirits, beer, and wine nightclub license to
sell spirituous liquor by the drink, beer, and wine at retail, for
consumption on the licensed premises.
(2) The license may be issued only to a person whose business
includes the sale and service of alcohol to the person's customers, has
food sales and service incidental to the sale and service of alcohol,
and has primary business hours between 9:00 p.m. and 2:00 a.m.
(3) Minors may be allowed on the licensed premises but only in
areas where alcohol is not served or consumed.
(4) The annual fee for this license is two thousand dollars. The
fee for the license shall be reviewed from time to time and set at such
a level sufficient to defray the cost of licensing and enforcing this
licensing program. The fee shall be fixed by rule adopted by the
((board)) office in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(5) Local governments may petition the ((board)) office to request
that further restrictions be imposed on a spirits, beer, and wine
nightclub license in the interest of public safety. Examples of
further restrictions a local government may request are: No minors
allowed on the entire premises, submitting a security plan, or signing
a good neighbor agreement with the local government.
(6) The total number of spirts, beer, and wine nightclub licenses
are subject to the requirements of RCW 66.24.420(4). However, the
((board)) office shall refuse a spirits, beer, and wine nightclub
license to any applicant if the ((board)) office determines that the
spirits, beer, and wine nightclub licenses already granted for the
particular locality are adequate for the reasonable needs of the
community.
(7) The ((board)) office may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 106 RCW 66.24.610 and 2011 c 325 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be a license to allow a VIP airport lounge operator to
sell or otherwise provide spirits, wine, and beer solely for
consumption on the premises of a VIP airport lounge. The license
described in this section allows the VIP airport lounge operator to
purchase spirits from the ((board)) office, and to purchase beer and
wine at retail outlets, or from the manufacturer or a distributor. No
licensee may serve liquor from a bar where patrons may sit to be
served, but may only serve liquor from a service bar, as approved by
the ((board)) office. The annual fee for this license shall be two
thousand dollars.

Sec. 107 RCW 66.24.--- and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 102 are each amended to read as follows:
(1) The holder of a spirits distributor license or spirits retail
license issued under this title may commence sale of spirits upon
issuance thereof, but in no event earlier than March 1, 2012, for
distributors, or June 1, 2012, for retailers. The ((board)) office
must complete application processing by those dates of all complete
applications for spirits licenses on file with the ((board)) office on
or before sixty days from December 8, 2011.
(2) The ((board)) office must effect orderly closure of all state
liquor stores no later than June 1, 2012, and must thereafter refrain
from purchase, sale, or distribution of liquor, except for asset sales
authorized by chapter 2, Laws of 2012.
(3) The ((board)) office must devote sufficient resources to
planning and preparation for sale of all assets of state liquor stores
and distribution centers, and all other assets of the state over which
the ((board)) office has power of disposition, including without
limitation goodwill and location value associated with state liquor
stores, with the objective of depleting all inventory of liquor by May
31, 2012, and closing all other asset sales no later than June 1, 2013.
The ((board)) office, in furtherance of this subsection, may sell
liquor to spirits licensees.
(4)(a) Disposition of any state liquor store or distribution center
assets remaining after June 1, 2013, must be managed by the department
of revenue.
(b) The ((board)) office must obtain the maximum reasonable value
for all asset sales made under this section.
(c) The ((board)) office must sell by auction open to the public
the right at each state-owned store location of a spirits retail
licensee to operate a liquor store upon the premises. Such right must
be freely alienable and subject to all state and local zoning and land
use requirements applicable to the property. Acquisition of the
operating rights must be a precondition to, but does not establish
eligibility for, a spirits retail license at the location of a state
store and does not confer any privilege conferred by a spirits retail
license. Holding the rights does not require the holder of the right
to operate a liquor-licensed business or apply for a liquor license.
(5) All sales proceeds under this section, net of direct sales
expenses and other transition costs authorized by this section, must be
deposited into the liquor revolving fund.
(6)(a) The ((board)) office must complete the orderly transition
from the current state-controlled system to the private licensee system
of spirits retailing and distribution as required under this chapter by
June 1, 2012.
(b) The transition must include, without limitation, a provision
for applying operating and asset sale revenues of the ((board)) office
to just and reasonable measures to avert harm to interests of tribes,
military buyers, and nonemployee liquor store operators under then
existing contracts for supply by the ((board)) office of distilled
spirits, taking into account present value of issuance of a spirits
retail license to the holder of such interest. The provision may
extend beyond the time for completion of transition to a spirits
licensee system.
(c) Purchases by the federal government from any licensee of the
((board)) office of spirits for resale through commissaries at military
installations are exempt from sales tax based on selling price levied
by RCW 82.08.150.

Sec. 108 RCW 66.24.--- and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 103 are each amended to read as follows:
(1) There is a spirits retail license to: Sell spirits in original
containers to consumers for consumption off the licensed premises and
to permit holders; sell spirits in original containers to retailers
licensed to sell spirits for consumption on the premises, for resale at
their licensed premises according to the terms of their licenses,
although no single sale may exceed twenty-four liters, unless the sale
is by a licensee that was a contract liquor store manager of a contract
liquor store at the location of its spirits retail licensed premises
from which it makes such sales; and export spirits.
(2) For the purposes of this title, a spirits retail license is a
retail license, and a sale by a spirits retailer is a retail sale only
if not for resale. Nothing in this title authorizes sales by on-sale
licensees to other retail licensees. The ((board)) office must
establish by rule an obligation of on-sale spirits retailers to:
(a) Maintain a schedule by stock-keeping unit of all their
purchases of spirits from spirits retail licensees, indicating the
identity of the seller and the quantities purchased; and
(b) Provide, not more frequently than quarterly, a report for each
scheduled item containing the identity of the purchasing on-premise
licensee and the quantities of that scheduled item purchased since any
preceding report to:
(i) A distributor authorized by the distiller to distribute a
scheduled item in the on-sale licensee's geographic area; or
(ii) A distiller acting as distributor of the scheduled item in the
area.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in ((subsection)) (c) of this
((section)) subsection, the ((board)) office may issue spirits retail
licenses only for premises comprising at least ten thousand square feet
of fully enclosed retail space within a single structure, including
storerooms and other interior auxiliary areas but excluding covered or
fenced exterior areas, whether or not attached to the structure, and
only to applicants that the ((board)) office determines will maintain
systems for inventory management, employee training, employee
supervision, and physical security of the product substantially as
effective as those of stores currently operated by the ((board)) office
with respect to preventing sales to or pilferage by underage or
inebriated persons.
(b) License issuances and renewals are subject to RCW 66.24.010 and
the regulations promulgated thereunder, including without limitation
rights of cities, towns, county legislative authorities, the public,
churches, schools, and public institutions to object to or prevent
issuance of local liquor licenses. However, existing grocery premises
licensed to sell beer and/or wine are deemed to be premises "now
licensed" under RCW 66.24.010(9)(a) for the purpose of processing
applications for spirits retail licenses.
(c) The ((board)) office may not deny a spirits retail license to
an otherwise qualified contract liquor store at its contract location
or to the holder of former state liquor store operating rights sold at
auction under RCW 66.24.--- (section 102, chapter 2, Laws of 2012) on
the grounds of location, nature, or size of the premises to be
licensed. The ((board)) office shall not deny a spirits retail license
to applicants that are not contract liquor stores or operating rights
holders on the grounds of the size of the premises to be licensed, if
such applicant is otherwise qualified and the ((board)) office
determines that:
(i) There is no retail spirits license holder in the trade area
that the applicant proposes to serve;
(ii) The applicant meets, or upon licensure will meet, the
operational requirements established by the ((board)) office by rule;
and
(iii) The licensee has not committed more than one public safety
violation within the three years preceding application.
(d) A retailer authorized to sell spirits for consumption on or off
the licensed premises may accept delivery of spirits at its licensed
premises or at one or more warehouse facilities registered with the
((board)) office, which facilities may also warehouse and distribute
nonliquor items, and from which the retailer may deliver to its own
licensed premises and, pursuant to sales permitted under subsection (1)
of this section:
(i) To other retailer premises licensed to sell spirits for
consumption on the licensed premises;
(ii) To other registered facilities; or
(iii) To lawful purchasers outside the state. The facilities may
be registered and utilized by associations, cooperatives, or comparable
groups of retailers, including at least one retailer licensed to sell
spirits.
(4) Each spirits retail licensee must pay to the ((board)) office,
for deposit into the liquor revolving fund, a license issuance fee
equivalent to seventeen percent of all spirits sales revenues under the
license, exclusive of taxes collected by the licensee and of sales of
items on which a license fee payable under this section has otherwise
been incurred. The ((board)) office must establish rules setting forth
the timing of such payments and reporting of sales dollar volume by the
licensee, with payments required quarterly in arrears. The first
payment is due October 1, 2012.
(5) In addition to the payment required under subsection (4) of
this section, each licensee must pay an annual license renewal fee of
one hundred sixty-six dollars. The ((board)) office must periodically
review and adjust the renewal fee as may be required to maintain it as
comparable to annual license renewal fees for licenses to sell beer and
wine not for consumption on the licensed premises. If required by law
at the time, any increase of the annual renewal fee becomes effective
only upon ratification by the legislature.
(6) As a condition to receiving and renewing a retail spirits
license the licensee must provide training as prescribed by the
((board)) office by rule for individuals who sell spirits or who manage
others who sell spirits regarding compliance with laws and regulations
regarding sale of spirits, including without limitation the
prohibitions against sale of spirits to individuals who are underage or
visibly intoxicated. The training must be provided before the
individual first engages in the sale of spirits and must be renewed at
least every five years. The licensee must maintain records documenting
the nature and frequency of the training provided. An employee
training program is presumptively sufficient if it incorporates a
"responsible vendor program" promulgated by the ((board)) office.
(7) The maximum penalties prescribed by the ((board)) office in WAC
314-29-020 through 314-29-040 relating to fines and suspensions are
doubled for violations relating to the sale of spirits by retail
spirits licensees.
(8)(a) The ((board)) office must promulgate regulations concerning
the adoption and administration of a compliance training program for
spirits retail licensees, to be known as a "responsible vendor
program," to reduce underage drinking, encourage licensees to adopt
specific best practices to prevent sales to minors, and provide
licensees with an incentive to give their employees on-going training
in responsible alcohol sales and service.
(b) Licensees who join the responsible vendor program under this
section and maintain all of the program's requirements are not subject
to the doubling of penalties provided in this section for a single
violation in any period of twelve calendar months.
(c) The responsible vendor program must be free, voluntary, and
self-monitoring.
(d) To participate in the responsible vendor program, licensees
must submit an application form to the ((board)) office. If the
application establishes that the licensee meets the qualifications to
join the program, the ((board)) office must send the licensee a
membership certificate.
(e) A licensee participating in the responsible vendor program must
at a minimum:
(i) Provide on-going training to employees;
(ii) Accept only certain forms of identification for alcohol sales;
(iii) Adopt policies on alcohol sales and checking identification;
(iv) Post specific signs in the business; and
(v) Keep records verifying compliance with the program's
requirements.

Sec. 109 RCW 66.28.030 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 113 are each amended to read as follows:
Every domestic distillery, brewery, and microbrewery, domestic
winery, certificate of approval holder, licensed liquor importer,
licensed wine importer, and licensed beer importer is responsible for
the conduct of any licensed spirits, beer, or wine distributor in
selling, or contracting to sell, to retail licensees, spirits, beer, or
wine manufactured by such domestic distillery, brewery, microbrewery,
domestic winery, manufacturer holding a certificate of approval, sold
by an authorized representative holding a certificate of approval, or
imported by such liquor, beer, or wine importer. Where the ((board))
office finds that any licensed spirits, beer, or wine distributor has
violated any of the provisions of this title or of the regulations of
the ((board)) office in selling or contracting to sell spirits, beer,
or wine to retail licensees, the ((board)) office may, in addition to
any punishment inflicted or imposed upon such distributor, prohibit the
sale of the brand or brands of spirits, beer, or wine involved in such
violation to any or all retail licensees within the trade territory
usually served by such distributor for such period of time as the
((board)) office may fix, irrespective of whether the distiller
manufacturing such spirits or the liquor importer importing such
spirits, brewer manufacturing such beer or the beer importer importing
such beer, or the domestic winery manufacturing such wine or the wine
importer importing such wine or the certificate of approval holder
manufacturing such spirits, beer, or wine or acting as authorized
representative actually participated in such violation.

Sec. 110 RCW 66.28.040 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 116 are each amended to read as follows:
Except as permitted by the ((board)) office under RCW 66.20.010, no
domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor, distiller, domestic
winery, importer, rectifier, certificate of approval holder, or other
manufacturer of liquor may, within the state of Washington, give to any
person any liquor; but nothing in this section nor in RCW 66.28.305
prevents a domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor, domestic
winery, distiller, certificate of approval holder, or importer from
furnishing samples of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to authorized
licensees for the purpose of negotiating a sale, in accordance with
regulations adopted by the ((liquor control board)) office, provided
that the samples are subject to taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and
66.24.210; nothing in this section prevents a domestic brewery,
microbrewery, domestic winery, distillery, certificate of approval
holder, or distributor from furnishing beer, wine, or spirituous liquor
for instructional purposes under RCW 66.28.150; nothing in this section
prevents a domestic winery, certificate of approval holder, or
distributor from furnishing wine without charge, subject to the taxes
imposed by RCW 66.24.210, to a not-for-profit group organized and
operated solely for the purpose of enology or the study of viticulture
which has been in existence for at least six months and that uses wine
so furnished solely for such educational purposes or a domestic winery,
or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from furnishing wine
without charge or a domestic brewery, or an out-of-state certificate of
approval holder, from furnishing beer without charge, subject to the
taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, or a domestic distiller
licensed under RCW 66.24.140 or an accredited representative of a
distiller, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor
licensed under RCW 66.24.310, from furnishing spirits without charge,
to a nonprofit charitable corporation or association exempt from
taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or (6) of the internal revenue
code of 1986 for use consistent with the purpose or purposes entitling
it to such exemption; nothing in this section prevents a domestic
brewery or microbrewery from serving beer without charge, on the
brewery premises; nothing in this section prevents donations of wine
for the purposes of RCW 66.12.180; nothing in this section prevents a
domestic winery from serving wine without charge, on the winery
premises; nothing in this section prevents a craft distillery from
serving spirits without charge, on the distillery premises subject to
RCW 66.24.145; nothing in this section prohibits spirits sampling under
chapter 186, Laws of 2011; and nothing in this section prevents a
winery or microbrewery from serving samples at a farmers market under
section 1, chapter 62, Laws of 2011.

Sec. 111 RCW 66.28.042 and 2011 c 119 s 208 are each amended to
read as follows:
A liquor manufacturer, importer, authorized representative holding
a certificate of approval, or distributor may provide to licensed
retailers and their employees food and beverages for consumption at a
meeting at which the primary purpose is the discussion of business, and
may provide local ground transportation to and from such meetings. The
value of the food, beverage, or transportation provided under this
section shall not be considered the advancement of moneys or moneys'
worth within the meaning of RCW 66.28.305, nor shall it be considered
the giving away of liquor within the meaning of RCW 66.28.040. The
((board)) office may adopt rules for the implementation of this
section.

Sec. 112 RCW 66.28.043 and 2011 c 119 s 209 are each amended to
read as follows:
A liquor manufacturer, importer, authorized representative holding
a certificate of approval, or distributor may provide to licensed
retailers and their employees tickets or admission fees for athletic
events or other forms of entertainment occurring within the state of
Washington, if the manufacturer, importer, distributor, authorized
representative holding a certificate of approval, or any of their
employees accompanies the licensed retailer or its employees to the
event. A liquor manufacturer, importer, authorized representative
holding a certificate of approval, or distributor may also provide to
licensed retailers and their employees food and beverages for
consumption at such events, and local ground transportation to and from
activities allowed under this section. The value of the food,
beverage, transportation, or admission to events provided under this
section shall not be considered the advancement of moneys or moneys'
worth within the meaning of RCW 66.28.305, nor shall it be considered
the giving away of liquor within the meaning of RCW 66.28.040. The
((board)) office may adopt rules for the implementation of this
section.

Sec. 113 RCW 66.28.060 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 117 are each amended to read as follows:
Every distillery licensed under this title must make monthly
reports to the ((board)) office pursuant to the regulations.

Sec. 114 RCW 66.28.070 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 118 are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it is
unlawful for any retail spirits, beer, or wine licensee to purchase
spirits, beer, or wine, except from a duly licensed distributor,
domestic winery, domestic brewer, or certificate of approval holder
with a direct shipment endorsement.
(2)(a) A spirits, beer, or wine retailer may purchase spirits,
beer, or wine:
(i) From a government agency that has lawfully seized liquor
possessed by a licensed distributor or retailer;
(ii) From ((a board)) an office-authorized manufacturer or
certificate holder authorized by this title to act as a distributor of
liquor;
(iii) From a licensed retailer which has discontinued business if
the distributor has refused to accept spirits, beer, or wine from that
retailer for return and refund;
(iv) From a retailer whose license or license endorsement permits
resale to a retailer of wine and/or spirits for consumption on the
premises, if the purchasing retailer is authorized to sell such wine
and/or spirits.
(b) Goods purchased under this subsection (2) must meet the quality
standards set by the manufacturer of the goods.
(3) Special occasion licensees holding a special occasion license
may only purchase spirits, beer, or wine from a spirits, beer, or wine
retailer duly licensed to sell spirits, beer, or wine for off-premises
consumption, or from a duly licensed spirits, beer, or wine
distributor.

Sec. 115 RCW 66.28.110 and 2009 c 404 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every person producing, manufacturing, bottling, or
distributing wine shall put upon all packages a distinctive label that
will provide the consumer with adequate information as to the identity
and quality of the product, the alcoholic content thereof, the net
contents of the package, the name of the producer, manufacturer, or
bottler thereof, and such other information as the ((board)) office may
by rule prescribe.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section:
(a) If the appellation of origin claimed or implied anywhere on a
wine label is "Washington," then at least ninety-five percent of the
grapes used in the production of the wine must have been grown in
Washington.
(b) If the appellation of origin claimed or implied anywhere on a
wine label is "Washington" and the name of an American viticultural
area located wholly within Washington, then at least ninety-five
percent of the grapes used in the production of the wine must have been
grown in Washington.
(c) If the appellation of origin claimed or implied anywhere on a
wine label is "Washington" and the name of an American viticultural
area located within both Washington and an adjoining state, then at
least ninety-five percent of the grapes used in the production of the
wine must have been grown within the defined boundaries of that
American viticultural area or in Washington.
(3) Upon evidence of material damage, destruction, disease, or
other loss to one or more vineyards in any American viticultural area,
region, subregion, or other discrete area, the director of the
department of agriculture must notify the ((board)) office and the
((board)) office may suspend the requirements of subsection (2) of this
section with respect to the adversely affected area for such period of
time as the ((board)) office reasonably may determine.
(4) For purposes of this section, "American viticultural area" is
a delimited grape growing region distinguishable by geographical
features, the boundaries of which have been recognized and defined by
the federal alcohol and trade tax bureau and recognized by the
((board)) office.
(5) This section does not apply to wines that are produced with the
addition of wine spirits, brandy, or alcohol.

Sec. 116 RCW 66.28.--- and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 120 are each amended to read as follows:
(1) No price for spirits sold in the state by a distributor or
other licensee acting as a distributor pursuant to this title may be
below acquisition cost unless the item sold below acquisition cost has
been stocked by the seller for a period of at least six months. The
seller may not restock the item for a period of one year following the
first effective date of such below cost price.
(2) Spirits sold to retailers for resale for consumption on or off
the licensed premises may be delivered to the retailer's licensed
premises, to a location specified by the retailer and approved for
deliveries by the ((board)) office, or to a carrier engaged by either
party to the transaction.
(3) In selling spirits to another retailer, to the extent
consistent with the purposes of chapter 2, Laws of 2012, a spirits
retail licensee must comply with all provisions of and regulations
under this title applicable to wholesale distributors selling spirits
to retailers.
(4) A distiller holding a license or certificate of compliance as
a distiller under this title may act as distributor in the state of
spirits of its own production or of foreign-produced spirits it is
entitled to import. The distiller must, to the extent consistent with
the purposes of chapter 2, Laws of 2012, comply with all provisions of
and regulations under this title applicable to wholesale distributors
selling spirits to retailers.
(5) With respect to any alleged violation of this title by sale of
spirits at a discounted price, all defenses under applicable trade
regulation laws are available, including without limitation good faith
meeting of a competitor's lawful price and absence of harm to
competition.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no licensee may
import, purchase, distribute, or accept delivery of any wine that is
produced outside of the United States or any distilled spirits without
the written consent of the brand owner or its authorized agent.

Sec. 117 RCW 66.28.180 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 121 are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Beer and/or wine distributors.
(a) Every beer distributor must maintain at its liquor-licensed
location a price list showing the wholesale prices at which any and all
brands of beer sold by the distributor are sold to retailers within the
state.
(b) Each price list must set forth:
(i) All brands, types, packages, and containers of beer offered for
sale by the distributor; and
(ii) The wholesale prices thereof to retail licensees, including
allowances, if any, for returned empty containers.
(c) No beer distributor may sell or offer to sell any package or
container of beer to any retail licensee at a price differing from the
price for such package or container as shown in the price list,
according to rules adopted by the ((board)) office.
(d) Quantity discounts of sales prices of beer are prohibited. No
distributor's sale price of beer may be below the distributor's
acquisition cost.
(e) Distributor prices below acquisition cost on a "close-out" item
are allowed if the item to be discontinued has been listed for a period
of at least six months, and upon the further condition that the
distributor who offers such a close-out price may not restock the item
for a period of one year following the first effective date of such
close-out price.
(f) Any beer distributor may sell beer at the distributor's listed
prices to any annual or special occasion retail licensee upon
presentation to the distributor at the time of purchase or delivery of
an original or facsimile license or a special permit issued by the
((board)) office to such licensee.
(g) Every annual or special occasion retail licensee, upon
purchasing any beer from a distributor, must immediately cause such
beer to be delivered to the licensed premises, and the licensee may not
thereafter permit such beer to be disposed of in any manner except as
authorized by the license.
(h) Beer sold as provided in this section must be delivered by the
distributor or an authorized employee either to the retailer's licensed
premises or directly to the retailer at the distributor's licensed
premises. When a brewery, microbrewery, or certificate of approval
holder with a direct shipping endorsement is acting as a distributor of
beer of its own production, a licensed retailer may contract with a
common carrier to obtain the beer directly from the brewery,
microbrewery, or certificate of approval holder with a direct shipping
endorsement. A distributor's prices to retail licensees for beer must
be the same at both such places of delivery. Wine sold to retailers
must be delivered to the retailer's licensed premises, to a location
specified by the retailer and approved for deliveries by the ((board))
office, or to a carrier engaged by either party to the transaction.
(2) Beer suppliers' contracts and memoranda.
(a) Every domestic brewery, microbrewery, certificate of approval
holder, and beer and/or wine importer offering beer for sale to
distributors within the state and any beer distributor who sells to
other beer distributors must maintain at its liquor-licensed location
a beer price list and a copy of every written contract and a memorandum
of every oral agreement which such brewery may have with any beer
distributor for the supply of beer, which contracts or memoranda must
contain:
(i) All advertising, sales and trade allowances, and incentive
programs; and
(ii) All commissions, bonuses or gifts, and any and all other
discounts or allowances.
(b) Whenever changed or modified, such revised contracts or
memoranda must also be maintained at its liquor licensed location.
(c) Each price list must set forth all brands, types, packages, and
containers of beer offered for sale by such supplier.
(d) Prices of a domestic brewery, microbrewery, or certificate of
approval holder for beer must be uniform prices to all distributors or
retailers on a statewide basis less bona fide allowances for freight
differentials. Quantity discounts of suppliers' prices for beer are
prohibited. No price may be below the supplier's acquisition or
production cost.
(e) A domestic brewery, microbrewery, certificate of approval
holder, importer, or distributor acting as a supplier to another
distributor must file with the ((board)) office a list of all
distributor licensees of the ((board)) office to which it sells or
offers to sell beer.
(f) No domestic brewery, microbrewery, or certificate of approval
holder may sell or offer to sell any package or container of beer to
any distributor at a price differing from the price list for such
package or container as shown in the price list of the domestic
brewery, microbrewery, or certificate of approval holder and then in
effect, according to rules adopted by the ((board)) office.
(3) In selling wine to another retailer, to the extent consistent
with the purposes of chapter 2, Laws of 2012, a grocery store licensee
with a reseller endorsement must comply with all provisions of and
regulations under this title applicable to wholesale distributors
selling wine to retailers.
(4) With respect to any alleged violation of this title by sale of
wine at a discounted price, all defenses under applicable trade
regulation laws are available including, without limitation, good faith
meeting of a competitor's lawful price and absence of harm to
competition.

Sec. 118 RCW 66.28.--- and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 123 are each amended to read as follows:
A retailer authorized to sell wine may accept delivery of wine at
its licensed premises or at one or more warehouse facilities registered
with the ((board)) office, which facilities may also warehouse and
distribute nonliquor items, and from which it may deliver to its own
licensed premises and, pursuant to sales permitted by this title, to
other licensed retailers, to other registered facilities, or to lawful
purchasers outside the state; such facilities may be registered and
utilized by associations, cooperatives, or comparable groups of
retailers including at least one retailer licensed to sell wine. A
restaurant retailer authorized to sell spirits may accept delivery of
spirits at its licensed premises or at one or more warehouse facilities
registered with the ((board)) office, which facilities may also
warehouse and distribute nonliquor items, from which it may deliver to
its own licensed premises and, pursuant to sales permitted by this
title, to other licensed retailers, to other registered facilities, or
to lawful purchasers outside the state; such facilities may be
registered and utilized by associations, cooperatives, or comparable
groups of retailers including at least one restaurant retailer licensed
to sell spirits. Nothing in this section authorizes sales of spirits
or wine by a retailer holding only an on-sale privilege to another
retailer.

Sec. 119 RCW 66.28.200 and 2009 c 373 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Licensees holding a beer and/or wine restaurant or a tavern
license in combination with an off-premises beer and wine retailer's
license, licensees holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license
with an endorsement issued under RCW 66.24.400(4), and licensees
holding a beer and/or wine specialty shop license with an endorsement
issued under RCW 66.24.371(1) may sell malt liquor in kegs or other
containers capable of holding four gallons or more of liquid. Under a
special endorsement from the ((board)) office, a grocery store licensee
may sell malt liquor in containers no larger than five and one-half
gallons. The sale of any container holding four gallons or more must
comply with the provisions of this section and RCW 66.28.210 through
66.28.240.
(2) Any person who sells or offers for sale the contents of kegs or
other containers containing four gallons or more of malt liquor, or
leases kegs or other containers that will hold four gallons of malt
liquor, to consumers who are not licensed under chapter 66.24 RCW shall
do the following for any transaction involving the container:
(a) Require the purchaser of the malt liquor to sign a declaration
and receipt for the keg or other container or beverage in substantially
the form provided in RCW 66.28.220;
(b) Require the purchaser to provide one piece of identification
((pursuant to RCW 66.16.040));
(c) Require the purchaser to sign a sworn statement, under penalty
of perjury, that:
(i) The purchaser is of legal age to purchase, possess, or use malt
liquor;
(ii) The purchaser will not allow any person under the age of
twenty-one years to consume the beverage except as provided by RCW
66.44.270;
(iii) The purchaser will not remove, obliterate, or allow to be
removed or obliterated, the identification required under RCW 66.28.220
to be affixed to the container;
(d) Require the purchaser to state the particular address where the
malt liquor will be consumed, or the particular address where the keg
or other container will be physically located; and
(e) Require the purchaser to maintain a copy of the declaration and
receipt next to or adjacent to the keg or other container, in no event
a distance greater than five feet, and visible without a physical
barrier from the keg, during the time that the keg or other container
is in the purchaser's possession or control.
(3) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 120 RCW 66.28.210 and 2003 c 53 s 297 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person who purchases the contents of kegs or other
containers containing four gallons or more of malt liquor, or purchases
or leases the container shall:
(a) Sign a declaration and receipt for the keg or other container
or beverage in substantially the form provided in RCW 66.28.220;
(b) Provide one piece of identification ((pursuant to RCW
66.16.040));
(c) Be of legal age to purchase, possess, or use malt liquor;
(d) Not allow any person under the age of twenty-one to consume the
beverage except as provided by RCW 66.44.270;
(e) Not remove, obliterate, or allow to be removed or obliterated,
the identification required under rules adopted by the ((board))
office;
(f) Not move, keep, or store the keg or its contents, except for
transporting to and from the distributor, at any place other than that
particular address declared on the receipt and declaration; and
(g) Maintain a copy of the declaration and receipt next to or
adjacent to the keg or other container, in no event a distance greater
than five feet, and visible without a physical barrier from the keg,
during the time that the keg or other container is in the purchaser's
possession or control.
(2) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 121 RCW 66.28.220 and 2007 c 53 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((board)) office shall adopt rules requiring retail
licensees to affix appropriate identification on all containers of four
gallons or more of malt liquor for the purpose of tracing the
purchasers of such containers. The rules may provide for
identification to be done on a statewide basis or on the basis of
smaller geographical areas.
(2) The ((board)) office shall develop and make available forms for
the declaration and receipt required by RCW 66.28.200. The ((board))
office may charge spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees with an
endorsement issued under RCW 66.24.400(4) and grocery store licensees
for the costs of providing the forms and that money collected for the
forms shall be deposited into the liquor revolving fund for use by the
((board)) office, without further appropriation, to continue to
administer the cost of the keg registration program.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to sell or offer for sale kegs or
other containers containing four gallons or more of malt liquor to
consumers who are not licensed under chapter 66.24 RCW if the kegs or
containers are not identified in compliance with rules adopted by the
((board)) office.
(4) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 122 RCW 66.28.260 and 2003 c 154 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Licensed beer distributors may not buy or sell beer, for purposes
of distribution, at farmers market locations authorized by the
((board)) office pursuant to chapter 154, Laws of 2003.

Sec. 123 RCW 66.28.270 and 2009 c 373 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter prohibits the use of checks, credit or
debit cards, prepaid accounts, electronic funds transfers, and other
similar methods as approved by the ((board)) office, as cash payments
for purposes of this title. Electronic ((fund[s])) funds transfers
must be: (1) Voluntary; (2) conducted pursuant to a prior written
agreement of the parties that includes a provision that the purchase be
initiated by an irrevocable invoice or sale order before the time of
delivery; (3) initiated by the retailer, manufacturer, importer, or
distributor no later than the first business day following delivery;
and (4) completed as promptly as is reasonably practical, and in no
event((,)) later than five business days following delivery.

Sec. 124 RCW 66.28.285 and 2009 c 506 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 66.28.280
through 66.28.315 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adverse impact on public health and safety" means that an
existing or proposed practice or occurrence has resulted or is more
likely than not to result in alcohol being made significantly more
attractive or available to minors than would otherwise be the case or
has resulted or is more likely than not to result in overconsumption,
consumption by minors, or other harmful or abusive forms of
consumption.
(2) "Affiliate" means any one of two or more persons if one of
those persons has actual or legal control, directly or indirectly,
whether by stock ownership or otherwise, of the other person or persons
and any one of two or more persons subject to common control, actual or
legal, directly or indirectly, whether by stock ownership or otherwise.
(3) "Industry member" means a licensed manufacturer, producer,
supplier, importer, wholesaler, distributor, authorized representative,
certificate of approval holder, warehouse, and any affiliates,
subsidiaries, officers, directors, partners, agents, employees, and
representatives of any industry member. "Industry member" does not
include the ((board)) office or any of the ((board's)) office's
employees.
(4) "Person" means any individual, partnership, joint stock
company, business trust, association, corporation, or other form of
business enterprise, including a receiver, trustee, or liquidating
agent and includes any officer or employee of a retailer or industry
member.
(5) "Retailer" means the holder of a license issued by the
((board)) office to allow for the sale of alcoholic beverages to
consumers for consumption on or off premises and any of the retailer's
agents, officers, directors, shareholders, partners, or employees.
"Retailer" does not include the ((board)) office or any of the
((board's)) office's employees.
(6) "Undue influence" means one retailer or industry member
directly or indirectly influencing the purchasing, marketing, or sales
decisions of another retailer or industry member by any agreement
written or unwritten or any other business practices or arrangements
such as but not limited to the following:
(a) Any form of coercion between industry members and retailers or
between retailers and industry members through acts or threats of
physical or economic harm, including threat of loss of supply or threat
of curtailment of purchase;
(b) A retailer on an involuntary basis purchasing less than it
would have of another industry member's product;
(c) Purchases made by a retailer or industry member as a
prerequisite for purchase of other items;
(d) A retailer purchasing a specific or minimum quantity or type of
a product or products from an industry member;
(e) An industry member requiring a retailer to take and dispose of
a certain product type or quota of the industry member's products;
(f) A retailer having a continuing obligation to purchase or
otherwise promote or display an industry member's product;
(g) An industry member having a continuing obligation to sell a
product to a retailer;
(h) A retailer having a commitment not to terminate its
relationship with an industry member with respect to purchase of the
industry member's products or an industry member having a commitment
not to terminate its relationship with a retailer with respect to the
sale of a particular product or products;
(i) An industry member being involved in the day-to-day operations
of a retailer or a retailer being involved in the day-to-day operations
of an industry member in a manner that violates the provisions of this
section;
(j) Discriminatory pricing practices as prohibited by law or other
practices that are discriminatory in that product is not offered to all
retailers in the local market on the same terms.

Sec. 125 RCW 66.28.295 and 2011 c 66 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in RCW 66.28.290 shall prohibit:
(1) A licensed domestic brewery or microbrewery from being licensed
as a retailer pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling
beer or wine at retail on the brewery premises and at one additional
off-site retail only location.
(2) A domestic winery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to
chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on
the winery premises. Such beer and wine so sold at retail shall be
subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210 and to
reporting and bonding requirements as prescribed by regulations adopted
by the ((board)) office pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, and beer and
wine that is not produced by the brewery or winery shall be purchased
from a licensed beer or wine distributor.
(3) A microbrewery holding a beer and/or wine restaurant license
under RCW 66.24.320 from holding the same privileges and endorsements
attached to the beer and/or wine restaurant license.
(4) A licensed craft distillery from selling spirits of its own
production under RCW 66.24.145.
(5) A licensed distiller, domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic
winery, or a lessee of a licensed domestic brewer, microbrewery, or
domestic winery, from being licensed as a spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling
liquor at a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant premises on the property
on which the primary manufacturing facility of the licensed distiller,
domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery is located or on
contiguous property owned or leased by the licensed distiller, domestic
brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery as prescribed by rules adopted
by the ((board)) office pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) A microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license under RCW 66.24.420 from holding the same privileges and
endorsements attached to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license.
(7) A brewery or microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant license or a beer and/or wine license under chapter 66.24
RCW operated on the premises of the brewery or microbrewery from
holding a second retail only license at a location separate from the
premises of the brewery or microbrewery.
(8) Retail licensees with a caterer's endorsement issued under RCW
66.24.320 or 66.24.420 from operating on a domestic winery premises.
(9) An organization qualifying under RCW 66.24.375 formed for the
purpose of constructing and operating a facility to promote Washington
wines from holding retail licenses on the facility property or leasing
all or any portion of such facility property to a retail licensee on
the facility property if the members of the board of directors or
officers of the board for the organization include officers, directors,
owners, or employees of a licensed domestic winery. Financing for the
construction of the facility must include both public and private
money.
(10) A bona fide charitable nonprofit society or association
registered under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code, or a local wine industry association registered under
Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(6) of the federal internal revenue code as
it existed on July 22, 2007, and having an officer, director, owner, or
employee of a licensed domestic winery or a wine certificate of
approval holder on its board of directors from holding a special
occasion license under RCW 66.24.380.
(11) A person licensed pursuant to RCW 66.24.170, 66.24.240, or
66.24.244 from exercising the privileges of distributing and selling at
retail such person's own production or from exercising any other right
or privilege that attaches to such license.
(12) A person holding a certificate of approval pursuant to RCW
66.24.206 from obtaining an endorsement to act as a distributor of
their own product or from shipping their own product directly to
consumers as authorized by RCW 66.20.360.
(13) A person holding a wine shipper's permit pursuant to RCW
66.20.375 from shipping their own product directly to consumers.
(14) A person holding a certificate of approval pursuant to RCW
66.24.270(2) from obtaining an endorsement to act as a distributor of
their own product.
(15) A domestic winery and a restaurant licensed under RCW
66.24.320 or 66.24.400 from entering an arrangement to waive a corkage
fee.

Sec. 126 RCW 66.28.300 and 2009 c 506 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any industry member or retailer or any other person seeking a
determination by the ((board)) office as to whether a proposed or
existing financial interest has resulted or is more likely than not to
result in undue influence or has resulted or is more likely than not to
result in an adverse impact on public health and safety may file a
complaint or request for determination with the ((board)) office. Upon
receipt of a request or complaint the ((board)) office may conduct such
investigation as it deems appropriate in the circumstances. If the
investigation reveals the financial interest has resulted or is more
likely than not to result in undue influence or has resulted or is more
likely than not to result in an adverse impact on public health and
safety the ((board)) office may issue an administrative violation
notice or a notice of intent to deny the license to the industry
member, to the retailer, or both. If the financial interest was
acquired through a transaction that has already been consummated when
the ((board)) office issues its administrative violation notice, the
((board)) office shall have the authority to require that the
transaction be rescinded or otherwise undone. The recipient of the
administrative notice of violation or notice of intent to deny the
license may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 127 RCW 66.28.310 and 2011 c 119 s 101 and 2011 c 66 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits an industry member from
providing retailers branded promotional items which are of nominal
value, singly or in the aggregate. Such items include but are not
limited to: Trays, lighters, blotters, postcards, pencils, coasters,
menu cards, meal checks, napkins, clocks, mugs, glasses, bottles or can
openers, corkscrews, matches, printed recipes, shirts, hats, visors,
and other similar items. Branded promotional items:
(i) Must be used exclusively by the retailer or its employees in a
manner consistent with its license;
(ii) Must bear imprinted advertising matter of the industry member
only, except imprinted advertising matter of the industry member can
include the logo of a professional sports team which the industry
member is licensed to use;
(iii) May be provided by industry members only to retailers and
their employees and may not be provided by or through retailers or
their employees to retail customers; and
(iv) May not be targeted to or appeal principally to youth.
(b) An industry member is not obligated to provide any such branded
promotional items, and a retailer may not require an industry member to
provide such branded promotional items as a condition for selling any
alcohol to the retailer.
(c) Any industry member or retailer or any other person asserting
that the provision of branded promotional items as allowed in (a) of
this subsection has resulted or is more likely than not to result in
undue influence or an adverse impact on public health and safety, or is
otherwise inconsistent with the criteria in (a) of this subsection may
file a complaint with the ((board)) office. Upon receipt of a
complaint the ((board)) office may conduct such investigation as it
deems appropriate in the circumstances. If the investigation reveals
the provision of branded promotional items has resulted in or is more
likely than not to result in undue influence or has resulted or is more
likely than not to result in an adverse impact on public health and
safety or is otherwise inconsistent with (a) of this subsection the
((board)) office may issue an administrative violation notice to the
industry member, to the retailer, or both. The recipient of the
administrative violation notice may request a hearing under chapter
34.05 RCW.
(2) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits:
(a) An industry member from providing to a special occasion
licensee and a special occasion licensee from receiving services for:
(i) Installation of draft beer dispensing equipment or advertising;
(ii) Advertising, pouring, or dispensing of beer or wine at a beer
or wine tasting exhibition or judging event; or
(iii) Pouring or dispensing of spirits by a licensed domestic
distiller or the accredited representative of a distiller,
manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor licensed
under RCW 66.24.310; or
(b) Special occasion licensees from paying for beer or wine
immediately following the end of the special occasion event; or
(c) Wineries or breweries that are participating in a special
occasion event from paying reasonable booth fees to the special
occasion licensee.
(3) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits industry members from
performing, and retailers from accepting the service of building,
rotating, and restocking displays and stockroom inventories; rotating
and rearranging can and bottle displays of their own products;
providing point of sale material and brand signs; pricing case goods of
their own brands; and performing such similar business services
consistent with ((board)) office rules, or personal services as
described in subsection (5) of this section.
(4) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits:
(a) Industry members from listing on their internet web sites
information related to retailers who sell or promote their products,
including direct links to the retailers' internet web sites; and
(b) Retailers from listing on their internet web sites information
related to industry members whose products those retailers sell or
promote, including direct links to the industry members' web sites; or
(c) Industry members and retailers from producing, jointly or
together with regional, state, or local industry associations,
brochures and materials promoting tourism in Washington state which
contain information regarding retail licensees, industry members, and
their products.
(5) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits the performance of personal
services offered from time to time by a domestic winery or certificate
of approval holder to retailers when the personal services are (a)
conducted at a licensed premises, and (b) intended to inform, educate,
or enhance customers' knowledge or experience of the manufacturer's
products. The performance of personal services may include
participation and pouring, bottle signing events, and other similar
informational or educational activities at the premises of a retailer
holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, a wine and/or
beer restaurant license, a specialty wine shop license, a special
occasion license, a grocery store license with a tasting endorsement,
or a private club license. A domestic winery or certificate of
approval holder is not obligated to perform any such personal services,
and a retail licensee may not require a domestic winery or certificate
of approval holder to conduct any personal service as a condition for
selling any alcohol to the retail licensee, or as a condition for
including any product of the domestic winery or certificate of approval
holder in any tasting conducted by the licensee. Except as provided in
RCW 66.28.150, the cost of sampling may not be borne, directly or
indirectly, by any domestic winery or certificate of approval holder or
any distributor. Nothing in this section prohibits wineries,
certificate of approval holders, and retail licensees from identifying
the producers on private labels authorized under RCW 66.24.400,
66.24.425, and 66.24.450.
(6) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits an industry member from
entering into an arrangement with any holder of a sports entertainment
facility license or an affiliated business for brand advertising at the
licensed facility or promoting events held at the sports entertainment
facility as authorized under RCW 66.24.570.
(7) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits the performance of personal
services offered from time to time by a domestic brewery, microbrewery,
or beer certificate of approval holder to grocery store licensees with
a tasting endorsement when the personal services are (a) conducted at
a licensed premises in conjunction with a tasting event, and (b)
intended to inform, educate, or enhance customers' knowledge or
experience of the manufacturer's products. The performance of personal
services may include participation and pouring, bottle signing events,
and other similar informational or educational activities. A domestic
brewery, microbrewery, or beer certificate of approval holder is not
obligated to perform any such personal services, and a grocery store
licensee may not require the performance of any personal service as a
condition for including any product in any tasting conducted by the
licensee.
(8) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits an arrangement between a
domestic winery and a restaurant licensed under RCW 66.24.320 or
66.24.400 to waive a corkage fee.
(9) Nothing in this section prohibits professional sports teams who
hold a retail liquor license or their agents from accepting bona fide
liquor advertising from manufacturers, importers, distributors, or
their agents for use in the sporting arena. Professional sports teams
who hold a retail liquor license or their agents may license the
manufacturer, importer, distributor, or their agents to use the name
and trademarks of the professional sports team in their advertising and
promotions, under the following conditions:
(a) Such advertising must be paid for by said manufacturer,
importer, distributor, or their agent at the published advertising rate
or at a reasonable fair market value.
(b) Such advertising may carry with it no express or implied offer
on the part of the manufacturer, importer, distributor, or their agent,
or promise on the part of the retail licensee whose operation is
directly or indirectly part of the sporting arena, to stock or list any
particular brand of liquor to the total or partial exclusion of any
other brand.

Sec. 128 RCW 66.28.320 and 2009 c 506 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((board)) office shall adopt rules as are deemed necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter in accordance
with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 129 RCW 66.04.--- and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 125 are each amended to read as follows:
In this title, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Retailer," except as expressly defined by RCW 66.28.285(5)
with respect to its use in RCW 6.28.280 through 66.28.315, means the
holder of a license or permit issued by the ((board)) office
authorizing sale of liquor to consumers for consumption on and/or off
the premises. With respect to retailer licenses, "on-sale" refers to
the license privilege of selling for consumption upon the licensed
premises.
(2) "Spirits distributor" means a person, other than a person who
holds only a retail license, who buys spirits from a domestic
distiller, manufacturer, supplier, spirits distributor, or spirits
importer, or who acquires foreign-produced spirits from a source
outside of the United States, for the purpose of reselling the same not
in violation of this title, or who represents such distiller as agent.
(3) "Spirits importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits
from a distiller outside the state of Washington and imports such
spirits into the state for sale or export.

Sec. 130 RCW 66.32.010 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 208 are each amended to read as follows:
The ((board)) office may, to the extent required to control
unlawful diversion of liquor from authorized channels of distribution,
require that packages of liquor transported within the state be sealed
with such official seal as may be adopted by the ((board)) office,
except in the case of:
(1) Liquor manufactured in the state; or
(2) Liquor purchased within the state or for shipment to a consumer
within the state in accordance with the provisions of law; or
(3) Wine or beer exempted in RCW 66.12.010.

Sec. 131 RCW 66.32.020 and 1987 c 202 s 220 are each amended to
read as follows:
If, upon the sworn complaint of any person, it is made to appear to
any judge of the superior court or district court, that there is
probable cause to believe that intoxicating liquor is being
manufactured, sold, bartered, exchanged, given away, furnished, or
otherwise disposed of or kept in violation of the provisions of this
title, such judge shall, with or without the approval of the
prosecuting attorney, issue a warrant directed to a civil officer of
the state duly authorized to enforce or assist in enforcing any law
thereof, or to an inspector of the ((board)) office, commanding the
civil officer or inspector to search the premises, room, house,
building, boat, vehicle, structure or place designated and described in
the complaint and warrant, and to seize all intoxicating liquor there
found, together with the vessels in which it is contained, and all
implements, furniture, and fixtures used or kept for the illegal
manufacture, sale, barter, exchange, giving away, furnishing, or
otherwise disposing of the liquor, and to safely keep the same, and to
make a return of the warrant within ten days, showing all acts and
things done thereunder, with a particular statement of all articles
seized and the name of the person or persons in whose possession they
were found, if any, and if no person is found in the possession of the
articles, the return shall so state.

Sec. 132 RCW 66.32.090 and 1993 c 26 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In every case in which liquor is seized by a sheriff or deputy of
any county or by a police officer of any municipality or by a member of
the Washington state patrol, or any other authorized peace officer or
inspector, it shall be the duty of the sheriff or deputy of any county,
or chief of police of the municipality, or the chief of the Washington
state patrol, as the case may be, to forthwith report in writing to the
((board)) office of particulars of such seizure.

Sec. 133 RCW 66.40.030 and 2009 c 271 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within any unit referred to in RCW 66.40.010, there may be held a
separate election upon the question of whether the sale of liquor under
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private
club; spirits, beer, and wine nightclub; and sports entertainment
facility licenses, shall be permitted within such unit. The conditions
and procedure for holding such election shall be those prescribed by
RCW 66.40.020, 66.40.040, 66.40.100, 66.40.110 and 66.40.120. Whenever
a majority of qualified voters voting upon said question in any such
unit shall have voted "against the sale of liquor under spirits, beer,
and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club; spirits,
beer, and wine nightclub; and sports entertainment facility licenses",
the county auditor shall file with the ((liquor control board)) office
a certificate showing the result of the canvass at such election; and
after ninety days from and after the date of the canvass, it shall not
be lawful for licensees to maintain and operate premises within the
election unit licensed under spirits, beer, and wine restaurant;
spirits, beer, and wine private club; spirits, beer, and wine
nightclub; and sports entertainment facility licenses. The addition
after an election under this section of new territory to a city, town,
or county, by annexation, disincorporation, or otherwise, shall not
extend the prohibition against the sale of liquor under spirits, beer,
and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club; spirits,
beer, and wine nightclub; and sports entertainment facility licenses to
the new territory. Elections held under RCW 66.40.010, 66.40.020,
66.40.040, 66.40.100, 66.40.110, 66.40.120 and 66.40.140, shall be
limited to the question of whether the sale of liquor by means other
than under spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine
private club; spirits, beer, and wine nightclub; and sports
entertainment facility licenses shall be permitted within such election
unit.

Sec. 134 RCW 66.40.140 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 88 are each amended
to read as follows:
Whenever a majority of qualified voters voting upon said question
in any such unit shall have voted "Against sale of liquor", the county
auditor shall file with the ((liquor control board)) office a
certificate showing the result of the canvass at such election; and
thereafter, except as hereinafter provided, it shall not be lawful for
a liquor store to be operated therein nor for licensees to maintain and
operate licensed premises therein except as hereinafter provided:
(1) As to any stores maintained by the ((board)) office within any
such unit at the time of such licensing, the ((board)) office shall
have a period of thirty days from and after the date of the canvass of
the vote upon such election to continue operation of its store or
stores therein.
(2) As to any premises licensed hereunder within any such unit at
the time of such election, such licensee shall have a period of sixty
days from and after the date of the canvass of the vote upon such
election in which to discontinue operation of its store or stores
therein.
(3) Nothing herein contained shall prevent any distillery, brewery,
rectifying plant or winery or the licensed operators thereof from
selling its manufactured product, manufactured within such unit,
outside the boundaries thereof.
(4) Nothing herein contained shall prevent any person residing in
any unit in which the sale of liquor shall have been forbidden by
popular vote as herein provided, who is otherwise qualified to receive
and hold a permit under this title, from lawfully purchasing without
the unit and transporting into or receiving within the unit, liquor
lawfully purchased by him or her outside the boundaries of such unit.

Sec. 135 RCW 66.44.010 and 1998 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All county and municipal peace officers are hereby charged with
the duty of investigating and prosecuting all violations of this title,
and the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture,
importation, transportation, possession, distribution and sale of
liquor, and all fines imposed for violations of this title and the
penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture, importation,
transportation, possession, distribution and sale of liquor shall
belong to the county, city or town wherein the court imposing the fine
is located, and shall be placed in the general fund for payment of the
salaries of those engaged in the enforcement of the provisions of this
title and the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture,
importation, transportation, possession, distribution and sale of
liquor: PROVIDED, That all fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties
collected or assessed by a district court because of the violation of
a state law shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW as now
exists or is later amended.
(2) In addition to any and all other powers granted, the ((board))
office shall have the power to enforce the penal provisions of this
title and the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture,
importation, transportation, possession, distribution and sale of
liquor.
(3) In addition to the other duties under this section, the
((board)) office shall enforce chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW.
(4) The ((board)) office may appoint and employ, assign to duty and
fix the compensation of, officers to be designated as liquor
enforcement officers. Such liquor enforcement officers shall have the
power, under the supervision of the ((board)) office, to enforce the
penal provisions of this title and the penal laws of this state
relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession,
distribution and sale of liquor. They shall have the power and
authority to serve and execute all warrants and process of law issued
by the courts in enforcing the penal provisions of this title or of any
penal law of this state relating to the manufacture, importation,
transportation, possession, distribution and sale of liquor, and the
provisions of chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW. They shall have the power
to arrest without a warrant any person or persons found in the act of
violating any of the penal provisions of this title or of any penal law
of this state relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation,
possession, distribution and sale of liquor, and the provisions of
chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW.

Sec. 136 RCW 66.44.070 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 60 are each amended
to read as follows:
A certificate, signed by any person appointed or designated by the
((board)) office in writing as an analyst, as to the percentage of
alcohol contained in any liquid, drink, liquor, or combination of
liquors, when produced in any court or before any court shall be prima
facie evidence of the percentage of alcohol contained therein.

Sec. 137 RCW 66.44.120 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 209 are each amended to read as follows:
(1) No person other than an employee of the ((board)) office may
keep or have in his or her possession any official seal adopted by the
((board)) office under this title, unless the same is attached to a
package in accordance with the law; nor may any person keep or have in
his or her possession any design in imitation of any official seal
prescribed under this title, or calculated to deceive by its
resemblance thereto, or any paper upon which any design in imitation
thereof, or calculated to deceive as aforesaid, is stamped, engraved,
lithographed, printed, or otherwise marked.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, every person
who willfully violates this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor
and is liable on conviction thereof for a first offense to imprisonment
in the county jail for a period of not less than three months nor more
than six months, without the option of the payment of a fine, and for
a second offense, to imprisonment in the county jail for not less than
six months nor more than three hundred sixty-four days, without the
option of the payment of a fine.
(b) A third or subsequent offense is a class C felony, punishable
by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not less than one
year nor more than two years.

Sec. 138 RCW 66.44.150 and 2012 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 1183)
s 210 are each amended to read as follows:
If any person in this state buys alcoholic beverages from any
person other than a person authorized by the ((board)) office to sell
alcoholic beverages, he or she is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 139 RCW 66.44.160 and 1955 c 289 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in this title, any person who has or
keeps or transports alcoholic beverages other than those purchased from
the ((board)) office, a state liquor store, or some person authorized
by the ((board)) office to sell them, shall be guilty of a violation of
this title.

Sec. 140 RCW 66.44.200 and 1998 c 259 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person shall sell any liquor to any person apparently under
the influence of liquor.
(2)(a) No person who is apparently under the influence of liquor
may purchase or consume liquor on any premises licensed by the
((board)) office.
(b) A violation of this subsection is an infraction punishable by
a fine of not more than five hundred dollars.
(c) A defendant's intoxication may not be used as a defense in an
action under this subsection.
(d) Until July 1, 2000, every establishment licensed under RCW
66.24.330 or 66.24.420 shall conspicuously post in the establishment
notice of the prohibition against the purchase or consumption of liquor
under this subsection.
(3) An administrative action for violation of subsection (1) of
this section and an infraction issued for violation of subsection (2)
of this section arising out of the same incident are separate actions
and the outcome of one shall not determine the outcome of the other.

Sec. 141 RCW 66.44.290 and 2003 c 53 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every person under the age of twenty-one years who purchases or
attempts to purchase liquor shall be guilty of a violation of this
title. This section does not apply to persons between the ages of
eighteen and twenty-one years who are participating in a controlled
purchase program authorized by the ((liquor control board)) office
under rules adopted by the ((board)) office. Violations occurring
under a private, controlled purchase program authorized by the ((liquor
control board)) office may not be used for criminal or administrative
prosecution.
(2) An employer who conducts an in-house controlled purchase
program authorized under this section shall provide his or her
employees a written description of the employer's in-house controlled
purchase program. The written description must include notice of
actions an employer may take as a consequence of an employee's failure
to comply with company policies regarding the sale of alcohol during an
in-house controlled purchase.
(3) An in-house controlled purchase program authorized under this
section shall be for the purposes of employee training and employer
self-compliance checks. An employer may not terminate an employee
solely for a first-time failure to comply with company policies
regarding the sale of alcohol during an in-house controlled purchase
program authorized under this section.
(4) Every person between the ages of eighteen and twenty,
inclusive, who is convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of
a misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a
minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars shall be imposed and any
sentence requiring community restitution shall require not fewer than
twenty-five hours of community restitution.

Sec. 142 RCW 66.44.292 and 1981 1st ex.s. c 5 s 23 are each
amended to read as follows:
The ((Washington state liquor control board)) office shall furnish
notification of any hearing or hearings held, wherein any licensee or
his or her employee is found to have sold liquor to a minor, to the
prosecuting attorney of the county in which the sale took place, upon
which the prosecuting attorney may formulate charges against said minor
or minors for such violation of RCW 66.44.290 as may appear.

Sec. 143 RCW 66.44.310 and 2007 c 370 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by RCW 66.44.316, 66.44.350, and
66.24.590, it shall be a misdemeanor:
(a) To serve or allow to remain in any area classified by the
((board)) office as off-limits to any person under the age of twenty-one years;
(b) For any person under the age of twenty-one years to enter or
remain in any area classified as off-limits to such a person, but
persons under twenty-one years of age may pass through a restricted
area in a facility holding a spirits, beer, and wine private club
license;
(c) For any person under the age of twenty-one years to represent
his or her age as being twenty-one or more years for the purpose of
purchasing liquor or securing admission to, or remaining in any area
classified by the ((board)) office as off-limits to such a person.
(2) The ((Washington state liquor control board)) office shall have
the power and it shall be its duty to classify licensed premises or
portions of licensed premises as off-limits to persons under the age of
twenty-one years of age.

Sec. 144 RCW 66.44.350 and 1999 c 281 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding provisions of RCW 66.44.310, employees holding beer
and/or wine restaurant; beer and/or wine private club; snack bar;
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private
club; and sports entertainment facility licenses who are licensees
eighteen years of age and over may take orders for, serve and sell
liquor in any part of the licensed premises except cocktail lounges,
bars, or other areas classified by the ((Washington state liquor
control board)) office as off-limits to persons under twenty-one years
of age: PROVIDED, That such employees may enter such restricted areas
to perform work assignments including picking up liquor for service in
other parts of the licensed premises, performing clean up work, setting
up and arranging tables, delivering supplies, delivering messages,
serving food, and seating patrons: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such
employees shall remain in the areas off-limits to minors no longer than
is necessary to carry out their aforementioned duties: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That such employees shall not be permitted to perform
activities or functions of a bartender.

Sec. 145 RCW 66.98.070 and 1949 c 5 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of ((this
act)) section 15, chapter 5, Laws of 1949, the ((board)) office shall
have the same power to make regulations not inconsistent with the
spirit of ((this act)) section 15, chapter 5, Laws of 1949 as is
provided by RCW 66.08.030.

Sec. 146 RCW 9.41.300 and 2011 c 221 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to enter the following places
when he or she knowingly possesses or knowingly has under his or her
control a weapon:
(a) The restricted access areas of a jail, or of a law enforcement
facility, or any place used for the confinement of a person (i)
arrested for, charged with, or convicted of an offense, (ii) held for
extradition or as a material witness, or (iii) otherwise confined
pursuant to an order of a court, except an order under chapter 13.32A
or 13.34 RCW. Restricted access areas do not include common areas of
egress or ingress open to the general public;
(b) Those areas in any building which are used in connection with
court proceedings, including courtrooms, jury rooms, judge's chambers,
offices and areas used to conduct court business, waiting areas, and
corridors adjacent to areas used in connection with court proceedings.
The restricted areas do not include common areas of ingress and egress
to the building that is used in connection with court proceedings, when
it is possible to protect court areas without restricting ingress and
egress to the building. The restricted areas shall be the minimum
necessary to fulfill the objective of this subsection (1)(b).
For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), "weapon" means any firearm,
explosive as defined in RCW 70.74.010, or any weapon of the kind
usually known as slung shot, sand club, or metal knuckles, or any
knife, dagger, dirk, or other similar weapon that is capable of causing
death or bodily injury and is commonly used with the intent to cause
death or bodily injury.
In addition, the local legislative authority shall provide either
a stationary locked box sufficient in size for pistols and key to a
weapon owner for weapon storage, or shall designate an official to
receive weapons for safekeeping, during the owner's visit to restricted
areas of the building. The locked box or designated official shall be
located within the same building used in connection with court
proceedings. The local legislative authority shall be liable for any
negligence causing damage to or loss of a weapon either placed in a
locked box or left with an official during the owner's visit to
restricted areas of the building.
The local judicial authority shall designate and clearly mark those
areas where weapons are prohibited, and shall post notices at each
entrance to the building of the prohibition against weapons in the
restricted areas;
(c) The restricted access areas of a public mental health facility
certified by the department of social and health services for inpatient
hospital care and state institutions for the care of the mentally ill,
excluding those facilities solely for evaluation and treatment.
Restricted access areas do not include common areas of egress and
ingress open to the general public;
(d) That portion of an establishment classified by the ((state
liquor)) office of alcohol beverage control ((board)) as off-limits to
persons under twenty-one years of age; or
(e) The restricted access areas of a commercial service airport
designated in the airport security plan approved by the federal
transportation security administration, including passenger screening
checkpoints at or beyond the point at which a passenger initiates the
screening process. These areas do not include airport drives, general
parking areas and walkways, and shops and areas of the terminal that
are outside the screening checkpoints and that are normally open to
unscreened passengers or visitors to the airport. Any restricted
access area shall be clearly indicated by prominent signs indicating
that firearms and other weapons are prohibited in the area.
(2) Cities, towns, counties, and other municipalities may enact
laws and ordinances:
(a) Restricting the discharge of firearms in any portion of their
respective jurisdictions where there is a reasonable likelihood that
humans, domestic animals, or property will be jeopardized. Such laws
and ordinances shall not abridge the right of the individual guaranteed
by Article I, section 24 of the state Constitution to bear arms in
defense of self or others; and
(b) Restricting the possession of firearms in any stadium or
convention center, operated by a city, town, county, or other
municipality, except that such restrictions shall not apply to:
(i) Any pistol in the possession of a person licensed under RCW
9.41.070 or exempt from the licensing requirement by RCW 9.41.060; or
(ii) Any showing, demonstration, or lecture involving the
exhibition of firearms.
(3)(a) Cities, towns, and counties may enact ordinances restricting
the areas in their respective jurisdictions in which firearms may be
sold, but, except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a business
selling firearms may not be treated more restrictively than other
businesses located within the same zone. An ordinance requiring the
cessation of business within a zone shall not have a shorter
grandfather period for businesses selling firearms than for any other
businesses within the zone.
(b) Cities, towns, and counties may restrict the location of a
business selling firearms to not less than five hundred feet from
primary or secondary school grounds, if the business has a storefront,
has hours during which it is open for business, and posts
advertisements or signs observable to passersby that firearms are
available for sale. A business selling firearms that exists as of the
date a restriction is enacted under this subsection (3)(b) shall be
grandfathered according to existing law.
(4) Violations of local ordinances adopted under subsection (2) of
this section must have the same penalty as provided for by state law.
(5) The perimeter of the premises of any specific location covered
by subsection (1) of this section shall be posted at reasonable
intervals to alert the public as to the existence of any law
restricting the possession of firearms on the premises.
(6) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A person engaged in military activities sponsored by the
federal or state governments, while engaged in official duties;
(b) Law enforcement personnel, except that subsection (1)(b) of
this section does apply to a law enforcement officer who is present at
a courthouse building as a party to an action under chapter 10.14,
10.99, or 26.50 RCW, or an action under Title 26 RCW where any party
has alleged the existence of domestic violence as defined in RCW
26.50.010; or
(c) Security personnel while engaged in official duties.
(7) Subsection (1)(a), (b), (c), and (e) of this section does not
apply to correctional personnel or community corrections officers, as
long as they are employed as such, who have completed government-sponsored law enforcement firearms training, except that subsection
(1)(b) of this section does apply to a correctional employee or
community corrections officer who is present at a courthouse building
as a party to an action under chapter 10.14, 10.99, or 26.50 RCW, or an
action under Title 26 RCW where any party has alleged the existence of
domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010.
(8) Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to a person
licensed pursuant to RCW 9.41.070 who, upon entering the place or
facility, directly and promptly proceeds to the administrator of the
facility or the administrator's designee and obtains written permission
to possess the firearm while on the premises or checks his or her
firearm. The person may reclaim the firearms upon leaving but must
immediately and directly depart from the place or facility.
(9) Subsection (1)(c) of this section does not apply to any
administrator or employee of the facility or to any person who, upon
entering the place or facility, directly and promptly proceeds to the
administrator of the facility or the administrator's designee and
obtains written permission to possess the firearm while on the
premises.
(10) Subsection (1)(d) of this section does not apply to the
proprietor of the premises or his or her employees while engaged in
their employment.
(11) Government-sponsored law enforcement firearms training must be
training that correctional personnel and community corrections officers
receive as part of their job requirement and reference to such training
does not constitute a mandate that it be provided by the correctional
facility.
(12) Any person violating subsection (1) of this section is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor.
(13) "Weapon" as used in this section means any firearm, explosive
as defined in RCW 70.74.010, or instrument or weapon listed in RCW
9.41.250.

Sec. 147 RCW 9.46.0315 and 1991 c 192 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit organizations organized
primarily for purposes other than the conduct of raffles, are hereby
authorized to conduct raffles without obtaining a license to do so from
the commission when such raffles are held in accordance with all other
requirements of this chapter, other applicable laws, and rules of the
commission; when gross revenues from all such raffles held by the
organization during the calendar year do not exceed five thousand
dollars; and when tickets to such raffles are sold only to, and winners
are determined only from among, the regular members of the organization
conducting the raffle. The organization may provide unopened
containers of beverages containing alcohol as raffle prizes if the
appropriate permit has been obtained from the ((liquor)) office of
alcohol beverage control ((board)): PROVIDED, That the term members
for this purpose shall mean only those persons who have become members
prior to the commencement of the raffle and whose qualification for
membership was not dependent upon, or in any way related to, the
purchase of a ticket, or tickets, for such raffles.

Sec. 148 RCW 9.46.0331 and 2009 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature hereby authorizes any person to conduct or operate
amusement games when licensed and operated pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter and rules and regulations adopted by the commission at
such locations as the commission may authorize. The rules shall
provide for at least the following:
(1) Persons other than bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit
organizations shall conduct amusement games only after obtaining a
special amusement game license from the commission.
(2) Amusement games may be conducted under such a license only as
a part of, and upon the site of:
(a) Any agricultural fair as authorized under chapter 15.76 or
36.37 RCW; or
(b) A civic center of a county, city, or town; or
(c) A world's fair or similar exposition that is approved by the
bureau of international expositions at Paris, France; or
(d) A community-wide civic festival held not more than once
annually and sponsored or approved by the city, town, or county in
which it is held; or
(e) A commercial exposition organized and sponsored by an
organization or association representing the retail sales and service
operators conducting business in a shopping center or other commercial
area developed and operated for retail sales and service, but only upon
a parking lot or similar area located in said shopping center or
commercial area for a period of no more than seventeen consecutive days
by any licensee during any calendar year; or
(f) An amusement park. An amusement park is a group of activities,
at a permanent location, to which people go to be entertained through
a combination of various mechanical or aquatic rides, theatrical
productions, motion picture, and/or slide show presentations with food
and drink service. The amusement park must include at least five
different mechanical, or aquatic rides, three additional activities,
and the gross receipts must be primarily from these amusement
activities; or
(g) Within a regional shopping center. A regional shopping center
is a shopping center developed and operated for retail sales and
service by retail sales and service operators and consisting of more
than six hundred thousand gross square feet not including parking
areas. Amusement games conducted as a part of, and upon the site of,
a regional shopping center shall not be subject to the prohibition on
revenue sharing set forth in RCW 9.46.120(2); or
(h) A location that possesses a valid license from the Washington
state ((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage control ((board)) and
prohibits minors on their premises; or
(i) Movie theaters, bowling alleys, miniature golf course
facilities, and amusement centers. For the purposes of this section an
amusement center shall be defined as a permanent location whose primary
source of income is from the operation of ten or more amusement
devices; or
(j) Any business whose primary activity is to provide food service
for on premises consumption and who offers family entertainment which
includes at least three of the following activities: Amusement
devices; theatrical productions; mechanical rides; motion pictures; and
slide show presentations; or
(k) Other locations as the commission may authorize.
(3) No amusement games may be conducted in any location except in
conformance with local zoning, fire, health, and similar regulations.
In no event may the licensee conduct any amusement games at any of the
locations set out in subsection (2) of this section without first
having obtained the written permission to do so from the person or
organization owning the premises or an authorized agent thereof, and
from the persons sponsoring the fair, exhibition, commercial
exhibition, or festival, or from the city or town operating the civic
center, in connection with which the games are to be operated.
(4) In no event may a licensee conduct any amusement games at the
location described in subsection (2)(g) of this section, without, at
the location of such games, providing adult supervision during all
hours the licensee is open for business at such location, prohibiting
school-age minors from entry during school hours, maintaining full-time
personnel whose responsibilities include maintaining security and daily
machine maintenance, and providing for hours for the close of business
at such location that are no later than 10:00 p.m. on Fridays and
Saturdays and on all other days that are the same as those of the
regional shopping center in which the licensee is located.
(5) In no event may a licensee conduct any amusement game at a
location described in subsection (2)(i) or (j) of this section,
without, at the location of such games, providing adult supervision
during all hours the licensee is open for business at such location,
prohibiting school-age minors from playing licensed amusement games
during school hours, maintaining full-time personnel whose
responsibilities include maintaining security and daily machine
maintenance, and prohibiting minors from playing the amusement games
after 10:00 p.m. on any day.

Sec. 149 RCW 10.93.020 and 2006 c 284 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "General authority Washington law enforcement agency" means any
agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political
subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, and any
agency, department, or division of state government, having as its
primary function the detection and apprehension of persons committing
infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in general, as
distinguished from a limited authority Washington law enforcement
agency, and any other unit of government expressly designated by
statute as a general authority Washington law enforcement agency. The
Washington state patrol and the department of fish and wildlife are
general authority Washington law enforcement agencies.
(2) "Limited authority Washington law enforcement agency" means any
agency, political subdivision, or unit of local government of this
state, and any agency, department, or division of state government,
having as one of its functions the apprehension or detection of persons
committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws
relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to, the
state departments of natural resources and social and health services,
the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission, the state
parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and transportation
commission, the state ((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage control
((board)), the office of the insurance commissioner, and the state
department of corrections.
(3) "General authority Washington peace officer" means any full-time, fully compensated and elected, appointed, or employed officer of
a general authority Washington law enforcement agency who is
commissioned to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington
generally.
(4) "Limited authority Washington peace officer" means any full-time, fully compensated officer of a limited authority Washington law
enforcement agency empowered by that agency to detect or apprehend
violators of the laws in some or all of the limited subject areas for
which that agency is responsible. A limited authority Washington peace
officer may be a specially commissioned Washington peace officer if
otherwise qualified for such status under this chapter.
(5) "Specially commissioned Washington peace officer", for the
purposes of this chapter, means any officer, whether part-time or full-time, compensated or not, commissioned by a general authority
Washington law enforcement agency to enforce some or all of the
criminal laws of the state of Washington, who does not qualify under
this chapter as a general authority Washington peace officer for that
commissioning agency, specifically including reserve peace officers,
and specially commissioned full-time, fully compensated peace officers
duly commissioned by the states of Oregon or Idaho or any such peace
officer commissioned by a unit of local government of Oregon or Idaho.
A reserve peace officer is an individual who is an officer of a
Washington law enforcement agency who does not serve such agency on a
full-time basis but who, when called by the agency into active service,
is fully commissioned on the same basis as full-time peace officers to
enforce the criminal laws of the state.
(6) "Federal peace officer" means any employee or agent of the
United States government who has the authority to carry firearms and
make warrantless arrests and whose duties involve the enforcement of
criminal laws of the United States.
(7) "Agency with primary territorial jurisdiction" means a city or
town police agency which has responsibility for police activity within
its boundaries; or a county police or sheriff's department which has
responsibility with regard to police activity in the unincorporated
areas within the county boundaries; or a statutorily authorized port
district police agency or four-year state college or university police
agency which has responsibility for police activity within the
statutorily authorized enforcement boundaries of the port district,
state college, or university.
(8) "Primary commissioning agency" means (a) the employing agency
in the case of a general authority Washington peace officer, a limited
authority Washington peace officer, an Indian tribal peace officer, or
a federal peace officer, and (b) the commissioning agency in the case
of a specially commissioned Washington peace officer (i) who is
performing functions within the course and scope of the special
commission and (ii) who is not also a general authority Washington
peace officer, a limited authority Washington peace officer, an Indian
tribal peace officer, or a federal peace officer.
(9) "Primary function of an agency" means that function to which
greater than fifty percent of the agency's resources are allocated.
(10) "Mutual law enforcement assistance" includes, but is not
limited to, one or more law enforcement agencies aiding or assisting
one or more other such agencies through loans or exchanges of personnel
or of material resources, for law enforcement purposes.

Sec. 150 RCW 15.89.070 and 2011 c 103 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Elect a chair and officers. The officers must include a
treasurer who is responsible for all receipts and disbursements by the
commission and the faithful discharge of whose duties shall be
guaranteed by a bond at the sole expense of the commission. The
commission must adopt rules for its own governance that provide for the
holding of an annual meeting for the election of officers and the
transaction of other business and for other meetings the commission may
direct;
(2) Do all things reasonably necessary to effect the purposes of
this chapter. However, the commission has no rule-making power except
as provided in this chapter;
(3) Employ and discharge managers, secretaries, agents, attorneys,
and employees and engage the services of independent contractors;
(4) Retain, as necessary, the services of private legal counsel to
conduct legal actions on behalf of the commission. The retention of a
private attorney is subject to review by the office of the attorney
general;
(5) Receive donations of beer from producers for promotional
purposes under subsections (6) and (7) of this section and for fund-raising purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Donations of
beer for promotional purposes may only be disseminated without charge;
(6) Engage directly or indirectly in the promotion of Washington
beer, including, without limitation, the acquisition in any lawful
manner and the dissemination without charge of beer. This
dissemination is not deemed a sale for any purpose and the commission
is not deemed a producer, supplier, or manufacturer, or the clerk,
servant, or agent of a producer, supplier, distributor, or
manufacturer. This dissemination without charge shall be for
agricultural development or trade promotion, and not for fund-raising
purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Dissemination for
promotional purposes may include promotional hosting and must in the
good faith judgment of the commission be in the aid of the marketing,
advertising, sale of beer, or of research related to such marketing,
advertising, or sale;
(7) Promote Washington beer by conducting unique beer tastings
without charge;
(8) Beginning July 1, 2007, fund the Washington beer commission
through sponsorship of up to twelve beer festivals annually at which
beer may be sold to festival participants. For this purpose, the
commission would qualify for issue of a special occasion license as an
exception to WAC 314-05-020 but must comply with laws under Title 66
RCW and rules adopted by the ((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage
control ((board)) under which such events may be conducted;
(9) Participate in international, federal, state, and local
hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production,
regulation, distribution, sale, or use of beer including activities
authorized under RCW 42.17A.635, including the reporting of those
activities to the public disclosure commission;
(10) Acquire and transfer personal and real property, establish
offices, incur expenses, and enter into contracts, including contracts
for the creation and printing of promotional literature. The contracts
are not subject to chapter 43.78 RCW, and are cancelable by the
commission unless performed under conditions of employment that
substantially conform to the laws of this state and the rules of the
department of labor and industries. The commission may create debt and
other liabilities that are reasonable for proper discharge of its
duties under this chapter;
(11) Maintain accounts with one or more qualified public
depositories as the commission may direct, for the deposit of money,
and expend money for purposes authorized by this chapter by drafts made
by the commission upon such institutions or by other means;
(12) Cause to be kept and annually closed, in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles, accurate records of all
receipts, disbursements, and other financial transactions, available
for audit by the state auditor;
(13) Create and maintain a list of producers and disseminate
information among and solicit the opinions of producers with respect to
the discharge of the duties of the commission, directly or by
arrangement with trade associations or other instrumentalities;
(14) Employ, designate as an agent, act in concert with, and enter
into contracts with any person, council, commission, or other entity to
promote the general welfare of the beer industry and particularly to
assist in the sale and distribution of Washington beer in domestic and
foreign commerce. The commission shall expend money necessary or
advisable for this purpose and to pay its proportionate share of the
cost of any program providing direct or indirect assistance to the sale
and distribution of Washington beer in domestic or foreign commerce,
employing and paying for vendors of professional services of all kinds;
(15) Sue and be sued as a commission, without individual liability
for acts of the commission within the scope of the powers conferred
upon it by this chapter;
(16) Serve as liaison with the ((liquor)) office of alcohol
beverage control ((board)) on behalf of the commission and not for any
individual producer;
(17) Receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or
private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the commission
and expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of
the gifts, grants, or endowments.

Sec. 151 RCW 15.89.100 and 2011 c 54 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall prepare a list of all producers from
information available from the ((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage
control ((board)), the department, or the producers' association. This
list must contain the names and addresses of producers within this
state and the amount, by barrelage, of beer produced during the period
designated by the commission. A qualified person may, at any time,
have his or her name placed upon the list by delivering or mailing the
information to the commission. This list shall be corrected and
brought up-to-date in accordance with evidence and information
available to the commission by December 31st of each year. For the
purposes of giving notice and holding referendums, the list updated
before the date for issuing notices or ballots is the list of all
producers entitled to notice, to assent or dissent, or to vote.
Inadvertent failure to notify a producer does not invalidate a
proceeding conducted under this chapter.
(2) It is the responsibility of producers to ensure that their
correct address is filed with the commission. It is also the
responsibility of producers to submit production data to the commission
as prescribed by this chapter.
(3) The commission shall develop a reporting system to document
that the producers in this state are reporting quantities of beer
produced and are paying the assessment as provided in RCW 15.89.110.

Sec. 152 RCW 15.89.160 and 2006 c 330 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
County and state law enforcement officers, the ((liquor)) office of
alcohol beverage control ((board)) and its enforcement agents, and
employees of the department shall enforce this chapter.

Sec. 153 RCW 19.02.050 and 2011 c 298 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature hereby directs the full participation by the
following agencies in the implementation of this chapter:
(1) Department of agriculture;
(2) Secretary of state;
(3) Department of social and health services;
(4) Department of revenue;
(5) Department of fish and wildlife;
(6) Employment security department;
(7) Department of labor and industries;
(8) Department of commerce;
(9) ((Liquor)) Office of alcohol beverage control ((board));
(10) Department of health;
(11) Department of licensing;
(12) Parks and recreation commission;
(13) Utilities and transportation commission; and
(14) Other agencies as determined by the governor.

Sec. 154 RCW 19.126.070 and 1985 c 440 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Continued violation of this chapter constitutes grounds, in the
discretion of the ((state liquor)) office of alcohol beverage control
((board)), for suspension or cancellation under RCW 66.24.010 of any
license or certificate held by a supplier or its agent.

Sec. 155 RCW 19.192.010 and 1998 c 24 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person or entity, other than those listed in subsection (2)
of this section, issuing an identification card that purports to
identify the holder as a resident of this or any other state and that
contains at least a name, photograph, and date of birth, must label the
card "not official proof of identification" in flourescent yellow ink,
on the face of the card, and in not less than fourteen-point font. The
background color of the card must be a color other than the color used
for official Washington state driver's licenses and identicards.
(2) This section does not apply to the following persons and
entities:
(a) Department of licensing;
(b) Any federal, state, or local government agency;
(c) The Washington state ((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage
control ((board));
(d) Private employers issuing cards identifying employees;
(e) Banks and credit card companies issuing credit, debit, or bank
cards containing a person's photograph; and
(f) Retail or wholesale stores issuing membership cards containing
a person's photograph.
(3) Failure to comply with this section is a class 1 civil
infraction.

Sec. 156 RCW 35A.66.020 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.66.020 are
each amended to read as follows:
The qualified electors of any code city may petition for an
election upon the question of whether the sale of liquor shall be
permitted within the boundaries of such city as provided by chapter
66.40 RCW, and shall be governed by the procedure therein, and may
regulate music, dancing and entertainment as authorized by RCW
66.28.080: PROVIDED, That every code city shall enforce state laws
relating to the investigation and prosecution of all violations of
Title 66 RCW relating to control of alcoholic beverages and shall be
entitled to retain the fines collected therefrom as therein provided.
Every code city shall also share in the allocation and distribution of
liquor profits and excise as provided in RCW 82.08.170, 66.08.190, and
66.08.210, and make reports of seizure as required by RCW 66.32.090,
and otherwise regulate by ordinances not in conflict with state law or
((liquor board)) office of alcohol beverage control regulations.

Sec. 157 RCW 36.27.020 and 1995 c 194 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The prosecuting attorney shall:
(1) Be legal adviser of the legislative authority, giving ((them
[it])) it his or her written opinion when required by the legislative
authority or the chairperson thereof touching any subject which the
legislative authority may be called or required to act upon relating to
the management of county affairs;
(2) Be legal adviser to all county and precinct officers and school
directors in all matters relating to their official business, and when
required draw up all instruments of an official nature for the use of
said officers;
(3) Appear for and represent the state, county, and all school
districts subject to the supervisory control and direction of the
attorney general in all criminal and civil proceedings in which the
state or the county or any school district in the county may be a
party;
(4) Prosecute all criminal and civil actions in which the state or
the county may be a party, defend all suits brought against the state
or the county, and prosecute actions upon forfeited recognizances and
bonds and actions for the recovery of debts, fines, penalties, and
forfeitures accruing to the state or the county;
(5) Attend and appear before and give advice to the grand jury when
cases are presented to it for consideration and draw all indictments
when required by the grand jury;
(6) Institute and prosecute proceedings before magistrates for the
arrest of persons charged with or reasonably suspected of felonies when
the prosecuting attorney has information that any such offense has been
committed and the prosecuting attorney shall for that purpose attend
when required by them if the prosecuting attorney is not then in
attendance upon the superior court;
(7) Carefully tax all cost bills in criminal cases and take care
that no useless witness fees are taxed as part of the costs and that
the officers authorized to execute process tax no other or greater fees
than the fees allowed by law;
(8) Receive all cost bills in criminal cases before district judges
at the trial of which the prosecuting attorney was not present, before
they are lodged with the legislative authority for payment, whereupon
the prosecuting attorney may retax the same and the prosecuting
attorney must do so if the legislative authority deems any bill
exorbitant or improperly taxed;
(9) Present all violations of the election laws which may come to
the prosecuting attorney's knowledge to the special consideration of
the proper jury;
(10) Examine once in each year the official bonds of all county and
precinct officers and report to the legislative authority any defect in
the bonds of any such officer;
(11) Make an annual report to the governor as of the 31st of
December of each year setting forth the amount and nature of business
transacted by the prosecuting attorney in that year with such other
statements and suggestions as the prosecuting attorney may deem useful;
(12) Send to the ((state liquor)) office of alcohol beverage
control ((board)) at the end of each year a written report of all
prosecutions brought under the state liquor laws in the county during
the preceding year, showing in each case, the date of trial, name of
accused, nature of charges, disposition of case, and the name of the
judge presiding;
(13) Seek to reform and improve the administration of criminal
justice and stimulate efforts to remedy inadequacies or injustice in
substantive or procedural law.

Sec. 158 RCW 41.26.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 5 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly
required by the context:
(1) "Accumulated contributions" means the employee's contributions
made by a member, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2),
plus accrued interest credited thereon.
(2) "Actuarial reserve" means a method of financing a pension or
retirement plan wherein reserves are accumulated as the liabilities for
benefit payments are incurred in order that sufficient funds will be
available on the date of retirement of each member to pay the member's
future benefits during the period of retirement.
(3) "Actuarial valuation" means a mathematical determination of the
financial condition of a retirement plan. It includes the computation
of the present monetary value of benefits payable to present members,
and the present monetary value of future employer and employee
contributions, giving effect to mortality among active and retired
members and also to the rates of disability, retirement, withdrawal
from service, salary and interest earned on investments.
(4)(a) "Basic salary" for plan 1 members, means the basic monthly
rate of salary or wages, including longevity pay but not including
overtime earnings or special salary or wages, upon which pension or
retirement benefits will be computed and upon which employer
contributions and salary deductions will be based.
(b) "Basic salary" for plan 2 members, means salaries or wages
earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services,
including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries
deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b),
414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall
exclude lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused
accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of
severance pay. In any year in which a member serves in the legislature
the member shall have the option of having such member's basic salary
be the greater of:
(i) The basic salary the member would have received had such member
not served in the legislature; or
(ii) Such member's actual basic salary received for nonlegislative
public employment and legislative service combined. Any additional
contributions to the retirement system required because basic salary
under (b)(i) of this subsection is greater than basic salary under
(b)(ii) of this subsection shall be paid by the member for both member
and employer contributions.
(5)(a) "Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance, disability allowance, death benefit,
or any other benefit described herein.
(b) "Beneficiary" for plan 2 members, means any person in receipt
of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter
resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.
(6)(a) "Child" or "children" means an unmarried person who is under
the age of eighteen or mentally or physically disabled as determined by
the department, except a person who is disabled and in the full time
care of a state institution, who is:
(i) A natural born child;
(ii) A stepchild where that relationship was in existence prior to
the date benefits are payable under this chapter;
(iii) A posthumous child;
(iv) A child legally adopted or made a legal ward of a member prior
to the date benefits are payable under this chapter; or
(v) An illegitimate child legitimized prior to the date any
benefits are payable under this chapter.
(b) A person shall also be deemed to be a child up to and including
the age of twenty years and eleven months while attending any high
school, college, or vocational or other educational institution
accredited, licensed, or approved by the state, in which it is located,
including the summer vacation months and all other normal and regular
vacation periods at the particular educational institution after which
the child returns to school.
(7) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created
in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(8) "Director" means the director of the department.
(9) "Disability board" for plan 1 members means either the county
disability board or the city disability board established in RCW
41.26.110.
(10) "Disability leave" means the period of six months or any
portion thereof during which a member is on leave at an allowance equal
to the member's full salary prior to the commencement of disability
retirement. The definition contained in this subsection shall apply
only to plan 1 members.
(11) "Disability retirement" for plan 1 members, means the period
following termination of a member's disability leave, during which the
member is in receipt of a disability retirement allowance.
(12) "Domestic partners" means two adults who have registered as
domestic partners under RCW 26.60.020.
(13) "Employee" means any law enforcement officer or firefighter as
defined in subsections (16) and (18) of this section.
(14)(a) "Employer" for plan 1 members, means the legislative
authority of any city, town, county, or district or the elected
officials of any municipal corporation that employs any law enforcement
officer and/or firefighter, any authorized association of such
municipalities, and, except for the purposes of RCW 41.26.150, any
labor guild, association, or organization, which represents the
firefighters or law enforcement officers of at least seven cities of
over 20,000 population and the membership of each local lodge or
division of which is composed of at least sixty percent law enforcement
officers or firefighters as defined in this chapter.
(b) "Employer" for plan 2 members, means the following entities to
the extent that the entity employs any law enforcement officer and/or
firefighter:
(i) The legislative authority of any city, town, county, or
district;
(ii) The elected officials of any municipal corporation;
(iii) The governing body of any other general authority law
enforcement agency; or
(iv) A four-year institution of higher education having a fully
operational fire department as of January 1, 1996.
(15)(a) "Final average salary" for plan 1 members, means (i) for a
member holding the same position or rank for a minimum of twelve months
preceding the date of retirement, the basic salary attached to such
same position or rank at time of retirement; (ii) for any other member,
including a civil service member who has not served a minimum of twelve
months in the same position or rank preceding the date of retirement,
the average of the greatest basic salaries payable to such member
during any consecutive twenty-four month period within such member's
last ten years of service for which service credit is allowed, computed
by dividing the total basic salaries payable to such member during the
selected twenty-four month period by twenty-four; (iii) in the case of
disability of any member, the basic salary payable to such member at
the time of disability retirement; (iv) in the case of a member who
hereafter vests pursuant to RCW 41.26.090, the basic salary payable to
such member at the time of vesting.
(b) "Final average salary" for plan 2 members, means the monthly
average of the member's basic salary for the highest consecutive sixty
service credit months of service prior to such member's retirement,
termination, or death. Periods constituting authorized unpaid leaves
of absence may not be used in the calculation of final average salary.
(c) In calculating final average salary under (a) or (b) of this
subsection, the department of retirement systems shall include:
(i) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by a state agency
or institution during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium as a result of
reduced work hours, mandatory or voluntary leave without pay, temporary
reduction in pay implemented prior to December 11, 2010, or temporary
layoffs if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the
employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer;
and
(ii) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by the state or
a local government employer during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium as a
result of reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary
layoffs, or reductions to current pay if the reduced compensation is an
integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as
certified by the employer. Reductions to current pay shall not include
elimination of previously agreed upon future salary increases.
(16) "Firefighter" means:
(a) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated
basis as a member of a fire department of an employer and who is
serving in a position which requires passing a civil service
examination for firefighter, and who is actively employed as such;
(b) Anyone who is actively employed as a full time firefighter
where the fire department does not have a civil service examination;
(c) Supervisory firefighter personnel;
(d) Any full time executive secretary of an association of fire
protection districts authorized under RCW 52.12.031. The provisions of
this subsection (16)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members;
(e) The executive secretary of a labor guild, association or
organization (which is an employer under subsection (14) of this
section), if such individual has five years previous membership in a
retirement system established in chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW. The
provisions of this subsection (16)(e) shall not apply to plan 2
members;
(f) Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated
basis for an employer, as a fire dispatcher, in a department in which,
on March 1, 1970, a dispatcher was required to have passed a civil
service examination for firefighter;
(g) Any person who on March 1, 1970, was employed on a full time,
fully compensated basis by an employer, and who on May 21, 1971, was
making retirement contributions under the provisions of chapter 41.16
or 41.18 RCW; and
(h) Any person who is employed on a full-time, fully compensated
basis by an employer as an emergency medical technician.
(17) "General authority law enforcement agency" means any agency,
department, or division of a municipal corporation, political
subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, and any
agency, department, or division of state government, having as its
primary function the detection and apprehension of persons committing
infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in general, but
not including the Washington state patrol. Such an agency, department,
or division is distinguished from a limited authority law enforcement
agency having as one of its functions the apprehension or detection of
persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal
laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to,
the state departments of natural resources and social and health
services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission,
the state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and
transportation commission, the state ((liquor)) office of alcohol
beverage control ((board)), and the state department of corrections.
(18) "Law enforcement officer" beginning January 1, 1994, means any
person who is commissioned and employed by an employer on a full time,
fully compensated basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of
Washington generally, with the following qualifications:
(a) No person who is serving in a position that is basically
clerical or secretarial in nature, and who is not commissioned shall be
considered a law enforcement officer;
(b) Only those deputy sheriffs, including those serving under a
different title pursuant to county charter, who have successfully
completed a civil service examination for deputy sheriff or the
equivalent position, where a different title is used, and those persons
serving in unclassified positions authorized by RCW 41.14.070 except a
private secretary will be considered law enforcement officers;
(c) Only such full time commissioned law enforcement personnel as
have been appointed to offices, positions, or ranks in the police
department which have been specifically created or otherwise expressly
provided for and designated by city charter provision or by ordinance
enacted by the legislative body of the city shall be considered city
police officers;
(d) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes the executive
secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an
employer under subsection (14) of this section) if that individual has
five years previous membership in the retirement system established in
chapter 41.20 RCW. The provisions of this subsection (18)(d) shall not
apply to plan 2 members; and
(e) The term "law enforcement officer" also includes a person
employed on or after January 1, 1993, as a public safety officer or
director of public safety, so long as the job duties substantially
involve only either police or fire duties, or both, and no other duties
in a city or town with a population of less than ten thousand. The
provisions of this subsection (18)(e) shall not apply to any public
safety officer or director of public safety who is receiving a
retirement allowance under this chapter as of May 12, 1993.
(19) "Medical services" for plan 1 members, shall include the
following as minimum services to be provided. Reasonable charges for
these services shall be paid in accordance with RCW 41.26.150.
(a) Hospital expenses: These are the charges made by a hospital,
in its own behalf, for
(i) Board and room not to exceed semiprivate room rate unless
private room is required by the attending physician due to the
condition of the patient.
(ii) Necessary hospital services, other than board and room,
furnished by the hospital.
(b) Other medical expenses: The following charges are considered
"other medical expenses", provided that they have not been considered
as "hospital expenses".
(i) The fees of the following:
(A) A physician or surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter
18.71 RCW;
(B) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under the
provisions of chapter 18.57 RCW;
(C) A chiropractor licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.25
RCW.
(ii) The charges of a registered graduate nurse other than a nurse
who ordinarily resides in the member's home, or is a member of the
family of either the member or the member's spouse.
(iii) The charges for the following medical services and supplies:
(A) Drugs and medicines upon a physician's prescription;
(B) Diagnostic X-ray and laboratory examinations;
(C) X-ray, radium, and radioactive isotopes therapy;
(D) Anesthesia and oxygen;
(E) Rental of iron lung and other durable medical and surgical
equipment;
(F) Artificial limbs and eyes, and casts, splints, and trusses;
(G) Professional ambulance service when used to transport the
member to or from a hospital when injured by an accident or stricken by
a disease;
(H) Dental charges incurred by a member who sustains an accidental
injury to his or her teeth and who commences treatment by a legally
licensed dentist within ninety days after the accident;
(I) Nursing home confinement or hospital extended care facility;
(J) Physical therapy by a registered physical therapist;
(K) Blood transfusions, including the cost of blood and blood
plasma not replaced by voluntary donors;
(L) An optometrist licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.53
RCW.
(20) "Member" means any firefighter, law enforcement officer, or
other person as would apply under subsections (16) or (18) of this
section whose membership is transferred to the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system on or after
March 1, 1970, and every law enforcement officer and firefighter who is
employed in that capacity on or after such date.
(21) "Plan 1" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and funding provisions
covering persons who first became members of the system prior to
October 1, 1977.
(22) "Plan 2" means the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and funding provisions
covering persons who first became members of the system on and after
October 1, 1977.
(23) "Position" means the employment held at any particular time,
which may or may not be the same as civil service rank.
(24) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may
determine.
(25) "Retiree" for persons who establish membership in the
retirement system on or after October 1, 1977, means any member in
receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this
chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by such member.
(26) "Retirement fund" means the "Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system fund" as provided for
herein.
(27) "Retirement system" means the "Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system" provided herein.
(28)(a) "Service" for plan 1 members, means all periods of
employment for an employer as a firefighter or law enforcement officer,
for which compensation is paid, together with periods of suspension not
exceeding thirty days in duration. For the purposes of this chapter
service shall also include service in the armed forces of the United
States as provided in RCW 41.26.190. Credit shall be allowed for all
service credit months of service rendered by a member from and after
the member's initial commencement of employment as a firefighter or law
enforcement officer, during which the member worked for seventy or more
hours, or was on disability leave or disability retirement. Only
service credit months of service shall be counted in the computation of
any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this chapter.
(i) For members retiring after May 21, 1971 who were employed under
the coverage of a prior pension act before March 1, 1970, "service"
shall also include (A) such military service not exceeding five years
as was creditable to the member as of March 1, 1970, under the member's
particular prior pension act, and (B) such other periods of service as
were then creditable to a particular member under the provisions of RCW
41.18.165, 41.20.160, or 41.20.170. However, in no event shall credit
be allowed for any service rendered prior to March 1, 1970, where the
member at the time of rendition of such service was employed in a
position covered by a prior pension act, unless such service, at the
time credit is claimed therefor, is also creditable under the
provisions of such prior act.
(ii) A member who is employed by two employers at the same time
shall only be credited with service to one such employer for any month
during which the member rendered such dual service.
(b) "Service" for plan 2 members, means periods of employment by a
member for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for
ninety or more hours per calendar month which shall constitute a
service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for one or
more employers for which basic salary is earned for at least seventy
hours but less than ninety hours per calendar month shall constitute
one-half service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for
one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for less than
seventy hours shall constitute a one-quarter service credit month.
Members of the retirement system who are elected or appointed to a
state elective position may elect to continue to be members of this
retirement system.
Service credit years of service shall be determined by dividing the
total number of service credit months of service by twelve. Any
fraction of a service credit year of service as so determined shall be
taken into account in the computation of such retirement allowance or
benefits.
If a member receives basic salary from two or more employers during
any calendar month, the individual shall receive one service credit
month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple
service for ninety or more hours is rendered; or one-half service
credit month's service credit during any calendar month in which
multiple service for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours
is rendered; or one-quarter service credit month during any calendar
month in which multiple service for less than seventy hours is
rendered.
(29) "Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an
accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.
(30) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.
(31) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(32) "State elective position" means any position held by any
person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed
as a member of the legislature.
(33) "Surviving spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a
member. "Surviving spouse" shall not include the divorced spouse of a
member except as provided in RCW 41.26.162.

Sec. 159 RCW 41.37.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 5 s 4 and 2011 c 68
s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all contributions
standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the
regular interest thereon.
(2) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when
computed upon the basis of such mortality and other tables as may be
adopted by the director.
(3) "Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index
B.
(4) "Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated
contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(5)(a) "Average final compensation" means the member's average
compensation earnable of the highest consecutive sixty months of
service credit months prior to such member's retirement, termination,
or death. Periods constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be
used in the calculation of average final compensation except under RCW
41.37.290.
(b) In calculating average final compensation under (a) of this
subsection, the department of retirement systems shall include:
(i) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by a state agency
or institution during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium as a result of
reduced work hours, mandatory or voluntary leave without pay, temporary
reduction in pay implemented prior to December 11, 2010, or temporary
layoffs if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the
employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer;
and
(ii) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by the state or
a local government employer during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium as a
result of reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary
layoffs, or reductions to current pay if the reduced compensation is an
integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as
certified by the employer. Reductions to current pay shall not include
elimination of previously agreed upon future salary increases.
(6) "Beneficiary" means any person in receipt of a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer by another person.
(7)(a) "Compensation earnable" for members, means salaries or wages
earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services,
including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries
deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b),
414(h), and 457 of the United States internal revenue code, but shall
exclude nonmoney maintenance compensation and lump sum or other
payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation,
unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay.
(b) "Compensation earnable" for members also includes the following
actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:
(i) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on
reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer
to an individual in lieu of reinstatement, which are awarded or granted
as the equivalent of the salary or wage which the individual would have
earned during a payroll period shall be considered compensation
earnable to the extent provided in this subsection, and the individual
shall receive the equivalent service credit;
(ii) In any year in which a member serves in the legislature, the
member shall have the option of having such member's compensation
earnable be the greater of:
(A) The compensation earnable the member would have received had
such member not served in the legislature; or
(B) Such member's actual compensation earnable received for
nonlegislative public employment and legislative service combined. Any
additional contributions to the retirement system required because
compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater
than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be
paid by the member for both member and employer contributions;
(iii) Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045,
and 72.09.240;
(iv) Compensation that a member would have received but for a
disability occurring in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW
41.37.060;
(v) Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the
leave sharing program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through
41.04.670; and
(vi) Compensation that a member receives for being in standby
status. For the purposes of this section, a member is in standby
status when not being paid for time actually worked and the employer
requires the member to be prepared to report immediately for work, if
the need arises, although the need may not arise.
(8) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created
in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(9) "Director" means the director of the department.
(10) "Eligible position" means any permanent, full-time position
included in subsection (19) of this section.
(11) "Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free
from the employer's direction and control over the performance of work.
The department shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection
consistent with common law.
(12) "Employer" means the Washington state department of
corrections, the Washington state parks and recreation commission, the
Washington state gambling commission, the Washington state patrol, the
Washington state department of natural resources, and the Washington
state ((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage control ((board)); any
county corrections department; any city corrections department not
covered under chapter 41.28 RCW; and any public corrections entity
created under RCW 39.34.030 by counties, cities not covered under
chapter 41.28 RCW, or both.
(13) "Final compensation" means the annual rate of compensation
earnable by a member at the time of termination of employment.
(14) "Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual
average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage
earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor statistics, United States department of labor.
(15) "Index A" means the index for the year prior to the
determination of a postretirement adjustment.
(16) "Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.
(17) "Ineligible position" means any position which does not
conform with the requirements set forth in subsection (10) of this
section.
(18) "Leave of absence" means the period of time a member is
authorized by the employer to be absent from service without being
separated from membership.
(19) "Member" means any employee employed by an employer on a full-time basis:
(a) Who is in a position that requires completion of a certified
criminal justice training course and is authorized by their employer to
arrest, conduct criminal investigations, enforce the criminal laws of
the state of Washington, and carry a firearm as part of the job;
(b) Whose primary responsibility is to ensure the custody and
security of incarcerated or probationary individuals as a corrections
officer, probation officer, or jailer;
(c) Who is a limited authority Washington peace officer, as defined
in RCW 10.93.020, for an employer; or
(d) Whose primary responsibility is to supervise members eligible
under this subsection.
(20) "Membership service" means all service rendered as a member.
(21) "Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions
made by the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(22) "Plan" means the Washington public safety employees'
retirement system plan 2.
(23) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may
determine.
(24) "Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer while a member.
(25) "Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a
retirement allowance as provided by this chapter.
(26) "Retirement allowance" means monthly payments to a retiree or
beneficiary as provided in this chapter.
(27) "Retirement system" means the Washington public safety
employees' retirement system provided for in this chapter.
(28) "Separation from service" occurs when a person has terminated
all employment with an employer.
(29) "Service" means periods of employment by a member on or after
July 1, 2006, for one or more employers for which compensation earnable
is paid. Compensation earnable earned for ninety or more hours in any
calendar month shall constitute one service credit month. Compensation
earnable earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours
in any calendar month shall constitute one-half service credit month of
service. Compensation earnable earned for less than seventy hours in
any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service credit month of
service. Time spent in standby status, whether compensated or not, is
not service.
Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in
the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits.
(a) Service in any state elective position shall be deemed to be
full-time service.
(b) A member shall receive a total of not more than twelve service
credit months of service for such calendar year. If an individual is
employed in an eligible position by one or more employers the
individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during
any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours
is rendered.
(30) "Service credit month" means a month or an accumulation of
months of service credit which is equal to one.
(31) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.
(32) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(33) "State elective position" means any position held by any
person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed
as a member of the legislature.
(34) "State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of
Washington.

Sec. 160 RCW 41.37.015 and 2004 c 242 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
A retirement system is hereby created for public safety employees
of the Washington state department of corrections, the Washington state
parks and recreation commission, the Washington state gambling
commission, the Washington state patrol, the Washington state
((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage control ((board)), county
corrections departments, and city corrections departments not covered
under chapter 41.28 RCW. The administration and management of the
retirement system, the responsibility for making effective the
provisions of this chapter, and the authority to make all rules
necessary therefor are hereby vested in the department. All rules
shall be governed by chapter 34.05 RCW. This retirement system shall
be known as the Washington public safety employees' retirement system.

Sec. 161 RCW 41.40.023 and 2010 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Membership in the retirement system shall consist of all regularly
compensated employees and appointive and elective officials of
employers, as defined in this chapter, with the following exceptions:
(1) Persons in ineligible positions;
(2) Employees of the legislature except the officers thereof
elected by the members of the senate and the house and legislative
committees, unless membership of such employees be authorized by the
said committee;
(3)(a) Persons holding elective offices or persons appointed
directly by the governor: PROVIDED, That such persons shall have the
option of applying for membership during such periods of employment:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That any persons holding or who have held
elective offices or persons appointed by the governor who are members
in the retirement system and who have, prior to becoming such members,
previously held an elective office, and did not at the start of such
initial or successive terms of office exercise their option to become
members, may apply for membership to be effective during such term or
terms of office, and shall be allowed to establish the service credit
applicable to such term or terms of office upon payment of the employee
contributions therefor by the employee with interest as determined by
the director and employer contributions therefor by the employer or
employee with interest as determined by the director: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That all contributions with interest submitted by the employee
under this subsection shall be placed in the employee's individual
account in the employee's savings fund and be treated as any other
contribution made by the employee, with the exception that any
contributions submitted by the employee in payment of the employer's
obligation, together with the interest the director may apply to the
employer's contribution, shall not be considered part of the member's
annuity for any purpose except withdrawal of contributions;
(b) A member holding elective office who has elected to apply for
membership pursuant to (a) of this subsection and who later wishes to
be eligible for a retirement allowance shall have the option of ending
his or her membership in the retirement system. A member wishing to
end his or her membership under this subsection must file, on a form
supplied by the department, a statement indicating that the member
agrees to irrevocably abandon any claim for service for future periods
served as an elected official. A member who receives more than fifteen
thousand dollars per year in compensation for his or her elective
service, adjusted annually for inflation by the director, is not
eligible for the option provided by this subsection (3)(b);
(4) Employees holding membership in, or receiving pension benefits
under, any retirement plan operated wholly or in part by an agency of
the state or political subdivision thereof, or who are by reason of
their current employment contributing to or otherwise establishing the
right to receive benefits from any such retirement plan except as
follows:
(a) In any case where the retirement system has in existence an
agreement with another retirement system in connection with exchange of
service credit or an agreement whereby members can retain service
credit in more than one system, such an employee shall be allowed
membership rights should the agreement so provide;
(b) An employee shall be allowed membership if otherwise eligible
while receiving survivor's benefits;
(c) An employee shall not either before or after June 7, 1984, be
excluded from membership or denied service credit pursuant to this
subsection solely on account of: (i) Membership in the plan created
under chapter 2.14 RCW; or (ii) enrollment under the relief and
compensation provisions or the pension provisions of the volunteer
firefighters' relief and pension fund under chapter 41.24 RCW;
(d) Except as provided in RCW 41.40.109, on or after July 25, 1999,
an employee shall not be excluded from membership or denied service
credit pursuant to this subsection solely on account of participation
in a defined contribution pension plan qualified under section 401 of
the internal revenue code;
(e) Employees who have been reported in the retirement system prior
to July 25, 1999, and who participated during the same period of time
in a defined contribution pension plan qualified under section 401 of
the internal revenue code and operated wholly or in part by the
employer, shall not be excluded from previous retirement system
membership and service credit on account of such participation;
(5) Patient and inmate help in state charitable, penal, and
correctional institutions;
(6) "Members" of a state veterans' home or state soldiers' home;
(7) Persons employed by an institution of higher learning or
community college, primarily as an incident to and in furtherance of
their education or training, or the education or training of a spouse;
(8) Employees of an institution of higher learning or community
college during the period of service necessary to establish eligibility
for membership in the retirement plans operated by such institutions;
(9) Persons rendering professional services to an employer on a
fee, retainer, or contract basis or when the income from these services
is less than fifty percent of the gross income received from the
person's practice of a profession;
(10) Persons appointed after April 1, 1963, by the ((liquor))
office of alcohol beverage control ((board)) as contract liquor store
managers;
(11) Employees of a labor guild, association, or organization:
PROVIDED, That elective officials and employees of a labor guild,
association, or organization which qualifies as an employer within this
chapter shall have the option of applying for membership;
(12) Retirement system retirees: PROVIDED, That following
reemployment in an eligible position, a retiree may elect to
prospectively become a member of the retirement system if otherwise
eligible;
(13) Persons employed by or appointed or elected as an official of
a first class city that has its own retirement system: PROVIDED, That
any member elected or appointed to an elective office on or after April
1, 1971, shall have the option of continuing as a member of this system
in lieu of becoming a member of the city system. A member who elects
to continue as a member of this system shall pay the appropriate member
contributions and the city shall pay the employer contributions at the
rates prescribed by this chapter. The city shall also transfer to this
system all of such member's accumulated contributions together with
such further amounts as necessary to equal all employee and employer
contributions which would have been paid into this system on account of
such service with the city and thereupon the member shall be granted
credit for all such service. Any city that becomes an employer as
defined in RCW 41.40.010(13) as the result of an individual's election
under this subsection shall not be required to have all employees
covered for retirement under the provisions of this chapter. Nothing
in this subsection shall prohibit a city of the first class with its
own retirement system from: (a) Transferring all of its current
employees to the retirement system established under this chapter, or
(b) allowing newly hired employees the option of continuing coverage
under the retirement system established by this chapter.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, persons
transferring from employment with a first class city of over four
hundred thousand population that has its own retirement system to
employment with the state department of agriculture may elect to remain
within the retirement system of such city and the state shall pay the
employer contributions for such persons at like rates as prescribed for
employers of other members of such system;
(14) Employees who (a) are not citizens of the United States, (b)
do not reside in the United States, and (c) perform duties outside of
the United States;
(15) Employees who (a) are not citizens of the United States, (b)
are not covered by chapter 41.48 RCW, (c) are not excluded from
membership under this chapter or chapter 41.04 RCW, (d) are residents
of this state, and (e) make an irrevocable election to be excluded from
membership, in writing, which is submitted to the director within
thirty days after employment in an eligible position;
(16) Employees who are citizens of the United States and who reside
and perform duties for an employer outside of the United States:
PROVIDED, That unless otherwise excluded under this chapter or chapter
41.04 RCW, the employee may apply for membership (a) within thirty days
after employment in an eligible position and membership service credit
shall be granted from the first day of membership service, and (b)
after this thirty-day period, but membership service credit shall be
granted only if payment is made for the noncredited membership service
under RCW 41.50.165(2), otherwise service shall be from the date of
application;
(17) The city manager or chief administrative officer of a city or
town, other than a retiree, who serves at the pleasure of an appointing
authority: PROVIDED, That such persons shall have the option of
applying for membership within thirty days from date of their
appointment to such positions. Persons serving in such positions as of
April 4, 1986, shall continue to be members in the retirement system
unless they notify the director in writing prior to December 31, 1986,
of their desire to withdraw from membership in the retirement system.
A member who withdraws from membership in the system under this section
shall receive a refund of the member's accumulated contributions.
Persons serving in such positions who have not opted for membership
within the specified thirty days, may do so by paying the amount
required under RCW 41.50.165(2) for the period from the date of their
appointment to the date of acceptance into membership;
(18) Persons serving as: (a) The chief administrative officer of
a public utility district as defined in RCW 54.16.100; (b) the chief
administrative officer of a port district formed under chapter 53.04
RCW; or (c) the chief administrative officer of a county who serves at
the pleasure of an appointing authority: PROVIDED, That such persons
shall have the option of applying for membership within thirty days
from the date of their appointment to such positions. Persons serving
in such positions as of July 25, 1999, shall continue to be members in
the retirement system unless they notify the director in writing prior
to December 31, 1999, of their desire to withdraw from membership in
the retirement system. A member who withdraws from membership in the
system under this section shall receive a refund of the member's
accumulated contributions upon termination of employment or as
otherwise consistent with the plan's tax qualification status as
defined in internal revenue code section 401.
Persons serving in such positions who have not opted for membership
within the specified thirty days, may do so at a later date by paying
the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2) for the period from the date
of their appointment to the date of acceptance into membership;
(19) Persons enrolled in state-approved apprenticeship programs,
authorized under chapter 49.04 RCW, and who are employed by local
governments to earn hours to complete such apprenticeship programs, if
the employee is a member of a union-sponsored retirement plan and is
making contributions to such a retirement plan or if the employee is a
member of a Taft-Hartley retirement plan;
(20) Beginning on July 22, 2001, persons employed exclusively as
trainers or trainees in resident apprentice training programs operated
by housing authorities authorized under chapter 35.82 RCW, (a) if the
trainer or trainee is a member of a union-sponsored retirement plan and
is making contributions to such a retirement plan or (b) if the
employee is a member of a Taft-Hartley retirement plan;
(21) Employees who are removed from membership under RCW 41.40.823
or 41.40.633; and
(22) Persons employed as the state director of fire protection
under RCW 43.43.938 who were previously members of the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 under chapter
41.26 RCW may continue as a member of the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system in lieu of becoming a member of this
system.

Sec. 162 RCW 42.16.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 446 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, all state officers and employees shall be paid for services
rendered from the first day of the month through the fifteenth day of
the month and for services rendered from the sixteenth day of the month
through the last calendar day of the month. Paydates for these two pay
periods shall be established by the director of financial management
through the administrative hearing process and the official paydates
shall be established six months prior to the beginning of each
subsequent calendar year. Under no circumstance shall the paydate be
established more than ten days after the pay period in which the wages
are earned except when the designated paydate falls on Sunday, in which
case the paydate shall not be later than the following Monday. Payment
shall be deemed to have been made by the established paydates if: (a)
The salary warrant is available at the geographic work location at
which the warrant is normally available to the employee; or (b) the
salary has been electronically transferred into the employee's account
at the employee's designated financial institution; or (c) the salary
warrants are mailed at least two days before the established paydate
for those employees engaged in work in remote or varying locations from
the geographic location at which the payroll is prepared, provided that
the employee has requested payment by mail.
The office of financial management shall develop the necessary
policies and operating procedures to assure that all remuneration for
services rendered including basic salary, shift differential, standby
pay, overtime, penalty pay, salary due based on contractual agreements,
and special pay provisions, as provided for by law, agency policy or
rule, or contract, shall be available to the employee on the designated
paydate. Overtime, penalty pay, and special pay provisions may be paid
by the next following paydate if the postponement of payment is
attributable to: The employee's not making a timely or accurate report
of the facts which are the basis for the payment, or the employer's
lack of reasonable opportunity to verify the claim.
Compensable benefits payable because of separation from state
service shall be paid with the earnings for the final period worked
unless the employee separating has not provided the agency with the
proper notification of intent to terminate.
One-half of the employee's basic monthly salary shall be paid in
each pay period. Employees paid on an hourly basis or employees who
work less than a full pay period shall be paid for actual salary
earned.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply in instances
where it would conflict with contractual rights or, with the approval
of the office of financial management, to short-term, intermittent,
noncareer state employees, to student employees of institutions of
higher education, to national or state guard members participating in
state active duty, and to ((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage control
agency managers who are paid a percentage of monthly liquor sales.
(3) When a national or state guard member is called to participate
in state active duty, the paydate shall be no more than seven days
following completion of duty or the end of the pay period, whichever is
first. When the seventh day falls on Sunday, the paydate shall not be
later than the following Monday. This subsection shall apply only to
the pay a national or state guard member receives from the military
department for state active duty.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a
bargained contract at an institution of higher education may include a
provision for paying part-time academic employees on a pay schedule
that coincides with all the paydays used for full-time academic
employees.

Sec. 163 RCW 42.17A.705 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 109 are each
amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.700, "executive state officer"
includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the director of the department of services for the blind,
the chief information officer of the office of chief information
officer, the director of the state system of community and technical
colleges, the director of commerce, the director of the consolidated
technology services agency, the secretary of corrections, the director
of early learning, the director of ecology, the commissioner of
employment security, the chair of the energy facility site evaluation
council, the director of enterprise services, the secretary of the
state finance committee, the director of financial management, the
director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest
practices appeals board, the director of the gambling commission, the
secretary of health, the administrator of the Washington state health
care authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the
human resources director, the executive secretary of the human rights
commission, the executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence
review board, the executive director of the state investment board, the
director of labor and industries, the director of licensing, the
director of the lottery commission, the director of the office of
alcohol beverage control, the director of the office of minority and
women's business enterprises, the director of parks and recreation, the
executive director of the public disclosure commission, the executive
director of the Puget Sound partnership, the director of the recreation
and conservation office, the director of retirement systems, the
director of revenue, the secretary of social and health services, the
chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the
board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of
the utilities and transportation commission, the director of veterans
affairs, the president of each of the regional and state universities
and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each district and
each campus president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, Eastern Washington
University board of trustees, Washington economic development finance
authority, Washington energy northwest executive board, The Evergreen
State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, fish and
wildlife commission, forest practices appeals board, forest practices
board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities
authority, higher education coordinating board, higher education
facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance
commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review
board, board of industrial insurance appeals, state investment board,
commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics board, life sciences
discovery fund authority board of trustees, ((liquor control board,))
lottery commission, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation
planning council, parks and recreation commission, Washington personnel
resources board, board of pilotage commissioners, pollution control
hearings board, public disclosure commission, public employees'
benefits board, recreation and conservation funding board, salmon
recovery funding board, shorelines hearings board, board of tax
appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington board of
regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington State
University board of regents, and Western Washington University board of
trustees.

Sec. 164 RCW 43.06.455 and 2001 c 235 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governor may enter into cigarette tax contracts concerning
the sale of cigarettes. All cigarette tax contracts shall meet the
requirements for cigarette tax contracts under this section. Except
for cigarette tax contracts under RCW 43.06.460, the rates, revenue
sharing, and exemption terms of a cigarette tax contract are not
effective unless authorized in a bill enacted by the legislature.
(2) Cigarette tax contracts shall be in regard to retail sales in
which Indian retailers make delivery and physical transfer of
possession of the cigarettes from the seller to the buyer within Indian
country, and are not in regard to transactions by non-Indian retailers.
In addition, contracts shall provide that retailers shall not sell or
give, or permit to be sold or given, cigarettes to any person under the
age of eighteen years.
(3) A cigarette tax contract with a tribe shall provide for a
tribal cigarette tax in lieu of all state cigarette taxes and state and
local sales and use taxes on sales of cigarettes in Indian country by
Indian retailers. The tribe may allow an exemption for sales to tribal
members.
(4) Cigarette tax contracts shall provide that all cigarettes
possessed or sold by a retailer shall bear a cigarette stamp obtained
by wholesalers from a bank or other suitable stamp vendor and applied
to the cigarettes. The procedures to be used by the tribe in obtaining
tax stamps must include a means to assure that the tribal tax will be
paid by the wholesaler obtaining such cigarettes. Tribal stamps must
have serial numbers or some other discrete identification so that each
stamp can be traced to its source.
(5) Cigarette tax contracts shall provide that retailers shall
purchase cigarettes only from:
(a) Wholesalers or manufacturers licensed to do business in the
state of Washington;
(b) Out-of-state wholesalers or manufacturers who, although not
licensed to do business in the state of Washington, agree to comply
with the terms of the cigarette tax contract, are certified to the
state as having so agreed, and who do in fact so comply. However, the
state may in its sole discretion exercise its administrative and
enforcement powers over such wholesalers or manufacturers to the extent
permitted by law;
(c) A tribal wholesaler that purchases only from a wholesaler or
manufacturer described in (a), (b), or (d) of this subsection; and
(d) A tribal manufacturer.
(6) Cigarette tax contracts shall be for renewable periods of no
more than eight years. A renewal may not include a renewal of the
phase-in period.
(7) Cigarette tax contracts shall include provisions for
compliance, such as transport and notice requirements, inspection
procedures, stamping requirements, recordkeeping, and audit
requirements.
(8) Tax revenue retained by a tribe must be used for essential
government services. Use of tax revenue for subsidization of cigarette
and food retailers is prohibited.
(9) The cigarette tax contract may include provisions to resolve
disputes using a nonjudicial process, such as mediation.
(10) The governor may delegate the power to negotiate cigarette tax
contracts to the department of revenue. The department of revenue
shall consult with the ((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage control
((board)) during the negotiations.
(11) Information received by the state or open to state review
under the terms of a contract is subject to the provisions of RCW
82.32.330.
(12) It is the intent of the legislature that the ((liquor)) office
of alcohol beverage control ((board)) and the department of revenue
continue the division of duties and shared authority under chapter
82.24 RCW and therefore the ((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage
control ((board)) is responsible for enforcement activities that come
under the terms of chapter 82.24 RCW.
(13) Each cigarette tax contract shall include a procedure for
notifying the other party that a violation has occurred, a procedure
for establishing whether a violation has in fact occurred, an
opportunity to correct such violation, and a provision providing for
termination of the contract should the violation fail to be resolved
through this process, such termination subject to mediation should the
terms of the contract so allow. A contract shall provide for
termination of the contract if resolution of a dispute does not occur
within twenty-four months from the time notification of a violation has
occurred. Intervening violations do not extend this time period. In
addition, the contract shall include provisions delineating the
respective roles and responsibilities of the tribe, the department of
revenue, and the ((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage control
((board)).
(14) For purposes of this section and RCW 43.06.460, 82.08.0316,
82.12.0316, and 82.24.295:
(a) "Essential government services" means services such as tribal
administration, public facilities, fire, police, public health,
education, job services, sewer, water, environmental and land use,
transportation, utility services, and economic development;
(b) "Indian retailer" or "retailer" means (i) a retailer wholly
owned and operated by an Indian tribe, (ii) a business wholly owned and
operated by a tribal member and licensed by the tribe, or (iii) a
business owned and operated by the Indian person or persons in whose
name the land is held in trust; and
(c) "Indian tribe" or "tribe" means a federally recognized Indian
tribe located within the geographical boundaries of the state of
Washington.

Sec. 165 RCW 43.06.465 and 2005 c 11 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governor may enter into a cigarette tax agreement with the
Puyallup Tribe of Indians concerning the sale of cigarettes, subject to
the limitations in this section. The legislature intends to address
the uniqueness of the Puyallup Indian reservation and its selling
environment through pricing and compliance strategies, rather than
through the imposition of equivalent taxes. It is the legislature's
intent (a) that an increase in prices through a flat tax will reduce
much of the competitive advantage that has historically existed due to
the discrepancy in the difference between state and tribal taxes, and
(b) that the tribal retailers can remain in business under the changed
circumstances. The governor may delegate the authority to negotiate a
cigarette tax agreement with the Puyallup Tribe to the department of
revenue. The department of revenue shall consult with the ((liquor))
office of alcohol beverage control ((board)) during the negotiations.
(2) Any agreement must require the tribe to impose a tax of eleven
dollars and seventy-five cents on each carton of cigarettes, with ten
packs a carton and twenty cigarettes per pack being the industry
standard. This tax shall be prorated for cartons and packs that are
nonstandard. This tribal tax is in lieu of the combined state and
local sales and use taxes, and state cigarette taxes, and as such these
state taxes are not imposed during the term of the agreement on any
transaction governed by the agreement. The tribal tax shall increase
or decrease by the same dollar amount as any increase or decrease in
the state cigarette tax.
(3) The agreement must include a provision requiring the tribe to
transmit thirty percent of the tribal tax revenue on all cigarette
sales to the state. The funds shall be transmitted to the state
treasurer on a quarterly basis for deposit by the state treasurer into
the general fund. The remaining tribal tax revenue must be used for
essential government services, as that term is defined in RCW
43.06.455.
(4) The agreement is limited to retail sales in which Indian
retailers make delivery and physical transfer of possession of the
cigarettes from the seller to the buyer within Indian country, and are
not in regard to transactions by non-Indian retailers. In addition,
agreements shall provide that retailers shall not sell or give, or
permit to be sold or given, cigarettes to any person under the age of
eighteen years.
(5)(a) The agreement must include a provision to price and sell the
cigarettes so that the retail selling price is not less than the price
paid by the retailer for the cigarettes.
(b) The tribal tax is in addition to the retail selling price.
(c) The agreement must include a provision to assure the price paid
to the retailer includes the tribal tax, as evidenced by the tribe's
cigarette stamp.
(d) If the tribe is acting as a wholesaler to tribal retailers, the
retail selling price must not be less than the price the tribe paid for
such cigarettes plus the tribal tax, as evidenced by the tribe's
cigarette stamp.
(6)(a) The agreement must include provisions regarding enforcement
and compliance by the tribe in regard to enrolled tribal members who
sell cigarettes and shall describe the individual and joint
responsibilities of the tribe, the department of revenue, and the
((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage control ((board)).
(b) The agreement must include provisions for tax administration
and compliance, such as transport and notice requirements, inspection
procedures, stamping requirements, recordkeeping, and audit
requirements.
(c) The agreement must include provisions for sharing of
information among the tribe, the department of revenue, and the
((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage control ((board)).
(7) The agreement must provide that all cigarettes possessed or
sold by a tribal retailer shall bear a tribal cigarette stamp obtained
by wholesalers from a bank or other suitable stamp vendor and applied
to the cigarettes. Tribal stamps must have serial numbers or some
other discrete identification so that each stamp can be traced to its
source.
(8) The agreement must provide that retailers shall purchase
cigarettes only from wholesalers or manufacturers licensed to do
business in the state of Washington.
(9) The agreement must be for a renewable period of no more than
eight years.
(10) The agreement must include provisions to resolve disputes
using a nonjudicial process, such as mediation, and shall include a
dispute resolution protocol. The protocol shall include a procedure
for notifying the other party that a violation has occurred, a
procedure for establishing whether a violation has in fact occurred, an
opportunity to correct such violation, and a provision providing for
termination of the agreement should the violation fail to be resolved
through this process, such termination subject to mediation should the
terms of the agreement so allow. An agreement must provide for
termination of the agreement if resolution of a dispute does not occur
within twenty-four months from the time notification of a violation has
occurred. Intervening violations do not extend this time period.
(11) The agreement may not include any provisions that impact the
state's share of the master settlement agreement, and as such this
agreement does not authorize negotiation regarding a redistribution of
the state's proceeds under the master settlement agreement.
(12) Information received by the state or open to state review
under the terms of an agreement is subject to RCW 82.32.330.
(13) It is the intent of the legislature that the ((liquor)) office
of alcohol beverage control ((board)) and the department of revenue
continue the division of duties and shared authority under chapter
82.24 RCW.
(14) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Indian country" has the same meaning as in chapter 82.24 RCW.
(b) "Indian retailer" or "retailer" means (i) a retailer wholly
owned and operated by an Indian tribe or (ii) a business wholly owned
and operated by an enrolled tribal member and licensed by the tribe.
(c) "Indian tribe" or "tribe" means the Puyallup Tribe of Indians,
which is a federally recognized Indian tribe located within the
geographical boundaries of the state of Washington.

Sec. 166 RCW 43.06.466 and 2008 c 228 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that entering into a cigarette tax
agreement with the Yakama Nation is a positive step and that such an
agreement will support a stable and orderly environment on the Yakima
Reservation for regulation of cigarette sales. The legislature further
finds that the very special circumstances of the Yakama Nation pursuant
to the Treaty with the Yakamas of 1855 (12 Stat. 951) support a
cigarette tax agreement that reflects those circumstances. The
legislature also finds that the provisions of the agreement with the
Yakama Nation authorized by chapter 228, Laws of 2008 are reasonably
necessary to prevent fraudulent transactions and place a minimal burden
on the Yakama Nation, pursuant to the United States supreme court's
decision inWashington v. Confederated Tribes of the Colville Indian
Reservation, 447 U.S. 134 (1980).
It is the intent of the legislature that the cigarette tax
agreement with the Yakama Nation reflects the uniqueness of the Yakama
Nation's Treaty through specific terms that govern pricing of
cigarettes, tribal cigarette tax revenue, information sharing, and
administration of the agreement.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Cigarette" has the same meaning as in chapter 82.24 RCW; and
(b) "Tribal retailer" means a cigarette retailer as that term is
defined in RCW 82.24.010 that is licensed by and located within the
jurisdiction of the Yakama Nation and is wholly owned by the Yakama
Nation or any of its enrolled members.
(3) The governor may enter into a cigarette tax agreement with the
Yakama Nation, a federally recognized Indian tribe located within the
geographical boundaries of the state of Washington, concerning the sale
of cigarettes, subject to the provisions of this section. The governor
may delegate the authority to negotiate the agreement to the department
of revenue.
(4) The agreement must be for a renewable period of no more than
eight years.
(5) All cigarettes possessed or sold by tribal retailers must be
subject to the agreement, except cigarettes manufactured within the
jurisdiction of the Yakama Nation by the Yakama Nation or its enrolled
members.
(6) The agreement must allow the Yakama Nation to exempt its
enrolled members from the tribal cigarette tax imposed under subsection
(7) of this section.
(a) Sales of cigarettes exempt under this subsection must be
subject to the requirements of subsection (9) of this section.
(b) The exemption must be provided only at the point of sale and
reimbursement provided to the tribal retailer by the Yakama Nation.
(7) The agreement must require the Yakama Nation to impose and
maintain in effect on the sale of cigarettes by tribal retailers a tax
as provided in this subsection.
(a) The rate of tax will be expressed in dollars and cents and must
be the percentage of tax imposed by the state under chapter 82.24 RCW
for the period of the agreement as stated ((here)) in this section:
(i) Eighty percent during the first six years;
(ii) Eighty-four percent during the seventh year; and
(iii) Eighty-seven and six-tenths percent during the eighth year.
(b) The tax must be imposed on each carton, or portion of a carton,
of cigarettes, with ten packs per carton and twenty cigarettes per pack
being the industry standard, and prorated for cartons and packs that
are not standard.
(c) The tax must be in lieu of the combined state and local sales
and use taxes, and state cigarette taxes, and, as provided in RCW
82.24.302, 82.08.0316, and 82.12.0316, the taxes imposed by chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.24 RCW do not apply during the term of the
agreement on any transaction governed by the agreement.
(d) Throughout the term of the agreement and any renewal of the
agreement, the tax must increase or decrease in correspondence with the
state cigarette tax by applying the percentages in (a) of this
subsection.
(8) The revenue generated by the tax imposed under subsection (7)
of this section must be used by the Yakama Nation for essential
government services, as that term is defined in RCW 43.06.455.
(9) All cigarettes possessed or sold by a tribal retailer must bear
a tribal cigarette tax stamp as provided in this subsection.
(a) The Yakama Nation may act as its own stamp vendor, subject to
meeting reasonable requirements for internal controls.
(b) The stamps must have serial numbers or other discrete
identification that allow stamps to be traced to their source.
(10) The price paid by the tribal retailer to the wholesaler must
not be less than the total of the price paid by the Yakama Nation or
other wholesaler and the tax imposed under subsection (7) of this
section.
(11) The retail selling price of cigarettes sold by tribal
retailers must not be less than the price paid by them under subsection
(10) of this section.
(12) Tribal retailers must not sell or give, or permit to be sold
or given, cigarettes to any person under the age of eighteen years.
(13) The authority and the individual and joint responsibility of
the Yakama Nation, the department of revenue, and the ((liquor)) office
of alcohol beverage control ((board)) for administration and
enforcement must be specified in the agreement including, but not
limited to, requirements regarding transport of cigarettes, keeping of
records, reporting, notice, inspection, audit, and mutual exchange of
information.
(a) Requirements must provide for sharing of information regarding
transport of cigarettes in the state of Washington by the Yakama Nation
or its enrolled members, reporting of information on sales to customers
located outside the jurisdiction of the Yakama Nation, and authority
for unannounced inspection by the state of tribal retailers to verify
compliance with stamping and pricing provisions.
(b) Information received by the state or open to state review under
the terms of the agreement is subject to RCW 82.32.330.
(14) The agreement must provide for resolution of disputes using a
nonjudicial process, such as mediation, and establish a dispute
resolution protocol that includes the following elements:
(a) A procedure for notifying the other party that a violation has
occurred;
(b) A procedure for establishing whether a violation has in fact
occurred;
(c) An opportunity to correct the violation;
(d) A procedure for terminating the agreement in the event of a
failure to correct the violation, such termination subject to mediation
should the terms of the agreement so allow; and
(e) Termination of the agreement for cause.
(15) The agreement may not include any provisions that impact the
state's share of the master settlement agreement or concern
redistribution of the state's proceeds under the master settlement
agreement.
(16) The department of revenue may share with the Yakama Nation tax
information under RCW 82.32.330 that is necessary for the Yakama
Nation's compliance with the agreement.

Sec. 167 RCW 43.82.010 and 2007 c 506 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services,
on behalf of the agency involved and after consultation with the office
of financial management, shall purchase, lease, lease purchase, rent,
or otherwise acquire all real estate, improved or unimproved, as may be
required by elected state officials, institutions, departments,
commissions, boards, and other state agencies, or federal agencies
where joint state and federal activities are undertaken and may grant
easements and transfer, exchange, sell, lease, or sublease all or part
of any surplus real estate for those state agencies which do not
otherwise have the specific authority to dispose of real estate. This
section does not transfer financial liability for the acquired property
to the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services.
(2) Except for real estate occupied by federal agencies, the
director shall determine the location, size, and design of any real
estate or improvements thereon acquired or held pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section. Facilities acquired or held pursuant to this
chapter, and any improvements thereon, shall conform to standards
adopted by the director and approved by the office of financial
management governing facility efficiency unless a specific exemption
from such standards is provided by the director of ((general
administration)) enterprise services. The director of ((general
administration)) enterprise services shall report to the office of
financial management and the appropriate committees of the legislature
annually on any exemptions granted pursuant to this subsection.
(3) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services
may fix the terms and conditions of each lease entered into under this
chapter, except that no lease shall extend greater than twenty years in
duration. The director of ((general administration)) enterprise
services may enter into a long-term lease greater than ten years in
duration upon a determination by the director of the office of
financial management that the long-term lease provides a more favorable
rate than would otherwise be available, it appears to a substantial
certainty that the facility is necessary for use by the state for the
full length of the lease term, and the facility meets the standards
adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The director of
((general administration)) enterprise services may enter into a long-term lease greater than ten years in duration if an analysis shows that
the life-cycle cost of leasing the facility is less than the life-cycle
cost of purchasing or constructing a facility in lieu of leasing the
facility.
(4) Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease for or on
behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as collateral or
security for the payment of securities offered for sale through a
public offering. Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease
for or on behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as
collateral or security for the payment of securities offered for sale
through a private placement without the prior written approval of the
state treasurer. However, this limitation shall not prevent a lessor
from assigning or encumbering its interest in a lease as security for
the repayment of a promissory note provided that the transaction would
otherwise be an exempt transaction under RCW 21.20.320. The state
treasurer shall adopt rules that establish the criteria under which any
such approval may be granted. In establishing such criteria the state
treasurer shall give primary consideration to the protection of the
state's credit rating and the integrity of the state's debt management
program. If it appears to the state treasurer that any lease has been
used or referred to in violation of this subsection or rules adopted
under this subsection, then he or she may recommend that the governor
cause such lease to be terminated. The department of ((general
administration)) enterprise services shall promptly notify the state
treasurer whenever it may appear to the department that any lease has
been used or referred to in violation of this subsection or rules
adopted under this subsection.
(5) It is the policy of the state to encourage the colocation and
consolidation of state services into single or adjacent facilities,
whenever appropriate, to improve public service delivery, minimize
duplication of facilities, increase efficiency of operations, and
promote sound growth management planning.
(6) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services
shall provide coordinated long-range planning services to identify and
evaluate opportunities for colocating and consolidating state
facilities. Upon the renewal of any lease, the inception of a new
lease, or the purchase of a facility, the director of ((general
administration)) enterprise services shall determine whether an
opportunity exists for colocating the agency or agencies in a single
facility with other agencies located in the same geographic area. If
a colocation opportunity exists, the director of ((general
administration)) enterprise services shall consult with the affected
state agencies and the office of financial management to evaluate the
impact colocation would have on the cost and delivery of agency
programs, including whether program delivery would be enhanced due to
the centralization of services. The director of ((general
administration)) enterprise services, in consultation with the office
of financial management, shall develop procedures for implementing
colocation and consolidation of state facilities.
(7) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services
is authorized to purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire improved
or unimproved real estate as owner or lessee and to lease or sublet all
or a part of such real estate to state or federal agencies. The
director of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall charge
each using agency its proportionate rental which shall include an
amount sufficient to pay all costs, including, but not limited to,
those for utilities, janitorial and accounting services, and sufficient
to provide for contingencies; which shall not exceed five percent of
the average annual rental, to meet unforeseen expenses incident to
management of the real estate.
(8) If the director of ((general administration)) enterprise
services determines that it is necessary or advisable to undertake any
work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement on any real
estate acquired pursuant to subsection (1) or (7) of this section, the
director shall cause plans and specifications thereof and an estimate
of the cost of such work to be made and filed in his or her office and
the state agency benefiting thereby is hereby authorized to pay for
such work out of any available funds: PROVIDED, That the cost of
executing such work shall not exceed the sum of twenty-five thousand
dollars. Work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement in
excess of twenty-five thousand dollars, other than that done by the
owner of the property if other than the state, shall be performed in
accordance with the public works law of this state.
(9) In order to obtain maximum utilization of space, the director
of ((general administration)) enterprise services shall make space
utilization studies, and shall establish standards for use of space by
state agencies. Such studies shall include the identification of
opportunities for colocation and consolidation of state agency office
and support facilities.
(10) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services
may construct new buildings on, or improve existing facilities, and
furnish and equip, all real estate under his or her management. Prior
to the construction of new buildings or major improvements to existing
facilities or acquisition of facilities using a lease purchase
contract, the director of ((general administration)) enterprise
services shall conduct an evaluation of the facility design and budget
using life-cycle cost analysis, value-engineering, and other techniques
to maximize the long-term effectiveness and efficiency of the facility
or improvement.
(11) All conveyances and contracts to purchase, lease, rent,
transfer, exchange, or sell real estate and to grant and accept
easements shall be approved as to form by the attorney general, signed
by the director of ((general administration)) enterprise services or
the director's designee, and recorded with the county auditor of the
county in which the property is located.
(12) The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services
may delegate any or all of the functions specified in this section to
any agency upon such terms and conditions as the director deems
advisable. By January 1st of each year, beginning January 1, 2008, the
department shall submit an annual report to the office of financial
management and the appropriate committees of the legislature on all
delegated leases.
(13) This section does not apply to the acquisition of real estate
by:
(a) The state college and universities for research or experimental
purposes;
(b) The ((state liquor)) office of alcohol beverage control
((board)) for liquor stores and warehouses; and
(c) The department of natural resources, the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of transportation, and the state parks and
recreation commission for purposes other than the leasing of offices,
warehouses, and real estate for similar purposes.
(14) Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary,
the department of ((general administration)) enterprise services may
negotiate ground leases for public lands on which property is to be
acquired under a financing contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW under
terms approved by the state finance committee.
(15) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services shall report annually to the office of financial management
and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature on facility
leases executed for all state agencies for the preceding year, lease
terms, and annual lease costs. The report must include leases executed
under RCW 43.82.045 and subsection (12) of this section.

Sec. 168 RCW 67.70.070 and 1982 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
No license as an agent to sell lottery tickets or shares may be
issued to any person to engage in business exclusively as a lottery
sales agent. Before issuing a license the director shall consider such
factors as: (1) The financial responsibility and security of the
person and his or her business or activity, (2) the accessibility of
his or her place of business or activity to the public, (3) the
sufficiency of existing licenses to serve the public convenience, and
(4) the volume of expected sales.
For purposes of this section, the term "person" means an
individual, association, corporation, club, trust, estate, society,
company, joint stock company, receiver, trustee, assignee, referee, or
any other person acting in a fiduciary or representative capacity,
whether appointed by a court or otherwise, and any combination of
individuals. "Person" does not mean any department, commission,
agency, or instrumentality of the state, or any county or municipality
or any agency or instrumentality thereof, except for retail outlets of
the ((state liquor)) office of alcohol beverage control ((board)).

Sec. 169 RCW 69.04.240 and 2007 c 226 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
A food shall be deemed to be adulterated if it is confectionery and
it bears or contains any alcohol from natural or artificial alcohol
flavoring in excess of one percent of the weight of the confection or
any nonnutritive article or substance except harmless coloring,
harmless flavoring, harmless resinous glaze not in excess of four-tenths of one percent, natural gum, and pectin. This section shall not
apply to any chewing gum by reason of its containing harmless
nonnutritive masticatory substances, or to any confection permitted to
be sold by an endorsement from the ((liquor)) office of alcohol
beverage control ((board)) under RCW 66.24.360.

Sec. 170 RCW 70.155.010 and 2009 c 278 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions set forth in RCW 82.24.010 shall apply to this
chapter. In addition, for the purposes of this chapter, unless
otherwise required by the context:
(1) "((Board)) Office" means the Washington state ((liquor)) office
of alcohol beverage control ((board)).
(2) "Internet" means any computer network, telephonic network, or
other electronic network.
(3) "Minor" refers to an individual who is less than eighteen years
old.
(4) "Sample" means a tobacco product distributed to members of the
general public at no cost or at nominal cost for product promotion
purposes.
(5) "Sampling" means the distribution of samples to members of the
public.
(6) "Tobacco product" means a product that contains tobacco and is
intended for human use, including any product defined in RCW
82.24.010(((2))) (1) or 82.26.010(((1))) (21), except that for the
purposes of RCW 70.155.140 only, "tobacco product" does not include
cigars defined in RCW 82.26.010 as to which one thousand units weigh
more than three pounds.

Sec. 171 RCW 70.155.020 and 1993 c 507 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person who holds a license issued under RCW 82.24.520 or
82.24.530 shall:
(1) Display the license or a copy in a prominent location at the
outlet for which the license is issued; and
(2) Display a sign concerning the prohibition of tobacco sales to
minors.
Such sign shall:
(a) Be posted so that it is clearly visible to anyone purchasing
tobacco products from the licensee;
(b) Be designed and produced by the department of health to read:
"THE SALE OF TOBACCO PRODUCTS TO PERSONS UNDER AGE 18 IS STRICTLY
PROHIBITED BY STATE LAW. IF YOU ARE UNDER 18, YOU COULD BE PENALIZED
FOR PURCHASING A TOBACCO PRODUCT; PHOTO ID REQUIRED"; and
(c) Be provided free of charge by the ((liquor)) office of alcohol
beverage control ((board)).

Sec. 172 RCW 70.155.080 and 2002 c 175 s 47 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person under the age of eighteen who purchases or attempts to
purchase, possesses, or obtains or attempts to obtain cigarettes or
tobacco products commits a class 3 civil infraction under chapter 7.80
RCW and is subject to a fine as set out in chapter 7.80 RCW or
participation in up to four hours of community restitution, or both.
The court may also require participation in a smoking cessation
program. This provision does not apply if a person under the age of
eighteen, with parental authorization, is participating in a controlled
purchase as part of ((a liquor)) an office of alcohol beverage control
((board)), law enforcement, or local health department activity.
(2) Municipal and district courts within the state have
jurisdiction for enforcement of this section.

Sec. 173 RCW 70.155.090 and 2006 c 14 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Where there may be a question of a person's right to purchase
or obtain tobacco products by reason of age, the retailer or agent
thereof((,)) shall require the purchaser to present any one of the
following officially issued identification that shows the purchaser's
age and bears his or her signature and photograph: (a) Liquor control
authority card of identification of a state or province of Canada; (b)
driver's license, instruction permit, or identification card of a state
or province of Canada; (c) "identicard" issued by the Washington state
department of licensing under chapter 46.20 RCW; (d) United States
military identification; (e) passport; (f) enrollment card, issued by
the governing authority of a federally recognized Indian tribe located
in Washington, that incorporates security features comparable to those
implemented by the department of licensing for Washington drivers'
licenses. At least ninety days prior to implementation of an
enrollment card under this subsection, the appropriate tribal authority
shall give notice to the ((board)) office. The ((board)) office shall
publish and communicate to licensees regarding the implementation of
each new enrollment card; or (g) merchant marine identification card
issued by the United States coast guard.
(2) It is a defense to a prosecution under RCW 26.28.080 that the
person making a sale reasonably relied on any of the officially issued
identification as defined in subsection (1) of this section. The
((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage control ((board)) shall waive the
suspension or revocation of a license if the licensee clearly
establishes that he or she acted in good faith to prevent violations
and a violation occurred despite the licensee's exercise of due
diligence.

Sec. 174 RCW 70.155.100 and 2006 c 14 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage control ((board)) may
suspend or revoke a retailer's license issued under RCW 82.24.510(1)(b)
held by a business at any location, or may impose a monetary penalty as
set forth in subsection (2) of this section, if the ((liquor control
board)) office finds that the licensee has violated RCW 26.28.080,
70.155.020, 70.155.030, 70.155.040, 70.155.050, 70.155.070, or
70.155.090.
(2) The sanctions that the ((liquor control board)) office may
impose against a person licensed under RCW 82.24.530 based upon one or
more findings under subsection (1) of this section may not exceed the
following:
(a) For violation of RCW 26.28.080 or 70.155.020:
(i) A monetary penalty of one hundred dollars for the first
violation within any two-year period;
(ii) A monetary penalty of three hundred dollars for the second
violation within any two-year period;
(iii) A monetary penalty of one thousand dollars and suspension of
the license for a period of six months for the third violation within
any two-year period;
(iv) A monetary penalty of one thousand five hundred dollars and
suspension of the license for a period of twelve months for the fourth
violation within any two-year period;
(v) Revocation of the license with no possibility of reinstatement
for a period of five years for the fifth or more violation within any
two-year period;
(b) For violations of RCW 70.155.030, a monetary penalty in the
amount of one hundred dollars for each day upon which such violation
occurred;
(c) For violations of RCW 70.155.040 occurring on the licensed
premises:
(i) A monetary penalty of one hundred dollars for the first
violation within any two-year period;
(ii) A monetary penalty of three hundred dollars for the second
violation within any two-year period;
(iii) A monetary penalty of one thousand dollars and suspension of
the license for a period of six months for the third violation within
any two-year period;
(iv) A monetary penalty of one thousand five hundred dollars and
suspension of the license for a period of twelve months for the fourth
violation within any two-year period;
(v) Revocation of the license with no possibility of reinstatement
for a period of five years for the fifth or more violation within any
two-year period;
(d) For violations of RCW 70.155.050, a monetary penalty in the
amount of three hundred dollars for each violation;
(e) For violations of RCW 70.155.070, a monetary penalty in the
amount of one thousand dollars for each violation.
(3) The ((liquor control board)) office may impose a monetary
penalty upon any person other than a licensed cigarette retailer if the
((liquor control board)) office finds that the person has violated RCW
26.28.080, 70.155.020, 70.155.030, 70.155.040, 70.155.050, 70.155.070,
or 70.155.090.
(4) The monetary penalty that the ((liquor control board)) office
may impose based upon one or more findings under subsection (3) of this
section may not exceed the following:
(a) For violation of RCW 26.28.080 or 70.155.020, fifty dollars for
the first violation and one hundred dollars for each subsequent
violation;
(b) For violations of RCW 70.155.030, one hundred dollars for each
day upon which such violation occurred;
(c) For violations of RCW 70.155.040, one hundred dollars for each
violation;
(d) For violations of RCW 70.155.050, three hundred dollars for
each violation;
(e) For violations of RCW 70.155.070, one thousand dollars for each
violation.
(5) The ((liquor control board)) office may develop and offer a
class for retail clerks and use this class in lieu of a monetary
penalty for the clerk's first violation.
(6) The ((liquor control board)) office may issue a cease and
desist order to any person who is found by the ((liquor control board))
office to have violated or intending to violate the provisions of this
chapter, RCW 26.28.080 or 82.24.500, requiring such person to cease
specified conduct that is in violation. The issuance of a cease and
desist order shall not preclude the imposition of other sanctions
authorized by this statute or any other provision of law.
(7) The ((liquor control board)) office may seek injunctive relief
to enforce the provisions of RCW 26.28.080 or 82.24.500 or this
chapter. The ((liquor control board)) office may initiate legal action
to collect civil penalties imposed under this chapter if the same have
not been paid within thirty days after imposition of such penalties.
In any action filed by the ((liquor control board)) office under this
chapter, the court may, in addition to any other relief, award the
((liquor control board)) office reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.
(8) All proceedings under subsections (1) through (6) of this
section shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(9) The ((liquor control board)) office may reduce or waive either
the penalties or the suspension or revocation of a license, or both, as
set forth in this chapter where the elements of proof are inadequate or
where there are mitigating circumstances. Mitigating circumstances may
include, but are not limited to, an exercise of due diligence by a
retailer. Further, the ((board)) office may exceed penalties set forth
in this chapter based on aggravating circumstances.

Sec. 175 RCW 70.155.110 and 1993 c 507 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage control ((board))
shall, in addition to the ((board's)) office's other powers and
authorities, have the authority to enforce the provisions of this
chapter and RCW 26.28.080(((4))) and 82.24.500. The ((liquor control
board)) office shall have full power to revoke or suspend the license
of any retailer or wholesaler in accordance with the provisions of RCW
70.155.100.
(2) The ((liquor control board)) office and the ((board's))
office's authorized agents or employees shall have full power and
authority to enter any place of business where tobacco products are
sold for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter.
(3) For the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter and
RCW 26.28.080(((4))) and 82.24.500, a peace officer or enforcement
officer of the ((liquor control board)) office who has reasonable
grounds to believe a person observed by the officer purchasing,
attempting to purchase, or in possession of tobacco products is under
the age of eighteen years of age, may detain such person for a
reasonable period of time and in such a reasonable manner as is
necessary to determine the person's true identity and date of birth.
Further, tobacco products possessed by persons under the age of
eighteen years of age are considered contraband and may be seized by a
peace officer or enforcement officer of the ((liquor control board))
office.
(4) The ((liquor control board)) office may work with local county
health departments or districts and local law enforcement agencies to
conduct random, unannounced, inspections to assure compliance.

Sec. 176 RCW 70.155.120 and 1993 c 507 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The youth tobacco prevention account is created in the state
treasury. All fees collected pursuant to RCW 82.24.520 and 82.24.530
and funds collected by the ((liquor control board)) office from the
imposition of monetary penalties and samplers' fees shall be deposited
into this account, except that ten percent of all such fees and
penalties shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(2) Moneys appropriated from the youth tobacco prevention account
to the department of health shall be used by the department of health
for implementation of this chapter, including collection and reporting
of data regarding enforcement and the extent to which access to tobacco
products by youth has been reduced.
(3) The department of health shall enter into interagency
agreements with the ((liquor control board)) office to pay the costs
incurred, up to thirty percent of available funds, in carrying out its
enforcement responsibilities under this chapter. Such agreements shall
set forth standards of enforcement, consistent with the funding
available, so as to reduce the extent to which tobacco products are
available to individuals under the age of eighteen. The agreements
shall also set forth requirements for data reporting by the ((liquor
control board)) office regarding its enforcement activities.
(4) The department of health and the department of revenue shall
enter into an interagency agreement for payment of the cost of
administering the tobacco retailer licensing system and for the
provision of quarterly documentation of tobacco wholesaler, retailer,
and vending machine names and locations.
(5) The department of health shall, within up to seventy percent of
available funds, provide grants to local health departments or other
local community agencies to develop and implement coordinated tobacco
intervention strategies to prevent and reduce tobacco use by youth.

Sec. 177 RCW 70.158.020 and 2003 c 25 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following definitions apply to this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Brand family" means all styles of cigarettes sold under the
same trademark and differentiated from one another by means of
additional modifiers or descriptors, including, but not limited to,
"menthol," "lights," "kings," and "100s," and includes any brand name
alone or in conjunction with any other word, trademark, logo, symbol,
motto, selling message, recognizable pattern of colors, or any other
indicia of product identification identical or similar to, or
identifiable with, a previously known brand of cigarettes.
(2) (("Board" means the liquor control board.
(3))) "Cigarette" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.157.010(d).
(((4))) (3) "Director" means the director of the department of
revenue except as otherwise noted.
(((5))) (4) "Directory" means the directory to be created and
published on a web site by the attorney general pursuant to RCW
70.158.030(2).
(((6))) (5) "Distributor" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.26.010(((3))) (7), except that for purposes of this chapter, no
person is a distributor if that person does not deal with cigarettes as
defined in this section.
(((7))) (6) "Master settlement agreement" has the same meaning as
in RCW 70.157.010(e).
(((8))) (7) "Nonparticipating manufacturer" means any tobacco
product manufacturer that is not a participating manufacturer.
(8) "Office" means the office of alcohol beverage control.
(9) "Participating manufacturer" has the meaning given that term in
section II(jj) of the master settlement agreement.
(10) "Qualified escrow fund" has the same meaning as in RCW
70.157.010(f).
(11) "Stamp" means "stamp" as defined in RCW 82.24.010(7) or as
referred to in RCW 43.06.455(4).
(12) "Tobacco product manufacturer" has the same meaning as in RCW
70.157.010(i).
(13) "Units sold" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.157.010(j).
(14) "Wholesaler" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.24.010.

Sec. 178 RCW 70.158.050 and 2003 c 25 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the reporting requirements under RCW
70.157.010(j) and the rules adopted thereunder, not later than twenty-five calendar days after the end of each calendar month, and more
frequently if directed by the director, each wholesaler and distributor
shall submit information the director requires to facilitate compliance
with this chapter, including, but not limited to, a list by brand
family of the total number of cigarettes, or, in the case of roll-your-
own, the equivalent stick count for which the wholesaler or distributor
affixed stamps during the previous calendar month or otherwise paid the
tax due for the cigarettes. Each wholesaler and distributor shall
maintain and make available to the director, all invoices and
documentation of sales of all nonparticipating manufacturer cigarettes
and any other information relied upon in reporting to the attorney
general or the director for a period of five years.
(2) Information or records required to be furnished to the
department, the ((board)) office, or the attorney general are
confidential and shall not be disclosed. However, the director and the
((board)) office are authorized to disclose to the attorney general any
information received under this chapter and requested by the attorney
general for purposes of determining compliance with and enforcing the
provisions of this chapter. The director, the ((board)) office, and
the attorney general may share with each other the information received
under this chapter, and may share information with other federal,
state, or local agencies, including without limitation the ((board))
office, only for purposes of enforcement of this chapter, RCW
70.157.020, or corresponding laws of other states. If a tobacco
product manufacturer that is required to establish a qualified escrow
fund under RCW 70.157.020 disputes the attorney general's determination
of what that manufacturer needs to place into escrow, and the attorney
general determines that the dispute can likely be resolved by
disclosing reports from the relevant distributors and wholesalers
indicating the sales or purchases of the tobacco manufacturer's
products, then the attorney general shall request voluntary waivers of
confidentiality so that the reports may be disclosed to the tobacco
product manufacturer to help resolve the dispute. If the waivers are
provided, then the director and the attorney general are authorized to
disclose the waived confidential information collected on the sales or
purchases of cigarettes to the tobacco product manufacturer. However,
before the attorney general or the director discloses the waived
confidential information, the tobacco product manufacturer must provide
to the attorney general all records relating to its sales or purchases
of cigarettes in dispute. The information provided to a tobacco
product manufacturer pursuant to this subsection (2) shall be limited
to brands or products of that manufacturer only, may be used only for
the limited purpose of determining the appropriate escrow deposit, and
may not be disclosed by the tobacco product manufacturer.
(3) The attorney general may require at any time from the
nonparticipating manufacturer proof, from the financial institution in
which the manufacturer has established a qualified escrow fund for the
purpose of compliance with RCW 70.157.020(b)(1), of the amount of money
in the fund, exclusive of interest, the amount and date of each deposit
to the fund, and the amount and date of each withdrawal from the fund.
(4) In addition to the information required to be submitted
pursuant to RCW 70.158.030, this section, and chapters 82.24 and 82.26
RCW, the director, the ((board)) office, or the attorney general may
require a wholesaler, distributor, or tobacco product manufacturer to
submit any additional information including, but not limited to,
samples of the packaging or labeling of each brand family, as is
necessary to enable the attorney general to determine whether a tobacco
product manufacturer is in compliance with this chapter. If the
director, the ((board)) office, or the attorney general makes a request
for information pursuant to this subsection (4), the tobacco product
manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler shall comply promptly.
(5) A nonparticipating manufacturer that either: (a) Has not
previously made escrow payments to the state of Washington pursuant to
RCW 70.157.020; or (b) has not actually made any escrow payments for
more than one year, shall make the required escrow deposits in
quarterly installments during the first year in which the sales covered
by the deposits are made or in the first year in which the payments are
made. The director or the attorney general may require production of
information sufficient to enable the attorney general to determine the
adequacy of the amount of the installment deposit.

Sec. 179 RCW 70.158.060 and 2003 c 25 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to or in lieu of any other civil or criminal remedy
provided by law, upon a determination that a wholesaler has violated
RCW 70.158.030(3) or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter, the
director or the ((board)) office may revoke or suspend the license of
the wholesaler in the manner provided by chapter 82.24 or 82.32 RCW.
Each stamp affixed and each sale or offer to sell cigarettes in
violation of RCW 70.158.030(3) shall constitute a separate violation.
For each violation of this chapter, the director or the ((board))
office may also impose a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed the
greater of five hundred percent of the retail value of the cigarettes
or five thousand dollars upon a determination of violation of RCW
70.158.030(3) or any rules adopted pursuant thereto. The penalty shall
be imposed in the manner provided by chapter 82.24 RCW.
(2) The attorney general may seek an injunction in superior court
to restrain a threatened or actual violation of RCW 70.158.030(3) or
70.158.050 (1) or (4) by a person and to compel the person to comply
with these sections. In any action brought pursuant to this section,
the state shall be entitled to recover the costs of investigation,
costs of the action, and reasonable attorneys' fees.
(3) It is unlawful for a person to: (a) Sell or distribute
cigarettes or (b) acquire, hold, own, possess, transport, import, or
cause to be imported cigarettes, that the person knows or should know
are intended for distribution or sale in the state in violation of RCW
70.158.030(3). A violation of this subsection (3) is a gross
misdemeanor.
(4) Any violation of this chapter is not reasonable in relation to
the development and preservation of business and is an unfair and
deceptive act or practice and an unfair method of competition in the
conduct of trade or commerce in violation of RCW 19.86.020. Standing
to bring an action to enforce RCW 19.86.020 for violation of this
chapter shall lie solely with the attorney general. Remedies provided
by chapter 19.86 RCW are cumulative and not exclusive.

Sec. 180 RCW 70.158.070 and 2003 c 25 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A determination of the attorney general not to include or to
remove from the directory a brand family or tobacco product
manufacturer shall be final agency action for purposes of review under
RCW 34.05.570(4).
(2) No person shall be issued a license or granted a renewal of a
license to act as a wholesaler unless the person has certified in
writing under penalty of perjury, that the person will comply fully
with this section.
(3) The first reports of wholesalers and distributors are due
August 25, 2003. The certifications by a tobacco product manufacturer
described in RCW 70.158.030(1) are due September 15, 2003. The
directory described in RCW 70.158.030(2) shall be published or made
available by November 1, 2003.
(4) The attorney general, the ((board)) office, and the director
may adopt rules as necessary to effect the administration of this
chapter.
(5) In any action brought by the state to enforce this chapter, the
state is entitled to recover the costs of investigation, expert witness
fees, costs of the action, and reasonable attorneys' fees.
(6) If a court determines that a person has violated this chapter,
the court shall order any profits, gain, gross receipts, or other
benefit from the violation to be disgorged and paid to the general
fund. Unless otherwise expressly provided, the remedies or penalties
provided by this chapter are cumulative to each other and to the
remedies or penalties available under all other laws of this state.

Sec. 181 RCW 77.15.750 and 2011 c 320 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful use of a department permit if
the person:
(a) Violates any terms or conditions of the permit issued by the
department or the director; or
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or the director applicable
to the requirement for, issuance of, or use of the permit.
(2)(a) Permits covered under subsection (1) of this section
include, but are not limited to, master hunter permits, crab pot
removal permits and shellfish pot removal permits under RCW 77.70.500,
depredation permits, landowner hunting permits, commercial carp license
permits, permits to possess or dispense beer or malt liquor pursuant to
RCW 66.28.210, and permits to hold, sponsor, or attend an event
requiring a banquet permit from the ((liquor)) office of alcohol
beverage control ((board)).
(b) Permits excluded from subsection (1) of this section include
the discover pass created in RCW 79A.80.020, the vehicle access pass
created in RCW 79A.80.040, the day-use permit created in RCW
79A.80.030, commercial use or activity permits, noncommercial use or
activity permits, parking permits, experimental fishery permits, trial
commercial fishery permits, and scientific collection permits.
(3) Unlawful use of a department permit is a misdemeanor.
(4) A person is guilty of unlawful use of an experimental fishery
permit or a trial commercial fishery permit if the person:
(a) Violates any terms or conditions of the permit issued by the
department or the director; or
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or the director applicable
to the issuance or use of the permit.
(5) Unlawful use of an experimental fishery permit or a trial
commercial fishery permit is a gross misdemeanor.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Experimental fishery permit" means a permit issued by the
director for either:
(i) An "emerging commercial fishery," defined as a fishery for a
newly classified species for which the department has determined that
there is a need to limit participation; or
(ii) An "expanding commercial fishery," defined as a fishery for a
previously classified species in a new area, by a new method, or at a
new effort level, for which the department has determined that there is
a need to limit participation.
(b) "Trial commercial fishery permit" means a permit issued by the
department for trial harvest of a newly classified species or harvest
of a previously classified species in a new area or by a new means.

Sec. 182 RCW 82.24.010 and 1997 c 420 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter:
(1) (("Board" means the liquor control board.
(2))) "Cigarette" means any roll for smoking made wholly or in part
of tobacco, irrespective of size or shape and irrespective of the
tobacco being flavored, adulterated, or mixed with any other
ingredient, where such roll has a wrapper or cover made of paper or any
material, except where such wrapper is wholly or in the greater part
made of natural leaf tobacco in its natural state.
(((3))) (2) "Indian tribal organization" means a federally
recognized Indian tribe, or tribal entity, and includes an Indian
wholesaler or retailer that is owned by an Indian who is an enrolled
tribal member conducting business under tribal license or similar
tribal approval within Indian country. For purposes of this chapter
"Indian country" is defined in the manner set forth in 18 U.S.C. Sec.
1151.
(3) "Office" means the office of alcohol beverage control.
(4) "Precollection obligation" means the obligation of a seller
otherwise exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter to collect the
tax from that seller's buyer.
(5) "Retailer" means every person, other than a wholesaler, who
purchases, sells, offers for sale or distributes any one or more of the
articles taxed herein, irrespective of quantity or amount, or the
number of sales, and all persons operating under a retailer's
registration certificate.
(6) "Retail selling price" means the ordinary, customary or usual
price paid by the consumer for each package of cigarettes, less the tax
levied by this chapter and less any similar tax levied by this state.
(7) "Stamp" means the stamp or stamps by use of which the tax levy
under this chapter is paid or identification is made of those
cigarettes with respect to which no tax is imposed.
(8) "Wholesaler" means every person who purchases, sells, or
distributes any one or more of the articles taxed herein to retailers
for the purpose of resale only.
(9) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the words
"person," "sale," "business" and "successor" applies equally in this
chapter.

Sec. 183 RCW 82.24.550 and 2009 c 154 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((board)) office shall enforce the provisions of this
chapter. The ((board)) office may adopt, amend, and repeal rules
necessary to enforce and administer the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The department may adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to
administer the provisions of this chapter. The ((board)) office may
revoke or suspend the license or permit of any wholesale or retail
cigarette dealer in the state upon sufficient cause appearing of the
violation of this chapter or upon the failure of such licensee to
comply with any of the provisions of this chapter.
(3) A license shall not be suspended or revoked except upon notice
to the licensee and after a hearing as prescribed by the ((board))
office. The ((board)) office, upon finding that the licensee has
failed to comply with any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted
under this chapter, shall, in the case of the first offense, suspend
the license or licenses of the licensee for a period of not less than
thirty consecutive business days, and, in the case of a second or
further offense, shall suspend the license or licenses for a period of
not less than ninety consecutive business days nor more than twelve
months, and, in the event the ((board)) office finds the licensee has
been guilty of willful and persistent violations, it may revoke the
license or licenses.
(4) Any licenses issued under chapter 82.26 RCW to a person whose
license or licenses have been suspended or revoked under this section
shall also be suspended or revoked during the period of suspension or
revocation under this section.
(5) Any person whose license or licenses have been revoked under
this section may reapply to the ((board)) office at the expiration of
one year from the date of revocation of the license or licenses. The
license or licenses may be approved by the ((board)) office if it
appears to the satisfaction of the ((board)) office that the licensee
will comply with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted
under this chapter.
(6) A person whose license has been suspended or revoked shall not
sell cigarettes or tobacco products or permit cigarettes or tobacco
products to be sold during the period of such suspension or revocation
on the premises occupied by the person or upon other premises
controlled by the person or others or in any other manner or form
whatever.
(7) Any determination and order by the ((board)) office, and any
order of suspension or revocation by the ((board)) office of the
license or licenses issued under this chapter, or refusal to reinstate
a license or licenses after revocation shall be reviewable by an appeal
to the superior court of Thurston county. The superior court shall
review the order or ruling of the ((board)) office and may hear the
matter de novo, having due regard to the provisions of this chapter and
the duties imposed upon the ((board)) office.
(8) If the ((board)) office makes an initial decision to deny a
license or renewal, or suspend or revoke a license, the applicant may
request a hearing subject to the applicable provisions under Title 34
RCW.
(9) For purposes of this section, "tobacco products" has the same
meaning as in RCW 82.26.010.

Sec. 184 RCW 82.24.551 and 1997 c 420 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall appoint, as duly authorized agents,
enforcement officers of the ((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage
control ((board)) to enforce provisions of this chapter. These
officers shall not be considered employees of the department.

Sec. 185 RCW 82.24.552 and 2007 c 221 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of obtaining information concerning any matter
relating to the administration or enforcement of this chapter, the
department, the ((board)) office, or any of its agents may inspect the
books, documents, or records of any person transporting cigarettes for
sale to any person or entity in the state, and books, documents, or
records containing any information relating to the transportation or
possession of cigarettes for sale in the possession of a specific
common carrier as defined in RCW 81.80.010 doing business in this
state, or books, documents, and records of vehicle rental agencies
whose vehicles are being rented for the purpose of transporting
contraband cigarettes.
(2) If a person neglects or refuses to produce and submit for
inspection any book, record, or document as required by this section
when requested to do so by the department, the ((board)) office, or its
agent, then the department or the ((board)) office may seek an order in
superior court compelling production of the books, records, or
documents.

Sec. 186 RCW 82.26.010 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 22 s 4 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Actual price" means the total amount of consideration for
which tobacco products are sold, valued in money, whether received in
money or otherwise, including any charges by the seller necessary to
complete the sale such as charges for delivery, freight,
transportation, or handling.
(2) "Affiliated" means related in any way by virtue of any form or
amount of common ownership, control, operation, or management.
(3) (("Board" means the liquor control board.
(4))) "Business" means any trade, occupation, activity, or
enterprise engaged in for the purpose of selling or distributing
tobacco products in this state.
(((5))) (4) "Cigar" means a roll for smoking that is of any size or
shape and that is made wholly or in part of tobacco, irrespective of
whether the tobacco is pure or flavored, adulterated or mixed with any
other ingredient, if the roll has a wrapper made wholly or in greater
part of tobacco. "Cigar" does not include a cigarette.
(((6))) (5) "Cigarette" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.24.010.
(((7))) (6) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(((8))) (7) "Distributor" means (a) any person engaged in the
business of selling tobacco products in this state who brings, or
causes to be brought, into this state from without the state any
tobacco products for sale, (b) any person who makes, manufactures,
fabricates, or stores tobacco products in this state for sale in this
state, (c) any person engaged in the business of selling tobacco
products without this state who ships or transports tobacco products to
retailers in this state, to be sold by those retailers, (d) any person
engaged in the business of selling tobacco products in this state who
handles for sale any tobacco products that are within this state but
upon which tax has not been imposed.
(((9))) (8) "Indian country" means the same as defined in chapter
82.24 RCW.
(((10))) (9) "Little cigar" means a cigar that has a cellulose
acetate integrated filter.
(((11))) (10) "Manufacturer" means a person who manufactures and
sells tobacco products.
(((12))) (11) "Manufacturer's representative" means a person hired
by a manufacturer to sell or distribute the manufacturer's tobacco
products, and includes employees and independent contractors.
(((13))) (12) "Moist snuff" means tobacco that is finely cut,
ground, or powdered; is not for smoking; and is intended to be placed
in the oral, but not the nasal, cavity.
(13) "Office" means the office of alcohol beverage control.
(14) "Person" means any individual, receiver, administrator,
executor, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm,
copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint stock company,
business trust, municipal corporation, the state and its departments
and institutions, political subdivision of the state of Washington,
corporation, limited liability company, association, society, any group
of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual, cooperative,
fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise. The term excludes any person
immune from state taxation, including the United States or its
instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes and enrolled
tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.
(15) "Place of business" means any place where tobacco products are
sold or where tobacco products are manufactured, stored, or kept for
the purpose of sale, including any vessel, vehicle, airplane, train, or
vending machine.
(16) "Retail outlet" means each place of business from which
tobacco products are sold to consumers.
(17) "Retailer" means any person engaged in the business of selling
tobacco products to ultimate consumers.
(18)(a) "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, or barter, in any
manner or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration, and includes
and means all sales made by any person.
(b) The term "sale" includes a gift by a person engaged in the
business of selling tobacco products, for advertising, promoting, or as
a means of evading the provisions of this chapter.
(19)(a) "Taxable sales price" means:
(i) In the case of a taxpayer that is not affiliated with the
manufacturer, distributor, or other person from whom the taxpayer
purchased tobacco products, the actual price for which the taxpayer
purchased the tobacco products;
(ii) In the case of a taxpayer that purchases tobacco products from
an affiliated manufacturer, affiliated distributor, or other affiliated
person, and that sells those tobacco products to unaffiliated
distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate consumers, the actual
price for which that taxpayer sells those tobacco products to
unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate
consumers;
(iii) In the case of a taxpayer that sells tobacco products only to
affiliated distributors or affiliated retailers, the price, determined
as nearly as possible according to the actual price, that other
distributors sell similar tobacco products of like quality and
character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or
ultimate consumers;
(iv) In the case of a taxpayer that is a manufacturer selling
tobacco products directly to ultimate consumers, the actual price for
which the taxpayer sells those tobacco products to ultimate consumers;
(v) In the case of a taxpayer that has acquired tobacco products
under a sale as defined in subsection (18)(b) of this section, the
price, determined as nearly as possible according to the actual price,
that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same tobacco products
or similar tobacco products of like quality and character to
unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate
consumers; or
(vi) In any case where (a)(i) through (v) of this subsection do not
apply, the price, determined as nearly as possible according to the
actual price, that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same
tobacco products or similar tobacco products of like quality and
character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or
ultimate consumers.
(b) For purposes of (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection only,
"person" includes both persons as defined in subsection (14) of this
section and any person immune from state taxation, including the United
States or its instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes
and enrolled tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.
(c) The department may adopt rules regarding the determination of
taxable sales price under this subsection.
(20) "Taxpayer" means a person liable for the tax imposed by this
chapter.
(21) "Tobacco products" means cigars, cheroots, stogies, periques,
granulated, plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed, and other smoking
tobacco, snuff, snuff flour, cavendish, plug and twist tobacco, fine-cut and other chewing tobaccos, shorts, refuse scraps, clippings,
cuttings and sweepings of tobacco, and other kinds and forms of
tobacco, prepared in such manner as to be suitable for chewing or
smoking in a pipe or otherwise, or both for chewing and smoking, and
any other product, regardless of form, that contains tobacco and is
intended for human consumption or placement in the oral or nasal cavity
or absorption into the human body by any other means, but does not
include cigarettes as defined in RCW 82.24.010.
(22) "Unaffiliated distributor" means a distributor that is not
affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from
whom the distributor has purchased tobacco products.
(23) "Unaffiliated retailer" means a retailer that is not
affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from
whom the retailer has purchased tobacco products.

Sec. 187 RCW 82.26.060 and 2009 c 154 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every distributor shall keep at each place of business complete
and accurate records for that place of business, including itemized
invoices, of tobacco products held, purchased, manufactured, brought in
or caused to be brought in from without the state, or shipped or
transported to retailers in this state, and of all sales of tobacco
products made.
(2) These records shall show the names and addresses of purchasers,
the inventory of all tobacco products, and other pertinent papers and
documents relating to the purchase, sale, or disposition of tobacco
products. All invoices and other records required by this section to
be kept shall be preserved for a period of five years from the date of
the invoices or other documents or the date of the entries appearing in
the records.
(3) At any time during usual business hours the department,
((board)) office, or its duly authorized agents or employees, may enter
any place of business of a distributor, without a search warrant, and
inspect the premises, the records required to be kept under this
chapter, and the tobacco products contained therein, to determine
whether or not all the provisions of this chapter are being fully
complied with. If the department, ((board)) office, or any of its
agents or employees, are denied free access or are hindered or
interfered with in making such examination, the registration
certificate issued under RCW 82.32.030 of the distributor at such
premises shall be subject to revocation, and any licenses issued under
this chapter or chapter 82.24 RCW are subject to suspension or
revocation, by the department or ((board)) office.

Sec. 188 RCW 82.26.080 and 2005 c 180 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every retailer shall procure itemized invoices of all tobacco
products purchased. The invoices shall show the seller's name and
address, the date of purchase, and all prices and discounts.
(2) The retailer shall keep at each retail outlet copies of
complete, accurate, and legible invoices for that retail outlet or
place of business. All invoices required to be kept under this section
shall be preserved for five years from the date of purchase.
(3) At any time during usual business hours the department,
((board)) office, or its duly authorized agents or employees may enter
any retail outlet without a search warrant, and inspect the premises
for invoices required to be kept under this section and the tobacco
products contained in the retail outlet, to determine whether or not
all the provisions of this chapter are being fully complied with. If
the department, ((board)) office, or any of its agents or employees,
are denied free access or are hindered or interfered with in making the
inspection, the registration certificate issued under RCW 82.32.030 of
the retailer at the premises is subject to revocation, and any licenses
issued under this chapter or chapter 82.24 RCW are subject to
suspension or revocation by the department.

Sec. 189 RCW 82.26.105 and 2007 c 221 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of obtaining information concerning any matter
relating to the administration or enforcement of this chapter, the
department, the ((board)) office, or any of its agents may inspect the
books, documents, or records of any person transporting tobacco
products for sale to any person or entity in the state, and books,
documents, or records containing any information relating to the
transportation or possession of tobacco products for sale in the
possession of a specific common carrier as defined in RCW 81.80.010
doing business in this state, or books, documents, and records of
vehicle rental agencies whose vehicles are being rented for the purpose
of transporting contraband tobacco products.
(2) If a person neglects or refuses to produce and submit for
inspection any book, record, or document as required by this section
when requested to do so by the department, the ((board)) office, or its
agent, then the department or the ((board)) office may seek an order in
superior court compelling production of the books, records, or
documents.

Sec. 190 RCW 82.26.121 and 1997 c 420 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall appoint, as duly authorized agents,
enforcement officers of the ((liquor control board)) office to enforce
provisions of this chapter. These officers shall not be considered
employees of the department.

Sec. 191 RCW 82.26.140 and 2005 c 180 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person other than (a) a licensed distributor in the
distributor's own vehicle, a manufacturer's representative authorized
to sell or distribute tobacco products in this state under RCW
82.26.210, or a licensed retailer in the retailer's own vehicle, or (b)
a person who has given notice to the ((board)) office in advance of the
commencement of transportation shall transport or cause to be
transported in this state tobacco products for sale.
(2) When transporting tobacco products for sale, the person shall
have in his or her actual possession, or cause to have in the actual
possession of those persons transporting such tobacco products on his
or her behalf, invoices or delivery tickets for the tobacco products,
which shall show the true name and address of the consignor or seller,
the true name and address of the consignee or purchaser, and the
quantity and brands of the tobacco products being transported.
(3) In any case where the department or the ((board)) office, or
any peace officer of the state, has knowledge or reasonable grounds to
believe that any vehicle is transporting tobacco products in violation
of this section, the department, the ((board)) office, or peace
officer, is authorized to stop the vehicle and to inspect it for
contraband tobacco products.

Sec. 192 RCW 82.26.150 and 2009 c 154 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The licenses issuable by the ((board)) office under this
chapter are as follows:
(a) A distributor's license; and
(b) A retailer's license.
(2) Application for the licenses shall be made through the master
license system under chapter 19.02 RCW. The ((board)) office may adopt
rules regarding the regulation of the licenses. The ((board)) office
may refuse to issue any license under this chapter if the ((board))
office has reasonable cause to believe that the applicant has willfully
withheld information requested for the purpose of determining the
eligibility of the applicant to receive a license, or if the ((board))
office has reasonable cause to believe that information submitted in
the application is false or misleading or is not made in good faith.
In addition, for the purpose of reviewing an application for a
distributor's license or retailer's license and for considering the
denial, suspension, or revocation of any such license, the ((board))
office may consider criminal conduct of the applicant, including an
administrative violation history record with the ((board)) office and
a criminal history record information check within the previous five
years, in any state, tribal, or federal jurisdiction in the United
States, its territories, or possessions, and the provisions of RCW
9.95.240 and chapter 9.96A RCW shall not apply to such cases. The
((board)) office may, in its discretion, issue or refuse to issue the
distributor's license or retailer's license, subject to the provisions
of RCW 82.26.220.
(3) No person may qualify for a distributor's license or a
retailer's license under this section without first undergoing a
criminal background check. The background check shall be performed by
the ((board)) office and must disclose any criminal conduct within the
previous five years in any state, tribal, or federal jurisdiction in
the United States, its territories, or possessions. If the applicant
or licensee also has a license issued under chapter 66.24 or 82.24 RCW,
the background check done under the authority of chapter 66.24 or 82.24
RCW satisfies the requirements of this section.
(4) Each license issued under this chapter shall expire on the
master license expiration date. The license shall be continued
annually if the licensee has paid the required fee and complied with
all the provisions of this chapter and the rules of the ((board))
office adopted pursuant to this chapter.
(5) Each license and any other evidence of the license required
under this chapter must be exhibited in each place of business for
which it is issued and in the manner required for the display of a
master license.

Sec. 193 RCW 82.26.180 and 2009 c 154 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((board)) office shall compile and maintain a current record of
the names of all distributors and retailers licensed under this chapter
and the status of their license or licenses. The information must be
updated on a monthly basis and published on the ((board's)) office's
official internet web site. This information is not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and shall be disclosed to
manufacturers, distributors, retailers, and the general public upon
request.

Sec. 194 RCW 82.26.190 and 2009 c 154 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) No person may engage in or conduct business as a distributor
or retailer in this state after September 30, 2005, without a valid
license issued under this chapter. Any person who sells tobacco
products to persons other than ultimate consumers or who meets the
definition of distributor under RCW 82.26.010(((3))) (7)(d) must obtain
a distributor's license under this chapter. Any person who sells
tobacco products to ultimate consumers must obtain a retailer's license
under this chapter.
(b) A violation of this subsection (1) is punishable as a class C
felony according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2)(a) No person engaged in or conducting business as a distributor
or retailer in this state may:
(i) Refuse to allow the department or the ((board)) office, on
demand, to make a full inspection of any place of business where any of
the tobacco products taxed under this chapter are sold, stored, or
handled, or otherwise hinder or prevent such inspection;
(ii) Make, use, or present or exhibit to the department or the
((board)) office any invoice for any of the tobacco products taxed
under this chapter that bears an untrue date or falsely states the
nature or quantity of the goods invoiced; or
(iii) Fail to produce on demand of the department or the ((board))
office all invoices of all the tobacco products taxed under this
chapter within five years prior to such demand unless the person can
show by satisfactory proof that the nonproduction of the invoices was
due to causes beyond the person's control.
(b) No person, other than a licensed distributor or retailer, may
transport tobacco products for sale in this state for which the taxes
imposed under this chapter have not been paid unless:
(i) Notice of the transportation has been given as required under
RCW 82.26.140;
(ii) The person transporting the tobacco products actually
possesses invoices or delivery tickets showing the true name and
address of the consignor or seller, the true name and address of the
consignee or purchaser, and the quantity and brands of tobacco products
being transported; and
(iii) The tobacco products are consigned to or purchased by a
person in this state who is licensed under this chapter.
(c) A violation of this subsection (2) is a gross misdemeanor.
(3) Any person licensed under this chapter as a distributor, and
any person licensed under this chapter as a retailer, shall not operate
in any other capacity unless the additional appropriate license is
first secured. A violation of this subsection (3) is a misdemeanor.
(4) The penalties provided in this section are in addition to any
other penalties provided by law for violating the provisions of this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter.

Sec. 195 RCW 82.26.210 and 2009 c 154 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
A manufacturer that has manufacturer's representatives who sell or
distribute the manufacturer's tobacco products in this state must
provide the ((board)) office a list of the names and addresses of all
such representatives and must ensure that the list provided to the
((board)) office is kept current. A manufacturer's representative is
not authorized to distribute or sell tobacco products in this state
unless the manufacturer that hired the representative has a valid
distributor's license under this chapter and that manufacturer provides
the ((board)) office a current list of all of its manufacturer's
representatives as required by this section. A manufacturer's
representative must carry a copy of the distributor's license of the
manufacturer that hired the representative at all times when selling or
distributing the manufacturer's tobacco products.

Sec. 196 RCW 82.26.220 and 2009 c 154 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((board)) office shall enforce this chapter. The ((board))
office may adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to enforce and
administer this chapter.
(2) The department may adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to
administer this chapter. The ((board)) office may revoke or suspend
the distributor's or retailer's license of any distributor or retailer
of tobacco products in the state upon sufficient cause showing a
violation of this chapter or upon the failure of the licensee to comply
with any of the rules adopted under it.
(3) A license shall not be suspended or revoked except upon notice
to the licensee and after a hearing as prescribed by the ((board))
office. The ((board)) office, upon finding that the licensee has
failed to comply with any provision of this chapter or of any rule
adopted under it, shall, in the case of the first offense, suspend the
license or licenses of the licensee for a period of not less than
thirty consecutive business days, and in the case of a second or
further offense, suspend the license or licenses for a period of not
less than ninety consecutive business days but not more than twelve
months, and in the event the ((board)) office finds the licensee has
been guilty of willful and persistent violations, it may revoke the
license or licenses.
(4) Any licenses issued under chapter 82.24 RCW to a person whose
license or licenses have been suspended or revoked under this section
shall also be suspended or revoked during the period of suspension or
revocation under this section.
(5) Any person whose license or licenses have been revoked under
this section may reapply to the ((board)) office at the expiration of
one year of the license or licenses. The license or licenses may be
approved by the ((board)) office if it appears to the satisfaction of
the ((board)) office that the licensee will comply with the provisions
of this chapter and the rules adopted under it.
(6) A person whose license has been suspended or revoked shall not
sell tobacco products or cigarettes or permit tobacco products or
cigarettes to be sold during the period of suspension or revocation on
the premises occupied by the person or upon other premises controlled
by the person or others or in any other manner or form.
(7) Any determination and order by the ((board)) office, and any
order of suspension or revocation by the ((board)) office of the
license or licenses issued under this chapter, or refusal to reinstate
a license or licenses after revocation is reviewable by an appeal to
the superior court of Thurston county. The superior court shall review
the order or ruling of the ((board)) office and may hear the matter de
novo, having due regard to the provisions of this chapter and the
duties imposed upon the ((board)) office.
(8) If the ((board)) office makes an initial decision to deny a
license or renewal, or suspend or revoke a license, the applicant may
request a hearing subject to the applicable provisions under Title 34
RCW.

Sec. 197 RCW 82.26.230 and 2005 c 180 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any tobacco products in the possession of a person selling
tobacco products in this state acting as a distributor or retailer and
who is not licensed as required under RCW 82.26.190, or a person who is
selling tobacco products in violation of RCW 82.26.220(6), may be
seized without a warrant by any agent of the department, agent of the
((board)) office, or law enforcement officer of this state. Any
tobacco products seized under this subsection shall be deemed
forfeited.
(2) Any tobacco products in the possession of a person who is not
a licensed distributor or retailer and who transports tobacco products
for sale without having provided notice to the ((board)) office
required under RCW 82.26.140, or without invoices or delivery tickets
showing the true name and address of the consignor or seller, the true
name and address of the consignee or purchaser, and the quantity and
brands of tobacco products being transported may be seized and are
subject to forfeiture.
(3) All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels that
are used, or intended for use to transport, or in any manner to
facilitate the transportation, for the purpose of sale or receipt of
tobacco products under subsection (2) of this section, may be seized
and are subject to forfeiture except:
(a) A conveyance used by any person as a common or contract carrier
having in actual possession invoices or delivery tickets showing the
true name and address of the consignor or seller, the true name of the
consignee or purchaser, and the quantity and brands of the tobacco
products transported, unless it appears that the owner or other person
in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a
violation of this chapter;
(b) A conveyance subject to forfeiture under this section by reason
of any act or omission of which the owner establishes to have been
committed or omitted without his or her knowledge or consent; or
(c) A conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest if the
secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or
omission.
(4) Property subject to forfeiture under subsections (2) and (3) of
this section may be seized by any agent of the department, the
((board)) office, or law enforcement officer of this state upon process
issued by any superior court or district court having jurisdiction over
the property. Seizure without process may be made if:
(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search warrant or an
inspection under an administrative inspection warrant; or
(b) The department, ((board)) office, or law enforcement officer
has probable cause to believe that the property was used or is intended
to be used in violation of this chapter and exigent circumstances exist
making procurement of a search warrant impracticable.
(5) This section shall not be construed to require the seizure of
tobacco products if the department's agent, ((board's)) office's agent,
or law enforcement officer reasonably believes that the tobacco
products are possessed for personal consumption by the person in
possession of the tobacco products.
(6) Any tobacco products seized by a law enforcement officer shall
be turned over to the ((board)) office as soon as practicable.

Sec. 198 RCW 82.26.240 and 2005 c 180 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In all cases of seizure of any tobacco products made subject to
forfeiture under this chapter, the department or ((board)) office shall
proceed as provided in RCW 82.24.135.
(2) When tobacco products are forfeited under this chapter, the
department or ((board)) office may:
(a) Retain the property for official use or upon application by any
law enforcement agency of this state, another state, or the District of
Columbia, or of the United States for the exclusive use of enforcing
this chapter or the laws of any other state or the District of Columbia
or of the United States; or
(b) Sell the tobacco products at public auction to the highest
bidder after due advertisement. Before delivering any of the goods to
the successful bidder, the department or ((board)) office shall require
the purchaser to pay the proper amount of any tax due. The proceeds of
the sale shall be first applied to the payment of all proper expenses
of any investigation leading to the seizure and of the proceedings for
forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure, maintenance of
custody, advertising, and court costs. The balance of the proceeds and
all money shall be deposited in the general fund of the state. Proper
expenses of investigation include costs incurred by any law enforcement
agency or any federal, state, or local agency.
(3) The department or the ((board)) office may return any property
seized under the provisions of this chapter when it is shown that there
was no intention to violate the provisions of this chapter. When any
property is returned under this section, the department or the
((board)) office may return the property to the parties from whom they
were seized if and when such parties have paid the proper amount of tax
due under this chapter.

Sec. 199 RCW 82.26.250 and 2005 c 180 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the department or the ((board)) office has good reason to
believe that any of the tobacco products taxed under this chapter are
being kept, sold, offered for sale, or given away in violation of the
provisions of this chapter, it may make affidavit of facts describing
the place or thing to be searched, before any judge of any court in
this state, and the judge shall issue a search warrant directed to the
sheriff, any deputy, police officer, or duly authorized agent of the
department or the ((board)) office commanding him or her diligently to
search any building, room in a building, place, or vehicle as may be
designated in the affidavit and search warrant, and to seize the
tobacco products and hold them until disposed of by law.

Sec. 200 RCW 82.32.300 and 1997 c 420 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The administration of this and chapters 82.04 through 82.27 RCW of
this title is vested in the department of revenue which shall prescribe
forms and rules of procedure for the determination of the taxable
status of any person, for the making of returns and for the
ascertainment, assessment and collection of taxes and penalties imposed
thereunder.
The department of revenue shall make and publish rules and
regulations, not inconsistent therewith, necessary to enforce
provisions of this chapter and chapters 82.02 through 82.23B and 82.27
RCW, and the ((liquor)) office of alcohol beverage control ((board))
shall make and publish rules necessary to enforce chapters 82.24 and
82.26 RCW, which shall have the same force and effect as if
specifically included therein, unless declared invalid by the judgment
of a court of record not appealed from.
The department may employ such clerks, specialists, and other
assistants as are necessary. Salaries and compensation of such
employees shall be fixed by the department and shall be charged to the
proper appropriation for the department.
The department shall exercise general supervision of the collection
of taxes and, in the discharge of such duty, may institute and
prosecute such suits or proceedings in the courts as may be necessary
and proper.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of
the liquor control board are transferred to the office of alcohol
beverage control. All references to the liquor control board in the
Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director of
the office of alcohol beverage control or the office of alcohol
beverage control when referring to the functions transferred in this
section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the liquor control
board pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall
be delivered to the custody of the office of alcohol beverage control.
All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other
tangible property employed by the liquor control board in carrying out
the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available
to the office of alcohol beverage control. All funds, credits, or
other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be assigned to the office of alcohol beverage
control.
(b) Any appropriations made to the liquor control board for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on
the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
office of alcohol beverage control.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the liquor control board engaged in performing
the powers, functions, and duties transferred are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the office of alcohol beverage control. All employees
classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are
assigned to the office of alcohol beverage control to perform their
usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in
accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the liquor control
board pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall
be continued and acted upon by the office of alcohol beverage control.
All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and
shall be performed by the office of alcohol beverage control.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the liquor control board shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees of the liquor control board assigned
to the office of alcohol beverage control under this section whose
positions are within an existing bargaining unit description at the
office of alcohol beverage control shall become a part of the existing
bargaining unit at the office of alcohol beverage control and shall be
considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing
bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 Sections 66 and 75 of this act take effect
December 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 Sections 65 and 74 of this act expire
December 1, 2012.

--- END ---