BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.06B.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 73 and 2011 c 60
s 45 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The agency council on coordinated transportation is created.
The purpose of the council is to advance and improve accessibility to
and coordination of special needs transportation services statewide.
The council is composed of ((fourteen)) sixteen voting members ((and)),
four nonvoting, legislative members, and such other nonvoting members
as may be determined by the council.
(2) The ((fourteen)) sixteen voting members are the superintendent
of public instruction or a designee, the secretary of transportation or
a designee, the director of the health care authority or a designee,
and ((eleven)) thirteen members appointed by the governor as follows:
(a) One representative from the office of the governor;
(b) Three persons who are consumers of special needs transportation
services, which must include:
(i) One person designated by the executive director of the
governor's committee on disability issues and employment; and
(ii) One person who is designated by the executive director of the
developmental disabilities council;
(c) One representative from the Washington association of pupil
transportation;
(d) One representative from the Washington state transit
association;
(e) One of the following:
(i) A representative from the community transportation association
of the Northwest; or
(ii) A representative from the community action council
association;
(f) One person who represents regional transportation planning
organizations and metropolitan planning organizations;
(g) One representative of brokers who provide nonemergency,
medically necessary trips to persons with special transportation needs
under the medicaid program administered by the health care authority;
(h) One representative from the Washington state department of
veterans affairs; ((and))
(i) One representative of the state association of counties;
(j) One representative from a federally recognized tribal
government; and
(k) One representative from the department of social and health
services.
(3) The four nonvoting members are legislators as follows:
(a) Two members from the house of representatives, one from each of
the two largest caucuses, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, including at least one member from the house
transportation policy and budget committee or the house appropriations
committee; and
(b) Two members from the senate, one from each of the two largest
caucuses, appointed by the president of the senate, including at least
one member from the senate transportation committee or the senate ways
and means committee.
(4) Gubernatorial appointees of the council will serve two-year
terms. Members may not receive compensation for their service on the
council, but will be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses
incurred in performing their duties as members as set forth in RCW
43.03.220.
(5) The council shall vote on an annual basis to elect one of its
voting members to serve as chair. The position of chair must rotate
among the represented agencies, associations, and interest groups at
least every two years. If the position of chair is vacated for any
reason, the secretary of transportation or the secretary's designee
shall serve as acting chair until the next regular meeting of the
council, at which time the members will elect a chair.
(6) The council shall periodically assess its membership to ensure
that there exists a balanced representation of persons with special
transportation needs and providers of special transportation needs
services. Recommendations for modifying the membership of the council
must be included in the council's biennial report to the legislature as
provided in RCW 47.06B.050.
(7) The department of transportation shall provide necessary staff
support for the council as resources allow.
(8) The council may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from
public or private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the council and
spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income from the public or private
sources according to their terms, unless the receipt of the gifts,
grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17A.560.
(9) The meetings of the council must be open to the public, with
the agenda published in advance, and minutes kept and made available to
the public. The public notice of the meetings must indicate that
accommodations for persons with disabilities will be made available
upon request.
(10) All meetings of the council must be held in locations that are
readily accessible to public transportation, and must be scheduled for
times when public transportation is available.
(11) The council shall make an effort to include presentations by
and work sessions including persons with special transportation needs.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.06B.030 and 2007 c 421 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To assure implementation of an effective system of coordinated
transportation that meets the needs of persons with special
transportation needs, the agency council on coordinated transportation
shall adopt a biennial work plan that must, at a minimum:
(a) Focus on projects that identify and address barriers in laws,
policies, and procedures;
(b) Focus on results; ((and))
(c) Identify and advocate for transportation system improvements
for persons with special transportation needs; and
(d) Focus on projects that the members of the council are willing
to donate time to, with an emphasis on projects that involve:
(i) Coordinated human services transportation plans;
(ii) Cost and ride sharing;
(iii) Performance measures;
(iv) Mobility management; and
(v) Addressing underserved populations.
(2) The council shall, as necessary, convene work groups at the
state, regional, or local level to develop and implement coordinated
approaches to special needs transportation.
(3) To improve the service experienced by persons with special
transportation needs, the council shall develop statewide guidelines
for customer complaint processes so that information about policies
regarding the complaint processes is available consistently and
consumers are appropriately educated about available options. To be
eligible for funding on or after January 1, 2008, organizations
applying for state paratransit/special needs grants as described in
section 226(1), chapter 370, Laws of 2006 must implement a process
following the guidelines established by the council.
(4) The council shall represent the needs and interests of persons
with special transportation needs in statewide efforts for emergency
and disaster preparedness planning by advising the emergency management
council on how to address transportation needs for high-risk
individuals during and after disasters.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.06B.050 and 2009 c 515 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Based on the work plan adopted by the council pursuant to RCW
47.06B.030 and the available resources of the members, the agency
council on coordinated transportation shall submit a progress report to
the legislature by December 1, 2009, and every other year thereafter.
The report must describe the council's progress in achieving its
objectives and in attaining the applicable goals identified in the
council's biennial work plan and highlight any problems encountered in
achieving these goals. ((The report must also include the required
performance measure evaluations established in RCW 47.06B.030(4).))
The information will be reported in a form established by the council.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.06B.901 and 2011 c 60 s 51 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2012:
(1) ((RCW 47.06B.010 and 2009 c 515 s 3, 2007 c 421 s 1, 1999 c 385
s 1, & 1998 c 173 s 1;
(2) RCW 47.06B.012 and 1999 c 385 s 2;
(3) RCW 47.06B.020 and 2011 c 60 s 45, 2009 c 515 s 4, 2007 c 421
s 2, & 1998 c 173 s 2;
(4) RCW 47.06B.030 and 2007 c 421 s 3, 1999 c 385 s 5, & 1998 c 173
s 3;
(5) RCW 47.06B.040 and 2007 c 421 s 4 & 1999 c 385 s 6;
(6) RCW 47.06B.050 and 2009 c 515 s 8 & 2007 c 421 s 6;
(7))) RCW 47.06B.060 and 2009 c 515 s 1;
(((8))) (2) RCW 47.06B.070 and 2009 c 515 s 9;
(((9))) (3) RCW 47.06B.075 and 2009 c 515 s 10; ((and
(10))) (4) RCW 47.06B.080 and 2009 c 515 s 11; and
(5) RCW 47.06B.900 and 2009 c 515 s 17, 2007 c 421 s 8, 1999 c 385
s 7, & 1998 c 173 s 6.

--- END ---