BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Any parent, legal guardian, or caregiver who
knowingly fails to notify law enforcement within forty-eight hours of
learning that a child, in his or her care and less than thirteen years
of age, is missing is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Any parent, legal guardian, or caregiver who
knowingly fails to notify law enforcement within six hours of learning
of the death of a minor child in his or her care is guilty of a class
C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 9A RCW.

--- END ---