BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The continuum of care for the juvenile rehabilitation
administration has been stretched to the limit since the closure of
Indian Ridge youth camp in 1999 and Mission Creek youth camp in 2001.
(2) Closing the last remaining medium security, step-down facility
in the department would seriously impede capacity to deliver effective
rehabilitative services.
(3) In a period of fiscal restraint, understandable consideration
has been made to achieve savings by closing a medium security
institution and consolidating the population in the bed space of
remaining close security facilities. Further shrinking of the
institutional continuum would require mixing incompatible
subpopulations, resulting in genuine safety and security risks.
(4) Furthermore, it would not be in the interest of the state to
place youth who are appropriate for youth camp placement in an
unnecessarily restrictive setting, such as an institution.
(5) Unless the services and environment in a close security
facility support and match the developmental, treatment, and security
needs of the young people currently being served in a medium security
facility, there is genuine potential some will be harmed rather than
helped.
(6) The legislature hereby recognizes and concurs with the findings
of the juvenile rehabilitation administration strategic plan: 2009-2013, "It would serve nobody's best interests to place youth who are
appropriate for youth camp placement in an unnecessarily restrictive
setting like an institution. A "bed" is not just a bed. It is a
facility placement for a young person. Unless the services and
environment in a facility support and match the developmental,
treatment, and security needs of the young people being served, there
is genuine potential some will be harmed rather than helped..."
(7) The legislature also recognizes that, "It is mission critical
that JRA retain a continuum of care capable of responding to the
complicated developmental, management, and treatment needs of this
population."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall maintain a medium security youth camp to
fulfill the department's obligation to provide education, treatment,
and job training to juvenile offenders in the least restrictive
continuum of care. Juvenile offenders sentenced for treatment shall be
placed in a medium security youth camp which offers education;
treatment options to include sex offender, aggression reduction, and
intensive inpatient chemical dependency programs; job training; and
community-based work experience. This program for juvenile offenders
serving a term of confinement under the supervision of the department
is exempt from the licensing requirements of chapter 74.15 RCW.
(2) The medium security youth camp for juvenile offenders shall be
a structured and regimented model emphasizing the building up of an
offender's self-esteem, confidence, and discipline. The sentence for
treatment program shall provide participants with basic education,
vocational training, work-based learning, work experience, work ethic
skills, conflict resolution counseling, substance abuse intervention as
assessed, including intensive inpatient chemical dependency treatment,
anger management counseling, and victim awareness.
(3) The department shall develop standards for the safe and
effective operation of the sentence for treatment program, for
successful program completion by the offender, and for the continued
aftercare supervision of offenders who have successfully completed the
program, including assistance with housing and job placement if needed.
(4) Admission to the sentence for treatment program is voluntary.
If the court determines that the offender is eligible for the sentence
for treatment program, the court shall order the department to place
the offender directly in the medium security youth camp where the
department shall evaluate the offender and provide the court with
recommended educational attainment, treatment, and length and type of
work experience needed by the offender. Length of satisfactory work
experience established by the court shall not exceed the length of time
needed to complete educational attainment and treatment minus the time
needed for assessment, orientation, and time off from work needed to
meet treatment requirements. Time accrued as unsatisfactory work
performance shall extend the sentence for treatment an equal number of
days. No juvenile who is assessed as a high risk offender or suffers
from any mental or physical problems that could endanger his or her
health or drastically affect his or her performance in the program
shall be retained in the sentence for treatment program.
(5) If the activities of the juvenile offender while in the
juvenile offender youth camp are so disruptive to the sentence for
treatment program, as determined by the secretary according to
standards developed by the department, which results in the removal of
the juvenile offender from the youth camp, or if the offender cannot
complete the sentence for treatment program due to medical problems,
the secretary shall require that the offender be committed to a
juvenile institution to serve the entire remainder of his or her
disposition, less the amount of time already served in the sentence for
treatment program.
(6) All offenders who successfully complete the sentence for
treatment program shall spend the remainder of his or her disposition
on parole in a juvenile rehabilitation administration intensive
aftercare program in the local community. Violations of the conditions
of parole are subject to sanctions specified in RCW 13.40.210. The
aftercare program shall provide for the needs of the offender based on
his or her progress in the aftercare program as indicated by ongoing
assessment of those needs and progress. The aftercare program shall
monitor postprogram juvenile offenders and assist them to successfully
reintegrate into the community. In addition, the aftercare program
shall develop a process for closely monitoring and assessing public
safety risks, and be designed and funded by the department.
(7) The department shall also develop and maintain a database to
measure recidivism rates specific to the sentence for treatment
program. The database shall maintain data on all juvenile offenders
who complete the sentence for treatment program for a period of two
years following the completion of the program. The database shall also
maintain data on the criminal activity, educational progress, and
employment activities of all juvenile offender programs. Data by
facility and program shall be updated every six months and available to
the public by means of the internet.
(8) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Medium security youth camp" or "youth camp" means a medium
security forestry camp that accepts juvenile offenders of a minimum or
medium security risk.
(b) "Sentence for treatment" means an alternative sentencing option
offered at the discretion of the court which carries a comprehensive
mandate of certain educational attainment, successful completion of
substance abuse, chemical dependency or sex offender treatment, and/or
vocational experience for a particular juvenile offender. Upon
successful completion of the specified treatment or attainment of the
prescribed educational or vocational achievement, the extent of the
standard disposition remaining is served by the offender on an
intensive supervision program administered by the administration.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.40.0357 and 2008 c 230 s 3 and 2008 c 158 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

JUVENILE
DISPOSITION
OFFENSE
CATEGORY DESCRIPTION (RCW CITATION) JUVENILE DISPOSITION
CATEGORY FOR
ATTEMPT, BAILJUMP,
CONSPIRACY, OR
SOLICITATION

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A Arson 1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson 2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090(2) (a) and
(c)) E

E Malicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090(2)(b)) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus
(9.40.100) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus with
Intent to Commit Arson (9.40.105) E

A Possession of Incendiary Device (9.40.120)
B+

Assault and Other Crimes Involving
Physical Harm

A Assault 1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault 2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault 3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault 4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless Endangerment (9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting Suicide Attempt (9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion (9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+ Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential Burglary (9A.52.025) C

B Burglary 2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools (Possession of) (9A.52.060) E

D Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Mineral Trespass (78.44.330) C

C Vehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption of Alcohol
(66.44.270) E

C Illegally Obtaining Legend Drug
(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery, Possession of Legend Drug
with Intent to Sell (69.41.030(2)(a)) D+

E Possession of Legend Drug
(69.41.030(2)(b)) E

B+ Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or
Flunitrazepam Sale (69.50.401(2) (a) or
(b)) B+

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic Sale (69.50.401(2)(c)) C

E Possession of Marihuana <40 grams
(69.50.4014) E

C Fraudulently Obtaining Controlled
Substance (69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of Controlled Substance for Profit
(69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or
Flunitrazepam Counterfeit Substances
(69.50.4011(2) (a) or (b)) B

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic Counterfeit Substances
(69.50.4011(2) (c), (d), or (e)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance
(69.50.4013) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance
(69.50.4012)
C

Firearms and Weapons

B Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of Stolen Firearm (9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded Pistol Without Permit
(9.41.050) E

C Possession of Firearms by Minor (<18)
(9.41.040(2)(a)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of Dangerous Weapon
(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating Another Person by use of
Weapon (9.41.270)
E

Homicide

A+ Murder 1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder 2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful Imprisonment (9A.40.040)
D+

Obstructing Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a Law Enforcement Officer
(9A.76.020) E

E Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing Contraband 1 (9A.76.140) C

C Introducing Contraband 2 (9A.76.150) D

E Introducing Contraband 3 (9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a Public Servant (9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a Witness (9A.72.110)
C+

Public Disturbance

C+ Riot with Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(b)) D+

D+ Riot Without Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(a)) E

E Failure to Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape 1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape 2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape 3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent Exposure (Victim <14)
(9A.88.010) E

E Indecent Exposure (Victim 14 or over)
(9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting Prostitution 1 (9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting Prostitution 2 (9A.88.080) D+

E O & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

C Failure to Register as a Sex Offender
(9A.44.130)
D

Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and Forgery

B Theft 1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft 2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft 3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft of Livestock 1 and 2 (9A.56.080 and
9A.56.083) C

C Forgery (9A.60.020) D

A Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery 2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion 1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion 2 (9A.56.130) D+

C Identity Theft 1 (9.35.020(2)) D

D Identity Theft 2 (9.35.020(3)) E

D Improperly Obtaining Financial Information
(9.35.010) E

B Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (9A.56.068) C

B Possession of Stolen Property 1
(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of Stolen Property 2
(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of Stolen Property 3
(9A.56.170) E

B Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission
1 (9A.56.070) C

C Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission
2 (9A.56.075) D

B Theft of a Motor Vehicle (9A.56.065) C

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving Without a License (46.20.005) E

B+ Hit and Run - Death (46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run - Injury (46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and Run-Attended (46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and Run-Unattended (46.52.010) E

C Vehicular Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to Elude Pursuing Police
Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While Under the Influence
(46.61.502 and 46.61.504) E

B+ Felony Driving While Under the Influence
(46.61.502(6)) B

B+ Felony Physical Control of a Vehicle While
Under the Influence (46.61.504(6))
B

Other

B Animal Cruelty 1 (16.52.205) C

B Bomb Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape 11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape 21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape 3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene, Harassing, Etc., Phone Calls
(9.61.230) E

A Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
A Felony B+

B Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
B Felony C

C Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
C Felony D

D Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Gross
Misdemeanor E

E Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation of Order of Restitution,
Community Supervision, or Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C offenses
and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks
confinement
2nd escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks
confinement
3rd and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month
period - 12 weeks confinement

2If the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order,
it may impose a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may
select sentencing option A, B, C, D, E, or RCW 13.40.167.

OPTION A
JUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID
STANDARD RANGE

A+
180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

EXCEPT

30-40

WEEKS FOR

15-17

YEAR OLDS

Current B+ 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

Offense WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL 52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) 15-36 WEEKS WEEKS

C+ LS

15-36 WEEKS

C LS 15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions:

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Restitution

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4
or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of
confinement.
(1) The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category.
The current offense category is determined by the offense of
adjudication.
(2) The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior
adjudications included in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior
felony adjudication shall count as one point. Each prior violation,
misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count as 1/4
point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.
(3) The standard range disposition for each offense is determined
by the intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications
and the row defined by the current offense category.
(4) RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for
more than one offense.
(5) A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an
offense category of E. However, a disposition for a violation shall
not include confinement.

OR

OPTION B
SUSPENDED DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

(1) If the offender is subject to a standard range disposition
involving confinement by the department, the court may impose the
standard range and suspend the disposition on condition that the
offender comply with one or more local sanctions and any educational or
treatment requirement. The treatment programs provided to the offender
must be either research-based best practice programs as identified by
the Washington state institute for public policy or the joint
legislative audit and review committee, or for chemical dependency
treatment programs or services, they must be evidence-based or
research-based best practice programs. For the purposes of this
subsection:
(a) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had
multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations
demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for the
population; and
(b) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some
research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the
standard of evidence-based practices.
(2) If the offender fails to comply with the suspended disposition,
the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or may revoke
the suspended disposition and order the disposition's execution.
(3) An offender is ineligible for the suspended disposition option
under this section if the offender is:
(a) Adjudicated of an A+ offense;
(b) Fourteen years of age or older and is adjudicated of one or
more of the following offenses:
(i) A class A offense, or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation
to commit a class A offense;
(ii) Manslaughter in the first degree (RCW 9A.32.060); or
(iii) Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021), extortion in
the first degree (RCW 9A.56.120), kidnapping in the second degree (RCW
9A.40.030), robbery in the second degree (RCW 9A.56.210), residential
burglary (RCW 9A.52.025), burglary in the second degree (RCW
9A.52.030), drive-by shooting (RCW 9A.36.045), vehicular homicide (RCW
46.61.520), hit and run death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a)), intimidating a
witness (RCW 9A.72.110), violation of the uniform controlled substances
act (RCW 69.50.401 (2)(a) and (b)), or manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070),
when the offense includes infliction of bodily harm upon another or
when during the commission or immediate withdrawal from the offense the
respondent was armed with a deadly weapon;
(c) Ordered to serve a disposition for a firearm violation under
RCW 13.40.193; or
(d) Adjudicated of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

OR

OPTION C
CHEMICAL DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition
of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not
committed an A- or B+ offense, the court may impose a disposition under
RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION D
MANIFEST INJUSTICE

If the court determines that a disposition under option A, B, or C
would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a
disposition outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).

OR

OPTION E
SENTENCE FOR TREATMENT

If the juvenile offender is subject to a disposition of more than 15
weeks and is not deemed to require confinement in a close security
facility by the department, the court may impose a sentence for
treatment as established in section 2 of this act.

--- END ---