BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.525 and 2005 c 319 s 140 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The rate charged by a local government utility to the
department of transportation with respect to state highway right-of-way
or any section of state highway right-of-way for the construction,
operation, and maintenance of storm water control facilities under
chapters 35.67, 35.92, 36.89, 36.94, 57.08, and 86.15 RCW, shall be
thirty percent of the rate for comparable real property, except as
otherwise provided in this section. ((The rate charged to the
department with respect to state highway right-of-way or any section of
state highway right-of-way within a local government utility's
jurisdiction shall not, however, exceed the rate charged for comparable
city street or county road right-of-way within the same jurisdiction.))
(b) If a local government utility does not charge the department of
transportation under (a) of this subsection during fiscal year 2013,
the rate charged shall be ten percent of the rate for comparable real
property during fiscal year 2014, twenty percent of the rate for
comparable real property during fiscal year 2015, and thirty percent of
the rate for comparable real property during fiscal year 2016 and
thereafter.
(c) The rate charged by a local government utility to its own or to
another local government's streets or roads for the construction,
operation, and maintenance of storm water control facilities may be the
same maximum rate as charged by the local government utility to the
department of transportation under (a) and (b) of this subsection, or
such other rate, or no rate, as may be determined by the legislative
authority of that local government utility, in its sole discretion and
in consideration of the continuing expenditures of the local government
utility for the construction, operation, and maintenance of storm water
control facilities designed to control surface water or storm water
runoff from local streets or roads.
(d) The legislature finds that the ((aforesaid)) rates charged to
the department of transportation under (a) and (b) of this subsection
are presumptively fair and equitable because of the traditional and
continuing expenditures of the department of transportation, cities,
and counties for the construction, operation, and maintenance of storm
water control facilities designed to control surface water or storm
water runoff from state highway rights-of-way.
(2) Charges paid under subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section by
the department of transportation must be used solely for storm water
control facilities that ((directly)) reduce state highway runoff
impacts or ((implementation of)) that implement best management
practices that will reduce the need for such facilities. ((By January
1st of each year, beginning with calendar year 1997, the local
government utility, in coordination with the department, shall develop
a plan for the expenditure of the charges for that calendar year. The
plan must be consistent with the objectives identified in RCW
90.78.010. In addition, beginning with the submittal for 1998, the
utility shall provide a progress report on the use of charges assessed
for the prior year. No charges may be paid until the plan and report
have been submitted to the department.)) Through a planning and
reporting process, local government utilities shall clearly demonstrate
that charges paid under subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section by
the department of transportation are being used as required under this
subsection. Local government utilities and the department of
transportation shall develop this simplified planning and reporting
process for storm water fees, which may include a determination of the
comparable property upon which the rate charged to the department of
transportation is based.
(3) The utility imposing the charge and the department of
transportation may, however, agree to either higher or lower rates with
respect to the construction, operation, or maintenance of any specific
storm water control facilities ((based upon the annual plan prescribed
in subsection (2) of this section)). If, after mediation, the local
government utility and the department of transportation cannot agree
upon the proper rate, either may commence an action in the superior
court for the county in which the state highway right-of-way is located
to establish the proper rate. The court in establishing the proper
rate shall take into account the extent and adequacy of storm water
control facilities constructed by the department and the actual
benefits to the sections of state highway rights-of-way from storm
water control facilities constructed, operated, and maintained by the
local government utility. Control of surface water runoff and storm
water runoff from state highway rights-of-way shall be deemed an actual
benefit to the state highway rights-of-way. The rate for sections of
state highway right-of-way as determined by the court shall be set
forth in terms of the percentage of the rate for comparable real
property((, but shall in no event exceed the rate charged for
comparable city street or county road right-of-way within the same
jurisdiction)).
(4) The legislature finds that the federal clean water act
(national pollutant discharge elimination system, 40 C.F.R. parts 122-124), the state water pollution control act, chapter 90.48 RCW, and the
highway runoff program under chapter 90.71 RCW, mandate the treatment
and control of storm water runoff from state highway rights-of-way
owned by the department of transportation. Appropriations made by the
legislature to the department of transportation for the construction,
operation, and maintenance of storm water control facilities are
intended to address applicable federal and state mandates related to
storm water control and treatment. This section is not intended to
limit opportunities for sharing the costs of storm water improvements
between cities, counties, and the state.
(5) When the amounts charged by local government utilities under
subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section exceed the amount of funds
that are appropriated for this purpose, the department of
transportation must request supplemental appropriations from the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2013.

--- END ---