BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All heavy equipment, including attachments, owned by a heavy
equipment rental business for the purpose of leasing or renting at
retail is exempt from property taxes.
(2) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Beginning January 1, 2013, a county may
impose a tax on persons leasing or renting heavy equipment at retail
from a heavy equipment rental business. The rate of tax equals five
dollars and twenty-five cents per invoice for the lease or rental of
heavy equipment.
(2) The tax authorized under this section is sourced to the county
where the heavy equipment rental business from which the heavy
equipment is leased or rented is located.
(3) The heavy equipment rental business must collect the tax
imposed under this section from the lessee and remit it in the manner
prescribed by this chapter. The heavy equipment rental business must
report taxes imposed under this section on a state tax return in the
manner provided in section 3 of this act. However, a county may have
the business report the tax authorized under this section directly to
the county in lieu of the state administering the tax.
(4) On an annual basis, a county imposing the tax under this
section must distribute thirty-three and one-third percent of the
proceeds derived under this chapter on a pro rata basis with cities and
towns within the county based on population. However, a city or town
is not eligible for any distribution under this subsection, and the
county may retain such distribution, if the amount of the distribution
would be less than one hundred dollars. The population determination
for the county includes only the unincorporated areas.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply to this chapter unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Person" and "retail sale" have the same meanings as provided
in chapter 82.04 RCW.
(b) "Heavy equipment" means earthmoving, construction, or
industrial equipment that is mobile, weighs at least five hundred
pounds, and meets either of the following requirements:
(i) The equipment is a self-propelled vehicle that is not designed
to be driven on a highway; or
(ii) The equipment is industrial lift equipment, industrial
material handling equipment, industrial electrical generation
equipment, or a similar piece of industrial equipment.
(c) "Heavy equipment rental business" means a person primarily
engaged in the short-term renting or leasing of heavy equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Counties opting to have the department
administer and collect the county tax authorized under section 2 of
this act must contract, no less than seventy-five days prior to the
effective date of an ordinance or resolution imposing the tax
authorized, for the administration and collection of the tax by the
department. A county must provide the department with at least
seventy-five days' notice prior to the imposition of the tax authorized
under section 2 of this act and the department must make reasonable
efforts to notify affected taxpayers before the tax is imposed. The
department may deduct an amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed
one percent of the taxes collected for administration and collection
expenses incurred by the department. The remainder of any portion of
any tax authorized by this chapter that is collected by the department
must be deposited in the county heavy equipment tax account hereby
created in the state treasury.
(2) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute moneys in the
county heavy equipment tax account to counties imposing the tax
authorized in section 2 of this act. Except as provided in RCW
43.08.190, all earnings of investments of balances in the county heavy
equipment tax account must be credited to the county heavy equipment
tax account and distributed monthly to the counties imposing the tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If the county opts to have the state
administer the tax authorized in section 2 of this act, chapter 82.32
RCW applies to the tax authorized in section 2 of this act. The
department or a county may adopt any administrative rules necessary for
the effective administration of this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.84.092 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 6, 2011 1st sp.s.
c 7 s 22, 2011 c 369 s 6, 2011 c 339 s 1, 2011 c 311 s 9, 2011 c 272 s
3, 2011 c 120 s 3, and 2011 c 83 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the budget stabilization account,
the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin
taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin
water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction
fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county heavy equipment tax account, the
county sales and use tax equalization account, the deferred
compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of licensing services account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental
disabilities community trust account, the drinking water assistance
account, the drinking water assistance administrative account, the
drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern Washington
University capital projects account, the Interstate 405 express toll
lanes operations account, the education construction fund, the
education legacy trust account, the election account, the energy
freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail
assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the freight
mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account,
the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account,
the health system capacity account, the high capacity transportation
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher
education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the
highway infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high
occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital safety net
assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the
judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold
excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local
sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust
account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
multiagency permitting team account, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public
transportation systems account, the public works assistance account,
the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry
operations account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account,
the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management
cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility
grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the site closure
account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small
city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the
special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the
state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route number 520
civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account,
the state wildlife account, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account),
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain
injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement
system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state economic development
commission account, the Washington state health insurance pool account,
the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 84 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 1 of this act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2013 and thereafter.

--- END ---