BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.022 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 19 are each
amended to read as follows:
The department shall establish, by rule, the procedures,
principles, and conditions for the nursing facility medicaid payment
system addressed by the following principles:
(1) The department must receive complete, annual reporting of all
costs and the financial condition of each contractor, prepared and
presented in a standardized manner. The department shall establish, by
rule, due dates, requirements for cost report completion, actions
required for improperly completed or late cost reports, fines for any
statutory or regulatory noncompliance, retention requirements, and
public disclosure requirements.
(2) The department shall examine all cost reports to determine
whether the information is correct, complete, and reported in
compliance with this chapter, department rules and instructions, and
generally accepted accounting principles.
(3) Each contractor must establish and maintain, as a service to
the resident, a bookkeeping system incorporated into the business
records for all resident funds entrusted to the contractor and received
by the contractor for the resident. The department shall adopt rules
to ensure that resident personal funds handled by the contractor are
maintained by each contractor in a manner that is, at a minimum,
consistent with federal requirements.
(4) The department shall have the authority to audit resident trust
funds and receivables, at its discretion.
(5) Contractors shall provide the department access to the nursing
facility, all financial and statistical records, and all working papers
that are in support of the cost report, receivables, and resident trust
funds.
(6) The department shall establish a settlement process in order to
reconcile medicaid resident days to billed days and medicaid payments
for the preceding calendar year. The settlement process shall ensure
that any savings in the direct care or therapy care component rates be
shifted only between direct care and therapy care component rates, and
shall not be shifted into any other rate components, except for cost
reports covering report periods ending December 31, 2011, 2012, and
2013.
(7) The department shall define and identify allowable and
unallowable costs.
(8) A contractor shall bill the department for care provided to
medicaid recipients, and the department shall pay a contractor for
service rendered under the facility contract and appropriately billed.
Billing and payment procedures shall be specified by rule.
(9) The department shall establish the conditions for participation
in the nursing facility medicaid payment system.
(10) The department shall establish procedures and a rate setting
methodology for a change of ownership.
(11) The department shall establish, consistent with federal
requirements for nursing facilities participating in the medicaid
program, an appeals or exception procedure that allows individual
nursing home providers an opportunity to receive prompt administrative
review of payment rates with respect to such issues as the department
deems appropriate.
(12) The department shall have authority to adopt, amend, and
rescind such administrative rules and definitions as it deems necessary
to carry out the policies and purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 2 2011 1st sp.s. c 7 s 11 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) For fiscal years 2012 and 2013 and subject to appropriation,
the department of social and health services shall do a comparative
analysis of the facility-based payment rates calculated on July 1,
2011, using the payment methodology defined in chapter 74.46 RCW as
modified by RCW 74.46.431, 74.46.435, 74.46.437, 74.46.485, 74.46.496,
74.46.501, 74.46.506, 74.46.515, and 74.46.521, to the facility-based
payment rates in effect June 30, 2010. If the facility-based payment
rate calculated on July 1, 2011, is smaller than the facility-based
payment rate on June 30, 2011, the difference shall be provided to the
individual nursing facilities as an add-on payment per medicaid
resident day.
(2) During the comparative analysis performed in subsection (1) of
this section, if it is found that the direct care rate for any facility
calculated under RCW 74.46.431, 74.46.435, 74.46.437, 74.46.485,
74.46.496, 74.46.501, 74.46.506, 74.46.515, and 74.46.521 is greater
than the direct care rate in effect on June 30, 2010, then the facility
shall receive a ten percent direct care rate add-on to compensate that
facility for taking on more acute clients than they have in the past.
(3) The rate add-ons provided in subsection (2) of this section are
subject to the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW
74.46.022(6).
(4) The rate add-ons in subsection (1) of this section are not
subject to the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW
74.46.022(6).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---