BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.82.040 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 4 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Once a WRIA planning unit has been initiated under RCW
90.82.060 and a lead agency has been designated, it shall notify the
department and may apply to the department for funding assistance for
conducting the planning and implementation. Funds shall be provided
from and to the extent of appropriations made by the legislature to the
department expressly for this purpose.
(2)(a) Each planning unit that has complied with subsection (1) of
this section is eligible to receive watershed planning grants in the
following amounts for the first three phases of watershed planning and
phase four watershed plan implementation:
(i) Initiating governments may apply for an initial organizing
grant of up to fifty thousand dollars for a single WRIA or up to
seventy-five thousand dollars for a multi-WRIA management area in
accordance with RCW 90.82.060(4);
(ii)(A) A planning unit may apply for up to two hundred thousand
dollars for each WRIA in the management area for conducting watershed
assessments in accordance with RCW 90.82.070, except that a planning
unit that chooses to conduct a detailed assessment or studies under
(a)(ii)(B) of this subsection or whose initiating governments choose or
have chosen to include an instream flow or water quality component in
accordance with RCW 90.82.080 or 90.82.090 may apply for up to one
hundred thousand additional dollars for each instream flow and up to
one hundred thousand additional dollars for each water quality
component included for each WRIA to conduct an assessment on that
optional component and for each WRIA in which the assessments or
studies under (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection are conducted.
(B) A planning unit may elect to apply for up to one hundred
thousand additional dollars to conduct a detailed assessment of
multipurpose water storage opportunities or for studies of specific
multipurpose storage projects which opportunities or projects are
consistent with and support the other elements of the planning unit's
watershed plan developed under this chapter; and
(iii) A planning unit may apply for up to two hundred fifty
thousand dollars for each WRIA in the management area for developing a
watershed plan and making recommendations for actions by local, state,
and federal agencies, tribes, private property owners, private
organizations, and individual citizens, including a recommended list of
strategies and projects that would further the purpose of the plan in
accordance with RCW 90.82.060 through 90.82.100.
(b) A planning unit may request a different amount for phase two or
phase three of watershed planning than is specified in (a) of this
subsection, provided that the total amount of funds awarded do not
exceed the maximum amount the planning unit is eligible for under (a)
of this subsection. The department shall approve such an alternative
allocation of funds if the planning unit identifies how the proposed
alternative will meet the goals of this chapter and provides a proposed
timeline for the completion of planning. However, the up to one
hundred thousand additional dollars in funding for instream flow and
water quality components and for water storage assessments or studies
that a planning unit may apply for under (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection
may be used only for those instream flow, water quality, and water
storage purposes.
(c) By December 1, 2001, or within one year of initiating phase one
of watershed planning, whichever occurs later, the initiating
governments for each planning unit must inform the department whether
they intend to have the planning unit establish or amend instream flows
as part of its planning process. If they elect to have the planning
unit establish or amend instream flows, the planning unit is eligible
to receive one hundred thousand dollars for that purpose in accordance
with (a)(ii) of this subsection. If the initiating governments for a
planning unit elect not to establish or amend instream flows as part of
the unit's planning process, the department shall retain one hundred
thousand dollars to carry out an assessment to support establishment of
instream flows and to establish such flows in accordance with RCW
90.54.020(3)(a) and chapter 90.22 RCW. The department shall not use
these funds to amend an existing instream flow unless requested to do
so by the initiating governments for a planning unit.
(d) In administering funds appropriated for supplemental funding
for optional plan components under (a)(ii) of this subsection, the
department shall give priority in granting the available funds to
proposals for setting or amending instream flows.
(e) A planning unit may apply for a matching grant for phase four
watershed plan implementation following approval under the provisions
of RCW 90.82.130. A match of ten percent is required and may include
financial contributions or in-kind goods and services directly related
to coordination and oversight functions. The match can be provided by
the planning unit or by the combined commitments from federal agencies,
tribal governments, local governments, special districts, or other
local organizations. The phase four grant may be up to one hundred
thousand dollars for each planning unit for each of the first three
years of implementation. At the end of the three-year period, ((a two-year)) extensions may be available for up to fifty thousand dollars
each year, subject to legislative appropriation. For planning units
that cover more than one WRIA, additional matching funds of up to
twenty-five thousand dollars may be available for each additional WRIA
per year for the first three years of implementation, and up to twelve
thousand five hundred dollars per WRIA per year ((for each of the
fourth and fifth years)) thereafter.
(3)(a) The department shall use the eligibility criteria in this
subsection (3) instead of rules, policies, or guidelines when
evaluating grant applications at each stage of the grants program.
(b) In reviewing grant applications under this subsection (3), the
department shall evaluate whether:
(i) The planning unit meets all of the requirements of this
chapter;
(ii) The application demonstrates a need for state planning funds
to accomplish the objectives of the planning process; and
(iii) The application and supporting information evidences a
readiness to proceed.
(c) In ranking grant applications submitted at each stage of the
grants program, the department shall give preference to applications in
the following order of priority:
(i) Applications from existing planning groups that have been in
existence for at least one year;
(ii) Applications that, if not funded, would result in the
dissolution of a planning unit that has been meeting regularly and
pursuing the goals of subsection (2) of this section;
(iii) Applications that address protection and enhancement of fish
habitat in watersheds that have aquatic fish species listed or proposed
to be listed as endangered or threatened under the federal endangered
species act, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq. and for which there is
evidence of an inability to supply adequate water for population and
economic growth from:
(A) First, multi-WRIA planning; and
(B) Second, single WRIA planning;
(((iii))) (iv) Applications that address protection and enhancement
of fish habitat in watersheds or for which there is evidence of an
inability to supply adequate water for population and economic growth
from:
(A) First, multi-WRIA planning; and
(B) Second, single WRIA planning.
(d) Except for phase four watershed plan implementation, the
department may not impose any local matching fund requirement as a
condition for grant eligibility or as a preference for receiving a
grant.
(4) The department may retain up to one percent of funds allocated
under this section to defray administrative costs.
(5) Planning under this chapter should be completed as
expeditiously as possible, with the focus being on local stakeholders
cooperating to meet local needs.
(6) Funding provided under this section shall be considered a
contractual obligation against the moneys appropriated for this
purpose.

--- END ---