BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the state as
a whole benefits from investment in public infrastructure because it
promotes community and economic development. Public investment
stimulates business activity and helps create jobs, stimulates the
redevelopment of brownfields and blighted areas in the inner city,
lowers the cost of housing, and promotes efficient land use. The
legislature finds that the Washington state jobs investment act
generates revenue for the state and that it is in the public interest
to provide a sales and use tax credit to those local governments for
those project investments and job creation activities that can
demonstrate a net positive return to the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Assessed value" means the valuation of taxable real property
as placed on the last completed assessment roll.
(2) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board.
(3) "Bond" means a bond, a note or other evidence of indebtedness,
including but not limited to a lease-purchase agreement or an executory
conditional sales contract.
(4) "Community redevelopment financing" means the use of revenues
from local public sources, dedicated to pay the principal and interest
on bonds authorized under section 11 of this act and public improvement
costs within the redevelopment area on a pay-as-you-go basis, and
revenues received from the local option sales and use tax authorized in
section 16 of this act, dedicated to pay the principal and interest on
bonds authorized under section 11 of this act.
(5) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(6) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning July 1st
and ending the following June 30th.
(7) "Local government" means any city, town, county, and port
district.
(8) "Local property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the receipt of regular property taxes levied on
the property tax allocation revenue value and used for community
redevelopment financing.
(9) "Local sales and use tax increment" means the estimated annual
increase in local sales and use taxes as determined by the local
government in the calendar years following the approval of the
redevelopment area by the board from taxable activity within the
redevelopment area.
(10) "Local sales and use taxes" means local revenues derived from
the imposition of sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030.
(11) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government.
(12) "Participating local government" means a local government
having a redevelopment area within its geographic boundaries that has
taken action as provided in section 7(1) of this act to allow the use
of all or some of its local sales and use tax increment or other
revenues from local public sources dedicated for community
redevelopment financing.
(13) "Participating taxing district" means a taxing district that:
(a) Has a redevelopment area wholly or partially within its
geographic boundaries;
(b) Levies or has levied for it regular property taxes as defined
in this section; and
(c) Has not taken action as provided in section 6(2) of this act.
(14) "Property tax allocation revenue base value" means the
assessed value of real property located within a redevelopment area,
less the property tax allocation revenue value.
(15)(a)(i) "Property tax allocation revenue value" means up to one
hundred percent of any increase in the assessed value of real property
in a redevelopment area resulting from:
(A) The placement of new construction, improvements to property, or
both, on the assessment roll, where the new construction and
improvements are initiated after the redevelopment area is approved by
the department;
(B) The cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when the cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as provided in RCW
84.14.020, and the new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements are initiated after the redevelopment area
is approved by the department;
(C) The cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when the cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as
provided in RCW 84.26.070, and the rehabilitation is initiated after
the redevelopment area is approved by the department.
(ii) Increases in the assessed value of real property in a
redevelopment area resulting from (a)(i)(A) through (C) of this
subsection are included in the property tax allocation revenue value in
the initial year. These same amounts are also included in the property
tax allocation revenue value in subsequent years unless the property
becomes exempt from property taxation.
(b) "Property tax allocation revenue value" includes up to one
hundred percent of any increase in the assessed value of new
construction consisting of an entire building in the years following
the initial year, unless the building becomes exempt from property
taxation.
(c) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "property tax
allocation revenue value" does not include any increase in the assessed
value of real property after the initial year.
(d) There is no property tax allocation revenue value if the
assessed value of real property in a redevelopment area has not
increased as a result of any of the reasons specified in (a)(i)(A)
through (C) of this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, "initial year" means:
(i) For new construction and improvements to property added to the
assessment roll, the year during which the new construction and
improvements are initially placed on the assessment roll;
(ii) For the cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when the cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW, the year when the cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of levying taxes for
collection in the following year; and
(iii) For the cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when the
cost is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW,
the year when such cost is treated as new construction for purposes of
levying taxes for collection in the following year.
(16) "Public improvement costs" means the costs of:
(a) Design, planning, acquisition, including land acquisition, site
preparation including land clearing, construction, reconstruction,
rehabilitation, improvement, and installation of public improvements;
(b) Demolishing, relocating, maintaining, and operating property
pending construction of public improvements;
(c) Relocating utilities as a result of public improvements;
(d) Financing public improvements, including interest during
construction, legal and other professional services, taxes, insurance,
principal and interest costs on general indebtedness issued to finance
public improvements, and any necessary reserves for general
indebtedness; and
(e) Administrative expenses and feasibility studies reasonably
necessary and related to these costs, including related costs that may
have been incurred before adoption of the ordinance authorizing the
public improvements and the use of community redevelopment financing to
fund the costs of the public improvements.
(17) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the redevelopment area that
include:
(i) Street, road, bridge, and rail construction and maintenance;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;
(iii) Sidewalks, streetlights, landscaping, and streetscaping;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(vi) Park facilities, recreational areas, and environmental
remediation;
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems;
(viii) Electric, gas, fiber, and other utility infrastructures; and
(b) Expenditures for any of the following purposes:
(i) Providing environmental analysis, professional management,
planning, and promotion within the redevelopment area, including the
management and promotion of retail trade activities in the
redevelopment area;
(ii) Providing maintenance and security for common or public areas
in the redevelopment area; or
(iii) Historic preservation activities authorized under RCW
35.21.395.
(18) "Real property" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.04.090 and
also includes any privately owned improvements located on publicly
owned land that are subject to property taxation.
(19)(a) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as
defined in RCW 84.04.140, except:
(i) Regular property taxes levied by public utility districts
specifically for the purpose of making required payments of principal
and interest on general indebtedness;
(ii) Regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of
common schools under RCW 84.52.065; and
(iii) Regular property taxes authorized by RCW 84.55.050 that are
limited to a specific purpose.
(b) "Regular property taxes" do not include:
(i) Excess property tax levies that are exempt from the aggregate
limits for junior and senior taxing districts as provided in RCW
84.52.043; and
(ii) Property taxes that are specifically excluded through an
interlocal agreement between the sponsoring local government and a
participating taxing district as set forth in section 6(3) of this act.
(20)(a) "Revenues from local public sources" means:
(i) The local sales and use tax amounts received as a result of
interlocal agreement, local sales and use tax amounts from sponsoring
local governments based on its local sales and use tax increment, and
local property tax allocation revenues, which are dedicated by a
sponsoring local government, participating local governments, and
participating taxing districts, for payment of bonds under section 11
of this act or public improvement costs within the redevelopment area
on a pay-as-you-go basis; and
(ii) Any other local revenues, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, including revenues derived from federal and private sources
and amounts received by taxing districts as set forth by an interlocal
agreement as described in section 6(4) of this act, which are dedicated
for the payment of bonds under section 11 of this act or public
improvement costs within the redevelopment area on a pay-as-you-go
basis.
(b) Revenues from local public sources do not include any local
funds derived from state grants, state loans, or any other state moneys
including any local sales and use taxes credited against the state
sales and use taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.
(21) "Redevelopment area" means the geographic area adopted by a
sponsoring local government and approved by the department, from which
local sales and use tax increments are estimated and property tax
allocation revenues are derived for community redevelopment financing.
(22) "Sponsoring local government" means a city, town, county, or
any combination thereof, that adopts a redevelopment area.
(23) "State amount" means the amount approved by the department
under section 10(2)(a) of this act.
(24) "State sales and use tax increment" means the estimated amount
of annual increase in state sales and use taxes to be received by the
state from taxable activity within the redevelopment area in the years
following the approval of the redevelopment area by the department as
determined by the sponsoring local government in an application under
section 10 of this act and updated periodically as required in section
18 of this act.
(25) "State sales and use taxes" means state retail sales and use
taxes under RCW 82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020 at the rate provided in RCW
82.08.020(1), less the amount of tax distributions from all local
retail sales and use taxes, other than the local sales and use taxes
authorized by section 16 of this act for the applicable redevelopment
area, imposed on the same taxable events that are credited against the
state retail sales and use taxes under RCW 82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020.
(26) "Taxing district" means a government entity that levies or has
levied for it regular property taxes upon real property located within
a proposed or approved redevelopment area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A local government may finance public
improvements using community redevelopment financing subject to the
following conditions:
(1) The local government has adopted an ordinance designating a
redevelopment area within its boundaries and specified the public
improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part with the use
of community redevelopment financing;
(2) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in
part using community redevelopment financing are expected to encourage
private development within the redevelopment area and to increase the
fair market value of real property within the redevelopment area;
(3) The local government has entered into a contract with a private
developer relating to the development of private improvements within
the redevelopment area or has received a letter of intent from a
private developer relating to the developer's plans for the development
of private improvements within the redevelopment area;
(4) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the
redevelopment area, as a result of the public improvements, will be
consistent with the countywide planning policy adopted by the county
under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's comprehensive plan and
development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(5) The local government may not use community redevelopment
financing to finance the costs associated with the financing, design,
acquisition, construction, equipping, operating, maintaining,
remodeling, repairing, and reequipping of public facilities funded with
taxes collected under RCW 82.14.048 or 82.14.390;
(6) The governing body of the local government must make a finding
that community redevelopment financing:
(a) Will not be used for the purpose of relocating a business from
outside the redevelopment area, but within this state, into the
redevelopment area unless convincing evidence is provided that the firm
being relocated would otherwise leave the state;
(b) Will improve the viability of existing business entities within
the redevelopment area; and
(c) Will be used exclusively in areas within the jurisdiction of
the local government deemed in need of either economic development or
redevelopment, or both, and absent the financing available under this
chapter, section 16 of this act, and section 17 of this act the
proposed economic development or redevelopment would more than likely
not occur; and
(7) The governing body of the local government finds that the
public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using
community redevelopment financing are reasonably likely to:
(a) Increase private investment within the redevelopment area;
(b) Increase employment within the redevelopment area; and
(c) Generate, over the period of time that the local sales and use
tax will be imposed under section 16 of this act, increases in state
and local property, sales, and use tax revenues that are equal to or
greater than the respective state and local contributions made under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Before adopting an ordinance creating
the redevelopment area, a sponsoring local government must:
(a) Provide notice to all taxing districts that levy or have levied
for it regular property taxes and local governments with geographic
boundaries within the proposed redevelopment area of the sponsoring
local government's intent to create a redevelopment area. Notice must
be provided in writing to the governing body of the taxing districts
and local governments at least sixty days in advance of the public
hearing as required by (b) of this subsection. The notice must include
at least the following information:
(i) The name of the proposed redevelopment area;
(ii) The date for the public hearing as required by (b) of this
subsection;
(iii) The earliest anticipated date when the sponsoring local
government will take action to adopt the proposed redevelopment area;
and
(iv) The name of a contact person with phone number of the
sponsoring local government and mailing address where a copy of an
ordinance adopted under sections 5 and 6 of this act may be sent; and
(b) Hold a public hearing on the proposed financing of the public
improvements in whole or in part with community redevelopment
financing. Notice of the public hearing must be published in a legal
newspaper of general circulation within the proposed redevelopment area
at least ten days before the public hearing and posted in at least six
conspicuous public places located in the proposed redevelopment area.
Notices must describe the contemplated public improvements, estimate
the costs of the public improvements, describe the portion of the costs
of the public improvements to be borne by community redevelopment
financing, describe any other sources of revenue to finance the public
improvements, describe the boundaries of the proposed redevelopment
area, and estimate the period during which community redevelopment
financing is contemplated to be used. The public hearing may be held
by either the governing body of the sponsoring local government, or a
committee of the governing body that includes at least a majority of
the whole governing body.
(2) To create a redevelopment area, a sponsoring local government
must adopt an ordinance establishing the redevelopment area that:
(a) Describes the public improvements proposed to be made in the
redevelopment area;
(b) Describes the boundaries of the redevelopment area, subject to
the limitations in section 5 of this act;
(c) Estimates the cost of the proposed public improvements and the
portion of these costs to be financed by community redevelopment
financing;
(d) Estimates the time during which local property tax allocation
revenues, and other revenues from local public sources, such as amounts
of local sales and use taxes from participating local governments, are
to be used for community redevelopment financing;
(e) Provides the date when the use of local property tax allocation
revenues will commence and a list of the participating taxing districts
and the regular property taxes that must be used to calculate property
tax allocation revenues;
(f) Finds that all of the requirements in section 3 of this act are
met;
(g) Provides the anticipated rate of sales and use tax under
section 16 of this act that the local government will impose if awarded
a state amount under section 10 of this act;
(h) Provides the anticipated date when the criteria for the sales
and use tax in section 16 of this act will be met and the anticipated
date when the sales and use tax in section 16 of this act will be
imposed.
(3) The sponsoring local government must deliver a certified copy
of the adopted ordinance to the county treasurer, county assessor, the
governing body of each participating taxing authority and participating
taxing district within which the redevelopment area is located, and the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The designation of a redevelopment area is
subject to the following limitations:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, no
redevelopment area may have within its geographic boundaries any part
of a hospital benefit zone under chapter 39.100 RCW, any part of a
revenue development area created under chapter 39.102 RCW, any part of
an increment area under chapter 39.89 RCW, any revitalization area
under chapter 39.104 RCW, or any part of another redevelopment area
under this chapter;
(b) A redevelopment area's boundaries may include all or a portion
of an existing increment area if:
(i) The state of Washington has loaned money for environmental
cleanup on such area in order to stimulate redevelopment of
brownfields;
(ii) The environmental cleanup, for which the state's loans were
intended, has been completed; and
(iii) The sponsoring local government determines the creation of
the redevelopment area is necessary for redevelopment and protecting
the state's investment by increasing property tax revenue;
(2) A redevelopment area is limited to contiguous tracts, lots,
pieces, or parcels of land without the creation of islands of property
not included in the redevelopment area;
(3) The boundaries may not be drawn to purposely exclude parcels
where economic growth is unlikely to occur;
(4) The public improvements financed through bonds issued under
section 11 of this act must be located in the redevelopment area;
(5) A redevelopment area cannot comprise an area containing more
than twenty-five percent of the total assessed value of the taxable
real property within the boundaries of the sponsoring local government
at the time the redevelopment area is created;
(6) The boundaries of the redevelopment area may not be changed for
the time period that local property tax allocation revenues, local
sales and use taxes of participating local governments, and the local
sales and use tax under section 16 of this act are used to pay bonds
issued under section 11 of this act and public improvement costs within
the redevelopment area on a pay-as-you-go basis, as provided under this
chapter; and
(7) A redevelopment area must be geographically restricted to the
location of the public improvement and adjacent locations that the
sponsoring local government finds to have a high likelihood of
receiving direct positive business and economic impacts due to the
public improvement, such as a neighborhood or a block.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Participating taxing districts must
allow the use of all of their local property tax allocation revenues
for community redevelopment financing.
(2)(a) If a taxing district does not want to allow the use of its
property tax revenues for the community redevelopment financing of
public improvements in a redevelopment area, its governing body must
adopt an ordinance to remove itself as a participating taxing district
and must notify the sponsoring local government.
(b) The taxing district must provide a copy of the adopted
ordinance and notice to the sponsoring local government creating the
redevelopment area before the anticipated date that the sponsoring
local government proposes to adopt the ordinance creating the
redevelopment area as provided in the notice required by section
4(1)(a) of this act.
(3) If a taxing district wants to become a participating taxing
district by allowing one or more but not all of its regular property
tax levies to be used for the calculation of local property tax
allocation revenues, it may do so through an interlocal agreement
specifying the regular property taxes that will be used for calculating
its local property tax allocation revenues. This subsection does not
authorize a taxing district to allow the use of only part of one or
more of its regular property tax levies by the sponsoring local
government.
(4) If a taxing district wants to participate on a partial basis by
providing a specified amount of money to a sponsoring local government
to be used for community redevelopment financing for a specified amount
of time, it may do so through an interlocal agreement. However, the
taxing district must adopt an ordinance as described in subsection (2)
of this section to remove itself as a participating taxing district for
purposes of calculating property tax allocation revenues and instead
partially participate through an interlocal agreement outlining the
specifics of its participation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A participating local government must
enter into an interlocal agreement as provided in chapter 39.34 RCW to
participate in community redevelopment financing with the sponsoring
local government.
(2)(a) If a local government that imposes a sales and use tax under
RCW 82.14.030 does not want to participate in the community
redevelopment financing of public improvements in a redevelopment area,
its governing body must adopt an ordinance and notify the sponsoring
local government that the taxing authority will not be a participating
local government.
(b) The local government must provide a copy of the adopted
ordinance and the notice to the sponsoring local government creating
the redevelopment area before the anticipated date that the sponsoring
local government proposes to adopt an ordinance creating the
redevelopment area as provided in the notice required by section
4(1)(a) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Commencing in the second calendar year
following the creation of a redevelopment area by a sponsoring local
government, the county treasurer must distribute receipts from regular
taxes imposed on real property located in the redevelopment area as
follows:
(a) Each participating taxing district and the sponsoring local
government must receive that portion of its regular property taxes
produced by the rate of tax levied by or for the taxing district on the
property tax allocation revenue base value for that community
redevelopment financing project in the taxing district; and
(b) The sponsoring local government must receive an additional
portion of the regular property taxes levied by it and by or for each
participating taxing district upon the property tax allocation revenue
value within the redevelopment area. However, if there is no property
tax allocation revenue value, the sponsoring local government may not
receive any additional regular property taxes under this subsection
(1)(b). The sponsoring local government may agree to receive less than
the full amount of the additional portion of regular property taxes
under this subsection (1)(b) as long as bond debt service, reserve, and
other bond covenant requirements are satisfied, in which case the
balance of these tax receipts must be allocated to the participating
taxing districts that levied regular property taxes, or have regular
property taxes levied for them, in the redevelopment area for
collection that year in proportion to their regular tax levy rates for
collection that year. The sponsoring local government may request that
the treasurer transfer this additional portion of the property taxes to
its designated agent. The portion of the tax receipts distributed to
the sponsoring local government or its agent under this subsection
(1)(b) may only be expended to finance public improvement costs
associated with the public improvements financed in whole or in part by
community redevelopment financing.
(2) The county assessor must determine the property tax allocation
revenue value and property tax allocation revenue base value. This
section does not authorize revaluations of real property by the
assessor for property taxation that are not made in accordance with the
assessor's revaluation plan under chapter 84.41 RCW or under other
authorized revaluation procedures.
(3) The distribution of local property tax allocation revenue to
the sponsoring local government must cease when local property tax
allocation revenues are no longer obligated to pay the costs of the
public improvements. Any excess local property tax allocation
revenues, and earnings on the revenues, remaining at the time the
distribution of local property tax allocation revenue terminates, must
be returned to the county treasurer and distributed to the
participating taxing districts that imposed regular property taxes, or
had regular property taxes imposed for it, in the redevelopment area
for collection that year, in proportion to the rates of their regular
property tax levies for collection that year.
(4) The allocation to the redevelopment area of that portion of the
sponsoring local government's and each participating taxing district's
regular property taxes levied upon the property tax allocation revenue
value within that redevelopment area is declared to be a public purpose
of and benefit to the sponsoring local government and each
participating taxing district.
(5) The distribution of local property tax allocation revenues
under this section may not affect or be deemed to affect the rate of
taxes levied by or within any sponsoring local government and
participating taxing district or the consistency of any such levies
with the uniformity requirement of Article VII, section 1 of the state
Constitution.
(6) This section does not apply to a redevelopment area that has
boundaries that include all or a portion of the boundaries of an
increment area created under chapter 39.89 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) A sponsoring local government may use
annually local sales and use tax amounts equal to some or all of its
local sales and use tax increments to finance public improvements in
the redevelopment area. The amounts of local sales and use tax
dedicated by a participating local government must begin and cease on
the dates specified in an interlocal agreement authorized in chapter
39.34 RCW. Sponsoring local governments and participating local
governments are authorized to allocate some or all of their local sales
and use tax increment to the sponsoring local government as provided by
section 7(1) of this act.
(2) The department, upon request, must assist sponsoring local
governments in estimating sales and use tax revenues, local property
tax revenues, or business and occupation tax revenues from estimated
taxable activity in the proposed or adopted redevelopment area. The
sponsoring local government must provide the department with accurate
information describing the geographical boundaries of the redevelopment
area in an electronic format or in a manner as otherwise prescribed by
the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Prior to applying to the department to
receive a state amount, a sponsoring local government must adopt a
redevelopment area within the limitations in section 5 of this act and
in accordance with section 4 of this act.
(2)(a) As a condition to imposing a sales and use tax under section
16 of this act, a sponsoring local government must apply to the
department and be approved for a project award amount. The application
must be in a form and manner prescribed by the department and include,
but not be limited to:
(i) Information establishing that over the period of time that the
local sales and use tax will be imposed under section 16 of this act,
increases in state and local property, sales, and use tax revenues as
a result of public improvements in the redevelopment area will be equal
to or greater than the respective state and local contributions made
under this chapter;
(ii) The anticipated effective date for imposing the tax under
section 16 of this act;
(iii) The estimated number of years that the tax will be imposed;
(iv) The anticipated rate of tax to be imposed under section 16 of
this act, subject to the rate-setting conditions in section 16(3) of
this act, should the sponsoring local government be approved for a
project award; and
(v) The anticipated date when bonds under section 11 of this act
will be issued.
(b) The board must make available electronic forms to be used for
this purpose. As part of the application, each applicant must provide
to the board a copy of the adopted ordinance creating the redevelopment
area as required in section 4 of this act, copies of any adopted
interlocal agreements from participating local governments, and any
notices from taxing districts that elect not to be a participating
taxing district.
(3) Project awards must be determined on:
(a) A first-come basis for applications completed in their entirety
and submitted electronically; and
(b) Whether the sponsoring local government would be able to
generate enough tax revenue under section 16 of this act to generate
the amount of project award requested.
(4) Upon receipt of the sponsoring local government's application,
the board must notify the sponsoring local government of approval or
denial of a project award within two regularly scheduled board
meetings. Determination of a project award by the board is final.
Notification must include the earliest date when the tax authorized
under section 16 of this act may be imposed, subject to conditions in
chapter 82.14 RCW. The project award notification must specify the
rate requested in the application and any adjustments to the rate that
would need to be made based on the project award and rate restrictions
in section 16 of this act.
(5) The board must begin accepting applications on September 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) A sponsoring local government creating
a redevelopment area and authorizing the use of community redevelopment
financing may incur general indebtedness, including issuing general
obligation bonds, to finance the public improvements and retire the
indebtedness in whole or in part from community redevelopment financing
it receives, subject to the following requirements:
(a)(i) The ordinance adopted by the sponsoring local government
creating the redevelopment area and authorizing the use of community
redevelopment financing indicates an intent to incur this indebtedness
and the maximum amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated; and
(ii) The sponsoring local government includes this statement of
intent in all notices required by section 4 of this act; or
(b) The sponsoring local government adopts a resolution, after
opportunity for public comment, that indicates an intent to incur this
indebtedness and the maximum amount of this indebtedness that is
contemplated.
(2) The general indebtedness incurred under subsection (1) of this
section may be payable from other tax revenues, the full faith and
credit of the sponsoring local government, and nontax income, revenues,
fees, and rents from the public improvements, as well as contributions,
grants, and nontax money available to the local government for payment
of costs of the public improvements or associated debt service on the
general indebtedness.
(3) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, a sponsoring local government creating a redevelopment area
and authorizing the use of community redevelopment financing may
require any nonpublic participants to provide adequate security to
protect the public investment in the public improvement within the
redevelopment area.
(4) Bonds issued under this section must be authorized by ordinance
of the sponsoring local government and may be issued in one or more
series and must bear a date or dates, be payable upon demand or mature
at a time or times, bear interest at a rate or rates, be in a
denomination or denominations, be in a form either coupon or registered
as provided in RCW 39.46.030, carry conversion or registration
privileges, have a rank or priority, be executed in a manner, be
payable in a medium of payment, at a place or places, and be subject to
terms of redemption with or without premium, be secured in a manner,
and have other characteristics, as may be provided by an ordinance or
trust indenture or mortgage issued pursuant thereto.
(5) The sponsoring local government may:
(a) Annually pay into a special fund to be established for the
benefit of bonds issued under this section a fixed proportion or a
fixed amount of any local property tax allocation revenues derived from
property within the redevelopment area containing the public
improvements funded by the bonds, the payment to continue until all
bonds payable from the fund are paid in full;
(b) Annually pay into the special fund established pursuant to this
section a fixed proportion or a fixed amount of any revenues derived
from taxes imposed under section 16 of this act, such payment to
continue until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full.
Revenues derived from taxes imposed under section 16 of this act are
subject to the use restriction in section 17 of this act; and
(c) Issue revenue bonds payable from any or all revenues deposited
in the special fund established pursuant to this section.
(6) In case any of the public officials of the sponsoring local
government whose signatures appear on any bonds or any coupons issued
under this chapter cease to be the officials before the delivery of the
bonds, the signatures must, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for
all purposes, the same as if the officials had remained in office until
the delivery. Any provision of any law to the contrary
notwithstanding, any bonds issued under this chapter are fully
negotiable.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (4) through (6) of this section,
bonds issued under this section may be issued and sold in accordance
with chapter 39.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A sponsoring local government that issues
bonds under section 11 of this act to finance public improvements may
pledge for the payment of such bonds all or part of any local property
tax allocation revenues derived from the public improvements. The
sponsoring local government may also pledge all or part of any revenues
derived from taxes imposed under section 16 of this act and held in
connection with the public improvements. All of such tax revenues are
subject to the use restriction in section 17 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The bonds issued by a local government
under section 11 of this act to finance public improvements do not
constitute an obligation of the state of Washington, either general or
special.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Nothing in this act may be construed to
give port districts the authority to impose a sales or use tax under
chapter 82.14 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The department of revenue may adopt any
rules under chapter 34.05 RCW it considers necessary for the
administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any city or county that has been approved for a project award
under section 10 of this act may impose a sales and use tax under the
authority of this section in accordance with the terms of this chapter.
Except as provided in this section, the tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing jurisdiction of the
city or county.
(2) The tax authorized under subsection (1) of this section is
credited against the state taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020(1) and
82.12.020 at the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1). The department
must perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the city or
county at no cost to the city or county. The taxes must be distributed
to cities and counties as provided in RCW 82.14.060.
(3) The rate of tax imposed by a city or county may not exceed the
lesser of:
(a) The rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1), less:
(i) The aggregate rates of all other local sales and use taxes
imposed by any taxing authority on the same taxable events;
(ii) The aggregate rates of all taxes under RCW 82.14.465 and
82.14.475 and this section that are authorized but have not yet been
imposed on the same taxable events by a city or county that has been
approved to receive a state amount by the department or the community
economic redevelopment board under chapter 39.104, 39.100, or 39.102
RCW; and
(iii) The percentage amount of distributions required under RCW
82.08.020(5) multiplied by the rate of state taxes imposed under RCW
82.08.020(1); and
(b) The rate, as determined by the city or county in consultation
with the board, reasonably necessary to receive the project award under
section 10 of this act over ten months.
(4) The department, upon request, must assist a city or county in
establishing its tax rate in accordance with subsection (3) of this
section. Once the rate of tax is selected through the application
process and approved under section 10 of this act, it may not be
increased.
(5)(a) No tax may be imposed under the authority of this section
before:
(i) July 1, 2012;
(ii) July 1st of the second calendar year following the year in
which the board approved the application made under section 10 of this
act;
(iii) The state sales and use tax increment and state property tax
increment, and the state business and occupation tax, where applicable,
for the preceding calendar year equal or exceed the amount of the
project award approved by the department under section 10 of this act;
and
(iv) Bonds have been issued according to section 11 of this act.
(b) The tax imposed under this section expires the earlier of the
date that the bonds issued under the authority of section 11 of this
act are retired or twenty-five years after the tax is first imposed.
(6) An ordinance or resolution adopted by the legislative authority
of the city or county imposing a tax under this section must provide
that:
(a) The tax will first be imposed on the first day of a fiscal
year;
(b) The cumulative amount of tax received by the city or county, in
any fiscal year, may not exceed the amount approved by the department
under subsection (10) of this section;
(c) The department must cease distributing the tax for the
remainder of any fiscal year in which either:
(i) The amount of tax received by the city or county equals the
amount of distributions approved by the department for the fiscal year
under subsection (10) of this section; or
(ii) The amount of revenue distributed to all sponsoring and
cosponsoring local governments from taxes imposed under this section
equals the annual state amount limit;
(d) The tax will be distributed again, should it cease to be
distributed for any of the reasons provided in (c) of this subsection,
at the beginning of the next fiscal year, subject to the restrictions
in this section; and
(e) The state is entitled to any revenue generated by the tax in
excess of the amounts specified in (c) of this subsection.
(7) If a city or county receives approval for more than one
redevelopment area within its jurisdiction, the city or county may
impose a sales and use tax under this section for each redevelopment
area.
(8) The department must determine the amount of tax receipts
distributed to each city and county imposing a sales and use tax under
the authority of this section and must advise a city or county when tax
distributions for the fiscal year equal the amount determined by the
department in subsection (10) of this section. Determinations by the
department of the amount of tax distributions attributable to a city or
county are not appealable. The department must remit any tax receipts
in excess of the amounts specified in subsection (6)(c) of this section
to the state treasurer who must deposit the money in the general fund.
(9) If a city or county fails to comply with section 18 of this
act, no tax may be distributed in the subsequent fiscal year until such
time as the city or county complies and the department calculates the
state amount according to subsection (10) of this section for the
fiscal year.
(10)(a) For each fiscal year that a city or county imposes the tax
under the authority of this section, the department must approve the
amount of taxes that may be distributed to the city or county. The
amount approved by the department under this subsection is the lesser
of:
(i) The state amount;
(ii) The amount of project award granted by the department as
provided in section 10 of this act; or
(iii) The total amount of revenues from local public sources
dedicated or, in the case of carry forward revenues, deemed dedicated
in the preceding calendar year, as reported in the required annual
report under section 18 of this act.
(b) A city or county may not receive, in any fiscal year, more
revenues from taxes imposed under the authority of this section than
the amount approved annually by the department.
(11) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section
subject to subsection (12) of this section and unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(12) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Local sales and use taxes" means sales and use taxes imposed
by cities, counties, public facilities districts, and other local
governments under the authority of this chapter, chapter 67.28 RCW, or
any other chapter, and that are credited against the state sales and
use taxes.
(b) "State sales and use taxes" means the taxes imposed in RCW
82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Money collected from the taxes imposed under section 16 of this act
may be used only for the purpose of paying debt service on bonds issued
under the authority in section 11 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government receiving a project award under
section 10 of this act must provide a report to the department by March
1st of each year beginning March 1st after the project award has been
approved. The report must contain the following information:
(a) The amounts of local property tax allocation revenues received
in the preceding calendar year broken down by sponsoring local
government and participating taxing district;
(b) The amount of state property tax allocation revenues estimated
to have been received by the state in the preceding calendar year;
(c) The amount of local sales and use tax and other revenue from
local public sources dedicated by any participating local government
used for the payment of bonds under section 11 of this act and public
improvement costs within the redevelopment area on a pay-as-you-go
basis in the preceding calendar year;
(d) The amount of local sales and use tax dedicated by the
sponsoring local government, as it relates to the sponsoring local
government's local sales and use tax increment, used for the payment of
bonds under section 11 of this act and public improvement costs within
the redevelopment area on a pay-as-you-go basis;
(e) The amounts, other than those listed in (a) through (d) of this
subsection, from local public sources, broken down by type or source,
used for payment of bonds under section 11 of this act or public
improvement costs within the redevelopment area on a pay-as-you-go
basis in the preceding calendar year;
(f) The anticipated date when bonds under section 11 of this act
are expected to be retired;
(g) The names of any businesses locating within the redevelopment
area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by the
sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with
community redevelopment financing;
(h) An estimate of the cumulative number of permanent jobs created
in the redevelopment area as a result of the public improvements
undertaken by the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or
in part with community redevelopment financing;
(i) An estimate of the average wages and benefits received by all
employees of businesses locating within the redevelopment area as a
result of the public improvements undertaken by the sponsoring local
government and financed in whole or in part with community
redevelopment financing;
(j) A list of public improvements financed by bonds issued under
section 11 of this act and the date on which the bonds are anticipated
to be retired;
(k) That the sponsoring local government is in compliance with
section 3 of this act;
(l) At least once every three years, updated estimates of the
amounts of state and local sales and use tax increments estimated to
have been received since the approval by the department of the project
award under section 10 of this act;
(m) The amount of revenues from local public sources that:
(i) Were expended in prior years for the payment of bonds under
section 11 of this act and public improvement costs within the
redevelopment area on a pay-as-you-go basis in prior calendar years
that were in excess of the project award amount for that year and are
carried forward for dedication in future years;
(ii) Are deemed dedicated to payment of bonds or public improvement
costs in the calendar year for which the report is prepared; and
(iii) Remain available for dedication in future years; and
(n) Any other information required by the department to enable the
department to fulfill its duties under this chapter and section 16 of
this act.
(2) The department must make a report available to the public and
the legislature by June 1st of each year. The report must include a
summary of the information provided to the department by sponsoring
local governments under subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 39.88.010 (Declaration) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 2;
(2) RCW 39.88.020 (Definitions) and 2011 c 336 s 815 & 1982 1st
ex.s. c 42 s 3;
(3) RCW 39.88.030 (Authority -- Limitations) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42
s 4;
(4) RCW 39.88.040 (Procedure for adoption of public improvement)
and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 5;
(5) RCW 39.88.050 (Notice of public improvement) and 1982 1st ex.s.
c 42 s 6;
(6) RCW 39.88.060 (Disagreements between taxing districts) and 1989
c 378 s 1 & 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 7;
(7) RCW 39.88.070 (Apportionment of taxes) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42
s 8;
(8) RCW 39.88.080 (Application of tax allocation revenues) and 1982
1st ex.s. c 42 s 9;
(9) RCW 39.88.090 (General obligation bonds) and 1982 1st ex.s. c
42 s 10;
(10) RCW 39.88.100 (Tax allocation bonds) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42
s 11;
(11) RCW 39.88.110 (Legal investments) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s
13;
(12) RCW 39.88.120 (Notice to state) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 14;
(13) RCW 39.88.130 (Conclusive presumption of validity) and 1982
1st ex.s. c 42 s 15;
(14) RCW 39.88.900 (Supplemental nature of chapter) and 1982 1st
ex.s. c 42 s 16;
(15) RCW 39.88.905 (Short title) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 1;
(16) RCW 39.88.910 (Captions not part of law -- 1982 1st ex.s. c 42)
and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 17; and
(17) RCW 39.88.915 (Severability -- 1982 1st ex.s. c 42) and 1982 1st
ex.s. c 42 s 18.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Sections 1 through 15 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---