BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.944 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7026 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The fire service training account is hereby established in the
state treasury. The primary purpose of the account is firefighter
training for both volunteer and career firefighters. The fund shall
consist of:
(a) All fees received by the Washington state patrol for fire
service training;
(b) All grants and bequests accepted by the Washington state patrol
under RCW 43.43.940;
(c) Twenty percent of all moneys received by the state on fire
insurance premiums; and
(d) General fund -- state moneys appropriated into the account by the
legislature.
(2) Moneys in the account may be appropriated ((only)) for: (a)
Fire service training; (b) school fire prevention activities within the
Washington state patrol; and (c) the maintenance, operations, and
capital projects of the state fire training academy. However,
expenditures for purposes of (b) and (c) of this subsection may only be
made to the extent that these expenditures do not adversely affect
expenditures for the purpose of (a) of this subsection. The state
patrol may use amounts appropriated from the fire service training
account under this section to contract with the Washington state
firefighters apprenticeship trust for the operation of the firefighter
joint apprenticeship training program. The contract may call for
payments on a monthly basis. ((During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may appropriate funds from this account for school fire
prevention activities within the Washington state patrol and for
repairs of the burn building. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may appropriate funds from this account for school fire
prevention activities within the Washington state patrol, and for
predesign and repairs of the burn building.))
(3) Any general fund -- state moneys appropriated into the account
shall be allocated solely to the firefighter joint apprenticeship
training program. The Washington state patrol may contract with
outside entities for the administration and delivery of the firefighter
joint apprenticeship training program.

--- END ---