BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.91 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful ferry conduct if, while on or in
a ferry vessel or in or at a ferry facility, he or she knowingly:
(a) Smokes or carries a lighted or smoldering pipe, cigar, or
cigarette, unless he or she is smoking in an area designated and
authorized by the Washington state ferries;
(b) Discards litter other than in designated receptacles;
(c) Dumps or discards, or both, any materials on or at a ferry
facility including, but not limited to, hazardous substances and
automotive fluids;
(d) Plays any radio, recorder, or other sound-producing equipment,
except that nothing in this subsection prohibits the use of the
equipment when connected to earphones or an ear receiver that limits
the sound to an individual listener. The use of public address systems
or music systems that are authorized by the Washington state ferries is
permitted. The use of communications devices by ferry employees and
designated contractors or public safety officers in the line of duty is
permitted, as is the use of private communications devices used to
summon, notify, or communicate with other individuals, such as pagers
and cellular phones;
(e) Spits, expectorates, urinates, or defecates, except in
appropriate plumbing fixtures in restroom facilities;
(f) Carries any flammable liquid, explosive, acid, or other article
or material likely to cause harm to others, except that nothing in this
subsection prevents a person from carrying a cigarette, cigar, or pipe
lighter or carrying a firearm or ammunition in a way that is not
otherwise prohibited by law;
(g) Consumes an alcoholic beverage or is in possession of an open
alcoholic beverage container, unless authorized by the Washington state
ferries and required permits have been obtained;
(h) Obstructs or impedes the flow of ferry vessels or passenger
traffic, hinders or prevents access to ferry vessels or facilities, or
otherwise unlawfully interferes with the provision or use of public
transportation services;
(i) Unreasonably disturbs others by engaging in loud, raucous,
unruly, harmful, or harassing behavior;
(j) Destroys, defaces, or otherwise damages property in a ferry
vessel or at a ferry facility;
(k) Throws an object in a ferry vessel, at a ferry facility, or at
any person at a ferry facility with intent to do harm;
(l) Possesses an unissued transfer or fare media or tenders an
unissued transfer or fare media as proof of fare payment;
(m) Falsely claims to be a ferry operator or other ferry employee
or through words, actions, or the use of clothes, insignia, or
equipment resembling department-issued uniforms and equipment, creates
a false impression that he or she is a ferry operator or other ferry
employee;
(n) Engages in gambling or any game of chance for the winning of
money or anything of value;
(o) Skates on roller skates or in-line skates, or rides in or upon
or by any means a coaster, skateboard, toy vehicle, or any similar
device. However, a person may walk while wearing skates or carry a
skateboard while on or in a ferry vessel or in or at a ferry facility
if that conduct is not otherwise prohibited by law;
(p) Fails to maintain a pet or domestic animal under physical
control on a leash no more than eight feet in length or otherwise
physically restrained at all times, unless the pet or domestic animal
is being used as a service animal or for law enforcement purposes; or
(q) Engages in other conduct that is inconsistent with the intended
use and purpose of the ferry facility or ferry vessel and refuses to
obey the lawful commands of an agent of the Washington state ferries or
a peace officer to cease such conduct.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Ferry facility" means all passenger facilities, docks,
structures, stops, shelters, properties, and rights-of-way of all kinds
that are owned, leased, held, or used by the state of Washington for
the purpose of providing a state ferry system under chapter 47.60 RCW.
(b) "Ferry vessel" means any ferry boat, or any other device or
vessel, that is owned or operated by the Washington state ferries or an
entity providing service on behalf of the Washington state ferries that
is used for the purpose of carrying passengers on a regular schedule.
(c) "Washington state ferries" means the Washington state ferries
under chapter 47.60 RCW.
(3) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor.

--- END ---