BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that generating
electricity from the combustion of coal produces pollutants that are
harmful to human health and safety and the environment. The emissions
from the combustion of coal significantly impact visibility in
protected national park and tribal areas in the Northwest.
The legislature has previously recognized that greenhouse gas
emissions contribute to climate change and has found that Washington is
especially vulnerable to climate change. The legislature further finds
that, on average, eighteen percent of the state's annual power
consumption and fifty percent of the state's greenhouse gas emissions
from in-state electricity consumption comes from coal power plants.
The legislature finds that many coal power plants across the
country are in need of significant modernization to ensure fundamental
safeguards for clean air, water, and land.
The legislature further finds that electricity ratepayers in
Washington could suffer undue economic burden from continued expenses
for coal-based electricity resources if there is not a full accounting
of pending and future expenses from environmental compliance.
The legislature finds that the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission has begun to require financial accounting of
environmental expenses by administrative rule and finds that a statute
can ensure long-term consistency and legislative endorsement of the
principle of clear, transparent, and complete accounting.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.04.080 and 1989 c 107 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every public service company shall annually furnish to the
commission a report in such form as the commission may require, and
shall specifically answer all questions propounded to it by the
commission, upon or concerning which the commission may need
information. Such annual reports shall show in detail the amount of
capital stock issued, the amounts paid therefor and the manner of
payment for same, the dividends paid, the surplus fund, if any, and the
number of stockholders, the funded and floating debts and the interest
paid thereon, the cost and value of the company's property, franchises
and equipment, the number of employees and the salaries paid each
class, the accidents to employees and other persons and the cost
thereof, the amounts expended for improvements each year, how expended
and the character of such improvements, the earnings or receipts from
each franchise or business and from all sources, the proportion thereof
earned from business moving wholly within the state and the proportion
earned from interstate business, the operating and other expenses and
the proportion of such expense incurred in transacting business wholly
within the state, and proportion incurred in transacting interstate
business, such division to be shown according to such rules of division
as the commission may prescribe, the balances of profit and loss, and
a complete exhibit of the financial operations of the company each
year, including an annual balance sheet. Such report shall also
contain such information in relation to rates, charges or regulations
concerning charges, or agreements, arrangements or contracts affecting
the same, as the commission may require; and the commission may, in its
discretion, for the purpose of enabling it the better to carry out the
provisions of this title, prescribe the period of time within which all
public service companies subject to the provisions of this title shall
have, as near as may be, a uniform system of accounts, and the manner
in which such accounts shall be kept. Such detailed report shall
contain all the required statistics for the period of twelve months
ending on the last day of any particular month prescribed by the
commission for any public service company. Such reports shall be made
out under oath and filed with the commission at its office in Olympia
on such date as the commission specifies by rule, unless additional
time be granted in any case by the commission. The commission shall
have authority to require any public service company to file monthly
reports of earnings and expenses, and to file periodical or special, or
both periodical and special, reports concerning any matter about which
the commission is authorized or required by this or any other law, to
inquire into or keep itself informed about, or which it is required to
enforce, such periodical or special reports to be under oath whenever
the commission so requires.
(2) Each electrical company shall provide an annual report to the
commission concerning electricity provided by the company, from coal
power plants owned in whole or in part by the company, to one or more
retail electric customers. The report must provide the full cost
accounting of environmental expenses associated with each plant, as
identified by or associated with:
(a) The most recent annual report to shareholders, if any, and any
subsequent quarterly reports to shareholders; the most recent federal
energy regulatory commission form 1 and form 2, if applicable, and the
company's federal securities and exchange commission form 10k's, form
10q's, any prospectuses for any issuances of securities, and quarterly
reports to stockholders, if any, for the most recent two years prior to
the filing date;
(b) Any proposed federal regulations concerning air emissions or
climate change. The regulations will need to be accounted for once the
federal government has proposed a draft rule or has published a date
for proposed regulations or is under a court order to file a rule,
regulation, or determination that affects a coal plant, or its adjacent
mine that provides coal for the plant, that serves electricity to
Washington state customers;
(c) Any proposed state rules concerning air emissions or climate
change. The rules will need to be accounted for once a state
government, which has jurisdiction over a coal-based resource that
provides electricity for Washington state customers, has proposed a
draft rule or has published a date for proposed rules or is under a
court order to file a rule, regulation, or determination that affects
a coal plant, or its adjacent mine that provides coal for the plant,
that serves electricity to Washington state customers;
(d) Any existing litigation against a coal plant that provides
electricity for Washington state customers; and
(e) Best estimates of potential future costs of compliance with
state or federal laws regulating carbon dioxide emissions from a coal
plant. The report must explain any differences between these estimates
and estimates used in the utility's most recently filed integrated
resource plan under chapter 19.280 RCW.

--- END ---