BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the intent of the legislature to
provide diversified local revenue options that may be tailored to the
needs of each jurisdiction. It is also the intent that local
governments provide countywide transportation planning and coordinate
with other municipalities, transit systems, transportation benefit
districts, planning organizations, and other transportation agencies.
It is critical that all transportation infrastructure is well planned,
coordinated, and maintained at the local levels to provide a seamless
transportation infrastructure to enable people and goods to move safely
and efficiently throughout the state and to bolster and improve the
state's economy.
(2) The legislature finds that the purchasing power of funds to pay
for local transportation needs continues to decline while costs have
risen. Without additional funding, counties and cities will continue
to struggle financially to preserve and maintain county roads, city
streets, and bridges; pavement conditions will to continue to decline;
and public transit systems will be forced to cut services at a time
when demand for transit services is increasing.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.73.065 and 2007 c 329 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, taxes,
fees, charges, and tolls may not be imposed by a district without
approval of a majority of the voters in the district voting on a
proposition at a general or special election. The proposition must
include a specific description of the transportation improvement or
improvements proposed by the district and the proposed taxes, fees,
charges, and the range of tolls imposed by the district to raise
revenue to fund the improvement or improvements.
(2) Voter approval under this section ((shall)) must be accorded
substantial weight regarding the validity of a transportation
improvement as defined in RCW 36.73.015.
(3) A district may not increase any taxes, fees, charges, or range
of tolls imposed under this chapter once the taxes, fees, charges, or
tolls take effect, unless authorized by the district voters pursuant to
RCW 36.73.160 or up to forty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized in
RCW 82.80.140 by the governing board of the district.
(4)(a) A district that includes all the territory within the
boundaries of the jurisdiction, or jurisdictions, establishing the
district may impose by a majority vote of the governing board of the
district the following fees and charges:
(i) Up to ((twenty)) forty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized in
RCW 82.80.140; or
(ii) A fee or charge in accordance with RCW 36.73.120.
(b) The vehicle fee authorized in (a) of this subsection may only
be imposed for a passenger-only ferry transportation improvement if the
vehicle fee is first approved by a majority of the voters within the
jurisdiction of the district.
(c)(i) A district solely comprised of a city or cities ((shall))
may not impose the fees or charges identified in (a) of this subsection
within one hundred eighty days after July 22, 2007, unless the county
in which the city or cities reside, by resolution, declares that it
will not impose the fees or charges identified in (a) of this
subsection within the one hundred eighty-day period; or
(ii) A district solely comprised of a city or cities identified in
RCW 36.73.020(6)(b) ((shall)) may not impose the fees or charges until
after May 22, 2008, unless the county in which the city or cities
reside, by resolution, declares that it will not impose the fees or
charges identified in (a) of this subsection through May 22, 2008.
(5) If the interlocal agreement in RCW 82.80.140(2)(a) cannot be
reached, a district that includes only the unincorporated territory of
a county may impose by a majority vote of the governing body of the
district up to ((twenty)) forty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized
in RCW 82.80.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county may impose a local motor vehicle excise tax of up to
one percent annually on the value of every motor vehicle registered to
a person residing within the county based on the valuation schedules in
RCW 82.44.035. No motor vehicle excise tax may be imposed on vehicles
licensed under RCW 46.17.355, except for motor vehicles with an unladen
weight of six thousand pounds or less, RCW 46.16A.425, 46.17.335, or
46.17.350(1)(c).
(2) Counties imposing a tax under this section shall contract,
before the effective date of the resolution or ordinance imposing a
surcharge, administration and collection to the department of
licensing, as appropriate, which must deduct an amount, as provided by
contract, for administration and collection expenses incurred by the
department.
(3) Counties imposing a tax under this section must use the funds
for transportation projects, which may include investment in new or
existing highways of statewide significance, principal arterials of
regional significance, high capacity transportation, public
transportation, or other transportation projects and programs of
regional or statewide significance, including transportation demand
management. Projects may also include the operation, preservation, or
maintenance of these facilities or programs.
(4) Counties imposing a tax under this section must negotiate an
interlocal agreement with cities and the transit agencies within the
county to distribute a portion of the revenues to the cities and
transit agencies. The interlocal agreement must require that the
county distribute a maximum of twenty dollars per vehicle in each city
to the cities within the county for the cities to use on local road
operations and maintenance needs. The interlocal agreement must be
effective prior to the imposition of the tax. The interlocal agreement
is effective when:
(a) Approved by the county and approved by sixty percent of the
cities in the county; or
(b) Approved by the county and approved by the cities that
represent seventy-five percent of the population of the cities within
the county.
(5)(a) A county has one year from the effective date of this
section to impose a local motor vehicle tax of up to one percent, as
authorized in this section. If a county does not impose the full one
percent of the local motor vehicle excise tax authorized under this
section within the year, the transit systems within that county may
impose up to one-half of the county's one percent local motor vehicle
excise tax.
(b) If there is more than one transit system within the county, all
of the transit systems within that county must impose the local motor
vehicle excise tax under this subsection (5) in order to be authorized
to impose such tax. If all of the transit systems within the county do
not impose such tax, none of the transit systems may impose the tax
under this subsection (5).
(c) If the transit system or systems within the county impose any
local motor vehicle excise tax under this subsection (5), the county
may only impose the local motor vehicle excise tax to the extent that
the county-imposed tax when combined with the transit system-imposed
tax is one percent or less.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.80.010 and 2003 c 350 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county;
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030.
(2) Subject to the conditions of this section, any county may levy,
by approval of its legislative body and a majority of the registered
voters of the county voting on the proposition at a general or special
election, additional excise taxes equal to ((ten percent of the
statewide motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025)) one cent,
two cents, or three cents on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel as
defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on each gallon of special fuel as defined
in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the county. Vehicles
paying an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are exempt from the
county fuel excise tax. An election held under this section must be
held not more than twelve months before the date on which the proposed
tax is to be levied. The ballot setting forth the proposition
((shall)) must state the tax rate that is proposed. The county's
authority to levy additional excise taxes under this section includes
the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the county. The
additional excise taxes are subject to the same exceptions and rights
of refund as applicable to other motor vehicle fuel and special fuel
excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW. The proposed
tax ((shall)) may not be levied less than one month from the date the
election results are certified by the county election officer. The
commencement date for the levy of any tax under this section ((shall
be)) is the first day of January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is imposed upon the
distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of a county to
a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a county ((shall)) must contract with the
department of revenue for the administration and collection of the
taxes. The contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to
exceed one percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be
deposited into the local tax administration account created in the
custody of the state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend
money from this account, upon appropriation, for the administration of
the local taxes imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer ((shall)) must distribute monthly to the
levying county and cities contained therein the proceeds of the
additional excise taxes collected under this section, after the
deductions for payments and expenditures as provided in RCW
46.68.090(1) (a) and (b) and under the conditions and limitations
provided in RCW 82.80.080.
(8) The proceeds of the additional excise taxes levied under this
section ((shall)) must be used strictly for transportation purposes in
accordance with RCW 82.80.070.
(9) A county may not levy the tax under this section if they are
levying the tax in RCW 82.80.110 or if they are a member of a regional
transportation investment district levying the tax in RCW 82.80.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect January 1, 2013.

--- END ---