BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For any bill enacted by the legislature that creates a new tax
preference or expands or extends an existing tax preference, the bill
must include legislative intent provisions, establishing the policy
goals and any related metrics that might provide context and/or data
for purposes of reviewing the tax preference under chapter 43.136 RCW.
(2) Any bill that is enacted without the legislative intent
provisions required by subsection (1) of this section must be reviewed
under chapter 43.136 RCW within five years of its enactment unless the
bill contains an expiration date specified in the enacting legislation
that is sooner than the five year review provided for in this
subsection.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "tax preference" has the same
meaning as in RCW 43.136.021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any tax
preference, as defined in RCW 43.136.021, that takes effect on or after
July 1, 2012, expires on the June 30th that is the tenth June 30th
subsequent to the effective date of the tax preference.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any tax
preference:
(a) Enacted with a separate expiration date; or
(b) Specifically exempted from the requirements of (a) of this
subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any tax
preference, as defined in RCW 43.136.021, that takes effect on or after
July 1, 2012, expires on the June 30th that is the tenth June 30th
subsequent to the effective date of the tax preference.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any tax
preference:
(a) Enacted with a separate expiration date; or
(b) Specifically exempted from the requirements of (a) of this
subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any tax
preference, as defined in RCW 43.136.021, that takes effect on or after
July 1, 2012, expires on the June 30th that is the tenth June 30th
subsequent to the effective date of the tax preference.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any tax
preference:
(a) Enacted with a separate expiration date; or
(b) Specifically exempted from the requirements of (a) of this
subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any tax
preference, as defined in RCW 43.136.021, that takes effect on or after
July 1, 2012, expires on the June 30th that is the tenth June 30th
subsequent to the effective date of the tax preference.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any tax
preference:
(a) Enacted with a separate expiration date; or
(b) Specifically exempted from the requirements of (a) of this
subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 83.100 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any tax
preference, as defined in RCW 43.136.021, that takes effect on or after
July 1, 2012, expires on the June 30th that is the tenth June 30th
subsequent to the effective date of the tax preference.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any tax
preference:
(a) Enacted with a separate expiration date; or
(b) Specifically exempted from the requirements of (a) of this
subsection.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.136.055 and 2011 c 335 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee must review
tax preferences according to the schedule developed under RCW
43.136.045. The committee must consider, but not be limited to, the
following factors in the review as relevant to each particular tax
preference:
(a) The classes of individuals, types of organizations, or types of
industries whose state tax liabilities are directly affected by the tax
preference;
(b) Public policy objectives that might provide a justification for
the tax preference, including but not limited to the legislative
history, any legislative intent, or the extent to which the tax
preference encourages business growth or relocation into this state,
promotes growth or retention of high wage jobs, or helps stabilize
communities. However, when reviewing a tax preference with a specific
expiration date, the committee may not conclude that the legislative
intent was for the tax preference to be temporary in nature unless the
legislative history or legislative intent expressly provides that it is
temporary;
(c) Evidence that the existence of the tax preference has
contributed to the achievement of any of the public policy objectives;
(d) The extent to which continuation of the tax preference might
contribute to any of the public policy objectives;
(e) The extent to which the tax preference may provide unintended
benefits to an individual, organization, or industry other than those
the legislature intended;
(f) The extent to which terminating the tax preference may have
negative effects on the category of taxpayers that currently benefit
from the tax preference, and the extent to which resulting higher taxes
may have negative effects on employment and the economy;
(g) The feasibility of modifying the tax preference to provide for
adjustment or recapture of the tax benefits of the tax preference if
the objectives are not fulfilled;
(h) Fiscal impacts of the tax preference, including past impacts
and expected future impacts if it is continued. For the purposes of
this subsection, "fiscal impact" includes an analysis of the general
effects of the tax preference on the overall state economy, including,
but not limited to, the effects of the tax preference on the
consumption and expenditures of persons and businesses within the
state;
(i) The extent to which termination of the tax preference would
affect the distribution of liability for payment of state taxes;
(j) The economic impact of the tax preference compared to the
economic impact of government activities funded by the tax for which
the tax preference is taken at the same level of expenditure as the tax
preference. For purposes of this subsection the economic impact shall
be determined using the Washington input-output model as published by
the office of financial management;
(k) Consideration of similar tax preferences adopted in other
states, and potential public policy benefits that might be gained by
incorporating corresponding provisions in Washington.
(2) For each tax preference, the committee must provide a
recommendation as to whether the tax preference should be continued
without modification, modified, scheduled for sunset review at a future
date, or terminated immediately. The committee may recommend
accountability standards for the future review of a tax preference.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---