BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.350 and 2007 c 17 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall have the power and it shall be the
director's duty to engage in negotiated rule making pursuant to RCW
34.05.310(2)(a) with the exclusive representative of the family child
care licensees selected in accordance with RCW 43.215.355 and with
other affected interests before adopting requirements that affect
family child care licensees.
(2) The department shall not implement new or revised rules
pertaining to licensed family day care providers if a small business
economic impact statement required under RCW 19.85.030 indicates that
family day care providers may experience increased costs in order to
comply with the new or revised rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---