BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington state liberty preservation act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The Washington state legislature finds the
following:
(1) The congress of the United States passed the national defense
authorization act, 2011 P.L. 112-81, ("2012 NDAA") for fiscal year 2012
on December 15, 2011;
(2) The president of the United States of America signed the 2012
NDAA into law on December 31, 2011;
(3) Section 1022 of the 2012 NDAA requires the armed forces of the
United States to detain, pending disposition according to the law of
war, any person involved in, or whom provided substantial support to,
terrorism or belligerent acts against the United States, and whom is a
member of al-Qaeda or an associated force;
(4) Section 1022 (4)(b)(1) and (2) of the 2012 NDAA excludes United
States citizens, and lawful resident aliens for conduct occurring
within the United States, from its mandatory detention provisions but
is only applicable to that section of the 2012 NDAA;
(5) Section 1022 (4)(b)(1) of the 2012 NDAA specifically provides
that, "The requirement to detain a person in military custody under
this section does not extend to citizens of the United States";
(6) Section 1022 of the 2012 NDAA specifically provides that, "The
requirement to detain a person in military custody under this section
does not extend to lawful resident aliens of the United States . . .";
(7) By contrast, section 1021 of the 2012 NDAA purports to
authorize, but does not require, the president of the United States to
utilize the armed forces of the United States to detain persons the
president suspects were part of, or substantially supported, al-Qaeda,
the Taliban, or associated forces and to dispose of such detained
persons according to the law of war, which may include, but is not
limited to: (a) Indefinite detention without charge or trial until the
end of hostilities authorized by the 2001 authorization for use of
military force against terrorists, 2001 P.L. 107-40, (b) prosecution
through a military commission, or (c) transfer to a foreign country or
foreign entity;
(8) Additionally, section 1021 of the 2012 NDAA purports to enlarge
the scope of those persons the office of the president may indefinitely
detain beyond those responsible for the September 11, 2001, terrorist
attacks, and those who harbored them, as purportedly authorized by the
2001 authorization for use of military force against terrorists, to now
include "[a] person who was a part of or substantially supported al-Qaeda, the Taliban, or associated forces that are engaged in
hostilities against the United States or its coalition partners,
including any person who has committed a belligerent act or has
directly supported such hostilities in aid of such enemy forces";
(9) However, section 1021, unlike section 1022 of the 2012 NDAA,
makes no specific exclusion for United States citizens and lawful
resident aliens for conduct occurring within the United States;
(10) While section 1021 of the 2012 NDAA seeks to preserve existing
law and authorities pertaining to the detention of United States
citizens, lawful resident aliens of the United States, and any other
person captured in the United States, it does not specify what such
existing law or authorities are;
(11) President Obama issued a signing statement upon signing the
NDAA into law indicating that he "will not authorize the indefinite
military detention without trial of American citizens";
(12) The clear language of, and omission of an exclusion in,
section 1021 of the 2012 NDAA combined with the language of President
Obama's signing statement indicates that while the president claims he
will not authorize the indefinite military detention without trial of
American citizens, he believes that the office of president now
possesses the authority to do so;
(13) Furthermore, the specific exclusion of application to United
States citizens and lawful resident aliens contained in section 1022 of
the 2012 NDAA, and the absence of such exclusion in section 1021 of the
NDAA, strongly implies that the provisions of section 1021 are intended
to apply to United States citizens and lawful resident aliens, whether
or not they are captured in the United States in the context of the
following facts:
(a) The office of the president of the United States, under both
the administrations of George W. Bush and Barack H. Obama, has asserted
the 2001 authorization for the use of military force against terrorists
allows the office of the president to indefinitely detain without
charge United States citizens and lawful resident aliens captured in
the United States;
(b) The United States supreme court has not decided whether the
2001 authorization for the use of military force against terrorists
allows the office of the president to indefinitely detain without
charge United States citizens and lawful resident aliens captured in
the United States;
(c) United States Senator, Carl Levin, declared in colloquy on the
floor of the United States senate that the original 2012 NDAA provided
that section 1021, then section 1031 prior to final drafting,
specifically would not apply to United States citizens, but that the
office of the president of the United States had requested that such
restriction be removed from the 2012 NDAA;
(d) During debate within the Senate and before the passage of the
2012 NDAA, United States Senator, Mark Udall, introduced an amendment
intended to forbid the indefinite detention of United States citizens,
which was rejected by a vote of 38-60;
(e) United States Senators John McCain and Lindsey Graham declared
in colloquies on the floor of the United States senate that section
1021 of the 2012 NDAA authorized the indefinite detention of United
States citizens captured within the United States by the armed forces
of the United States;
(f) United States Senator Lindsey Graham further declared in
colloquy on the floor of the United States senate that the United
States homeland is now part of "the battlefield";
(g) Retired four star marine generals Charles C. Krulak and Joseph
P. Hoar stated publicly that as a result of the indefinite detention
provision of the 2012 NDAA that "due process would be a thing of the
past," and "this provision would expand the battlefield to include the
United States";
(h) Retired four star marine generals Charles C. Krulak and Joseph
P. Hoar also stated publicly that the mandate of military custody for
most terrorism suspects "would violate not only the spirit of the
postreconstruction act limiting the use of the armed forces for
domestic law enforcement but also our trust with service members, who
enlist believing that they will never be asked to turn their weapons on
fellow Americans";
(14) Policing the citizenry of the United States of America by the
armed forces of the United States, as purportedly authorized by the
2012 NDAA, is contrary to the fundamental principles of our republic,
and is generally repugnant to a free society;
(15) Section 1021 of the 2012 NDAA as it purports to authorize (a)
detainment of United States citizens and legal resident aliens captured
within the United States of America without charge, (b) military
tribunals for United States citizens and legal resident aliens captured
within the United States of America, and (c) the transfer of United
States citizens and legal resident aliens captured within the United
States of America to foreign jurisdictions, is violative of the
following rights enshrined in the Constitution of the United States of
America: Article I, section 9, clause 2's right to seek Writ of Habeas
Corpus; the First Amendment's right to petition the government for a
redress of grievances; the Fourth Amendment's right to be free from
unreasonable searches and seizures; the Fifth Amendment's right to be
free from charge for an infamous or capitol crime until presentment or
indictment by a grand jury; the Fifth Amendment's right to be free from
deprivation of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law;
the Sixth Amendment's right in criminal prosecutions to enjoy a speedy
trial by an impartial jury in the state and district where the crime
shall have been committed; the Sixth Amendment's right to be informed
of the nature and cause of the accusation; the Sixth Amendment's right
to confront witnesses; the Sixth Amendment's right to counsel; the
Eighth Amendment's right to be free from excessive bail and fines, and
cruel and unusual punishment; the Fourteenth Amendment's right to be
free from deprivation of life, liberty, or property, without due
process of law;
(16) Section 1021 of the 2012 NDAA as it purports to authorize (a)
detainment of United States citizens and legal resident aliens captured
within the United States of America without charge or trial, (b)
military tribunals for United States citizens and legal resident aliens
captured within the United States of America, and (c) the transfer of
United States citizens and legal resident aliens captured within the
United States of America to foreign jurisdictions, is violative of the
following rights enshrined in the Washington state Constitution:
Article I, section 1: "...governments...are established to protect and
maintain individual rights."; Article I, section 3: "No person shall
be deprived of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law;"
Article I, section 7: "No person shall be disturbed in his private
affairs, or his home invaded, without authority of law;" Article I,
section 10: "Justice in all cases shall be administered openly, and
without unnecessary delay;" Article I, section 13: "The privilege of
the writ of habeas corpus shall not be suspended, unless in case of
rebellion or invasion the public safety requires it;" Article I,
section 14: "Excessive bail shall not be required, excessive fines
imposed, nor cruel punishment inflicted;" Article I, section 18: "The
military shall be in strict subordination to the civil power;" Article
I, section 21: "The right of trial by jury shall remain inviolate…;"
Article I, section 22: "In criminal prosecutions the accused shall
have the right to appear and defend in person, or by counsel, to demand
the nature and cause of the accusation against him, to have a copy
thereof, to testify in his own behalf, to meet the witnesses against
him face to face, to have compulsory process to compel the attendance
of witnesses in his own behalf, to have a speedy public trial by an
impartial jury of the county in which the offense is charged to have
been committed and the right to appeal in all cases...;" Article I,
section 27: "...No person shall be convicted of treason unless on the
testimony of two witnesses to the same overt act, or confession in open
court;" Article I, section 29: "The provisions of this Constitution
are mandatory, unless by express words they are declared to be
otherwise;" Article I, section 30: "The enumeration in this
Constitution of certain rights shall not be construed to deny others
retained by the people;" and Article I, section 32: "A frequent
recurrence to fundamental principles is essential to the security of
individual right and the perpetuity of free government"; and
(17) As required by Article VI of the United States Constitution,
the members of the Washington state legislature have taken an oath to
uphold both the Constitution of the United States of America and the
Constitution of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The Washington state legislature intends the
following:
(1) To condemn in no uncertain terms section 1021 of the 2012 NDAA
as it purports to repeal the spirit of the postreconstruction act and
authorize the president of the United States to utilize the armed
forces of the United States to police United States citizens and lawful
resident aliens within the United States of America, indefinitely
detain United States citizens and lawful resident aliens captured
within the United States of America without charge until the end of
hostilities authorized by the 2001 authorization for use of military
force, subject American citizens and lawful resident aliens captured
within the United States of America to military tribunals, and transfer
American citizens and lawful resident aliens captured within the United
States of America to a foreign country or foreign entity.
(2) To affirm it is indisputable that the threat of terrorism is
real, and that the full force of appropriate, and constitutional, law
must be used to defeat this threat. However, winning the war against
terror cannot come at the great expense of eviscerating the unalienable
rights recognized by and protected in the United States Constitution
and the Constitution of the state of Washington. Indeed, undermining
those constitutional rights serves only to concede to the terrorists'
demands of changing the fabric of what has made the United States of
America a republic granting the greatest number of people the greatest
amount of liberty, justice, security, opportunity, prosperity,
happiness, peace, and good ever known or experienced by humankind
throughout the history of the world.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 42.20 RCW
to read as follows:
No state or local official or employee, or agent of the state of
Washington, or employee of a corporation providing services to the
state of Washington, or member of the national guard or state defense
forces acting in his or her capacity as a state or local official or
employee, or agent of the state of Washington, or employee of a
corporation providing services to the state of Washington, or member of
the national guard or state defense forces, shall knowingly cooperate
with an investigation or detainment of a United States citizen or
lawful resident alien located within the United States of America by
the armed forces of the United States of America, except for (1) an
investigation or detainment by the United States coast guard when it is
not operating as a service in the navy, (2) an investigation or
detainment by national guard units or state defense forces while under
the authority of the governor of the state of Washington, or (3) an
internal investigation or detainment by the armed forces of the United
States of America of active duty members of the armed forces of the
United States of America.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 38.40 RCW
to read as follows:
No member of the armed forces of the United States of America, nor
any person acting directly with, or on behalf of, the armed forces of
the United States of America, shall be permitted to conduct within the
boundaries of the state of Washington, an investigation or detainment
of a United States citizen or lawful resident alien located within the
state of Washington except for (1) an investigation or detainment by
the United States coast guard when it is not operating as a service in
the navy, (2) an investigation or detainment by national guard units or
state defense forces while under the authority of the governor of the
state of Washington, or (3) an internal investigation or detainment by
the armed forces of the United States of America of active duty members
of the armed forces of the United States of America.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The provisions of this act shall be
construed liberally to effectuate the intent, purposes, and policies of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---