BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 67.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The taxes on lodging authorized under this chapter do not apply to
fees for services, utilities, and use of facilities charged by the
state parks and recreation commission under chapter 79A.05 RCW and
sales of the discover pass as defined in RCW 79A.80.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---