BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.250 and 2010 c 257 s 1 and 2010 c 128 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following employment and licensing information is exempt from
public inspection and copying under this chapter:
(1) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used
to administer a license, employment, or academic examination;
(2) All applications for public employment, including the names of
applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect
to an applicant;
(3) The residential addresses, residential telephone numbers,
personal wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail
addresses, social security numbers, and emergency contact information
of employees or volunteers of a public agency, and the names, dates of
birth, residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, personal
wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail addresses, social
security numbers, and emergency contact information of dependents of
employees or volunteers of a public agency that are held by any public
agency in personnel records, public employment related records, or
volunteer rosters, or are included in any mailing list of employees or
volunteers of any public agency. For purposes of this subsection,
"employees" includes independent provider home care workers as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240;
(4) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency
employee: (a) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by
the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in
connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW
against the person; and (b) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed;
(5) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency
conducting an active and ongoing investigation of a possible unfair
practice under chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of other
federal, state, or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment;
(6) Information in specific investigative records compiled by or on
behalf of an employing agency conducting an investigation of possible
misconduct where such investigation has resulted in a nonsustained type
finding and such records have been transferred to the legal
representative of the agency for retention for use in a controversy to
which the agency may become a party. A finding is not deemed to be
sustained until the completion of all available appeals.
(7) Criminal history records checks for board staff finalist
candidates conducted pursuant to RCW 43.33A.025;
(((7))) (8) Except as provided in RCW 47.64.220, salary and benefit
information for maritime employees collected from private employers
under RCW 47.64.220(1) and described in RCW 47.64.220(2); and
(((8))) (9) Photographs and month and year of birth in the
personnel files of employees and workers of criminal justice agencies
as defined in RCW 10.97.030. The news media, as defined in RCW
5.68.010(5), shall have access to the photographs and full date of
birth. For the purposes of this subsection, news media does not
include any person or organization of persons in the custody of a
criminal justice agency as defined in RCW 10.97.030.

--- END ---