BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) In 2001, more than sixty percent of the
voters of the state of Washington supported the policies of providing
regular compensation cost-of-living adjustments for public school and
community and technical college employees as well as providing student
achievement funds for school districts to reduce class size, provide
professional development, and offer full-day kindergarten. However,
these policies were not accompanied by a revenue source to pay for
their cost.
(2) The legislature further finds that the nature and needs of
educational programming evolve over time. In 2009 and 2010, the
legislature embarked on a significant reform of the program of basic
education, including making commitments to provide increased funding in
four key areas: Reduced K-3 class size; statewide provision of all-day
kindergarten; enhanced state funding for maintenance, supplies, and
operating costs; and a new funding formula to support transportation of
students to and from school. The legislature maintains that,
particularly in light of recent rulings by the state supreme court
regarding adequacy of education funding, the voters of the state should
have the opportunity to repurpose the student achievement program in
support of these key areas. The legislature believes that such a
repurposing adheres to the spirit and intent of the original initiative
to support student achievement.
(3) Therefore the legislature intends to submit to the voters of
the state of Washington the opportunity to reauthorize both the policy
and the revenue to provide education cost-of-living adjustment and to
repurpose the policy and the revenue for the student achievement
program. If the voters do not support both policy and revenue, the
previous policies should be removed as an ongoing obligation of the
state. The legislature acknowledges that such a rejection does not
negate the state's obligation to fully fund the program of basic
education as defined by the legislature.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.400.205 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 18 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) From state general funds that must be appropriated from the
revenue generated under RCW 82.08.020(5) and other funds as may be
necessary, school district employees shall be provided an annual salary
cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section.
(a) The cost-of-living increase shall be calculated by applying the
rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index to any state-funded salary base used in state funding formulas for teachers and
other school district employees. Beginning with the ((2001-02)) 2014-15 school year, and for each subsequent school year, ((except for the
2011-12 and 2012-13 school years,)) each school district shall be
provided a cost-of-living allocation sufficient to grant this cost-of-living increase.
(b) A school district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
compensation policies. No later than the end of the school year, each
school district shall certify to the superintendent of public
instruction that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living
increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.
(c) Any funded cost-of-living increase shall be included in the
salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for school
employees in subsequent years. For teachers and other certificated
instructional staff, the rate of the annual cost-of-living increase
funded for certificated instructional staff shall be applied to the
base salary used with the statewide salary allocation schedule
established under RCW 28A.150.410 and to any other salary models used
to recognize school district personnel costs.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any school year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.50.465 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 18 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) From state general funds that must be appropriated from the
revenue generated under RCW 82.08.020(5) and other funds as may be
necessary, academic employees of community and technical college
districts shall be provided an annual salary cost-of-living increase in
accordance with this section. For purposes of this section, "academic
employee" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28B.52.020.
(a) Beginning with the ((2001-2002)) 2014-2015 fiscal year, and for
each subsequent fiscal year, ((except as provided in (d) of this
subsection,)) each college district shall receive a cost-of-living
allocation sufficient to increase academic employee salaries, including
mandatory salary-related benefits, by the rate of the yearly increase
in the cost-of-living index.
(b) A college district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
other compensation policies. No later than the end of the fiscal year,
each college district shall certify to the college board that it has
spent funds provided for cost-of-living increases on salaries and
salary-related benefits.
(c) The college board shall include any funded cost-of-living
increase in the salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases
for academic employees in subsequent years.
(d) Beginning with the ((2001-2002)) 2014-2015 fiscal year, and for
each subsequent fiscal year ((except for the 2011-2012 and 2012-2013
fiscal years)), the state shall fully fund the cost-of-living increase
set forth in this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any fiscal year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.50.468 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 18 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) From state general funds that must be appropriated from the
revenue generated under RCW 82.08.020(5) and other funds as may be
necessary, classified employees of technical colleges shall be provided
an annual salary cost-of-living increase in accordance with this
section. For purposes of this section, "technical college" has the
same meaning as defined in RCW 28B.50.030. This section applies to
only those classified employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56
RCW.
(a) Beginning with the ((2001-2002)) 2014-2015 fiscal year, and for
each subsequent fiscal year, ((except as provided in (d) of this
subsection,)) each technical college board of trustees shall receive a
cost-of-living allocation sufficient to increase classified employee
salaries, including mandatory salary-related benefits, by the rate of
the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index.
(b) A technical college board of trustees shall distribute its
cost-of-living allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in
accordance with the technical college's salary schedules, collective
bargaining agreements, and other compensation policies. No later than
the end of the fiscal year, each technical college shall certify to the
college board that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living
increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.
(c) The college board shall include any funded cost-of-living
increase in the salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases
for technical college classified employees in subsequent years.
(d) Beginning with the ((2001-2002)) 2014-2015 fiscal year, and for
each subsequent fiscal year ((except for the 2011-2012 and 2012-2013
fiscal years)), the state shall fully fund the cost-of-living increase
set forth in this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any fiscal year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.150.380 and 2009 c 548 s 110 and 2009 c 479 s 16
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state legislature shall, at each regular session in an odd-numbered year, appropriate for the current use of the common schools
such amounts as needed for state support to school districts during the
ensuing biennium for the program of basic education under RCW
28A.150.200.
(2) In addition to those state funds provided to school districts
for basic education, the legislature may appropriate funds to be
distributed to school districts for other factors and for other special
programs to enhance or enrich the program of basic education.
(3) The state legislature shall also, at each regular session in an
odd-numbered year, appropriate from the general fund ((and)) from the
revenue generated under RCW 82.08.020(5), the education construction
fund, and other funds as may be necessary for the purposes of and in
accordance with the provisions of the student achievement ((act))
program during the ensuing biennium.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.135.045 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 950 are each
amended to read as follows:
The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(1) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, funds may also be
used for higher education facilities preservation and maintenance.
During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the legislature may
transfer from the education construction fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.
(2) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(3) Funds for the student achievement program in RCW 28A.505.210
and 28A.505.220 shall be appropriated to the superintendent of public
instruction strictly for distribution to school districts to meet the
provisions set out in the student achievement act. ((Allocations shall
be made on an equal per full-time equivalent student basis to each
school district.))
(4) After July 1, 2010, the state treasurer shall transfer one
hundred two million dollars from the general fund to the education
construction fund by June 30th of each year.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.505.210 and 2009 c 479 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
((School districts shall have the authority to decide the best use
of funds distributed for)) (1) The purpose of the student achievement
program ((under RCW 28A.505.220)) is to assist students in meeting and
exceeding the new, higher academic standards in each district
((consistent with the provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2001)) and to
support implementation of revised definitions and funding formulas for
basic education.
(((1))) (2) Beginning September 1, 2014, funds for the student
achievement program provided under RCW 28A.505.220 shall be allocated
((for the following uses)) to support implementation of the following
provisions of chapter 236, Laws of 2010:
(a) To reduce class size ((by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators,
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school;
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection.
(2) Annually on or before May 1st, the school district board of
directors shall meet at the time and place designated for the purpose
of a public hearing on the proposed use of these funds to improve
student achievement for the coming year. Any person may appear or by
written submission have the opportunity to comment on the proposed plan
for the use of these funds. No later than August 31st, as a part of
the process under RCW 28A.505.060, each school district shall adopt a
plan for the use of these funds for the upcoming school year.
Annually, each school district shall provide to the citizens of their
district a public accounting of the funds made available to the
district during the previous school year under chapter 3, Laws of 2001,
how the funds were used, and the progress the district has made in
increasing student achievement, as measured by required state
assessments and other assessments deemed appropriate by the district.
Copies of this report shall be provided to the superintendent of public
instruction)) for grades K-3 under RCW 28A.150.260(4)(b);
(b) To increase the minimum allocations for maintenance, supplies,
and operating costs under RCW 28A.150.260(8)(b);
(c) To continue phasing-in implementation of all-day kindergarten
under RCW 28A.150.315; and
(d) To implement the revised funding distribution formula for pupil
transportation under RCW 28A.160.192.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.505.220 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 17 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Total distributions for the student achievement program from
the general fund ((to each school district)) shall be based upon the
average number of full-time equivalent students ((in the school
district)) statewide during the previous school year as reported to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction by August 31st of
the previous school year. ((The superintendent of public instruction
shall ensure that moneys generated by skill center students are
returned to skill centers.))
(2) The allocation rate per full-time equivalent student shall be
((three)) five hundred two dollars in the ((2005-06 school year, three
hundred seventy-five dollars in the 2006-07 school year, and four
hundred fifty dollars in the 2007-08)) 2014-15 school year. For each
subsequent school year, the amount allocated per full-time equivalent
student shall be adjusted for inflation by the implicit price deflator
as published by the federal bureau of labor statistics. ((However, for
the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the amount allocated per full-time equivalent student shall be as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act.)) These allocations per full-time equivalent
student shall be supported from the distributions from the education
legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230 ((and)), the state
general fund from the revenue generated under RCW 82.08.020(5), and
other funds as may be necessary.
(3) The ((school district)) annual amounts as defined in subsection
(2) of this section shall be distributed ((on the monthly apportionment
schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250)) to school districts through
applicable state funding formulas, but the omnibus appropriations act
must separately specify the annual amounts distributed under this
section for each of the purposes under RCW 28A.505.210.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.08.020 and 2011 c 171 s 120 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected a tax equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state
of:
(a) Tangible personal property, unless the sale is specifically
excluded from the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;
(b) Digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services,
if the sale is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail
sale;
(c) Services, other than digital automated services, included
within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;
(d) Extended warranties to consumers; and
(e) Anything else, the sale of which is included within the RCW
82.04.050 definition of retail sale.
(2) There is levied and collected an additional tax on each retail
car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this
state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The
revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the
multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.365, nonhighway vehicles as
defined in RCW 46.09.310, and snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.04.546.
(5) ((Beginning on December 8, 2005,)) (a) Beginning July 1, 2014,
there is levied and collected an additional tax equal to four-tenths of
one percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state of
any property, product, warranty, or service subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, the rate under (a) of this subsection
must be increased as follows:
(i) On July 1, 2015, by an increment of one-tenth of one percent;
(ii) On July 1, 2016, by an increment of one-tenth of one percent;
(iii) On July 1, 2017, by an increment of one-tenth of one percent;
(iv) On July 1, 2018, no change;
(v) On July 1, 2019, by an increment of one-tenth of one percent;
(vi) On July 1, 2020, no change;
(vii) On July 1, 2021, by an increment of one-tenth of one percent;
(viii) On July 1, 2022, no change; and
(ix) On July 1, 2023, by an increment of one-tenth of one percent.
(c) The tax imposed under this subsection must be used only for
funding the cost-of-living adjustments under RCW 28A.400.205,
28B.50.465, and 28B.50.468, and funding the student achievement program
under RCW 28A.505.210 and 28A.505.220.
(6)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, 0.16 percent
of the taxes collected under subsection (1) of this section must be
dedicated to funding comprehensive performance audits required under
RCW 43.09.470. The revenue identified in this subsection must be
deposited in the performance audits of government account created in
RCW 43.09.475.
(((6))) (b) This subsection does not apply to taxes collected under
subsection (5) of this section.
(7) The taxes imposed under this chapter apply to successive retail
sales of the same property.
(((7))) (8) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes
imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.150.380 and 2009 c 548 s 110 and 2009 c 479 s 16
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state legislature shall, at each regular session in an odd-numbered year, appropriate for the current use of the common schools
such amounts as needed for state support to school districts during the
ensuing biennium for the program of basic education under RCW
28A.150.200.
(2) In addition to those state funds provided to school districts
for basic education, the legislature may appropriate funds to be
distributed to school districts for other factors and for other special
programs to enhance or enrich the program of basic education.
(((3) The state legislature shall also, at each regular session in
an odd-numbered year, appropriate from the general fund and education
construction fund for the purposes of and in accordance with the
provisions of the student achievement act during the ensuing
biennium.))

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.600.405 and 2007 c 355 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section and RCW 28B.50.534, "eligible
student" means a student who has completed all state and local high
school graduation requirements except the certificate of academic
achievement under RCW 28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual
achievement under RCW 28A.155.045, who is less than age twenty-one as
of September 1st of the academic year the student enrolls at a
community and technical college under this section, and who meets the
following criteria:
(a) Receives a level 2 (basic) score on the reading and writing
content areas of the high school ((Washington assessment of student
learning)) statewide student assessment;
(b) Has not successfully met state standards on a retake of the
assessment or an alternative assessment;
(c) Has participated in assessment remediation; and
(d) Receives a recommendation to enroll in courses or a program of
study made available under RCW 28B.50.534 from his or her high school
principal.
(2) An eligible student may enroll in courses or a program of study
made available by a community or technical college participating in the
pilot program created under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose of obtaining
a high school diploma.
(3) For eligible students in courses or programs delivered directly
by the community or technical college participating in the pilot
program under RCW 28B.50.534 and only for enrollment in courses that
lead to a high school diploma, the superintendent of public instruction
shall transmit to the colleges participating in the pilot program an
amount per each full-time equivalent college student at statewide
uniform rates. The amount shall be the sum of (a), (b), and (c)((, and
(d))) of this subsection, as applicable.
(a) The superintendent shall separately calculate and allocate
moneys appropriated for basic education under RCW 28A.150.260 for
purposes of making payments under this section. The calculations and
allocations shall be based upon the estimated statewide annual average
per full-time equivalent high school student allocations under RCW
28A.150.260, excluding small high school enhancements, and applicable
rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(b) The superintendent shall allocate an amount equal to the per
funded student state allocation for the learning assistance program
under chapter 28A.165 RCW for each full-time equivalent college student
or a pro rata amount for less than full-time enrollment.
(c) ((The superintendent shall allocate an amount equal to the per
full-time equivalent student allocation for the student achievement
program under RCW 28A.505.210 for each full-time equivalent college
student or a pro rata amount for less than full-time enrollment.
(d))) For eligible students who meet eligibility criteria for the
state transitional bilingual instruction program under chapter 28A.180
RCW, the superintendent shall allocate an amount equal to the per
student state allocation for the transitional bilingual instruction
program or a pro rata amount for less than full-time enrollment.
(4) The superintendent may adopt rules establishing enrollment
reporting, recordkeeping, and accounting requirements necessary to
ensure accountability for the use of basic education, learning
assistance, and transitional bilingual program funds under this section
for the pilot program created under RCW 28B.50.534.
(5) All school districts in the geographic area of the two
community and technical colleges selected pursuant to section 8,
chapter 355, Laws of 2007 to participate in the pilot program shall
provide information about the high school completion option under RCW
28B.50.534 to students in grades ten, eleven, and twelve and the
parents or guardians of those students.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.135.045 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 950 are each
amended to read as follows:
The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(1) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, funds may also be
used for higher education facilities preservation and maintenance.
During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the legislature may
transfer from the education construction fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.
(2) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(3) ((Funds for the student achievement program in RCW 28A.505.210
and 28A.505.220 shall be appropriated to the superintendent of public
instruction strictly for distribution to school districts to meet the
provisions set out in the student achievement act. Allocations shall
be made on an equal per full-time equivalent student basis to each
school district.
(4))) After July 1, 2010, the state treasurer shall transfer one
hundred two million dollars from the general fund to the education
construction fund by June 30th of each year.

Sec. 13 RCW 67.70.340 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 27 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that creating a shared game lottery
could result in less revenue being raised by the existing state lottery
ticket sales. The legislature further recognizes that the fund most
impacted by this potential event is the Washington opportunity pathways
account. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to use some of
the proceeds from the shared game lottery to make up the difference
that the potential state lottery revenue loss would have on the
Washington opportunity pathways account. The legislature further
intends to use some of the proceeds from the shared game lottery to
fund programs and services related to problem and pathological
gambling.
(2) The Washington opportunity pathways account is expected to
receive one hundred two million dollars annually from state lottery
games other than the shared game lottery. For fiscal year 2011 and
thereafter, if the amount of lottery revenues earmarked for the
Washington opportunity pathways account is less than one hundred two
million dollars, the commission, after making the transfer required
under subsection (3) of this section, must transfer sufficient moneys
from revenues derived from the shared game lottery into the Washington
opportunity pathways account to bring the total revenue up to one
hundred two million dollars.
(3)(a) The commission shall transfer, from revenue derived from the
shared game lottery, to the problem gambling account created in RCW
43.20A.892, an amount equal to the percentage specified in (b) of this
subsection of net receipts. For purposes of this subsection, "net
receipts" means the difference between (i) revenue received from the
sale of lottery tickets or shares and revenue received from the sale of
shared game lottery tickets or shares; and (ii) the sum of payments
made to winners.
(b) In fiscal year 2006, the percentage to be transferred to the
problem gambling account is one-tenth of one percent. In fiscal year
2007 and subsequent fiscal years, the percentage to be transferred to
the problem gambling account is thirteen one-hundredths of one percent.
(4) The commission shall transfer the remaining net revenues, if
any, derived from the shared game lottery "Powerball" authorized in RCW
67.70.044(1) after the transfers pursuant to this section into the
state general fund for ((the student achievement program under RCW
28A.505.220)) support for the common schools.
(5) The remaining net revenues, if any, in the shared game lottery
account after the transfers pursuant to this section shall be deposited
into the Washington opportunity pathways account.

Sec. 14 RCW 83.100.230 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 953 are each
amended to read as follows:
The education legacy trust account is created in the state
treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for ((deposit into the
student achievement fund)) support of the common schools and for
expanding access to higher education through funding for new
enrollments and financial aid, and other educational improvement
efforts. ((During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account
may also be transferred into the state general fund.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.400.205 (Cost-of-living increases for employees) and
2011 1st sp.s. c 18 s 1, 2009 c 573 s 1, 2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 1, &
2001 c 4 s 2;
(2) RCW 28A.400.206 (Cost-of-living increases -- Duty of state) and
2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 2 & 2001 c 4 s 1;
(3) RCW 28A.505.210 (Student achievement funds -- Use and accounting
of funds -- Public hearing -- Report) and 2009 c 479 s 17, 2005 c 497 s
105, & 2001 c 3 s 3;
(4) RCW 28A.505.220 (Student achievement program -- General fund
allocation) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 17 s 1;
(5) RCW 28B.50.465 (Cost-of-living increases -- Academic employees)
and 2011 1st sp.s. c 18 s 2, 2009 c 573 s 2, 2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 3,
& 2001 c 4 s 3; and
(6) RCW 28B.50.468 (Cost-of-living increases -- Classified employees)
and 2011 1st sp.s. c 18 s 3, 2009 c 573 s 3, 2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 4,
& 2001 c 4 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The secretary of state shall submit
sections 1 through 9 of this act to the people for their adoption and
ratification, or rejection, at the general election to be held in this
state on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November, 2013, in
accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the
laws adopted to facilitate its operation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 10 through 15 of this act take
effect January 1, 2014, if Referendum .... (sections 1 through 9 of
this act) is not approved by December 31, 2013.

--- END ---