BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Educational interpreters" means school district employees,
whether certificated or classified, providing sign language translation
and further explanation of concepts introduced by the teacher for
students who are deaf, deaf-blind, or hearing impaired; and
(b) "Educational interpreter assessment" means an assessment that
includes both written assessment and performance assessment that is
offered by a national organization of professional sign language
interpreters and transliterators, and is designed to assess performance
in more than one sign system or sign language.
(2) The professional educator standards board shall identify and
publicize educational interpreter assessments that are available and
meet the definition in this section. The board shall establish a
performance standard for each educational interpreter assessment for
the purposes of this section.
(3) By the beginning of the 2015-16 school year, educational
interpreters who are employed by school districts must have
successfully achieved the performance standard established by the
professional educator standards board on one of the educational
interpreter assessments identified by the board.
(4) By the beginning of the 2018-19 school year, educational
interpreters who are employed by school districts must meet the
requirements of subsection (3) of this section, plus achieve national
interpreter certification by the national association of the deaf
registry of interpreters for the deaf.

--- END ---