BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 INTENT. It is the intent of the
legislature to ensure that the top one percent of citizens in our state
contribute to sustain the paramount duty of the state to educate our
children by requiring these wealthiest, those who have benefited
greatly in this great recession, to pay their fair share through a two
percent marginal tax on annual income exceeding one million dollars.

PART II
ENSURING THE TOP ONE PERCENT PAY TOO
TAXING ANNUAL INCOME OVER ONE MILLION DOLLARS TO FUND THE
PARAMOUNT DUTY TRUST FUND
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 EXCISE TAX IMPOSED--RATES. An excise tax
is imposed on the receipt of adjusted gross income above one million
dollars by residents or qualifying nonresidents deriving income from
sources within the state. The rate of the tax is as follows: Adjusted
gross income in excess of one million dollars is taxed at two percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 THE PARAMOUNT DUTY TRUST FUND. (1) A new
state trust fund is hereby established dedicated to meeting the
paramount duty for the education of all children. This trust is funded
by the excise tax assessed under this chapter.
(2) Revenue received by the trust must be devoted to education,
with the first priority being classroom size reduction in kindergarten
through fourth grade. In no case may this new revenue be used to
supplant current funding for these services.
(3) The office of financial management must prepare an annual audit
of the funds deposited in the paramount duty trust fund, reporting on
how funds have been spent, determining if the intent of reducing class
size has been met, and estimating the number of children benefited, as
well as all state residents benefited, and public and private jobs
created and/or maintained, including the multiplier effects of public
expenditures. Monthly disclosure of tax collection and spending under
this chapter must be posted on a web site maintained by the treasurer
and the office of financial management and such disclosure must, at a
minimum, include the information set forth in RCW 43.08.150.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 ABSOLUTE TAX THRESHOLD. It is the mandate
of this chapter that in no event may excise tax be levied upon adjusted
gross income below one million dollars. No provision of this chapter
allows the imposition of tax upon adjusted gross income below one
million dollars.

PART III
RULE MAKING AND ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 SIMPLIFICATION AND PAPERWORK REDUCTION.
To reduce administrative burden to taxpayers and state government, the
department must, to the greatest extent possible, administer the tax
assessed under this chapter in a manner that is consistent with the
federal income tax system and utilizing documents that taxpayers
already must prepare as part of their federal tax filings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 RULE MAKING. (1)(a) The department must
adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration and
enforcement of this chapter, including:
(i) A phase-in for fiscal year taxpayers, required methods of
accounting, and time of payment of tax deducted and withheld under this
chapter;
(ii) Time and manner of making returns, extensions of time for
filing returns, verification of returns, and the time when a return is
deemed filed;
(iii) Filing requirements, including forms, due dates, extensions,
and joint returns;
(iv) Recordkeeping and inspection and estimated tax and
withholding;
(v) Liability of transferee's imposition of penalties and accrual
of interest for late returns, credit for income taxes due to another
jurisdiction, and dual residency; and
(vi) Any other matters that the department deems appropriate.
(b) The rules adopted under this section, to the extent possible
without being inconsistent with this chapter, must follow the internal
revenue code and the regulations and rulings of the United States
treasury department with respect to the federal income tax.
(2) The department may adopt as a part of these rules any portions
of the internal revenue code and treasury department regulations and
rulings, in whole or in part, including rules that impose interest and
penalties, but the amount of such interest and penalties must be set by
the department. Modifications of the federal rules may be made if
reasonably necessary to facilitate the prompt, efficient, and equitable
implementation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 IMPLEMENTATION. The department must take
actions and adopt rules, forms, and procedures to implement this
chapter consistently with RCW 26.60.015, notwithstanding any term or
provision of this chapter, except section 203 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 REFUNDS OF OVERPAYMENTS--OTHER
ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS. (1) The department must refund all taxes
improperly paid or collected.
(2) The following sections apply to the administration of taxes
imposed under this chapter: RCW 82.32.020, 82.32.050, 82.32.060,
82.32.070, 82.32.090, 82.32.100, 82.32.105, 82.32.110, 82.32.120,
82.32.130, 82.32.140, 82.32.150, 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.32.180,
82.32.190, 82.32.200, 82.32.210, 82.32.220, 82.32.230, 82.32.235,
82.32.237, 82.32.240, 82.32.245, 82.32.265, 82.32.290, 82.32.300,
82.32.310, 82.32.320, 82.32.330, 82.32.340, 82.32.350, 82.32.360, and
82.32.380.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 APPEALS. The board of tax appeals has
jurisdiction over appeals relating to tax deficiencies and refunds,
including penalties and interest, pursuant to this chapter. The
taxpayer may elect a formal or informal hearing pursuant to RCW
82.03.140.

PART IV
APPORTIONMENT AND ALLOCATION OF INCOME
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 APPORTIONMENT AND ALLOCATION OF INCOME.
(1) For resident individuals, all income must be apportioned and
allocated to this state.
(2) For nonresident individuals, income derived from sources within
this state must be apportioned and allocated to this state.
(3) For purposes of this chapter:
(a) The adjusted gross income of a nonresident derived from sources
within this state is the net amount of items of income, gain, loss, and
deduction of the nonresident's adjusted gross income that are derived
from or connected with sources in this state.
(b) Items of income, gain, loss, and deduction derived from or
connected with sources within this state are those items attributable
to the ownership or disposition of any interest in real or tangible
personal property in this state, and a business, trade, profession, or
occupation carried on within this state. The department must issue
rules to provide consistency of this section with other excise tax
provisions.
(c) Deduction with respect to expenses, capital losses, and net
operating losses must be based solely on income, gains, losses, and
deductions derived from or connected with sources in this state but
shall otherwise be determined in the same manner as the corresponding
federal deduction except as provided in this chapter.
(d) Compensation paid by the United States for service in the armed
forces of the United States performed in this state by a nonresident
does not constitute income derived from sources within this state.
(e) If a business, trade, profession, or occupation is carried on
partly within and partly without this state, the determination of net
income derived or connected with sources within this state as provided
in this section must be made by apportionment and allocation under
chapter 82.56 RCW.

PART V
DEFINITIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Adjusted gross income" means adjusted gross income as
determined under the federal internal revenue code.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Individual" means a natural person, whether filing
individually or jointly.
(4) "Internal revenue code" means the United States internal
revenue code of 1986 and amendments thereto, as existing and in effect
on January 1, 2012.
(5) "Resident" includes an individual who:
(a) Has resided in this state for the entire tax year; or
(b) Is domiciled in this state unless the individual:
(i) Maintains no permanent place of abode in this state; and
(ii) Does not maintain a permanent place of abode elsewhere; and
(iii) Spends in the aggregate not more than thirty days in the tax
year in this state; or
(c) Is not domiciled in this state, but maintains a permanent place
of abode in this state and spends in the aggregate more than one
hundred eighty-three days of the tax year in this state unless the
individual establishes to the satisfaction of the department that the
individual is in the state only for temporary or transitory purposes;
or
(d) Claims this state as the individual's tax home for federal
income tax purposes.
(6) "Tax" means the tax determined by this chapter, unless the
context requires a different meaning.
(7) "Taxpayer" means a person receiving income subject to tax under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 TERM USAGE. Except as provided in section
501 of this act, any term used in this chapter has the same meaning as
when used in a comparable context in the internal revenue code.

PART VI
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid,
the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 APPLICATION. This act applies to taxes
collectible in 2013 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 CODIFICATION. Sections 101 through 602 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

--- END ---