BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the governing body of a municipal fire district.
(2) "City" means a city, code city, or town with an existing
municipal fire department that convenes a municipal fire district
planning committee under this chapter.
(3) "Municipal fire district" or "district" means a municipal
corporation, an independent taxing authority within the meaning of
Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a taxing district
within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution,
whose boundaries are coextensive with a city and that has been created
by a vote of the people under this chapter.
(4) "Municipal fire district planning committee" means the
committee created under section 3 of this act to create and propose the
establishment of a municipal fire district.
(5) "Municipal fire district service plan" or "plan" means a plan
proposed by a municipal fire district planning committee to develop and
operate a municipal fire district.
(6) "Regular property taxes" has the same meaning as in RCW
84.04.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A city with its own fire department may
establish a municipal fire district pursuant to section 3 of this act
to replace its existing municipal fire department and to provide for
fire prevention services, fire suppression services, emergency medical
services, and the protection of life and property. The boundaries of
a municipal fire district must be coextensive with the boundaries of
the city. Territory annexed to a city after a municipal fire district
is formed becomes territory of the municipal fire district as of the
date the annexation becomes effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A city may initiate the formation of a
municipal fire district by convening a municipal fire district planning
committee.
(2) A municipal fire district planning committee is comprised of at
least three elected officials of the city, one representative of each
bargaining unit that would be affected by the establishment of a
municipal fire district, and two voters of the proposed municipal fire
district as agreed upon by the legislative authority of the city and
the represented collective bargaining units.
(3) At its first meeting, a municipal fire district planning
committee may elect officers and provide for the adoption of rules and
other operating procedures.
(4) A municipal fire district planning committee may dissolve
itself at any time by a majority vote of the total membership of the
planning committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A municipal fire district planning
committee shall adopt a municipal fire district service plan that:
(a) Proposes the formation of a municipal fire district and
recommends the design, financing, and development of fire protection
and emergency service facilities and operations, including maintenance
and preservation of facilities or systems;
(b) Recommends sources of revenue authorized under section 5 of
this act;
(c) Identifies the portions of the plan that may be amended by the
board without voter approval;
(d) Recommends a financing plan to fund selected fire protection
and emergency services and projects;
(e) Defines the composition of the board and provides for the
election of municipal fire district commissioners; and
(f) Identifies a date no more than three hundred sixty-five days
after the date of the election when the formation of the district is
effective.
(2) Within ten days after the date the municipal fire district
planning committee adopts the municipal fire district service plan, the
plan must be forwarded to the legislative authority of the city to
initiate the election process under section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A municipal fire district planning
committee may, as part of a municipal fire district service plan,
recommend the imposition of some or all of the following revenue
sources that a district may impose upon approval of the voters as
provided in this chapter:
(a) Benefit charges under sections 14 through 20 of this act;
(b) Property taxes under sections 11 and 12 of this act and RCW
84.09.030, 84.52.010, 82.52.044, 84.52.052, and 84.52.069; or
(c) Both (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(2) A municipal fire district may impose taxes and benefit charges
as set forth in its plan upon formation of the district, or as provided
for in this chapter after formation of the district. If the plan
authorizes the district to impose benefit charges or sixty percent
voter-approved taxes, the plan and formation of the district must be
approved by an affirmative vote of sixty percent of the voters within
the boundaries of the district voting on a ballot proposition as set
forth in section 6 of this act. However, if the plan provides for
alternative sources of revenue that become effective if the plan and
creation of the district is approved only by a majority vote, the plan
with alternative sources of revenue and creation of the district may be
approved by an affirmative vote of the majority of those voters. If
the plan does not authorize the district to impose benefit charges or
sixty percent voter-approved taxes, the plan and formation of the
district must be approved by an affirmative vote of the majority of the
voters within the boundaries of the authority voting on a ballot
proposition as set forth in section 6 of this act. Except as provided
in this section, all other voter approval requirements under law for
the levying of property taxes or the imposition of benefit charges
apply. Revenues from these taxes and benefit charges may be used only
to implement the plan as set forth in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Upon receipt of the municipal fire district
service plan under section 4 of this act, the legislative authority of
a city may certify the plan to the ballot, including identification of
the revenue options specified to fund the plan. The legislative
authority may draft a ballot title, give notice as required by law for
ballot measures, and perform other duties as required to put the plan
before the voters of the proposed district for their approval or
rejection as a single ballot measure that both approves formation of
the district and approves the plan. The electorate is the voters
voting within the boundaries of the proposed municipal fire district.
A simple majority of the total persons voting on the single ballot
measure to approve the plan and establish the district is required for
approval. However, if the plan authorizes the district to impose
benefit charges or sixty percent voter-approved taxes, the plan and
formation of the district must be approved by an affirmative vote of
sixty percent of the voters within the boundaries of the district on a
single ballot measure in accordance with section 5 of this act. The
city is solely responsible for the cost of the election to approve the
single ballot measure approving the formation of the district and the
plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If the voters approve the single ballot
measure creating the municipal fire district and imposing taxes and
benefit charges, if any, the district is formed as of the formation
date identified in the municipal fire district service plan. The
appropriate county election officials shall, within fifteen days of the
final certification of the election results, publish a notice in a
newspaper or newspapers of general circulation in the municipal fire
district declaring the district formed. A party challenging the
procedure or the formation of a voter-approved district must file the
challenge in writing by serving the prosecuting attorney of the city
within thirty days after the final certification of the election.
Failure to challenge within that time bars further challenge of the
district's valid formation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The board may:
(1) Levy taxes and impose benefit charges as authorized in the
formation resolution and approved by district voters;
(2) Enter into agreements with federal, state, local, and regional
entities and departments as necessary to accomplish district purposes
and protect the district's investments;
(3) Accept gifts, grants, or other contributions of funds that will
support the purposes and programs of the district;
(4) Monitor and audit the progress and execution of fire protection
and emergency service projects to protect the investment of the public
and annually make public its findings;
(5) Pay for services and enter into leases and contracts, including
professional service contracts; and
(6) Hire, manage, and terminate employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Except as otherwise provided in the
municipal fire district service plan, all powers, duties, and functions
of the city pertaining to fire protection and emergency services must
be transferred to the district on its formation date.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in the municipal fire district
service plan, on the formation date of the municipal fire district:
Custody of all reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the city's existing
fire department pertaining to fire protection and emergency services
powers, functions, and duties must be transferred to the municipal fire
district; ownership of all real property and personal property,
including cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and
other tangible property employed by the city's existing fire department
in carrying out the fire protection and emergency services powers,
functions, and duties, must be transferred to the municipal fire
district; and all funds, credits, or other assets held by the city in
connection with the fire protection and emergency services powers,
functions, and duties must be transferred and credited to the municipal
fire district.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in the municipal fire district
service plan, any appropriations made to the city for carrying out the
fire protection and emergency services powers, functions, and duties
must be transferred and credited to the municipal fire district.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in the municipal fire district
service plan, whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
legislative authority of the city must make a determination as to the
proper allocation.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in the municipal fire district
service plan, all rules and all pending business before the city
pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred must be
continued and acted upon by the municipal fire district, and all
existing contracts and obligations remain in full force and must be
performed by the municipal fire district.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the city does not affect the validity of any act performed before
creation of the municipal fire district.
(5)(a) Subject to (c) of this subsection, all employees of the
city's existing fire department are transferred to the jurisdiction of
the municipal fire district on its formation date. Upon transfer,
unless an agreement for different terms of transfer is reached between
the collective bargaining representatives of the transferring employees
and the municipal fire district, an employee is entitled to the
employee's rights, benefits, and privileges to which he or she would
have been entitled as an employee of the city, including the right to:
(i) Compensation at least equal to the level at the time of
transfer;
(ii) Retirement, vacation, sick leave, and any other accrued
benefit;
(iii) Promotion and service time accrual; and
(iv) The length or terms of probationary periods, including no
requirement for an additional probationary period if one had been
completed before the transfer date.
(b) If the city provides for civil service in its existing
municipal fire department, the successor municipal fire district must
provide for civil service in the district. If the city does not
provide for civil service in its existing municipal fire department,
the successor municipal fire district may provide for civil service in
the district.
(c) Upon formation, a municipal fire district is deemed to be the
legal successor to the city for all collective bargaining agreements in
place between the city and an existing collective bargaining unit
pertaining to the provision of fire prevention services, fire
suppression services, and emergency medical services, and for the
protection of life and property within the municipal fire district.
This section may not be construed to alter any existing collective
bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining
agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining unit
has been modified as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) A municipal fire district may incur
general indebtedness for district purposes, issue bonds, notes, or
other evidences of indebtedness not to exceed an amount, together with
any outstanding nonvoter-approved general obligation debt, equal to
three-fourths of one percent of the value of the taxable property
within the district. The maximum term of the obligations may not
exceed twenty years. The obligations may pledge benefit charges and
may pledge payments to a district from the state, the federal
government, or any fire protection jurisdiction under an interlocal
contract. The interlocal contracts pledging revenues and taxes are
binding for a term not to exceed twenty-five years, and taxes or other
revenue pledged by an interlocal contract may not be eliminated or
modified if it would impair the pledge of the contract.
(2) A municipal fire district may also issue general obligation
bonds for capital purposes not to exceed an amount, together with any
outstanding general obligation debt, equal to one and one-half percent
of the value of the taxable property within the district. The district
may provide for the retirement of the bonds by excess property tax
levies. The voters of the district must approve a proposition
authorizing the bonds and levies by an affirmative vote of three-fifths
of those voting on the proposition at an election. At the election,
the total number of persons voting must constitute not less than forty
percent of the voters in the district who voted at the last preceding
general state election. The maximum term of the bonds may not exceed
twenty-five years. Elections must be held as provided in RCW
39.36.050.
(3) Obligations of a district must be issued and sold in accordance
with chapters 39.46 and 39.50 RCW, as applicable.
(4) For purposes of this section, "value of the taxable property"
has the same meaning as in RCW 39.36.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) To carry out the purposes for which a
municipal fire district is created, as authorized in the plan and
approved by the voters, the board may annually levy the following
taxes:
(a) An ad valorem tax on all taxable property located within the
district not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value;
(b) An ad valorem tax on all property located within the district
not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value and
which will not cause the combined levies to exceed the constitutional
or statutory limitations. This levy, or any portion of this levy, may
also be made when dollar rates of other taxing units are released by
agreement with the other taxing units from their authorized levies; and
(c) An ad valorem tax on all taxable property located within the
district not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value if the district has at least one full-time, paid employee or
contracts with another municipal corporation for the services of at
least one full-time, paid employee. This levy may be made only if it
will not affect dollar rates that other taxing districts may lawfully
claim nor cause the combined levies to exceed the constitutional or
statutory limitations or both.
(2) Levies in excess of the amounts provided in subsection (1) of
this section or in excess of the aggregate dollar rate limitations, or
both, may be made for any district purpose when authorized at a special
election under RCW 84.52.052. Any such tax when levied must be
certified to the proper county officials for the collection of the tax
as for other general taxes. The taxes when collected must be placed in
the appropriate district fund or funds as provided by law, and must be
paid out on warrants of the auditor of the county in which the district
is located, upon authorization of the board.
(3) A municipal fire district may provide for the retirement of
general indebtedness by excess property tax levies as set forth in
section 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 At the time of making general tax levies in
each year, the county legislative authority in which a municipal fire
district is located shall make the required levies for district
purposes against the real and personal property in the district in
accordance with the equalized valuations of the property for general
tax purposes and as a part of the general taxes. The tax levies are
part of the general tax roll and must be collected as part of the
general taxes against the property in the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The county treasurer of the county in which
the municipal fire district created under this chapter is located shall
collect taxes authorized and levied under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) The board may by resolution, as
authorized in the plan and approved by the voters, for district
purposes authorized by law, fix and impose a benefit charge on personal
property and improvements to real property located within the district
on the date specified and that have received or will receive the
benefits provided by the district, to be paid by the owners of the
properties. A benefit charge does not apply to personal property and
improvements to real property owned or used by any recognized religious
denomination or religious organization as, or including, a sanctuary or
for purposes related to the bona fide religious ministries of the
denomination or religious organization, including schools and
educational facilities used for kindergarten, primary, or secondary
educational purposes or for institutions of higher education and all
grounds and buildings related to such facilities and institutions.
However, a benefit charge does apply to personal property and
improvements to real property owned or used by any recognized religious
denomination or religious organization for business operations, profit-making enterprises, or activities not including the use of a sanctuary
or related to kindergarten, primary, or secondary educational purposes
or for institutions of higher education. The aggregate amount of these
benefit charges in any one year may not exceed an amount equal to sixty
percent of the operating budget for the year in which the benefit
charge is to be collected. The county legislative authority in the
county in which the municipal fire district is located shall make any
necessary adjustments to assure compliance with this limitation and
immediately notify the board of any changes.
(2) A benefit charge imposed must be reasonably proportioned to the
measurable benefits to property resulting from the services afforded by
the district. It is acceptable to apportion the benefit charge to the
values of the properties as found by the county assessor modified
generally in the proportion that fire insurance rates are reduced or
entitled to be reduced as the result of providing the services. Any
other method that reasonably apportions the benefit charges to the
actual benefits resulting from the degree of protection, which may
include, but is not limited to, the distance from regularly maintained
fire protection equipment, the level of fire prevention services
provided to the properties, or the need of the properties for
specialized services, may be specified in the resolution and is subject
to contest on the grounds of unreasonable or capricious action or
action in excess of the measurable benefits to the property resulting
from services afforded by the authority. The board may determine that
certain properties or types or classes of properties are not receiving
measurable benefits based on criteria the board establishes by
resolution. A benefit charge authorized under this chapter is not
applicable to the personal property or improvements to real property of
any individual, corporation, partnership, firm, organization, or
association maintaining a fire department and whose fire protection and
training system has been accepted by a fire insurance underwriter
maintaining a fire protection engineering and inspection service
authorized by the state insurance commissioner to do business in this
state, but the property may be protected by the district under a
contractual agreement.
(3) For administrative purposes, the benefit charge imposed on any
individual property may be compiled into a single charge, provided that
the district, upon request of the property owner, provide an itemized
list of charges for each measurable benefit included in the charge.
(4) For the purposes of this section and sections 15 through 21 of
this act:
(a) "Improvements to real property" does not include permanent
growing crops, field improvements installed for the purpose of aiding
the growth of permanent crops, or other field improvements normally not
subject to damage by fire.
(b) "Personal property" includes every form of tangible personal
property including, but not limited to, all goods, chattels, stock in
trade, estates, or crops. "Personal property" does not include any
personal property used for farming, field crops, farm equipment, or
livestock.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 All personal property not assessed and
subjected to ad valorem taxation under Title 84 RCW, all property under
contract or for which the municipal fire district is receiving payment
for as authorized by law, all property subject to chapter 54.28 RCW,
and all property that is subject to a contract for services with a
district is exempt from a benefit charge imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) The resolution establishing benefit
charges as specified in section 14 of this act must specify, by legal
geographical areas or other specific designations, the charge to apply
to each property by location, type, or other designation, or other
information that is necessary to the proper computation of the benefit
charge to be charged to each property owner subject to the resolution.
(2) The county assessor of each county in which the municipal fire
district is located shall determine and identify the personal
properties and improvements to real property that are subject to a
benefit charge in each district and shall furnish and deliver to the
county treasurer of that county a listing of the properties with
information describing the location, legal description, and address of
the person to whom the statement of benefit charges is to be mailed,
the name of the owner, and the value of the property and improvements,
together with the benefit charge to apply to each. These benefit
charges must be certified to the county treasurer for collection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Each municipal fire district shall
contract, prior to the imposition of a benefit charge, for the
administration and collection of the benefit charge by the county
treasurer of the county in which the district is located who shall
deduct a percentage as provided by contract to reimburse the county for
expenses incurred by the county assessor and county treasurer in the
administration of the resolution under section 14 of this act and this
chapter. The county treasurer shall make distributions each year, as
the charges are collected, in the amount of the benefit charges imposed
on behalf of each district, less the deduction provided for in the
contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) Any benefit charge authorized under
this chapter is not effective unless a proposition to impose the
benefit charge is approved by a sixty percent majority of the voters of
the municipal fire district voting at a general election or at a
special election called by the district for that purpose held within
the district. A ballot measure that contains an authorization to
impose benefit charges and that is approved by the voters pursuant to
section 6 of this act meets the proposition approval requirement of
this section. An election held under this section must be held not
more than twelve months prior to the date on which the first charge is
to be assessed. A benefit charge approved at an election expires in
six years or fewer as authorized by the voters, unless subsequently
reapproved by the voters.
(2) The ballot must be submitted so as to enable the voters
favoring the authorization of a municipal fire district benefit charge
to vote "Yes" and those opposed to vote "No." The ballot question is
as follows:

"Shall. . . . . the municipal fire district having a
coextensive boundary with (insert city, code city, or town) be
authorized to impose benefit charges each year
for. . . . . . . . (insert number of years not to exceed six)
years, not to exceed an amount equal to sixty percent of its
operating budget, and be prohibited from imposing an additional
property tax under section 11(1)(c) of this act?

Yes . . . . . . . . . . . .

No . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(3) A municipal fire district renewing the benefit charge may elect
to use the following alternative ballot:

"Shall . . . . . the municipal fire district having
a coextensive boundary with (insert city, code city, or town)
be authorized to continue voter-authorized benefit charges each
year for . . . . . . . . (insert number of years not to exceed
six) years, not to exceed an amount equal to sixty percent of
its operating budget, and be prohibited from imposing an
additional property tax under section 11(1)(c) of this act?

Yes . . . . . . . . . . . .

No . . . . . . . . . . . . "

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) Not fewer than ten days nor more than
six months before the election at which the proposition to impose the
benefit charge is submitted as provided in this chapter, the board
shall hold a public hearing specifically setting forth its proposal to
impose benefit charges for the support of its legally authorized
activities that will maintain or improve the services afforded in the
district. A report of the public hearing must be filed with the county
treasurer of the county in which the property is located and be
available for public inspection.
(2) Prior to November 15th of each year, the board shall hold a
public hearing to review and establish the municipal fire district
benefit charges for the subsequent year.
(3) All resolutions imposing or changing the benefit charges must
be filed with the county treasurer of the county in which the property
is located, together with the record of each public hearing, before
November 30th immediately preceding the year in which the benefit
charges are to be collected on behalf of the district.
(4) After the benefit charges have been established, the owners of
the property subject to the charge must be notified of the amount of
the charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 After notice has been given to the property
owners of the amount of the charge, the board imposing a benefit charge
under this chapter shall form a review board for at least a two-week
period and shall, upon complaint in writing of an aggrieved party
owning property in the district, reduce the charge of a person who, in
the review board's opinion, has been charged too large a sum to a sum
or amount as the review board believes to be the true, fair, and just
amount.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A person who is receiving the exemption
contained in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 is exempt from any legal
obligation to pay a portion of the benefit charge imposed under this
chapter as follows:
(1) A person who meets the income limitation contained in RCW
84.36.381(5)(a) and does not meet the income limitation contained in
RCW 84.36.381(5)(b) (i) or (ii) is exempt from twenty-five percent of
the charge;
(2) A person who meets the income limitation contained in RCW
84.36.381(5)(b)(i) is exempt from fifty percent of the charge; and
(3) A person who meets the income limitation contained in RCW
84.36.381(5)(b)(ii) is exempt from seventy-five percent of the charge.

Sec. 22 RCW 52.26.020 and 2011 c 141 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the governing body of a regional fire protection
service authority.
(2) "Elected official" means an elected official of a participating
fire protection jurisdiction or a regional fire protection district
commissioner created under RCW 52.26.080.
(3) "Fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire district, city,
town, port district, municipal airport, municipal fire district, or
Indian tribe.
(4) "Participating fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire
protection jurisdiction participating in the formation or operation of
a regional fire protection service authority.
(5) "Regional fire protection service authority" or "authority"
means a municipal corporation, an independent taxing authority within
the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a
taxing district within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution, whose boundaries are coextensive with two or more
adjacent fire protection jurisdictions and that has been created by a
vote of the people under this chapter to implement a regional fire
protection service authority plan.
(6) "Regional fire protection service authority plan" or "plan"
means a plan to develop and finance a fire protection service authority
project or projects, including, but not limited to, specific capital
projects, fire operations and emergency service operations pursuant to
RCW 52.26.040(3)(b), and preservation and maintenance of existing or
future facilities.
(7) "Regional fire protection service authority planning committee"
or "planning committee" means the advisory committee created under RCW
52.26.030 to create and propose to fire protection jurisdictions a
regional fire protection service authority plan to design, finance, and
develop fire protection and emergency service projects.
(8) "Regular property taxes" has the same meaning as in RCW
84.04.140.

Sec. 23 RCW 52.33.010 and 2005 c 376 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature intends for fire protection districts, municipal
fire districts, and regional fire (([protection])) protection service
authorities to set standards for addressing the reporting and
accountability of substantially career fire departments, and to specify
performance measures applicable to response time objectives for certain
major services. The legislature acknowledges the efforts of the
international city/county management association, the international
association of fire chiefs, and the national fire protection
association for the organization and deployment of resources for fire
departments. The arrival of first responders with automatic external
defibrillator capability before the onset of brain death, and the
arrival of adequate fire suppression resources before flash-over is a
critical event during the mitigation of an emergency, and is in the
public's best interest. For these reasons, this chapter contains
performance measures, comparable to that research, relating to the
organization and deployment of fire suppression operations, emergency
medical operations, and special operations by substantially career fire
departments. This chapter does not, and is not intended to, in any way
modify or limit the authority of fire protection districts, municipal
fire districts, and regional fire protection service authorities to set
levels of service.

Sec. 24 RCW 52.33.020 and 2005 c 376 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advanced life support" means functional provision of advanced
airway management, including intubation, advanced cardiac monitoring,
manual defibrillation, establishment and maintenance of intravenous
access, and drug therapy.
(2) "Aircraft rescue and firefighting" means the firefighting
actions taken to rescue persons and to control or extinguish fire
involving or adjacent to aircraft on the ground.
(3) "Brain death" as defined by the American heart association
means the irreversible death of brain cells that begins four to six
minutes after cardiac arrest.
(4) "Fire department" means a fire protection district, a municipal
fire district, or a regional fire protection service authority
responsible for firefighting actions, emergency medical services, and
other special operations in a specified geographic area. The
department must be a substantially career fire department, and not a
substantially volunteer fire department.
(5) "Fire suppression" means the activities involved in controlling
and extinguishing fires.
(6) "First responder" means provision of initial assessment and
basic first-aid intervention, including cardiac pulmonary resuscitation
and automatic external defibrillator capability.
(7) "Flash-over" as defined by national institute of standards and
technology means when all combustibles in a room burst into flame and
the fire spreads rapidly.
(8) "Marine rescue and firefighting" means the firefighting actions
taken to prevent, control, or extinguish fire involved in or adjacent
to a marine vessel and the rescue actions for occupants using normal
and emergency routes for egress.
(9) "Response time" means the time immediately following the
turnout time that begins when units are en route to the emergency
incident and ends when units arrive at the scene.
(10) "Special operations" means those emergency incidents to which
the fire department responds that require specific and advanced
training and specialized tools and equipment.
(11) "Turnout time" means the time beginning when units receive
notification of the emergency to the beginning point of response time.

Sec. 25 RCW 52.33.030 and 2005 c 376 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every fire protection district, municipal fire district, and
regional fire protection service authority shall maintain a written
statement or policy that establishes the following:
(a) The existence of a fire department;
(b) Services that the fire department is required to provide;
(c) The basic organizational structure of the fire department;
(d) The expected number of fire department employees; and
(e) Functions that fire department employees are expected to
perform.
(2) Every fire protection district, municipal fire district, and
regional fire protection service authority shall include service
delivery objectives in the written statement or policy required under
subsection (1) of this section. These objectives shall include
specific response time objectives for the following major service
components, if appropriate:
(a) Fire suppression;
(b) Emergency medical services;
(c) Special operations;
(d) Aircraft rescue and firefighting;
(e) Marine rescue and firefighting; and
(f) Wild land firefighting.
(3) Every fire protection district, municipal fire district, and
regional fire protection service authority, in order to measure the
ability to arrive and begin mitigation operations before the critical
events of brain death or flash-over, shall establish time objectives
for the following measurements:
(a) Turnout time;
(b) Response time for the arrival of the first arriving engine
company at a fire suppression incident and response time for the
deployment of a full first alarm assignment at a fire suppression
incident;
(c) Response time for the arrival of a unit with first responder or
higher level capability at an emergency medical incident; and
(d) Response time for the arrival of an advanced life support unit
at an emergency medical incident, where this service is provided by the
fire department.
(4) Every fire protection district, municipal fire district, and
regional fire protection service authority shall also establish a
performance objective of not less than ninety percent for the
achievement of each response time objective established under
subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 26 RCW 52.33.040 and 2005 c 376 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every fire protection district, municipal fire district, and
regional fire protection service authority shall evaluate its level of
service and deployment delivery and response time objectives on an
annual basis. The evaluations shall be based on data relating to level
of service, deployment, and the achievement of each response time
objective in each geographic area within the jurisdiction of the fire
protection district and regional fire protection service authority.
(2) Beginning in 2007, every fire protection district, municipal
fire district, and regional fire protection service authority shall
issue an annual written report which shall be based on the annual
evaluations required by subsection (1) of this section.
(a) The annual report shall define the geographic areas and
circumstances in which the requirements of this standard are not being
met.
(b) The annual report shall explain the predictable consequences of
any deficiencies and address the steps that are necessary to achieve
compliance.

Sec. 27 RCW 84.52.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 28 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes must be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
(2) The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes,
and purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, must be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county must be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
(3) When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax
levy on any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in
RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either
of these sections, the assessor must recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(a) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
road district, and city or town purposes must be extended on the tax
rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law;
however any state levy takes precedence over all other levies and may
not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 36.54.130,
84.34.230, 84.52.069, 84.52.105, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120,
84.52.125, 84.52.135, 84.52.140, and the protected portion of the levy
under RCW 86.15.160 by flood control zone districts in a county with a
population of seven hundred seventy-five thousand or more that are
coextensive with a county, the combined rate of regular property tax
levies that are subject to the one percent limitation exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, then these levies
must be reduced as follows:
(i) The portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that
has a population of less than one hundred fifty thousand and is located
in a county with a population of one million five hundred thousand or
more that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 must be reduced until the
combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value
of any property or must be eliminated;
(ii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the protected portion of the levy
imposed under RCW 86.15.160 by a flood control zone district in a
county with a population of seven hundred seventy-five thousand or more
that is coextensive with a county must be reduced until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or must be eliminated;
(iii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under
RCW 84.52.140 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(iv) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a fire
protection district that is protected under RCW 84.52.125 must be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;
(v) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under
RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(vi) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry
district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or must be eliminated;
(vii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district with a population of one hundred fifty
thousand or more that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 must be reduced
until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or must be eliminated;
(viii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value, must be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or must be eliminated; and
(ix) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 must
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated.
(b) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property must be
reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of
taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(i) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(ii) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts other than the portion of a levy protected under RCW
84.52.815 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(iii) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire
protection service authorities, library districts, the first fifty cent
per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park
districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for public hospital districts, must be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;
(iv) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(v) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 ((and)),
regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b)
and (c), and municipal fire districts under section 11(1) (b) and (c)
of this act must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and
(vi) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection
service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), municipal fire districts
under section 11(1)(a) of this act, library districts, metropolitan
park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their first fifty
cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public
hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation levy, must be reduced on a pro rata basis or
eliminated.

Sec. 28 RCW 84.52.010 and 2009 c 551 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and
purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on
any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW
84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either of
these sections, the assessor shall recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(1) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
road district, and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax
rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law;
however any state levy shall take precedence over all other levies and
shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 36.54.130,
84.34.230, 84.52.069, 84.52.105, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120,
84.52.125, 84.52.135, and 84.52.140, the combined rate of regular
property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then
these levies shall be reduced as follows:
(a) The levy imposed by a county under RCW 84.52.140 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(b) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a fire
protection district that is protected under RCW 84.52.125 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(c) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under
RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(d) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry
district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or must be eliminated;
(e) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(f) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; and
(g) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or eliminated.
(2) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be
reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of
taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(a) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(b) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(c) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire
protection service authorities, library districts, the first fifty cent
per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park
districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for public hospital districts, shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;
(d) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(e) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 ((and)),
regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b)
and (c), and municipal fire districts under section 11(1) (b) and (c)
of this act shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and
(f) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection
service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), municipal fire districts
under section 11(1)(a) of this act, library districts, metropolitan
park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their first fifty
cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public
hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or
eliminated.

Sec. 29 RCW 84.52.052 and 2004 c 129 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
The limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and RCW
84.52.043 shall not prevent the levy of additional taxes by any taxing
district, except school districts and fire protection districts, in
which a larger levy is necessary in order to prevent the impairment of
the obligation of contracts. As used in this section, the term "taxing
district" means any county, metropolitan park district, park and
recreation service area, park and recreation district, water-sewer
district, solid waste disposal district, public facilities district,
flood control zone district, county rail district, service district,
public hospital district, road district, rural county library district,
island library district, rural partial-county library district,
intercounty rural library district, cemetery district, city, town,
transportation benefit district, emergency medical service district
with a population density of less than one thousand per square mile,
cultural arts, stadium, and convention district, ferry district, city
transportation authority, municipal fire district, or regional fire
protection service authority.
Any such taxing district may levy taxes at a rate in excess of the
rate specified in RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056 and 84.52.043, or
84.55.010 through 84.55.050, when authorized so to do by the voters of
such taxing district in the manner set forth in Article VII, section
2(a) of the Constitution of this state at a special or general election
to be held in the year in which the levy is made.
A special election may be called and the time therefor fixed by the
county legislative authority, or council, board of commissioners, or
other governing body of any such taxing district, by giving notice
thereof by publication in the manner provided by law for giving notices
of general elections, at which special election the proposition
authorizing such excess levy shall be submitted in such form as to
enable the voters favoring the proposition to vote "yes" and those
opposed thereto to vote "no."

Sec. 30 RCW 84.52.069 and 2011 c 365 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "taxing district" means a county,
emergency medical service district, city or town, public hospital
district, urban emergency medical service district, regional fire
protection service authority, municipal fire district, or fire
protection district.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, a taxing
district may impose additional regular property tax levies in an amount
equal to fifty cents or less per thousand dollars of the assessed value
of property in the taxing district. The tax shall be imposed (a) each
year for six consecutive years, (b) each year for ten consecutive
years, or (c) permanently. A tax levy under this section must be
specifically authorized by a majority of at least three-fifths of the
registered voters thereof approving a proposition authorizing the
levies submitted at a general or special election, at which election
the number of persons voting "yes" on the proposition shall constitute
three-fifths of a number equal to forty percent of the total number of
voters voting in such taxing district at the last preceding general
election when the number of registered voters voting on the proposition
does not exceed forty percent of the total number of voters voting in
such taxing district in the last preceding general election; or by a
majority of at least three-fifths of the registered voters thereof
voting on the proposition when the number of registered voters voting
on the proposition exceeds forty percent of the total number of voters
voting in such taxing district in the last preceding general election.
Ballot propositions must conform with RCW 29A.36.210. A taxing
district may not submit to the voters at the same election multiple
propositions to impose a levy under this section.
(3) A taxing district imposing a permanent levy under this section
shall provide for separate accounting of expenditures of the revenues
generated by the levy. The taxing district must maintain a statement
of the accounting which must be updated at least every two years and
must be available to the public upon request at no charge.
(4)(a) A taxing district imposing a permanent levy under this
section must provide for a referendum procedure to apply to the
ordinance or resolution imposing the tax. This referendum procedure
must specify that a referendum petition may be filed at any time with
a filing officer, as identified in the ordinance or resolution. Within
ten days, the filing officer must confer with the petitioner concerning
form and style of the petition, issue the petition an identification
number, and secure an accurate, concise, and positive ballot title from
the designated local official. The petitioner has thirty days in which
to secure the signatures of not less than fifteen percent of the
registered voters of the taxing district, as of the last general
election, upon petition forms which contain the ballot title and the
full text of the measure to be referred. The filing officer must
verify the sufficiency of the signatures on the petition and, if
sufficient valid signatures are properly submitted, must certify the
referendum measure to the next election within the taxing district if
one is to be held within one hundred eighty days from the date of
filing of the referendum petition, or at a special election to be
called for that purpose in accordance with RCW 29A.04.330.
(b) The referendum procedure provided in this subsection (4) is
exclusive in all instances for any taxing district imposing the tax
under this section and supersedes the procedures provided under all
other statutory or charter provisions for initiative or referendum
which might otherwise apply.
(5) Any tax imposed under this section may be used only for the
provision of emergency medical care or emergency medical services,
including related personnel costs, training for such personnel, and
related equipment, supplies, vehicles and structures needed for the
provision of emergency medical care or emergency medical services.
(6) If a county levies a tax under this section, no taxing district
within the county may levy a tax under this section. If a regional
fire protection service authority imposes a tax under this section, no
other taxing district that is a participating fire protection
jurisdiction in the regional fire protection service authority may levy
a tax under this section. No other taxing district may levy a tax
under this section if another taxing district has levied a tax under
this section within its boundaries: PROVIDED, That if a county levies
less than fifty cents per thousand dollars of the assessed value of
property, then any other taxing district may levy a tax under this
section equal to the difference between the rate of the levy by the
county and fifty cents: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if a taxing district
within a county levies this tax, and the voters of the county
subsequently approve a levying of this tax, then the amount of the
taxing district levy within the county must be reduced, when the
combined levies exceed fifty cents. Whenever a tax is levied
countywide, the service must, insofar as is feasible, be provided
throughout the county: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no countywide levy
proposal may be placed on the ballot without the approval of the
legislative authority of each city exceeding fifty thousand population
within the county: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section and RCW
36.32.480 shall not prohibit any city or town from levying an annual
excess levy to fund emergency medical services: AND PROVIDED, FURTHER,
That if a county proposes to impose tax levies under this section, no
other ballot proposition authorizing tax levies under this section by
another taxing district in the county may be placed before the voters
at the same election at which the county ballot proposition is placed:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That any taxing district emergency medical
service levy that is limited in duration and that is authorized
subsequent to a county emergency medical service levy that is limited
in duration, expires concurrently with the county emergency medical
service levy. A fire protection district that has annexed an area
described in subsection (10) of this section may levy the maximum
amount of tax that would otherwise be allowed, notwithstanding any
limitations in this subsection (6).
(7) The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 do not apply to the tax levy
authorized in this section.
(8) If a ballot proposition approved under subsection (2) of this
section did not impose the maximum allowable levy amount authorized for
the taxing district under this section, any future increase up to the
maximum allowable levy amount must be specifically authorized by the
voters in accordance with subsection (2) of this section at a general
or special election.
(9) The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to the first
levy imposed pursuant to this section following the approval of such
levy by the voters pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
(10) For purposes of imposing the tax authorized under this
section, the boundary of a county with a population greater than one
million five hundred thousand does not include all of the area of the
county that is located within a city that has a boundary in two
counties, if the locally assessed value of all the property in the area
of the city within the county having a population greater than one
million five hundred thousand is less than two hundred fifty million
dollars.
(11) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire protection
district, city, town, Indian tribe, or port district; and
(b) "Participating fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire
protection district, city, town, Indian tribe, or port district that is
represented on the governing board of a regional fire protection
service authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 Sections 1 through 21 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 52 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 Section 27 of this act expires January 1,
2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 Section 28 of this act takes effect January
1, 2018.

--- END ---