BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.155 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that while local governments are
responsible for creating, developing, managing, financing, operating,
and maintaining local infrastructure systems, state priority policy
objectives are served by investing financial and technical resources in
these local systems. A significant backlog of projects to repair and
improve local public infrastructure systems exists. The state intends
to strategically invest resources to address this backlog and to
promote the following priority policy objectives:
(a) Preserving, enhancing, or achieving public health and safety;
(b) Protecting the state's environment;
(c) Promoting economic development;
(d) Encouraging well-managed local infrastructure systems; and
(e) Sustaining the state's infrastructure assistance capacity.
(2) It is the policy of the state of Washington to encourage self-reliance by local governments in meeting their public works needs, to
finance critical local public works projects, and to provide
infrastructure-related technical assistance to local governments.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.155.020 and 2009 c 565 s 33 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the public works board created in RCW 43.155.030.
(2) "Capital facility plan" means a capital facility plan required
by the growth management act under chapter 36.70A RCW or, for local
governments not fully planning under the growth management act, a plan
required by the public works board.
(3) "Contingent loan agreement" means an agreement between the
state and a traditional eligible jurisdiction or a nontraditional
eligible jurisdiction in which the state provides an absolute and
unconditional commitment to make a loan to a traditional eligible
jurisdiction or a nontraditional eligible jurisdiction from the public
works assistance account in order to enhance the credit of the
borrower.
(4) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(((4) "Financing guarantees" means the pledge of money in the
public works assistance account, or money to be received by the public
works assistance account, to the repayment of all or a portion of the
principal of or interest on obligations issued by local governments to
finance public works projects.))
(5) "Director" means the director of the department.
(6) "Emergency" means a public works project made necessary by a
natural disaster or an immediate and emergent threat to the public
health and safety due to unforeseen or unavoidable circumstances as
evidenced by a local government declaration.
(7) "Financial assistance" means loans, contingent loan agreements,
and forgivable loans.
(8) "Forgivable loan" means a loan for which a portion of the
principal and interest may be forgiven upon meeting certain criteria
and contract loan provisions.
(9) "Local government((s))" ((means cities, towns, counties,
special purpose districts, and any other municipal corporations or
quasi-municipal corporations in the state excluding school districts
and port districts)) means every city, county, town, port district,
district, or other public agency authorized by law to require the
execution of public work.
(((6) "Public works project" means a project of a local government
for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets and roads,
bridges, water systems, or storm and sanitary sewage systems and solid
waste facilities, including recycling facilities. A planning project
may include the compilation of biological, hydrological, or other data
on a county, drainage basin, or region necessary to develop a base of
information for a capital facility plan.
(7) "Solid waste or recycling project" means remedial actions
necessary to bring abandoned or closed landfills into compliance with
regulatory requirements and the repair, restoration, and replacement of
existing solid waste transfer, recycling facilities, and landfill
projects limited to the opening of landfill cells that are in existing
and permitted landfills.
(8) "Technical assistance" means training and other services
provided to local governments to: (a) Help such local governments
plan, apply, and qualify for loans and financing guarantees from the
board, and (b) help local governments improve their ability to plan
for, finance, acquire, construct, repair, replace, rehabilitate, and
maintain public facilities.))
(10) "Nontraditional jurisdiction" means port districts.
(11) "Nontraditional project" means any local government
infrastructure project included in its adopted capital facilities plan
or equivalent that does not meet the definition of traditional project,
and excludes rolling stock.
(12) "Nontraditional system" means telecommunications, energy,
flood levees, public buildings and facilities, rail, criminal justice
facilities, and parks and recreation facilities.
(13) "Planning project" means the process through which a
jurisdiction creates and adopts a capital facilities plan, a system
plan, or equivalent.
(14) "Policy objectives" means state priorities that guide the
investment of public works assistance account funds and are composed of
the following:
(a) Preservation, enhancement, or achievement of public health and
safety;
(b) Protection of the state's environment;
(c) Promotion of economic development;
(d) Encouraging well-managed local infrastructure systems; and
(e) Sustaining the state infrastructure assistance network.
(15) "Preconstruction" means activities including but not limited
to project planning, design, engineering, bid document preparation,
environmental studies, right-of-way acquisition, and other
nonconstruction preliminary phases of public works projects as
determined by the board.
(16) "Public works project" means a nontraditional or traditional
project.
(17) "Technical assistance" means training and other services
provided to local governments to:
(a) Plan, apply, and qualify for financial assistance;
(b) Improve their ability to plan for, finance, acquire, construct,
reconstruct, and maintain infrastructure systems; and
(c) Improve their capacity to manage and operate their
infrastructure systems in a manner consistent with long-term
sustainability.
(18) "Traditional eligible jurisdictions" means counties, cities,
towns, special purpose districts, and any other municipal or quasi-municipal corporations excluding school districts and port districts.
(19) "Traditional eligible systems" means drinking water systems,
sanitary sewer systems, storm water systems, solid waste/recycling
systems, bridges, and roadways.
(20) "Traditional project" means a project listed in a local
government's capital facilities plan or equivalent that results in the
planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of a traditional eligible
system and excludes rolling stock.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.155.030 and 1999 c 153 s 58 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The public works board is hereby created.
(2) The board shall be composed of thirteen members appointed by
the governor for terms of four years((, except that five members
initially shall be appointed for terms of two years)). The board shall
include: (a) Three members, two of whom shall be elected officials and
one shall be ((a public works manager)) an appointed official,
appointed from a list of ((at least six)) persons nominated by the
association of Washington cities or its successor; (b) three members,
two of whom shall be elected officials and one shall be ((a public
works manager)) an appointed official, appointed from a list of ((at
least six)) persons nominated by the Washington state association of
counties or its successor; (c) ((three members appointed from a list of
at least six persons nominated jointly by the Washington public utility
districts association and a state association of water-sewer districts,
or their successors; and (d))) one member appointed from a list of
persons nominated by the Washington public utility districts
association or its successor; (d) two members appointed from a list of
persons nominated by the state association of water-sewer districts or
its successor; and (e) four members appointed from the general public.
In appointing the four general public members, the governor shall
endeavor to balance the geographical composition of the board and to
include members with special expertise in relevant fields such as
public finance, architecture and civil engineering, and public works
construction. The governor shall appoint one of the general public
members of the board as chair. The term of the chair shall coincide
with the term of the governor.
(3) ((Staff support to the board shall be provided by the
department.
(4))) Members of the board shall receive no compensation but shall
be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(((5))) (4) If a vacancy on the board occurs by death, resignation,
or otherwise, the governor shall fill the vacant position for the
unexpired term. Each vacancy in a position appointed from lists
provided by the associations under subsection (2) of this section shall
be filled from a list of ((at least three)) persons nominated by the
relevant association or associations. Any members of the board((,
appointive or otherwise,)) may be removed by the governor for cause in
accordance with RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.155 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to aid the financing of public works projects, the
board:
(a) May execute contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds
from the public works assistance account for projects approved for
funding by the board;
(b) Shall manage the public works assistance account in such a way
as to ensure its sustainability;
(c) May make low-interest, interest-free, or forgivable loans to
local governments for:
(i) Traditional and nontraditional projects;
(ii) Traditional and nontraditional preconstruction projects;
(iii) Capital facilities planning or equivalent;
(iv) Assisting local governments to pay all or a portion of the
principal of or interest on obligations issued to finance
infrastructure projects pursuant to contingent loan agreements;
(v) Emergency projects for traditional eligible jurisdictions in
traditional eligible systems; and
(vi) Investment grade efficiency audits;
(d) May require such terms and conditions and may charge such rates
of interest on its loans as it deems necessary or convenient to carry
out the purposes of this chapter. Money received from local
governments in repayment of loans made under this section must be paid
into the public works assistance account for uses consistent with this
chapter;
(e) May not refinance existing debt or financial obligations of
local governments;
(f) May coordinate with the Washington state treasurer, who, on
behalf of the state of Washington, may prescribe the terms of and enter
into a contingent loan agreement between the state and a local
government if the state treasurer determines that such a contingent
loan agreement is financially prudent and is consistent with the
provisions of this chapter. Contingent loan agreements may be entered
into by the state treasurer only with local governments whose limited
tax general obligations or senior revenue obligations, as applicable to
the obligations concerned, are rated not higher than A1 or A+ by at
least one of the nationally recognized rating agencies. The state's
obligation to make any loan to a local government pursuant to the terms
of a contingent loan agreement is subject to appropriation from the
public works assistance account. The office of the state treasurer may
charge a fee to local governments to recover the costs of creating the
contingent loan agreements; and
(g) May create such subaccounts in the public works assistance
account as the board deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.
(2) In order to provide for the state of Washington's obligations
under the terms of contingent loan agreements, the legislature must
make provision, from time to time in appropriations acts, for such
amounts as may be required to make timely payments from the public
works assistance account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.155 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall provide technical assistance to local governments
in accordance with board policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.155 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall:
(1) Beginning in June 2014 and every four years thereafter, provide
the governor and legislature with a comprehensive assessment of local
infrastructure needs and potential resources within the state to meet
those needs;
(2) In consultation with the office of the state treasurer,
recommend to the governor and the legislature the amount of resources
from the public works assistance account to be appropriated for
contingent loan agreements;
(3) Establish and maintain collaborative relations with
governmental, private, and other financing organizations, advocate
groups, and other stakeholders associated with infrastructure
financing;
(4) Provide information and advice to the governor and legislature
on matters related to local government infrastructure financing; and
(5) At the direction of the governor, provide information and
advocacy at the national level on matters related to local government
infrastructure financing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.155 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall:
(1) Consistent with the guidelines issued by the office of
financial management and in consultation with the department, prepare
biennial operating and capital budgets and, as needed, update these
budgets during the biennium;
(2) Accept or reject, from any state or federal agency, loans or
grants for the planning or financing of any public works project and
enter into agreements with any such agency concerning the loans or
grants;
(3) Accept or reject any gifts, grants, or loans of funds,
property, or financial or other aid in any form from any other source
on any terms and conditions that are not in conflict with this chapter;
(4) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter; and
(5) Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the
powers expressly granted or implied under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.155 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) In collaboration with the board, and in accordance with the
board's operating budget, provide staff to the board necessary to
efficiently and effectively carry out the duties of this chapter; and
(b) Submit the board's operating and capital budgets in accordance
with guidelines set by the office of financial management.
(2) The director shall:
(a) Be accountable to the board for operating and capital
expenditures from the account;
(b) Report to the board not less than quarterly; and
(c) Represent the interests and concerns of the board as a member
of the governor's executive cabinet.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.155.050 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 951 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans ((and to give financial
guarantees)), forgivable loans, and payments required under contingent
loan agreements to local governments for public works projects. Moneys
in the account may also be appropriated to provide for state match
requirements ((under federal law for projects and activities conducted
and financed by the board under the drinking water assistance account))
for federal programs.
(2) Not more than fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget
appropriation to the public works board from this account may be
((expended or)) obligated for preconstruction loans, emergency loans,
or loans for capital facility planning under this chapter; of this
amount, not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget
appropriation may be expended for emergency loans and not more than one
percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended
for capital facility planning loans. ((For the 2007-2009 biennium,
moneys in the account may be used for grants for projects identified in
section 138, chapter 488, Laws of 2005 and section 1033, chapter 520,
Laws of 2007. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, sums in the public
works assistance account may be used for the water pollution control
revolving fund program match in section 3013, chapter 36, Laws of 2010
1st sp. sess. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the job development fund to the general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.)) During the
2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the public
works assistance account to the general fund, the water pollution
control revolving account, and the drinking water assistance account
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.
(3) Not more than ten percent of the biennial capital budget
appropriation to the board from the public works assistance account may
be obligated by the board as forgivable loans for traditional projects.
Based on conditions set in rule by the board, the board may obligate
not more than fifty percent forgivable loan to any traditional project.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.155.070 and 2009 c 518 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To qualify for loans or pledges under this chapter the board
must determine that a local government meets all of the following
conditions:
(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46
RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;
(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility
plan; and
(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources
which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into
consideration local employment and economic factors.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 ((must have adopted a comprehensive plan,
including a capital facilities plan element, and development
regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not
require any county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to
adopt a comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting
or receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if such
request is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in
RCW 36.70A.040. A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040
which has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations
within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited
from receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if the
comprehensive plan and development regulations are adopted as required
by RCW 36.70A.040 before submitting a request for a loan or loan
guarantee)) may not receive financial assistance under this chapter
unless it has adopted a comprehensive plan, including a capital
facilities plan element, and development regulations as required by RCW
36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any county, city, or town
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a comprehensive plan or
development regulations before requesting or receiving financial
assistance under this chapter if such request is made before the
expiration of the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040. A county,
city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that has not adopted a
comprehensive plan and development regulations within the time periods
specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited from receiving financial
assistance under this chapter if the comprehensive plan and development
regulations are adopted as required by RCW 36.70A.040 before submitting
a request for financial assistance.
(3) In considering awarding ((loans)) financial assistance for
public facilities to special districts requesting funding for a
proposed facility located in a county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040, the board shall consider whether the county, city, or town
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the
proposed facility is located has adopted a comprehensive plan and
development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) ((The board shall develop a priority process for public works
projects as provided in this section. The intent of the priority
process is to maximize the value of public works projects accomplished
with assistance under this chapter. The board shall attempt to assure
a geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects. The board
shall consider at least the following factors in assigning a priority
to a project:
(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency public works needs;
(b) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.110, whether the
entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW
90.71.010;
(c) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(d) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(e) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007;
(f) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local
government and amount of loan money available;
(g) The number of communities served by or funding the project;
(h) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment,
compared to the average state unemployment;
(i) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement,
or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards, including the cost of
extending existing service to such a system;
(j) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.120, and
effective one calendar year following the development of model
evergreen community management plans and ordinances under RCW
35.105.050, whether the entity receiving assistance has been
recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the
evergreen community recognition program created in RCW 35.105.030;
(k) The relative benefit of the project to the community,
considering the present level of economic activity in the community and
the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in
communities that have low economic growth; and
(l) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(5) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments
shall not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government
applicant shall provide documentation of attempts to secure additional
local or other sources of funding for each public works project for
which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.
(6) Before November 1st of each even-numbered year, the board shall
develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate
and house of representatives a description of the loans made under RCW
43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section during the
preceding fiscal year and a prioritized list of projects which are
recommended for funding by the legislature, including one copy to the
staff of each of the committees. The list shall include, but not be
limited to, a description of each project and recommended financing,
the terms and conditions of the loan or financial guarantee, the local
government jurisdiction and unemployment rate, demonstration of the
jurisdiction's critical need for the project and documentation of local
funds being used to finance the public works project. The list shall
also include measures of fiscal capacity for each jurisdiction
recommended for financial assistance, compared to authorized limits and
state averages, including local government sales taxes; real estate
excise taxes; property taxes; and charges for or taxes on sewerage,
water, garbage, and other utilities.
(7) The board shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially
obligate funds from the public works assistance account before the
legislature has appropriated funds for a specific list of public works
projects. The legislature may remove projects from the list
recommended by the board. The legislature shall not change the order
of the priorities recommended for funding by the board.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section does not apply to loans made
under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section.
(9) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans shall be
exempted from subsection (7) of this section.
(10) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or recycling
facilities under this chapter, a city or county must demonstrate that
the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent with and necessary
to implement the comprehensive solid waste management plan adopted by
the city or county under chapter 70.95 RCW.
(11) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
effects of storm water or wastewater on Puget Sound may be funded under
this section only if the project is not in conflict with the action
agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310))
In considering awarding financial assistance, the board must consider:
(a) Whether the entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound
partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010. Entities that are not eligible
to be a Puget Sound partner due to geographic location, composition,
exclusion from the scope of the action agenda developed by the Puget
Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310, or for any other reason, may not
be given less preferential treatment than Puget Sound partners; and
(b) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.155
RCW to read as follows:
The intent of the project selection process is to promote state
policy objectives and to maximize the value of projects financed under
this chapter. When demand for local financing exceeds available
resources from the public works assistance account, some or all of the
following criteria may be used by the board to prioritize projects for
financing:
(1) Achieving balanced distribution of funds by geography, system
type, and jurisdiction type;
(2) Whether the project would affect the health and safety of a
large percentage of the affected community's population;
(3) Whether the project consolidates or regionalizes systems;
(4) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment,
compared to the average state unemployment;
(5) Whether the system is being well-managed in the present and for
long-term sustainability; and
(6) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.155.010 (Legislative findings and policy) and 1996 c 168
s 1 & 1985 c 446 s 7;
(2) RCW 43.155.040 (General powers of the board) and 1985 c 446 s
10;
(3) RCW 43.155.055 (Water storage projects and water systems
facilities subaccount) and 2003 c 330 s 1;
(4) RCW 43.155.060 (Public works financing powers -- Competitive bids
on projects) and 1988 c 93 s 2 & 1985 c 446 s 11;
(5) RCW 43.155.065 (Emergency public works projects) and 2001 c 131
s 3, 1990 c 133 s 7, & 1988 c 93 s 1;
(6) RCW 43.155.068 (Loans for preconstruction activities) and 2001
c 131 s 4 & 1995 c 363 s 2;
(7) RCW 43.155.075 (Loans for public works projects -- Statement of
environmental benefits -- Development of outcome-focused performance
measures) and 2001 c 227 s 10;
(8) RCW 43.155.100 (Water conservation account) and 2002 c 329 s
11;
(9) RCW 43.155.110 (Puget Sound partners) and 2007 c 341 s 25; and
(10) RCW 43.155.120 (Administering funds -- Preference to an
evergreen community) and 2008 c 299 s 30.

--- END ---