BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.17.390 and 2009 c 564 s 931 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Starting in 2012, and at least once every three years
thereafter, each agency shall apply to the Washington state quality
award((, or similar organization,)) for an independent assessment of
its quality management, accountability, and performance system. The
assessment shall evaluate the effectiveness of all elements of its
management, accountability, and performance system, including:
Leadership, strategic planning, customer focus, analysis and
information, employee performance management, and process improvement.
The purpose of the assessment is to recognize best practice and
identify improvement opportunities.
(2) Pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, state agencies must
provide electronic copies of Washington state quality award
assessments, feedback reports, and corrective action plans to the
government management accountability and performance program, the joint
legislative audit and review committee, and the state auditor. Each of
these entities must post the assessments, feedback reports, and
corrective action plans on its web site.
(3) Agencies must track employees trained in performance management
and report to the government management accountability and performance
program.
(4) The government management accountability and performance
program must coordinate with the Washington state quality award to
develop an implementation plan with dates for all state agencies to
accomplish a full assessment by 2013 and every three years thereafter
until a score of sixty percent is obtained.
(5) The office of financial management must use the Washington
state quality award assessments as a measure for the priorities of
government program.
(6) A performance audit of the priorities of government program
must be completed by January 2013. The state auditor must review each
state agency's performance management system, Washington state quality
award assessment, annual self-assessments, and corrective action plans
for all performance audits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The house of representatives must complete a Washington state
quality award assessment by June 30, 2013, and every two years
thereafter until a score of sixty percent is obtained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2013, from the general fund to the Washington quality
award council for Washington state quality awards, or other quality
management training, as provided in section 1(3) of this act.
(2) The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2014,
from the general fund to the Washington quality award council for
Washington state quality awards, or other quality management training,
as provided in section 1(3) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of two hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2013, from the general fund to the state auditor
for a performance audit of the priorities of government program as
provided in section 1(6) of this act.

--- END ---