BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,406,000))
$25,145,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,502,000))
$15,306,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,065,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($128,973,000))
$121,516,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of (($16,139,000)) $15,878,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and (($13,335,000))
$11,666,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2013 is for state agency operations.
(a) $9,775,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and (($8,532,000)) $8,448,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the
operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(i) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(a), the
superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of
four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the
civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans
civic education award.
(ii) By January 1, 2012, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall issue a report to the legislature with a timeline and
an estimate of costs for implementation of the common core standards.
The report must incorporate feedback from an open public forum for
recommendations to enhance the standards, particularly in math.
(iii) Within the amounts provided, and in consultation with the
public school employees of Washington and the Washington school
counselors' association, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop a model policy that further defines the
recommended roles and responsibilities of graduation coaches and
identifies best practices for how graduation coaches work in
coordination with school counselors and in the context of a
comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
(iv) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall,
no later than August 1, 2011, establish a standard statewide definition
of unexcused absence. The definition shall be reported to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives for
legislative review in the 2012 legislative session. Beginning no later
than January 1, 2012, districts shall report to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, daily student unexcused absence
data by school.
(b) $1,964,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $1,017,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for activities associated
with the implementation of new school finance systems required by
chapter 236, Laws of 2010 (K-12 education funding) and chapter 548,
Laws of 2009 (state's education system), including technical staff,
systems reprogramming, and workgroup deliberations, including the
quality education council and the data governance working group.
(c) (($851,000)) $808,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 and (($851,000)) $766,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the
operation and expenses of the state board of education, including basic
education assistance activities.
(d) (($1,744,000)) $1,526,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and (($1,362,000)) $1,225,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided
solely to the professional educator standards board for the following:
(i) (($1,050,000)) $1,005,000 in fiscal year 2012 and
(($1,050,000)) $1,005,000 in fiscal year 2013 are for the operation
and expenses of the Washington professional educator standards board;
and
(ii) (($694,000)) $521,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 and (($312,000)) $220,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are for conditional
scholarship loans and mentor stipends provided through the alternative
routes to certification program administered by the professional
educator standards board, including the pipeline for paraeducators
program and the retooling to teach conditional loan programs. Funding
within this subsection (1)(d)(ii) is also provided for the recruiting
Washington teachers program. Funding reductions in this subsection
(1)(d)(ii) in the 2011- 2013 fiscal biennium are intended to be one-time.
(e) $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and
civil rights.
(f) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the ongoing work of the
education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.
(g) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on
educational opportunity for military children).
(h) $159,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 185, Laws of 2011 (bullying prevention), which requires the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to convene an
ongoing workgroup on school bullying and harassment prevention. Within
the amounts provided, $140,000 is for youth suicide prevention
activities.
(i) $1,227,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,227,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive
data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including
development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and
research system (CEDARS).
(j) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for project citizen, a
program sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and
the center for civic education to promote participation in government
by middle school students.
(k) $166,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 192,
Laws of 2011 (school district insolvency). Funding is provided to
develop a clear legal framework and process for dissolution of a school
district.
(2) $9,267,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and (($9,167,000)) $3,640,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are for statewide programs.

(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) $2,541,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,541,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at
educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of
public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to
provide direct care to students, health education, and training for
school staff.
(ii) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for a nonviolence and
leadership training program provided by the institute for community
leadership.

(b) TECHNOLOGY
$1,221,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2012 and (($1,221,000)) $1,099,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for K-20
telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to
prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization
of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the
network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced
technical support for the network.

(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the Washington state
achievers scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support
community involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community
volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.
(ii) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for contracting with a
college scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach
to students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound
scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007.
(iii) $2,808,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 ((and $2,808,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the
dissemination of the navigation 101 curriculum to all districts. The
funding shall support electronic student planning tools and software
for analyzing the impact of navigation 101 on student performance, as
well as grants to a maximum of one hundred school districts each year,
based on progress and need for the implementation of the navigation 101
program. The implementation grants shall be awarded to a cross-section
of school districts reflecting a balance of geographic and demographic
characteristics. Within the amounts provided, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction will create a navigation 101
accountability model to analyze the impact of the program.
(iv) $337,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $337,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for implementation of the
building bridges statewide program for comprehensive dropout
prevention, intervention, and reengagement strategies.
(v) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for dropout prevention
programs at the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
including the jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program.
(vi) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 340, Laws of 2011 (assessment of students in state-funded full-day kindergarten classrooms), including the development and
implementation of the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing
skills (WaKIDS).
(3) Within the amounts provided in this section, the superintendent
shall implement House Bill No. 1414 (waivers for school districts).
(4) Within the amounts provided in this section, the superintendent
shall implement House Bill No. 2506 (categorical school programs).

Sec. 2 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,253,769,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,205,868,000))
$5,188,061,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,078,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,481,715,000))
$10,463,908,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such
funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal
year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(b) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as
provided in the funding formulas and salary schedules in sections 502
and 503 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.
(c) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as
provided in sections 502 and 504, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as amended
through sections 1402 and 1403 of this act.
(d) The appropriations in this section include federal funds
provided through section 101 of P.L. No. 111-226 (education jobs fund),
which shall be used to support general apportionment program funding.
In distributing general apportionment allocations under this section
for the 2011-12 school year, the superintendent shall include the
additional amount of $3,078,000 allocated by the United States
department of education on September 16, 2011, provided through 101 of
P.L. No. 111-226 (education jobs fund) as part of each district's
general apportionment allocation.
(e) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in
September and on the first school day of each month October through
June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. Any school district concluding its basic education
program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held
in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS
Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the
2011-12 and 2012-13 school years are determined using formula-generated
staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.
(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW
28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size
allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as
provided in RCW 28A.150.260. The superintendent shall make allocations
to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time
equivalent student enrollment in each grade.
(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in
this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW
28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of
prototypical school on the following regular education average class
size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided
in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade RCW 28A.150.260

Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23

Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53

Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for career and technical
education (CTE) and skill center programs average class size as
provided in RCW 28A.150.260.
(ii) For each level of prototypical school at which more than fifty
percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals
in the prior school year, the superintendent shall allocate funding
based on the following average class size of full-time equivalent
students per teacher:

General education class size in high poverty
school:

Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 24.10

Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53

Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(iii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher
planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is
13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and
(iv) Laboratory science, advanced placement, and international
baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as
general education schools in the same grade; and
(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social
workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated
based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and is
considered certificated instructional staff, except as provided in
(d)(ii) of this subsection.
(ii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill
center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to
provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social
workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following
combined rate per 1000 students:

Career and Technical Education
students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.02 per 1000 student FTE's
Skill Center students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.36 per 1000 student FTE's

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS
(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated
administrative staff salaries for the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years
for general education students are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and adjusted based
on a district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment
in each grade.
(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill
center programs generate certificated school building-level
administrator staff units at per student rates that exceed the general
education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following percentages:

Career and Technical Education students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.5 percent
Skill Center students . . . . . . . . . . . . 19.75 percent

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS
Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2011-12 and 2012-13
school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units
provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and adjusted based on each district's
annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS
In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated
in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and
administrative staff units are provided for the 2011-12 and 2012-13
school year for the central office administrative costs of operating a
school district, at the following rates:
(a) The total central office staff units provided in this
subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of
eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and
classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support
services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b), by 5.3 percent.
(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this
subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as
generated in subsection (4) of this section, and ((25.47)) 25.48
percent shall be allocated as administrative staff units, as generated
in subsection (3) of this section.
(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of
basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and
staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students,
are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in
(a) of this subsection.
(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center
programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same
staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education
students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office
administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student
rates that exceed the general education rate established for students
in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 3.69 percent for career and
technical education students, and 21.92 percent for skill center
students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS
Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 16.33
percent in the 2011-12 school year and ((16.33)) 16.34 percent in the
2012-13 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 18.73
percent in the 2011-12 school year and 18.73 percent in the 2012-13
school year for classified salary allocations provided under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS
Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504 of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in
subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections
(4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is
intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of
distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified
employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per
year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time
equivalent.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS
Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent
student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC)
incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW
28A.150.260.
(a) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at
the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component 2011-12
SCHOOL YEAR 2012-13
SCHOOL YEAR

Technology $57.42 $58.17

Utilities and Insurance $156.03 $158.05

Curriculum and Textbooks $61.65 $62.45

Other Supplies and Library Materials $130.89 $132.59

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated and Classified Staff $9.53 $9.66

Facilities Maintenance $77.30 $78.30

Security and Central Office $53.55 $54.25

TOTAL BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE $546.37 $553.47

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student
FTE MSOC allocations which equal the rate for general education
students calculated in (a) of this subsection, multiplied by a factor
of 2.171.
(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education programs generate a per student MSOC allocation
that is equal to the rate for general education students calculated in
(a) of this subsection, multiplied by a factor of 2.442.
(d) Students in laboratory science courses generate per student FTE
MSOC allocations which equal the per student FTE rate for general
education students established in (a) of this subsection.

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS
For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, funding for substitute
costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute
days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this
section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING
(a) Amounts provided in this section are adjusted to reflect
provisions of House Bill No. 2065 (allocation of funding for funding
for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all
districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative
learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to
provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE
programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not
limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as
accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic
education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident
students.

(11) VOLUNTARY FULL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS
Funding in this section is sufficient to fund voluntary full day
kindergarten programs in qualifying high poverty schools, pursuant to
RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315. Each kindergarten student who enrolls
for the voluntary full-day program in a qualifying school shall count
as one-half of one full-time equivalent student for purpose of making
allocations under this section. Funding in this section provides full-day kindergarten programs for 21 percent of kindergarten enrollment in
the 2011-12 school year, and 22 percent in the 2012-13 school year.
Funding priority shall be given to schools with the highest poverty
levels, as measured by prior year free and reduced price lunch
eligibility rates in each school. Funding in this section is
sufficient to fund voluntary full day kindergarten programs for July
and August of the 2010-11 school year.

(12) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND
NECESSARY PLANTS
For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants
within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary
by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are
provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional
administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to
districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education
staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center
enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of
this section on a per district basis.
(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and
enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent
students in grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full-time equivalent students;
(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit;
(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit;
(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit
allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified
staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit; and
(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support
small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under
subsection (12) of this section shall generate additional MSOC
allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC)
allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided
section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental
budget), adjusted annually for inflation.
(13) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(14) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following
programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2012
and 2013 as follows:
(a) $589,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $597,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for fire protection for school
districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter
established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.
(b) $436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for programs providing skills
training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day
school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public
instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500
per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.
(c) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund adjustments to
school districts' allocations resulting from the implementation of the
prototypical school funding formula, pursuant to chapter 236, Laws of
2010 (K-12 education funding). The funding in this section is intended
to hold school districts harmless in total for funding changes
resulting from conversion to the prototypical school formula in the
general apportionment program, the learning assistance program, the
transitional bilingual program, and the highly capable program, after
adjustment for changes in enrollment and other caseload adjustments.
(15) $208,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $211,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for school district emergencies as
certified by the superintendent of public instruction. At the close of
the fiscal year the superintendent of public instruction shall report
to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature on the allocations provided to districts
and the nature of the emergency.
(16) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of
1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463,
Laws of 2007.
(17) Beginning in the 2011-12 school year, students participating
in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum
enrollment of 1.2 FTE including school district and institution of
higher education enrollment. Beginning in the 2012-13 school year,
students participating in running start programs may be funded up to a
combined maximum enrollment of 1.0 FTE including school district and
institution of higher education enrollment. In calculating the
combined ((1.2)) FTE, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction may average the participating student's September through
June enrollment to account for differences in the start and end dates
for courses provided by the high school and higher education
institution. Additionally, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and
technical colleges, the higher education coordinating board, and the
education data center, shall annually track and report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of
students participating in the running start program, including course
load analyses at both the high school and community and technical
college system.
(18) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (12) of this section, the following apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (12) of this section shall be
reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.
(19)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved
career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not
exceed 15 percent of the combined basic education and career and
technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds.
Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are
considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting
purposes under this section.
(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent
enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the
enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall
be adjusted for reported career and technical education program
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

Sec. 3 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION
(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the
state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated
administrative, and classified staff units as provided in RCW
28A.150.280 and under section 503 of this act:
(a) Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units
are determined for each district by multiplying the district's
certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 2
by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated
instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP document
1; and
(b) Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units
and classified staff units for each district are determined based on
the district's certificated administrative and classified salary
allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document 2.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "LEAP Document 1" means the staff mix factors for certificated
instructional staff according to education and years of experience, as
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee on May 23, 2011, at 16:10 hours; and
(b) "LEAP Document 2" means the school year salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff and classified staff and derived and
total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed
by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on
May 23, 2011, at 16:10 hours.
(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary
adjustments at a rate of 15.69 percent for school year 2011-12 and
((15.69)) 15.70 percent for school year 2012-13 for certificated
instructional and certificated administrative staff and 15.23 percent
for school year 2011-12 and 15.23 percent for the 2012-13 school year
for classified staff.
(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary
allocation schedules for certificated instructional staff are
established for basic education salary allocations:

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff For School Year 2011-12
***Education Experience***

Years MA+90

of OR

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 Ph.D.

0 33,401 34,303 35,238 36,175 39,180 41,116 40,045 43,051 44,989

1 33,851 34,765 35,712 36,690 39,727 41,652 40,490 43,527 45,452

2 34,279 35,202 36,159 37,212 40,241 42,186 40,938 43,966 45,912

3 34,720 35,653 36,620 37,706 40,729 42,722 41,363 44,384 46,377

4 35,153 36,127 37,099 38,224 41,264 43,271 41,808 44,849 46,857

5 35,600 36,578 37,561 38,748 41,777 43,824 42,261 45,291 47,339

6 36,060 37,017 38,032 39,279 42,293 44,352 42,725 45,740 47,797

7 36,868 37,839 38,868 40,182 43,241 45,356 43,594 46,652 48,768

8 38,050 39,074 40,127 41,550 44,651 46,844 44,961 48,063 50,254

9 40,353 41,459 42,933 46,106 48,373 46,343 49,518 51,785

10 42,806 44,387 47,602 49,945 47,798 51,014 53,356

11 45,883 49,169 51,558 49,295 52,581 54,969

12 47,332 50,777 53,238 50,850 54,188 56,650

13 52,425 54,959 52,460 55,836 58,370

14 54,081 56,745 54,117 57,600 60,157

15 55,488 58,221 55,523 59,098 61,721

16 or more 56,597 59,385 56,634 60,279 62,955

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff For School Year 2012-13
***Education Experience***

Years MA+90

of OR

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 Ph.D.

0 33,401 34,303 35,238 36,175 39,180 41,116 40,045 43,051 44,989

1 33,851 34,765 35,712 36,690 39,727 41,652 40,490 43,527 45,452

2 34,279 35,202 36,159 37,212 40,241 42,186 40,938 43,966 45,912

3 34,720 35,653 36,620 37,706 40,729 42,722 41,363 44,384 46,377

4 35,153 36,127 37,099 38,224 41,264 43,271 41,808 44,849 46,857

5 35,600 36,578 37,561 38,748 41,777 43,824 42,261 45,291 47,339

6 36,060 37,017 38,032 39,279 42,293 44,352 42,725 45,740 47,797

7 36,868 37,839 38,868 40,182 43,241 45,356 43,594 46,652 48,768

8 38,050 39,074 40,127 41,550 44,651 46,844 44,961 48,063 50,254

9 40,353 41,459 42,933 46,106 48,373 46,343 49,518 51,785

10 42,806 44,387 47,602 49,945 47,798 51,014 53,356

11 45,883 49,169 51,558 49,295 52,581 54,969

12 47,332 50,777 53,238 50,850 54,188 56,650

13 52,425 54,959 52,460 55,836 58,370

14 54,081 56,745 54,117 57,600 60,157

15 55,488 58,221 55,523 59,098 61,721

16 or more 56,597 59,385 56,634 60,279 62,955

(b) During the 2012-13 school years, the salary allocations for
certificated instructional staff shall exclude the following:
(i) Any years of service earned after August 31, 2011;
(ii) Any educational credits earned after October 1, 2011,
excluding certificated instructional staff meeting the criteria in
(b)(iii) of this subsection;
(iii) For certificated instructional staff with zero years of
experience, districts shall recognize credits earned as of October 1,
2011;
(iv) For certificated instructional staff receiving initial
certification after October 1, 2011, districts shall recognize credits
earned as of the date of approval of their Washington state
instructional certificate.
(c) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer
to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate
degree.
(((c))) (d) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but
before the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits
may be counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this
subsection, the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:
(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and
(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.
(b) "MA" means a masters degree.
(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.
(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent
in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and
28A.415.023.
(6) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by
any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine
compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and
LEAP documents referenced in this part V, or any replacement schedules
and documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(7) The salary allocation schedules established in this section are
for allocation purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2).

Sec. 4 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Additional salary adjustments as necessary to fund the base
salaries for certificated instructional staff as listed for each
district in LEAP Document 2, defined in section 504(2)(b) of this act.
Allocations for these salary adjustments shall be provided to all
districts that are not grandfathered to receive salary allocations
above the statewide salary allocation schedule, and to certain
grandfathered districts to the extent necessary to ensure that salary
allocations for districts that are currently grandfathered do not fall
below the statewide salary allocation schedule.
(b) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff as listed for each district in LEAP
Document 2, defined in section 504(2)(b) of this act.
(c) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for classified
staff as listed for each district in LEAP Document 2, defined in
section 504(2)(b) of this act.
(d) The appropriations in this subsection (1) include associated
incremental fringe benefit allocations at 15.69 percent for the 2011-12
school year and ((15.69)) 15.70 percent for the 2012-13 school year for
certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and
15.23 percent for the 2011-12 school year and 15.23 percent for the
2012-13 school year for classified staff.
(e) The appropriations in this section include the increased or
decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all
relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes
for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary
allocation schedules and methodology in sections 503 and 504 of this
act. Changes for special education result from changes in each
district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
503 and 504 of this act.
(f) The appropriations in this section include no salary
adjustments for substitute teachers.
(2) The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is
$768.00 per month for the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years. The
appropriations in this section reflect the incremental change in cost
of allocating rates of $768.00 per month for the 2011-12 school year
and $768.00 per month for the 2012-13 school year.
(3) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

Sec. 5 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $322,033,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($273,380,000))
$272,487,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($595,413,000))
$594,520,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for the
transportation of students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192.
(b) From July 1, 2011, to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of
students as provided in section 505, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1404 of this act.
(3) Any amounts appropriated for maintenance level funding for
pupil transportation that exceed actual maintenance level expenditures
as calculated under the funding formula that takes effect September 1,
2011, shall be distributed to districts according to RCW
28A.160.192(2)(b).
(4) A maximum of $892,000 of this fiscal year 2012 appropriation
((and a maximum of $892,000 of the fiscal year 2013 appropriation)) may
be expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus
purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction
determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process
based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to
those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall base
depreciation payments for school district buses on the pre-sales tax
five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus.
In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation
payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus
category for that school year.
(7) Funding levels in this section reflect waivers granted by the
state board of education for four-day school weeks as allowed under RCW
28A.305.141.
(8) Starting with the 2012-13 school year, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall disburse payments for bus
depreciation in August.

Sec. 6 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $653,904,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($694,237,000))
$693,011,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $486,936,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $756,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,835,833,000))
$1,834,607,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to
implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed
by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to
section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.
(c) Beginning with the 2010-11 school year award cycle, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award
determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school
year. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety
net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from
the current school year.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for special
education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390.
(b) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school district programs for special education
students as provided in section 507, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1406 of this act.
(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions
for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW
28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund--state funded special
education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual
enrollment percent or 12.7 percent.
(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW
28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate
rather than individual district units. For purposes of this
subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than
individual district units.
(7) $8,914,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $34,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $29,574,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for safety net awards for districts
with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the
amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section. If the federal
safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the
federal appropriation in this subsection (7) in any fiscal year, the
superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds
necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of each school year,
the superintendent shall recover safety net funds that were distributed
prospectively but for which districts were not subsequently eligible.
(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, safety net funds
shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as
provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (ESHB 2261).
(b) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
operate the safety net oversight committee and shall award safety net
funds as provided in section 507, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as amended
through section 1406 of this act.
(8) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund--state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund--state funds allocated under
this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special
education program.
(11) $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for two additional full-time
equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to
provide training and support to districts applying for safety net
awards.
(12) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
shall be expended to support a special education ombudsman program
within the office of superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 7 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE
DISTRICTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,889,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,904,000))
$7,392,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,793,000))
$15,281,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish
financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction
and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).
(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional
professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum
and instructional strategies. Funding shall be distributed among the
educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions
in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use
this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated
instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter
and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials,
and other expenditures related to providing regional professional
development support.
(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state
board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.310.340, may
receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct
school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education
rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.
(4) The general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013
reflects a total reduction of $500,000 for general administrative
activities of educational service districts. This amount reflects the
following percentage reductions:
(a) For educational service district number 101, number 105, number
123, and number 171: Three and one-half percent;
(b) For educational service district number 112, number 113, number
114, and number 189: Ten percent;
(c) For educational service district number 121: Fifty percent.

Sec. 8 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,507,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,969,000))
$16,808,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,476,000))
$34,315,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund--state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(a) Any years of service earned after August 31, 2011;
(b) Any educational credits earned after October 1, 2011, excluding
certificated instructional staff meeting the criteria in (c) of this
subsection;
(c) For certificated instructional staff with zero years of
experience, districts shall recognize credits earned as of October 1,
2011; and
(d) For certificated instructional staff receiving initial
certification after October 1, 2011, districts shall recognize credits
earned as of the date of approval of their Washington state
instructional certificate.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $669,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $669,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to maintain at least one
certificated instructional staff and related support services at an
institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support
one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish
the educational program. The following types of institutions are
included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles
under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for
juveniles operated by city and county jails.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 9 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,759,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,842,000))
$8,802,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,601,000))
$17,561,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable
students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i)
Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly
capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students
per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900
instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the district's average staff
mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this
act.
(b) From July 1, 2011, to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable
students as provided in section 511, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1409 of this act.
(3) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort
Worden state park.

Sec. 10 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,078,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($98,309,000))
$81,142,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $219,161,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,598,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($381,146,000))
$363,979,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $40,822,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $41,613,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for development and
implementation of the Washington state assessment system, including:
(a) Development and implementation of retake assessments for high
school students who are not successful in one or more content areas and
(b) development and implementation of alternative assessments or
appeals procedures to implement the certificate of academic
achievement. The superintendent of public instruction shall report
quarterly on the progress on development and implementation of
alternative assessments or appeals procedures. Within these amounts,
the superintendent of public instruction shall contract for the early
return of 10th grade student assessment results, on or around June 10th
of each year. State funding shall be limited to one collection of
evidence payment per student, per content-area assessment.
(2) $356,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $356,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the Washington state
leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional
partnership activities coordinated at the Pacific science center,
including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal
professional development, and school and community engagement events.
(3) $980,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $980,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for improving technology
infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district technology
development, promoting standards for school district technology,
promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.
(4) $3,852,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,624,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for continued implementation of
chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) including development of
new performance-based evaluation systems for certificated educators.
(5) $1,261,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2165
(teacher & principal evals). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $1,923,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2427
(educator evaluation systems). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7)(a) (($40,681,000)) $32,100,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for the following
bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the
national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching
in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of (($5,090))
$4,000 per teacher in the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, adjusted
for inflation in each school year in which Initiative 732 cost of
living adjustments are provided;
(ii) An additional (($5,000)) $4,000 annual bonus shall be paid to
national board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High
schools where at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is
eligible for federal free or reduced price lunch, (B) middle schools
where at least 60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible
for federal free or reduced price lunch, or (C) elementary schools
where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible
for federal free or reduced price lunch;
(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications
for bonuses under (a)(ii) of this subsection for less than one full
school year receive bonuses in a pro-rated manner. Beginning in the
2011-12 school year, all bonuses in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection
will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in (a)(i) and (ii)
of this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for first
year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the
instructional school year they are certified; and
(iv) During the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, and within
available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the
eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the
national board for professional teaching standards may receive a
conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward
the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front
candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual
bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in
addition to compensation received under a district's salary schedule
and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average
salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200.
Recipients who fail to receive certification after three years are
required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the
terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including
applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use
revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure
payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section
in each school year.
(((6))) (8) $477,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 ((and $477,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the
leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and
program administrators.
(((7))) (9) $950,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 ((and $950,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the
Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading
corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are
implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs.
Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps
programs.
(((8))) (10) $810,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 ((and $810,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the
development of a leadership academy for school principals and
administrators. The superintendent of public instruction shall
contract with an independent organization to design, field test, and
implement a state-of-the-art education leadership academy that will be
accessible throughout the state. Initial development of the content of
the academy activities shall be supported by private funds.
Semiannually the independent organization shall report on amounts
committed by foundations and others to support the development and
implementation of this program. Leadership academy partners shall
include the state level organizations for school administrators and
principals, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional
educator standards board, and others as the independent organization
shall identify.
(((9))) (11) $3,234,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 ((and $3,234,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for grants
to school districts to provide a continuum of care for children and
families to help children become ready to learn. Grant proposals from
school districts shall contain local plans designed collaboratively
with community service providers. If a continuum of care program
exists in the area in which the school district is located, the local
plan shall provide for coordination with existing programs to the
greatest extent possible.
(((10))) (12) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 ((and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the
implementation of chapter 288, Laws of 2011 (actual student success
program), including allocations to the opportunity internship program,
the jobs for America's graduates program, the building bridges program,
services provided by a college scholarship organization. Funding shall
not be used in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium to provide awards for
schools and school districts.
(((11))) (13) $859,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, (($846,000)) $821,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $248,000 of the education
legacy trust account--state appropriation are for administrative
support of education reform programs.
(((12))) (14) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 ((and $2,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for a
statewide information technology (IT) academy program. This public-private partnership will provide educational software, as well as IT
certification and software training opportunities for students and
staff in public schools.
(((13))) (15) $977,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 ((and $977,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for
secondary career and technical education grants pursuant to chapter
170, Laws of 2008. If equally matched by private donations, $300,000
of the 2012 appropriation and $300,000 of the 2013 appropriation shall
be used to support FIRST robotics programs.
(((14))) (16) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and (($125,000)) $100,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for (a) staff at
the office of the superintendent of public instruction to coordinate
and promote efforts to develop integrated math, science, technology,
and engineering programs in schools and districts across the state; and
(b) grants of $2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers
each year with professional development training for implementing
integrated math, science, technology, and engineering programs in their
schools.
(((15))) (17) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 ((and $135,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for
science, technology, engineering and mathematics lighthouse projects,
consistent with chapter 238, Laws of 2010.
(((16))) (18) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 ((and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for a
beginning educator support program. School districts and/or regional
consortia may apply for grant funding. The superintendent shall
implement this program in 5 to 15 school districts and/or regional
consortia. The program provided by a district and/or regional
consortia shall include: A paid orientation; assignment of a qualified
mentor; development of a professional growth plan for each beginning
teacher aligned with professional certification; release time for
mentors and new teachers to work together; and teacher observation time
with accomplished peers. $250,000 may be used to provide statewide
professional development opportunities for mentors and beginning
educators.
(19) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for advanced project lead the way courses
at ten high schools. To be eligible for funding, a high school must
have offered a foundational project lead the way course during the
2011-12 school year. The funding must be used for one-time start-up
course costs for an advanced project lead the way course, to be offered
to students beginning in the 2012-13 school year. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the education research and
data center at the office of financial management shall track student
participation and long-term outcome data.
(20) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for aerospace and manufacturing technical
programs housed at two skill centers. The one-time funding is provided
for start-up equipment and curriculum purchases. To be eligible for
funding, the skill center must agree to provide regional high schools
with access to a technology laboratory, expand manufacturing
certificate and course offerings at the skill center, and provide a
laboratory space for local high school teachers to engage in
professional development in the instruction of courses leading to
student employment certification in the aerospace and manufacturing
industries. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall administer the grants in consultation with the center for
excellence for aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing.
(21) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for start-up grants to twelve high schools
to implement the aerospace assembler program. Participating high
schools must agree to offer the aerospace assembler training program to
students by spring semester of school year 2012-13. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the education research and
data center at the office of financial management shall track student
participation and long-term outcome data.

Sec. 11 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,496,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,856,000))
$82,621,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,001,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($233,353,000))
$233,118,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual
programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages:
(i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional
bilingual program student; (ii) fifteen transitional bilingual program
students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900
instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the district's average staff
mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this
act.
(b) From July 1, 2011, to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual
instruction programs as provided in section 514, chapter 564, Laws of
2009, as amended through section 1411 of this act.
(c) The allocations in this section reflect the implementation of
a new funding formula for the transitional bilingual instructional
program, effective September 1, 2011, as specified in RCW
28A.150.260(10)(b).
(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts
in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of
assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the
following amounts: 2.79 percent for school year 2011-12 and 2.09
percent for school year 2012-13.
(4) The general fund--federal appropriation in this section is for
migrant education under Title I Part C and English language
acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the
elementary and secondary education act.
(5)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
implement a funding model for the transitional bilingual program,
beginning in school year 2012-13, that is scaled to provide more
support to students requiring most intensive intervention, (students
with beginning levels of English language proficiency) and less support
to students requiring less intervention. The funding model shall also
provide up to two years of bonus funding upon successful exit from the
bilingual program to facilitate successful transition to a standard
program of education.
(b) It is expected that per-pupil funding for level 2 proficiency
will be set at the same level as would have been provided statewide
prior to establishing differential per-pupil amounts; level 1 will be
125 percent of level 2; level 3 through the level prior to exit will be
75 percent of level 2; and two bonus years upon successful
demonstration of proficiency will be 100 percent of level 2. Prior to
implementing in school year 2012-13, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall provide to the senate and house of
representatives ways and means committees recommended rates based on
the results of proficiency test procurement, expressed as both per-pupil rates and hours of instruction as provided in RCW
28A.150.260(10)(b).
(c) Each bilingual student shall be tested for proficiency level
and, therefore, eligibility for the transitional bilingual program each
year. The bonus payments for up to two school years following
successful exit from the transitional bilingual program shall be
allocated to the exiting school district. If the student graduates or
transfers to another district prior to the district receiving both
years' bonuses, the district shall receive the bonus for only the
length of time the student remains enrolled in the exiting district.
(d) The quality education council shall examine the revised funding
model developed under this subsection and provide a report to the
education and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2011,
that includes recommendations for:
(i) Changing the prototypical school funding formula for the
transitional bilingual program to align with the revised model in an
accurate and transparent manner;
(ii) Reconciling the revised model with statutory requirements for
categorical funding of the transitional bilingual instructional program
that is restricted to students eligible for and enrolled in that
program;
(iii) Clarifying the elements of the transitional bilingual
instructional program that fall under the definition of basic education
and the impact of the revised model on them; and
(iv) The extent that the disparate financial impact of the revised
model on different school districts should be addressed and options for
addressing it.
(e) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
report to the senate and house of representatives ways and means
committees and education committees annually by December 31st of each
year, through 2018, regarding any measurable changes in proficiency,
time-in-program, and transition experience.
(6) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to track current and former
transitional bilingual program students.

Sec. 12 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,470,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($103,666,000))
$103,307,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $492,207,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,980,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($746,323,000))
$745,964,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund--state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b)(i) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance
programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages:
(A) Additional instruction of 1.51560 hours per week per funded
learning assistance program student; (B) fifteen learning assistance
program students per teacher; (C) 36 instructional weeks per year; (D)
900 instructional hours per teacher; and (E) the district's average
staff mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of
this act.
(ii) From July 1, 2011, to August 31, 2011, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance
programs as provided in section 515, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1412 of this act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent
enrollment in grades K-12 for the prior school year multiplied by the
district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12
eligible for free or reduced price lunch in the prior school year.
(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through
the annual income verification process required by the national school
lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the
learning assistance program dated February, 2010.
(3) The general fund--federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund-state or education legacy trust funds
allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be
expended for the learning assistance program.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
research and recommend options for an adjustment factor for middle
school and high school free and reduced price lunch eligibility
reporting rates pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(12)(a), and submit a report
to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 1, 2012. For the
2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the adjustment factor is 1.0.

Sec. 13 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through
part V of this act are for allocations purposes only and do not entitle
a particular district, district employee, or student to a specific
service, beyond what has been expressly provided in statute. Part V of
this act restates the requirements of various sections of Title 28A
RCW. If any conflict exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control
unless this act explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement.
Any amounts provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts
required by Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the
program of basic education.
(2) To the maximum extent practicable, when adopting new or revised
rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part
V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall attempt to seek legislative
approval through the budget request process.
(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as
expressly provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2012, unless
specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the director
of financial management, the superintendent of public instruction may
transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2012 among
the following programs to meet the apportionment schedule for a
specified formula in another of these programs: General apportionment;
employee compensation adjustments; pupil transportation; special
education programs; institutional education programs; transitional
bilingual programs; and learning assistance programs.
(5) The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving
any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

INDEX PAGE #

PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 1, 40
BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
--- END ---