BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.729 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The term of the sentence of an offender committed to a
correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and adopted by the correctional agency having jurisdiction in
which the offender is confined. The earned release time shall be for
good behavior and good performance, as determined by the correctional
agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency shall not credit
the offender with earned release credits in advance of the offender
actually earning the credits.
(b) Any program established pursuant to this section shall allow an
offender to earn early release credits for presentence incarceration.
If an offender is transferred from a county jail to the department, the
administrator of a county jail facility shall certify to the department
the amount of time spent in custody at the facility and the amount of
earned release time. The department may approve a jail certification
from a correctional agency that calculates earned release time based on
the actual amount of confinement time served by the offender before
sentencing when an erroneous calculation of confinement time served by
the offender before sentencing appears on the judgment and sentence.
(2) An offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after
July 23, 1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements
under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good
time credits or earned release time for that portion of his or her
sentence that results from any deadly weapon enhancements.
(3) An offender may earn early release time as follows:
(a) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence.
(b) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed
ten percent of the sentence.
(c) An offender is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time if he or she:
(i) Is not classified as an offender who is at a high risk to
reoffend as provided in subsection (4) of this section;
(ii) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(iii) Has no prior conviction for the offenses listed in (c)(ii) of
this subsection;
(iv) Participates in programming or activities as directed by the
offender's individual reentry plan as provided under RCW 72.09.270 to
the extent that such programming or activities are made available by
the department; and
(v) Has not committed a new felony after July 22, 2007, while under
community custody.
(d) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence.
(4) The department shall perform a risk assessment of each offender
who may qualify for earned early release under subsection (3)(c) of
this section utilizing the risk assessment tool recommended by the
Washington state institute for public policy. Subsection (3)(c) of
this section does not apply to offenders convicted after July 1, 2010.
(5)(a) A person who is eligible for earned early release as
provided in this section and who will be supervised by the department
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.501 or 9.94A.5011, shall be transferred to
community custody in lieu of earned release time;
(b) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to
the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to
propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living
arrangement. All offenders with community custody terms eligible for
release to community custody in lieu of earned release shall provide an
approved residence and living arrangement prior to release to the
community;
(c) The department may deny transfer to community custody in lieu
of earned release time if the department determines an offender's
release plan, including proposed residence location and living
arrangements, may violate the conditions of the sentence or conditions
of supervision, place the offender at risk to violate the conditions of
the sentence, place the offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk
to victim safety or community safety. The department's authority under
this section is independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence
or statutory provision regarding conditions for community custody;
(d) If the department is unable to approve the offender's release
plan, the department may do one or more of the following:
(i) Transfer an offender to partial confinement in lieu of earned
early release for a period not to exceed three months. The three
months in partial confinement is in addition to that portion of the
offender's term of confinement that may be served in partial
confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728(5);
(ii) Provide ((rental vouchers)) transitional reentry housing, in
accordance with section 2 of this act, to the offender for a period not
to exceed three months if ((rental)) housing assistance will result in
an approved release plan. The ((voucher)) housing must be provided in
conjunction with additional transition support programming or services
that enable an offender to participate in services including, but not
limited to, substance abuse treatment, mental health treatment, sex
offender treatment, educational programming, or employment programming;
(e) For each offender who is the recipient of ((a rental voucher))
transitional reentry housing, the department shall include, concurrent
with the data that the department otherwise obtains and records, the
housing status of the offender for the duration of the offender's
supervision.
(6) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW
9.94A.670(5)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within amounts appropriated for this purpose, the department
will contract with housing providers to continuously make available a
sufficient number of beds in transitional reentry housing to meet the
needs of offenders transitioning to the community on earned early
release and who are in need of housing pursuant to RCW 9.94A.729(5)(d).
(2) The department must give preference to housing providers that
provide a small, family oriented, living environment with between three
and ten beds and provide transition support that enables an offender to
participate in programming or services including, but not limited to,
substance abuse treatment, mental health treatment, sex offender
treatment, educational programming, or employment programming.
(3) To the extent feasible, the department must consolidate housing
beds so that any one housing provider is contracted to provide at least
three beds.
(4) The department will assign one community corrections officer as
the primary contact for a housing provider and will provide local law
enforcement with a list of transitional reentry housing providers in
the jurisdiction of the law enforcement agency and the provider's
assigned community corrections officer.
(5) If a housing provider has cause to terminate a tenancy as
provided in this subsection, the housing provider must give written
notice to the assigned community corrections officer no less than
forty-eight hours prior to terminating the tenancy. A housing provider
may subsequently terminate the tenancy and require the offender to
vacate the premises within forty-eight hours of receipt of written
notice if the offender has:
(a) Misused a controlled substance or used or consumed any illegal
drug or alcoholic beverage either on or off of the premises;
(b) Engaged in harassment or verbal abuse of neighbors, staff, or
other tenants;
(c) Absconded;
(d) Returned to the physical custody of the department or other
agency for greater than thirty days; or
(e) Engaged in other behavior that is incompatible with the rules
of the house and has been given at least three written violation
notices.
(6) An offender's failure to vacate the premises after termination
of the tenancy, as set forth in this section, constitutes criminal
trespass under chapter 9A.52 RCW. A housing provider may enlist the
cooperation of law enforcement in removing the offender from the
premises without having to obtain a court order or writ of restitution.
The housing provider shall provide law enforcement with a signed
written statement attesting to the facts that substantiate the
termination of the tenancy and subsequent criminal trespass.
(7) An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or
public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470, or units of local government
and its employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune from civil
liability for damages for assisting a housing provider in the removal
of an offender from the premises as provided in this section.
(8) A housing provider who provides transitional reentry housing is
not liable for civil damages arising from the criminal conduct of an
offender to any greater extent than a regular tenant, and no special
duties are created under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 59.18.040 and 1989 c 342 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following living arrangements are not intended to be governed
by the provisions of this chapter, unless established primarily to
avoid its application, in which event the provisions of this chapter
shall control:
(1) Residence at an institution, whether public or private, where
residence is merely incidental to detention or the provision of
medical, religious, educational, recreational, or similar services,
including but not limited to correctional facilities, licensed nursing
homes, monasteries and convents, and hospitals;
(2) Occupancy under a bona fide earnest money agreement to purchase
or contract of sale of the dwelling unit or the property of which it is
a part, where the tenant is, or stands in the place of, the purchaser;
(3) Residence in a hotel, motel, or other transient lodging whose
operation is defined in RCW 19.48.010;
(4) Rental agreements entered into pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 47.12 RCW where occupancy is by an owner-condemnee and where
such agreement does not violate the public policy of this state of
ensuring decent, safe, and sanitary housing and is so certified by the
consumer protection division of the attorney general's office;
(5) Rental agreements for the use of any single-family residence
which are incidental to leases or rentals entered into in connection
with a lease of land to be used primarily for agricultural purposes;
(6) Rental agreements providing housing for seasonal agricultural
employees while provided in conjunction with such employment;
(7) Rental agreements with the state of Washington, department of
natural resources, on public lands governed by Title 79 RCW;
(8) Occupancy by an employee of a landlord whose right to occupy is
conditioned upon employment in or about the premises;
(9) Transitional reentry housing provided under contract with the
department of corrections under section 2 of this act.

--- END ---