BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.810 and 2006 c 305 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Upon cessation of a use under which an exemption has been
granted pursuant to RCW 84.36.030, 84.36.037, 84.36.040, 84.36.041,
84.36.042, ((84.36.043,)) 84.36.046, 84.36.050, 84.36.060, 84.36.550,
((84.36.560,)) 84.36.570, and 84.36.650, except as provided in (b) of
this subsection, the county treasurer ((shall)) must collect all taxes
((which)) that would have been paid had the property not been exempt
during the three years preceding, or the life of such exemption((,)) if
such ((be)) amount is less, together with the interest at the same rate
and computed in the same way as that upon delinquent property taxes.
If the property has been granted an exemption for more than ten
consecutive years, taxes and interest ((shall)) are not ((be)) assessed
under this section.
(b) Upon cessation of use by an institution of higher education of
property exempt under RCW 84.36.050(2) the county treasurer ((shall))
must collect all taxes which would have been paid had the property not
been exempt during the seven years preceding, or the life of the
exemption, whichever is less.
(c) Upon cessation of a use under which an exemption has been
granted pursuant to RCW 84.36.043 or 84.36.560, the county treasurer
must collect all taxes that would have been paid had the property not
been exempt during the year preceding, or the life of such exemption if
such amount is less, together with the interest at the same rate and
computed in the same way as that upon delinquent property taxes. If
the property has been granted an exemption for more than ten
consecutive years, taxes and interest are not assessed under this
section.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies only when ownership of
the property is transferred or when fifty-one percent or more of the
area of the property loses its exempt status. The additional tax under
subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) is not ((be)) imposed if the
cessation of use resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a nonprofit organization, association, or
corporation for a use which also qualifies and is granted exemption
under this chapter;
(b) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain,
or sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in
anticipation of the exercise of such power;
(c) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the property is located which disallows
the present use of such property;
(d) A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or
other such calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the
organization, association, or corporation changing the use of such
property;
(e) Relocation of the activity and use of another location or site
except for undeveloped properties of camp facilities exempted under RCW
84.36.030;
(f) Cancellation of a lease on leased property that had been exempt
under this chapter;
(g) A change in the exempt portion of a home for the aging under
RCW 84.36.041(3), as long as some portion of the home remains exempt;
or
(h) Transfer to an agency of the state of Washington or the city or
county within which the property is located.
(3) Subsection (2)(e) and (f) of this section ((do [does])) does
not apply to property leased to a state institution of higher education
and exempt under RCW 84.36.050(2).

--- END ---