BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Under Article IX, section 1 of the state Constitution, it is the
paramount duty of the state to make ample provision for the education
of all of Washington's children. According to the state supreme court,
this constitutional provision requires that the state must amply
provide for the education of all Washington children as the state's
first and highest priority before any other state programs or
operations. For these reasons, it is the intent of the legislature to
require that all appropriations for K-12 basic education, together with
appropriations for other K-12 education programs, be enacted into law
before the legislature takes executive action on other omnibus
appropriations legislation.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.380 and 2009 c 548 s 110 and 2009 c 479 s 16
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state legislature shall, at each regular session in an odd-numbered year, appropriate for the current use of the common schools
such amounts as needed for state support to school districts during the
ensuing biennium for the program of basic education under RCW
28A.150.200.
(2) In addition to those state funds provided to school districts
for basic education, the legislature may appropriate funds to be
distributed to school districts for other factors and for other special
programs to enhance or enrich the program of basic education.
(3) The state legislature shall also, at each regular session in an
odd-numbered year, appropriate from the general fund and education
construction fund for the purposes of and in accordance with the
provisions of the student achievement act during the ensuing biennium.
(4) As of the effective date of this section, all appropriations
for the purposes of this section and other K-12 education purposes,
including any adjustments to biennial operating appropriations made in
a supplemental operating appropriations act, must be made in
legislation that is separate from the omnibus operating appropriations
act. Such appropriations must be enacted into law before it is in
order for either house of the legislature to take executive action on
omnibus operating appropriations legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning the effective date of this section, appropriations for
the purposes of RCW 28A.150.380 and other K-12 education purposes must
be enacted into law before it is in order for either house of the
legislature to take executive action on omnibus operating or
transportation appropriations legislation.
The house of representatives and senate, jointly or separately, may
adopt rules or resolutions to implement their respective
responsibilities under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---