BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.50.040 and 1993 c 128 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person or health care facility aggrieved by the actions
prohibited by RCW 9A.50.020 may seek civil damages from those who
committed the prohibited acts and those acting in concert with them.
A plaintiff in an action brought under this chapter shall not recover
more than his or her actual damages and additional sums authorized in
RCW 9A.50.050. Once a plaintiff recovers his or her actual damages and
any additional sums authorized under this chapter, additional damages
shall not be recovered.
(2)(a) The attorney general may file suit to enjoin a violation of
RCW 9A.50.020, for compensatory damages to persons or facilities
aggrieved by the actions prohibited by RCW 9A.50.020, and for the
assessment of a civil penalty against the respondent. The civil
penalty may not exceed fifteen thousand dollars for a first violation
and twenty-five thousand dollars for subsequent violations. In
determining the amount of the civil penalty, the court shall include
prior violations of the federal freedom of access to clinic entrances
act of 1994, 18 U.S.C. Sec. 248, and prior violations of the laws of
another state that are equivalent to a violation of this chapter.
(b) In any case where the attorney general decides not to pursue an
action, the county or city may file suit under this subsection (2) for
injunctive relief, damages, and penalties for violations of RCW
9A.50.020.
(3) A person does not have to be criminally convicted of violating
RCW 9A.50.020 to be held civilly liable under this section. It is not
necessary to prove actual damages to recover the additional sums
authorized under RCW 9A.50.050, costs, and reasonable attorneys' fees.
The prevailing party is entitled to recover costs and reasonable
attorneys' fees.
(((2))) (4) The superior courts of this state shall have authority
to grant temporary, preliminary, and permanent injunctive relief to
enjoin violations of this chapter.
In appropriate circumstances, any superior court having personal
jurisdiction over one or more defendants may issue injunctive relief
that shall have binding effect on the original defendants and persons
acting in concert with the original defendants, in any county in the
state.
Due to the nature of the harm involved, injunctive relief may be
issued without bond in the discretion of the court, notwithstanding any
other requirement imposed by statute.
The state and its political subdivisions shall cooperate in the
enforcement of court injunctions that seek to protect against acts
prohibited by this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.50.020 and 1993 c 128 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is unlawful for a person except as otherwise protected by state
or federal law, alone or in concert with others, to willfully or
recklessly interfere with access to or from a health care facility or
willfully or recklessly disrupt the normal functioning of such facility
by:
(1) Physically obstructing or impeding the free passage of a person
seeking to enter or depart from the facility or from the common areas
of the real property upon which the facility is located;
(2) Making noise that unreasonably disturbs the peace within the
facility;
(3) Trespassing on the facility or the common areas of the real
property upon which the facility is located;
(4) Telephoning the facility repeatedly, or knowingly permitting
any telephone under his or her control to be used for such purpose;
((or))
(5) Threatening to inflict injury on the owners, agents, patients,
employees, or property of the facility or knowingly permitting any
telephone under his or her control to be used for such purpose; or
(6) Intentionally damaging the property of the facility because the
facility is a health care facility.

--- END ---