BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
A state agency shall not expend moneys except pursuant to an
appropriation by law if the moneys are received in an administrative or
judicial regulatory or civil enforcement action, or settlement thereof,
brought by the state.
In any regulatory or civil enforcement action brought by the
attorney general under the authority of the attorney general or another
state agency where moneys are to be paid to the state or to a state-
administered account, the attorney general shall seek a court order or
settlement that includes a requirement that the moneys received by the
state shall not be expended except pursuant to an appropriation by law.
This section does not apply to:
(1) Moneys received by the state for payment by the state to
injured parties or a class of parties as damages, restitution, or
refunds. However, if such payments to a class of parties in lieu of
damages, restitution, or refunds, such as payments under the doctrine
of cy pres, include a payment to a state agency, the expenditure of the
payment by the state agency shall be subject to this section;
(2) Fees or enforcement actions to collect fees, including
investigation or examination fees, that are established by
administrative rule or statute;
(3) Expenditures from accounts outside the state treasury,
including court registries, exclusively for purposes of remedial action
or natural resource damages under chapters 70.105D, 90.48, and 90.56
RCW, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq., or 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601 et seq., or
for purposes of financial assurance under chapter 70.95 or 70.105 RCW;
(4) Moneys recovered by the department of social and health
services for client services, benefits, or vendor overpayments or
moneys collected by the division of child support; and
(5) Expenditures from nonappropriated funds and accounts that are
specifically established by statute if the statute does not incorporate
a reference to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
Except as provided in section 1 of this act or as otherwise
provided by law, recoveries of amounts expended pursuant to an
appropriation, including but not limited to, payments for material
supplied or services rendered under chapter 39.34 RCW, may be expended
as part of the original appropriation of the fund to which such
recoveries belong, without further or additional appropriation. Such
expenditures shall be subject to conditions and procedures prescribed
by the director of financial management. The director may authorize
expenditures with respect to recoveries accrued but not received, in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, except that
such recoveries shall not be included in revenues or expended against
an appropriation for a subsequent fiscal period. This section does not
apply to the repayment of loans, except for loans between state
agencies.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.79.270 and 2005 c 319 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever any money, from the federal government, or from other
sources, which was not anticipated in the budget approved by the
legislature has actually been received and is designated to be spent
for a specific purpose, the head of any department, agency, board, or
commission through which such expenditure shall be made is to submit to
the governor a statement which may be in the form of a request for an
allotment amendment setting forth the facts constituting the need for
such expenditure and the estimated amount to be expended: PROVIDED,
That no expenditure shall be made in excess of the actual amount
received, ((and)) no money shall be expended for any purpose except the
specific purpose for which it was received, and no money shall be
expended under this section if an appropriation is required under
section 1 of this act. A copy of any proposal submitted to the
governor to expend money from an appropriated fund or account in excess
of appropriations provided by law which is based on the receipt of
unanticipated revenues shall be submitted to the joint legislative
audit and review committee and also to the standing committees on ways
and means of the house and senate if the legislature is in session at
the same time as it is transmitted to the governor.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, whenever money
from any source that was not anticipated in the transportation budget
approved by the legislature has actually been received and is
designated to be spent for a specific purpose, the head of a
department, agency, board, or commission through which the expenditure
must be made shall submit to the governor a statement, which may be in
the form of a request for an allotment amendment, setting forth the
facts constituting the need for the expenditure and the estimated
amount to be expended. However, no expenditure may be made in excess
of the actual amount received, and no money may be expended for any
purpose except the specific purpose for which it was received. A copy
of any proposal submitted to the governor to expend money from an
appropriated transportation fund or account in excess of appropriations
provided by law that is based on the receipt of unanticipated revenues
must be submitted, at a minimum, to the standing committees on
transportation of the house and senate at the same time as it is
transmitted to the governor.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.46.100 and 2004 c 276 s 903 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created the gambling revolving fund which shall
consist of all moneys receivable for licensing, penalties, forfeitures,
and all other moneys, income, or revenue received by the commission.
The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All moneys
received by the commission or any employee thereof, except for change
funds and an amount of petty cash as fixed by rule or regulation of the
commission, shall be deposited each day in a depository approved by the
state treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited
to the gambling revolving fund. Disbursements from the revolving fund
shall be on authorization of the commission or a duly authorized
representative thereof. In order to maintain an effective expenditure
and revenue control the gambling revolving fund shall be subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation shall be required to
permit expenditures and payment of obligations from such fund except as
provided in section 1 of this act. All expenses relative to commission
business, including but not limited to salaries and expenses of the
director and other commission employees shall be paid from the gambling
revolving fund.
During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the gambling revolving fund to the problem gambling treatment
account, contingent on enactment of chapter ..., Laws of 2004 (Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2776, problem gambling treatment). Also
during the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from
the gambling revolving fund to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the excess nontribal fund balance of the fund. The commission
shall not increase fees during the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium for the
purpose of restoring the excess fund balance transferred under this
section.

Sec. 5 RCW 15.13.470 and 2007 c 335 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 15.13.285 and in subsections (2),
(3), and (4) of this section, all moneys collected under this chapter
shall be paid to the director, deposited in an account within the
agricultural local fund, and used solely for carrying out this chapter.
Except as provided in section 1 of this act, no appropriation is
required for the disbursement of moneys from the account by the
director.
(2) All fees collected under RCW 15.13.310 shall be deposited in
the planting stock certification account within the agricultural local
fund to be used only for the Washington grapevine and fruit tree
certification and nursery improvement programs as set forth in this
chapter and chapter 15.14 RCW.
(3) All fees collected under RCW 15.13.311 shall be deposited in
the Christmas tree account within the agricultural local fund to be
used only for the Washington Christmas tree program as established
under this chapter, which may include market surveys and research
related to Christmas trees.
(4) All moneys collected for civil penalties under this chapter
shall be deposited in the nursery research account within the
agricultural local fund.

Sec. 6 RCW 15.13.470 and 2002 c 215 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 15.13.285 and in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section, all moneys collected under this chapter shall be
paid to the director, deposited in an account within the agricultural
local fund, and used solely for carrying out this chapter. Except as
provided in section 1 of this act, no appropriation is required for the
disbursement of moneys from the account by the director.
(2) All fees collected under RCW 15.13.310 shall be deposited in
the planting stock certification account within the agricultural local
fund to be used only for the Washington grapevine and fruit tree
certification and nursery improvement programs as set forth in this
chapter and chapter 15.14 RCW.
(3) All moneys collected for civil penalties under this chapter
shall be deposited in the nursery research account within the
agricultural local fund.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.160.050 and 2011 c 331 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) All certificate of competency holders that desire to
continue in the fire protection sprinkler business shall annually,
prior to January 1st, secure from the state director of fire protection
a renewal certificate of competency upon payment of the fee as
prescribed by the state director of fire protection. Application for
renewal shall be upon a form prescribed by the state director of fire
protection and the certificate holder shall furnish the information
required by the director.
(b) Failure of any certificate of competency holder to secure his
or her renewal certificate of competency within sixty days after the
due date shall constitute sufficient cause for the state director of
fire protection to suspend the certificate of competency.
(c) The state director of fire protection may, upon the receipt of
payment of all delinquent fees including a late charge, restore a
certificate of competency that has been suspended for failure to pay
the renewal fee.
(d) A certificate of competency holder may voluntarily surrender
his or her certificate of competency to the state director of fire
protection and be relieved of the annual renewal fee. After
surrendering the certificate of competency, he or she shall not be
known as a certificate of competency holder and shall desist from the
practice thereof. Within two years from the time of surrender of the
certificate of competency, he or she may again qualify for a
certificate of competency, without examination, by the payment of the
required fee. If two or more years have elapsed, he or she shall
return to the status of a new applicant.
(2)(a) All licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractors
desiring to continue to be licensed shall annually, prior to January
1st, secure from the state director of fire protection a renewal
license upon payment of the fee as prescribed by the state director of
fire protection. Application for renewal shall be upon a form
prescribed by the state director of fire protection and the license
holder shall furnish the information required by the director.
(b) Failure of any license holder to secure his or her renewal
license within sixty days after the due date shall constitute
sufficient cause for the state director of fire protection to suspend
the license.
(c) The state director of fire protection may, upon the receipt of
payment of all delinquent fees including a late charge, restore a
license that has been suspended for failure to pay the renewal fee.
(3) The initial certificate of competency or license fee shall be
prorated based upon the portion of the year such certificate of
competency or license is in effect, prior to renewal on January 1st.
(4) The fire protection contractor license fund is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from license and
certificate fees and charges or from the money generated by the rules
and regulations promulgated under this chapter shall be deposited into
the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only for purposes
authorized under this chapter and standards for fire protection and its
enforcement, with respect to all hospitals as required by RCW
70.41.080; for providing assistance in identifying fire sprinkler
system components that have been subject to either a recall or
voluntary replacement program by a manufacturer of fire sprinkler
products, a nationally recognized testing laboratory, or the federal
consumer product safety commission; and for use in developing and
publishing educational materials related to the effectiveness of
residential fire sprinklers. Assistance shall include, but is not
limited to, aiding in the identification of recalled components,
information sharing strategies aimed at ensuring the consumer is made
aware of recalls and voluntary replacement programs, and providing
training and assistance to local fire authorities, the fire sprinkler
industry, and the public. Only the state director of fire protection
or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund.
The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW((,
but)). Except as provided in section 1 of this act, no appropriation
is required for expenditures from the fund.

Sec. 8 RCW 19.146.228 and 2009 c 528 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall establish fees sufficient to cover, but not
exceed, the costs of administering this chapter. These fees may
include:
(1) An annual assessment paid by each licensee on or before a date
specified by rule;
(2) An investigation fee to cover the costs of any investigation of
the books and records of a licensee or other person subject to this
chapter; and
(3) An application fee to cover the costs of processing
applications made to the director under this chapter.
Mortgage brokers and loan originators shall not be charged
investigation fees for the processing of complaints when the
investigation determines that no violation of this chapter occurred or
when the mortgage broker or loan originator provides a remedy
satisfactory to the complainant and the director and no order of the
director is issued. All moneys, fees, and penalties collected under
the authority of this chapter shall be subject to section 1 of this act
and shall be deposited into the financial services regulation fund,
unless the consumer services account is created as a dedicated,
nonappropriated account, in which case all moneys, fees, and penalties
collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the consumer
services account.

Sec. 9 RCW 22.09.411 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 67 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby established a fund to be known as the grain
indemnity fund. The grain indemnity fund shall consist of assessments
remitted by licensees pursuant to the provisions of RCW 22.09.416
through 22.09.426.
(2) All assessments shall be paid to the department and shall be
deposited in the grain indemnity fund. The state treasurer shall be
the custodian of the grain indemnity fund. Disbursements shall be on
authorization of the director. Except as provided in section 1 of this
act, no appropriation is required for disbursements from this fund.
(3) The grain indemnity fund shall be used exclusively for purposes
of paying claimants pursuant to this chapter, and paying necessary
expenses of administering the grain indemnity fund, provided however,
that moneys equivalent to one-half of the interest earned by the fund
for deposit to the general fund may be paid to the department to defray
costs of administering the warehouse audit program. The state of
Washington shall not be liable for any claims presented against the
fund.

Sec. 10 RCW 22.09.830 and 1994 sp.s. c 6 s 901 and 1994 c 46 s 6
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All moneys collected as fees for weighing, grading, and
inspecting commodities and all other fees collected under the
provisions of this chapter, except as provided in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section, shall be deposited in the grain inspection
revolving fund, which is hereby established. The state treasurer is
the custodian of the revolving fund. Disbursements from the revolving
fund shall be on authorization of the director of the department of
agriculture. The revolving fund is subject to the allotment procedure
provided in chapter 43.88 RCW((, but)). Except as provided in section
1 of this act, no appropriation is required for disbursements from the
fund. The fund shall be used for all expenses directly incurred by the
grain inspection program in carrying out the provisions of this chapter
and for departmental administrative expenses during the 1993-95
biennium. The department may use so much of such fund not exceeding
five percent thereof as the director of agriculture may determine
necessary for research and promotional work, including rate studies,
relating to wheat and wheat products.
(2) All fees collected for the inspection, grading, and testing of
hops shall be deposited into the hop inspection fund, which is hereby
established, and shall be retained by the department for the purpose of
inspecting, grading, and testing hops. Any moneys in any fund retained
by the department on July 1, 1963, and derived from hop inspection and
grading shall be deposited to this hop inspection fund. For the
purposes of research which would contribute to the development of
superior hop varieties and to improve hop production and harvest
practices, the department may expend up to twenty percent of the moneys
deposited in the hop inspection fund during the fiscal year ending June
30th immediately preceding the year in which such expenditures are to
be made. No expenditures shall be made under the provisions of this
subsection when the hop inspection fund is, or the director may
reasonably anticipate that it will be, reduced below twenty thousand
dollars as the result of such expenditure or other necessary
expenditures made to carry out the inspection, grading, and testing of
hops.
(3) All moneys collected by the grain warehouse audit program,
including grain warehouse license fees pursuant to RCW 22.09.050 and
22.09.055, shall be deposited by the director into the grain warehouse
audit account, hereby created within the agricultural local fund
established in RCW 43.23.230. Moneys collected shall be used to
support the grain warehouse audit program.

Sec. 11 RCW 28C.10.082 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 85 are each amended
to read as follows:
The tuition recovery trust fund is hereby established in the
custody of the state treasurer. The agency shall deposit in the fund
all moneys received under RCW 28C.10.084. Moneys in the fund may be
spent only for the purposes under RCW 28C.10.084. Disbursements from
the fund shall be on authorization of the agency. The fund is subject
to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW((, but)).
Except as provided in section 1 of this act, no appropriation is
required for disbursements from the fund.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.10.200 and 1971 ex.s. c 71 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in section 1 of this act, court costs,
attorneys' fees, and other expenses recovered by the attorney general
shall be deposited in the legal services revolving fund and shall be
considered as returned loans of materials supplied or services
rendered. Such amounts may be expended in the same manner and under
the same conditions and restrictions as set forth in section 11,
chapter 282, Laws of 1969 ex. sess.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.10.220 and 2002 c 371 s 907 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in section 1 of this act, the attorney general
is authorized to expend from the antitrust revolving fund, created by
RCW 43.10.210 through 43.10.220, such funds as are necessary for the
payment of costs, expenses and charges incurred in the preparation,
institution and maintenance of antitrust actions under the state and
federal antitrust acts. During the 2001-03 fiscal biennium, the
attorney general may expend from the antitrust revolving fund for the
purposes of the consumer protection activities of the office.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.23.230 and 2011 c 204 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The agricultural local fund is hereby established in the
custody of the state treasurer. The fund shall consist of such money
as is directed by law for deposit in the fund, and such other money not
subject to appropriation that the department authorizes to be deposited
in the fund. Any money deposited in the fund, the use of which has
been restricted by law, may only be expended in accordance with those
restrictions. The department may make disbursements from the fund.
The fund is not subject to legislative appropriation except as provided
in section 1 of this act.
(2) There is created within the agricultural local fund the animal
disease traceability account which must be used to account for the
costs associated with the implementation of chapter 16.36 RCW.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.320.110 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 909 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is created a local fund known as the "financial services
regulation fund" which shall consist of all moneys received by the
divisions of the department of financial institutions, except for the
division of securities which shall deposit thirteen percent of all
moneys received, except as provided in RCW 43.320.115, and which shall
be used for the purchase of supplies and necessary equipment; the
payment of salaries, wages, and utilities; the establishment of
reserves; and other incidental costs required for the proper regulation
of individuals and entities subject to regulation by the department.
The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the fund. Disbursements
from the fund shall be on authorization of the director of financial
institutions or the director's designee. In order to maintain an
effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be subject in
all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW((, but)). Except as provided in
section 1 of this act, no appropriation is required to permit
expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.
During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the financial services regulation fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 16 RCW 43.70.340 and 1998 c 37 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The temporary worker housing fund is established in the custody
of the state treasury. The department shall deposit all funds received
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section and from the legislature
to administer a temporary worker housing permitting, licensing, and
inspection program conducted by the department. Disbursement from the
fund shall be on authorization of the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee. The fund is subject to the allotment procedure
provided under chapter 43.88 RCW((, but)). Except as provided in
section 1 of this act, no appropriation is required for disbursements.
(2) There is imposed a fee on each operating license issued by the
department to every operator of temporary worker housing that is
regulated by the state board of health. In establishing the fee to be
paid under this subsection the department shall consider the cost of
administering a license as well as enforcing applicable state board of
health rules on temporary worker housing.
(3) There is imposed a fee on each temporary worker housing
building permit issued by the department to every operator of temporary
worker housing as required by RCW 43.70.337. The fee shall include the
cost of administering a permit as well as enforcing the department's
temporary worker building code as adopted under RCW 70.114A.081.
(4) The department shall conduct a fee study for:
(a) A temporary worker housing operator's license;
(b) On-site inspections; and
(c) A plan review and building permit for new construction.
After completion of the study, the department shall adopt these
fees by rule by no later than December 31, 1998.
(5) The term of the operating license and the application
procedures shall be established, by rule, by the department.

Sec. 17 RCW 59.21.050 and 2011 c 158 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The existence of the mobile home park relocation fund in the
custody of the state treasurer is affirmed. Expenditures from the fund
may be used only for relocation assistance awarded under this chapter.
Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures
from the fund. All relocation payments to tenants shall be made from
the fund. The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW((, but)). Except as provided in section 1 of this act, no
appropriation is required for expenditures from the fund.
(2) A park tenant is eligible for assistance under this chapter
only after an application is submitted by that tenant or an
organization acting on the tenant's account under RCW 59.21.021(4) on
a form approved by the director which shall include:
(a) For those persons who maintained ownership of and relocated
their homes or removed their homes from the park: (i) A copy of the
notice from the park-owner, or other adequate proof, that the tenancy
is terminated due to closure of the park or its conversion to another
use; (ii) a copy of the rental agreement then in force, or other proof
that the applicant was a tenant at the time of notice of closure; (iii)
a copy of the contract for relocating the home which includes the date
of relocation, or other proof of actual relocation expenses incurred on
a date certain; and (iv) a statement of any other available assistance;
(b) For those persons who sold their homes and incurred no
relocation expenses: (i) A copy of the notice from the park-owner, or
other adequate proof, that the tenancy is terminated due to closure of
the park or its conversion to another use; (ii) a copy of the rental
agreement then in force, or other proof that the applicant was a tenant
at the time of notice of closure; and (iii) a copy of the record of
title transfer issued by the department of licensing when the tenant
sold the home rather than relocate it due to park closure or
conversion.
(3) The department may deduct a percentage amount of the fee
collected under RCW 46.17.155 for administration expenses incurred by
the department.

Sec. 18 RCW 70.47.030 and 2004 c 192 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The basic health plan trust account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Any nongeneral fund-state funds collected for this
program shall be deposited in the basic health plan trust account and
may be expended without further appropriation. Moneys in the account
shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter, including
payments to participating managed health care systems on behalf of
enrollees in the plan and payment of costs of administering the plan.
During the 1995-97 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
funds from the basic health plan trust account to the state general
fund.
(2) The basic health plan subscription account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from amounts due from or
on behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees and health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees shall be deposited into the account. Funds in the
account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter,
including payments to participating managed health care systems on
behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees and health coverage tax credit
eligible enrollees in the plan and payment of costs of administering
the plan. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW((, but)). Except as provided in section 1 of this act, no
appropriation is required for expenditures.
(3) The ((administrator)) director shall take every precaution to
see that none of the funds in the separate accounts created in this
section or that any premiums paid either by subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees are commingled in any way, except that the ((administrator))
director may combine funds designated for administration of the plan
into a single administrative account.

Sec. 19 RCW 15.36.454 and 1999 c 291 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 15.36.471 or subsection (2) or (3) of
this section, any person who fails to comply with this chapter or the
rules adopted under this chapter may be subject to a civil penalty in
an amount of not more than one thousand dollars per violation per day.
(2) The director shall adopt rules establishing civil penalties
assessed under RCW 15.36.111(1) and 15.36.201(2). The penalties shall
be equitably based on the volume of milk or milk product handled by the
producer or milk processor subject to the penalty.
(3) Whenever the results of an antibiotic, pesticide, or other drug
residue test on a producer's milk are above the actionable level
established in the PMO, the producer is subject to a civil penalty in
an amount equal to one-half the value of the sum of the volumes of milk
produced on the day prior to and the day of the adulteration. The
value of the milk shall be computed using the weighted average price
for the federal market order under which the milk is delivered.
(4) Each violation is a separate and distinct offense. The
director shall impose the civil penalty in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW. Except as otherwise provided in section 1 of this act,
moneys collected under this section and RCW 15.36.471 shall be remitted
to the department and deposited into the revolving fund of the
Washington state dairy products commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Except for section 6 of this act, this act
takes effect July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 Section 5 of this act expires July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Section 6 of this act takes effect July 1,
2014.

--- END ---