BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.102.020 and 2010 c 164 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Annual state contribution limit" means ((seven)) twelve
million five hundred thousand dollars statewide per fiscal year.
(2) "Assessed value" means the valuation of taxable real property
as placed on the last completed assessment roll.
(3) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board under
chapter 43.160 RCW.
(4) "Demonstration project" means one of the following projects:
(a) Bellingham waterfront redevelopment project;
(b) Spokane river district project at Liberty Lake; and
(c) Vancouver riverwest project.
(5) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(6) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning July 1st
and ending the following June 30th.
(7) "Local excise tax allocation revenue" means an amount of local
excise taxes equal to some or all of the sponsoring local government's
local excise tax increment, amounts of local excise taxes equal to some
or all of any participating local government's excise tax increment as
agreed upon in the written agreement under RCW 39.102.080(1), or both,
and dedicated to local infrastructure financing.
(8) "Local excise tax increment" means an amount equal to the
estimated annual increase in local excise taxes in each calendar year
following the approval of the revenue development area by the board
from taxable activity within the revenue development area, as set forth
in the application provided to the board under RCW 39.102.040, and
updated in accordance with RCW 39.102.140(1)(f).
(9) "Local excise taxes" means local revenues derived from the
imposition of sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030.
(10) "Local government" means any city, town, county, port
district, and any federally recognized Indian tribe.
(11) "Local infrastructure financing" means the use of revenues
received from local excise tax allocation revenues, local property tax
allocation revenues, other revenues from local public sources, and
revenues received from the local option sales and use tax authorized in
RCW 82.14.475, dedicated to pay either the principal and interest on
bonds authorized under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public improvement
costs on a pay-as-you-go basis subject to RCW 39.102.195, or both.
(12) "Local property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the receipt of regular property taxes levied on
the property tax allocation revenue value and used for local
infrastructure financing.
(13) "Low-income housing" means residential housing for low-income
persons or families who lack the means which is necessary to enable
them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe, and
sanitary dwellings, without overcrowding. For the purposes of this
subsection, "low income" means income that does not exceed eighty
percent of the median family income for the standard metropolitan
statistical area in which the revenue development area is located.
(14) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government.
(15) "Participating local government" means a local government
having a revenue development area within its geographic boundaries that
has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring local government
as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of all or some of its
local excise tax allocation revenues or other revenues from local
public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(16) "Participating taxing district" means a local government
having a revenue development area within its geographic boundaries that
has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring local government
as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of some or all of its
local property tax allocation revenues or other revenues from local
public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(17) "Property tax allocation revenue base value" means the
assessed value of real property located within a revenue development
area less the property tax allocation revenue value.
(18)(a)(i) "Property tax allocation revenue value" means
seventy-five percent of any increase in the assessed value of real
property in a revenue development area resulting from:
(A) The placement of new construction, improvements to property, or
both, on the assessment roll, where the new construction and
improvements are initiated after the revenue development area is
approved by the board;
(B) The cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as provided in RCW
84.14.020, and the new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements are initiated after the revenue development
area is approved by the board;
(C) The cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as
provided in RCW 84.26.070, and the rehabilitation is initiated after
the revenue development area is approved by the board.
(ii) Increases in the assessed value of real property in a revenue
development area resulting from (a)(i)(A) through (C) of this
subsection are included in the property tax allocation revenue value in
the initial year. These same amounts are also included in the property
tax allocation revenue value in subsequent years unless the property
becomes exempt from property taxation.
(b) "Property tax allocation revenue value" includes seventy-five
percent of any increase in the assessed value of new construction
consisting of an entire building in the years following the initial
year, unless the building becomes exempt from property taxation.
(c) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "property tax
allocation revenue value" does not include any increase in the assessed
value of real property after the initial year.
(d) There is no property tax allocation revenue value if the
assessed value of real property in a revenue development area has not
increased as a result of any of the reasons specified in (a)(i)(A)
through (C) of this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, "initial year" means:
(i) For new construction and improvements to property added to the
assessment roll, the year during which the new construction and
improvements are initially placed on the assessment roll;
(ii) For the cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW, the year when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of levying taxes for
collection in the following year; and
(iii) For the cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when
such cost is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55
RCW, the year when such cost is treated as new construction for
purposes of levying taxes for collection in the following year.
(19) "Public improvement costs" means the cost of: (a) Design,
planning, acquisition including land acquisition, site preparation
including land clearing, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation,
improvement, and installation of public improvements; (b) demolishing,
relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending construction of
public improvements; (c) the local government's portion of relocating
utilities as a result of public improvements; (d) financing public
improvements, including interest during construction, legal and other
professional services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs
on general indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any
necessary reserves for general indebtedness; (e) assessments incurred
in revaluing real property for the purpose of determining the property
tax allocation revenue base value that are in excess of costs incurred
by the assessor in accordance with the revaluation plan under chapter
84.41 RCW, and the costs of apportioning the taxes and complying with
this chapter and other applicable law; (f) administrative expenses and
feasibility studies reasonably necessary and related to these costs;
and (g) any of the above-described costs that may have been incurred
before adoption of the ordinance authorizing the public improvements
and the use of local infrastructure financing to fund the costs of the
public improvements.
(20) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the revenue development area
that include:
(i) Street, bridge, and road construction and maintenance,
including highway interchange construction;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements,
including wastewater reuse facilities;
(iii) Sidewalks, traffic controls, and streetlights;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas, including trails;
((and))
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems; and
(viii) Passenger facilities, structures, stops, shelters, bus
zones, properties, and rights-of-way of all kinds that are owned,
leased, held, or used by a transit authority for the purpose of
providing public transportation services;
(b) Expenditures for facilities and improvements that support
affordable housing as defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
(21) "Real property" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.04.090 and
also includes any privately owned improvements located on publicly
owned land that are subject to property taxation.
(22) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as
defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied by
public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making
required payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness;
(b) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of the
common schools under RCW 84.52.065; and (c) regular property taxes
authorized by RCW 84.55.050 that are limited to a specific purpose.
"Regular property taxes" do not include excess property tax levies that
are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and senior taxing
districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.
(23) "Relocating a business" means the closing of a business and
the reopening of that business, or the opening of a new business that
engages in the same activities as the previous business, in a different
location within a one-year period, when an individual or entity has an
ownership interest in the business at the time of closure and at the
time of opening or reopening. "Relocating a business" does not include
the closing and reopening of a business in a new location where the
business has been acquired and is under entirely new ownership at the
new location, or the closing and reopening of a business in a new
location as a result of the exercise of the power of eminent domain.
(24) "Revenue development area" means the geographic area adopted
by a sponsoring local government and approved by the board, from which
local excise and property tax allocation revenues are derived for local
infrastructure financing.
(25)(a) "Revenues from local public sources" means:
(i) Amounts of local excise tax allocation revenues and local
property tax allocation revenues, dedicated by sponsoring local
governments, participating local governments, and participating taxing
districts, for local infrastructure financing; and
(ii) Any other local revenues, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, including revenues derived from federal and private
sources.
(b) Revenues from local public sources do not include any local
funds derived from state grants, state loans, or any other state moneys
including any local sales and use taxes credited against the state
sales and use taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.
(26) "Small business" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
19.85.020.
(27) "Sponsoring local government" means a city, town, or county,
and for the purpose of this chapter a federally recognized Indian tribe
or any combination thereof, that adopts a revenue development area and
applies to the board to use local infrastructure financing.
(28) "State contribution" means the lesser of:
(a) One million dollars;
(b) The total amount of local excise tax allocation revenues, local
property tax allocation revenues, and other revenues from local public
sources, that are dedicated by a sponsoring local government, any
participating local governments, and participating taxing districts, in
the preceding calendar year to the payment of principal and interest on
bonds issued under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public improvement costs on
a pay-as-you-go basis subject to RCW 39.102.195, or both;
(c) The amount of project award granted by the board in the notice
of approval to use local infrastructure financing under RCW 39.102.040;
or
(d) The highest amount of state excise tax allocation revenues and
state property tax allocation revenues for any one calendar year as
determined by the sponsoring local government and reported to the board
and the department as required by RCW 39.102.140.
(29) "State excise tax allocation revenue" means an amount equal to
the annual increase in state excise taxes estimated to be received by
the state in each calendar year following the approval of the revenue
development area by the board, from taxable activity within the revenue
development area as set forth in the application provided to the board
under RCW 39.102.040 and periodically updated and reported as required
in RCW 39.102.140(1)(f).
(30) "State excise taxes" means revenues derived from state retail
sales and use taxes under RCW 82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020 at the rate
provided in RCW 82.08.020(1), less the amount of tax distributions from
all local retail sales and use taxes, other than the local sales and
use taxes authorized by RCW 82.14.475 for the applicable revenue
development area, imposed on the same taxable events that are credited
against the state retail sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW.
(31) "State property tax allocation revenue" means an amount equal
to the estimated tax revenues derived from the imposition of property
taxes levied by the state for the support of common schools under RCW
84.52.065 on the property tax allocation revenue value, as set forth in
the application submitted to the board under RCW 39.102.040 and updated
annually in the report required under RCW 39.102.140(1)(f).
(32) "Taxing district" means a government entity that levies or has
levied for it regular property taxes upon real property located within
a proposed or approved revenue development area.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.102.030 and 2006 c 181 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
The local infrastructure financing tool program is created to
assist local governments in financing authorized public infrastructure
projects designed to promote economic development and increase jobs in
the jurisdiction. The local infrastructure financing tool program is
not created to enable existing Washington-based businesses from outside
a revenue development area to relocate into a revenue development area.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.102.040 and 2007 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to applying to the board to use local infrastructure
financing, a sponsoring local government ((shall)) must:
(a) Designate a revenue development area within the limitations in
RCW 39.102.060;
(b) Certify that the conditions in RCW 39.102.070 are met;
(c) Complete the process in RCW 39.102.080;
(d) Provide public notice as required in RCW 39.102.100; and
(e) Pass an ordinance adopting the revenue development area as
required in RCW 39.102.090.
(2) Any local government that has created an increment area under
chapter 39.89 RCW and has not issued bonds to finance any public
improvement may apply to the board and have its increment area
considered for approval as a revenue development area under this
chapter without adopting a new revenue development area under RCW
39.102.090 and 39.102.100 if it amends its ordinance to comply with RCW
39.102.090(1) and otherwise meets the conditions and limitations under
this chapter.
(3) As a condition to imposing a sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.475, a sponsoring local government, including any cosponsoring
local government seeking authority to impose a sales and use tax under
RCW 82.14.475, must apply to the board and be approved for a project
award amount. The application ((shall)) must be in a form and manner
prescribed by the board and include but not be limited to information
establishing that the applicant is an eligible candidate to impose the
local sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.475, the anticipated effective
date for imposing the tax, the estimated number of years that the tax
will be imposed, and the estimated amount of tax revenue to be received
in each fiscal year that the tax will be imposed. The board ((shall))
must make available forms to be used for this purpose. As part of the
application, each applicant must provide to the board a copy of the
ordinance or ordinances creating the revenue development area as
required in RCW 39.102.090. A notice of approval to use local
infrastructure financing ((shall)) must contain a project award that
represents the maximum amount of state contribution that the applicant,
including any cosponsoring local governments, can earn each year that
local infrastructure financing is used. The total of all project
awards ((shall)) may not exceed the annual state contribution limit.
The determination of a project award ((shall)) must be made based on
information contained in the application and the remaining amount of
annual state contribution limit to be awarded. Determination of a
project award by the board is final.
(4)(a) Sponsoring local governments, and any cosponsoring local
governments, applying in calendar year 2007 for a competitive project
award, must submit completed applications to the board no later than
July 1, 2007. By September 15, 2007, in consultation with the
department of revenue and the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce, the board ((shall)) must approve
competitive project awards from competitive applications submitted by
the 2007 deadline. No more than two million five hundred thousand
dollars in competitive project awards shall be approved in 2007. For
projects not approved by the board in 2007, sponsoring and cosponsoring
local governments may apply again to the board in 2008 for approval of
a project.
(b) Sponsoring local governments, and any cosponsoring local
governments, applying in calendar year 2008 for a competitive project
award, must submit completed applications to the board no later than
July 1, 2008. By September 18, 2008, in consultation with the
department of revenue and the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce, the board ((shall)) must approve
competitive project awards from competitive applications submitted by
the 2008 deadline.
(c) Sponsoring local governments, and any cosponsoring local
governments, applying in calendar year 2012 for a competitive project
award, must submit completed applications to the board no later than
July 1, 2012. By September 15, 2012, in consultation with the
department of revenue and the department of commerce, the board must
approve competitive project awards from competitive applications
submitted by the 2012 deadline. The board, in consultation with the
Washington state economic development commission must assign relative
weights to the selection criteria and include it in the application
process. No more than five million dollars in competitive project
awards may be approved in 2012.
(5) Except as provided in RCW 39.102.050(2), a total of no more
than ((five)) ten million dollars in competitive project awards
((shall)) may be approved for local infrastructure financing.
(((d))) (6) The project selection criteria and weighting developed
prior to July 22, 2007, for the application evaluation and approval
process shall apply to applications received prior to November 1, 2007.
In evaluating applications for a competitive project award after
November 1, 2007, the board ((shall)) must, in consultation with the
Washington state economic development commission, develop the relative
weight to be assigned to the following criteria:
(((i))) (a) The project's potential to enhance the sponsoring local
government's regional and/or international competitiveness;
(((ii))) (b) The project's ability to encourage mixed use and
transit-oriented development and the redevelopment of a geographic
area;
(((iii))) (c) Achieving an overall distribution of projects
statewide that reflect geographic diversity;
(((iv))) (d) The estimated wages and benefits for the project is
greater than the average labor market area;
(((v))) (e) The estimated state and local net employment change
over the life of the project;
(((vi))) (f) The current economic health and vitality of the
proposed revenue development area and the contiguous community and the
estimated impact of the proposed project on the proposed revenue
development area and contiguous community;
(((vii))) (g) The estimated state and local net property tax change
over the life of the project;
(((viii))) (h) The estimated state and local sales and use tax
increase over the life of the project;
(((ix))) (i) An analysis that shows that, over the life of the
project, neither the local excise tax allocation revenues nor the local
property tax allocation revenues will constitute more than eighty
percent of the total local funds as described in RCW
39.102.020(((29)(c))); ((and
(x))) (j) If a project is located within an urban growth area,
evidence that the project utilizes existing urban infrastructure and
that the transportation needs of the project will be adequately met
through the use of local infrastructure financing or other sources; and
(k) In evaluating applications for a competitive project award
after June 30, 2012, the following project selection criteria must also
be used:
(i) The project's potential to enhance the sponsoring local
government's competitiveness in manufacturing, technology, or other
industry sector or cluster targeted by the department of commerce under
RCW 43.330.090;
(ii) The estimated wages and benefits for the project created in
the middle-income bracket or higher as defined in RCW 28B.145.060
projected annually and over the life of the project;
(iii) The estimated state and local net employment change for
positions with wages and benefits in the middle-income bracket or
higher projected annually and over the life of the project;
(iv) The project's potential to assist a local government in
implementing its comprehensive plan, capital facilities plan, or
planning goals adopted under the growth management act; and
(v) The project's potential to redevelop a brownfield that is
certified by the department of ecology as requiring no further
remediation.
(((e)(i))) (7)(a) Except as provided in this subsection (((4)(e))),
the board may not approve the use of local infrastructure financing
within more than one revenue development area per county.
(((ii))) (b) In a county in which the board has approved the use of
local infrastructure financing, the use of such financing in additional
revenue development areas may be approved, subject to the following
conditions:
(((A))) (i) The sponsoring local government is located in more than
one county; and
(((B))) (ii) The sponsoring local government designates a revenue
development area that comprises portions of a county within which the
use of local infrastructure financing has not yet been approved.
(((iii))) (c) In a county where the local infrastructure financing
tool is authorized under RCW 39.102.050, the board may approve
additional use of the local infrastructure financing tool.
(((5))) (8) Once the board has approved the sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local governments, to use local
infrastructure financing, notification must be sent by the board to the
sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local governments,
authorizing the sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local
governments, to impose the local sales and use tax authorized under RCW
82.14.475, subject to the conditions in RCW 82.14.475.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.102.070 and 2009 c 267 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The use of local infrastructure financing under this chapter is
subject to the following conditions:
(1) No funds may be used to finance, design, acquire, construct,
equip, operate, maintain, remodel, repair, or reequip public facilities
funded with taxes collected under RCW 82.14.048 or 82.14.390;
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection no funds may be
used for public improvements other than projects identified within the
capital facilities, utilities, housing, or transportation element of a
comprehensive plan required under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(b) Funds may be used for public improvements that are historical
preservation activities as defined in RCW 39.89.020;
(3) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in
part using local infrastructure financing are expected to encourage
private development within the revenue development area and to increase
the fair market value of real property within the revenue development
area;
(4) A sponsoring local government, participating local government,
or participating taxing district has entered or expects to enter into
a contract with a private developer relating to the development of
private improvements within the revenue development area or has
received a letter of intent from a private developer relating to the
developer's plans for the development of private improvements within
the revenue development area;
(5) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the
revenue development area, as a result of the public improvements, will
be consistent with the countywide planning policy adopted by the county
under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's comprehensive plan and
development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW. For projects
awarded under RCW 39.102.040(4)(c), the revenue development area must
include, but not be limited to, land uses designated for commercial,
industrial, or manufacturing uses under the comprehensive plan and
development regulations;
(6) The governing body of the sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local government, must make a finding that local
infrastructure financing:
(a) Is not expected to be used for the purpose of relocating a
business from outside the revenue development area, but within this
state, into the revenue development area; and
(b) Will improve the viability of existing business entities within
the revenue development area;
(7) The governing body of the sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local government, finds that the public improvements
proposed to be financed in whole or in part using local infrastructure
financing are reasonably likely to:
(a) Increase private residential and commercial investment within
the revenue development area;
(b) Increase employment within the revenue development area;
(c) Improve the viability of any existing communities that are
based on mixed-use development within the revenue development area; and
(d) Generate, over the period of time that the local option sales
and use tax will be imposed under RCW 82.14.475, state excise tax
allocation revenues and state property tax allocation revenues derived
from the revenue development area that are equal to or greater than the
respective state contributions made under this chapter;
(8) The sponsoring local government may only use local
infrastructure financing in areas deemed in need of economic
development or redevelopment within boundaries of the sponsoring local
government.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.102.140 and 2009 c 518 s 12 and 2009 c 267 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government ((shall)) must provide a report
to the board and the department by March 1st of each year. The report
((shall)) must contain the following information:
(a) The amount of local excise tax allocation revenues, local
property tax allocation revenues, other revenues from local public
sources, and taxes under RCW 82.14.475 received by the sponsoring local
government during the preceding calendar year that were dedicated to
pay the public improvements financed in whole or in part with local
infrastructure financing, and a summary of how these revenues were
expended;
(b) The names of any businesses locating within the revenue
development area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by
the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with
local infrastructure financing;
(c) The total number of permanent jobs created in the revenue
development area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by
the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with
local infrastructure financing;
(d) The average wages and benefits received by all employees of
businesses locating within the revenue development area as a result of
the public improvements undertaken by the sponsoring local government
and financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure financing;
(e) That the sponsoring local government is in compliance with RCW
39.102.070; ((and))
(f) Beginning with the reports due March 1, 2010, the following
must also be included:
(i) A list of public improvements financed on a pay-as-you-go basis
in previous calendar years and by indebtedness issued under this
chapter;
(ii) The date when any indebtedness issued under this chapter is
expected to be retired;
(iii) At least once every three years, updated estimates of state
excise tax allocation revenues, state property tax allocation revenues,
and local excise tax increments, as determined by the sponsoring local
government, that are estimated to have been received by the state, any
participating local government, sponsoring local government, and
cosponsoring local government, since the approval of the project award
under RCW 39.102.040 by the board; and
(iv) Any other information required by the department or the board
to enable the department or the board to fulfill its duties under this
chapter and RCW 82.14.475; and
(g) Reports on projects funded under RCW 39.102.040(5) must also
include:
(i) A comparison between the total number of permanent jobs with
wages and benefits in the middle-income bracket or higher created in
the revenue development area as a result of the public improvements
undertaken by the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or
in part with local infrastructure financing, and the number proposed in
the application process; and
(ii) A comparison between the average wages and benefits received
by all employees of businesses locating within the revenue development
area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by the
sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with local
infrastructure financing, and the estimated wages and benefits for the
project created in the middle-income bracket or higher projected in the
application process.
(2) The board ((shall)) must make a report available to the public
and the legislature by June 1st of each even-numbered year. The report
((shall)) must include a list of public improvements undertaken by
sponsoring local governments and financed in whole or in part with
local infrastructure financing and it ((shall)) must also include a
summary of the information provided to the department by sponsoring
local governments under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The department, upon request, must assist a sponsoring local
government in estimating the amount of state excise tax allocation
revenues and local excise tax increments required in subsection
(1)(f)(iii) of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.102.904 and 2006 c 181 s 707 are each amended to
read as follows:
This act expires June 30, ((2039)) 2045.

--- END ---