BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Business licensing system" and "business license" have the
same meaning as in RCW 19.02.020.
(2) "City" means a city, town, or code city.
(3) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(4)(a) "Employee" means any individual:
(i) Who is considered an employee under the statutory or common law
of this state;
(ii) Who is considered an employee or worker by the department of
labor and industries;
(iii) Whose wages are reported by his or her employer to the
employment security department for purposes of contributions payable
under chapter 50.24 RCW;
(iv) Who is a sole proprietor of a business; or
(v) Who is an owner, officer, partner, member, manager, or trustee
of a business entity. For purposes of this subsection, "manager" means
a person designated as such by a limited liability company, limited
liability partnership, or similar business entity, in the entity's
certificate of formation or similar governing documents.
(b) An individual that falls within any provision in (a) of this
subsection (4) is an employee regardless of whether that individual is
employed full-time or part-time; is employed on a permanent or
temporary basis; or receives wages, salary, commission, or other form
of remuneration from his or her employer.
(c) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this subsection
(4), an individual who is merely a passive investor in a business and
does not perform any services or activities as an agent of the business
is not an employee.
(d) An individual performing services in his or her capacity as a
director of a corporation or other entity is not an employee of the
entity if the individual does not otherwise fall within the provisions
of (a) of this subsection (4).
(5) "General business license" means a license, not including a
regulatory license, that a city requires all or most businesses to
obtain in order to conduct business within the city. For purposes of
this subsection (5), "regulatory license" means a license that a city
requires only for certain types of businesses, such as taxicab or other
for-hire vehicle operators, adult entertainment businesses, amusement
device operators, massage parlors, debt collectors, door-to-door sales
persons, trade-show operators, and home-based businesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By July 1, 2020, all cities that are
required to participate under subsection (2) of this section must have
their general business licenses issued and renewed, if the license is
required to be renewed, through the business and licensing system in
accordance with chapter 19.02 RCW.
(2)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, the association of
Washington cities, as a representative of the cities, must determine
which cities are required to participate in issuing and renewing their
general business licenses through the business and licensing system in
accordance with chapter 19.02 RCW under this section.
(b) The association of Washington cities must select additional
cities to participate each year beginning with the year in which this
section takes effect through 2020. Unless provided otherwise in
subsection (4) of this section, all cities must be participating in the
business and licensing system in accordance with chapter 19.02 RCW as
provided in this section by no later than July 1, 2020.
(3) In establishing a schedule for assuming the issuance and
renewal of general business licenses under this section, the department
must work with the affected cities and/or the association of Washington
cities, as a representative of the affected cities, to determine
collaboratively based upon substantial input from the affected cities
and/or the association of Washington cities such schedule.
(4) The department may delay or phase-in the issuance and renewal
of general business licenses beyond the date provided in subsection (1)
of this section if funding or other resources are insufficient to
enable the department to meet the deadline in subsection (1) of this
section or as necessary to ensure the business licensing system is
adequately prepared to handle all general business licenses and that
the transition to mandatory department issuance and renewal of general
business licenses is as seamless as possible.
(5) Cities may continue to issue and renew their general business
licenses until those licenses have been incorporated into the business
licensing system. A city whose general business license has been
incorporated into the business licensing system may no longer issue and
renew those licenses.
(6) For purposes of this section, "business and occupation tax" has
the same meaning as in RCW 35.102.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) By the time that a city's general
business license is required to be issued and renewed through the
business licensing system, the license is subject to all of the
provisions of this section.
(2)(a) A city may use only the following types of fees for general
business licenses:
(i) A flat fee as established by the city;
(ii) A flat fee calculated by multiplying a specific dollar amount
by the quotient resulting from dividing the total hours worked by the
business's employees located within the city by one thousand nine
hundred twenty; or
(iii) A range of flat fees where the determination of the
applicable fee is based on the quotient resulting from dividing the
total hours worked by the business's employees located within the city
by one thousand nine hundred twenty.
(b) A city may not use a combination of fees described in (a)(i)
through (iii) of this subsection (2) for its general business license.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, a flat fee for a general
business license must be the same amount for all businesses or for all
businesses within a specified fee range.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, an employee of a staffing firm
is not considered to be an employee of any client of the staffing firm
to whom the employee is assigned. To the extent that a staffing firm
assigns its employees to work in any city that imposes a licensing fee
as authorized in (a) of this subsection (2), the staffing firm is
subject to a licensing fee in such city even if the staffing firm is
not otherwise physically located in that city. For purposes of this
subsection (2)(d), "staffing firm" means a person providing "staffing
services" as defined in RCW 82.04.540.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, a covered employee is not
considered to be an employee of the professional employer organization
with which the individual has a coemployment relationship. Rather, the
covered employee is deemed the sole employee of the client. The
definitions in RCW 82.04.540 apply to this subsection (2)(e).
(f) For purposes of the fees authorized in (a)(ii) and (iii) of
this subsection (2):
(i) Hours worked are for the twelve-month period ending the last
day of the month immediately preceding the month in which the license
for which the fee is imposed takes effect, except that new businesses
must make a reasonable estimation of the hours that their employees
located within the city will work in the city during the twelve-month
period beginning on the date that the license for which the fee is
imposed will take effect; and
(ii) It must be presumed that any employee that works in a city for
any part of a twelve-month period has worked for at least one thousand
nine hundred twenty hours in that city during that twelve-month period
unless the individual's employer has records establishing that the
employee worked more or fewer than one thousand nine hundred twenty
hours in that city during that twelve-month period.
(g) For purposes of (a)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection (2), an
employee is located in a city if the employee:
(i) Spends any amount of time in the city on behalf of his or her
employer, even if most of the employee's work time is spent outside of
the city; or
(ii) Does not spend any time in the city on behalf of his or her
employer; but the employee's work is directed or managed by the
employer primarily from a location within the city, and the employer is
not required to pay a general business license fee to any other city in
which the employee performs services for the employer.
(3)(a) A general business license may not be renewed more
frequently than once per year except that the department may require a
more frequent renewal date as may be necessary to synchronize the
renewal date for the general business license with the business's
business license expiration date.
(b) In establishing a procedure to synchronize renewal dates for
general business licenses under this section with other licenses, the
department must work with the affected cities and/or the association of
Washington cities, as a representative of the affected cities, to
determine collaboratively based upon substantial input from the
affected cities and/or the association of Washington cities such
procedure.
(4) The business licensing system need not accommodate any monetary
penalty imposed by a city for failing to obtain or renew a general
business license. The penalty imposed in RCW 19.02.085 applies to
general business licenses that are not renewed by their expiration
date.
(5) The department may refuse to administer any provision of a city
ordinance that is inconsistent with this chapter. This authority
includes refusing to issue or renew a city's general business license.
Within five working days following the department's refusal to
administer a provision of a city's licensing ordinance, the department
must provide notice to the city of the department's refusal and the
reasons therefore.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department is not authorized to enforce
a city's licensing laws except to the extent of issuing or renewing a
license in accordance with this chapter and chapter 19.02 RCW or
refusing to issue a license due to an incomplete application,
nonpayment of the appropriate licensing fee as indicated by the license
application or renewal application, or the nonpayment of any applicable
penalty for late renewal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Cities whose general business licenses are
issued through the business licensing system retain the authority to
provide exemptions and thresholds for these licenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Provisions relating to requiring a nexus
between the city issuing the general business license and a person
obtaining or renewing a license from such city in order for the city to
issue or renew the license must be established in accordance with the
proposed recommendations from the work group established in RCW
82.32.--- (section 9, chapter . . ., Laws of 2012 (House Bill No. . . .
(H-4271/12))).
(2)(a) If House Bill No. . . . (H-4271/12) is not enacted by the
2012 legislature, then any provisions relating to requiring a nexus
under this chapter must be developed by a work group hereby created to
review and make recommendations in regards to such provisions.
(b) The work group created under this section must consist of the
following members:
(i) Three members representing cities, appointed by the association
of Washington cities;
(ii) Three members representing the business community, appointed
by the Washington state chamber of commerce; and
(iii) One member representing the department, to serve as a voting
chair, to be appointed by the department.
(c) The work group must prepare and provide recommendations in the
form of implementing legislation to the appropriate fiscal committees
of both the house of representatives and the senate by December 15,
2012.
(d) The recommendations prepared by the work group under this
section:
(i) Must be the result of the collaborative and cooperative efforts
of the work group members; and
(ii) Must include proposed legislation that addresses the issue of
nexus in relation to issuance and renewal of general business licenses
between the licensee and the issuing city.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A general business license change enacted by
a city whose general business license is issued through the business
licensing system takes effect no sooner than seventy-five days after
the department receives notice of the change and only on the first day
of January, April, July, or October, if the change affects in any way
who must obtain a license, who is exempt from obtaining a license, or
the amount or method of determining any fee for the issuance or renewal
of a license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 19.02 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must offer applicants the ability to submit
applications for general business licenses or their renewal
electronically. The department must also offer an option for
application and renewal fees for general business licenses to be paid
electronically. For purposes of this section, "general business
license" has the same meaning as in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

--- END ---