BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that during difficult
fiscal times it must prioritize scarce resources so as to provide the
best outcomes for the citizenry of our state. Furthermore, as the
recent state supreme court decision in McCleary v. State reiterated,
the state has fallen short of its paramount duty to fully and amply
fund our public school system. The legislature also finds that
legislation initiating comprehensive K-12 education funding reform has
been enacted in the last several years, which will require additional
regular and dependable state resources. Therefore, the legislature
intends to repeal the nonresident sales tax exemption and direct the
increased resources to K-12 public education to further achieve its
constitutional and statutory obligations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.0273 (Exemptions -- Sales to
nonresidents of tangible personal property, digital goods, and digital
codes for use outside the state -- Proof of nonresident status--Penalties) and 2011 c 7 s 1, 2010 c 106 s 215, 2009 c 535 s 512, 2007
c 135 s 2, 2003 c 53 s 399, 1993 c 444 s 1, 1988 c 96 s 1, 1982 1st
ex.s. c 5 s 1, & 1980 c 37 s 39 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
By May 1, 2013, and by May 1st of every year thereafter, the
department must annually estimate the increase in state revenue for the
prior calendar year resulting from the repeal of RCW 82.08.0273 under
section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of 2012 (section 2 of this act) and
certify the estimated amount to the state treasurer. By July 1, 2013,
and by July 1st of every year thereafter, the state treasurer must
transfer the amount into the all-day kindergarten account hereby
created in the state treasury. Money in the account may only be used
to fund all-day kindergarten.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---