BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4292 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 301 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
by those engaged in banking, loan, security or other financial
businesses, interest received on investments or loans primarily secured
by first mortgages or trust deeds on nontransient residential
properties.
(2) Interest deductible under this section includes the portion of
fees charged to borrowers, including points and loan origination fees,
that is recognized over the life of the loan as an adjustment to yield
in the taxpayer's books and records according to generally accepted
accounting principles.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section notwithstanding, the
following is a nonexclusive list of items that are not deductible under
this section:
(a) Fees for specific services such as: Document preparation fees;
finder fees; brokerage fees; title examination fees; fees for credit
checks; notary fees; loan application fees; interest lock-in fees if
the loan is not made; servicing fees; and similar fees or amounts;
(b) Fees received in consideration for an agreement to make funds
available for a specific period of time at specified terms, commonly
referred to as commitment fees;
(c) Any other fees, or portion of a fee, that is not recognized
over the life of the loan as an adjustment to yield in the taxpayer's
books and records according to generally accepted accounting
principles;
(d) Gains on the sale of valuable rights such as service release
premiums, which are amounts received when servicing rights are sold;
and
(e) Gains on the sale of loans, except deferred loan origination
fees and points deductible under subsection (2) of this section, are
not to be considered part of the proceeds of sale of the loan.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, in computing
tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax by those engaged in
banking, loan, security, or other financial businesses, amounts
received for servicing loans primarily secured by first mortgages or
trust deeds on nontransient residential properties, including such
loans that secure mortgage-backed or mortgage-related securities, but
only if:
(a)(i) The loans were originated by the person claiming a deduction
under this subsection (4) and that person either sold the loans on the
secondary market or securitized the loans and sold the securities on
the secondary market; or
(ii)(A) The person claiming a deduction under this subsection (4)
acquired the loans from the person that originated the loans through a
merger or acquisition of substantially all of the assets of the person
who originated the loans, or the person claiming a deduction under this
subsection (4) is affiliated with the person that originated the loans.
For purposes of this subsection, "affiliated" means under common
control. "Control" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of
more than fifty percent of the power to direct or cause the direction
of the management and policies of a person, whether through the
ownership of voting shares, by contract, or otherwise; and
(B) Either the person who originated the loans or the person
claiming a deduction under this subsection (4) sold the loans on the
secondary market or securitized the loans and sold the securities on
the secondary market; and
(b) The amounts received for servicing the loans are determined by
a percentage of the interest paid by the borrower and are only received
if the borrower makes interest payments.
(5)(a) The deductions provided in this section are not available to
any person that is located in more than ten states.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) A person is located in a state if:
(A) The person or an affiliate of the person maintains a branch,
office, or one or more employees or representatives in the state; and
(B) The person's or the affiliate of the person's in-state presence
allows borrowers or potential borrowers to contact the branch, office,
employee, or representative concerning the acquiring, negotiating,
renegotiating, or restructuring of, or making payments on, mortgages
issued or to be issued by the person or an affiliate of the person.
(ii) "Affiliate" means a person is "affiliated," as defined in
subsection (4) of this section, with another person.
(6) By June 30, 2015, the joint legislative audit and review
committee must review the deductions provided in this section in
accordance with RCW 43.136.055 and make a recommendation as to whether
the deductions should be continued without modification, modified, or
terminated immediately.
(7) The amendatory changes in section 1, chapter . . ., Laws of
2012 (this section) expire on the date in which any provision of this
section is invalidated by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a final
judgment not subject to appeal, on the basis of a violation of the
state or federal constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of revenue must provide
written notice of the expiration date of section 1 of this act to
affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the
secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as
deemed appropriate by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---