BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In section 1, chapter 22, Laws of 2011 1st
sp. sess., the legislature stated that it "does not wish to narrow the
high school science curriculum to a singular focus on biology." The
legislature finds that the unusual reality of only one science end-of-course test, namely in biology, required for graduation for the class
of 2015 does narrow the focus and creates an unintended consequence
that runs counter to other educational goals of the state of
Washington.
The high stakes graduation requirement for biology has resulted in
some schools letting go physics instructors in favor of biology
instructors. The artificial emphasis on biology caused by the
graduation requirement also prevents teachers from spending time
teaching nonbiology science subjects that are known to be necessary for
students in today's world. Science teachers are experiencing the
pressure from the high stakes nature of the one biology test, which
creates an overwhelming concentration of staff, time, and resources
into that one subject to the exclusion of physical, earth, and space
sciences, and engineering.
The legislature is also aware that next generation science
standards developed from the framework for science education will be
released for adoption in the fall of 2012 and that this could make
necessary further revisiting of the entire assessment process for
science in this state.
The legislature therefore intends to set aside the biology
end-of-course exam as a graduation requirement until such time as the
state has the funding and resources to develop and implement a second
science end-of-course or integrated science exam or until the decision
is made about how to assess the next generation science standards,
which are being released for consideration for adoption in the fall of
2012.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 22 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the statewide student assessment, opportunities for a
student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which the
student was not successful, and, if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (((10))) (9) of this section, one or more
objective alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate
achievement of state academic standards. The objective alternative
assessments for each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the
skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the statewide
student assessment for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045 or 28A.655.0611, acquisition of the certificate is required
for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school statewide student assessment shall
earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a student does not
successfully meet the state standards in one or more content areas
required for the certificate of academic achievement, then the student
may retake the assessment in the content area up to four times at no
cost to the student. If the student successfully meets the state
standards on a retake of the assessment then the student shall earn a
certificate of academic achievement. Once objective alternative
assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection (((10))) (9) of this
section, a student may use the objective alternative assessments to
demonstrate that the student successfully meets the state standards for
that content area if the student has taken the statewide student
assessment at least once. If the student successfully meets the state
standards on the objective alternative assessments then the student
shall earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(4) ((Beginning with the graduating class of 2015, a student must
meet the state standards in science in addition to the other content
areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the statewide
student assessment or the objective alternative assessments in order to
earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(5))) The state board of education may not require the acquisition
of the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(((6))) (5) A student may retain and use the highest result from
each successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(((7))) (6) School districts must make available to students the
following options:
(a) To retake the statewide student assessment up to four times in
the content areas in which the student did not meet the state standards
if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the statewide student assessment up to four times in
the content areas in which the student did not meet the state standards
if the student is enrolled in a high school completion program at a
community or technical college. The superintendent of public
instruction and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall jointly identify means by which students in these programs can be
assessed.
(((8))) (7) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of
the high school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall
pay for retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(((9))) (8) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice
a year shall be available to each school district.
(((10))) (9)(a) The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop options for implementing objective
alternative assessments, which may include an appeals process for
students' scores, for students to demonstrate achievement of the state
academic standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be
comparable in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must
demonstrate on the statewide student assessment and be objective in its
determination of student achievement of the state standards. Before
any objective alternative assessments in addition to those authorized
in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a student to
demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in a content
area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall formally
approve the use of any objective alternative assessments through the
omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution.
(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics, reading or English, or
writing portion of the SAT or the ACT may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the state standards for the certificate of
academic achievement. The state board of education shall identify the
scores students must achieve on the relevant portion of the SAT or ACT
to meet or exceed the state standard in the relevant content area on
the statewide student assessment. ((A student's score on the science
portion of the ACT or the science subject area tests of the SAT may be
used as an objective alternative assessment under this section as soon
as the state board of education determines that sufficient data is
available to identify reliable equivalent scores for the science
content area of the statewide student assessment.)) After the first
scores are established, the state board may increase but not decrease
the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state standards.
(ii) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale of
one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an
objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating
that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate
of academic achievement. A score of three on the AP examinations in
calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the
mathematics portion of the statewide student assessment. A score of
three on the AP examinations in English language and composition may be
used as an alternative assessment for the writing portion of the
statewide student assessment. A score of three on the AP examinations
in English literature and composition, macroeconomics, microeconomics,
psychology, United States history, world history, United States
government and politics, or comparative government and politics may be
used as an alternative assessment for the reading portion of the
statewide student assessment. ((A score of three on the AP examination
in biology, physics, chemistry, or environmental science may be used as
an alternative assessment for the science portion of the statewide
student assessment.
(11))) (10) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and
senate education committees shall obtain information and conclusions
from recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(((12))) (11) To help assure continued progress in academic
achievement as a foundation for high school graduation and to assure
that students are on track for high school graduation, each school
district shall prepare plans for and notify students and their parents
or legal guardians as provided in this subsection. Student learning
plans are required for eighth grade students who were not successful on
any or all of the content areas of the state assessment during the
previous school year or who may not be on track to graduate due to
credit deficiencies or absences. The parent or legal guardian shall be
notified about the information in the student learning plan, preferably
through a parent conference and at least annually. To the extent
feasible, schools serving English language learner students and their
parents shall translate the plan into the primary language of the
family. The plan shall include the following information as
applicable:
(a) The student's results on the state assessment;
(b) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the
score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;
(c) Any credit deficiencies;
(d) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;
(e) The student's progress toward meeting state and local
graduation requirements;
(f) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken
by the student to meet state academic standards and stay on track for
graduation;
(g) Remediation strategies and alternative education options
available to students, including informing students of the option to
continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until
the age of twenty-one;
(h) The alternative assessment options available to students under
this section and RCW 28A.655.065;
(i) School district programs, high school courses, and career and
technical education options available for students to meet graduation
requirements; and
(j) Available programs offered through skill centers or community
and technical colleges, including the college high school diploma
options under RCW 28B.50.535.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.068 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 22 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in the 2011-12 school year, the statewide high school
assessment in science shall be an end-of-course assessment for biology
that measures the state standards for life sciences, in addition to
systems, inquiry, and application as they pertain to life sciences.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction may develop science
end-of-course assessments in subjects in addition to biology for
purposes of RCW 28A.655.061, when so directed by the legislature.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction may participate with
consortia of multiple states as common student learning standards and
assessments in science are developed. The superintendent of public
instruction, in consultation with the state board of education, may
modify the essential academic learning requirements and statewide
student assessments in science, including the high school assessment,
according to the multistate common student learning standards and
assessments as long as the education committees of the legislature have
opportunities for review before the modifications are adopted, as
provided under RCW 28A.655.070.
(((4) The statewide high school assessment under this section shall
be used to demonstrate that a student meets the state standards in the
science content area of the statewide student assessment for purposes
of RCW 28A.655.061.))

--- END ---