BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) There are more low-achieving schools in the state seeking
assistance in improving the academic outcomes of students than are
being assisted using current school improvement initiatives;
(b) Promising educator development programs provide intensive
school-based, residency, and mentor experiences for those preparing for
careers in teaching and educational leadership; and
(c) Collaboration among colleges of education, schools, and
communities offers unique opportunities to leverage resources, foster
innovation, disseminate best practices in educator preparation and
professional development, and close the educational opportunity gap for
students in low-achieving schools.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to authorize a pilot project
where colleges of education collaborate with school districts to
establish collaborative schools for innovation and success serving
particularly at-risk and low-achieving students. Each collaboration is
intended both to accelerate student achievement and deepen the
knowledge and skills of current and future educators. The legislature
intends that the initial collaborations occur in elementary schools.
Pending the evaluation results of the initial pilot project, the
legislature may expand the collaborations to include middle and high
schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
As used in sections 3 through 7 of this act, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, "college of education" means an institution
of higher education in Washington state that has been approved by the
professional educator standards board to offer educator preparation and
certification programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The collaborative schools for innovation and success pilot
project is created. Any school district in the state may enter an
agreement with a college of education and submit an application to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction and the professional
educator standards board as provided in section 4 of this act to
participate in the pilot project.
(2) The purpose of the pilot project is for colleges of education
and school districts to collaborate to improve student and educator
success by:
(a) Developing and implementing research-based models of
instruction and services that have proven to be successful in closing
the educational opportunity gap and improving student learning in
low-performing schools; and
(b) Developing and implementing research-based models of educator
preparation and professional development programs that have proven to
be successful in building an educator workforce with the knowledge,
skills, and background that aligns with the characteristics and needs
of students in low-performing schools.
(3) For each proposed pilot project, the college of education and
the school district shall collaborate to select an elementary school in
the district to be the collaborative school for innovation and success.
The school must be among the lowest-achieving schools in the district
as measured by district, state, or federal criteria, including criteria
that measure the educational opportunity gap in the school, and the
school must not have received state, federal, or private funds for the
purpose of implementing a school improvement plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Each school district and college of education seeking approval
to participate in the collaborative schools for innovation and success
pilot project must submit a joint application of intent to the office
of the superintendent of public instruction and the professional
educator standards board by July 1, 2012.
(2) An application of intent must contain:
(a) The school selected for inclusion in the pilot project and the
rationale for its selection;
(b) The research basis and theory of action proposed to close the
educational opportunity gap and improve student achievement in the
selected school;
(c) The research basis and theory of action proposed to improve
educator preparation and professional development in the selected
school;
(d) A preliminary plan for involving parents, community members,
and school staff in the development of the innovation and success plan
under section 5 of this act;
(e) The proposed roles and responsibilities of the college of
education and school district in the pilot project; and
(f) A preliminary plan for using the results of the pilot project
to improve educational programs throughout the school district and
throughout the college of education.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
professional educator standards board shall jointly review the
applications and select up to six applications for participation in the
pilot project no later than August 1, 2012. One of the selected
applications must be from the largest school district in western
Washington that submitted an application, and one must be from the
largest school district in eastern Washington that submitted an
application.
(4) The selection criteria shall include, but are not limited to,
the quality of the research basis for the proposed collaboration; the
efficacy of the proposed strategies for closing the educational
opportunity gap, improving student achievement, and improving educator
preparation in low-performing schools; and the degree of commitment
displayed by the college of education and the school district to
collaborate throughout the pilot project.
(5) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate
grants to three of the selected applications, to be used for
development and implementation of an innovation and success plan under
section 5 of this act. The colleges of education and school districts
from the remaining selected applications may participate in the
collaborative schools for innovation and success pilot project by
complying with the provisions of sections 5 through 7 of this act, but
without state funding support.
(6) The college of education shall serve as the fiscal agent for
the pilot project, unless the college is an independent institution of
higher education, in which case the school district shall serve as the
fiscal agent. Each college of education and school district must seek
private, foundation, community, or other grant funds to leverage any
supplemental state funds that may be appropriated for the purposes of
the pilot project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) After receiving approval of an application of intent, each
college of education and school district must conduct a comprehensive
needs assessment of the students to be served by a collaborative school
for innovation and success. The needs assessment must use
disaggregated student data and include a thorough evaluation of student
needs as identified by the parents of the students served by the
school, as well as the levels of support within the school community
and in the external community at-large for students' academic and
social emotional needs. The needs assessment must also examine
elements included in an academic performance audit under RCW
28A.657.040.
(2) The college of education and the school district must develop
an innovation and success plan for the school in collaboration with
school staff, parents, and community members.
(3) The innovation and success plan must include:
(a) The proposed program for instruction, wraparound support
services, resource deployment, and professional development that has
been developed based on the comprehensive needs assessment;
(b) A family and community engagement strategy that builds support
among students and parents for high achievement for all students in
culturally appropriate ways;
(c) Professional learning communities among school staff and higher
education faculty that are focused on identifying and responding to
emergent student learning needs;
(d) Intensive preparation of teacher and principal candidates using
research-based practices and a particular focus on cultural competency
and skill development to improve learning for English language
learners, highly mobile and homeless students, students with
disabilities, and other students with special learning needs;
(e) Identification of the metrics that will be used to assess
student achievement and skill development, both while the students are
enrolled in elementary school and after they continue into middle
school, and specific goals for improvement of these outcomes over the
term of the pilot project, including but not limited to such metrics as
attendance, grade-level retention, student growth, disciplinary
incidents, course completion and grades, and performance on
classroom-based assessments;
(f) Identification of the metrics that will be used to assess
educator skill development, both for preservice and certificated
educators, and specific goals for improvement of these outcomes over
the term of the pilot project;
(g) Identification of private and community partners to provide
wraparound services, technology, mentoring, or other enhancements for
the students in the school;
(h) Identification of waivers to be requested from the state board
of education under RCW 28A.305.140 or from the superintendent of public
instruction under RCW 28A.655.180;
(i) Identification of any modifications to approved educator
preparation programs or other waivers to be requested from the
professional educator standards board;
(j) Identification and completion of any modifications to school
district collective bargaining agreements necessary to implement the
innovation and success plan, using the procedures under RCW
28A.657.050(3); and
(k) A proposed budget based on funding and resources available to
the pilot project.
(4) Each college of education and school district must submit a
completed innovation and success plan to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the professional educator
standards board by March 15, 2013.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
professional educator standards board must notify each college of
education and school district by May 1, 2013, whether the innovation
and success plan has been approved. If the plan is not approved, the
reasons must be specified in writing and the college of education and
school district must be provided an opportunity to revise and resubmit
the plan within thirty days. The office and the board may provide
technical assistance in revising a plan.
(6) School districts are encouraged to assign teachers, principals,
and other staff to a collaborative school for innovation and success
who express an interest, commitment, and qualifications to participate
in the pilot project. School districts are also encouraged to permit
the transfer of existing school staff to another school in the district
if the staff do not wish to participate in the pilot project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Approved innovation and success plans shall be implemented in
each collaborative school for innovation and success pilot project over
a five-year period beginning in the 2013-14 school year through the
2017-18 school year.
(2) Each pilot project shall submit an annual progress report to
the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
professional educator standards board by December 1st. The report must
describe the best practices and new approaches being used at the
collaborative school for innovation and success, lessons learned,
adjustments planned and implemented, suggestions for expanding use of
best practices to a larger scale, and other results from the
collaborative experience of the pilot project. The office and board
shall compile and summarize the reports in a standard format and
forward them to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall contract
with a northwest educational research organization to conduct an
evaluation of the collaborative schools for innovation and success
pilot project using quantitative and qualitative analysis to identify
successful practices in improving student and educator outcomes. The
organization shall submit a preliminary evaluation by December 1, 2015,
and a final evaluation by September 1, 2018, to the superintendent of
public instruction and the professional educator standards board.
(2) Based on the experience of the participants and the evaluation
results, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
professional educator standards board shall recommend whether the pilot
project should be modified, continued, and expanded to include other
elementary schools in the state, or expanded to include middle and high
schools. The office and the board shall submit their recommendations
and the final report of the pilot project to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2018.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.305.140 and 2011 c 260 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education may grant waivers to school
districts from the provisions of RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.220 on
the basis that such waiver or waivers are necessary to:
(a) Implement successfully a local plan to provide for all students
in the district an effective education system that is designed to
enhance the educational program for each student. The local plan may
include alternative ways to provide effective educational programs for
students who experience difficulty with the regular education program;
((or))
(b) Implement an innovation school or innovation zone designated
under RCW 28A.630.081; or
(c) Implement a collaborative schools for innovation and success
pilot project approved under section 4 of this act.
(2) The state board shall adopt criteria to evaluate the need for
the waiver or waivers.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.655.180 and 2011 c 260 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education, where appropriate, or the
superintendent of public instruction, where appropriate, may grant
waivers to districts from the provisions of statutes or rules relating
to: The length of the school year; student-to-teacher ratios; and
other administrative rules that in the opinion of the state board of
education or the opinion of the superintendent of public instruction
may need to be waived in order for a district to implement a plan for
restructuring its educational program or the educational program of
individual schools within the district or to implement an innovation
school or innovation zone designated under RCW 28A.630.081 or to
implement a collaborative schools for innovation and success pilot
project approved under section 4 of this act.
(2) School districts may use the application process in RCW
28A.305.140 to apply for the waivers under this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.657.050 and 2010 c 235 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The local district superintendent and local school board of a
school district designated as a required action district must submit a
required action plan to the state board of education for approval.
Unless otherwise required by subsection (3) of this section, the plan
must be submitted under a schedule as required by the state board. A
required action plan must be developed in collaboration with
administrators, teachers, and other staff, parents, unions representing
any employees within the district, students, and other representatives
of the local community. The superintendent of public instruction shall
provide a district with assistance in developing its plan if requested.
The school board must conduct a public hearing to allow for comment on
a proposed required action plan. The local school district shall
submit the plan first to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to review and approve that the plan is consistent with
federal guidelines. After the office of the superintendent of public
instruction has approved that the plan is consistent with federal
guidelines, the local school district must submit its required action
plan to the state board of education for approval.
(2) A required action plan must include all of the following:
(a) Implementation of one of the four federal intervention models
required for the receipt of a federal school improvement grant, for
those persistently lowest-achieving schools that the district will be
focusing on for required action. However, a district may not establish
a charter school under a federal intervention model without express
legislative authority. The intervention models are the turnaround,
restart, school closure, and transformation models. The intervention
model selected must address the concerns raised in the academic
performance audit and be intended to improve student performance to
allow a school district to be removed from the list of districts
designated as a required action district by the state board of
education within three years of implementation of the plan;
(b) Submission of an application for a federal school improvement
grant or a grant from other federal funds for school improvement to the
superintendent of public instruction;
(c) A budget that provides for adequate resources to implement the
federal model selected and any other requirements of the plan;
(d) A description of the changes in the district's or school's
existing policies, structures, agreements, processes, and practices
that are intended to attain significant achievement gains for all
students enrolled in the school and how the district intends to address
the findings of the academic performance audit; and
(e) Identification of the measures that the school district will
use in assessing student achievement at a school identified as a
persistently lowest-achieving school, which include improving
mathematics and reading student achievement and graduation rates as
defined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction that
enable the school to no longer be identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school.
(3)(a) For any district designated for required action, the parties
to any collective bargaining agreement negotiated, renewed, or extended
under chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW after June 10, 2010, must reopen the
agreement, or negotiate an addendum, if needed, to make changes to
terms and conditions of employment that are necessary to implement a
required action plan. For any district applying to participate in a
collaborative schools for innovation and success pilot project under
section 4 of this act, the parties to any collective bargaining
agreement negotiated, renewed, or extended under chapter 41.59 or 41.56
RCW after the effective date of this section must reopen the agreement,
or negotiate an addendum, if needed, to make changes to terms and
conditions of employment that are necessary to implement an innovation
and success plan.
(b) If the school district and the employee organizations are
unable to agree on the terms of an addendum or modification to an
existing collective bargaining agreement, the parties, including all
labor organizations affected under the required action plan, shall
request the public employment relations commission to, and the
commission shall, appoint an employee of the commission to act as a
mediator to assist in the resolution of a dispute between the school
district and the employee organizations. Beginning in 2011, and each
year thereafter, mediation shall commence no later than April 15th.
All mediations held under this section shall include the employer and
representatives of all affected bargaining units.
(c) If the executive director of the public employment relations
commission, upon the recommendation of the assigned mediator, finds
that the employer and any affected bargaining unit are unable to reach
agreement following a reasonable period of negotiations and mediation,
but by no later than May 15th of the year in which mediation occurred,
the executive director shall certify any disputed issues for a decision
by the superior court in the county where the school district is
located. The issues for determination by the superior court must be
limited to the issues certified by the executive director.
(d) The process for filing with the court in this subsection (3)(d)
must be used in the case where the executive director certifies issues
for a decision by the superior court.
(i) The school district shall file a petition with the superior
court, by no later than May 20th of the same year in which the issues
were certified, setting forth the following:
(A) The name, address, and telephone number of the school district
and its principal representative;
(B) The name, address, and telephone number of the employee
organizations and their principal representatives;
(C) A description of the bargaining units involved;
(D) A copy of the unresolved issues certified by the executive
director for a final and binding decision by the court; and
(E) The academic performance audit that the office of the
superintendent of public instruction completed for the school district
in the case of a required action district, or the comprehensive needs
assessment in the case of a collaborative schools for innovation and
success pilot project.
(ii) Within seven days after the filing of the petition, each party
shall file with the court the proposal it is asking the court to order
be implemented in a required action plan or innovation and success plan
for the district for each issue certified by the executive director.
Contemporaneously with the filing of the proposal, a party must file a
brief with the court setting forth the reasons why the court should
order implementation of its proposal in the final plan.
(iii) Following receipt of the proposals and briefs of the parties,
the court must schedule a date and time for a hearing on the petition.
The hearing must be limited to argument of the parties or their counsel
regarding the proposals submitted for the court's consideration. The
parties may waive a hearing by written agreement.
(iv) The court must enter an order selecting the proposal for
inclusion in a required action plan that best responds to the issues
raised in the school district's academic performance audit, and allows
for the award of a federal school improvement grant or a grant from
other federal funds for school improvement to the district from the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement one of
the four federal intervention models. In the case of an innovation and
success plan, the court must enter an order selecting the proposal for
inclusion in the plan that best responds to the issues raised in the
school's comprehensive needs assessment. The court's decision must be
issued no later than June 15th of the year in which the petition is
filed and is final and binding on the parties; however the court's
decision is subject to appeal only in the case where it does not allow
the school district to implement a required action plan consistent with
the requirements for the award of a federal school improvement grant or
other federal funds for school improvement by the superintendent of
public instruction.
(e) Each party shall bear its own costs and attorneys' fees
incurred under this statute.
(f) Any party that proceeds with the process in this section after
knowledge that any provision of this section has not been complied with
and who fails to state its objection in writing is deemed to have
waived its right to object.
(4) All contracts entered into between a school district and an
employee must be consistent with this section and allow school
districts designated as required action districts to implement one of
the four federal models in a required action plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
The professional educator standards board may grant waivers from
the provisions of statutes or rules pertaining to educator preparation
and certification programs or other rules adopted under this chapter on
the basis that such waiver or waivers are necessary to implement a
collaborative schools for innovation and success pilot project approved
under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 28A.660
RCW to read as follows:
The professional educator standards board may grant waivers from
the provisions of statutes or rules adopted under this chapter on the
basis that such waiver or waivers are necessary to implement a
collaborative schools for innovation and success pilot project approved
under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 12 of this act expire
June 30, 2019.

--- END ---