BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that: (a)
Washington state is experiencing a prolonged rate of high unemployment;
(b) the long-term unemployed, veterans returning from Iraq and
Afghanistan, and people with limited employment history are finding it
particularly difficult to secure employment; (c) it is in the public
interest to target employment projects to those activities that have
the greatest benefit to the local economy; and (d) the talent and
energy of Washington's unemployed adults are an untapped resource that
should be challenged to meet the serious shortage in community services
and promote and conserve the valuable resources of the state.
(2) The legislature intends to establish the Washington works corps
program as an operating program of the employment security department
to increase opportunities for meaningful work experience, authorize
public-private partnerships, meet community and environmental needs,
and benefit local economies. Therefore, the legislature intends to
provide unemployed individuals with the opportunity to perform needed
services in communities throughout Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Agency administrative costs" means indirect expenses such as
personnel, payroll, contract administration, fiscal services, and other
overhead costs.
(2) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the employment
security department.
(3) "Corps" means the Washington works corps program.
(4) "Department" means the employment security department.
(5) "Enrollees" means those persons who have completed enrollment
forms, completed work agreements, and who have entered into the
Washington works corps program following the approval of the director
of the supervising agency or the director's designee.
(6) "Financial support" means a financial or in-kind contribution
that supports Washington works corps employment project, including but
not limited to funding for enrollee stipends or benefits, equipment,
facilities, and training.
(7) "Full-time term of service" means providing service on a full-time basis for a period of at least ten but no more than twelve months
in duration.
(8) "Program support costs" include, but are not limited to,
program planning, development of reports, job and career training,
uniforms and equipment, and standard office space and utilities.
Program support costs do not include direct scheduling and supervision
of corps enrollees.
(9) "Supervising agencies" means those nonprofit organizations or
public agencies that develop and implement full-time service projects
in which enrollees agree to participate.
(10) "Work agreement" means the written agreement between the
department, the enrollee, and the supervising agency under this chapter
for a period of up to twelve months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The Washington works corps program is
established within the department. The department has the following
powers and duties as necessary to administer the corps:
(1) Appointing a director and other personnel as necessary to carry
out the purposes of this chapter;
(2) Recruiting enrollees;
(3) Recruiting supervising agencies to host the enrollees in full-time service activities;
(4) Matching enrollees with appropriate service projects;
(5) Establishing consistent work standards and placement and
evaluation procedures of corps programs;
(6) Monitoring enrollee activities for compliance with this chapter
and compliance with work agreements;
(7) Assisting enrollees in transition to employment upon
termination from the programs, including such activities as orientation
to the labor market, on-the-job training, and placement in the private
sector;
(8) Executing subgrants or agreements with any other state
agencies, local institutions, nonprofit organizations, or nonprofit
service corps organizations in the administration of the corps;
(9) Selecting, reviewing, approving, and evaluating the success of
corps projects;
(10) Determining appropriate financial support levels for corps
projects;
(11) Assisting supervising agencies in obtaining financial support
funds from private and public agencies, individuals, and foundations in
order to support a portion of the projects cost; and
(12) Seeking, applying for, and accepting grants, funds, or
donations from the federal government, other public sources, or private
sources for Washington works corps projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The corps shall be organized and managed to
benefit the community or state at-large and may include but is not
limited to programs, projects, or activities that:
(1) Protect and enhance Washington's natural resources, and
participate in the recovery of the ecosystem;
(2) Address the educational and education-related needs of
children, youth, families, and young adults within public educational
institutions or related programs;
(3) Address unmet needs related to opportunities for economically
disadvantaged individuals within communities including financial
literacy, housing assistance, job training, and nutritional assistance;
(4) Seek to enhance, improve, or restore the environment or
increase energy efficiency in communities;
(5) Address unmet health needs within communities including access
to health care, disease prevention, and health promotion initiatives;
(6) Address unmet needs of veterans, members of the armed forces on
active duty, and family members of deployed military personnel; and
(7) Provide child care for other enrollees at licensed or certified
child care or early learning facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) No more than fifteen percent of the
funds available for the Washington works corps program may be expended
for administrative costs.
(2) The combined administrative costs and program support costs may
not exceed thirty percent of the total funds available for the
Washington works corps.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The commissioner may select and enroll in
the corps any person who is at least eighteen years of age, a resident
of the state or a military spouse, and unemployed. Enrollees must be
selected from among qualified individuals submitting applications for
full-time service at such time, in such form, and containing such
information as may be necessary to evaluate the suitability of each
individual for service, and available placements. Efforts must be made
to enroll individuals who are long-term unemployed, a veteran of Iraq
or Afghanistan, or economically, socially, physically, or educationally
disadvantaged. Enrollees may participate in a period of service of a
maximum of twelve months, and may reapply for not more than one
additional twelve-month period. The commissioner may prescribe such
additional standards and procedures in consultation with supervising
agencies as may be necessary in conformance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Washington works corps enrollees shall
receive a stipend for their services of one thousand six hundred
eighty-eight dollars per month. The stipend is a training and
subsistence allowance. The stipend amount may be increased in the
operating budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Washington works corps enrollees who
successfully complete a full-time term of service are eligible for an
educational award equivalent to the maximum value of the Pell grant for
the award year in which the term of service is funded. Enrollees who
successfully complete a second term of service are eligible for a
second educational award. Enrollees who successfully complete shorter
terms of service may receive a partial education award at a level
determined by the department.
(2) The education award in this section may be used to pay
education costs at institutions of higher education, to pay for
educational training, and to repay qualified student loans. Allowable
uses and limitations on the educational award must be consistent with
the AmeriCorps program's educational award. The department shall
determine by rule the process and requirements for providing an
educational award.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The assignment of enrollees shall not result
in the displacement of currently employed workers, including partial
displacement such as reduction in hours of nonovertime work, wages, or
other employment benefits. Supervising agencies that participate in
the program may not terminate, lay-off, or reduce the working hours of
any employee for the purpose of using an enrollee with funds available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The compensation received by enrollees
is considered a training and subsistence allowance. Medical insurance
and premiums under Title 51 RCW must be paid for the enrollees in the
corps by the commissioner in accordance with the standards and
limitations of the appropriation provided for this chapter. The
department must give notice of coverage to the director of labor and
industries after enrollment. The department shall not be deemed an
employer of an enrollee for any other purpose.
(2) Enrollees are not considered employees for any other purpose
under state law, including but not limited to Titles 41, 49, and 50
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The services provided by enrollees under
the Washington works corps program are not covered for purposes of
unemployment compensation coverage under RCW 50.44.040(4) and the
enrollees must be so advised by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) Placements in the corps must be made in
supervising agencies under work agreements as provided under this
chapter and must include those assignments that provide for addressing
community needs and conservation problems. Each work agreement must:
(a) Demonstrate that the service project is appropriate for the
enrollee's interests, skills, and abilities and that the project is
designed to meet unmet community needs;
(b) Require regular performance evaluation, including clear work
performance standards set by the supervising agency and procedures for
identifying strengths, recommended improvement areas, and conditions
for probation or dismissal of the enrollee;
(c) Provide time for participation in a core training program
common to all participants or optional additional training; and
(d) Include a commitment for partial financial support for the
enrollee from private industry, public agencies, community groups, or
foundations. The commissioner may establish additional standards for
the development of placements for enrollees with supervising agencies
and assure that the work agreements comply with those standards.
(2) This section does not apply to conservation corps programs
established by chapter 43.220 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 All parties entering into work agreements
under this chapter must agree that they will not discriminate in the
providing of any service on the basis of age, sex, marital status,
sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin, honorably
discharged veteran or military status, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a person with a disability, unless based upon a bona
fide occupational qualification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A nonprofit organization, local
institution, state agency, or nonprofit service corps organization that
contracts with the department to provide a specific service,
appropriate for the administration of this chapter, that the department
cannot otherwise provide, may be reimbursed at the discretion of the
department for the reasonable costs the department would absorb for
providing those services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The department shall adopt rules to
implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
By May 1, 2013, and by May 1st of every year thereafter, the
department must annually estimate the increase in state revenue for the
prior calendar year resulting from the narrowing of the exemption in
RCW 82.04.330 by section 23, chapter . . ., Laws of 2012 (section 23 of
this act) and certify the estimated amount to the state treasurer. By
July 1, 2013, and by July 1st of every year thereafter, the state
treasurer must transfer the amount into the Washington works corps
account created in section 18 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 For the purpose of providing funds to
finance the program described and authorized in chapter 50.-- RCW (the
chapter created in section 24 of this act), and all costs incidental
thereto, the state finance committee is authorized to issue general
obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of two hundred
forty million dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to
finance this program and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds
authorized in this section may be sold at such price as the state
finance committee shall determine. No bonds authorized in this section
may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the
net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The proceeds from the sale of the bonds
authorized in section 17 of this act and revenue transfers under
section 16 of this act must be deposited in the Washington works corps
account hereby created in the state treasury. These proceeds shall be
used exclusively for the program described and authorized in chapter
50.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 24 of this act) and for
the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds
issued for the purposes of this section, and shall be administered by
the office of financial management subject to legislative
appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) The debt-limit Washington works corps
bond retirement account, hereby created in the state treasury, shall be
used for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds
authorized in section 17 of this act.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements on the bonds authorized in section 17 of this act.
(3) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due on bonds issued for the purpose of section 17 of this
act, the state treasurer shall withdraw from the Washington works corps
account created in section 18 of this act and deposit in the debt-limit
Washington works corps retirement account an amount equal to the amount
certified by the state finance committee to be due on the payment date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1) Bonds issued under section 17 of this
act shall state that they are a general obligation of the state of
Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the
payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, and shall
contain an unconditional promise to pay the principal and interest as
the same shall become due.
(2) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 The legislature may provide additional
means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of and
interest on the bonds authorized in section 17 of this act, and section
20 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for
the payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The bonds authorized in section 17 of this
act shall be a legal investment for all state funds or funds under
state control and for all funds of any other public body.

Sec. 23 RCW 82.04.330 and 2001 c 118 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, this chapter
((shall)) does not apply to any farmer that sells any agricultural
product at wholesale or to any farmer who grows, raises, or produces
agricultural products owned by others, such as custom feed operations.
((This))
(b) The exemption ((shall)) under (a) of this subsection does not
apply to any person selling ((such)) agricultural products at retail or
to any person selling manufactured substances or articles. A farmer
may not exempt more than two hundred thousand dollars under this
section in any calendar year.
(2) This chapter shall also not apply to any persons who
participate in the federal conservation reserve program or its
successor administered by the United States department of agriculture
with respect to land enrolled in that program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Sections 1 through 15 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 50 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Sections 17 through 22 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---