BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.10.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 17 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon entry into the correctional system, offenders shall
receive an initial medical examination. The department shall prepare
a health profile for each offender that includes at least the following
information: (a) An identification of the offender's serious medical
and dental needs; (b) an evaluation of the offender's capacity for work
and recreation; and (c) a financial assessment of the offender's
ability to pay for all or a portion of his or her health care services
from personal resources or private insurance.
(2)(a) The department may develop and implement a plan for the
delivery of health care services and personal hygiene items to
offenders in the department's correctional facilities, at the
discretion of the secretary, and in conformity with federal law.
(b) To discourage unwarranted use of health care services caused by
unnecessary visits to health care providers, offenders shall
participate in the costs of their health care services by paying an
amount that is commensurate with their resources as determined by the
department, or a nominal amount of no less than ((three)) four dollars
per visit, as determined by the secretary. Under the authority granted
in RCW 72.01.050(2), the secretary may authorize the superintendent to
collect this amount directly from an offender's institution account.
All copayments collected from offenders' institution accounts shall be
((deposited into the general fund)) a reduction in the expenditures for
offender health care at the department.
(c) Offenders are required to make copayments for initial health
care visits that are offender initiated and, by rule adopted by the
department, may be charged a copayment for subsequent visits related to
the medical condition which caused the initial visit. ((Offenders are
not required to pay for emergency treatment or for visits initiated by
health care staff or treatment of those conditions that constitute a
serious health care need.))
(d) No offender may be refused any health care service because of
indigence.
(e) At no time shall the withdrawal of funds for the payment of a
medical service copayment result in reducing an offender's institution
account to an amount less than the level of indigency as defined in
chapter 72.09 RCW.
(3)(((a))) The department shall report annually to the legislature
the following information for the fiscal year preceding the report:
(((i))) (a) The total number of health care visits made by offenders;
(((ii))) (b) the total number of copayments assessed; (((iii))) (c) the
total dollar amount of copayments collected; (((iv))) (d) the total
number of copayments not collected due to an offender's indigency; and
(((v))) (e) the total number of copayments not assessed due to the
serious or emergent nature of the health care treatment or because the
health care visit was not offender initiated.
(((b) The first report required under this section shall be
submitted not later than October 1, 1996, and shall include, at a
minimum, all available information collected through the second half of
fiscal year 1996. This subsection (3)(b) shall expire December 1,
1996.))
(4)(a) The secretary shall adopt, by rule, a uniform policy
relating to the distribution and replenishment of personal hygiene
items for inmates incarcerated in all department institutions. The
policy shall provide for the initial distribution of adequate personal
hygiene items to inmates upon their arrival at an institution.
(b) The acquisition of replenishment personal hygiene items is the
responsibility of inmates, except that indigent inmates shall not be
denied adequate personal hygiene items based on their inability to pay
for them.
(c) The policy shall provide that the replenishment personal
hygiene items be distributed to inmates only in authorized quantities
and at intervals that reflect prudent use and customary wear and
consumption of the items.
(5) To the extent that federal law allows and federal financial
participation is available, for the limited purpose of implementing
this section, the department, or the department's designee, is
authorized to act on behalf of an inmate for purposes of applying for
medicaid eligibility.
(6) The following become a debt and are subject to RCW 72.09.450:
(a) All copayments under subsection (2) of this section that are
not collected when the visit occurs; and
(b) All charges for replenishment personal hygiene items that are
not collected when the item is distributed.

Sec. 2 RCW 72.10.030 and 1989 c 157 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the secretary may
enter into contracts with health care practitioners, health care
facilities, and other entities or agents as may be necessary to provide
((basic)) medical, behavioral health, and chemical dependency treatment
care to inmates. The contracts shall not cause the termination of
classified employees of the department rendering the services at the
time the contract is executed.
(2) In contracting for services, the secretary is authorized to
provide for indemnification of health care practitioners who cannot
obtain professional liability insurance through reasonable effort, from
liability on any action, claim, or proceeding instituted against them
arising out of the good faith performance or failure of performance of
services on behalf of the department. The contracts may provide that
for the purposes of chapter 4.92 RCW only, those health care
practitioners with whom the department has contracted shall be
considered state employees.
(3) Providers of hospital services that are hospitals licensed
under chapter 70.41 RCW shall contract with the department for
inpatient, outpatient, and ancillary services if deemed appropriate by
the department. Payments to hospitals shall conform to the following
requirements:
(a) The department shall pay hospitals through the provider one
system operated by the Washington state health care authority;
(b) The department shall reimburse the hospitals using the
reimbursement methodology in use by the state medicaid program; and
(c) The department shall only reimburse a provider of hospital
services to a hospital patient at a rate no more than the amount
payable under the medicaid reimbursement structure, regardless of
whether the hospital is located within or outside of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
As a condition of licensure, a hospital must contract with the
department of corrections pursuant to RCW 72.10.030.

--- END ---