BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.68.060 and 2011 c 346 s 301 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except for applications received pursuant to subsection (6)
of this section, no compensation of any kind shall be available under
this chapter if:
(((a))) (i)(A) An application for benefits is not received by the
department within ((two)) one year((s)) after the date the criminal act
was reported to a local police department or sheriff's office or the
date the rights of beneficiaries accrued, unless the director has
determined that "good cause" exists to expand the time permitted to
receive the application. "Good cause" shall be determined by the
department on a case-by-case basis and may extend the period of time in
which an application can be received for up to five years after the
date the criminal act was reported to a local police department or
sheriff's office or the date the rights of beneficiaries accrued; ((or
(b))) (B) The criminal act is not reported by the victim or someone
on his or her behalf to a local police department or sheriff's office
within ((twelve months)) ninety days of its occurrence or, if it could
not reasonably have been reported within that period, within ((twelve
months)) ninety days of the time when a report could reasonably have
been made. In making determinations as to reasonable time limits, the
department shall give greatest weight to the needs of the victims;
(ii)(A) An application for benefits is not received by the
department within two years after the date the sexual assault was
reported to a local police department or sheriff's office or the date
the rights of beneficiaries accrued, unless the director has determined
that good cause exists to expand the time permitted to receive the
application. Good cause shall be determined by the department on a
case-by-case basis and may extend the period of time in which an
application can be received for up to five years after the date the
sexual assault was reported to a local police department or sheriff's
office or the date the rights of beneficiaries accrued; or
(B) The sexual assault offense is not reported by the victim or
someone on his or her behalf to a local police department or sheriff's
office within twelve months of its occurrence or, if it could not
reasonably have been reported within that period, within twelve months
of the time when a report could reasonably have been made. In making
determinations as to reasonable time limits, the department shall give
greatest weight to the needs of the victims.
(b) As used in (a)(i)(A) and (B) of this subsection, a "criminal
act" does not include a "sexual assault" offense. "Sexual assault" has
the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.125.030.
(2) No person or spouse, child, or dependent of such person is
eligible for benefits under this chapter when the injury for which
benefits are sought, was:
(a) The result of consent, provocation, or incitement by the
victim, unless an injury resulting from a criminal act caused the death
of the victim;
(b) Sustained while the crime victim was engaged in the attempt to
commit, or the commission of, a felony; or
(c) Sustained while the victim was confined in any county or city
jail, federal jail or prison or in any other federal institution, or
any state correctional institution maintained and operated by the
department of social and health services or the department of
corrections, prior to release from lawful custody; or confined or
living in any other institution maintained and operated by the
department of social and health services or the department of
corrections.
(3) No person or spouse, child, or dependent of such person is
eligible for benefits under this chapter where the person making a
claim for such benefits has refused to give reasonable cooperation to
state or local law enforcement agencies in their efforts to apprehend
and convict the perpetrator of the criminal act which gave rise to the
claim.
(4) A victim is not eligible for benefits under this chapter if he
or she:
(a) Has been convicted of a felony offense within five years
preceding the criminal act for which they are applying where the felony
offense is a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030 or a crime against
persons under RCW 9.94A.411, or is convicted of such a felony offense
after the criminal act for which they are applying; and
(b) Has not completely satisfied all legal financial obligations
owed.
(5) Because victims of childhood criminal acts may repress
conscious memory of such criminal acts far beyond the age of eighteen,
the rights of adult victims of childhood criminal acts shall accrue at
the time the victim discovers or reasonably should have discovered the
elements of the crime. In making determinations as to reasonable time
limits, the department shall give greatest weight to the needs of the
victim.
(6)(a) Benefits under this chapter are available to any victim of
a person against whom the state initiates proceedings under chapter
71.09 RCW. The right created under this subsection shall accrue when
the victim is notified of proceedings under chapter 71.09 RCW or the
victim is interviewed, deposed, or testifies as a witness in connection
with the proceedings. An application for benefits under this
subsection must be received by the department within two years after
the date the victim's right accrued unless the director determines that
good cause exists to expand the time to receive the application. The
director shall determine "good cause" on a case-by-case basis and may
extend the period of time in which an application can be received for
up to five years after the date the right of the victim accrued.
Benefits under this subsection shall be limited to compensation for
costs or losses incurred on or after the date the victim's right
accrues for a claim allowed under this subsection.
(b) A person identified as the "minor" in the charge of commercial
sexual abuse of a minor under RCW 9.68A.100, promoting commercial
sexual abuse of a minor under RCW 9.68A.101, or promoting travel for
commercial sexual abuse of a minor under RCW 9.68A.102 is considered a
victim of a criminal act for the purpose of the right to benefits under
this chapter even if the person is also charged with prostitution under
RCW 9A.88.030.

--- END ---