BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.102.020 and 2007 c 6 s 1021 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Chapter 79, Laws of 2003)) (1) This chapter does not apply to
utility taxes ((on any service)) imposed by a city. For purposes of
this subsection, "utility tax" means a tax that historically or
traditionally has been ((taxed as a)) imposed on utility ((business))
businesses for municipal tax purposes((, such as:
(1) A light and power business or a natural gas distribution
business, as defined in RCW 82.16.010;
(2) A telephone business, as defined in RCW 82.16.010;
(3) Cable television services;
(4) Sewer or water services;
(5) Drainage services;
(6) Solid waste services; or
(7) Steam services)).
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, city business
and occupation taxes apply to business activities that have
historically been taxed under a city's utility tax, such as cable
television service and telecommunications service, to the extent that
such activities are subject to state business and occupation tax.
Nothing in this chapter prevents a city from taxing business activities
under both its business and occupation tax and utility tax. However,
a city is free to exempt an activity from either or both of its utility
tax and business and occupation tax if such activity would otherwise be
subject to both taxes.
(3) No city may tax an activity under its business and occupation
tax if such activity is subject to the state public utility tax under
chapter 82.16 RCW. However, a city may tax such activities under the
city's utility tax.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.102.030 and 2003 c 79 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter ((79,
Laws of 2003)), unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Business" has the same meaning as given in chapter 82.04 RCW.
(2) "City" means a city, town, or code city.
(3) "Business and occupation tax" or "gross receipts tax" means a
tax imposed on or measured by the value of products, the gross income
of the business, or the gross proceeds of sales, as the case may be,
and that is the legal liability of the business.
(4) "Value of products" has the same meaning as given in chapter
82.04 RCW.
(5) "Gross income of the business" has the same meaning as given in
chapter 82.04 RCW.
(6) "Gross proceeds of sales" has the same meaning as given in
chapter 82.04 RCW.
(7) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(8) "State business and occupation tax" means the tax imposed in
chapter 82.04 RCW.
(9) "State business and occupation tax definitions" means the
definitions in chapter 82.04 RCW, rules adopted by the department to
administer chapter 82.04 RCW, and interpretive statements or other
public guidance issued by the department relating to the tax imposed in
chapter 82.04 RCW.
(10) "City business and occupation tax" means a business and
occupation tax imposed by a city.
(11) "Service and other business activities classification" means
the classification under which an activity is taxed if it is not taxed
under some other classification.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.102.040 and 2010 c 271 s 706 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) ((The cities, working through the association of Washington
cities, shall form a model ordinance development committee made up of
a representative sampling of cities that as of July 27, 2003, impose a
business and occupation tax. This committee shall work through the
association of Washington cities to adopt a model ordinance on
municipal gross receipts business and occupation tax. The model
ordinance and subsequent amendments shall)) After June 30, 2013, only
the department may amend the city business and occupation tax model
ordinance. Beginning July 1, 2013, the department may amend the model
ordinance as it deems appropriate. Amendments, other than those
required to conform with changes to state law, must be adopted using a
process that includes opportunity for substantial input from cities,
individually or through the association of Washington cities, business
stakeholders, and other members of the public. Input ((shall)) must be
solicited from statewide business associations and from local chambers
of commerce and downtown business associations in cities that levy a
business and occupation tax.
(b) The department of commerce ((shall)) must contract to post the
model ordinance on an internet web site and to make paper copies
available for inspection upon request. The department of revenue and
the department of licensing ((shall)) must post copies of or links to
the model ordinance on their internet web sites. Additionally, a city
that imposes a business and occupation tax must make copies of its
ordinance available for inspection and copying as provided in chapter
42.56 RCW.
(((c) The definitions and tax classifications in the model
ordinance may not be amended more frequently than once every four
years, however the model ordinance may be amended at any time to comply
with changes in state law. Any amendment to a mandatory provision of
the model ordinance must be adopted with the same effective date by all
cities.))
(2) A city that imposes a business and occupation tax must adopt
the mandatory provisions of the model ordinance. The following
provisions are mandatory:
(a) A system of credits that meets the requirements of RCW
35.102.060 and a form for such use;
(b) A uniform, minimum small business tax threshold of at least the
equivalent of twenty thousand dollars in gross income annually. A city
may elect to deviate from this requirement by creating a higher
threshold or exemption, but it ((shall)) may not deviate lower than the
level required in this subsection((. If a city has a small business
threshold or exemption in excess of that provided in this subsection as
of January 1, 2003, and chooses to deviate below the threshold or
exemption level that was in place as of January 1, 2003, the city must
notify all businesses licensed to do business within the city at least
one hundred twenty days prior to the potential implementation of a
lower threshold or exemption amount));
(c) Tax reporting frequencies that meet the requirements of RCW
35.102.070;
(d) Penalty and interest provisions that meet the requirements of
RCW 35.102.080 and 35.102.090;
(e) Claim periods that meet the requirements of RCW 35.102.100;
(f) Refund provisions that meet the requirements of RCW 35.102.110;
and
(g) Provisions consistent with RCW 82.04.480 and 82.04.520;
(h) Tax classifications for reporting purposes that include all of
the state business and occupation tax classifications, including those
created in RCW 82.04.230 through 82.04.298, and classifications created
after the effective date of this section and codified outside of those
statutes. The model ordinance may not include any classifications that
are not used for state business and occupation tax purposes; and
(i) Definitions, which at a minimum, must include the definitions
enumerated in RCW 35.102.030 and 35.102.120. ((The definitions in
chapter 82.04 RCW shall be used as the baseline for all definitions in
the model ordinance, and any deviation in the model ordinance from
these definitions must be described by a comment in the model
ordinance.))
(3) Except for the deduction required by RCW 35.102.160 and the
system of credits developed to address multiple taxation under
subsection (2)(a) of this section, a city may adopt its own provisions
for tax exemptions, tax credits, and tax deductions.
(4) Any city that adopts an ordinance that deviates from the
nonmandatory provisions of the model ordinance ((shall)) must make a
description of such differences available to the public, in written and
electronic form.

Sec. 4 RCW 35.102.120 and 2003 c 79 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the definitions in RCW 35.102.030, the following
terms and phrases must be defined in the model ordinance under RCW
35.102.040, and such definitions ((shall)) must include any specific
requirements as noted in this ((subsection)) section:
(a) Eligible gross receipts tax.
(b) Extracting.
(c) Manufacturing. ((Software development may not be defined as a
manufacturing activity.)) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, "manufacturing" must have the same meaning as "to manufacture"
in RCW 82.04.120.
(d) Retailing.
(e) Retail sale.
(f) Services. The term "services" excludes retail or wholesale
services.
(g) Wholesale sale.
(h) Wholesaling.
(i) To manufacture.
(j) Commercial ((and)) or industrial use.
(k) Engaging in business.
(l) Person.
(2) ((Any)) (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section or
other provisions of this chapter:
(i) The state business and occupation tax definitions apply to the
model ordinance and any city's business and occupation tax in the same
manner as they apply for purposes of chapter 82.04 RCW; and
(ii) A city may not, for purposes of its business and occupation
tax, deviate from the state business and occupation tax definitions in
its ordinances, rules, other public guidance, and interpretations.
(b) For purposes of complying with (a) of this subsection (2),
references to the department in state business and occupation tax
definitions must be construed as references to the city or cities,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(c) For purposes of complying with (a) of this subsection (2),
references to the state in state business and occupation tax
definitions must be construed as references to the city or cities,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(d) Any portion of a state business and occupation tax definition
that relates solely to sales or use tax or otherwise does not apply to
the tax imposed in chapter 82.04 RCW does not apply to the model
ordinance or business and occupation taxes imposed by the cities.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the cities and
the model ordinance need not adopt any exclusionary language contained
in a state business and occupation tax definition, but only if the
exclusionary language has the effect of exempting a person, activity,
or income from the tax imposed in chapter 82.04 RCW.
(f) Notwithstanding (e) of this subsection (2), a city may not
deviate from the exclusion in RCW 82.04.062 from the definitions of
"wholesale sale," "sale at wholesale," "retail sale," and "sale at
retail." Cities imposing a business and occupation tax must compute
tax on the business of making sales of precious metal bullion or
monetized bullion consistent with RCW 82.04.062.
(g) Notwithstanding (e) of this subsection (2), cities may not
deviate from the exclusion in RCW 82.04.216 of steam, electricity, and
electrical energy from various terms denoting tangible items that may
be used, sold, or consumed.
(h) Language in a state business and occupation tax definition
governing how the defined term is to be applied for state business and
occupation tax purposes also applies for purposes of city business and
occupation taxes.
(3) Tax classifications in addition to those enumerated in
subsection (1) of this section ((that)), which are required to be
included in the model ordinance pursuant to RCW 35.102.040(2)(h), must
be uniform among all cities and with state business and occupation tax
classifications.

Sec. 5 RCW 35.102.140 and 2003 c 79 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Cities imposing business and occupation taxes must comply with
all requirements of RCW 35.102.020 through 35.102.130 by December 31,
2004. A city that has not complied with the requirements of RCW
35.102.020 through 35.102.130 by December 31, 2004, may not impose a
tax that is imposed by a city on the privilege of engaging in business
activities.)) (1) Cities imposing business and occupation taxes after
December 31, 2004, must comply with ((RCW 35.102.020 through
35.102.130)) this chapter.
(2) The department may issue, in consultation with the cities,
official written guidance on any provision of a city's business and
occupation tax that is required by this chapter to be administered
consistently with the state business and occupation tax. Any such
official public guidance issued by the department in consultation with
the cities preempts any conflicting interpretation of the city.
Likewise, any official public guidance issued by the department on a
state business and occupation tax matter preempts any conflicting
interpretation by the city on a matter involving a provision of the
city's business and occupation tax that is required by this chapter to
be administered consistently with the state business and occupation
tax. Nothing in this subsection is intended to affect the
interpretation or application of a city's business and occupation tax
for periods before the effective date of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 35.102.160 and 2006 c 301 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provision of professional employer services by a
professional employer organization is taxable under a city's service
and other business activities classification. A city that imposes its
business and occupation tax on professional employer services performed
by a professional employer organization((, regardless of the tax
classification applicable to such services, shall)) must provide a
deduction identical to the deduction in RCW 82.04.540(2).
(2) For the purposes of this section, "professional employer
organization" and "professional employer services" have the same
meanings as in RCW 82.04.540.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 35.102 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning on the effective date of this section, the department
may adopt rules and issue interpretive and policy statements in
accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as
it considers necessary or useful in enhancing uniformity between state
and city business and occupation taxes and in carrying out the
department's duties under this chapter. Such rules and interpretive
and policy statements take precedence over any conflicting rules and
interpretive or policy guidance issued by the cities.
(2) Prior to adopting any rules or issuing any interpretative or
policy statements under this section, such rules, interpretative
statements, and policy statements must be developed in a collaborative
process with the affected cities that takes into consideration any
recommendations and concerns from the affected cities in the formation
of such rules, policies, or statements by providing opportunity for
substantial input from the affected cities individually or through the
association of Washington cities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 35.102 RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of city business and occupation taxes, a person may
meet its burden of proving that a sale is a wholesale sale rather than
a retail sale as provided in RCW 82.04.470. Upon request of a city,
the department must assist the city in determining whether a person has
met the requirements of RCW 82.04.470(6).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A uniformity work group is created to review and make
recommendations in regards to the process through which increased
uniformity between state and local business and occupation taxes is
achieved.
(2) The work group must consist of the following members:
(a) Three members representing the cities, appointed by the
association of Washington cities;
(b) Three members representing the business community, appointed by
the Washington state chamber of commerce; and
(c) One member representing the department, to serve as a voting
chair, to be appointed by the department.
(3)(a) The work group must prepare and provide recommendations in
the form of implementing legislation to the appropriate fiscal
committees of both the house of representatives and the senate by
December 15, 2012.
(b) The recommendations prepared by the work group under this
section:
(i) Must be the result of the collaborative and cooperative efforts
of the work group members; and
(ii) Must include proposed legislation that increases uniformity
between the state and local business and occupation taxes, which
addresses the interpretation and implementation of any proposed changes
to applicable laws concerning apportionment and nexus in developing
such legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Except for section 9 of this act, this act
takes effect July 1, 2013.

--- END ---