BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.500.040 and 1999 c 317 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, local
effort assistance funds shall be distributed to qualifying districts as
follows:
(((1))) (a) Thirty percent in April;
(((2))) (b) Twenty-three percent in May;
(((3))) (c) Two percent in June;
(((4))) (d) Seventeen percent in August;
(((5))) (e) Nine percent in October;
(((6))) (f) Seventeen percent in November; and
(((7))) (g) Two percent in December.
(2) In calendar year 2013, local effort assistance funds shall be
distributed to qualifying districts as follows:
(a) Thirty percent in April;
(b) Twenty-five percent in July;
(c) Seventeen percent in August;
(d) Nine percent in October;
(e) Seventeen percent in November; and
(f) Two percent in December.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.500.020 and 2010 c 237 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(a) "Prior tax collection year" means the year immediately
preceding the year in which the local effort assistance shall be
allocated.
(b) "Statewide average ((fourteen)) twelve percent levy rate" means
((fourteen)) twelve percent of the total levy bases as defined in RCW
84.52.0531 (3) and (4) summed for all school districts, and divided by
the total assessed valuation for excess levy purposes in the prior tax
collection year for all districts as adjusted to one hundred percent by
the county indicated ratio established in RCW 84.48.075.
(c) The "district's ((fourteen)) twelve percent levy amount" means
the school district's maximum levy authority after transfers determined
under RCW 84.52.0531(2) (a) through (c) divided by the district's
maximum levy percentage determined under RCW 84.52.0531(((5))) (6)
multiplied by ((fourteen)) twelve percent.
(d) The "district's ((fourteen)) twelve percent levy rate" means
the district's ((fourteen)) twelve percent levy amount divided by the
district's assessed valuation for excess levy purposes for the prior
tax collection year as adjusted to one hundred percent by the county
indicated ratio.
(e) "Districts eligible for local effort assistance" means those
districts with a ((fourteen)) twelve percent levy rate that exceeds the
statewide average ((fourteen)) twelve percent levy rate.
(2) Unless otherwise stated all rates, percents, and amounts are
for the calendar year for which local effort assistance is being
calculated under this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.500.030 and 2006 c 372 s 904 and 2006 c 119 s 1
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Allocation of state matching funds to eligible districts for local
effort assistance shall be determined as follows:
(1) Funds raised by the district through maintenance and operation
levies shall be matched with state funds using the following ratio of
state funds to levy funds:
(a) The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate
and the statewide average twelve percent levy rate; to
(b) The statewide average twelve percent levy rate.
(2) The maximum amount of state matching funds for districts
eligible for local effort assistance shall be the district's twelve
percent levy amount, multiplied by the following percentage:
(a) The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate
and the statewide average twelve percent levy rate; divided by
(b) The district's twelve percent levy rate.
(3) Calendar year 2003 allocations and maximum eligibility under
this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.99.
(4) ((From January 1, 2004, to December 31, 2005, allocations and
maximum eligibility under this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.937.
(5) From January 1, 2006, to December 31, 2006, allocations and
maximum eligibility under this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.9563.))
Beginning with calendar year 2007, allocations and maximum eligibility
under this chapter shall be fully funded at one hundred percent and
shall not be reduced.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2010 c 237 s 1 and 2010 c 99 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection minus (e) of this
subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsections (3) and (4)
of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as
defined in subsection (6) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) Except for nonhigh districts under (d) of this subsection, for
districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the nonresident
school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the resident
school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount
equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included in the
nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this section
multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (6) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The levy bases of nonhigh districts participating in an
innovation academy cooperative established under RCW 28A.340.080 shall
be adjusted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to reflect each district's proportional share of student enrollment in
the cooperative;
(e) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 2005 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year and the amounts determined under subsection (4) of
this section, including allocations for compensation increases, plus
the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per full
time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) For levy collections in calendar years 2005 through 2017, in
addition to the allocations included under subsection (3)(a) through
(c) of this section, a district's levy base shall also include the
following:
(a)(i) For levy collections in calendar year 2010, the difference
between the allocation the district would have received in the current
school year had RCW 84.52.068 not been amended by chapter 19, Laws of
2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocation the district received in the
current school year pursuant to RCW 28A.505.220;
(ii) For levy collections in calendar years 2011 through 2017, the
difference between the allocation rate the district would have received
in the prior school year using the Initiative 728 rate and the
allocation rate the district received in the prior school year pursuant
to RCW 28A.505.220 multiplied by the full-time equivalent student
enrollment used to calculate the Initiative 728 allocation for the
prior school year; and
(b) The difference between the allocations the district would have
received the prior school year using the Initiative 732 base and the
allocations the district actually received the prior school year
pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.
(5) For levy collections in calendar years 2011 through 2017, in
addition to the allocations included under subsections (3)(a) through
(c) and (4)(a) and (b) of this section, a district's levy base shall
also include the difference between an allocation of fifty-three and
two-tenths certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through four enrolled
in the prior school year and the allocation of certificated
instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in
grades kindergarten through four that the district actually received in
the prior school year, except that the levy base for a school district
whose allocation in the 2009-10 school year was less than fifty-three
and two-tenths certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through four shall
include the difference between the allocation the district actually
received in the 2009-10 school year and the allocation the district
actually received in the prior school year.
(6)(a) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-four
percent in 2010 and twenty-eight percent in 2011 through ((2017)) 2013
and twenty-four percent every year thereafter;
(b) For qualifying districts, in addition to the percentage in (a)
of this subsection the grandfathered percentage determined as follows:
(i) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(ii) For 2011 ((through 2017)) and thereafter, the percentage
calculated as follows:
(A) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(B) Reduce the result of (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (7) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(C) Divide the result of (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(D) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(ii)(C) of this subsection.
(7) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from
the prior school year for programs included under subsections (3) and
(4) of this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment
changes, compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b)
that are or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Prior school year" means the most recent school year completed
prior to the year in which the levies are to be collected.
(b) "Current school year" means the year immediately following the
prior school year.
(c) "Initiative 728 rate" means the allocation rate at which the
student achievement program would have been funded under chapter 3,
Laws of 2001, if all annual adjustments to the initial 2001 allocation
rate had been made in previous years and in each subsequent year as
provided for under chapter 3, Laws of 2001.
(d) "Initiative 732 base" means the prior year's state allocation
for annual salary cost-of-living increases for district employees in
the state-funded salary base as it would have been calculated under
chapter 4, Laws of 2001, if each annual cost-of-living increase
allocation had been provided in previous years and in each subsequent
year.
(9) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
and inform school districts of the pertinent data necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section.
(11) For calendar year 2009, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall recalculate school district levy authority to
reflect levy rates certified by school districts for calendar year
2009.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2010 c 237 s 2 and 2010 c 99 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection minus (e) of this
subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as defined
in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) Except for nonhigh districts under (d) of this subsection, for
districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the nonresident
school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the resident
school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount
equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included in the
nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this section
multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (4) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The levy bases of nonhigh districts participating in an
innovation academy cooperative established under RCW 28A.340.080 shall
be adjusted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to reflect each district's proportional share of student enrollment in
the cooperative;
(e) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year, including allocations for compensation increases,
plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per
full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4)(a) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-four
percent in 2010 and twenty-eight percent in 2011 through ((2017)) 2013
and twenty-four percent every year thereafter;
(b) For qualifying districts, in addition to the percentage in (a)
of this subsection the grandfathered percentage determined as follows:
(i) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; ((and))
(ii) For 2011 ((through 2017)) and thereafter, the percentage
calculated as follows:
(A) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(B) Reduce the result of (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (5) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(C) Divide the result of (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(D) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(ii)(C) of this subsection((;
(iii) For 2018 and thereafter, the percentage shall be calculated
as follows:
(A) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(B) Reduce the result of (b)(iii)(A) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (5) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(C) Divide the result of (b)(iii)(B) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(D) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii)(C) of this subsection)).
(5) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from
the prior school year for programs included under subsection (3) of
this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment changes,
compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b) that are
or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year" means the
most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies
are to be collected.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "current school year" means
the year immediately following the prior school year.
(8) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

Sec. 6 2010 c 237 s 9 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
Sections 1((,)) and 5((, and 6)) of this act expire January 1,
2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 2010 c 237 s 6 expires August 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 3 of this act takes effect August 1,
2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 2 of this act expires January 1,
2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 2 of this act takes effect August
1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 4 of this act expires January 1,
2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Section 5 of this act takes effect January
1, 2018.

--- END ---