BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.30.010 and 2002 c 160 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the Washington state board of denturists.
(2) "Denture" means a removable full or partial upper or lower
dental appliance to be worn in the mouth to replace missing natural
teeth.
(3) "Denturist" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of denturism.
(4) "Department" means the department of health.
(5) "Practice of denturism" means:
(a) Making, placing, constructing, altering, reproducing, or
repairing a denture; ((and))
(b) Taking impressions and furnishing or supplying a denture
directly to a person or advising the use of a denture, and maintaining
a facility for the same;
(c) Making, placing, constructing, altering, reproducing, or
repairing all other nonorthodontic removable oral devices; and
(d) Teeth whitening using bleaching solutions of twenty percent or
less.
(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

--- END ---