BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.657.125 and 2010 c 235 s 114 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The McCleary decision by the state supreme court in 2011
found that the legislature is not meeting its paramount duty to
adequately fund K-12 basic education. The court also found that recent
legislative efforts to adjust the basic education definition and
funding models using the prototypical school model will meet the
paramount duty if implemented and fully funded in a timely manner.
(b) The legislature finds that in return for increased investment
in education, the public expects a unified and equitable system of
education accountability, which must include expectations and
benchmarks for improvement, along with support for schools ((and)),
districts, and other educational institutions to make the necessary
changes that will lead to success for all students. Such a system must
also clearly address the consequences for persistent lack of
improvement. ((Establishing a process for school districts to prepare
and implement a required action plan is one such consequence. However,
to be truly accountable to students, parents, the community, and
taxpayers, the legislature must also consider what should happen if a
required action district continues not to make improvement after an
extended period of time. Without an answer to this significant
question, the state's system of education accountability is
incomplete.)) Furthermore, accountability must be appropriately shared
among various levels of decision makers, including ((in the building,
in the district,)) at the local or institutional level and at the
state.
(c) The legislature further finds increasing evidence that
comprehensive early learning programs, particularly for at-risk
children, have a significant impact both on children's readiness to
learn and on their success in early grades and beyond. At the same
time, students' readiness for career and college after high school
graduation is increasingly important in today's economy. These
findings suggest that the educational system from prekindergarten
through postsecondary should be considered comprehensively rather than
as individual sectors.
(2)(a) A joint select committee on education finance and
accountability is established beginning no earlier than May 1, 2012,
with the following voting members:
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint ((two)) four members
from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint
((two)) four members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives.
(iii) The superintendent of public instruction or a designee shall
serve as a member of the committee.
(b) The committee shall choose its chair or cochairs from among its
legislative membership.
(3) ((The committee shall:
(a))) The purpose of the committee is to identify revenue sources
to adequately fund the state's education system; identify and analyze
options for a complete system of education accountability, particularly
consequences in the case of persistent lack of improvement ((by a
required action district;
(b) Identify and analyze appropriate decision-making
responsibilities and accompanying consequences at the building,
district, and state level within such an accountability system;
(c) Examine models and experiences in other states;
(d) Identify the circumstances under which significant state action
may be required; and
(e) Analyze the financial, legal, and practical considerations that
would accompany significant state action)); and assist the legislature
in meeting the requirements of the McCleary decision in a timely
manner.
(4)(a) The committee shall establish a scope of work and identify
the priority issues to be addressed, taking into consideration its
purpose and the time available for the task force to operate. The
committee shall consider the previous work of the basic education
finance task force, the quality education council, the state board of
education, the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability
committee, and technical working groups convened under chapter 548,
Laws of 2009; the timelines for implementation of chapter 236, Laws of
2010; the comprehensive plan for a voluntary program of early learning;
the state's application for flexibility under the federal elementary
and secondary education act; and other relevant research and reports.
(b) One objective of the committee is to provide maximum
transparency for parents, educators, and other citizens regarding how
the state's education system is funded and how education system
performance expectations are established and measured. A second
objective is to assure balance and shared responsibility between the
local and state level, including through stable and predictable funding
sources at both the local and state level.
(c) The preliminary report of the committee is due January 1, 2013,
and at a minimum shall include:
(i) The scope of work and priority issues the committee intends to
address, including the extent that the scope will include early
learning, K-12 education, and higher education, and including a work
plan with timelines for completion of the committee's work;
(ii) Based on the scope of work, recommendations for adjusting the
membership and organization of the committee, if necessary to provide
expertise to address the priority issues; and
(iii) Strategies for involving and seeking input from the public
and groups representing parents, educators, business, labor, and other
interested community members, which may include creation of
subcommittees.
(d) The final report of the committee is due January 1, 2014. The
committee may recommend multiple options, but shall recommend one
preferred alternative, including an outline of necessary implementing
legislation. The committee must recommend areas in the budget to be
eliminated or reduced if an option includes no new revenues.
(5) Staff support for the committee must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research, with assistance from the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, the office of financial management, the Washington
state institute for public policy, and other state agencies as
necessary.
(((5) The committee shall submit an interim report to the education
committees of the legislature by September 1, 2012, and a final report
with recommendations by September 1, 2013.))
(6) This section expires June 30, 2014.

--- END ---