BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In Washington, the citizens' right of
participation is a cornerstone of the legislative process at both the
state and local level. The more the citizenry is able to participate
in their government, the greater the legitimacy of the decisions that
are reached.
Citizens in a number of cities have recently voted to overturn
decisions to install automated traffic safety cameras. The legislature
therefore finds that it is necessary to take action to guarantee the
right of all citizens to participate in these decisions and jointly
decide if they wish to subject themselves to this type of electronic
monitoring.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.63.170 and 2011 c 367 s 704 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The use of automated traffic safety cameras for issuance of
notices of infraction is subject to the following requirements:
(a) The appropriate local legislative authority must first enact an
ordinance allowing for their use to detect one or more of the
following: Stoplight, railroad crossing, or school speed zone
violations. At a minimum, the local ordinance must contain the
restrictions described in this section and provisions for public notice
and signage. Cities and counties using automated traffic safety
cameras before July 24, 2005, are subject to the restrictions described
in this section, but are not required to enact an authorizing
ordinance.
(b) Use of automated traffic safety cameras is restricted to two-arterial intersections, railroad crossings, and school speed zones
only.
(c) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, automated traffic safety
cameras may be used to detect speed violations for the purposes of
section 201(2), chapter 367, Laws of 2011 if the local legislative
authority first enacts an ordinance authorizing the use of cameras to
detect speed violations.
(d) Automated traffic safety cameras may only take pictures of the
vehicle and vehicle license plate and only while an infraction is
occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of
passengers in the vehicle.
(e) A notice of infraction must be mailed to the registered owner
of the vehicle within fourteen days of the violation, or to the renter
of a vehicle within fourteen days of establishing the renter's name and
address under subsection (3)(a) of this section. The law enforcement
officer issuing the notice of infraction shall include with it a
certificate or facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of photographs,
microphotographs, or electronic images produced by an automated traffic
safety camera, stating the facts supporting the notice of infraction.
This certificate or facsimile is prima facie evidence of the facts
contained in it and is admissible in a proceeding charging a violation
under this chapter. The photographs, microphotographs, or electronic
images evidencing the violation must be available for inspection and
admission into evidence in a proceeding to adjudicate the liability for
the infraction. A person receiving a notice of infraction based on
evidence detected by an automated traffic safety camera may respond to
the notice by mail.
(f) The registered owner of a vehicle is responsible for an
infraction under RCW 46.63.030(1)(((e))) (d) unless the registered
owner overcomes the presumption in RCW 46.63.075, or, in the case of a
rental car business, satisfies the conditions under subsection (3) of
this section. If appropriate under the circumstances, a renter
identified under subsection (3)(a) of this section is responsible for
an infraction.
(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs,
microphotographs, or electronic images prepared under this section are
for the exclusive use of law enforcement in the discharge of duties
under this section and are not open to the public and may not be used
in a court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or
proceeding relates to a violation under this section. No photograph,
microphotograph, or electronic image may be used for any purpose other
than enforcement of violations under this section nor retained longer
than necessary to enforce this section.
(h) All locations where an automated traffic safety camera is used
must be clearly marked by placing signs in locations that clearly
indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone where traffic
laws are enforced by an automated traffic safety camera.
(i) If a county or city has established an authorized automated
traffic safety camera program under this section, the compensation paid
to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based only
upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in
support of the system, and may not be based upon a portion of the fine
or civil penalty imposed or the revenue generated by the equipment.
(2) Infractions detected through the use of automated traffic
safety cameras are not part of the registered owner's driving record
under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, infractions generated
by the use of automated traffic safety cameras under this section shall
be processed in the same manner as parking infractions, including for
the purposes of RCW 3.50.100, 35.20.220, 46.16A.120, and 46.20.270(3).
However, the amount of the fine issued for an infraction generated
through the use of an automated traffic safety camera shall not exceed
the amount of a fine issued for other parking infractions within the
jurisdiction.
(3) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business, the law enforcement agency shall, before a notice of
infraction being issued under this section, provide a written notice to
the rental car business that a notice of infraction may be issued to
the rental car business if the rental car business does not, within
eighteen days of receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing
agency by return mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine
who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction
occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction.
A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a
copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft; or
(c) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car
business may pay the applicable penalty.
Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
chapter for the notice of infraction.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer
from issuing a notice of traffic infraction to a person in control of
a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a),
(b), or (c).
(5) For the purposes of this section, "automated traffic safety
camera" means a device that uses a vehicle sensor installed to work in
conjunction with an intersection traffic control system, a railroad
grade crossing control system, or a speed measuring device, and a
camera synchronized to automatically record one or more sequenced
photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images of the rear of a
motor vehicle at the time the vehicle fails to stop when facing a
steady red traffic control signal or an activated railroad grade
crossing control signal, or exceeds a speed limit in a school speed
zone as detected by a speed measuring device. During the 2011-2013
fiscal biennium, an automated traffic safety camera includes a camera
used to detect speed violations for the purposes of section 201(2),
chapter 367, Laws of 2011.
(6) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, this section does not
apply to automated traffic safety cameras for the purposes of section
216(5), chapter 367, Laws of 2011.
(7)(a) Ordinances adopted under this section are subject to
referendum for forty-five days after passage. A referendum petition
must be: Signed by registered voters in a number equal to not less
than fifteen percent of the votes cast in the last general state
election in the adopting county or city, as determined by the county
auditor; submitted to the applicable county or city legislative body;
and submitted to the auditor of the applicable county or the county in
which all or a majority of the applicable city's territory is located.
Upon receipt of the county auditor's certificate of sufficiency by the
legislative body, the question of whether to employ automated traffic
safety cameras as provided in the ordinance must be submitted to the
voters of the county or city in a general election, if one is to be
held within ninety days, or at a special election called for that
purpose according to RCW 29A.04.321 or 29A.04.330. The election,
including required notifications, must be conducted as provided in the
general election law. The ordinance must be deemed approved by the
voters unless a majority of the votes cast on the proposition are in
opposition to the proposition.
(b) After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding
the date of passage of the ordinance, if no timely and sufficient
referendum petition has been filed, the ordinance must take effect upon
the date fixed in the ordinance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Ordinances pertaining to the use or prohibition of automated
traffic safety cameras for issuance of notices of infraction may be
initiated by petition of registered voters of the city filed with the
legislative body. A copy of the petition must be filed with the
auditor of the county in which all or a majority of the city's
territory is located. If the petition accompanying the proposed
ordinance is signed by registered voters in a number equal to not less
than fifteen percent of the votes cast in the last general state
election in the city, as determined by the county auditor, and if it
contains a request that, unless passed by the legislative body, the
ordinance be submitted to a vote of the registered voters of the city,
the legislative body must:
(a) Pass the proposed ordinance without alteration within twenty
days after the county auditor's certificate of sufficiency has been
received by the legislative body; or
(b) Immediately after the county auditor's certificate of
sufficiency for the petition is received, cause to be called a special
election to be held within ninety days, or at a special election called
for that purpose according to RCW 29A.04.321 or 29A.04.330, for
submission of the proposed ordinance without alteration, to a vote of
the people. If the number of votes cast favor the proposed ordinance,
it is effective immediately and must be made a part of the record of
ordinances of the city.
(2) Elections called under this section, including required
notifications, must be conducted as provided in the general election
law.
(3) The petitioner preparing an initiative petition for submission
under this section must follow the procedures established in RCW
35.21.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Ordinances pertaining to the use or prohibition of automated
traffic safety cameras for issuance of notices of infraction may be
initiated by petition of registered voters of the code city filed with
the legislative body. A copy of the petition must be filed with the
auditor of the county in which all or a majority of the code city's
territory is located. If the petition accompanying the proposed
ordinance is signed by registered voters in a number equal to not less
than fifteen percent of the votes cast in the last general state
election in the code city, as determined by the county auditor, and if
it contains a request that, unless passed by the legislative body, the
ordinance be submitted to a vote of the registered voters of the code
city, the legislative body must:
(a) Pass the proposed ordinance without alteration within twenty
days after the county auditor's certificate of sufficiency has been
received by the legislative body; or
(b) Immediately after the county auditor's certificate of
sufficiency for the petition is received, cause to be called a special
election to be held within ninety days, or at a special election called
for that purpose according to RCW 29A.04.321 or 29A.04.330, for
submission of the proposed ordinance without alteration, to a vote of
the people. If the number of votes cast favor the proposed ordinance,
it is effective immediately and must be made a part of the record of
ordinances of the code city.
(2) Elections called under this section, including required
notifications, must be conducted as provided in the general election
law.
(3) The petitioner preparing an initiative petition for submission
under this section must follow the procedures established in RCW
35.21.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Ordinances pertaining to the use or prohibition of automated
traffic safety cameras for issuance of notices of infraction may be
initiated by petition of registered voters of the county filed with the
legislative body. A copy of the petition must be filed with the county
auditor. If the petition accompanying the proposed ordinance is signed
by registered voters in a number equal to not less than fifteen percent
of the votes cast in the last general state election in the city, as
determined by the county auditor, and if it contains a request that,
unless passed by the legislative body, the ordinance be submitted to a
vote of the registered voters of the county, the legislative body must:
(a) Pass the proposed ordinance without alteration within twenty
days after the county auditor's certificate of sufficiency has been
received by the legislative body; or
(b) Immediately after the county auditor's certificate of
sufficiency for the petition is received, cause to be called a special
election to be held within ninety days, or at a special election called
for that purpose according to RCW 29A.04.321 or 29A.04.330, for
submission of the proposed ordinance without alteration, to a vote of
the people. If the number of votes cast favor the proposed ordinance,
it is effective immediately and must be made a part of the record of
ordinances of the county.
(2) Elections called under this section, including required
notifications, must be conducted as provided in the general election
law.
(3) The petitioner preparing an initiative petition for submission
under this section must follow the procedures established in section 6
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Petitions filed under section 5 of this act must be submitted to
the county auditor who shall verify the signatures on the petition to
determine that the petition has been signed by the requisite number of
persons who are registered voters within the county. If the petition
is found not to have the requisite number of signatures, it must be
returned to the petitioners. If the petition is found to be
sufficient, the auditor shall certify and transmit the petition to the
county legislative body.

--- END ---