BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.135.045 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 950 are each
amended to read as follows:
The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(1) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, funds may also be
used for higher education facilities preservation and maintenance.
During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the legislature may
transfer from the education construction fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.
(2) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection ((shall))
must result in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for
the fiscal period for which the appropriation is made and ((shall))
does not affect any subsequent fiscal period.
(3) Funds for the student achievement program in RCW 28A.505.210
and 28A.505.220 ((shall)) must be appropriated to the superintendent of
public instruction strictly for distribution to school districts to
meet the provisions set out in the student achievement act.
Allocations ((shall)) must be made on an equal per full-time equivalent
student basis to each school district.
(4) After July 1, 2010, the state treasurer ((shall)) must transfer
one hundred two million dollars from the general fund to the education
construction fund by June 30th of each year. However, the transfers
may not take place in the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2015.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.18.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7034 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Taxes collected under this chapter ((shall)) must be held in
trust until paid to the state. Except as otherwise provided in this
subsection (1), taxes received by the state ((shall)) must be deposited
in the public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050((:
PROVIDED, That during the fiscal year 2011)). For the period beginning
July 1, 2011, and ending June 30, 2015, taxes received by the state
under this chapter must be deposited in the general fund for general
purpose expenditures. For fiscal years 2016, 2017, and 2018, one-half
of the taxes received by the state under this chapter must be deposited
in the general fund for general purpose expenditures and the remainder
deposited in the public works assistance account. Any person
collecting the tax who appropriates or converts the tax collected
((shall be)) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the money required to
be collected is not available for payment on the date payment is due.
If a taxpayer fails to pay the tax imposed by this chapter to the
person charged with collection of the tax and the person charged with
collection fails to pay the tax to the department, the department may,
in its discretion, proceed directly against the taxpayer for collection
of the tax.
(2) The tax ((shall be)) is due from the taxpayer within twenty-five days from the date the taxpayer is billed by the person collecting
the tax.
(3) The tax ((shall be)) is due from the person collecting the tax
at the end of the tax period in which the tax is received from the
taxpayer. If the taxpayer remits only a portion of the total amount
billed for taxes, consideration, and related charges, the amount
remitted ((shall)) must be applied first to payment of the solid waste
collection tax and this tax ((shall have)) has priority over all other
claims to the amount remitted.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.160 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 969 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) On or before the twenty-fifth day of each month, all taxes
collected under RCW 82.08.150 during the preceding month must be
remitted to the state department of revenue, to be deposited with the
state treasurer. Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, upon receipt of such moneys the state treasurer must credit
sixty-five percent of the sums collected and remitted under RCW
82.08.150 (1) and (2) and one hundred percent of the sums collected and
remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (3) and (4) to the state general fund and
thirty-five percent of the sums collected and remitted under RCW
82.08.150 (1) and (2) to a fund which is hereby created to be known as
the "liquor excise tax fund."
(2) During the ((2011-2013)) 2012 fiscal ((biennium)) year, 66.19
percent of the sums collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and
(2) must be deposited in the state general fund and the remainder
collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) must be
deposited in the liquor excise tax fund.
(3) During fiscal year 2013, all funds collected under RCW
82.08.150 (1), (2), (3), and (4) must be deposited into the state
general fund.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.08.170 and 2002 c 38 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, during
the months of January, April, July, and October of each year, the state
treasurer ((shall)) must make the transfers required under subsections
(2) and (3) of this section from the liquor excise tax fund and then
the apportionment and distribution of all remaining moneys in the
liquor excise tax fund to the counties, cities, and towns in the
following proportions: (a) Twenty percent of the moneys in the liquor
excise tax fund ((shall)) must be divided among and distributed to the
counties of the state in accordance with the provisions of RCW
66.08.200; and (b) eighty percent of the moneys in the liquor excise
tax fund ((shall)) must be divided among and distributed to the cities
and towns of the state in accordance with the provisions of RCW
66.08.210.
(2) Each fiscal quarter and prior to making the twenty percent
distribution to counties under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the
treasurer shall transfer to the ((county research services account
under RCW 43.110.050)) liquor revolving fund created in RCW 66.08.170
sufficient moneys to fund the allotments from any legislative
appropriations ((from the county research services account)) for county
research and services as provided under chapter 43.110 RCW.
(3) During the months of January, April, July, and October of each
year, the state treasurer must transfer two million five hundred
thousand dollars from the liquor excise tax fund to the state general
fund.
(4) During calendar year 2012, the October distribution under
subsection (1) of this section and the July and October transfers under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section must not be made. During
calendar year 2013, the January, April, and July distributions under
subsection (1) of this section and transfers under subsections (2) and
(3) of this section must not be made.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.110.030 and 2010 c 271 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of commerce ((shall)) must contract for the
provision of municipal research and services to cities, towns, and
counties. Contracts for municipal research and services ((shall)) must
be made with state agencies, educational institutions, or private
consulting firms, that in the judgment of the department are qualified
to provide such research and services. Contracts for staff support may
be made with state agencies, educational institutions, or private
consulting firms that in the judgment of the department are qualified
to provide such support.
(2) Municipal research and services ((shall)) consists of:
(a) Studying and researching city, town, and county government and
issues relating to city, town, and county government;
(b) Acquiring, preparing, and distributing publications related to
city, town, and county government and issues relating to city, town,
and county government;
(c) Providing educational conferences relating to city, town, and
county government and issues relating to city, town, and county
government; and
(d) Furnishing legal, technical, consultative, and field services
to cities, towns, and counties concerning planning, public health,
utility services, fire protection, law enforcement, public works, and
other issues relating to city, town, and county government.
(3) Requests for legal services by county officials ((shall)) must
be sent to the office of the county prosecuting attorney. Responses by
the department of commerce to county requests for legal services
((shall)) must be provided to the requesting official and the county
prosecuting attorney.
(4) The department of commerce ((shall)) must coordinate with the
association of Washington cities and the Washington state association
of counties in carrying out the activities in this section. ((Services
to cities and towns shall be based upon the moneys appropriated to the
department from the city and town research services account under RCW
43.110.060. Services to counties shall be based upon the moneys
appropriated to the department from the county research services
account under RCW 43.110.050.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.110.050 (County research services account) and 2002 c 38
s 1 & 1997 c 437 s 3; and
(2) RCW 43.110.060 (City and town research services account) and
2010 c 271 s 702, 2002 c 38 s 4, & 2000 c 227 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 All moneys remaining in the county research
services account and city and town research services account on July 1,
2012, must be deposited by the state treasurer into the general fund.

Sec. 8 RCW 66.08.190 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 960 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((Except for revenues generated by the 2003 surcharge of
$0.42/liter on retail sales of spirits that must be distributed to the
state general fund during the 2003-2005 biennium,)) Prior to making
distributions described in subsection (2) of this section, amounts must
be retained to support allotments under RCW 43.88.110 from any
legislative appropriation for municipal research and services. The
legislative appropriation for such services must be in the amount
specified under RCW 66.24.065.
(2) When excess funds are distributed during the months of June,
September, December, and March of each year, all moneys subject to
distribution must be disbursed ((as follows:
(a) Three-tenths of one percent to border areas under RCW
66.08.195; and
(b) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, from the
amount remaining after distribution under (a) of this subsection, (i)
fifty percent to the general fund of the state, (ii) ten percent to the
counties of the state, and (iii) forty percent to the incorporated
cities and towns of the state.
(2) During the months of June, September, December, and March of
each year, prior to disbursing the distribution to incorporated cities
and towns under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the treasurer must
deduct from that distribution an amount that will fund that quarter's
allotments under RCW 43.88.110 from any legislative appropriation from
the city and town research services account. The treasurer must
deposit the amount deducted into the city and town research services
account.
(3) The governor may notify and direct the state treasurer to
withhold the revenues to which the counties and cities are entitled
under this section if the counties or cities are found to be in
noncompliance pursuant to RCW 36.70A.340.
(4) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, from the amount remaining
after distribution under subsection (1)(a) of this section, (a) 51.7
percent to the general fund of the state, (b) 9.7 percent to the
counties of the state, and (c) 38.6 percent to the incorporated cities
and towns of the state)) to border areas, counties, cities, and towns
as provided in RCW 66.24.065.
(3) The amount remaining after distributions under subsections (1)
and (2) of this section must be deposited into the general fund.

Sec. 9 RCW 66.08.196 and 2001 c 8 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Distribution of funds to border areas under RCW 66.08.190 and
66.24.290 (1)(((a))) (c) and (4) ((shall be)) is as follows:
(((1))) (a) Sixty-five percent of the funds ((shall)) must be
distributed to border areas ratably based on border area traffic
totals;
(((2))) (b) Twenty-five percent of the funds ((shall)) must be
distributed to border areas ratably based on border-related crime
statistics; and
(((3))) (c) Ten percent of the funds ((shall)) must be distributed
to border areas ratably based upon border area per capita law
enforcement spending.
(2) Distributions to an unincorporated area ((shall)) must be made
to the county in which such an area is located and may only be spent on
services provided to that area.

Sec. 10 RCW 66.08.200 and 1979 c 151 s 167 are each amended to
read as follows:
With respect to the ((ten percent share coming)) distribution of
funds to the counties, the computations for distribution ((shall)) must
be made by the state agency responsible for collecting the same as
follows:
(1) The share coming to each eligible county ((shall)) must be
determined by a division among the eligible counties according to the
relation which the population of the unincorporated area of such
eligible county, as last determined by the office of financial
management, bears to the population of the total combined
unincorporated areas of all eligible counties, as determined by the
office of financial management((: PROVIDED, That)). However, no
county in which the sale of liquor is forbidden in the unincorporated
area thereof as the result of an election ((shall be)) is entitled to
share in such distribution. "Unincorporated area" means all that
portion of any county not included within the limits of incorporated
cities and towns.
(2) When a special county census has been conducted for the purpose
of determining the population base of a county's unincorporated area
for use in the distribution of liquor funds, the census figure
((shall)) becomes effective for the purpose of distributing funds as of
the official census date once the census results have been certified by
the office of financial management and officially submitted to the
office of the secretary of state.

Sec. 11 RCW 66.08.210 and 1979 c 151 s 168 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) With respect to the ((forty percent share coming)) distribution
of funds to the incorporated cities and towns under RCW
66.24.290(1)(c), the computations for distribution ((shall)) must be
made by the state agency responsible for collecting the same as
((follows:)) provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The share coming to each eligible city or town ((shall)) must
be determined by a division among the eligible cities and towns within
the state ratably on the basis of population as last determined by the
office of financial management((: AND PROVIDED, That)). However, no
city or town in which the sale of liquor is forbidden as the result of
an election ((shall be)) is entitled to any share in such distribution.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.63A.190 and 1995 c 159 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
Funds appropriated by the legislature as supplemental resources for
border areas ((shall)) must be distributed by the state treasurer
pursuant to the formula for distributing funds ((from the liquor
revolving fund)) to border areas, and expenditure requirements for such
distributions, under RCW 66.08.196.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Section 2 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 and 3 through 12 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---