BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Legislation enacted in 2009 (chapter
548, Laws of 2009) and in 2010 (chapter 236, Laws of 2010) revised the
definition of the program of basic education, established new methods
for distributing state funds to school districts to support this
program of basic education, and provided an outline of specific
enhancements to the program of basic education that are required to be
implemented by 2018. In order to meet the required deadlines to
implement full funding of the enhancements, the joint task force in
section 2 of this act is created to develop and recommend options for
a permanent funding mechanism.
(2) Initiative Measure No. 728 (chapter 3, Laws of 2001) dedicated
a portion of state revenues to fund class size reductions and other
education improvements. Because class size reductions and similar
improvements are incorporated in the reforms that were enacted in
chapter 548, Laws of 2009, and chapter 236, Laws of 2010, and that are
being incrementally implemented through 2018, Initiative Measure No.
728 is repealed in order to make these dedicated revenues available for
implementation of basic education reform and to facilitate the funding
reform recommendations of the joint task force in section 2 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint task force on education
funding is established. The task force shall make recommendations on
how the legislature can meet the requirements outlined in chapter 548,
Laws of 2009 and chapter 236, Laws of 2010. In particular, the task
force shall develop a proposal for a reliable and dependable funding
mechanism to support basic education programs. At a minimum, the
proposed funding mechanism must support full implementation of the
programmatic enhancements required in chapter 548, Laws of 2009, and
chapter 236, Laws of 2010, including full-day kindergarten; reduced K-3
class size; increased allocations for maintenance, supplies, and
operating costs; and a new pupil transportation formula.
(2)(a) The joint task force on education funding shall consist of
the following members:
(i) Eight legislators, with two members from each of the two
largest caucuses of the senate appointed by the president of the senate
and two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(ii) Three individuals, to be appointed by the governor.
(b) The task force may recommend multiple options, but shall
recommend one preferred alternative, including an outline of necessary
implementing legislation. Should the task force recommend an option to
fully fund the program of basic education with no new revenues, the
task force must identify what areas already in the budget would be
eliminated or reduced.
(c) The task force shall be staffed by the house of representatives
office of program research, senate committee services, and the office
of financial management, with assistance from the Washington state
institute for public policy and other agencies as necessary.
(3) The task force shall submit a final report to the legislature
by December 31, 2012.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.380 and 2009 c 548 s 110 and 2009 c 479 s 16
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state legislature shall, at each regular session in an odd-numbered year, appropriate for the current use of the common schools
such amounts as needed for state support to school districts during the
ensuing biennium for the program of basic education under RCW
28A.150.200.
(2) In addition to those state funds provided to school districts
for basic education, the legislature may appropriate funds to be
distributed to school districts for other factors and for other special
programs to enhance or enrich the program of basic education.
(((3) The state legislature shall also, at each regular session in
an odd-numbered year, appropriate from the general fund and education
construction fund for the purposes of and in accordance with the
provisions of the student achievement act during the ensuing
biennium.))

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.600.405 and 2007 c 355 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section and RCW 28B.50.534, "eligible
student" means a student who has completed all state and local high
school graduation requirements except the certificate of academic
achievement under RCW 28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual
achievement under RCW 28A.155.045, who is less than age twenty-one as
of September 1st of the academic year the student enrolls at a
community and technical college under this section, and who meets the
following criteria:
(a) Receives a level 2 (basic) score on the reading and writing
content areas of the high school ((Washington assessment of student
learning)) statewide student assessment;
(b) Has not successfully met state standards on a retake of the
assessment or an alternative assessment;
(c) Has participated in assessment remediation; and
(d) Receives a recommendation to enroll in courses or a program of
study made available under RCW 28B.50.534 from his or her high school
principal.
(2) An eligible student may enroll in courses or a program of study
made available by a community or technical college participating in the
pilot program created under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose of obtaining
a high school diploma.
(3) For eligible students in courses or programs delivered directly
by the community or technical college participating in the pilot
program under RCW 28B.50.534 and only for enrollment in courses that
lead to a high school diploma, the superintendent of public instruction
shall transmit to the colleges participating in the pilot program an
amount per each full-time equivalent college student at statewide
uniform rates. The amount shall be the sum of (a), (b), and (c)((, and
(d))) of this subsection, as applicable.
(a) The superintendent shall separately calculate and allocate
moneys appropriated for basic education under RCW 28A.150.260 for
purposes of making payments under this section. The calculations and
allocations shall be based upon the estimated statewide annual average
per full-time equivalent high school student allocations under RCW
28A.150.260, excluding small high school enhancements, and applicable
rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(b) The superintendent shall allocate an amount equal to the per
funded student state allocation for the learning assistance program
under chapter 28A.165 RCW for each full-time equivalent college student
or a pro rata amount for less than full-time enrollment.
(c) ((The superintendent shall allocate an amount equal to the per
full-time equivalent student allocation for the student achievement
program under RCW 28A.505.210 for each full-time equivalent college
student or a pro rata amount for less than full-time enrollment.
(d))) For eligible students who meet eligibility criteria for the
state transitional bilingual instruction program under chapter 28A.180
RCW, the superintendent shall allocate an amount equal to the per
student state allocation for the transitional bilingual instruction
program or a pro rata amount for less than full-time enrollment.
(4) The superintendent may adopt rules establishing enrollment
reporting, recordkeeping, and accounting requirements necessary to
ensure accountability for the use of basic education, learning
assistance, and transitional bilingual program funds under this section
for the pilot program created under RCW 28B.50.534.
(5) All school districts in the geographic area of the two
community and technical colleges selected pursuant to section 8,
chapter 355, Laws of 2007 to participate in the pilot program shall
provide information about the high school completion option under RCW
28B.50.534 to students in grades ten, eleven, and twelve and the
parents or guardians of those students.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.135.045 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 950 are each
amended to read as follows:
The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(1) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, funds may also be
used for higher education facilities preservation and maintenance.
During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the legislature may
transfer from the education construction fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.
(2) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(3) ((Funds for the student achievement program in RCW 28A.505.210
and 28A.505.220 shall be appropriated to the superintendent of public
instruction strictly for distribution to school districts to meet the
provisions set out in the student achievement act. Allocations shall
be made on an equal per full-time equivalent student basis to each
school district.
(4))) After July 1, 2010, the state treasurer shall transfer one
hundred two million dollars from the general fund to the education
construction fund by June 30th of each year.

Sec. 6 RCW 67.70.340 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 27 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that creating a shared game lottery
could result in less revenue being raised by the existing state lottery
ticket sales. The legislature further recognizes that the fund most
impacted by this potential event is the Washington opportunity pathways
account. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to use some of
the proceeds from the shared game lottery to make up the difference
that the potential state lottery revenue loss would have on the
Washington opportunity pathways account. The legislature further
intends to use some of the proceeds from the shared game lottery to
fund programs and services related to problem and pathological
gambling.
(2) The Washington opportunity pathways account is expected to
receive one hundred two million dollars annually from state lottery
games other than the shared game lottery. For fiscal year 2011 and
thereafter, if the amount of lottery revenues earmarked for the
Washington opportunity pathways account is less than one hundred two
million dollars, the commission, after making the transfer required
under subsection (3) of this section, must transfer sufficient moneys
from revenues derived from the shared game lottery into the Washington
opportunity pathways account to bring the total revenue up to one
hundred two million dollars.
(3)(a) The commission shall transfer, from revenue derived from the
shared game lottery, to the problem gambling account created in RCW
43.20A.892, an amount equal to the percentage specified in (b) of this
subsection of net receipts. For purposes of this subsection, "net
receipts" means the difference between (i) revenue received from the
sale of lottery tickets or shares and revenue received from the sale of
shared game lottery tickets or shares; and (ii) the sum of payments
made to winners.
(b) In fiscal year 2006, the percentage to be transferred to the
problem gambling account is one-tenth of one percent. In fiscal year
2007 and subsequent fiscal years, the percentage to be transferred to
the problem gambling account is thirteen one-hundredths of one percent.
(4) The commission shall transfer the remaining net revenues, if
any, derived from the shared game lottery "Powerball" authorized in RCW
67.70.044(1) after the transfers pursuant to this section into the
state general fund for ((the student achievement program under RCW
28A.505.220)) support for the program of basic education under RCW
28A.150.200.
(5) The remaining net revenues, if any, in the shared game lottery
account after the transfers pursuant to this section shall be deposited
into the Washington opportunity pathways account.

Sec. 7 RCW 83.100.230 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 953 are each
amended to read as follows:
The education legacy trust account is created in the state
treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for ((deposit into the
student achievement fund)) support of the common schools and for
expanding access to higher education through funding for new
enrollments and financial aid, and other educational improvement
efforts. ((During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account
may also be transferred into the state general fund.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.505.210 (Student achievement funds -- Use and accounting
of funds -- Public hearing -- Report) and 2009 c 479 s 17, 2005 c 497 s
105, & 2001 c 3 s 3; and
(2) RCW 28A.505.220 (Student achievement program -- General fund
allocation) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 17 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Nothing in this act alters or amends the
provisions of RCW 84.52.0531 or the methodology for calculating the
school district levy base set forth therein.

--- END ---