BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
BALANCED LEGISLATIVE BUDGET REQUIRED FOR CURRENT FISCAL BIENNIUM;
LEGISLATIVE BUDGETS MUST INCLUDE UPDATED BUDGET OUTLOOK. (1) When the
legislature enacts any bill that makes appropriations from the state
general fund or related funds, the legislature must prepare and publish
a balance sheet which demonstrates that total proposed appropriations
from the state general fund and related funds for that biennium will
leave, in total, a positive ending fund balance.
(2) When either house of the legislature approves or reports from
committee any bill that makes appropriations from the general fund or
related funds, it must prepare and publish an updated legislative
budget outlook for the ensuing fiscal biennium. The legislative budget
outlook must estimate how the revenue and expenditure decisions assumed
or funded in the bill will change the most recent budget outlook
prepared by the economic and revenue forecast council under section 2
of this act. The legislative budget outlook must also reflect the
estimated fiscal impact of assumed or enacted legislation with future
implementation dates.
(3) Balance sheets and legislative budget outlooks required under
this section must be prepared and published by senate committee
services for bills approved by the senate or reported from its
committees, by the office of program research for bills approved by or
reported from the house of representatives or its committees, and
jointly by senate committee services and the office of program research
for conference committee reports and acts enacted by the legislature.
(4) The requirements of this section apply to any bill that makes
appropriations from the general fund or related funds for the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium or for any fiscal period thereafter. "Related funds,"
as used in this section, means the Washington opportunity pathways
account and the education legacy trust account.
(5) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to an
appropriations bill that (a) either makes net reductions in total
general fund or related funds appropriations or increases the ending
fund balance in the general fund or related funds, or both, and (b) is
enacted between July 1st and February 15th of any fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.33 RCW
to read as follows:
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL MUST PREPARE AN OPERATING
BUDGET OUTLOOK. (1) Each January, the economic and revenue forecast
council established in RCW 82.33.010 must prepare and publish on its
web site a multibiennium budget outlook for state operating budget
revenues and expenditures. The purpose of the outlook is to inform
policymakers and the public by projecting and comparing estimates of
revenues and expenditures for ensuing fiscal biennia.
(2) The revenue and caseload projections used in the outlook must
be based on the most recent official forecasts adopted by the council
under RCW 82.33.010 and the caseload forecast council under chapter
43.88C RCW for the years for which those forecasts are available.
(3) The outlook must:
(a) Estimate revenues to and expenditures from the state general
fund and related funds. The estimate of ensuing biennium expenditures
must focus on maintenance items including, but not limited to,
continuation of current programs, forecasted growth of current
entitlement programs, and actions required by law, including
legislation with a future implementation date. Estimates of ensuing
biennium expenditures must exclude policy items including, but not
limited to, legislation not yet enacted by the legislature, collective
bargaining agreements not yet approved by the legislature, and changes
to levels of funding for employee salaries and benefits unless those
changes are required by statute;
(b) Address major budget and revenue drivers, including trends and
variability in these drivers;
(c) Clearly state the assumptions used in the estimates of baseline
and projected expenditures and any adjustments made to those estimates;
(d) Clearly state the assumptions used in the baseline revenue
estimates and any adjustments to those estimates;
(e) Include the impact of previously enacted legislation with a
future implementation date; and
(f) Address other major fiscal factors, such as pension funding
status and state general obligation debt.
(4) The outlook must also separately include projections based on
the revenues and expenditures proposed in the governor's budget
documents submitted to the legislature under RCW 43.88.030.
(5) By the later of June 30th or thirty days after the enactment of
the legislative biennial or supplemental operating budget, the council
must update the outlook to reflect the enacted budget and other
relevant enacted legislation.
(6) In odd-numbered years, the period covered by the January
outlook is the next two ensuing fiscal biennia. In even-numbered
years, the period covered by the January outlook is the current
biennium and the ensuing biennium.
(7) All state agencies must provide the council with immediate
access to all information relating to revenues, caseload forecasts, and
expenditures.
(8) "Related funds," as used in this chapter, means the Washington
opportunity pathways account and the education legacy trust account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.33 RCW
to read as follows:
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL MUST DEVELOP AND REPORT ON
METHODOLOGY FOR PREPARING AN OPERATING BUDGET OUTLOOK. (1) By December
1, 2012, the economic and revenue forecast council established in RCW
82.33.010 must develop and report on a proposed methodology for
preparing the operating budget outlook required under section 2 of this
act.
(2) The report must include an illustrative application of the
proposed methodology to fiscal data and forecasts from fiscal years
2000 through 2011, including analysis of the accuracy of the
methodology as applied to projections of revenue, caseloads, and
expenditures.
(3) The council must provide the proposed methodology and its
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature and must make the proposed methodology
publicly available on its web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.33 RCW
to read as follows:
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL MUST DEVELOP PROPOSAL FOR
ENACTING BUDGETS THAT ARE BALANCED IN ENSUING BIENNIA. (1) By December
1, 2013, the economic and revenue forecast council established in RCW
82.33.010 must prepare and present to the legislature for its
consideration a proposed methodology for determining whether state
operating and related funds appropriations and revenues are balanced
for the ensuing as well as the current fiscal biennium.
(2)(a) The proposed methodology must build on the outlook process
established in section 2 of this act. In estimating ensuing fiscal
biennium expenditures, the methodology must focus on maintenance items,
including, but not limited to, continuation of current programs,
forecasted growth of current entitlement programs, and actions required
by law, including legislation with a future implementation date.
Estimates of ensuing fiscal biennium expenditures must exclude policy
items including, but not limited to, legislation not yet enacted by the
legislature, collective bargaining agreements not yet approved by the
legislature, and changes to levels of funding for employee salaries and
benefits unless those changes are required by statute.
(b) The council must include an analysis of whether and the extent
to which the proposed methodology for projecting revenues and
expenditures for ensuing fiscal biennia may reliably be used to
determine the future impact of pending appropriations and revenue
legislation, and whether this information is sufficiently reliable to
permit a conclusion that revenues and expenditures are in balance in
ensuing fiscal biennia.
(c) The council may present more than one proposed methodology to
the legislature. The methodologies may include, but are not limited
to, use of a probability range within a stated confidence interval for
revenues, caseloads, and expenditures.
(3) By December 1, 2013, the council must provide the proposed
methodology to the office of financial management and the appropriate
fiscal committees of the legislature, and it must publish the proposed
methodology on its web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
GOVERNOR MUST SUBMIT OUTLOOK WITH BUDGET DOCUMENTS. When
submitting operating budget documents to the legislature under RCW
43.88.030, the governor must also submit an operating budget outlook
based on the governor's operating budget proposal. The governor must
use revenue, caseload, and budget outlook assumptions as used in the
most recent forecasts of the economic and revenue forecast council
under chapter 82.33 RCW and the caseload forecast council under chapter
43.88C RCW. When the governor proposes new legislation that affects
expenditures or revenues, the outlook submitted by the governor must
indicate how these changes affect the outlook prepared by the economic
and revenue forecast council under section 2 of this act. The outlook
must also reflect the estimated fiscal impact of assumed or enacted
legislation with future implementation dates. This requirement applies
beginning with the budget documents submitted in December 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.33 RCW
to read as follows:
BUDGET OUTLOOK WORK GROUP. (1) To promote the free flow of
information and to promote legislative input in the preparation of
budget outlooks under section 2 of this act, immediate access to all
information relating to the budget outlook process must be available to
the budget outlook work group hereby created. Revenue collection
information must be available to the budget outlook work group on the
first business day following the conclusion of each collection period.
The budget outlook work group consists of staff members selected by the
executive head or chair of each of the following agencies or
committees:
(a) Department of revenue, one member;
(b) Office of financial management, two members;
(c) Office of the state treasurer, one member;
(d) Caseload forecast council, one member;
(e) Ways and means committee of the senate, two committee staff
members; and
(f) Ways and means committee of the house of representatives, two
committee staff members.
(2) The budget outlook work group shall provide technical support
to the economic and revenue forecast council in preparing the budget
outlook under section 2 of this act. Meetings of the budget outlook
work group may be called by any member of the group for the purposes of
assisting the economic and revenue forecast council, reviewing the
state economic and revenue and caseload forecasts, reviewing monthly
revenue collection or expenditure data, or for any other purpose which
may assist the council in preparing budget outlooks.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.33.010 and 1990 c 229 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
STATE TREASURER ADDED TO ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL
MEMBERSHIP; COUNCIL DUTIES REVISED. (1) The economic and revenue
forecast council is hereby created. The council shall consist of the
state treasurer or his or her designee, two individuals appointed by
the governor, and four individuals, one of whom is appointed by the
chairperson of each of the two largest political caucuses in the senate
and house of representatives. The chair of the council shall be
selected from among the four caucus appointees. The council may select
such other officers as the members deem necessary.
(2) The council shall employ an economic and revenue forecast
supervisor to supervise the preparation of all economic and revenue
forecasts and state budget outlooks. As used in this chapter,
"supervisor" means the economic and revenue forecast supervisor.
Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members of the council
is required for any decisions regarding employment of the supervisor.
Employment of the supervisor shall terminate after each term of three
years. At the end of the first year of each three-year term the
council shall consider extension of the supervisor's term by one year.
The council may fix the compensation of the supervisor. The supervisor
shall employ staff sufficient to accomplish the purposes of this
section.
(3) The economic and revenue forecast council shall oversee the
preparation of and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four
members, the official, optimistic, and pessimistic state economic and
revenue forecasts prepared under RCW 82.33.020. If the council is
unable to approve a forecast before a date required in RCW 82.33.020,
the supervisor shall submit the forecast without approval and the
forecast shall have the same effect as if approved by the council.
(4) The economic and revenue forecast council shall oversee the
preparation of and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four
members, the state budget outlook prepared under section 2 of this act.
If the council is unable to approve a state budget outlook before a
date required in section 2 of this act, the supervisor shall submit the
outlook without approval and the outlook has the same effect as if
approved by the council.
(5) A councilmember who does not cast an affirmative vote for
approval of the official economic and revenue forecast or the state
budget outlook may request, and the supervisor shall provide, an
alternative economic and revenue forecast or state budget outlook based
on assumptions specified by the member.
(((5))) (6) Members of the economic and revenue forecast council
shall serve without additional compensation but shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending
sessions of the council or on official business authorized by the
council. Nonlegislative members of the council shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE
REVIEW. The joint legislative audit and review committee must review
and report on the implementation and effectiveness of the budget
outlook process established in sections 1, 2, and 5 of this act. The
review must include, but is not limited to, the accuracy of budget
outlook projections when compared to actual revenues, caseloads, and
expenditures. The committee must provide the report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2022.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 EXPIRATION DATE. This act expires July 1,
2023.

--- END ---