BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Each year, nearly one billion dollars in public funds are spent
on the purchase of employee insurance benefits for more than two
hundred thousand public school employees and their dependents; and
(b) The legislature needs better information regarding school
employee benefits to effectively oversee the use of state funds for
employee benefits.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to:
(a) Improve the transparency of health benefit plan claims and
financial data to assure prudent and efficient use of taxpayers' funds,
and to support equity in access to health benefits for all eligible
school district employees and their eligible dependents;
(b) Make school district employee premiums more responsive to the
need for greater affordability for full family coverage, with a goal of
reducing the disparity in employee premiums for family coverage to no
more than three times the cost of employee only coverage; and
(c) Retain current collective bargaining for benefits, and retain
state, school district, and employee contributions to benefits.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.400.280 and 2011 c 269 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, school
districts may provide employer fringe benefit contributions after
October 1, 1990, only for basic benefits. However, school districts
may continue payments under contracts with employees or benefit
providers in effect on April 13, 1990, until the contract expires.
(2) School districts may provide employer contributions after
October 1, 1990, for optional benefit plans, in addition to basic
benefits, only for employees included in pooling arrangements under
this subsection. Optional benefits may include direct agreements as
defined in chapter 48.150 RCW, but may not include employee beneficiary
accounts that can be liquidated by the employee on termination of
employment. Optional benefit plans may be offered only if:
(a) The school district pools benefit allocations among employees
using a financial pooling arrangement that includes no more than two
pools that combine at least one employee bargaining unit ((and/or))
with all nonbargaining group employees and combines all other employees
in another pool if a separate pool is chosen;
(b) Each full-time employee included in the pooling arrangement is
offered basic benefits, including coverage for dependents((, without a
payroll deduction for premium charges));
(c) Each employee included in the pooling arrangement who elects
medical benefit coverage pays a minimum premium charge subject to
collective bargaining under chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW;
(d) The employee premiums are structured to ensure employees
selecting richer benefit plans pay the higher premium;
(e) Each full-time employee included in the pooling arrangement,
regardless of the number of dependents receiving basic coverage,
receives the same additional employer contribution for other coverage
or optional benefits; and
(((d))) (f) For part-time employees included in the pooling
arrangement, participation in optional benefit plans shall be governed
by the same eligibility criteria and/or proration of employer
contributions used for allocations for basic benefits.
(3) Savings accruing to school districts due to limitations on
benefit options under this section shall be pooled and made available
by the districts to reduce out-of-pocket premium expenses for employees
needing basic coverage for dependents. School districts are not
intended to divert state benefit allocations for other purposes.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.400.350 and 2011 c 269 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of any of the state's school districts
or educational service districts may make available liability, life,
health, health care, accident, disability, and salary protection or
insurance, direct agreements as defined in chapter 48.150 RCW, or any
one of, or a combination of the types of employee benefits enumerated
in this subsection, or any other type of insurance or protection, for
the members of the boards of directors, the students, and employees of
the school district or educational service district, and their
dependents. Such coverage may be provided by contracts or agreements
with private carriers, with the state health care authority after July
1, 1990, pursuant to the approval of the authority administrator, or
through self-insurance or self-funding pursuant to chapter 48.62 RCW,
or in any other manner authorized by law. Any direct agreement must
comply with RCW 48.150.050.
(2) Whenever funds are available for these purposes the board of
directors of the school district or educational service district may
contribute all or a part of the cost of such protection or insurance
for the employees of their respective school districts or educational
service districts and their dependents. The premiums on such liability
insurance shall be borne by the school district or educational service
district.
After October 1, 1990, school districts may not contribute to any
employee protection or insurance other than liability insurance unless
the district's employee benefit plan conforms to RCW 28A.400.275 and
28A.400.280.
(3) For school board members, educational service district board
members, and students, the premiums due on such protection or insurance
shall be borne by the assenting school board member, educational
service district board member, or student. The school district or
educational service district may contribute all or part of the costs,
including the premiums, of life, health, health care, accident or
disability insurance which shall be offered to all students
participating in interschool activities on the behalf of or as
representative of their school, school district, or educational service
district. The school district board of directors and the educational
service district board may require any student participating in
extracurricular interschool activities to, as a condition of
participation, document evidence of insurance or purchase insurance
that will provide adequate coverage, as determined by the school
district board of directors or the educational service district board,
for medical expenses incurred as a result of injury sustained while
participating in the extracurricular activity. In establishing such a
requirement, the district shall adopt regulations for waiving or
reducing the premiums of such coverage as may be offered through the
school district or educational service district to students
participating in extracurricular activities, for those students whose
families, by reason of their low income, would have difficulty paying
the entire amount of such insurance premiums. The district board shall
adopt regulations for waiving or reducing the insurance coverage
requirements for low-income students in order to assure such students
are not prohibited from participating in extracurricular interschool
activities.
(4) All contracts or agreements for insurance or protection written
to take advantage of the provisions of this section shall provide that
the beneficiaries of such contracts may utilize on an equal
participation basis the services of those practitioners licensed
pursuant to chapters 18.22, 18.25, 18.53, 18.57, and 18.71 RCW.
(5) Any school district and their benefit provider offering a
benefit plan by contract or agreement must demonstrate a commitment to:
(a) Significantly reduce administrative costs for school districts;
(b) Improve customer service;
(c) Reduce differential plan premium rates between employee only
and family health benefit premiums, with a goal of reducing the family
premiums to no more than three times the employee only premiums;
(d) Protect access to coverage for part-time K-12 employees; and
(e) Use innovative health plan features designed to reduce
utilization of unnecessary health services and offer evidence-based
health care services, which may include, but is not limited to,
adoption of state health technology assessment program decisions under
chapter 70.14 RCW and participation in efforts such as the Bree
collaborative under chapter 70.250 RCW.
(6) All contracts or agreements for insurance or protection shall
be in compliance with this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.400.275 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 11 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any contract or agreement for employee benefits executed after
April 13, 1990, between a school district and a benefit provider or
employee bargaining unit is null and void unless it contains an
agreement to abide by state laws relating to school district employee
benefits. The term of the contract or agreement may not exceed one
year.
(2) School districts and their benefit providers shall annually
submit the following information and data for the prior calendar year
to the ((Washington state health care authority)) office of the
insurance commissioner;
(a) A summary ((descriptions of all benefits offered under the
district's employee benefit plan. The districts shall also submit data
to the health care authority specifying)) of each health benefit plan
offered to each group of school employees under the districts employee
benefit plans. The summary must include the following:
(i) The financial plan structure and overall performance of each
health plan including:
(A) Total premium expenses;
(B) Total claims expenses;
(C) Claim reserves; and
(D) Plan administration expenses, including compensation paid to
brokers;
(b) The total number of employees and, for each employee, types of
coverage or benefits received including the number((s)) of covered
dependents, the number of eligible dependents, the amount of the
district's contribution to premium, additional premium costs paid by
the employee through payroll deductions, and the age and sex of ((the))
each employee and each dependent.
(3) The ((plan descriptions and the)) information and data shall be
submitted in a format and according to a schedule established by the
((health care authority)) office of the insurance commissioner under
section 5 of this act to enable the commissioner to meet his or her
reporting obligations under that section.
(((3))) (4) Any benefit provider offering a benefit plan by
contract or agreement with a school district under subsection (1) of
this section shall ((agree to)) make available to the school district
the benefit plan descriptions and((, where available, the demographic
information on plan subscribers)) data and information that the
district ((is)) and benefit provider are required to report to the
((Washington state health care authority)) office of the insurance
commissioner under this section.
(((4))) (5) This section shall not apply to benefit plans offered
in the 1989-90 school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "benefit provider" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 28A.400.270.
(2)(a) Beginning in 2013, the commissioner shall annually submit a
report to the legislature on school district health insurance benefits.
The report shall include each school district's health insurance
benefits' aggregated data. The report shall be available on the
commissioner's web site. The confidentiality of personally
identifiable data shall be safeguarded consistent with the provisions
of RCW 42.56.400(17).
(b) The report shall include information furnished by school
districts and their benefit providers to demonstrate progress to:
(i) Significantly reduce administrative costs for school districts;
(ii) Improve customer service;
(iii) Reduce differential plan premium rates between employee only
and family health benefit premiums, and progress towards the goal of
reducing the family premiums to no more than three times the cost of
employee only premiums;
(iv) Protect access to coverage for part-time K-12 employees; and
(v) Use innovative health plan features designed to reduce
utilization of unnecessary health services and offer evidence-based
health care services, which may include, but is not limited to,
adoption of state health technology assessment program decisions under
chapter 70.14 RCW, and participation in efforts such as the Bree
collaborative under chapter 70.250 RCW.
(c) The report shall include a summary of each health benefit plan
offered to school employees by benefit providers. The summary must
include the following:
(i) The financial plan structure and overall performance of each
plan including:
(A) Total premium expenses;
(B) Total claims expenses;
(C) Claim reserves; and
(D) Plan administration expenses, including compensation paid to
brokers; and
(ii) The total number of enrollees in each type of coverage,
including the number of employees and the number of dependents.
(3) If adequate progress is not being made in the areas of health
benefit equity, transparency, and efficiency, the commissioner may
submit recommendations to the legislature regarding additional steps
that may be taken by school districts or their benefit providers to
achieve greater progress.
(4) The commissioner shall collect data from school districts or
their benefit providers to fulfill the requirements of this section.
The commissioner may adopt rules necessary to implement the data
submission requirements under this section and RCW 28A.400.275,
including the format, timing of data reporting, data standards,
instructions, definitions, and data sources.
(5) Data, information, and documents provided by a school district
or an entity providing coverage pursuant to this section are exempt
from public inspection and copying under RCW 48.02.120 and chapters
42.17A and 42.56 RCW.
(6) If a school district or benefit provider does not comply with
the data reporting requirements of this section or RCW 28A.400.275, and
the failure is due to the actions of an entity providing coverage
authorized under Title 48 RCW, the commissioner may take enforcement
actions under this chapter, and the district or benefit provider is
subject to the market oversight authority of the commissioner as set
forth in chapter 48.37 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.56.400 and 2012 c ... (ESHB 2361) s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
The following information relating to insurance and financial
institutions is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance appeals
that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation claims filed
with the board under RCW 7.68.110;
(2) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW;
(3) The names and individual identification data of either all
owners or all insureds, or both, received by the insurance commissioner
under chapter 48.102 RCW;
(4) Information provided under RCW 48.30A.045 through 48.30A.060;
(5) Information provided under RCW 48.05.510 through 48.05.535,
48.43.200 through 48.43.225, 48.44.530 through 48.44.555, and 48.46.600
through 48.46.625;
(6) Examination reports and information obtained by the department
of financial institutions from banks under RCW 30.04.075, from savings
banks under RCW 32.04.220, from savings and loan associations under RCW
33.04.110, from credit unions under RCW 31.12.565, from check cashers
and sellers under RCW 31.45.030(3), and from securities brokers and
investment advisers under RCW 21.20.100, all of which is confidential
and privileged information;
(7) Information provided to the insurance commissioner under RCW
48.110.040(3);
(8) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.02.065, all of which are confidential and
privileged;
(9) Confidential proprietary and trade secret information provided
to the commissioner under RCW 48.31C.020 through 48.31C.050 and
48.31C.070;
(10) Data filed under RCW 48.140.020, 48.140.030, 48.140.050, and
7.70.140 that, alone or in combination with any other data, may reveal
the identity of a claimant, health care provider, health care facility,
insuring entity, or self-insurer involved in a particular claim or a
collection of claims. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Claimant" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(2).
(b) "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(6).
(c) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(7).
(d) "Insuring entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(8).
(e) "Self-insurer" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(11);
(11) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.135.060;
(12) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.060;
(13) Confidential and privileged documents obtained or produced by
the insurance commissioner and identified in RCW 48.37.080;
(14) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.140;
(15) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.17.595;
(16) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.102.051(1) and 48.102.140 (3) and (7)(a)(ii);
(17) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner in the commissioner's capacity as receiver under RCW
48.31.025 and 48.99.017, which are records under the jurisdiction and
control of the receivership court. The commissioner is not required to
search for, log, produce, or otherwise comply with the public records
act for any records that the commissioner obtains under chapters 48.31
and 48.99 RCW in the commissioner's capacity as a receiver, except as
directed by the receivership court;
(18) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.13.151;
(19) Data, information, and documents provided by a carrier
pursuant to section 1, chapter 172, Laws of 2010; ((and))
(20) Information in a filing of usage-based insurance about the
usage-based component of the rate pursuant to RCW 48.19.040(5)(b); and
(21) Data, information, and documents for reporting to the office
of the insurance commissioner by an entity providing health care
coverage pursuant to RCW 28A.400.275 and section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 48.62 RCW
to read as follows:
If an individual or joint local government self-insured health and
welfare benefits program formed by a school district or educational
service district does not comply with the data reporting requirements
of RCW 28A.400.275 and section 5 of this act, the self-insured health
and welfare benefits program is no longer authorized to operate in the
state. The state risk manager shall notify the state auditor and the
attorney general of the violation and the attorney general, on behalf
of the state risk manager, must take all necessary action to terminate
the operation of the self-insured health and welfare benefits program.

--- END ---