BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) School districts must notify parents or guardians of enrolled
students each year with the following information about each assessment
that is required by the state or by the federal government before the
assessment is administered during the school year:
(a) The subject areas covered by the assessment;
(b) When the assessment will be administered;
(c) When the assessment results will be released to parents or
guardians;
(d) How the assessment or assessment results will advance student
learning;
(e) The amount of instructional time lost in administering the
assessment;
(f) The cost to the school district of administering the
assessment;
(g) The cost to the state of administering the assessment; and
(h) Whether the assessment is required by the state, by the federal
government, or by both.
(2) School districts must also notify parents and guardians of
elementary and middle school students of their opportunity to excuse
their children from participation in any assessment required by the
state or by the federal government.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide to school districts the information necessary for the district
to notify parents of the information under subsection (1)(g) of this
section.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.070 and 2008 c 163 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
essential academic learning requirements that identify the knowledge
and skills all public school students need to know and be able to do
based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, develop student
assessments, and implement the accountability recommendations and
requests regarding assistance, rewards, and recognition of the state
board of education.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Periodically revise the essential academic learning
requirements, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the
maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four
and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the essential
academic learning requirements; and
(b) Review and prioritize the essential academic learning
requirements and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the
grade level content expectations to be assessed on the ((Washington
assessment of student learning)) statewide student assessment and used
for state or federal accountability purposes. The review,
prioritization, and identification shall result in more focus and
targeting with an emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade
level content expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level
content expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence
of expectations and performances that are logical, build with
increasing depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired,
and reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the
discipline. The office of the superintendent of public instruction,
within seven working days, shall post on its web site any grade level
content expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in
constructing the ((Washington assessment of student learning))
statewide student assessment.
(3)(a) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to
develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the
content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science for use in
the elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if
each student has mastered the essential academic learning requirements
identified in subsection (1) of this section. School districts shall
administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. School districts shall provide
an opportunity for parents and guardians of elementary and middle
school students to excuse their children from participation in any
assessment required by the state or by the federal government. School
districts, including individual schools and teachers, may not impose
any penalties, loss of privileges, or other adverse actions on parents
or students as a consequence of excusing a student from participation
in a required assessment. The academic assessment system may include
a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and
performance-based measures.
(b) Effective with the 2009 administration of the ((Washington
assessment of student learning)) statewide student assessment, the
superintendent shall redesign the assessment in the content areas of
reading, mathematics, and science in all grades except high school by
shortening test administration and reducing the number of short answer
and extended response questions.
(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the
essential academic learning requirements or the statewide assessments,
then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential
academic learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.
(5) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results
under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate
instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational
support for students who have not mastered the essential academic
learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.
(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics
shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to
determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content
areas from one school year to the next.
(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide
educational support to individual students, the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance
information as possible within the constraints of the assessment
system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school
districts:
(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may
provide additional achievement information for individual students; and
(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to
evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall
be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and
easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily
shared with parents and students.
(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(11) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of special education students when developing the
assessments under this section.
(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(13) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site
lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts,
and health and fitness.

--- END ---