BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The highest goals of Washington's educational system are: (i)
To support the personal development of each person to blossom to their
fullest capacity in whatever supportive role they choose to play in
society; and (ii) to support our collective development as a society of
thoughtful and productive citizens who can critically analyze social
problems and work collectively to advance society as a whole;
(b) Washington's postsecondary education system is one of the best
in the world with top apprenticeship programs, a top community and
technical college system, a top regional university system, and world
class research institutions;
(c) Washington's postsecondary education system has many
conflicting goals that it is structurally incapable of concurrently
meeting within the constraint of declining state revenues and state
support for the system. It must concurrently maintain the highest
quality postsecondary education system in the world, maintain
sufficient placement slots for anyone who wants to attend, maintain
affordability for anyone who wants to attend, increase degree
production, train workers to high levels in "high demand" fields,
maintain world class research capacity, and also achieve these goals
while declining revenues to the state force funding cuts;
(d) The many separate administrations among the regional and
research institutions lead to excessive administrative inefficiencies,
salaries, and overhead costs, as well as a lack of a comprehensive and
coordinated systemic approach to their governance;
(e) Washington's community and technical colleges are extremely
efficient at delivering a broad array of workforce training programs,
lower division college classes, and campus-based university centers,
which provide cost-efficient four-year degrees;
(f) Lower division classes at research universities are often
extremely large, with up to five hundred students in a class, and not
a good learning environment for students. In these circumstances,
lower division educational quality is sacrificed to subsidize upper
division and postgraduate operations; and
(g) It is time to consider a systemic restructuring to take best
advantage of our current postsecondary resources, and to align system
structures to achieve multiple goals of accessibility, affordability,
quality, efficiency of degree production, and creation of engaged
citizens.
(2) For these reasons, the legislature intends to create a
legislative task force on higher education reform for the purpose of
examining Washington's postsecondary education system, accounting for
available resources within the system, evaluating system goals,
evaluating system governance structures, and developing a comprehensive
recommendation to the legislature that best achieves system goals
simultaneously.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) A legislative task force on higher
education reform is established, with members as provided in this
subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint three voting members
of the task force from the senate, which shall include the chair and
the ranking member of the senate higher education and workforce
development committee.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint
three voting members of the task force from the house of
representatives, which shall include the chair and the ranking member
of the house higher education committee.
(iii) The governor shall appoint five nonvoting members of the task
force, which shall represent the office of financial management, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board for
community and technical colleges, the office of student achievement,
and the workforce training and education coordinating board.
(b) The task force shall choose its cochairs from among its
legislative membership. The chair of the house higher education
committee and the chair of the senate higher education and workforce
development committee shall convene the initial meeting of the task
force.
(2) The task force shall examine the higher education delivery
system to maximize resources and maintain access and quality, and shall
review the following issues:
(a) Whether lower division courses subsidize upper division
courses;
(b) Whether undergraduate programs subsidize graduate programs and
research activities;
(c) Whether community and technical colleges should be the primary
or exclusive providers of some or all lower division courses;
(d) Whether regional universities and the state college should be
the primary or exclusive providers of some or all upper division
courses;
(e) Whether state research universities should be the primary or
exclusive providers of some or all graduate programs;
(f) Whether state research universities should be restructured into
separate undergraduate and postgraduate institutions;
(g) The circumstances in which any waivers of the structure
outlined in (c) through (f) of this subsection should be provided;
(h) The merits of modifying the governance of institutions of
higher education including, but not limited to, establishing steering
committees consisting of deans in place of boards of regents; and
(i) The efficiencies that may be gained from eliminating
duplicative programs.
(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(4) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor, the house higher education committee, and the senate
higher education and workforce development committee by December 1,
2012.
(7) This section expires January 1, 2013.

--- END ---