BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.22.620 and 2009 c 229 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section, the term "public works" means as
defined in RCW 39.04.010.
(2) A first-class city may have public works performed by contract
pursuant to public notice and call for competitive bids. As limited by
subsection (3) of this section, a first-class city may have public
works performed by city employees in any annual or biennial budget
period equal to a dollar value not exceeding ten percent of the public
works construction budget, including any amount in a supplemental
public works construction budget, over the budget period. The amount
of public works that a first-class city has a county perform for it
under RCW 35.77.020 shall be included within this ten percent
limitation.
If a first-class city has public works performed by public
employees in any budget period that are in excess of this ten percent
limitation, the amount in excess of the permitted amount shall be
reduced from the otherwise permitted amount of public works that may be
performed by public employees for that city in its next budget period.
Twenty percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to that city
shall be withheld if two years after the year in which the excess
amount of work occurred, the city has failed to so reduce the amount of
public works that it has performed by public employees. The amount so
withheld shall be distributed to the city when it has demonstrated in
its reports to the state auditor that the amount of public works it has
performed by public employees has been so reduced.
Whenever a first-class city has had public works performed in any
budget period up to the maximum permitted amount for that budget
period, all remaining public works within that budget period shall be
done by contract pursuant to public notice and call for competitive
bids.
The state auditor shall report to the state treasurer any
first-class city that exceeds this amount and the extent to which the
city has or has not reduced the amount of public works it has performed
by public employees in subsequent years.
(3) In addition to the percentage limitation provided in subsection
(2) of this section, a first-class city shall not have public employees
perform a public works project in excess of ninety thousand dollars if
more than a single craft or trade is involved with the public works
project, or a public works project in excess of forty-five thousand
dollars if only a single craft or trade is involved with the public
works project or the public works project is street signalization or
street lighting. A public works project means a complete project. The
restrictions in this subsection do not permit the division of the
project into units of work or classes of work to avoid the restriction
on work that may be performed by day labor on a single project.
(4) In addition to the accounting and record-keeping requirements
contained in RCW 39.04.070, every first-class city annually ((shall))
may prepare a report for the state auditor indicating the total public
works construction budget and supplemental public works construction
budget for that year, the total construction costs of public works
performed by public employees for that year, and the amount of public
works that is performed by public employees above or below ten percent
of the total construction budget. However, if a city budgets on a
biennial basis, this annual report ((shall)) may indicate the amount of
public works that is performed by public employees within the current
biennial period that is above or below ten percent of the total
biennial construction budget.
Each first-class city with a population of one hundred fifty
thousand or less shall use the form required by RCW 43.09.205 to
account and record costs of public works in excess of five thousand
dollars that are not let by contract.
(5) The cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs
of materials, supplies, equipment, and labor on the construction of
that project. The value of the public works budget shall be the value
of all the separate public works projects within the budget.
(6) The competitive bidding requirements of this section may be
waived by the city legislative authority pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if
an exemption contained within that section applies to the work or
contract.
(7) In lieu of the procedures of subsections (2) and (6) of this
section, a first-class city may let contracts using the small works
roster process in RCW 39.04.155.
Whenever possible, the city shall invite at least one proposal from
a minority or woman contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this
section.
(8) The allocation of public works projects to be performed by city
employees shall not be subject to a collective bargaining agreement.
(9) This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as
defined in RCW 39.35A.020(4), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A
RCW.
(10) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any first-class city
from allowing for preferential purchase of products made from recycled
materials or products that may be recycled or reused.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.27.020 and 1995 c 194 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The prosecuting attorney shall:
(1) Be legal adviser of the legislative authority, giving ((them
[it])) it his or her written opinion when required by the legislative
authority or the chairperson thereof touching any subject which the
legislative authority may be called or required to act upon relating to
the management of county affairs;
(2) Be legal adviser to all county and precinct officers and school
directors in all matters relating to their official business, and when
required draw up all instruments of an official nature for the use of
said officers;
(3) Appear for and represent the state, county, and all school
districts subject to the supervisory control and direction of the
attorney general in all criminal and civil proceedings in which the
state or the county or any school district in the county may be a
party;
(4) Prosecute all criminal and civil actions in which the state or
the county may be a party, defend all suits brought against the state
or the county, and prosecute actions upon forfeited recognizances and
bonds and actions for the recovery of debts, fines, penalties, and
forfeitures accruing to the state or the county;
(5) Attend and appear before and give advice to the grand jury when
cases are presented to it for consideration and draw all indictments
when required by the grand jury;
(6) Institute and prosecute proceedings before magistrates for the
arrest of persons charged with or reasonably suspected of felonies when
the prosecuting attorney has information that any such offense has been
committed and the prosecuting attorney shall for that purpose attend
when required by them if the prosecuting attorney is not then in
attendance upon the superior court;
(7) Carefully tax all cost bills in criminal cases and take care
that no useless witness fees are taxed as part of the costs and that
the officers authorized to execute process tax no other or greater fees
than the fees allowed by law;
(8) Receive all cost bills in criminal cases before district judges
at the trial of which the prosecuting attorney was not present, before
they are lodged with the legislative authority for payment, whereupon
the prosecuting attorney may retax the same and the prosecuting
attorney must do so if the legislative authority deems any bill
exorbitant or improperly taxed;
(9) Present all violations of the election laws which may come to
the prosecuting attorney's knowledge to the special consideration of
the proper jury;
(10) Examine once in each year the official bonds of all county and
precinct officers and report to the legislative authority any defect in
the bonds of any such officer;
(11) ((Make an annual report to the governor as of the 31st of
December of each year setting forth the amount and nature of business
transacted by the prosecuting attorney in that year with such other
statements and suggestions as the prosecuting attorney may deem useful;
(12) Send to the state liquor control board at the end of each year
a written report of all prosecutions brought under the state liquor
laws in the county during the preceding year, showing in each case, the
date of trial, name of accused, nature of charges, disposition of case,
and the name of the judge presiding;
(13))) Seek to reform and improve the administration of criminal
justice and stimulate efforts to remedy inadequacies or injustice in
substantive or procedural law.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.180 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 19 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) It is the intent of the legislature that counties and
cities required to adopt a comprehensive plan under RCW 36.70A.040(1)
begin implementing this chapter on or before July 1, 1990, including
but not limited to: (((a))) (1) Inventorying, designating, and
conserving agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands, and
critical areas; and (((b))) (2) considering the modification or
adoption of comprehensive land use plans and development regulations
implementing the comprehensive land use plans. It is also the intent
of the legislature that funds be made available to counties and cities
beginning July 1, 1990, to assist them in meeting the requirements of
this chapter.
(((2) Each county and city that adopts a plan under RCW 36.70A.040
(1) or (2) shall report to the department annually for a period of five
years, beginning on January 1, 1991, and each five years thereafter, on
the progress made by that county or city in implementing this
chapter.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that over the years there have been a
number of reporting requirements, mandates, and programs created that
frequently duplicate the duties of local government, create additional
expenses for state and local government, and can obscure
responsibilities. The legislature establishes the process outlined in
this section to recommend the elimination of obsolete, redundant, or
unnecessary reports, mandates, and programs.
(2) The office must develop a process and criteria with statewide
organizations representing cities and counties to conduct a review of
reports, mandates, and programs that create additional expenses for
state and local government. Every odd-numbered year, the office must
submit recommendations to the legislature on which reports, programs,
and mandates should be terminated or consolidated based upon the
criteria developed with statewide organizations representing cities and
counties. The report must state which criteria were relied upon with
respect to each recommendation. The office must submit executive
request legislation each odd-numbered year to implement the
recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 35.21.687 (Affordable housing -- Inventory of suitable
housing) and 1995 c 399 s 37 & 1993 c 461 s 4; and
(2) RCW 36.34.137 (Affordable housing -- Inventory of suitable
property) and 1993 c 461 s 5.

--- END ---