BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.119.010 and 2004 c 275 s 60 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall design the Washington
promise scholarship program based on the following parameters:
(1) Scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating from
public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW,
students participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter
28A.200 RCW, and persons twenty-one years of age or younger receiving
a GED certificate, who meet both an academic and a financial
eligibility criteria.
(a) Academic eligibility criteria shall be defined as follows:
(i) Beginning with the graduating class of 2002, students
graduating from public and approved private high schools under chapter
28A.195 RCW must be in the top fifteen percent of their graduating
class, as identified by each respective high school at the completion
of the first term of the student's senior year; or
(ii) Students graduating from public high schools, approved private
high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, students participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW, and persons
twenty-one years of age or younger receiving a GED certificate, must
equal or exceed a cumulative scholastic assessment test I score of
twelve hundred on their first attempt or must equal or exceed a
composite American college test score of twenty-seven on their first
attempt.
(b) To meet the financial eligibility criteria, a student's family
income shall not exceed one hundred thirty-five percent of the state
median family income adjusted for family size, as determined by the
higher education coordinating board for each graduating class.
Students not meeting the eligibility requirements for the first year of
scholarship benefits may reapply for the second year of benefits, but
must still meet the income standard set by the board for the student's
graduating class.
(2) Promise scholarships are not intended to supplant any grant,
scholarship, or tax program related to postsecondary education. If the
board finds that promise scholarships supplant or reduce any grant,
scholarship, or tax program for categories of students, then the board
shall adjust the financial eligibility criteria or the amount of
scholarship to the level necessary to avoid supplanting.
(3) Within available funds, each qualifying student shall receive
two consecutive annual awards, the value of each not to exceed the
full-time annual resident tuition rates charged by Washington's
community colleges. The higher education coordinating board shall
award scholarships to as many students as possible from among those
qualifying under this section.
(4) By October 15th of each year, the board shall determine the
award amount of the scholarships, after taking into consideration the
availability of funds.
(5) The scholarships may only be used for undergraduate coursework
at accredited institutions of higher education in the state of
Washington.
(6) The scholarships may be used for undergraduate coursework at
Oregon institutions of higher education that are part of the border
county higher education opportunity project in RCW 28B.76.685 when:
(a) Those institutions offer programs not available at accredited
institutions of higher education in Washington state; or
(b) The student resides with a parent or guardian in Washington
state intending to commute from the parent's or guardian's residence,
the commute distance to a Washington institution of higher education
exceeds the distance to a participating Oregon border county
institution of higher education, and the commute distance to a
Washington institution of higher education is so far as to render
commuting impractical.
(7) The scholarships may be used for college-related expenses,
including but not limited to, tuition, room and board, books, and
materials.
(8) The scholarships may not be awarded to any student who is
pursuing a degree in theology.
(9) The higher education coordinating board may establish
satisfactory progress standards for the continued receipt of the
promise scholarship.
(10) The higher education coordinating board shall establish the
time frame within which the student must use the scholarship.

--- END ---