BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.105.310 and 1988 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except in transactions exempt under RCW 19.105.325, it is unlawful
for any person to market, offer, or sell a camping resort contract in
this state or to a Washington state resident unless the camping resort
contract is registered and the operator or registrant has received a
permit to market the registered contracts under this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.105.325 and 1988 c 159 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following transactions are exempt from registration under
this chapter:
(a) An offer or sale by a government or governmental agency;
(b) A bona fide pledge of a camping resort contract; and
(c) Offerings and dispositions of up to three resale camping resort
contracts by purchasers thereof on their own behalf or by third parties
brokering on behalf of purchasers, other than resale contracts
forfeited by or placed into an operator's sale inventory. All other
sales of resale camping resort contracts by any person or business
requires registration under this chapter.
(2) The director may, by rule or order, exempt any person, wholly
or partially, from any or all requirements of this chapter if the
director finds the requirements are not necessary for the protection of
the public health, safety, and welfare.

--- END ---