BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.73.170 and 2003 c 100 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((On or before December 31, 2004, a person in this state who
has been convicted of a felony and is currently serving a term of
imprisonment and who has been denied postconviction DNA testing may
submit a request to the state Office of Public Defense, which will
transmit the request to the county prosecutor in the county where the
conviction was obtained for postconviction DNA testing, if DNA evidence
was not admitted because the court ruled DNA testing did not meet
acceptable scientific standards or DNA testing technology was not
sufficiently developed to test the DNA evidence in the case. On and
after January 1, 2005, a person must raise the DNA issues at trial or
on appeal.
(2) The prosecutor shall screen the request. The request shall be
reviewed based upon the likelihood that the DNA evidence would
demonstrate innocence on a more probable than not basis. The
prosecutor shall inform the requestor and the state Office of Public
Defense of the decision, and shall, in the case of an adverse decision,
advise the requestor of appeals rights. Upon determining that testing
should occur and the evidence still exists, the prosecutor shall
request DNA testing by the Washington state patrol crime laboratory.
Contact with victims shall be handled through victim/witness divisions.
(3) A person denied a request made pursuant to subsections (1) and
(2) of this section has a right to appeal his or her request within
thirty days of denial of the request by the prosecutor. The appeal
shall be to the attorney general's office. If the attorney general's
office determines that it is likely that the DNA testing would
demonstrate innocence on a more probable than not basis, then the
attorney general's office shall request DNA testing by the Washington
state patrol crime laboratory.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any biological
material that has been secured in connection with a criminal case prior
to July 22, 2001, may not be destroyed before January 1, 2005.)) A
person convicted of a felony in a Washington state court who currently
is serving a term of imprisonment may submit to the court that entered
the judgment of conviction a verified written motion requesting DNA
testing, with a copy of the motion provided to the state office of
public defense.
(2) The motion shall:
(a) State that:
(i) The court ruled that DNA testing did not meet acceptable
scientific standards; or
(ii) DNA testing technology was not sufficiently developed to test
the DNA evidence in the case; or
(iii) The DNA testing now requested would be significantly more
accurate than prior DNA testing or would provide significant new
information;
(b) Explain why DNA evidence is material to the identity of the
perpetrator of, or accomplice to, the crime, or to sentence
enhancement; and
(c) Comply with all other procedural requirements established by
court rule.
(3) The court shall grant a motion requesting DNA testing under
this section if such motion is in the form required by subsection (2)
of this section, and the convicted person has shown the likelihood that
the DNA evidence would demonstrate innocence on a more probable than
not basis.
(4) Upon written request to the court that entered a judgment of
conviction, a convicted person who demonstrates that he or she is
indigent under RCW 10.101.010 may request appointment of counsel solely
to prepare and present a motion under this section, and the court, in
its discretion, may grant the request. Such motion for appointment of
counsel shall comply with all procedural requirements established by
court rule.
(5) DNA testing ordered under this section shall be performed by
the Washington state patrol crime laboratory. Contact with victims
shall be handled through victim/witness divisions.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon motion of
defense counsel or the court's own motion, a sentencing court in a
felony case may order the preservation of any biological material that
has been secured in connection with a criminal case, or evidence
samples sufficient for testing. The court must specify the samples to
be maintained and the length of time the samples must be preserved.

--- END ---