BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79.96 RCW
to read as follows:
Aquaculture products produced on leased state-owned aquatic land
may be sold by the leaseholder as prescribed by the department without
competitive bid or public auction and consistent with statutes
governing aquaculture leases on state-owned aquatic land.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.90.210 and 1990 c 163 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
All sales of tidelands and shorelands belonging to the state,
otherwise permitted by RCW 79.94.150 to be sold, shall be at public
auction and all sales of valuable materials shall be at public auction
or by sealed bid to the highest responsible bidder, on the terms
prescribed by law and as specified in the notice provided, and no land
or materials shall be sold for less than their appraised value:
PROVIDED, That when valuable material has been appraised at an amount
not exceeding one hundred thousand dollars, the department of natural
resources, when authorized by the board of natural resources, may
arrange for the sale at public auction of said valuable material and
for its removal under such terms and conditions as the department may
prescribe, after the department shall have caused to be published not
less than ten days prior to sale a notice of such sale in a newspaper
of general circulation located nearest to the property to be sold.
However, any sale of valuable material on aquatic lands of an appraised
value of ten thousand dollars or less may be sold directly to the
applicant for cash without notice or advertising. Sales of aquaculture
products by a leaseholder shall be as specified in section 1 of this
act.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.96.080 and 2003 c 39 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 1 of this act, geoducks shall be
sold as valuable materials under the provisions of chapter 79.90 RCW.
After confirmation of the sale, the department of natural resources may
enter into an agreement with the purchaser for the harvesting of
geoducks. The department of natural resources may place terms and
conditions in the harvesting agreements as the department deems
necessary. The department of natural resources may enforce the
provisions of any harvesting agreement by suspending or canceling the
harvesting agreement or through any other means contained in the
harvesting agreement. Any geoduck harvester may terminate a harvesting
agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection if actions of a
governmental agency, beyond the control of the harvester, its agents,
or its employees, prohibit harvesting, for a period exceeding thirty
days during the term of the harvesting agreement, except as provided
within the agreement. Upon such termination of the agreement by the
harvester, the harvester shall be reimbursed by the department of
natural resources for the cost paid to the department on the agreement,
less the value of the harvest already accomplished by the harvester
under the agreement.
(2) Harvesting agreements under this title for the purpose of
harvesting geoducks shall require the harvester and the harvester's
agent or representatives to comply with all applicable commercial
diving safety standards and regulations promulgated and implemented by
the federal occupational safety and health administration established
under the federal occupational safety and health act of 1970 as such
law exists or as hereafter amended (84 Stat. 1590 et seq.; 29 U.S.C.
Sec. 651 et seq.): PROVIDED, That for the purposes of this section and
RCW 77.60.070 as now or hereafter amended, all persons who dive for
geoducks are deemed to be employees as defined by the federal
occupational safety and health act. All harvesting agreements shall
provide that failure to comply with these standards is cause for
suspension or cancellation of the harvesting agreement: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That for the purposes of this subsection if the harvester
contracts with another person or entity for the harvesting of geoducks,
the harvesting agreement shall not be suspended or canceled if the
harvester terminates its business relationship with such entity until
compliance with this subsection is secured.

--- END ---