BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.02.005 and 2001 c 320 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When used in this title, unless otherwise required from the
context:
(1) "Personal representative" includes executor, administrator,
special administrator, and guardian or limited guardian and special
representative.
(2) "Net estate" refers to the real and personal property of a
decedent exclusive of homestead rights, exempt property, the family
allowance and enforceable claims against, and debts of, the deceased or
the estate.
(3) "Representation" refers to a method of determining distribution
in which the takers are in unequal degrees of kinship with respect to
the intestate, and is accomplished as follows: After first determining
who, of those entitled to share in the estate, are in the nearest
degree of kinship, the estate is divided into equal shares, the number
of shares being the sum of the number of persons who survive the
intestate who are in the nearest degree of kinship and the number of
persons in the same degree of kinship who died before the intestate but
who left issue surviving the intestate; each share of a deceased person
in the nearest degree shall be divided among those of the deceased
person's issue who survive the intestate and have no ancestor then
living who is in the line of relationship between them and the
intestate, those more remote in degree taking together the share which
their ancestor would have taken had he or she survived the intestate.
Posthumous children are considered as living at the death of their
parent.
(4) "Issue" includes all the lawful lineal descendants of the
ancestor and all lawfully adopted children.
(5) "Degree of kinship" means the degree of kinship as computed
according to the rules of the civil law; that is, by counting upward
from the intestate to the nearest common ancestor and then downward to
the relative, the degree of kinship being the sum of these two counts.
(6) "Heirs" denotes those persons, including the surviving spouse,
who are entitled under the statutes of intestate succession to the real
and personal property of a decedent on the decedent's death intestate.
(7) "Real estate" includes, except as otherwise specifically
provided herein, all lands, tenements, and hereditaments, and all
rights thereto, and all interest therein possessed and claimed in fee
simple, or for the life of a third person.
(8) "Will" means an instrument validly executed as required by RCW
11.12.020.
(9) "Codicil" means a will that modifies or partially revokes an
existing earlier will. A codicil need not refer to or be attached to
the earlier will.
(10) "Guardian" or "limited guardian" means a personal
representative of the person or estate of an incompetent or disabled
person as defined in RCW 11.88.010 and the term may be used in lieu of
"personal representative" wherever required by context.
(11) "Administrator" means a personal representative of the estate
of a decedent and the term may be used in lieu of "personal
representative" wherever required by context.
(12) "Executor" means a personal representative of the estate of a
decedent appointed by will and the term may be used in lieu of
"personal representative" wherever required by context.
(13) "Special administrator" means a personal representative of the
estate of a decedent appointed for limited purposes and the term may be
used in lieu of "personal representative" wherever required by context.
(14) "Trustee" means an original, added, or successor trustee and
includes the state, or any agency thereof, when it is acting as the
trustee of a trust to which chapter 11.98 RCW applies.
(15) "Nonprobate asset" means those rights and interests of a
person having beneficial ownership of an asset that pass on the
person's death under a written instrument or arrangement other than the
person's will. "Nonprobate asset" includes, but is not limited to, a
right or interest passing under a joint tenancy with right of
survivorship, joint bank account with right of survivorship, payable on
death or trust bank account, transfer on death security or security
account, deed or conveyance if possession has been postponed until the
death of the person, trust of which the person is grantor and that
becomes effective or irrevocable only upon the person's death,
community property agreement, individual retirement account or bond, or
note or other contract the payment or performance of which is affected
by the death of the person. "Nonprobate asset" does not include: A
payable-on-death provision of a life insurance policy, annuity, or
other similar contract, or of an employee benefit plan; a right or
interest passing by descent and distribution under chapter 11.04 RCW;
a right or interest if, before death, the person has irrevocably
transferred the right or interest, the person has waived the power to
transfer it or, in the case of contractual arrangement, the person has
waived the unilateral right to rescind or modify the arrangement; or a
right or interest held by the person solely in a fiduciary capacity.
For the definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to revocation of a
provision for a former spouse upon dissolution of marriage or
declaration of invalidity of marriage, RCW 11.07.010(5) applies. For
the definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to revocation of a
provision for a former spouse upon dissolution of marriage or
declaration of invalidity of marriage, see RCW 11.07.010(5). For the
definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to testamentary disposition
of nonprobate assets, see RCW 11.11.010(7).
(16) "Internal Revenue Code" ((means the United States Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2001))
is given the same meaning as provided in RCW 83.100.020.
(17) References to "section 2033A" of the Internal Revenue Code in
wills, trust agreements, powers of appointment, beneficiary
designations, and other instruments governed by or subject to this
title shall be deemed to refer to the comparable or corresponding
provisions of section 2057 of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by
section 6006(b) of the Internal Revenue Service Restructuring Act of
1998 (H.R. 2676, P.L. 105-206); and references to the section 2033A
"exclusion" shall be deemed to mean the section 2057 deduction.
Words that import the singular number may also be applied to the
plural of persons and things.
Words importing the masculine gender only may be extended to
females also.

Sec. 2 RCW 83.100.020 and 2001 c 320 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Decedent" means a deceased individual;
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue, the director of
that department, or any employee of the department exercising authority
lawfully delegated to him by the director;
(3) "Federal credit" means (a) for a transfer, the maximum amount
of the credit for state taxes allowed by section 2011 of the Internal
Revenue Code; and (b) for a generation-skipping transfer, the maximum
amount of the credit for state taxes allowed by section 2604 of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(4) "Federal return" means any tax return required by chapter 11 or
13 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(5) "Federal tax" means (a) for a transfer, a tax under chapter 11
of the Internal Revenue Code; and (b) for a generation-skipping
transfer, the tax under chapter 13 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(6) "Generation-skipping transfer" means a "generation-skipping
transfer" as defined and used in section 2611 of the Internal Revenue
Code;
(7) "Gross estate" means "gross estate" as defined and used in
section 2031 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(8) "Nonresident" means a decedent who was domiciled outside
Washington at his death;
(9) "Person" means any individual, estate, trust, receiver,
cooperative association, club, corporation, company, firm, partnership,
joint venture, syndicate, or other entity and, to the extent permitted
by law, any federal, state, or other governmental unit or subdivision
or agency, department, or instrumentality thereof;
(10) "Person required to file the federal return" means any person
required to file a return required by chapter 11 or 13 of the Internal
Revenue Code, such as the personal representative of an estate; or a
transferor, trustee, or beneficiary of a generation-skipping transfer;
or a qualified heir with respect to qualified real property, as defined
and used in section 2032A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(11) "Property" means (a) for a transfer, property included in the
gross estate; and (b) for a generation-skipping transfer, all real and
personal property subject to the federal tax;
(12) "Resident" means a decedent who was domiciled in Washington at
time of death;
(13) "Transfer" means "transfer" as used in section 2001 of the
Internal Revenue Code, or a disposition or cessation of qualified use
as defined and used in section 2032A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(14) "Trust" means "trust" under Washington law and any arrangement
described in section 2652 of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(15) "Internal Revenue Code" means, for the purposes of this
chapter and RCW 83.110.010, the United States Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, ((2001)) 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply
retroactively to decedents dying on or after January 1, 2004.

--- END ---