BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 89.08.410 and 1989 c 18 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state conservation commission may authorize grants to
conservation districts from moneys appropriated to the commission for
such purposes as provided in this section. Such grants shall be
((made)) awarded annually on or before the last day of June of each
year and shall be made only to those conservation districts that apply
for the grants. ((After all the grant requests have been submitted,
the initial grants in any year shall be made so that a conservation
district shall not receive a grant in excess of the lesser of: (1) an
amount equal to the total moneys obtained by the conservation district
from all other sources, other than any grants obtained from the state,
during the preceding calendar year; or (2) twenty-two thousand five
hundred dollars. If the appropriated moneys are insufficient to make
the maximum level of the initial grants, each grant amount shall be
reduced by an equal dollar amount until the total amount of the grants
is equal to the amount of the appropriation.
However, further grants shall be made to those conservation
districts that were limited to grants of twenty-two thousand five
hundred dollars if the appropriated moneys are in excess of the amount
of the initial distribution of grants, but the total of both grants to
any conservation district in any year shall not exceed an amount equal
to the total moneys obtained by that conservation district from all
other sources, other than any grants obtained from the state, during
the preceding calendar year. If the appropriated moneys are
insufficient to make the second distribution of grants, each grant
under the second distribution shall be reduced by an equal dollar
amount until the total amount of all the grants is equal to the amount
of the appropriation.)) The conservation commission may adopt rules
pertaining to eligibility and distribution of these funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---