BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 1.12.070 and 1967 c 222 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise specifically provided by law hereafter:
(1) Any report, claim, tax return, statement or other document
required to be filed with, or any payment made to the state or to any
political subdivision thereof, which is (a) transmitted through the
United States mail or private third-party delivery service, shall be
deemed filed and received by the state or political subdivision on the
date shown by the post office or private third-party delivery service
cancellation mark or shipping date stamped or affixed upon the envelope
or other appropriate wrapper containing it; or (b) mailed via United
States mail or sent by a private third-party delivery service but not
received by the state or political subdivision, or where received and
the cancellation mark or shipping date is illegible, erroneous, or
omitted, shall be deemed filed and received on the date it was mailed
if the sender establishes by competent evidence that the report, claim,
tax return, statement, remittance, or other document was deposited with
a private third-party delivery service or in the United States mail on
or before the date due for filing; and in cases of such nonreceipt of
a report, tax return, statement, remittance, or other document required
by law to be filed, the sender files with the state or political
subdivision a duplicate within ten days after written notification is
given to the sender by the state or political subdivision of its
nonreceipt of such report, tax return, statement, remittance, or other
document.
(2)(a) If any report, claim, tax return, statement, remittance, or
other document is sent by United States registered mail, certified mail
or certificate of mailing, a record authenticated by the United States
post office of such registration, certification or certificate shall be
considered competent evidence that the report, claim, tax return,
statement, remittance or other document was delivered to the addressee,
and the date of registration, certification or certificate shall be
deemed the postmarked date.
(b) If any report, claim, tax return, statement, remittance, or
other document is sent via private third-party delivery service, a
record authenticated by the private third-party delivery service shall
be considered competent evidence that the report, claim, tax return,
statement, remittance, or other document was delivered to the
addressee, and the date of deposit with the private third-party
delivery service shall be deemed the shipping date.
(3) If the date for filing any report, claim, tax return,
statement, remittance, or other document falls upon a Saturday, Sunday
or legal holiday, the filing shall be considered timely if performed on
the next business day.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.29.010 and 2002 c 168 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county treasurer:
(1) Shall receive all money due the county and disburse it on
warrants issued and attested by the county auditor and electronic funds
transfer under RCW 39.58.750 as attested by the county auditor;
(2) Shall issue a receipt in duplicate for all money received other
than taxes; the treasurer shall deliver immediately to the person
making the payment the original receipt and the duplicate shall be
retained by the treasurer;
(3) Shall affix on the face of all paid warrants the date of
redemption or, in the case of proper contract between the treasurer and
a qualified public depositary, the treasurer may consider the date
affixed by the financial institution as the date of redemption;
(4) Shall endorse, before the date of issue by the county or by any
taxing district for whom the county treasurer acts as treasurer, on the
face of all warrants for which there are not sufficient funds for
payment, "interest bearing warrant." When there are funds to redeem
outstanding warrants, the county treasurer shall give notice:
(a) By publication in a legal newspaper published or circulated in
the county; or
(b) By posting at three public places in the county if there is no
such newspaper; or
(c) By notification to the financial institution holding the
warrant;
(5) Shall pay interest on all interest-bearing warrants from the
date of issue to the date of notification;
(6) Shall maintain financial records reflecting receipts and
disbursement by fund in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles;
(7) Shall account for and pay all bonded indebtedness for the
county and all special districts for which the county treasurer acts as
treasurer;
(8) Shall invest all funds of the county or any special district in
the treasurer's custody, not needed for immediate expenditure, in a
manner consistent with appropriate statutes. If cash is needed to
redeem warrants issued from any fund in the custody of the treasurer,
the treasurer shall liquidate investments in an amount sufficient to
cover such warrant redemptions; and
(9) May provide certain collection services for county departments.
The treasurer, at the expiration of the term of office, shall make
a complete settlement with the county legislative authority, and shall
deliver to the successor all public money, books, and papers in the
treasurer's possession.
Money received by all entities for whom the county treasurer serves
as treasurer must be deposited within twenty-four hours in an account
designated by the county treasurer unless a waiver is granted by the
county treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.09.240.

Sec. 3 RCW 63.29.020 and 2004 c 168 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, all intangible
property, including any income or increment derived therefrom, less any
lawful charges, that is held, issued, or owing in the ordinary course
of the holder's business and has remained unclaimed by the owner for
more than three years after it became payable or distributable is
presumed abandoned.
(2) Property, with the exception of unredeemed Washington state
lottery tickets and unpresented winning parimutuel tickets, is payable
and distributable for the purpose of this chapter notwithstanding the
owner's failure to make demand or to present any instrument or document
required to receive payment.
(3) This chapter does not apply to claims drafts issued by
insurance companies representing offers to settle claims unliquidated
in amount or settled by subsequent drafts or other means.
(4) This chapter does not apply to property covered by chapter
63.26 RCW.
(5) This chapter does not apply to used clothing, umbrellas, bags,
luggage, or other used personal effects if such property is disposed of
by the holder as follows:
(a) In the case of personal effects of negligible value, the
property is destroyed; or
(b) The property is donated to a bona fide charity.
(6) This chapter does not apply to a gift certificate subject to
the prohibition against expiration dates under RCW 19.240.020 or to a
gift certificate subject to RCW 19.240.030 through 19.240.060.
However, this chapter applies to gift certificates presumed abandoned
under RCW 63.29.110.
(7) This chapter does not apply to excess proceeds held by
counties, cities, towns, and other municipal or quasi-municipal
corporations from foreclosures for delinquent property taxes,
assessments, or other liens.

Sec. 4 RCW 63.29.190 and 1993 c 498 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, a person who is required to file a report under RCW 63.29.170
shall pay or deliver to the department all abandoned property required
to be reported at the time of filing the report.
(2) Counties, cities, towns, and other municipal and quasi-municipal corporations that hold funds representing warrants canceled
pursuant to RCW 36.22.100 and 39.56.040, uncashed checks, ((excess
proceeds from property tax and irrigation district foreclosures,)) and
property tax overpayments or refunds may retain the funds until the
owner notifies them and establishes ownership as provided in RCW
63.29.135. Counties, cities, towns, or other municipal or quasi-municipal corporations shall provide to the department a report of
property it is holding pursuant to this section. The report shall
identify the property and owner in the manner provided in RCW 63.29.170
and the department shall publish the information as provided in RCW
63.29.180.
(3) The contents of a safe deposit box or other safekeeping
repository presumed abandoned under RCW 63.29.160 and reported under
RCW 63.29.170 shall be paid or delivered to the department within six
months after the final date for filing the report required by RCW
63.29.170.
If the owner establishes the right to receive the abandoned
property to the satisfaction of the holder before the property has been
delivered or it appears that for some other reason the presumption of
abandonment is erroneous, the holder need not pay or deliver the
property to the department, and the property will no longer be presumed
abandoned. In that case, the holder shall file with the department a
verified written explanation of the proof of claim or of the error in
the presumption of abandonment.
(4) The holder of an interest under RCW 63.29.100 shall deliver a
duplicate certificate or other evidence of ownership if the holder does
not issue certificates of ownership to the department. Upon delivery
of a duplicate certificate to the department, the holder and any
transfer agent, registrar, or other person acting for or on behalf of
a holder in executing or delivering the duplicate certificate is
relieved of all liability of every kind in accordance with RCW
63.29.200 to every person, including any person acquiring the original
certificate or the duplicate of the certificate issued to the
department, for any losses or damages resulting to any person by the
issuance and delivery to the department of the duplicate certificate.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.02.020 and 1997 c 452 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except only as expressly provided in chapters 67.28 and 82.14 RCW,
the state preempts the field of imposing taxes upon retail sales of
tangible personal property, the use of tangible personal property,
parimutuel wagering authorized pursuant to RCW 67.16.060, conveyances,
and cigarettes, and no county, town, or other municipal subdivision
shall have the right to impose taxes of that nature. Except as
provided in RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090, no county, city, town, or
other municipal corporation shall impose any tax, fee, or charge,
either direct or indirect, on the construction or reconstruction of
residential buildings, commercial buildings, industrial buildings, or
on any other building or building space or appurtenance thereto, or on
the development, subdivision, classification, or reclassification of
land. However, this section does not preclude dedications of land or
easements within the proposed development or plat which the county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation can demonstrate are
reasonably necessary as a direct result of the proposed development or
plat to which the dedication of land or easement is to apply.
This section does not prohibit voluntary agreements with counties,
cities, towns, or other municipal corporations that allow a payment in
lieu of a dedication of land or to mitigate a direct impact that has
been identified as a consequence of a proposed development,
subdivision, or plat. A local government shall not use such voluntary
agreements for local off-site transportation improvements within the
geographic boundaries of the area or areas covered by an adopted
transportation program authorized by chapter 39.92 RCW. Any such
voluntary agreement is subject to the following provisions:
(1) The payment shall be held in a reserve account and may only be
expended to fund a capital improvement agreed upon by the parties to
mitigate the identified, direct impact;
(2) The payment shall be expended in all cases within five years of
collection; and
(3) Any payment not so expended shall be refunded with interest to
be calculated from the original date the deposit was received by the
county and at the same rate applied to ((judgments to the property
owners of record at the time of the refund)) tax refunds pursuant to
RCW 84.69.100; however, if the payment is not expended within five
years due to delay attributable to the developer, the payment shall be
refunded without interest.
No county, city, town, or other municipal corporation shall require
any payment as part of such a voluntary agreement which the county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation cannot establish is
reasonably necessary as a direct result of the proposed development or
plat.
Nothing in this section prohibits cities, towns, counties, or other
municipal corporations from collecting reasonable fees from an
applicant for a permit or other governmental approval to cover the cost
to the city, town, county, or other municipal corporation of processing
applications, inspecting and reviewing plans, or preparing detailed
statements required by chapter 43.21C RCW.
This section does not limit the existing authority of any county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation to impose special
assessments on property specifically benefitted thereby in the manner
prescribed by law.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
imposing or permits counties, cities, or towns to impose water, sewer,
natural gas, drainage utility, and drainage system charges: PROVIDED,
That no such charge shall exceed the proportionate share of such
utility or system's capital costs which the county, city, or town can
demonstrate are attributable to the property being charged: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That these provisions shall not be interpreted to expand or
contract any existing authority of counties, cities, or towns to impose
such charges.
Nothing in this section prohibits a transportation benefit district
from imposing fees or charges authorized in RCW 36.73.120 nor prohibits
the legislative authority of a county, city, or town from approving the
imposition of such fees within a transportation benefit district.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
imposing transportation impact fees authorized pursuant to chapter
39.92 RCW.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
requiring property owners to provide relocation assistance to tenants
under RCW 59.18.440 and 59.18.450.
This section does not apply to special purpose districts formed and
acting pursuant to Titles 54, 57, or 87 RCW, nor is the authority
conferred by these titles affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 84.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Every person who offers a document to the auditor of the proper
county for recording that results in any division, alteration, or
adjustment of real property boundary lines, except as provided for in
RCW 58.04.007(1) and 84.40.042(1)(c), shall present a certificate of
payment from the proper officer who is in charge of the collection of
taxes and assessments for the affected property or properties. All
taxes and assessments, both current and delinquent must be paid. For
purposes of this act, liability shall begin on January 1st. Taxes not
yet levied and certified shall be collected as an advance tax under RCW
58.08.040.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.56.020 and 2004 c 161 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county treasurer shall be the receiver and collector of all
taxes extended upon the tax rolls of the county, whether levied for
state, county, school, bridge, road, municipal or other purposes, and
also of all fines, forfeitures or penalties received by any person or
officer for the use of his or her county. All taxes upon real and
personal property made payable by the provisions of this title shall be
due and payable to the treasurer on or before the thirtieth day of
April and, except as provided in this section, shall be delinquent
after that date.
(2) Each tax statement shall include a notice that checks for
payment of taxes may be made payable to "Treasurer of . . . . . .
County" or other appropriate office, but tax statements shall not
include any suggestion that checks may be made payable to the name of
the individual holding the office of treasurer nor any other
individual.
(3) When the total amount of tax or special assessments on personal
property or on any lot, block or tract of real property payable by one
person is fifty dollars or more, and if one-half of such tax be paid on
or before the thirtieth day of April, the remainder of such tax shall
be due and payable on or before the thirty-first day of October
following and shall be delinquent after that date.
(4) When the total amount of tax or special assessments on any lot,
block or tract of real property or on any mobile home payable by one
person is fifty dollars or more, and if one-half of such tax be paid
after the thirtieth day of April but before the thirty-first day of
October, together with the applicable interest and penalty on the full
amount of tax payable for that year, the remainder of such tax shall be
due and payable on or before the thirty-first day of October following
and shall be delinquent after that date.
(5) Delinquent taxes under this section are subject to interest at
the rate of twelve percent per annum computed on a monthly basis on the
full year amount of tax unpaid from the date of delinquency until paid.
Interest shall be calculated at the rate in effect at the time of
payment of the tax, regardless of when the taxes were first delinquent.
In addition, delinquent taxes under this section are subject to
penalties as follows:
(a) A penalty of three percent of the full year amount of tax
unpaid shall be assessed on the tax delinquent on June 1st of the year
in which the tax is due.
(b) An additional penalty of eight percent shall be assessed on the
amount of tax delinquent on December 1st of the year in which the tax
is due.
(6) Subsection (5) of this section notwithstanding, no interest or
penalties may be assessed ((for the period April 30, 2003, through
April 30, 2005,)) during any period of armed conflict on delinquent
taxes imposed ((for collection in 2003 or 2004 which are imposed)) on
the personal residences owned by active duty military personnel who
((participated in the situation known as "Operation Enduring
Freedom.")) are participating as part of one of the branches of the
military involved in the conflict and assigned to a duty station
outside the territorial boundaries of the United States.
(7) For purposes of this chapter, "interest" means both interest
and penalties.
(8) All collections of interest on delinquent taxes shall be
credited to the county current expense fund; but the cost of
foreclosure and sale of real property, and the fees and costs of
distraint and sale of personal property, for delinquent taxes, shall,
when collected, be credited to the operation and maintenance fund of
the county treasurer prosecuting the foreclosure or distraint or sale;
and shall be used by the county treasurer as a revolving fund to defray
the cost of further foreclosure, distraint and sale for delinquent
taxes without regard to budget limitations.

Sec. 8 RCW 84.56.310 and 1961 c 15 s 84.56.310 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any person being the owner or having an interest in an estate or
claim to real property against which taxes ((shall have been unpaid))
have not been paid may pay the same and satisfy the lien at any time
before ((execution of a deed to said)) the filing of a certificate of
delinquency against the real property. The person or authority who
shall collect or receive the same shall give a certificate that such
taxes have been so paid to the person or persons entitled to demand
such certificate. After the filing of a certificate of delinquency,
the redemption rights shall be controlled by RCW 84.64.060.

Sec. 9 RCW 84.69.020 and 2002 c 168 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
On the order of the county treasurer, ad valorem taxes paid before
or after delinquency shall be refunded if they were:
(1) Paid more than once;
(2) Paid as a result of manifest error in description;
(3) Paid as a result of a clerical error in extending the tax
rolls;
(4) Paid as a result of other clerical errors in listing property;
(5) Paid with respect to improvements which did not exist on
assessment date;
(6) Paid under levies or statutes adjudicated to be illegal or
unconstitutional;
(7) Paid as a result of mistake, inadvertence, or lack of knowledge
by any person exempted from paying real property taxes or a portion
thereof pursuant to RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, as now or
hereafter amended;
(8) Paid as a result of mistake, inadvertence, or lack of knowledge
by either a public official or employee or by any person with respect
to real property in which the person paying the same has no legal
interest;
(9) Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was appealed
to the county board of equalization and ordered reduced by the board;
(10) Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was appealed
to the state board of tax appeals and ordered reduced by the board:
PROVIDED, That the amount refunded under subsections (9) and (10) of
this section shall only be for the difference between the tax paid on
the basis of the appealed valuation and the tax payable on the
valuation adjusted in accordance with the board's order;
(11) Paid as a state property tax levied upon property, the
assessed value of which has been established by the state board of tax
appeals for the year of such levy: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the amount
refunded shall only be for the difference between the state property
tax paid and the amount of state property tax which would, when added
to all other property taxes within the one percent limitation of
Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution equal one percent of
the assessed value established by the board;
(12) Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was
adjudicated to be unlawful or excessive: PROVIDED, That the amount
refunded shall be for the difference between the amount of tax which
was paid on the basis of the valuation adjudged unlawful or excessive
and the amount of tax payable on the basis of the assessed valuation
determined as a result of the proceeding;
(13) Paid on property acquired under RCW 84.60.050, and canceled
under RCW 84.60.050(2);
(14) Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation that was reduced
under RCW 84.48.065;
(15) Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation that was reduced
under RCW 84.40.039; or
(16) Abated under RCW 84.70.010.
No refunds under the provisions of this section shall be made
because of any error in determining the valuation of property, except
as authorized in subsections (9), (10), (11), and (12) of this section
nor may any refunds be made if a bona fide purchaser has acquired
rights that would preclude the assessment and collection of the
refunded tax from the property that should properly have been charged
with the tax. Any refunds made on delinquent taxes shall include the
proportionate amount of interest and penalties paid. However, no
refunds as a result of an incorrect payment authorized under subsection
(8) of this section made by a third party payee shall ((not include
refund interest)) be granted. The county treasurer may deduct from
moneys collected for the benefit of the state's levy, refunds of the
state levy including interest on the levy as provided by this section
and chapter 84.68 RCW.
The county treasurer of each county shall make all refunds
determined to be authorized by this section, and by the first Monday in
February of each year, report to the county legislative authority a
list of all refunds made under this section during the previous year.
The list is to include the name of the person receiving the refund, the
amount of the refund, and the reason for the refund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 7 of this act applies to all taxes
levied for collection in 2005 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---