BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.04.100 and 1971 c 81 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
If a vacancy occurs in the office of a justice of the supreme
court, the governor shall appoint ((a)) one of the three persons
nominated by the nonpartisan judicial commission under section 2 of
this act to hold the office until the election and qualification of a
justice to fill the vacancy, which election shall take place at the
next succeeding general election, and the justice so elected shall hold
the office for the remainder of the unexpired term. If the governor
fails to appoint any of the nominees within sixty days after the list
of nominees is submitted, the nonpartisan judicial commission shall
appoint one of the nominees to fill the vacancy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 2.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The nonpartisan judicial commission is hereby established. The
duty of the commission is, in the event of a vacancy in the supreme
court or court of appeals, to nominate and submit to the governor three
names of people qualified to fill the vacancy. The nonpartisan
judicial commission consists of: A justice of the supreme court,
selected by the members of the supreme court; three members of the
state bar association, one from each of the three divisions of the
court of appeals, selected by members of the state bar association in
that division; and a resident from each of the three divisions of the
court of appeals, who are not members of the state bar association,
selected by the governor. The members of the commission shall select
one of their members to serve as chair. No commission member, other
than a judge, may hold public office. No commission member may hold an
official position in a political party. Members shall be compensated
in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 in addition to travel expenses
provided by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The supreme court may adopt
rules to administer the commission.
(2) The nonpartisan judicial commission members shall serve six-year terms. The initial members shall have their terms staggered as
follows: One member appointed by the state bar association and one
member appointed by the governor must be appointed for a two-year term;
one member appointed by the state bar association and one member
appointed by the governor must be appointed for a four-year term; and
the remaining members must be appointed for six-year terms.
Thereafter, members must be appointed for six-year terms.

Sec. 3 RCW 2.06.080 and 1969 ex.s. c 221 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
If a vacancy occurs in the office of a judge of the court, the
governor shall appoint ((a)) one of the three persons nominated by the
nonpartisan judicial commission under section 2 of this act to hold the
office until the election and qualification of a judge to fill the
vacancy, which election shall take place at the next succeeding general
election and the judge so elected shall hold the office for the
remainder of the unexpired term. If the governor fails to appoint any
of the nominees within sixty days after the list of nominees is
submitted, the nonpartisan judicial commission shall appoint one of the
nominees to fill the vacancy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect if the proposed
amendment to Article IV, section 3 of the state Constitution requiring
the governor to fill vacancies in the supreme court in accordance with
statute is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the
voters at the next general election. If the proposed amendment is not
approved and ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---