BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The wildlife conservationist award program is created in the
department. The purpose of the program is to recognize individuals who
have made outstanding contributions toward conserving Washington's
diverse plant and animal populations.
(2) The program consists of two annual awards as follows:
(a) The Art Kruckeberg award shall be presented to an individual
making outstanding contributions toward conserving the state's plants
and plant communities; and
(b) The Hazel Wolf award shall be presented to an individual making
outstanding contributions toward conserving the state's animals and
animal communities.
(3) The recipient of each award is entitled to select a nonprofit
wildlife conservation organization to receive a sum of up to twenty-five thousand dollars from the state. The organization must be
qualified as a tax-exempt organization under section 501(c)(3) of the
federal internal revenue code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)), and must
agree to commit the sum to the organization's wildlife conservation
activities in Washington.
(4) The department must develop guidelines for selecting award
recipients and incorporate into the program elements that provide for
public recognition of the contributions made by the recipients. The
department may create an advisory committee to assist the department in
developing the guidelines and in selecting recipients.

--- END ---