BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The part-time faculty in the community and technical colleges
provide a valuable contribution to quality instruction;
(2) The part-time faculty are essential to the success of the open
access opportunities provided by the two-year colleges to the citizens
of Washington;
(3) The two-year colleges employ a core of skilled, well-trained
faculty whose contributions are critical to the quality and breadth of
program offerings;
(4) The community and technical colleges have an essential role in
educating and retraining high-skilled workers who are vital to the
economic health of the communities of Washington;
(5) It is vital to attract and retain highly skilled faculty
capable of preparing students to transfer to four-year colleges and
universities and for the work force;
(6) Low and stagnating salaries as well as the lack of career
advancement options for part-time faculty are detrimental to the morale
of all faculty;
(7) Part-time faculty contribute to the learning environment
offered to the students through advising and attention that all good
educators bring to their profession; and
(8) Although progress has been made since the initial work of the
best practices task force in 1996, additional progress needs to be made
to improve and implement best practices for part-time community and
technical college faculty.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.50.4892 and 1996 c 120 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that community colleges and technical
colleges have an obligation to carry out their roles and missions in an
equitable fashion. The legislature also finds that governing boards
for community colleges and technical colleges have a responsibility to
provide leadership and guidance to their colleges in the equitable
treatment of part-time faculty teaching in the community and technical
colleges.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
convene a task force to conduct a review and update of the best
practices audit of compensation packages and conditions of employment
for part-time faculty in the community and technical college system
conducted in 1996 and reported on in 1998. The task force shall
include but need not be limited to part-time faculty, full-time
faculty, members of the state board, community college administrators,
and members of community college and technical college governing
boards. In performing the review and update of the audit, the task
force shall focus on the employment of part-time faculty, and shall
include the following issues in its deliberations: Salary issues,
provision of health and retirement benefits, the implications of
increased reliance on part-time rather than full-time faculty, the
implications of workload definitions, and tangible and intangible ways
to recognize the professional stature of part-time faculty.
(3) The task force shall report its findings to the state board,
local governing boards, and other interested parties by August 30,
((1996)) 2005. The report shall include recommendations on a review of
the status of the set of best practices principles for the colleges to
follow in their employment of part-time faculty developed in 1996.
((By September 30, 1996,)) The state board for community and technical
colleges shall adopt and periodically update a set of best practices
principles for colleges in the community and technical college system
to follow in their employment of part-time faculty. The board shall
use the best practices principles in the development of ((its 1997-99))
each biennial operating budget request. The board shall encourage and,
to the extent possible, require each local governing board to adopt,
revise, and implement the principles.

--- END ---