BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the benefit to
our state and nation of providing equal educational opportunities for
all races and nationalities. The legislature finds that Hispanic
American students are underrepresented in Washington's colleges and
universities. The legislature also finds that past discriminatory
practices have resulted in this underrepresentation. Creating an
endowed scholarship program to help Hispanic American students obtain
a higher education will help to rectify past discrimination by
providing a means and an incentive for Hispanic American students to
pursue a higher education. The state will benefit from contributions
made by Hispanic Americans who participate in a program of higher
education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a
college or university in the state of Washington that is accredited by
an accrediting association recognized as such by rule of the higher
education coordinating board.
(2) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(3) "Eligible student" or "student" means a Hispanic American
student as defined by the board in consultation with the advisory
committee described in section 4 of this act, who is a financially
needy student, as defined by the board, who is a resident student, as
defined by RCW 28B.15.012(2), who is a full-time student at an
institution of higher education, and who promises to use his or her
education to benefit other Hispanic Americans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The Hispanic American endowed scholarship
program is created. The program shall be administered by the board.
In administering the program, the board's powers and duties shall
include but not be limited to:
(1) Selecting students to receive scholarships, with the assistance
of a screening committee composed of persons involved in helping
Hispanic American students obtain a higher education;
(2) Adopting necessary rules and guidelines;
(3) Publicizing the program;
(4) Accepting and depositing donations into the endowment fund
created in section 7 of this act;
(5) Requesting and accepting from the state treasurer moneys earned
from the trust fund and the endowment fund created in sections 6 and 7
of this act;
(6) Soliciting and accepting grants and donations from public and
private sources for the program; and
(7) Naming scholarships in honor of Hispanic Americans who have
acted as role models.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The board shall establish an advisory
committee to assist in program design and to develop criteria for the
screening and selection of scholarship recipients. The committee shall
be composed of persons involved in helping Hispanic American students
obtain higher education. The criteria shall include a priority for
upper-division or graduate students. The criteria may include a
priority for students who are majoring in program areas in which
expertise is needed by the state's Hispanic Americans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The board may award scholarships to eligible
students from moneys earned from the endowment fund created in section
7 of this act, or from funds appropriated to the board for this
purpose, or from any private donations, or from any other funds given
to the board for this program. For an undergraduate student, the
amount of the scholarship shall not exceed the student's demonstrated
financial need. For a graduate student, the amount of the scholarship
shall not exceed the student's demonstrated need or the stipend of a
teaching assistant, including tuition, at the University of Washington,
whichever is higher. In calculating a student's need, the board shall
consider the student's costs for tuition, fees, books, supplies,
transportation, room, board, personal expenses, and child care. The
student's scholarship awarded under this chapter shall not exceed the
amount received by a student attending a state research university. A
student is eligible to receive a scholarship for a maximum of five
years. However, the length of the scholarship shall be determined at
the discretion of the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The Hispanic American endowed scholarship
trust fund is established. The trust fund shall be administered by the
state treasurer. Funds appropriated by the legislature for the trust
fund shall be deposited into the fund. All moneys deposited in the
fund shall be invested by the state treasurer. Notwithstanding RCW
43.84.092, all earnings of investments of balances of the trust fund
shall be credited to the fund. At the request of the board, and when
conditions set forth in section 8 of this act are met, the treasurer
shall transfer state matching moneys and any earned interest from the
trust fund to the Hispanic American scholarship endowment fund. No
appropriation is required for expenditures from the trust fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The Hispanic American scholarship endowment
fund is established. The endowment fund shall be administered by the
state treasurer. Moneys received from the board, private donations,
state matching moneys and any earned interest, and funds received from
any other source may be deposited into the endowment fund. All moneys
deposited in the endowment fund shall be invested by the state
treasurer. Notwithstanding RCW 43.84.092, all earnings of investments
of balances of the endowment fund shall be credited to the endowment
fund. At the request of the board, the treasurer shall release
earnings from the endowment fund to the board for scholarships. No
appropriation is required for expenditures from the endowment fund.
The principal of the endowment fund shall not be invaded. The
earnings on the fund shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in
section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The board may request that the treasurer
deposit fifty thousand dollars of state matching funds and any earned
interest into the Hispanic American scholarship endowment fund when the
board can match the state funds with an equal amount of private cash
donations. Private cash donations means moneys from nonstate sources
that include, but are not limited to, federal moneys, and assessments
by commodity commissions authorized to conduct research activities,
including but not limited to research studies authorized under RCW
15.66.030 and 15.65.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---