BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that commuting
accounts for more trips and miles traveled than any other single
purpose. The legislature also recognizes that telework has been found
to reduce commute trips and provide flexibility for work-related
travel. Additionally, telework enables employers to allow employees to
work outside of urban areas, which reduces urban commute trips while
strengthening rural economies. The legislature further recognizes that
telework is a key component in a comprehensive transportation demand
management package.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer is allowed a credit against tax due under this
chapter for telework expenditures that exceed the average annual
telework expenditures made by the employer in the preceding three
calendar years. A credit claimed under this section may not exceed the
amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. The
credit must be claimed in the year in which the expenditure is made.
The employer must make the expenditure the year in which the credit is
approved by the department. Approved credit may not be carried over to
subsequent calendar years. The credit must be claimed by the due date
of the last tax return for the calendar year in which the expenditure
is made. Any unused credit expires. A refund may not be given in
place of a credit. Total credits claimed by a person under this
section and section 3 of this act may not exceed twenty thousand
dollars for any calendar year. Expenditures made before the effective
date of this act are not eligible for credit. If a person has used a
credit approved under section 3 of this act against tax under chapter
82.16 RCW, that same credit cannot be used against tax under this
chapter.
(2) Application for credits under this section must be made before
making a telework expenditure. Applications must be made to the
department in a form and manner as required by the department. The
department shall approve or deny applications for credits using the
criteria under this subsection. The department shall keep a running
total of all credits approved under this subsection and section 3 of
this act during each calendar year, and shall deny any credit
application that would cause the tabulation for any calendar year to
exceed three million dollars. A person claiming a credit must keep
records as necessary for the department to verify eligibility under
this section, including records showing that an employee was regularly
scheduled to telework from his or her home two or more days per week.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply for the purposes of
this section.
(a) "Telework" means a work arrangement whereby employees are
regularly scheduled two or more days per week to perform the normal
duties and responsibilities of their positions at locations other than
the traditional workplace, through use of computers or
telecommunications. The term includes persons who are self-employed.
(b) "Telework equipment" means:
(i) Desktop and laptop computers, computer-related hardware,
facsimile machines, modems, and similar data processing or
telecommunication equipment used only at an alternate worksite,
including an employee's home for telework purposes; and
(ii) Equipment installed at an employer's place of business that is
used exclusively to provide remote data and voice access to telework
employees.
(c) "Telework expenditures" means amounts spent, including sales or
use taxes paid, to provide telework training, purchase telework
equipment, or for telework installation costs. The term includes only
expenditures for training, equipment, and services reasonably necessary
to facilitate telework.
(d) "Telework installation costs" means one-time expenditures for
installation of telecommunication access lines at an employee's home
for the purpose of telework.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
An employer is allowed a credit against tax due under this chapter
for telework expenditures, as defined in section 2 of this act. A
credit may be claimed under this section in the same manner as provided
for credits under section 2 of this act. Credits under this section are
subject to the same conditions and limitations as credits under section
2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect October 1, 2005.

--- END ---