BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the development
of a combined intercollegiate and community swim facility at the
University of Washington will provide a significant benefit to the
state. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to support a swim
facility with the capacity to accommodate intercollegiate swim and dive
competitions, including spring board and platform diving. The facility
shall also support university intramural and recreational activities by
students, faculty, and staff. Community use shall also be accommodated
and scheduled for local competitive swim teams, swim lessons, swim
camps, and high school competitions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of ten million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2007, from the state building construction account to the
University of Washington as matching funds for the construction of a
collegiate and community swim facility. The amount provided in this
act shall be matched by an equal amount from combined donations of
institutional, student, and private donations.

--- END ---