BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to improve the real
estate excise tax reporting and collection process for the transfer of
water rights that are transferred separately from the land. The
legislature intends to improve reporting by requiring the department of
ecology and water conservancy boards to provide the department of
revenue with information about these transfers and to allow the
reporting and payment of any real estate excise tax for these transfers
to be made directly to the department of revenue, thereby relieving the
counties of responsibility for collection of such tax payments and
reports. The legislature intends for these improvements in processing
to result in a simpler and more coordinated system for collection of
the real estate excise tax for these types of water rights transfers.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.280 and 1994 c 264 s 83 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon receipt of a proper application, the department shall instruct
the applicant to publish notice thereof in a form and within a time
prescribed by the department in a newspaper of general circulation
published in the county or counties in which the storage, diversion,
and use is to be made, and in such other newspapers as the department
may direct, once a week for two consecutive weeks. Upon receipt by the
department of an application it shall send notice thereof containing
pertinent information to the director of fish and wildlife. Within
thirty days of receipt, the department shall provide to the department
of revenue a copy of any application to change the place of use of a
water right to be transferred separately from the land to which it is
appurtenant and to which it is to become appurtenant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to filing with the county auditor under RCW
90.03.380(1), the department shall also provide to the department of
revenue a copy of the certificate and report of examination where the
department has approved a change in the place of use of a water right
to be transferred from the land to which it is appurtenant and to
become appurtenant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Within thirty days of receipt, the department shall provide to the
department of revenue a copy of any application filed pursuant to RCW
90.44.100 to change the place of use of a ground water right to be
transferred from the land to which it is appurtenant and to become
appurtenant.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.45.010 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 26 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" shall have its
ordinary meaning and shall include any conveyance, grant, assignment,
quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real property,
including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a
valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant,
assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to
purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or
interest therein or other contract under which possession of the
property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the
purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the
vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term
also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of
improvements constructed upon leased land.
(2) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition
within any twelve-month period of a controlling interest in any entity
with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable
consideration. For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of
persons acting in concert shall be aggregated for purposes of
determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest
has taken place. The department of revenue shall adopt standards by
rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting a
rule for this purpose, the department shall consider the following:
(a) Persons shall be treated as acting in concert when they have a
relationship with each other such that one person influences or
controls the actions of another through common ownership; and
(b) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they shall
be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the
purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of
ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single
entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each
purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other
purchasers, then the acquisitions shall be considered separate
acquisitions.
(3) The term "sale" shall not include:
(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.
(b) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type
mentioned above.
(c) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a
contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract
contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a
mortgage.
(d) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or
as the result of a court decree.
(e) The assignment of property or interest in property from one
spouse to the other in accordance with the terms of a decree of divorce
or in fulfillment of a property settlement agreement.
(f) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a
contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a
conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.
(g) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation
proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political
subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.
(h) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property
merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.
(i) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a deed of trust or
an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien
foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment, or deed in lieu
of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust.
(j) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans
administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract
of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or
veterans administration.
(k) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or
contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or
where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax
was first imposed.
(l) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.
(m) A sale by the United States, this state or any political
subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.
(n) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation
under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW
81.112.300.
(o) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists
of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where
there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include
transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the
transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or children: PROVIDED, That
if thereafter such transferee corporation or partnership voluntarily
transfers such real property, or such transferor, spouse, or children
voluntarily transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in
the transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than
(1) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or children, (2) a
trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or children
as the only beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or
(3) a corporation or partnership wholly owned by the original
transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or children, within three
years of the original transfer to which this exemption applies, and the
tax on the subsequent transfer has not been paid within sixty days of
becoming due, excise taxes shall become due and payable on the original
transfer as otherwise provided by law.
(p)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not
involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation,
liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not
limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of
section 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended.
(ii) However, the transfer described in (p)(i) of this subsection
cannot be preceded or followed within a twelve-month period by another
transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise
exempt transfer or transfers described in (p)(i) of this subsection,
results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for
valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously
holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property
in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert
hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(p)(ii) does not apply to that
part of the transfer involving property received that is the real
property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to
the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real
property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was
purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person
or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under
this subsection (3)(p)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who
previously held a controlling interest in the entity.
(q) The transfer of a water right to the state of Washington for
administration as a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW.
(r) The transfer of a water right to a municipally owned public
water system or to an irrigation district for the purpose of
consolidation of the water right into the water supply services
provided by the system or district.
(s) The transfer of a water right to the United States for purposes
of instream flows, municipal water supply, irrigation, or other
beneficial uses.
(t) An exchange of a water right for inclusion of the land
associated with that right in an area served by a water system as
defined by RCW 80.04.010 when such inclusion is the sole compensation
received.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.45.090 and 2003 c 53 s 404 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for: (a) A sale of a beneficial interest in real
property where no instrument evidencing the sale is recorded in the
official real property records of the county in which the property is
located, or (b) the sale of a water right that is transferred
separately from the land, or (c) both (a) and (b) of this subsection,
the tax imposed by this chapter shall be paid to and collected by the
treasurer of the county within which is located the real property which
was sold. In collecting the tax the treasurer shall act as agent for
the state. The county treasurer shall cause a stamp evidencing
satisfaction of the lien to be affixed to the instrument of sale or
conveyance prior to its recording or to the real estate excise tax
affidavit in the case of used mobile home sales and used floating home
sales. A receipt issued by the county treasurer for the payment of the
tax imposed under this chapter shall be evidence of the satisfaction of
the lien imposed hereunder and may be recorded in the manner prescribed
for recording satisfactions of mortgages. Except for an instrument of
sale or conveyance for the sale of water right that is transferred
separately from the land, no instrument of sale or conveyance
evidencing a sale subject to the tax shall be accepted by the county
auditor for filing or recording until the tax shall have been paid and
the stamp affixed thereto; in case the tax is not due on the transfer,
the instrument shall not be so accepted until suitable notation of such
fact has been made on the instrument by the treasurer.
(2) For a sale of a beneficial interest in real property where a
tax is due under this chapter and where no instrument is recorded in
the official real property records of the county in which the property
is located, the sale shall be reported to the department of revenue
within five days from the date of the sale on such returns or forms and
according to such procedures as the department may prescribe. Such
forms or returns shall be signed by both the transferor and the
transferee and shall be accompanied by payment of the tax due.
(3) For the sale of a water right that is transferred separately
from the land and tax is due under this chapter, the sale shall be
reported to the department within five days from the date of the sale
on such returns and according to such procedures as the department may
prescribe. The transferor and the transferee must sign such returns.
Payment of the tax due must accompany the return. Any person who
intentionally makes a false statement on any return required to be
filed with the department under this chapter is guilty of perjury.
(4) Any person who intentionally makes a false statement on any
return or form required to be filed with the department under this
chapter is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect August 1, 2005.

--- END ---