BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.005 and 2002 c 1 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Inflation" means ((the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of
economic analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of
the)) the change in the consumer price index for the most recent
twelve-month period, for the Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage
earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor statistics, United States department of labor, for the calendar
year before the taxes are payable;
(2) "Limit factor" means((:
(a) For taxing districts with a population of less than ten
thousand in the calendar year prior to the assessment year, one hundred
one percent;
(b) For taxing districts for which a limit factor is authorized
under RCW 84.55.0101, the lesser of the limit factor under that section
or one hundred one percent;
(c) For all other districts, the lesser of one hundred one percent
or)) one hundred percent plus inflation; and
(3) "Regular property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW
84.04.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 84.55.0101 (Limit factor -- Authorization
for taxing district to use one hundred one percent or less -- Ordinance
or resolution) and 2002 c 1 s 3 & 1997 c 3 s 204 are each repealed.

--- END ---