BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares that a safe and
healthy environment for Washington's school children is of great
importance. Children are especially vulnerable to contaminants, which
can cause learning disabilities, decreased growth, hyperactivity,
impaired hearing, and abnormal brain development. It is important that
the indoor air quality, drinking water, and instructional areas and
play areas in all schools are safe. Recognizing that safe water
delivered to a school can be adversely impacted by the plumbing in the
facility, the legislature finds that the best way to ensure that
drinking water is safe in a particular school building is through
testing water from individual taps and bubblers, setting action levels
for drinking water quality, and developing and implementing corrective
action plans when problems are found.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) It is the intent of this chapter that
the exclusive responsibility remains with the local school governing
authority of the school institutions for: (a) Providing information to
the public about water quality and other environmental health risks in
their school facilities; (b) undertaking corrective actions to respond
to exceedances of drinking water action levels in schools; (c) ensuring
sufficient monitoring of drinking water in school facilities is
conducted to identify where such exceedances are occurring; (d)
ensuring test results are widely accessible to parents, students,
staff, and local and state health departments; and (e) ensuring broad
community participation with prioritizing and resolving water quality
and other environmental health risks.
(2) It is further the intent of this chapter that the governing
entities of the school institutions enforce compliance with this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the state board of health.
(2) "Council" means the state building code council.
(3) "Department" means the department of health.
(4) "Local school governing authority" means a local board of
education under chapter 28A.330 RCW or school decision-making authority
for private schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW.
(5) "School" means common schools under RCW 28A.150.020 and
approved private schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, but does not
include a residential building that is a part of a home school
extension program of an approved private school.
(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.
(7) "Uniform plumbing code" means rules adopted by the council
under chapters 19.27 and 70.92 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The board shall adopt rules for drinking
water in school facilities by August 1, 2006. The rules shall include:
(a) Drinking water quality monitoring requirements and action levels
for lead and aesthetics concerns, such as taste, odor, and color; (b)
drinking water testing protocols that are consistent with analytical
techniques and testing protocols specified in federal drinking water
program guidance; (c) deadlines for schools to complete water quality
testing; (d) requirements and deadlines for posting test results, and
for providing notice to students, parents, and school staff when test
results exceed established water quality action levels; and (e)
requirements for the local school governing authority to report to the
community on implementation of corrective actions.
(2) The board may adopt, by rule, school drinking water quality
requirements for other contaminants if the board determines that: (a)
The presence of such contaminants is not due to insufficient
implementation of public water system standards or corrosion treatment
techniques by the public water system; and (b) setting school drinking
water action levels for such contaminants is necessary to protect
public health and safety.
(3) In adopting school drinking water requirements, the board shall
be guided by the rules for controlling these contaminants in public
water supplies as contained in drinking water rules and guidance by the
United States environmental protection agency.
(4) Analysis of drinking water samples must be performed by a state
accredited drinking water laboratory.
(5) No local government may establish drinking water standards for
schools that are less protective than the standards or methods
established under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The board shall include copper and cadmium
in the rules adopted under section 4 of this act if the board
determines that there are sufficient public health risks from such
contaminants in school drinking water to warrant adoption of rules and
that the public health risks cannot be addressed through regulation of
public water systems under chapter 70.119A RCW. The board shall
include its determinations under this section in the report required by
section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The board shall report to the appropriate
legislative committees on the rules developed under this chapter by
December 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Within available funds, the department shall
provide:
(1) Technical assistance to school administrators in conducting
water quality testing;
(2) Guidance to local school governing authorities in planning and
implementing actions to respond to the exceedances; and
(3) Assistance as schools develop corrective action plans under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This chapter is supplemental to and does not
replace or diminish the authority of the board or department granted by
other laws to ensure the provision of safe drinking water within
schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This chapter does not apply to schools that
are regulated as nontransient noncommunity systems under chapter 246-290 WAC.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The state building code council shall
examine the uniform plumbing code for consistency with applicable state
and federal standards for lead plumbing and solders, fixtures,
bubblers, fountains, or other potential sources of lead contamination
of drinking water, particularly regarding the application of the code
to construction of school buildings. The council shall also examine
the effectiveness of those standards in new plumbing construction
projects to minimize the leaching of lead into the drinking water
consumed at the tap. By December 1, 2006, the council must submit a
report on its review to the appropriate legislative committees on their
findings, with recommendations for actions to ensure the code is
effective in its content, implementation, and enforcement to minimize
in new plumbing construction projects the leaching of lead into the
drinking water consumed at the tap.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---