BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a well-established link between toxic chemical exposure, human health, and
environmental impacts. The widespread use of chemicals in our society
has resulted in an increased demand for full-scale health
investigations, assessment of resource damages, and health effects
information. Increased reporting, comprehensive unbiased investigation
capability, and enhanced community education efforts are required to
maintain this state's responsibilities to provide for public health and
safety.
It is the intent of the legislature that the various state agencies
responsible for chemical use and regulation coordinate their activities
in a timely manner to ensure adequate monitoring of chemical use and
protection of workers, adults, and children from the effects of toxic
chemical exposure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) There is hereby created a toxics
exposure reporting and tracking review panel consisting of the
following members:
(a) The directors, secretaries, or designees of the departments of
labor and industries, agriculture, natural resources, fish and
wildlife, transportation, social and health services, and ecology;
(b) The secretary of the department of health or his or her
designee, who shall serve as the coordinating agency for the review
panel;
(c) The chair of the department of environmental and occupational
health sciences of the University of Washington, or his or her
designee;
(d) The chair of program in environmental science and regional
planning at Washington State University, or his or her designee;
(e) A representative of the Washington poison control center
network;
(f) A practicing toxicologist and a member of the general public,
who shall each be appointed by the governor for terms of two years and
may be appointed for a maximum of four terms at the discretion of the
governor. The governor may remove either member prior to the
expiration of his or her term of appointment for cause. Upon the
death, resignation, or removal for cause of a member of the review
panel, the governor shall fill such vacancy, within thirty days of its
creation, for the remainder of the term in the manner prescribed in
this section for appointment to the review panel.
(2) The review panel shall be chaired by the secretary of the
department of health, or the secretary's designee. The members of the
review panel shall meet at least monthly at a time and place specified
by the chair, or at the call of a majority of the review panel.
(3) Members of the review panel shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The responsibilities of the toxics exposure
reporting and tracking review panel include, but are not limited to:
(1) Establishing guidelines for centralizing the receipt of
information relating to actual or alleged health and environmental
incidents involving toxic chemicals;
(2) Reviewing and making recommendations to the department of
health and the department of ecology or to the appropriate legislative
committees for procedures for monitoring exposure to chemicals, which
shall be implemented by the appropriate agency unless a written
statement providing the reasons for not adopting the recommendations is
provided to the review panel;
(3) Monitoring chemical use, possible health effects, and advice on
possible alternatives;
(4) At the request of the chair or any panel member, reviewing
exposure to chemicals of unusual complexity or those that cannot be
resolved;
(5) Identifying links between chemical exposure and human health;
(6) Identifying inadequacies in state or federal law that result in
insufficient protection of public health and safety, with specific
attention to advising the appropriate agencies on the adequacy of
chemical toxicity data established by the appropriate federal agency to
protect the health and safety of children and adults. The panel shall
establish a priority list for reviewing toxic chemicals, which
considers the following criteria:
(a) Whether the chemical is being widely used by industry or
residents of Washington;
(b) Whether another state has established a policy on use that is
different than the existing federal standards;
(c) The toxicity category of the chemical under federal law,
including persistence and bioaccumulation;
(d) Whether the chemical has been identified by a federal or state
agency or through a scientific review as presenting a risk of cancer,
birth defects, genetic damage, neurological effects, blood disorders,
sterility, menstrual dysfunction, organ damage, or other chronic or
subchronic effects; and
(e) Reports or complaints of ill effects from the chemical exposure
in the workplace, home, or school;
(7) Reviewing and approving an annual report prepared by the
department of health to the governor, agency heads, and members of the
legislature and made available to the public. The report shall
include, at a minimum:
(a) A summary of the year's activities;
(b) A synopsis of the chemical exposure to residents of Washington;
(c) A separate descriptive listing of each case in which adverse
health or environmental effects due to chemicals were found to occur;
(d) A tabulation of the data from each case;
(e) An assessment of the effects of chemical exposure on children;
(f) The identification of trends, issues, and needs; and
(g) Any recommendations for improved or reduced chemical use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In addition to the responsibilities in
section 3 of this act, the toxic exposures reporting and tracking
review panel shall:
(1) Identify alternatives to persistent, bioaccumulative toxins
used in manufacturing conducted in Washington state;
(2) Work with Washington state businesses to move to least toxic
methods and products;
(3) Work with businesses, state agencies, and recycling companies
to address end-of-life issues, and to formulate recommendations and
strategies;
(4) Function as an information clearinghouse to share information
to agencies, businesses, researchers, and students on persistent,
bioaccumulative toxins, health, and the environment; and
(5) Provide expert consultation to government, businesses, and
others concerning persistent, bioaccumulative toxins, health, and the
environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 70.104 RCW.

--- END ---