BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall review
the tax preferences in Title 84 RCW beginning in 2006 and every six
years thereafter. The review shall be completed and a report prepared
by June 30th of the year a review is required. The review shall not
include an evaluation of any tax preference in chapter 84.36 RCW that
has been in effect less than two years. The department of revenue
shall provide the committee with property tax data necessary to conduct
the review. Upon completion of the review, the committee shall
transmit the report to the appropriate committees of the legislature.
The report shall include the following:
(a) Identification of the populations whose tax liabilities are
directly affected by the tax preferences in chapter 84.36 RCW under
review;
(b) Identification where possible of the legislative objective in
establishing a tax preference and an assessment of the extent to which
the preference has accomplished that objective;
(c) An estimate of the additional tax revenues that state and local
governments would collect if a tax preference is eliminated; and
(d) An analysis of the change in the distribution of property taxes
if a tax preference is eliminated.
(2) As used in this section, "tax preference" means an exemption,
exclusion, or deduction from the base of tax; a credit against tax; a
deferral of tax; or a preferential tax rate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.136.010 (Legislative findings -- Intent) and 1982 1st
ex.s. c 35 s 39;
(2) RCW 43.136.020 ("Tax preference" defined) and 1982 1st ex.s. c
35 s 40;
(3) RCW 43.136.030 (Legislative budget committee and department of
revenue -- Review of tax preferences -- Reports) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 35 s
41;
(4) RCW 43.136.040 (Legislative budget committee review of tax
preferences -- Factors for consideration) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 35 s 42;
(5) RCW 43.136.050 (Powers and duties of ways and means committees)
and 1982 1st ex.s. c 35 s 43; and
(6) RCW 43.136.070 (Report on existing tax preferences to be
provided -- Additional information to be provided) and 1982 1st ex.s. c
35 s 45.

--- END ---