BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I - FINDINGS AND INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Timely disclosure to voters of the identity and sources of
funding for electioneering communications is vitally important to the
integrity of state, local, and judicial elections.
(2) Electioneering communications that identify political
candidates for state, local, or judicial office and that are
distributed sixty days before an election for those offices are
intended to influence voters and the outcome of those elections.
(3) The state has a compelling interest in providing voters
information about electioneering communications in political campaigns
concerning candidates for state, local, or judicial office so that
voters can be fully informed as to the: (a) Source of support or
opposition to those candidates; and (b) identity of persons attempting
to influence the outcome of state, local, and judicial candidate
elections.
(4) Nondisclosure of financial information about advertising that
masquerades as relating only to issues and not to candidate campaigns
fosters corruption or the appearance of corruption. These consequences
can be substantially avoided by full disclosure of the identity and
funding of those persons paying for such advertising.
(5) The United States supreme court held in McConnell et al. v.
Federal Elections Commission, 540 U.S. 93, 124 S.Ct. 619, 157 L.Ed.2d
491 (2003) that speakers seeking to influence elections do not possess
an inviolable free speech right to engage in electioneering
communications regarding elections, including when issue advocacy is
the functional equivalent of express advocacy. Therefore, such
election campaign communications can be regulated and the source of
funding disclosed.
(6) The state also has a sufficiently compelling interest in
preventing corruption in political campaigns to justify and restore
contribution limits and restrictions on the use of soft money in RCW
42.17.640. Those interests include restoring restrictions on the use
of such funds for electioneering communications, as well as the laws
preventing circumvention of those limits and restrictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Based upon the findings in section 1 of this
act, this act is narrowly tailored to accomplish the following and is
intended to:
(1) Improve the disclosure to voters of information concerning
persons and entities seeking to influence state, local, and judicial
campaigns through reasonable and effective mechanisms, including
improving disclosure of the source, identity, and funding of
electioneering communications concerning state, local, and judicial
candidate campaigns;
(2) Regulate electioneering communications that mention state,
local, and judicial candidates and that are broadcast, mailed, erected,
distributed, or otherwise published right before the election so that
the public knows who is paying for such communications;
(3) Reenact and amend the contribution limits in RCW 42.17.640 (6)
and (14) and the restrictions on the use of soft money, including as
applied to electioneering communications, as those limits and
restrictions were in effect following the passage of chapter 2, Laws of
1993 (Initiative No. 134) and before the state supreme court decision
in Washington State Republican Party v. Washington State Public
Disclosure Commission, 141 Wn.2d 245, 4 P.3d 808 (2000). The
commission is authorized to fully restore the implementation of the
limits and restrictions of RCW 42.17.640 (6) and (14) in light of
McConnell et al. v. Federal Elections Commission, 540 U.S. 93, 124
S.Ct. 619, 157 L.Ed.2d 491 (2003). The United States supreme court
upheld the disclosure and regulation of electioneering communications
in political campaigns, including but not limited to issue advocacy
that is the functional equivalent of express advocacy;
(4) Authorize the commission to adopt rules to implement this act.

PART II - ELECTIONEERING COMMUNICATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A payment for or promise to pay for any
electioneering communication shall be reported to the commission by the
sponsor on forms the commission shall develop by rule to include, at a
minimum, the following information:
(a) Name and address of the sponsor;
(b) Source of funds for the communication, including:
(i) General treasury funds. The name and address of businesses,
unions, groups, associations, or other organizations using general
treasury funds for the communication, however, if a business, union,
group, association, or other organization undertakes a special
solicitation of its members or other persons for an electioneering
communication, or it otherwise receives funds for an electioneering
communication, that entity shall report pursuant to (b)(ii) of this
subsection;
(ii) Special solicitations and other funds. The name, address,
and, for individuals, occupation and employer, of a person whose funds
were used to pay for the electioneering communication, along with the
amount, if such funds from the person have exceeded two hundred fifty
dollars in the aggregate for the electioneering communication; and
(iii) Any other source information required or exempted by the
commission by rule;
(c) Name and address of the person to whom an electioneering
communication related expenditure was made;
(d) A detailed description of each expenditure of more than one
hundred dollars;
(e) The date the expenditure was made and the date the
electioneering communication was first broadcast, transmitted, mailed,
erected, distributed, or otherwise published;
(f) The amount of the expenditure;
(g) The name of each candidate clearly identified in the
electioneering communication, the office being sought by each
candidate, and the amount of the expenditure attributable to each
candidate; and
(h) Any other information the commission may require or exempt by
rule.
(2) Electioneering communications shall be reported as follows:
The sponsor of an electioneering communication shall report to the
commission within twenty-four hours of, or on the first working day
after, the date the electioneering communication is broadcast,
transmitted, mailed, erected, distributed, or otherwise published.
(3) Electioneering communications shall be reported electronically
by the sponsor using software provided or approved by the commission.
The commission may make exceptions on a case-by-case basis for a
sponsor who lacks the technological ability to file reports using the
electronic means provided or approved by the commission.
(4) All persons required to report under RCW 42.17.065, 42.17.080,
42.17.090, and 42.17.100 are subject to the requirements of this
section, although the commission may determine by rule that persons
filing according to those sections may be exempt from reporting some of
the information otherwise required by this section. The commission may
determine that reports filed pursuant to this section also satisfy the
requirements of RCW 42.17.100 and 42.17.103.
(5) Failure of any sponsor to report electronically under this
section shall be a violation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) An electioneering communication made by
a person in cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the
request or suggestion of, a candidate, a candidate's authorized
committee, or their agents is a contribution to the candidate.
(2) An electioneering communication made by a person in
cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the request or
suggestion of, a political committee or its agents is a contribution to
the political committee.
(3) If an electioneering communication is not a contribution
pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the sponsor shall
file an affidavit or declaration so stating at the time the sponsor is
required to report the electioneering communication expense under
section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The sponsor of an electioneering
communication shall preserve all financial records relating to the
communication, including books of account, bills, receipts, contributor
information, and ledgers, for not less than five calendar years
following the year in which the communication was broadcast,
transmitted, mailed, erected, or otherwise published.
(2) All reports filed under section 3 of this act shall be
certified as correct by the sponsor. If the sponsor is an individual
using his or her own funds to pay for the communication, the
certification shall be signed by the individual. If the sponsor is a
political committee, the certification shall be signed by the committee
treasurer. If the sponsor is another entity, the certification shall
be signed by the individual responsible for authorizing the expenditure
on the entity's behalf.

PART III - AMENDMENTS TO AND REENACTMENT OF CURRENT LAWS
Sec. 6 RCW 42.17.020 and 2002 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Actual malice" means to act with knowledge of falsity or with
reckless disregard as to truth or falsity.
(2) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(((2))) (3) "Authorized committee" means the political committee
authorized by a candidate, or by the public official against whom
recall charges have been filed, to accept contributions or make
expenditures on behalf of the candidate or public official.
(((3))) (4) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by
RCW ((29.01.110)) 29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum
proposition proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any
municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other voting
constituency from and after the time when the proposition has been
initially filed with the appropriate election officer of that
constituency prior to its circulation for signatures.
(((4))) (5) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial,
economic, or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial,
proprietary, financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(((5))) (6) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has filed a valid certificate of
nomination with the secretary of state under chapter ((29.24)) 29A.20
RCW;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW ((29.01.090)) 29A.04.086, that is
the body authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise
authority on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(((6))) (7) "Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or
political committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.
(((7))) (8) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW
42.17.050, to perform the duties specified in that section.
(((8))) (9) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination
for election or election to public office. An individual seeks
nomination or election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(((9))) (10) "Caucus political committee" means a political
committee organized and maintained by the members of a major political
party in the state senate or state house of representatives.
(((10))) (11) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells
the service of communicating messages or producing printed material for
broadcast or distribution to the general public or segments of the
general public whether through the use of newspapers, magazines,
television and radio stations, billboard companies, direct mail
advertising companies, printing companies, or otherwise.
(((11))) (12) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW
42.17.350.
(((12))) (13) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower
meaning, includes payment in any form for real or personal property or
services of any kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance
with RCW 42.17.241, the term "compensation" shall not include per diem
allowances or other payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse
a public official for expenses incurred while the official is engaged
in the official business of the governmental entity.
(((13))) (14) "Continuing political committee" means a political
committee that is an organization of continuing existence not
established in anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(((14))) (15)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising or electioneering communication
prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized
agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for which the
individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(((15))) (16) "Elected official" means any person elected at a
general or special election to any public office, and any person
appointed to fill a vacancy in any such office.
(((16))) (17) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special
election for public office and any election in which a ballot
proposition is submitted to the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in
which the qualifications for voting include other than those
requirements set forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the
Constitution of the state of Washington shall not be considered an
election for purposes of this chapter.
(((17))) (18) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of
or in opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(((18))) (19) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the
first day of December after the date of the last previous general
election for the office that the candidate seeks and ending on November
30th after the next election for the office. In the case of a special
election to fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the
period beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on November
30th after the special election.
(((19))) (20) "Electioneering communication" means any broadcast,
cable, or satellite television or radio transmission, United States
postal service mailing, billboard, newspaper, or periodical that:
(a) Clearly identifies a candidate for a state, local, or judicial
office either by specifically naming the candidate, or identifying the
candidate without using the candidate's name;
(b) Is broadcast, transmitted, mailed, erected, distributed, or
otherwise published within sixty days before any election for that
office in the jurisdiction in which the candidate is seeking election;
and
(c) Either alone, or in combination with one or more communications
identifying the candidate by the same sponsor during the sixty days
before an election, has a fair market value of five thousand dollars or
more.
(21) "Electioneering communication" does not include:
(a) Usual and customary advertising of a business owned by a
candidate, even if the candidate is mentioned in the advertising when
the candidate has been regularly mentioned in that advertising
appearing at least twelve months preceding his or her becoming a
candidate;
(b) Advertising for candidate debates or forums when the
advertising is paid for by or on behalf of the debate or forum sponsor,
so long as two or more candidates for the same position have been
invited to participate in the debate or forum;
(c) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is:
(i) Of primary interest to the general public;
(ii) In a news medium controlled by a person whose business is that
news medium; and
(iii) Not a medium controlled by a candidate or a political
committee;
(d) Slate cards and sample ballots;
(e) Advertising for books, films, dissertations, or similar works
(i) written by a candidate when the candidate entered into a contract
for such publications or media at least twelve months before becoming
a candidate, or (ii) written about a candidate;
(f) Public service announcements;
(g) A mailed internal political communication primarily limited to
the members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(h) An expenditure by or contribution to the authorized committee
of a candidate for state, local, or judicial office; or
(i) Any other communication exempted by the commission through rule
consistent with the intent of this chapter.
(22) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of
value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not
legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure"
also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of
value in exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or
anything of value for the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring
any public official or candidate, or assisting in furthering or
opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of this chapter,
agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises to pay may be
reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is made. The
term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete repayment
by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a loan, the
receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(((20))) (23) "Final report" means the report described as a final
report in RCW 42.17.080(2).
(((21))) (24) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640
means the election that results in the election of a person to a state
office. It does not include a primary.
(((22))) (25) "Gift," is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.
(((23))) (26) "Immediate family" includes the spouse, dependent
children, and other dependent relatives, if living in the household.
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, "immediate family"
means an individual's spouse, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent,
stepparent, grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister
of the individual and the spouse of any such person and a child,
stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half
brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's spouse and the
spouse of any such person.
(((24))) (27) "Incumbent" means a person who is in present
possession of an elected office.
(28) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that has each
of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of five hundred dollars or
more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under five hundred
dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is five hundred dollars or more.
(((25))) (29)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits
a contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless
the contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family as
defined for purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an
association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(((26))) (30) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions,
amendments, nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in
either house of the state legislature, and includes any other matter
that may be the subject of action by either house or any committee of
the legislature and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both
houses, are pending approval by the governor.
(((27))) (31) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to
influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature
of the state of Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule,
standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency
under the state Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
Neither "lobby" nor "lobbying" includes an association's or other
organization's act of communicating with the members of that
association or organization.
(((28))) (32) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in
his or her own or another's behalf.
(((29))) (33) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by
whom a lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is
compensated for acting as a lobbyist.
(((30))) (34) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint
venture, public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or
local governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(((31))) (35) "Person in interest" means the person who is the
subject of a record or any representative designated by that person,
except that if that person is under a legal disability, the term
"person in interest" means and includes the parent or duly appointed
legal representative.
(((32))) (36) "Political advertising" includes any advertising
displays, newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles,
tabloids, flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other
means of mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing,
directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support or
opposition in any election campaign.
(((33))) (37) "Political committee" means any person (except a
candidate or an individual dealing with his or her own funds or
property) having the expectation of receiving contributions or making
expenditures in support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any
ballot proposition.
(((34))) (38) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
procedure for nominating a candidate to state office under chapter
((29.18 or 29.21)) 29A.52 RCW or any other primary for an election that
uses, in large measure, the procedures established in chapter ((29.18
or 29.21)) 29A.52 RCW.
(((35))) (39) "Public office" means any federal, state, judicial,
county, city, town, school district, port district, special district,
or other state political subdivision elective office.
(((36))) (40) "Public record" includes any writing containing
information relating to the conduct of government or the performance of
any governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or
retained by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.
(((37))) (41) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning
on the date of the filing of recall charges under RCW ((29.82.015))
29A.56.120 and ending thirty days after the recall election.
(((38))) (42) "Sponsor of an electioneering communications,
independent expenditures, or political advertising" means the person
paying for the electioneering communication, independent expenditure,
or political advertising. If a person acts as an agent for another or
is reimbursed by another for the payment, the original source of the
payment is the sponsor.
(43) "State legislative office" means the office of a member of the
state house of representatives or the office of a member of the state
senate.
(((39))) (44) "State office" means state legislative office or the
office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney
general, commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner,
superintendent of public instruction, state auditor, or state
treasurer.
(((40))) (45) "State official" means a person who holds a state
office.
(((41))) (46) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political
committee or candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the
possession or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the
election for which the contributions were received, and that are in
excess of the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the
committee or candidate prior to that election. In the case of a
continuing political committee, "surplus funds" mean those
contributions remaining in the possession or control of the committee
that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay all remaining debts
when it makes its final report under RCW 42.17.065.
(((42))) (47) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation, including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.
As used in this chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any
gender, the other, as the context requires.

Sec. 7 RCW 42.17.103 and 2001 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The sponsor of political advertising who, within twenty-one
days of an election, publishes, mails, or otherwise presents to the
public political advertising supporting or opposing a candidate or
ballot proposition that qualifies as an independent expenditure with a
fair market value of one thousand dollars or more shall deliver, either
electronically or in written form, a special report to the commission
within twenty-four hours of, or on the first working day after, the
date the political advertising is first published, mailed, or otherwise
presented to the public.
(2) If a sponsor is required to file a special report under this
section, the sponsor shall also deliver to the commission within the
delivery period established in subsection (1) of this section a special
report for each subsequent independent expenditure of any size
supporting or opposing the same candidate who was the subject of the
previous independent expenditure, supporting or opposing that
candidate's opponent, or supporting or opposing the same ballot
proposition that was the subject of the previous independent
expenditure.
(3) The special report must include at least:
(a) The name and address of the person making the expenditure;
(b) The name and address of the person to whom the expenditure was
made;
(c) A detailed description of the expenditure;
(d) The date the expenditure was made and the date the political
advertising was first published or otherwise presented to the public;
(e) The amount of the expenditure;
(f) The name of the candidate supported or opposed by the
expenditure, the office being sought by the candidate, and whether the
expenditure supports or opposes the candidate; or the name of the
ballot proposition supported or opposed by the expenditure and whether
the expenditure supports or opposes the ballot proposition; and
(g) Any other information the commission may require by rule.
(4) All persons required to report under RCW 42.17.065, 42.17.080,
42.17.090, ((and)) 42.17.100, and section 3 of this act are subject to
the requirements of this section. The commission may determine that
reports filed pursuant to this section also satisfy the requirements of
RCW 42.17.100.
(5) The sponsor of independent expenditures supporting a candidate
or opposing that candidate's opponent required to report under this
section shall file with each required report an affidavit or
declaration of the person responsible for making the independent
expenditure that the expenditure was not made in cooperation,
consultation, or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, the
candidate, the candidate's authorized committee, or the candidate's
agent, or with the encouragement or approval of the candidate, the
candidate's authorized committee, or the candidate's agent.

Sec. 8 RCW 42.17.110 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 112 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Each commercial advertiser who has accepted or provided
political advertising or electioneering communications during the
election campaign shall maintain open for public inspection during the
campaign and for a period of no less than three years after the date of
the applicable election, during normal business hours, documents and
books of account which shall specify:
(a) The names and addresses of persons from whom it accepted
political advertising or electioneering communications;
(b) The exact nature and extent of the ((advertising)) services
rendered; and
(c) The consideration and the manner of paying that consideration
for such services.
(2) Each commercial advertiser which must comply with subsection
(1) of this section shall deliver to the commission, upon its request,
copies of such information as must be maintained open for public
inspection pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 42.17.510 and 1995 c 397 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All written political advertising, whether relating to
candidates or ballot propositions, shall include the sponsor's name and
address. All radio and television political advertising, whether
relating to candidates or ballot propositions, shall include the
sponsor's name. The use of an assumed name for the sponsor of
electioneering communications, independent expenditures, or political
advertising shall be unlawful. ((The party with which a candidate
files)) For partisan office, if a candidate has expressed a party or
independent preference on the declaration of candidacy, that party or
independent designation shall be clearly identified in electioneering
communications, independent expenditures, or political advertising
((for partisan office)).
(2) In addition to the materials required by subsection (1) of this
section, except as specifically addressed in subsections (4) and (5) of
this section, all political advertising undertaken as an independent
expenditure by a person or entity other than a party organization, and
all electioneering communications, must include the following statement
((on)) as part of the communication "NOTICE TO VOTERS (Required by
law): This advertisement is not authorized or approved by any
candidate. It is paid for by (name, address, city, state)." If the
advertisement undertaken as an independent expenditure or
electioneering communication is undertaken by a nonindividual other
than a party organization, then the following notation must also be
included: "Top Five Contributors," followed by a listing of the names
of the five persons or entities making the largest contributions in
excess of seven hundred dollars reportable under this chapter during
the twelve-month period before the date of the advertisement or
communication.
(3) The statements and listings of contributors required by
subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall:
(a) Appear on the first page or fold of the written advertisement
or communication in at least ten-point type, or in type at least ten
percent of the largest size type used in a written advertisement or
communication directed at more than one voter, such as a billboard or
poster, whichever is larger;
(b) Not be subject to the half-tone or screening process; and
(c) Be set apart from any other printed matter((; and
(d) Be clearly spoken on any broadcast advertisement)).
(4) In an independent expenditure or electioneering communication
transmitted via television or other medium that includes a visual
image, the following statement must either be clearly spoken, or appear
in print and be visible for at least four seconds, appear in letters
greater than four percent of the visual screen height, and have a
reasonable color contrast with the background: "No candidate
authorized this ad. Paid for by (name, city, state)." If the
advertisement or communication is undertaken by a nonindividual other
than a party organization, then the following notation must also be
included: "Top Five Contributors" followed by a listing of the names
of the five persons or entities making the largest contributions in
excess of seven hundred dollars reportable under this chapter during
the twelve-month period before the date of the advertisement.
Abbreviations may be used to describe contributing entities if the full
name of the entity has been clearly spoken previously during the
broadcast advertisement.
(5) The following statement shall be clearly spoken in an
independent expenditure or electioneering communication transmitted by
a method that does not include a visual image: "No candidate
authorized this ad. Paid for by (name, city, state)." If the
independent expenditure or electioneering communication is undertaken
by a nonindividual other than a party organization, then the following
statement must also be included: "Top Five Contributors" followed by
a listing of the names of the five persons or entities making the
largest contributions in excess of seven hundred dollars reportable
under this chapter during the twelve-month period before the date of
the advertisement. Abbreviations may be used to describe contributing
entities if the full name of the entity has been clearly spoken
previously during the broadcast advertisement.
(6) Political yard signs are exempt from the requirement of
subsections (1) and (2) of this section that the name and address of
the sponsor of political advertising be listed on the advertising. In
addition, the public disclosure commission shall, by rule, exempt from
the identification requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this
section forms of political advertising such as campaign buttons,
balloons, pens, pencils, sky-writing, inscriptions, and other forms of
advertising where identification is impractical.
(((5))) (7) For the purposes of this section, "yard sign" means any
outdoor sign with dimensions no greater than eight feet by four feet.

Sec. 10 RCW 42.17.530 and 1999 c 304 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a violation of this chapter for a person to sponsor with
actual malice:
(a) Political advertising or an electioneering communication that
contains a false statement of material fact about a candidate for
public office. However, this subsection (1)(a) does not apply to
statements made by a candidate or the candidate's agent about the
candidate himself or herself;
(b) Political advertising or an electioneering communication that
falsely represents that a candidate is the incumbent for the office
sought when in fact the candidate is not the incumbent;
(c) Political advertising or an electioneering communication that
makes either directly or indirectly, a false claim stating or implying
the support or endorsement of any person or organization when in fact
the candidate does not have such support or endorsement.
(2) Any violation of this section shall be proven by clear and
convincing evidence.

Sec. 11 RCW 42.17.640 and 2001 c 208 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) No person, other than a bona fide political party or a caucus
political committee, may make contributions to a candidate for a state
legislative office that in the aggregate exceed ((five)) seven hundred
dollars or to a candidate for a state office other than a state
legislative office that in the aggregate exceed one thousand four
hundred dollars for each election in which the candidate is on the
ballot or appears as a write-in candidate. Contributions made with
respect to a primary may not be made after the date of the primary.
However, contributions to a candidate or a candidate's authorized
committee may be made with respect to a primary until thirty days after
the primary, subject to the following limitations: (a) The candidate
lost the primary; (b) the candidate's authorized committee has
insufficient funds to pay debts outstanding as of the date of the
primary; and (c) the contributions may only be raised and spent to
satisfy the outstanding debt. Contributions made with respect to a
general election may not be made after the final day of the applicable
election cycle.
(2) No person, other than a bona fide political party or a caucus
political committee, may make contributions to a state official against
whom recall charges have been filed, or to a political committee having
the expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall of the
state official, during a recall campaign that in the aggregate exceed
((five)) seven hundred dollars if for a state legislative office or one
thousand four hundred dollars if for a state office other than a state
legislative office.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, no bona fide
political party or caucus political committee may make contributions to
a candidate during an election cycle that in the aggregate exceed (i)
((fifty)) seventy cents multiplied by the number of eligible registered
voters in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected if the
contributor is a caucus political committee or the governing body of a
state organization, or (ii) ((twenty-five)) thirty-five cents
multiplied by the number of registered voters in the jurisdiction from
which the candidate is elected if the contributor is a county central
committee or a legislative district committee.
(b) No candidate may accept contributions from a county central
committee or a legislative district committee during an election cycle
that when combined with contributions from other county central
committees or legislative district committees would in the aggregate
exceed ((twenty-five)) thirty-five cents times the number of registered
voters in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, no bona fide
political party or caucus political committee may make contributions to
a state official against whom recall charges have been filed, or to a
political committee having the expectation of making expenditures in
support of the state official, during a recall campaign that in the
aggregate exceed (i) ((fifty)) seventy cents multiplied by the number
of eligible registered voters in the jurisdiction entitled to recall
the state official if the contributor is a caucus political committee
or the governing body of a state organization, or (ii) ((twenty-five))
thirty-five cents multiplied by the number of registered voters in the
jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected if the contributor is
a county central committee or a legislative district committee.
(b) No state official against whom recall charges have been filed,
no authorized committee of the official, and no political committee
having the expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall
of a state official may accept contributions from a county central
committee or a legislative district committee during an election cycle
that when combined with contributions from other county central
committees or legislative district committees would in the aggregate
exceed ((twenty-five)) thirty-five cents multiplied by the number of
registered voters in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is
elected.
(5) For purposes of determining contribution limits under
subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the number of eligible
registered voters in a jurisdiction is the number at the time of the
most recent general election in the jurisdiction.
(6) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section, no
person other than an individual, bona fide political party, or caucus
political committee may make contributions reportable under this
chapter to a caucus political committee that in the aggregate exceed
((five)) seven hundred dollars in a calendar year or to a bona fide
political party that in the aggregate exceed ((two)) three thousand
five hundred dollars in a calendar year. This subsection does not
apply to loans made in the ordinary course of business.
(7) For the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, a
contribution to the authorized political committee of a candidate, or
of a state official against whom recall charges have been filed, is
considered to be a contribution to the candidate or state official.
(8) A contribution received within the twelve-month period after a
recall election concerning a state office is considered to be a
contribution during that recall campaign if the contribution is used to
pay a debt or obligation incurred to influence the outcome of that
recall campaign.
(9) The contributions allowed by subsection (2) of this section are
in addition to those allowed by subsection (1) of this section, and the
contributions allowed by subsection (4) of this section are in addition
to those allowed by subsection (3) of this section.
(10) RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790 apply to a special election
conducted to fill a vacancy in a state office. However, the
contributions made to a candidate or received by a candidate for a
primary or special election conducted to fill such a vacancy shall not
be counted toward any of the limitations that apply to the candidate or
to contributions made to the candidate for any other primary or
election.
(11) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this section, no
corporation or business entity not doing business in Washington state,
no labor union with fewer than ten members who reside in Washington
state, and no political committee that has not received contributions
of ten dollars or more from at least ten persons registered to vote in
Washington state during the preceding one hundred eighty days may make
contributions reportable under this chapter to a candidate, to a state
official against whom recall charges have been filed, or to a political
committee having the expectation of making expenditures in support of
the recall of the official. This subsection does not apply to loans
made in the ordinary course of business.
(12) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this section, no
county central committee or legislative district committee may make
contributions reportable under this chapter to a candidate, state
official against whom recall charges have been filed, or political
committee having the expectation of making expenditures in support of
the recall of a state official if the county central committee or
legislative district committee is outside of the jurisdiction entitled
to elect the candidate or recall the state official.
(13) No person may accept contributions that exceed the
contribution limitations provided in this section.
(14) The following contributions are exempt from the contribution
limits of this section:
(a) An expenditure or contribution earmarked for voter
registration, for absentee ballot information, for precinct caucuses,
for get-out-the-vote campaigns, for precinct judges or inspectors, for
sample ballots, or for ballot counting, all without promotion of or
political advertising for individual candidates; or
(b) An expenditure by a political committee for its own internal
organization or fund raising without direct association with individual
candidates.

PART IV - TECHNICAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 RCW 42.17.505 (Definitions) and 1988 c 199
s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) Sections 1 through 5 of this act are
each added to chapter 42.17 RCW to be codified with the subchapter
heading of "Reporting of Electioneering Communications."
(2) The code reviser must change the subchapter heading "Political
Advertising" to "Political Advertising and Electioneering
Communications" in chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act takes effect January 1, 2006.

--- END ---