BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the
following project loans recommended by the public works board are
authorized to be made with funds appropriated from the public works
assistance account:
(1) Bainbridge Island--storm sewer project--construct a storm sewer
waste management facility including bins for storage of asphalt,
concrete, wood chips, rock, sand and gravel, and miscellaneous woody
debris; and test remaining soil and remove contaminated soils from the
Head of the Bay site . . . . . . . . . . . . $782,000
(2) Bainbridge Island--sanitary sewer project--upgrade wastewater
treatment plant by upgrading the following: Headworks, biosolids,
oxidation ditch aeration basins, sludge holding basins, secondary
clarification, and sludge pumping and effluent outfall . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,618,000
(3) Battle Ground--sanitary sewer project--expand the capacity in
the shared use facilities by performing the design engineering and
construction for a parallel sewer line interceptor, 1 new transmission
pump station, an influent pressure main, and treatment plant
improvements to increase the capacity from 10.3 million gallons per day
to 16 million gallons per day . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(4) Birchbay water and sewer district--sanitary sewer project--extend the existing sanitary sewer system constructing approximately
10,000 feet of gravity sewer mains, including manholes, side sewers to
each lot, and other sewer appurtenances. The project will also include
temporary erosion and sedimentation control measures and other
public/private improvement restoration following sewer installation
. . . . . . . . . . . . $765,000
(5) Blaine--sanitary sewer project--construct a wastewater
pretreatment facility and a 700,000 gallon equalization storage
facilities along and underneath Marine Drive to prevent raw sewage
overflows into Drayton Harbor, construction of control structures
required to operate and maintain facilities, and reconstruction of
existing lift station number one . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,080,000
(6) Brewster--sanitary sewer project--retrofit south lift station
and dry well/wet well system will be converted to a submersible pump
station, headworks structure will be enclosed, including electrical and
ventilation systems, replacement of chlorine gas disinfection system
with UV disinfection, construction of a plant water system, adding new
effluent flow meter and automatic sampler, replacement of activated
sludge pumps, retrofitting primary clarifier, installation of a new
dewatering facility, electrical, and control features and appurtenances
. . . . . . . . . . . . $2,659,600
(7) Carnation--sanitary sewer project--eliminate current septic
tank/drainfield systems and replace them with a centralized sewer
collection system that will connect directly to the treatment facility
being built by King County, including approximately 26,000 feet of
vacuum sewer collector pipes, 3,000 feet of force main, approximately
700 side sewers and the associated abandonment of septic
tank/drainfield systems, relocation of 10,000 feet of water main,
telemetry system for new sewer facilities, and a vacuum/pump station
. . . . . . . . . . . . $4,374,700
(8) Castle Rock--sanitary sewer project--upgrade wastewater
treatment plant by constructing a new treatment process, structures and
equipment, new oxidation ditch, modernized headworks, disinfecting with
ultraviolet, installation of a belt thickener, and press for solids and
secondary clarifiers . . . . . . . . . . . . $655,000
(9) Chinook water district--domestic water project--construct a new
package water filter plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,425,000
(10) College Place--domestic water project--construct a 1.5 million
gallon water storage reservoir, install a booster station,
approximately 7,100 feet of 16 inch water transmission mains, three
pressure reducing valve stations, and a second booster station in the
Regency Park package system, telemetry improvements, and associated
appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,975,000
(11) Douglas county--storm sewer project--construction of a
detention basin of approximately 35 acre feet, construction of an urban
conveyance and water quality project that consists of construction of
about 2,000 feet of closed conduit, 1,000 feet of open channel, and
construction of a water quality treatment facility, and all appropriate
appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,835,600
(12) Dupont--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately 6,600
feet of sanitary sewer line with manholes, 103 side sewers, and
overlaying 4,200 feet of street. The city of DuPont will also purchase
capacity from Pierce County allowing the transfer of flows for
treatment to Pierce County . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,985,600
(13) East Wenatchee water district--domestic water project--increase capacity and remedy leaking mains by replacing approximately
one mile of 12 inch ductile iron transmission main . . . . . . . . . . . . $490,875
(14) Eatonville--domestic water project--construct a membrane
filtration system and use the existing disinfection system, install a
booster pump station, additional well sources, basin modifications, and
approximately 1,200 feet of transmission main to connect to the
existing system . . . . . . . . . . . . $807,500
(15) Edmonds--sanitary sewer project--lift station elimination and
rehabilitation project includes elimination of lift station seven,
demolish the facility and construct approximately 1,550 feet of gravity
sewer line, and install a new line from current location of lift
station seven to lift station eight. Replace lift station eight,
including upsizing of the wet well and replacement of all mechanical
and electrical equipment and replacement and upsizing of approximately
450 feet of force main . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,216,903
(16) Enumclaw--sanitary sewer project--upgrade and expand the
existing wastewater treatment plant by constructing a new headworks,
install new extended aeration activated sludge basins, anaerobic/anoxic
basins, and two additional secondary clarifiers. The city will also
include construction of chemical facilities, enlarging laboratory area,
sludge dewatering, and stabilization facilities and related
appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,750,000
(17) Ephrata--sanitary sewer project--construction of approximately
2,400 feet of sanitary sewer main, 200 feet of side sewer pipe, eight
manholes and appurtenances, and the rehabilitation of approximately one
mile of access roadway in the port of Ephrata . . . . . . . . . . . . $289,000
(18) Everett--sanitary sewer project--construct upgrades to the
wastewater treatment plant that include: A headworks grit system,
construction of two primary clarifiers, a new biofilter, new piping
arrangements, modifications to the trickling filter pump station,
installation of primary sludge grit removal equipment, sludge
dispersion equipment, flow metering, new hypochlorite generation
facilities, new scum collection and dewatering equipment, and minor
upgrade of the north effluent pump station . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(19) Freeland water district--domestic water project--solve the
source and storage needs by constructing a new reservoir, connection of
the new well to the new reservoir, connection of the new reservoir to
the system, rehabilitation of the existing well number one, and all
appropriate appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $308,030
(20) Gig Harbor--sanitary sewer project--upgrade to the wastewater
treatment plant to improve its efficiency and effectiveness. In
addition, an outfall extension into Colvos Passage, including a
diffuser will be constructed. Project will result in a higher quality
effluent being discharged to Puget Sound . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(21) Goldendale--road project--reconstruct approximately 2,700 feet
of East Collins Drive. This will include curb and gutters, storm
drainage facilities, sewer line repair and replacement, water line
replacement, and a 40 foot curb to curb road section consisting of two
eleven foot travel lanes and two nine foot parking areas . . . . . . . . . . . . $827,316
(22) Highland water district--domestic water project--construct a
0.5 million gallon steel water tank and foundation, appurtenances such
as water lines and valves, access road, and other site improvements as
needed . . . . . . . . . . . . $573,750
(23) Ilwaco--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately 2,000
feet of sanitary sewer lines and 2,250 feet of storm sewer lines,
including contributing laterals. In addition, installation of new
manholes, catch basins, and other related improvements would be made as
part of the project . . . . . . . . . . . . $774,000
(24) Jefferson County public utility district 1--domestic water
project--extend water system to service the entire Marrowstone Island.
Replacing individual wells with a public water supply. This will
include installation of approximately 150,000 feet of water mains with
accoutrements, a new 300,000 gallon storage tank, and expansion of
existing treatment facilities. This will ensure a consistent source of
potable water for the residents . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(25) Jefferson County public utility district 1--sanitary sewer
project--replace approximately 80 individual septic systems with a new
community drainfield system, consisting of approximately 12 grinder
pump stations, twin booster pump stations, two dosing tanks, and other
components necessary to enable the system to function properly.
Completion of this project will virtually eliminate the release of any
untreated effluent into the wetland and Discovery Bay . . . . . . . . . . . . $948,924
(26) Kennewick--domestic water project--upgrade the water treatment
plant with installation of a new membrane filtration at the Columbia
River plant and installation of an ultraviolet disinfection system at
the Ranney collector number five. Other related improvements will be
made to the system as part of the project. This project will bring the
city into compliance with the department of health's ground water under
the influence (GWI) requirements . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(27) King county water district No. 111--domestic water project--construct four water treatment facilities. Each facility will include
chlorine generation systems, backwash recycling facilities, SCADA
systems at each plant, and any other related activities necessary to
complete the construction. This will enable the district to be in
compliance with iron and manganese MCLs and eliminate the hazards
associated with chlorine . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,255,428
(28) King county water district No. 125--domestic water project--upgrade pressure zone 2 by installing two secondary source connections,
including pressure-reducing valves, valves, piping, and appurtenances
and approximately 150 feet of water main. The project will also
include replacement of approximately 12,500 feet of undersized water
main, including all valves, fittings, hydrants, and appurtenances and
project area restoration as required . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,088,850
(29) Lake Forest Park--sanitary sewer project--installation of a
series of extensions to the city of Lake Forest Park's sanitary sewer
system to provide service to residential areas currently not serviced.
This will include construction of approximately 3.8 miles of sewer main
extension including gravity sewer, pressure piping, service connections
and side sewers, lift stations, grinder pump assemblies, surface
restoration, temporary erosion and sedimentation control, and related
work . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,656,000
(30) Leavenworth--domestic water project--reconstruct old reservoir
on existing site, including new structural walls, new roof, and related
appurtenances. Project will also include installation of a SCADA
monitoring/radio telemetry control system . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
(31) LOTT wastewater alliance--sanitary sewer project--construct
four secondary clarifier mechanisms, replacement of RAS pumps,
secondary scum pumping improvements, and motorized actuators. Upgrades
to equipment and mechanisms will enable LOTT to meet increasing loads
at the Budd Inlet wastewater treatment plant and improve the effluent
quality . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,278,404
(32) Malaga water district--domestic water project--construct a new
52,000 gallon partially buried concrete reservoir and connecting piping
and install security fencing around tank. This project will enable the
district to ensure a continuous safe water supply to the homes and
businesses in the area . . . . . . . . . . . . $161,500
(33) Manchester water district--domestic water project--upgrade a
wide range of the water system. Project will include installation of
a SCADA system with all hardware, software, and backup equipment.
Installation of a new flow meter at each wellhead and pump station.
Distribution/transmission piping replacements and upgrades to the Mile
Hill Road area, Yukon Harbor Drive and Southworth Drive. Installation
of two interties in the South Street and Garfield Road area.
Construction of two pressure-reducing stations located in the Beach
Drive and Harper Hill areas . . . . . . . . . . . . $970,870
(34) Mason county public utility district 1--domestic water
project--source improvements and system rehabilitation to the newly
acquired Arcadia Estates system. Project will include pump and
controls for well number two, 24,000 gallon storage reservoir with
draft fire hydrant, three booster pumps, two pressure tanks,
pressure-reducing station, service meters, and three blow off
assemblies. This will remove the red operating permit and ensure a
safe and reliable source of potable water for the community . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $95,950
(35) Mason county public utility district 1--domestic water
project--rehabilitate the source of supply at the newly acquired Twanoh
Heights water system. This project will include rehabilitation of well
number one, installation of two pumps, abandonment of well number two
per department of ecology rules, service meters and air release valves.
This project will allow the community to have a continuous, safe and
reliable water source . . . . . . . . . . . . $172,900
(36) Mason county public utility district 1--domestic water
project--address system needs for the Madrona Beach water system by
constructing a 11,500 gallon reservoir, booster station, site
work/plumbing, service meters, and a source meter. This will enable
the public utility district to comply with department of health
requirements and remove a blue operating permit . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,000
(37) Mason county public utility district 1--domestic water
project--make improvements to the newly acquired Canal Beach water
system. The improvements include drilling and testing a new well
source, constructing a 20,000 gallon storage tank, piped system
intertie, fire service line and hydrant, water services with new
meters, and abandonment of existing well sources per department of
ecology rules . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,712
(38) Mason county public utility district 1--domestic water
project--make improvements to the Minerva Terrace water system that
will include drill and test well, integrate well into system, booster
station with all appurtenances, 35,200 gallon reservoir, and a draft
fire hydrant. This will enable the system to have the red operating
permit to be lifted and comply with department of health rules . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $217,550
(39) Northeast Sammamish sewer/water district--domestic water
project--construct a new water treatment plant, new 0.5 million gallon
reservoir and pump station, new transmission water main, and new
distribution main and associated minor improvements. The district will
then be able to meet the federal arsenic level regulations and ensure
a safe source of potable water for the community . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,154,970
(40) Northshore utility district--sanitary sewer project--install
approximately 2,445 feet of gravity sewer main, manholes, connection to
the sanitary sewer system, and related restoration and appurtenances.
In addition, the district will replace approximately 2,400 feet of
asbestos concrete water mains. This will resolve the negative
environmental and health impacts of the failing septic systems in the
area . . . . . . . . . . . . $814,634
(41) Northshore utility district--sanitary sewer project--install
approximately 300 feet of gravity sewer main, manholes, connection to
the sanitary sewer system, and related restoration and appurtenances.
In addition, the district will replace approximately 300 feet of
asbestos concrete water mains. This will resolve the negative
environmental and health impacts of the failing septic systems in the
area . . . . . . . . . . . . $113,334
(42) Oak Harbor--domestic water project--replace existing water
transmission mains being destroyed due to a highway project. The
project includes construction of approximately 4,000 feet of
transmission mains along Highway 20 just south of Deception Pass state
park. Project will meet the city's foreseeable water requirements and
provide sufficient capacity for the Naval Air Station--Whidbey . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $834,700
(43) Orchard Avenue irrigation district number 6--domestic water
project--install approximately 19,100 feet of PVC pipe. Approximately
210 buried meter boxes, reconnect approximately 400 existing services,
and all required valves and other fittings. Project will eliminate
public health concern over potential lead contamination from lead joint
pipe . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,066,800
(44) Pierce County--road project--widen, reconstruct, and overlay
the intersection of Canyon Road E and 176th Street E, which includes
additional travel lanes in each direction and left and right turn lanes
at the intersection, a new traffic signal system, traffic signal
interconnect system, street lights, median, curb and gutter, concrete
sidewalks, landscaping, undergrounding of utilities, storm drainage
conveyance, storage, and treatment facilities. Project will increase
carrying capacity and allow for economic development . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,942,000
(45) Pullman--sanitary sewer project--construct a new variable
volume digester at the wastewater treatment plant, with an approximate
capacity of 350,000 gallons. The work includes site preparation and
construction of the digester, necessary piping modifications, and
modifications to the existing plant control system. Project will
enable the city to meet the environmental protection agency's SRT
requirements . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,912,000
(46) Pullman--domestic water project--construct a well to replace
well number 3. Included in the project will be the drilling of the
replacement well, well pump, motor, controls, disinfection equipment,
fluoride injection equipment, a swell and chemical storage house,
connection of transmission lines, and other related miscellaneous items
and site work . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
(47) Ridgefield--sanitary sewer project--construct a new pump
station, install approximately 3,000 feet of force main, which will
discharge directly into the treatment plant, and construct
approximately 3,000 feet of gravity interceptor sewer. This project
will enable the city to open up service to an area that is currently
not served and allow for economic development . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,718,000
(48) Ritzville--domestic water project--increase the city's water
capacity from 1,200 to 2,000 gallons per minute by drilling a new well.
This will also include installing the necessary pump and connections to
the storage tank and construct a well house to protect the equipment
. . . . . . . . . . . . $845,000
(49) Ronald wastewater district--sanitary sewer project--sewer
extension to unsewered areas includes installation of approximately
2,700 feet PVC sewer main and approximately 2,000 feet PVC sewers in
three separate areas of the district. All associated appurtenances
will also be instilled, such as manholes and side sewer stubs.
Approximately 1,100 sewer trunk main will be repaired. The streets and
other public improvements that are disturbed during construction will
be restored to city of Shoreline's standards . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,021,700
(50) Samish water district--sanitary sewer project--upgrade its
system by replacing pumps and controls at six sewage pump stations,
replace controls at one sewage pump station, upgrade SCADA, and replace
inline valves on existing sewer force main. This will ensure that the
system operates within regulations . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,083,000
(51) Seattle--storm sewer project--increase capacity of the
drainage system by installing approximately 1,760 feet of storm drain
along South Trenton Street, 3rd Avenue South, and 4th Avenue South.
Install 2,380 feet of storm drain along South Director Street and 7th
Avenue South. The last part of the project will construct a new storm
drain system on 8th Avenue South. These new drainage pipes will reduce
flows to the combined sewer system and reduce the number of overflows
. . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000
(52) Seattle--storm sewer project--upgrade two culverts in the
lower reaches of Taylor Creek to remove fish barriers and construct a
fish ladder to improve fish passage and control sediment
transportation. Other related improvements will be made to the area as
part of the project . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,500
(53) Seattle--storm sewer project--construct two ponds that will
include a 4 acre feet sediment collection pond, 2 acre feet decant
pond, 750 feet of access road, 750 of decant piping, a gravel pump and
its housing and controls, and 4,000 feet of landscaping around the new
ponds. Additional related upgrades will be done to complete the
project . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,832,600
(54) Skyway water/sewer district--domestic water project--replace
and upsize the supply meter from the city of Seattle system and replace
approximately 6,350 feet of asbestos water supply line. In addition,
four new pressure zones interties will be installed to improve flow
between pressure zones within the water/sewer district . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,130,526
(55) Spokane--domestic water project--replace about 3,500 feet of
riveted steel water transmission mains with ductile iron pipe. In
addition, project will include all valves, connections, blowoffs, air
valves, railroad crossing, and pavement restoration and traffic control
. . . . . . . . . . . . $3,453,975
(56) Spokane--domestic water project--construct a 2 million gallon
elevated steel tank with an accompanying booster station. This will
include all piping, valves, telemetry, instrumentation, excavation and
site preparation including landscaping, paving, and fencing . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $2,232,950
(57) Spokane county--road project--construct a total of 8.3 miles
of roadway from Havana Street to Forker Road and from Forker Road from
Bigelow Gulch Road to Wellesley Road. The construction will provide
for expanding the road to four traveled lanes plus eight foot shoulders
to improve safety and traffic capacity. A center turn lane will be
added at locations where vehicles routinely make left turns. Eight
foot shoulders will be added to provide for safety of pedestrians and
bicycles . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(58) Stanwood--domestic water project--construct a 1 million gallon
elevated water tank, water main, appurtenances, and equipment necessary
to connect the new water tank to the existing system. Project will
also install telemetry and control systems compatible with existing
system, construction of a Cedarhome booster pump station for filling
the Cedarhome reservoir, and improvements to the sites such as grading,
fencing, and landscaping . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,481,620
(59) Stevens County--solid waste project--expand municipal solid
waste site by construction of an 11 acre lateral expansion,
environmentally protective landfill lining and leachate collection
system and construction of ancillary facilities such as perimeter
roads. Leachate facilities will consist of piping, collection and
conveyance facilities . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
(60) Union Gap--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
3,400 feet of sewer interceptor and 1,800 feet of sewer laterals in
conjunction with new roadways in the Valley Mall Boulevard area . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $676,429
(61) Washougal--sanitary sewer project--construct a redundant
secondary clarifier adjacent to existing secondary clarifier, including
piping connections to the existing clarifier distribution structure,
scum pump station, and RAS/WAS pump room. Additional work will include
RAS/WAS pump room modifications for installation of dedicated return
and waste-activated sludge pumps, sidewalks, and site grading and all
necessary electrical hardware and SCADA control modifications. Project
will enable the city to meet their national pollution discharge
elimination system permit requirements . . . . . . . . . . . . $794,000
(62) West Richland--sanitary sewer project--increase capacity by
constructing a one million gallons per day biolac wastewater treatment
facility, approximately 2,700 feet of sanitary sewer pipe, lift
station, miscellaneous roadway patching, and site restoration. If
additional funds are available, improvements to the facilities outfall
structure will be designed along with facilities for sludge handling
from the sewer maintenance program. Project will enable the city to
meet their national pollution discharge elimination system permit
requirements . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
(63) Witworth water district 2--domestic water project--The
district will solve the area problems by installing approximately
27,090 of water lines together with valves and appurtenances,
connection to the existing system, 15 hydrants, pavement repair, and
other surface restoration. In addition, installation of a two million
gallon steel reservoir and a 1,700 gallons per minute booster pump
station and various piping, appurtenances, pumps, controls, security,
electrical, and connection to existing system . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,502,300
(64) Yakima--sanitary sewer project--The project will be done in
two phases. Phase I will install approximately 6,640 feet of sewer
main trunk line in River Road from North 16th Avenue to North 40th
Avenue. Phase II will install 5,500 feet of sewer main trunk line in
River Road from North 6th Avenue to North 16th Avenue if public works
trust fund loan funds remain and private development proceeds. The
project will help prevent further loss of major employers by providing
the transportation and utility infrastructure necessary to maintain
competitive operations . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,307,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---