BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.36.051 and 1999 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A milk processing plant must obtain an annual milk processing plant
license from the department, which shall expire on June 30 of each
year. A milk processing plant may choose to process (1) grade A milk
and milk products, or (2) other milk products that are not classified
grade A.
Only one license may be required to process milk; however, milk
processing plants must obtain the necessary endorsements from the
department in order to process products as defined for each type of
milk or milk product processing. Application for a license shall be on
a form prescribed by the director and accompanied by a ((twenty-five))
fifty-five dollar annual license fee. The applicant shall include on
the application the full name of the applicant for the license and the
location of the milk processing plant he or she intends to operate and
any other necessary information. Upon the approval of the application
by the director and compliance with the provisions of this chapter,
including the applicable rules adopted under this chapter by the
department, the applicant shall be issued a license or a renewal of a
license.
Licenses shall be issued to cover only those products, processes,
and operations specified in the license application and approved for
licensing. If a license holder wishes to engage in processing a type
of milk product that is different than the type specified on the
application supporting the licensee's existing license and processing
that type of food product would require a major addition to or
modification of the licensee's processing facilities, the licensee
shall submit an amendment to the current license application. In such
a case, the licensee may engage in processing the new type of milk
product only after the amendment has been approved by the department.
A licensee under this section shall not be required to obtain a
food processing plant license under chapter 69.07 RCW to process milk
or milk products.
The director shall waive the fee for a food processing license
under chapter 69.07 RCW for persons who are also licensed as a milk
processing plant.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.36.231 and 1999 c 291 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Milk and milk products for consumption in the raw state shall
be bottled or packaged on the farm where produced. Bottling and
capping shall be done in a sanitary manner by means of approved
equipment and ((these)) operations ((shall be integral in one
machine)). Caps or cap stock shall be purchased in sanitary containers
and kept therein in a clean dry place until used.
(2) All containers enclosing raw milk or any raw milk product shall
be plainly labeled or marked with the word "raw" and the name of the
producer or packager. The label or mark shall be in letters of a size,
kind, and color approved by the director and shall contain no marks or
words which are misleading.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.36.241 and 1961 c 11 s 15.36.420 are each amended
to read as follows:
Capping of milk or milk products shall be done ((by)) in a sanitary
manner by means of approved ((mechanical)) equipment and operations.
((Hand capping is prohibited.)) The cap or cover shall cover the
pouring lip to at least its largest diameter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 1 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 2005.

--- END ---