BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Bass sound harmonics may cause adverse auditory and nonauditory
effects, including hearing loss, communication and sleep disturbance,
increasing stress levels, changes in mood, and impact to cardiovascular
and endocrine systems;
(b) Exposure to bass sound harmonics may cause long-term damage;
(c) With increasing population sizes and new and developing
technologies for the production of bass sound harmonics, more
Washingtonians are exposed for longer periods to bass sound harmonics;
(d) The scientific research into the health effects of bass sound
harmonics has not been extensively studied, and state and local
programs relating to the restriction on bass sound harmonics should be
considered; and
(e) The state noise program has not been comprehensively reviewed
with respect to its application to bass sound harmonics.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to authorize a comprehensive
review of current federal research studies on the health effects of
bass sound harmonics, if any, and a review of current state and local
noise programs that includes provisions relating to bass sound
harmonics in order to provide greater understanding of opportunities to
strengthen those programs as well as further public education regarding
the health effects of bass sound harmonics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By January 1, 2007, the department of
health, with the guidance of the board of health, shall provide to the
appropriate committees of the senate and the house of representatives
an assessment of the health effects of bass sound harmonics and
recommendations for reducing the effects. The study shall include but
not be limited to:
(1) A review of the literature on the effects of bass sound
harmonics, with an emphasis upon more contemporary research completed
in the previous two decades. The review shall include research
findings on direct auditory effects, as well as nonauditory effects
such as sleep, emotional and communication disturbance, and stress
effects;
(2) An assessment of the principal sources of bass sound harmonics
in Washington communities and trends in bass sound harmonics in
representative urban, suburban, and rural areas;
(3) A review of the current bass sound harmonics programs at the
state and local level, including public education and compliance
activities;
(4) A review of federal noise control laws and programs and
regulatory subjects preempted by federal laws with respect to bass
sound harmonics; and
(5) Recommendations for improving state and local noise control
programs to address the health effects of bass sound harmonics
identified in the study and for more effective administration of
existing programs, including state financial and technical assistance
to local governments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) In conducting the study required by
section 2 of this act, the department of health shall form an advisory
committee including representatives of community organizations
concerned with bass sound harmonics, industries characterized by high
noise levels, motorized vehicle manufacturers, transportation
facilities, and scientific research interests. The department may
retain independent consultants for technical elements of health effects
analyses.
(2) The department shall provide for public participation in the
development of the report, including one or more public forums and the
provision of an opportunity for public review and comment upon a draft
report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of sixty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2006, from the general fund to the department of health
for the purposes of this act. The department may contract with another
entity to complete portions of the study provisions in this act, but
any contract may not allow greater than twenty-five percent of the
total contract amount for indirect costs.

--- END ---