BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.29.155 and 2003 c 202 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time of filing an application for a title insurance
agent license, or any renewal or reinstatement of a title insurance
agent license, the applicant shall provide satisfactory evidence to the
commissioner of having obtained the following as evidence of financial
responsibility:
(a) A fidelity bond or fidelity insurance providing coverage in the
aggregate amount of two hundred thousand dollars with a deductible no
greater than ten thousand dollars covering the applicant and each
corporate officer, partner, escrow officer, and employee of the
applicant conducting the business of an escrow agent as defined in RCW
18.44.011 and exempt from licensing under RCW 18.44.021(6), or a
guarantee from a licensed title insurance company as authorized by
subsection (5) of this section; and
(b) A surety bond in the amount of ten thousand dollars executed by
the applicant as obligor and by a surety company authorized, or
eligible under chapter 48.15 RCW, to do a surety business in this state
as surety, or some other security approved by the commissioner, unless
the fidelity bond or fidelity insurance obtained by the licensee to
satisfy the requirement in (a) of this subsection does not have a
deductible. The bond shall run to the state of Washington as obligee,
and shall run to the benefit of the state and any person or persons who
suffer loss by reason of the applicant's or its employee's violation of
this chapter. The bond shall be conditioned that the obligor as
licensee will faithfully conform to and abide by this chapter and all
rules adopted under this chapter, and shall reimburse all persons who
suffer loss by reason of a violation of this chapter or rules adopted
under this chapter. The bond shall be continuous and may be canceled
by the surety upon the surety giving written notice to the commissioner
of its intent to cancel the bond. The cancellation shall be effective
thirty days after the notice is received by the commissioner. Whether
or not the bond is renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued, or
otherwise extended, replaced, or modified, including increases or
decreases in the penal sum, it shall be considered one continuous
obligation, and the surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an
aggregate amount exceeding the penal sum set forth on the face of the
bond. In no event shall the penal sum, or any portion thereof, at two
or more points in time be added together in determining the surety's
liability. The bond is not liable for any penalties imposed on the
licensee, including but not limited to any increased damages or
attorneys' fees, or both, awarded under RCW 19.86.090.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a "fidelity bond" means a
primary commercial blanket bond or its equivalent satisfactory to the
commissioner and written by an insurer authorized, or eligible under
chapter 48.15 RCW, to transact this line of business in the state of
Washington. The bond shall provide fidelity coverage for any
fraudulent or dishonest acts committed by any one or more of the
employees, officers, or owners as defined in the bond, acting alone or
in collusion with others. The bond shall be for the sole benefit of
the title insurance agent and under no circumstances whatsoever shall
the bonding company be liable under the bond to any other party. The
bond shall name the title insurance agent as obligee and shall protect
the obligee against the loss of money or other real or personal
property belonging to the obligee, or in which the obligee has a
pecuniary interest, or for which the obligee is legally liable or held
by the obligee in any capacity, whether the obligee is legally liable
therefor or not. The bond may be canceled by the insurer upon delivery
of thirty days' written notice to the commissioner and to the title
insurance agent.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "fidelity insurance" means
employee dishonesty insurance or its equivalent satisfactory to the
commissioner and written by an insurer authorized, or eligible under
chapter 48.15 RCW, to transact this line of business in the state of
Washington. The insurance shall provide coverage for any fraudulent or
dishonest acts committed by any one or more of the employees, officers,
or owners as defined in the policy of insurance, acting alone or in
collusion with others. The insurance shall be for the sole benefit of
the title insurance agent and under no circumstances whatsoever shall
the insurance company be liable under the insurance to any other party.
The insurance shall name the title insurance agent as the named insured
and shall protect the named insured against the loss of money or other
real or personal property belonging to the named insured, or in which
the named insured has a pecuniary interest, or for which the named
insured is legally liable or held by the named insured in any capacity,
whether the named insured is legally liable therefor or not. The
insurance coverage may be canceled by the insurer upon delivery of
thirty days' written notice to the commissioner and to the title
insurance agent.
(4) The fidelity bond or fidelity insurance, and the surety bond or
other form of security approved by the commissioner, shall be kept in
full force and effect as a condition precedent to the title insurance
agent's authority to transact business in this state, and the title
insurance agent shall supply the commissioner with satisfactory
evidence thereof upon request.
(5) A title insurance company authorized to do business in
Washington under RCW 48.05.030 may provide a guarantee in a form
satisfactory to the commissioner accepting financial responsibility, up
to the aggregate amount of two hundred thousand dollars, for any
fraudulent or dishonest acts committed by any one or more of the
employees, officers, or owners of a title insurance agent that is
appointed as the title insurance company's agent. A title insurance
company providing a guarantee as permitted under this subsection may
only do so on behalf of its properly appointed title insurance agents.
If the title insurance agent is an agent for two or more title
insurance companies, any liability under the guarantee shall be borne
by the title insurance company for those escrows for which a title
insurance commitment or policy was issued on behalf of that title
insurance company. If no commitment or policy was issued regarding the
escrow for which moneys were lost, including but not limited to
collection escrows, each title insurance company, for which the agent
was appointed at the time of the fraudulent or dishonest act, shares in
the liability. The liability will be shared proportionally, as
follows: The premium the agent remitted to the title insurance company
in the year prior to the fraudulent or dishonest act will be compared
to the total premium the agent remitted to all title insurance
companies, for whom the title insurance agent was appointed, during the
same period.
(6) All title insurance agents licensed on or before the effective
date of this act shall comply with this section within thirty days
following the effective date.

--- END ---