BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cost-effective" means that cost savings to taxpayers realized
over a reasonable period of time are greater than costs to taxpayers.
(2) "Council" means the prevention quality council created in
section 2 of this act.
(3) "Evidence-based program" means a program that (a) incorporates
significant and relevant practices based on scientifically based
research and (b) is cost-effective.
(4) "Institute" means the Washington state institute for public
policy, created by the legislature in 1983.
(5) "Prevention and early intervention programs" means programs
that are intended, through activities involving persons under eighteen
years of age, to prevent or reduce the future likelihood of any of the
following outcomes:
(a) Commission of crime;
(b) Abuse of alcohol, tobacco, or other drugs;
(c) Failure to graduate from high school;
(d) Pregnancy or parenting before age eighteen;
(e) Suicide or attempted suicide;
(f) Child abuse or neglect, as either victim or perpetrator;
(g) Domestic violence as defined in chapter 10.99 RCW; or
(h) Other adverse outcomes identified by the council.
(6) "Scientifically based research" means research that obtains
reliable and valid knowledge by:
(a) Employing systematic, empirical methods that draw on
observation or experiment;
(b) Involving rigorous data analyses that are adequate to test the
stated hypotheses and justify the general conclusions drawn; and
(c) Relying on measurements or observational methods that provide
reliable and valid data across evaluators and observers, across
multiple measurements and observations, and across studies by the same
or different investigators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) The prevention quality council is
created. The council shall consist of nine members as follows: The
director of the office of financial management; the superintendent of
public instruction; the secretary of the department of social and
health services; the secretary of the department of health; the
secretary of corrections; and four members of the legislature, one of
whom is appointed by the chair of each of the two largest political
caucuses of the senate and house of representatives, from among the
members of the committees having jurisdiction over the omnibus
operating budget.
(b) The council shall select its chair from among the members, and
may select such other officers as its members deem necessary.
(2) Members of the council shall serve without additional
compensation, but legislative members shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of
the council or on official business authorized by the council.
Nonlegislative members of the council shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(3) The office of financial management shall provide staff services
to the council.
(4) The council shall contract with the institute to conduct
research required under this chapter and report its findings to the
council and the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The council shall meet at least annually to:
(1) Identify state agencies operating or funding prevention
programs;
(2) Review research findings and recommendations of the institute;
(3) Identify gaps in available research and make recommendations to
the legislature regarding areas that should be prioritized for future
research investments;
(4) Certify, by affirmative vote of at least six members, evidence-based prevention programs for state funding; and
(5) Recommend legislation modifying duties and services of state
agencies as necessary to achieve the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The institute, by contract with the council,
shall:
(1) Review evaluation and other research to identify evidence-based
programs, whether operating in this state or elsewhere;
(2) Estimate and compare the cost-effectiveness of prevention
programs;
(3) Periodically update its findings based on new or updated
research;
(4) Periodically review operations of certified evidence-based
programs for fidelity to designs and models on which certification was
based; and
(5) Perform other research and analyses related to the purposes of
this chapter as the council or the legislature may direct, subject to
available funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 State agencies identified by the council as
operating or funding prevention programs shall:
(1) Submit biennial reports to the council containing:
(a) A description of each prevention program on which the agency
expends state funds, including but not limited to whether the program
is an evidence-based program; and
(b) The percentage of state funds the agency receives for
prevention programs that is being expended on evidence-based programs;
and
(2) Spend not less than the percentages of state funds specified in
this section on certified evidence-based programs in the fiscal years
specified:
(a) Fifty percent in fiscal year 2007;
(b) Sixty percent in fiscal year 2008; and
(c) Seventy percent in fiscal year 2009 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This chapter shall be known as the
prevention and early intervention quality and accountability act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---