BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as
the Washington Uniform Estate Tax Apportionment Act of 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The following definitions
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Apportionable estate" means the value of the gross estate as
finally determined for purposes of the estate tax to be apportioned
reduced by:
(a) Any claim or expense allowable as a deduction for purposes of
the tax;
(b) The value of any interest in property that, for purposes of the
tax, qualifies for a marital or charitable deduction or otherwise is
deductible or is exempt; and
(c) Any amount added to the decedent's gross estate because of a
gift tax on transfers made before death.
(2) "Estate tax" means a federal, state, or foreign tax imposed
because of the death of an individual and interest and penalties
associated with the tax. The term does not include an inheritance tax,
income tax, or generation-skipping transfer tax other than a
generation-skipping transfer tax incurred on a direct skip taking
effect at death.
(3) "Gross estate" means, with respect to an estate tax, all
interests in property subject to the tax.
(4) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, public corporation, government, governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or
commercial entity.
(5) "Ratable" means apportioned or allocated pro rata according to
the relative values of interests to which the term is to be applied.
"Ratably" has a corresponding meaning.
(6) "Time-limited interest" means an interest in property which
terminates on a lapse of time or on the occurrence or nonoccurrence of
an event or which is subject to the exercise of discretion that could
transfer a beneficial interest to another person. The term does not
include a cotenancy unless the cotenancy itself is a time-limited
interest.
(7) "Value" means, with respect to an interest in property, fair
market value as finally determined for purposes of the estate tax that
is to be apportioned, reduced by any outstanding debt secured by the
interest without reduction for taxes paid or required to be paid or for
any special valuation adjustment.
(8) "Internal Revenue Code" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
83.100.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 APPORTIONMENT BY WILL OR OTHER DISPOSITIVE
INSTRUMENT. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this
section, the following rules apply:
(a) To the extent that a provision of a decedent's will provides
for the apportionment of an estate tax, the tax must be apportioned
accordingly.
(b) Any portion of an estate tax not apportioned pursuant to (a) of
this subsection must be apportioned in accordance with any provision of
a revocable trust of which the decedent was the settlor which provides
for the apportionment of an estate tax. If conflicting apportionment
provisions appear in two or more revocable trust instruments, the
provision in the most recently dated instrument prevails. For purposes
of this subsection (1)(b):
(i) A trust is revocable if it was revocable immediately after the
trust instrument was executed, even if the trust subsequently becomes
irrevocable; and
(ii) The date of an amendment to a revocable trust instrument is
the date of the amended instrument only if the amendment contains an
apportionment provision.
(c) If any portion of an estate tax is not apportioned pursuant to
(a) or (b) of this subsection, and a provision in any other dispositive
instrument provides that any interest in the property disposed of by
the instrument is or is not to be applied to the payment of the estate
tax attributable to the interest disposed of by the instrument, the
provision controls the apportionment of the tax to that interest.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, and unless the
decedent provides to the contrary, the following rules apply:
(a) If an apportionment provision provides that a person receiving
an interest in property under an instrument is to be exonerated from
the responsibility to pay an estate tax that would otherwise be
apportioned to the interest:
(i) The tax attributable to the exonerated interest must be
apportioned among the other persons receiving interests passing under
the instrument; or
(ii) If the values of the other interests are less than the tax
attributable to the exonerated interest, the deficiency must be
apportioned ratably among the other persons receiving interests in the
apportionable estate that are not exonerated from apportionment of the
tax.
(b) If an apportionment provision provides that an estate tax is to
be apportioned to an interest in property a portion of which qualifies
for a marital or charitable deduction, the estate tax must first be
apportioned ratably among the holders of the portion that does not
qualify for a marital or charitable deduction and then apportioned
ratably among the holders of the deductible portion to the extent that
the value of the nondeductible portion is insufficient.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in (d) of this subsection, if an
apportionment provision provides that an estate tax be apportioned to
property in which one or more time-limited interests exist, other than
interests in specified property under section 7 of this act, the tax
must be apportioned to the principal of that property, regardless of
the deductibility of some of the interests in that property.
(d) If an apportionment provision provides that an estate tax is to
be apportioned to the holders of interests in property in which one or
more time-limited interests exist and a charity has an interest that
otherwise qualifies for an estate tax charitable deduction, the tax
must first be apportioned, to the extent feasible, to interests in
property that have not been distributed to the persons entitled to
receive the interests. No tax shall be paid from a charitable
remainder annuity trust or a charitable remainder unitrust described in
section 664 of the Internal Revenue Code and created during the
decedent's life.
(3) A provision that apportions an estate tax is ineffective to the
extent that it increases the tax apportioned to a person having an
interest in the gross estate over which the decedent had no power to
transfer immediately before the decedent executed the instrument in
which the apportionment direction was made. For purposes of this
section, a testamentary power of appointment is a power to transfer the
property that is subject to the power.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 STATUTORY APPORTIONMENT OF ESTATE TAXES. To
the extent that apportionment of an estate tax is not controlled by an
instrument described in section 3 of this act and except as otherwise
provided in sections 6 and 7 of this act, the following rules apply:
(1) Subject to subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, the
estate tax is apportioned ratably to each person that has an interest
in the apportionable estate.
(2) A generation-skipping transfer tax incurred on a direct skip
taking effect at death is charged to the person to which the interest
in property is transferred.
(3) If property is included in the decedent's gross estate because
of section 2044 of the Internal Revenue Code or any similar estate tax
provision, the difference between the total estate tax for which the
decedent's estate is liable and the amount of estate tax for which the
decedent's estate would have been liable if the property had not been
included in the decedent's gross estate is apportioned ratably among
the holders of interests in the property. The balance of the tax, if
any, is apportioned ratably to each other person having an interest in
the apportionable estate.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in section 3(2)(d) of this act and
except as to property to which section 7 of this act applies, an estate
tax apportioned to persons holding interests in property subject to a
time-limited interest must be apportioned, without further
apportionment, to the principal of that property.
(5) If the court finds that it is inequitable to apportion interest
and penalties in the manner provided in this chapter because of special
circumstances, it may direct apportionment thereon in the manner it
finds equitable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 CREDITS AND DEFERRALS. Except as otherwise
provided in sections 6 and 7 of this act, the following rules apply to
credits and deferrals of estate taxes:
(1) A credit resulting from the payment of gift taxes or from
estate taxes paid on property previously taxed inures ratably to the
benefit of all persons to which the estate tax is apportioned.
(2) A credit for state or foreign estate taxes inures ratably to
the benefit of all persons to which the estate tax is apportioned,
except that the amount of a credit for a state or foreign tax paid by
a beneficiary of the property on which the state or foreign tax was
imposed, directly or by a charge against the property, inures to the
benefit of the beneficiary.
(3) If payment of a portion of an estate tax is deferred because of
the inclusion in the gross estate of a particular interest in property,
the benefit of the deferral inures ratably to the persons to which the
estate tax attributable to the interest is apportioned. The burden of
any interest charges incurred on a deferral of taxes and the benefit of
any tax deduction associated with the accrual or payment of the
interest charge is allocated ratably among the persons receiving an
interest in the property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 INSULATED PROPERTY--ADVANCEMENT OF TAX. (1)
As used in this section:
(a) "Advanced fraction" means a fraction that has as its numerator
the amount of the advanced tax and as its denominator the value of the
interests in insulated property to which that tax is attributable.
(b) "Advanced tax" means the aggregate amount of estate tax
attributable to interests in insulated property which is required to be
advanced by uninsulated holders under subsection (3) of this section.
(c) "Insulated property" means property subject to a time-limited
interest which is included in the apportionable estate and is
unavailable for payment of an estate tax because of impossibility or
impracticability. Insulated property does not include property from
which the beneficial holder has the unilateral right to cause
distribution to himself or herself.
(d) "Uninsulated holder" means a person who has an interest in
uninsulated property.
(e) "Uninsulated property" means property included in the
apportionable estate other than insulated property.
(2) If an estate tax is to be advanced pursuant to subsection (3)
of this section by persons holding interests in uninsulated property
subject to a time-limited interest other than property to which section
7 of this act applies, the tax must be advanced, without further
apportionment, from the principal of the uninsulated property.
(3) Subject to section 9 (2) and (4) of this act, an estate tax
attributable to interests in insulated property must be advanced
ratably by uninsulated holders.
(4) A court having jurisdiction to determine the apportionment of
an estate tax may require a beneficiary of an interest in insulated
property to pay all or part of the estate tax otherwise apportioned to
the interest if the court finds that it would be substantially more
equitable for that beneficiary to bear the tax liability personally
than for that part of the tax to be advanced by uninsulated holders.
(5) Upon payment by an uninsulated holder of estate tax required to
be advanced, a court may require the beneficiary of an interest in
insulated property to provide a bond or other security, including a
recordable lien on the property of the beneficiary, for repayment of
the advanced tax.
(6) When a distribution of insulated property is made, each
uninsulated holder may recover from the distributee a ratable portion
of the advanced fraction of the property distributed. To the extent
that undistributed insulated property ceases to be insulated, each
uninsulated holder may recover from the property a ratable portion of
the advanced fraction of the total undistributed property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 APPORTIONMENT AND RECAPTURE OF SPECIAL
ELECTIVE BENEFITS. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Special elective benefit" means a reduction in an estate tax
obtained by an election for:
(i) A reduced valuation of specified property that is included in
the gross estate;
(ii) A deduction from the gross estate, other than a marital or
charitable deduction, allowed for specified property; or
(iii) An exclusion from the gross estate of specified property.
(b) "Specified property" means property for which an election has
been made for a special elective benefit.
(2) If an election is made for one or more special elective
benefits, an initial apportionment of a hypothetical estate tax must be
computed as if no election for any of those benefits had been made.
The aggregate reduction in estate tax resulting from all elections made
must be allocated among holders of interests in the specified property
in the proportion that the amount of deduction, reduced valuation, or
exclusion attributable to each holder's interest bears to the aggregate
amount of deductions, reduced valuations, and exclusions obtained by
the decedent's estate from the elections. If the estate tax initially
apportioned to the holder of an interest in specified property is
reduced to zero, any excess amount of reduction reduces ratably the
estate tax apportioned to other persons that receive interests in the
apportionable estate.
(3) An additional estate tax imposed to recapture all or part of a
special elective benefit must be charged to the persons that are liable
for the additional tax under the law providing for the recapture.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 SECURING PAYMENT OF ESTATE TAX FROM PROPERTY
IN POSSESSION OF FIDUCIARY. (1) A fiduciary may defer a distribution
of property until the fiduciary is satisfied that adequate provision
for payment of the estate tax has been made.
(2) A fiduciary may withhold from a distributee the estate tax
apportioned to and the estate tax required to be advanced by the
distributee.
(3) As a condition to a distribution, a fiduciary may require the
distributee to provide a bond or other security for the estate tax
apportioned to and the estate tax required to be advanced by the
distributee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 COLLECTION OF ESTATE TAX BY FIDUCIARY. (1)
A fiduciary responsible for payment of an estate tax may collect from
any person the estate tax apportioned to and the estate tax required to
be advanced by the person.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in section 6 of this act, any
estate tax due from a person that cannot be collected from the person
may be collected by the fiduciary from other persons in the following
order of priority:
(a) Any person having an interest in the apportionable estate which
is not exonerated from the tax;
(b) Any other person having an interest in the apportionable
estate;
(c) Any person having an interest in the gross estate.
(3) A domiciliary fiduciary may recover from an ancillary personal
representative the estate tax apportioned to the property controlled by
the ancillary personal representative.
(4) The total tax collected from a person pursuant to this chapter
may not exceed the value of the person's interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 RIGHT OF REIMBURSEMENT. (1) A person
required under section 9 of this act to pay an estate tax greater than
the amount due from the person under section 3 or 4 of this act has a
right to reimbursement from another person to the extent that the other
person has not paid the tax required by section 3 or 4 of this act and
a right to reimbursement ratably from other persons to the extent that
each has not contributed a portion of the amount collected under
section 9(2) of this act.
(2) A fiduciary may enforce the right of reimbursement under
subsection (1) of this section on behalf of the person that is entitled
to the reimbursement and shall take reasonable steps to do so if
requested by the person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 ACTION TO DETERMINE OR ENFORCE CHAPTER--APPLICATION OF CHAPTER 11.96A RCW. Chapter 11.96A RCW applies to
issues, questions, or disputes that arise under or that relate to this
chapter. Any and all such issues, questions, or disputes may be
resolved judicially or nonjudicially under chapter 11.96A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 UNIFORMITY OF APPLICATION AND CONSTRUCTION.
In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be
given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its
subject matter among states that enact it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 APPLICATION DATE. (1) This act takes
effect for estate tax due on account of decedents who die on or after
January 1, 2006.
(2) Sections 2 through 7 of this act do not apply to a decedent who
dies after December 31, 2005, if the decedent continuously lacked
testamentary capacity from January 1, 2006, until the date of death.
For such a decedent, estate tax must be apportioned pursuant to the law
in effect immediately before the effective date of this act.

Sec. 15 RCW 83.100.020 and 2001 c 320 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Decedent" means a deceased individual;
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue, the director of
that department, or any employee of the department exercising authority
lawfully delegated to him by the director;
(3) "Federal credit" means (a) for a transfer, the maximum amount
of the credit for state taxes allowed by section 2011 of the Internal
Revenue Code; and (b) for a generation-skipping transfer, the maximum
amount of the credit for state taxes allowed by section 2604 of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(4) "Federal return" means any tax return required by chapter 11 or
13 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(5) "Federal tax" means (a) for a transfer, a tax under chapter 11
of the Internal Revenue Code; and (b) for a generation-skipping
transfer, the tax under chapter 13 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(6) "Generation-skipping transfer" means a "generation-skipping
transfer" as defined and used in section 2611 of the Internal Revenue
Code;
(7) "Gross estate" means "gross estate" as defined and used in
section 2031 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(8) "Nonresident" means a decedent who was domiciled outside
Washington at his death;
(9) "Person" means any individual, estate, trust, receiver,
cooperative association, club, corporation, company, firm, partnership,
joint venture, syndicate, or other entity and, to the extent permitted
by law, any federal, state, or other governmental unit or subdivision
or agency, department, or instrumentality thereof;
(10) "Person required to file the federal return" means any person
required to file a return required by chapter 11 or 13 of the Internal
Revenue Code, such as the personal representative of an estate; or a
transferor, trustee, or beneficiary of a generation-skipping transfer;
or a qualified heir with respect to qualified real property, as defined
and used in section 2032A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(11) "Property" means (a) for a transfer, property included in the
gross estate; and (b) for a generation-skipping transfer, all real and
personal property subject to the federal tax;
(12) "Resident" means a decedent who was domiciled in Washington at
time of death;
(13) "Transfer" means "transfer" as used in section 2001 of the
Internal Revenue Code, or a disposition or cessation of qualified use
as defined and used in section 2032A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(14) "Trust" means "trust" under Washington law and any arrangement
described in section 2652 of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(15) "Internal Revenue Code" means((, for the purposes of this
chapter and RCW 83.110.010,)) the United States Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, ((2001)) 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 83.110.010 (Definitions) and 2000 c 129 s 1, 1998 c 292 s
402, 1994 c 221 s 71, 1993 c 73 s 10, 1989 c 40 s 1, & 1986 c 63 s 1;
(2) RCW 83.110.020 (Apportionment of tax) and 2000 c 129 s 2, 1989
c 40 s 2, & 1986 c 63 s 2;
(3) RCW 83.110.030 (Apportionment procedure) and 2000 c 129 s 3,
1990 c 180 s 6, 1989 c 40 s 3, & 1986 c 63 s 3;
(4) RCW 83.110.040 (Collection of tax from persons interested in
the estate -- Security) and 1986 c 63 s 4;
(5) RCW 83.110.050 (Allowance for exemptions, deductions, and
credits) and 2000 c 129 s 4, 1993 c 73 s 11, 1989 c 40 s 4, & 1986 c 63
s 5;
(6) RCW 83.110.060 (Apportionment between temporary and remainder
interests) and 2000 c 129 s 5, 1989 c 40 s 5, & 1986 c 63 s 6;
(7) RCW 83.110.070 (Time for recovery of tax from persons
interested in the estate -- Exoneration of fiduciary -- Recovery of
uncollectible taxes) and 1986 c 63 s 7;
(8) RCW 83.110.080 (Action by nonresident -- Reciprocity) and 1986 c
63 s 8;
(9) RCW 83.110.090 (Coordination with federal law) and 2000 c 129
s 6, 1989 c 40 s 6, & 1986 c 63 s 9;
(10) RCW 83.110.900 (Construction) and 1986 c 63 s 10;
(11) RCW 83.110.901 (Short title) and 1986 c 63 s 11;
(12) RCW 83.110.902 (Captions) and 1986 c 63 s 13;
(13) RCW 83.110.903 (Application) and 1988 c 64 s 26 & 1986 c 63 s
14; and
(14) RCW 83.110.904 (Severability -- 1986 c 63) and 1986 c 63 s 12.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
chapter are not part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) This act takes effect January 1, 2006,
except for section 15 of this act.
(2) Section 15 of this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The repealed sections of law in section 16
of this act shall not be construed as affecting any existing right,
liability, or obligation incurred, under the repealed sections or under
any rule or order adopted under those sections, nor as affecting any
proceeding instituted under those sections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Sections 1 through 14 and 17 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 83 RCW.

--- END ---