BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.02.030 and 2004 c 166 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A patient may authorize a health care provider or health care
facility to disclose the patient's health care information. A health
care provider or health care facility shall honor an authorization and,
if requested, provide a copy of the recorded health care information
unless the health care provider or health care facility denies the
patient access to health care information under RCW 70.02.090.
(2) A health care provider or health care facility may charge a
reasonable fee for providing the health care information and is not
required to honor an authorization until the fee is paid.
(3) To be valid, a disclosure authorization to a health care
provider or health care facility shall:
(a) Be in writing, dated, and signed by the patient;
(b) Identify the nature of the information to be disclosed;
(c) Identify the name, address, and institutional affiliation of
the person or class of persons to whom the information is to be
disclosed;
(d) ((Except for third-party payors,)) Identify the provider or
class of providers who ((is)) are to make the disclosure; ((and))
(e) Identify the patient; and
(f) Contain an expiration date or an expiration event that relates
to the patient or the purpose of the use or disclosure.
(4) Except as provided by this chapter, the signing of an
authorization by a patient is not a waiver of any rights a patient has
under other statutes, the rules of evidence, or common law.
(5) A health care provider or health care facility shall retain the
original or a copy of each authorization or revocation in conjunction
with any health care information from which disclosures are made.
((This requirement shall not apply to disclosures to third-party
payors.))
(6) ((Except for authorizations given pursuant to an agreement with
a treatment or monitoring program or disciplinary authority under
chapter 18.71 or 18.130 RCW, when the patient is under the supervision
of the department of corrections, or to provide information to third-party payors, an authorization may not permit the release of health
care information relating to future health care that the patient
receives more than ninety days after the authorization was signed.
Patients shall be advised of the period of validity of their
authorization on the disclosure authorization form. If the
authorization does not contain an expiration date and the patient is
not under the supervision of the department of corrections, it expires
ninety days after it is signed.
(7))) Where the patient is under the supervision of the department
of corrections, an authorization signed pursuant to this section for
health care information related to mental health or drug or alcohol
treatment expires at the end of the term of supervision, unless the
patient is part of a treatment program that requires the continued
exchange of information until the end of the period of treatment.

--- END ---