BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.02.005 and 2001 c 320 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When used in this title, unless otherwise required from the
context:
(1) "Personal representative" includes executor, administrator,
special administrator, and guardian or limited guardian and special
representative.
(2) "Net estate" refers to the real and personal property of a
decedent exclusive of homestead rights, exempt property, the family
allowance and enforceable claims against, and debts of, the deceased or
the estate.
(3) "Representation" refers to a method of determining distribution
in which the takers are in unequal degrees of kinship with respect to
the intestate, and is accomplished as follows: After first determining
who, of those entitled to share in the estate, are in the nearest
degree of kinship, the estate is divided into equal shares, the number
of shares being the sum of the number of persons who survive the
intestate who are in the nearest degree of kinship and the number of
persons in the same degree of kinship who died before the intestate but
who left issue surviving the intestate; each share of a deceased person
in the nearest degree shall be divided among those of the deceased
person's issue who survive the intestate and have no ancestor then
living who is in the line of relationship between them and the
intestate, those more remote in degree taking together the share which
their ancestor would have taken had he or she survived the intestate.
Posthumous children are considered as living at the death of their
parent.
(4) "Issue" ((includes)) means all the ((lawful)) lineal
descendants of ((the ancestor and all lawfully adopted children)) an
individual. An adopted individual is a lineal descendant of each of
his or her adoptive parents and of all individuals with regard to which
each adoptive parent is a lineal descendant.
(5) "Degree of kinship" means the degree of kinship as computed
according to the rules of the civil law; that is, by counting upward
from the intestate to the nearest common ancestor and then downward to
the relative, the degree of kinship being the sum of these two counts.
(6) "Heirs" denotes those persons, including the surviving spouse,
who are entitled under the statutes of intestate succession to the real
and personal property of a decedent on the decedent's death intestate.
(7) "Real estate" includes, except as otherwise specifically
provided herein, all lands, tenements, and hereditaments, and all
rights thereto, and all interest therein possessed and claimed in fee
simple, or for the life of a third person.
(8) "Will" means an instrument validly executed as required by RCW
11.12.020.
(9) "Codicil" means a will that modifies or partially revokes an
existing earlier will. A codicil need not refer to or be attached to
the earlier will.
(10) "Guardian" or "limited guardian" means a personal
representative of the person or estate of an incompetent or disabled
person as defined in RCW 11.88.010 and the term may be used in lieu of
"personal representative" wherever required by context.
(11) "Administrator" means a personal representative of the estate
of a decedent and the term may be used in lieu of "personal
representative" wherever required by context.
(12) "Executor" means a personal representative of the estate of a
decedent appointed by will and the term may be used in lieu of
"personal representative" wherever required by context.
(13) "Special administrator" means a personal representative of the
estate of a decedent appointed for limited purposes and the term may be
used in lieu of "personal representative" wherever required by context.
(14) "Trustee" means an original, added, or successor trustee and
includes the state, or any agency thereof, when it is acting as the
trustee of a trust to which chapter 11.98 RCW applies.
(15) "Nonprobate asset" means those rights and interests of a
person having beneficial ownership of an asset that pass on the
person's death under a written instrument or arrangement other than the
person's will. "Nonprobate asset" includes, but is not limited to, a
right or interest passing under a joint tenancy with right of
survivorship, joint bank account with right of survivorship, payable on
death or trust bank account, transfer on death security or security
account, deed or conveyance if possession has been postponed until the
death of the person, trust of which the person is grantor and that
becomes effective or irrevocable only upon the person's death,
community property agreement, individual retirement account or bond, or
note or other contract the payment or performance of which is affected
by the death of the person. "Nonprobate asset" does not include: A
payable-on-death provision of a life insurance policy, annuity, or
other similar contract, or of an employee benefit plan; a right or
interest passing by descent and distribution under chapter 11.04 RCW;
a right or interest if, before death, the person has irrevocably
transferred the right or interest, the person has waived the power to
transfer it or, in the case of contractual arrangement, the person has
waived the unilateral right to rescind or modify the arrangement; or a
right or interest held by the person solely in a fiduciary capacity.
For the definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to revocation of a
provision for a former spouse upon dissolution of marriage or
declaration of invalidity of marriage, RCW 11.07.010(5) applies. For
the definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to revocation of a
provision for a former spouse upon dissolution of marriage or
declaration of invalidity of marriage, see RCW 11.07.010(5). For the
definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to testamentary disposition
of nonprobate assets, see RCW 11.11.010(7).
(16) "Internal Revenue Code" means the United States Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2001.
(17) References to "section 2033A" of the Internal Revenue Code in
wills, trust agreements, powers of appointment, beneficiary
designations, and other instruments governed by or subject to this
title shall be deemed to refer to the comparable or corresponding
provisions of section 2057 of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by
section 6006(b) of the Internal Revenue Service Restructuring Act of
1998 (H.R. 2676, P.L. 105-206); and references to the section 2033A
"exclusion" shall be deemed to mean the section 2057 deduction.
Words that import the singular number may also be applied to the
plural of persons and things.
Words importing the masculine gender only may be extended to
females also.

Sec. 2 RCW 11.12.110 and 1994 c 221 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless otherwise provided, when any property shall be given under
a will, or under a trust of which the decedent is a grantor and which
by its terms becomes irrevocable upon or before the grantor's death, to
any issue of a grandparent of the decedent and that issue dies before
the decedent, or dies before that issue's interest is no longer subject
to a contingency, leaving descendants who survive the decedent, those
descendants shall take that property as the predeceased issue would
have done if the predeceased issue had survived the decedent. If those
descendants are all in the same degree of kinship to the predeceased
issue they shall take equally or, if of unequal degree, then those of
more remote degree shall take by representation with respect to the
predeceased issue.

Sec. 3 RCW 11.28.170 and 1965 c 145 s 11.28.170 are each amended
to read as follows:
Before letters testamentary or of administration are issued, each
personal representative or an officer of a bank or trust company
qualified to act as a personal representative, must take and subscribe
an oath, before some person authorized to administer oaths, that the
duties of the trust as personal representative will be performed
according to law, which oath must be filed in the cause ((and
recorded)).

Sec. 4 RCW 11.40.020 and 1999 c 42 s 601 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a personal
representative may give notice to the creditors of the decedent, ((as
directed)) in substantially the form set forth in RCW 11.40.030,
announcing the personal representative's appointment and requiring that
persons having claims against the decedent present their claims within
the time specified in RCW 11.40.051 or be forever barred as to claims
against the decedent's probate and nonprobate assets. If notice is
given:
(a) The personal representative shall ((first)) file the ((original
of the)) notice with the court;
(b) The personal representative shall ((then)) cause the notice to
be published once each week for three successive weeks in a legal
newspaper in the county in which the estate is being administered((,
and if the decedent was a Washington resident, in the county of the
decedent's residence at the time of death, if different));
(c) The personal representative may, at any time during the probate
proceeding, give actual notice to creditors who become known to the
personal representative by serving the notice on the creditor or
mailing the notice to the creditor at the creditor's last known
address, by regular first class mail, postage prepaid; and
(d) The personal representative shall also mail a copy of the
notice, including the decedent's social security number, to the state
of Washington department of social and health services office of
financial recovery.
The personal representative shall file with the court proof by
affidavit of the giving and publication of the notice.
(2) If the decedent was a resident of the state of Washington at
the time of death and probate proceedings are commenced in a county
other than the county of the decedent's residence, then instead of the
requirements under subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section, the
personal representative shall cause the notice to creditors in
substantially the form set forth in RCW 11.40.030 to be published once
each week for three successive weeks in a legal newspaper in the county
of the decedent's residence and shall file the notice ((to the
creditors of the decedent as directed in RCW 11.40.030 must be filed))
with the superior court of the county ((of the decedent's residence))
in which the probate proceedings were commenced.

Sec. 5 RCW 11.40.030 and 1997 c 252 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notice under RCW 11.40.020 must contain the following elements in
substantially the following form:

The personal representative named below has been appointed as
personal representative of this estate. Any person having a claim
against the decedent must, before the time the claim would be barred by
any otherwise applicable statute of limitations, present the claim in
the manner as provided in RCW 11.40.070 by serving on or mailing to the
personal representative or the personal representative's attorney at
the address stated below a copy of the claim and filing the original of
the claim with the court in which the probate proceedings were
commenced. The claim must be presented within the later of: (1)
Thirty days after the personal representative served or mailed the
notice to the creditor as provided under RCW 11.40.020(((3))) (1)(c);
or (2) four months after the date of first publication of the notice.
If the claim is not presented within this time frame, the claim is
forever barred, except as otherwise provided in RCW 11.40.051 and
11.40.060. This bar is effective as to claims against both the
decedent's probate and nonprobate assets.

Date of First
Publication:

Personal Representative:

Attorney for the Personal Representative:
Address for Mailing or Service:
Court of probate proceedings and cause number:

Sec. 6 RCW 11.40.051 and 1997 c 252 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whether or not notice is provided under RCW 11.40.020, a person
having a claim against the decedent is forever barred from making a
claim or commencing an action against the decedent, if the claim or
action is not already barred by an otherwise applicable statute of
limitations, unless the creditor presents the claim in the manner
provided in RCW 11.40.070 within the following time limitations:
(a) If the personal representative provided notice under RCW
11.40.020 (((1) and (2))) and the creditor was given actual notice as
provided in RCW 11.40.020(((3))) (1)(c), the creditor must present the
claim within the later of: (i) Thirty days after the personal
representative's service or mailing of notice to the creditor; and (ii)
four months after the date of first publication of the notice;
(b) If the personal representative provided notice under RCW
11.40.020 (((1) and (2))) and the creditor was not given actual notice
as provided in RCW 11.40.020(((3))) (1)(c):
(i) If the creditor was not reasonably ascertainable, as defined in
RCW 11.40.040, the creditor must present the claim within four months
after the date of first publication of notice;
(ii) If the creditor was reasonably ascertainable, as defined in
RCW 11.40.040, the creditor must present the claim within twenty-four
months after the decedent's date of death; and
(c) If notice was not provided under this chapter or chapter 11.42
RCW, the creditor must present the claim within twenty-four months
after the decedent's date of death.
(2) An otherwise applicable statute of limitations applies without
regard to the tolling provisions of RCW 4.16.190.
(3) This bar is effective as to claims against both the decedent's
probate and nonprobate assets.

Sec. 7 RCW 11.40.070 and 1997 c 252 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The claimant, the claimant's attorney, or the claimant's agent
shall sign the claim and include in the claim the following
information:
(a) The name and address of the claimant;
(b) The name, address, if different from that of the claimant, and
nature of authority of an agent signing the claim on behalf of the
claimant;
(c) A statement of the facts or circumstances constituting the
basis of the claim;
(d) The amount of the claim; and
(e) If the claim is secured, unliquidated, contingent, or not yet
due, the nature of the security, the nature of the uncertainty, or the
date when it will become due.
Failure to describe correctly the information in (c), (d), or (e)
of this subsection, if the failure is not substantially misleading,
does not invalidate the claim.
(2) A claim does not need to be supported by affidavit.
(3) A claim must be presented within the time limits set forth in
RCW 11.40.051 by: (a) Serving on or mailing to, by regular first class
mail, the personal representative or the personal representative's
attorney a copy of the signed claim; and (b) filing the original of the
signed claim with the court in which probate proceedings were
commenced. A claim is deemed presented upon the later of the date of
postmark or service on the personal representative, or the personal
representative's attorney, and filing with the court.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if a
claimant makes a written demand for payment within the time limits set
forth in RCW 11.40.051, the personal representative may waive formal
defects and elect to treat the demand as a claim properly filed under
this chapter if: (a) The claim was due; (b) the amount paid is the
amount of indebtedness over and above all payments and offsets; (c) the
estate is solvent; and (d) the payment is made in good faith. Nothing
in this chapter limits application of the doctrines of waiver,
estoppel, or detrimental claims or any other equitable principle.

Sec. 8 RCW 11.42.020 and 1997 c 252 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The)) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a notice
agent may give nonprobate notice to the creditors of the decedent if:
(a) As of the date of the filing of the notice to creditors with
the court, the notice agent has no knowledge of another person acting
as notice agent or of the appointment of a personal representative in
the decedent's estate in the state of Washington; and
(b) According to the records of the court as are available on the
date of the filing of the notice to creditors, no cause number
regarding the decedent has been issued to any other notice agent and no
personal representative of the decedent's estate had been appointed.
(2) The notice agent must give notice to the creditors of the
decedent, ((as directed)) in substantially the form set forth in RCW
11.42.030, announcing that the notice agent has elected to give
nonprobate notice to creditors and requiring that persons having claims
against the decedent present their claims within the time specified in
RCW 11.42.050 or be forever barred as to claims against the decedent's
probate and nonprobate assets.
(a) The notice agent shall ((first)) file the ((original of the))
notice with the court.
(b) The notice agent shall ((then)) cause the notice to be
published once each week for three successive weeks in a legal
newspaper in the notice county.
(c) The notice agent may at any time give actual notice to
creditors who become known to the notice agent by serving the notice on
the creditor or mailing the notice to the creditor at the creditor's
last known address, by regular first class mail, postage prepaid.
(d) The notice agent shall also mail a copy of the notice,
including the decedent's social security number, to the state of
Washington department of social and health services' office of
financial recovery.
(e) If the decedent was a resident of the state of Washington at
the time of death and the notice agent's declaration and oath were
filed in a county other than the county of the decedent's residence,
then instead of the requirements in (a) and (b) of this subsection, the
notice agent shall cause the notice to creditors in substantially the
form set forth in RCW 11.42.030 to be published once each week for
three successive weeks in a legal newspaper in the county of the
decedent's residence and shall file the notice with the superior court
of the county in which the notice agent's declaration and oath were
filed.
The notice agent shall file with the court proof by affidavit of
the giving and publication of the notice.

Sec. 9 RCW 11.42.030 and 1997 c 252 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notice under RCW 11.42.020 must contain the following elements in
substantially the following form:

The notice agent named below has elected to give notice to
creditors of the above-named decedent. As of the date of the filing of
a copy of this notice with the court, the notice agent has no knowledge
of any other person acting as notice agent or of the appointment of a
personal representative of the decedent's estate in the state of
Washington. According to the records of the court as are available on
the date of the filing of this notice with the court, a cause number
regarding the decedent has not been issued to any other notice agent
and a personal representative of the decedent's estate has not been
appointed.
Any person having a claim against the decedent must, before the
time the claim would be barred by any otherwise applicable statute of
limitations, present the claim in the manner as provided in RCW
11.42.070 by serving on or mailing to the notice agent or the notice
agent's attorney at the address stated below a copy of the claim and
filing the original of the claim with the court in which the notice
agent's declaration and oath were filed. The claim must be presented
within the later of: (1) Thirty days after the notice agent served or
mailed the notice to the creditor as provided under RCW
11.42.020(2)(c); or (2) four months after the date of first publication
of the notice. If the claim is not presented within this time frame,
the claim is forever barred, except as otherwise provided in RCW
11.42.050 and 11.42.060. This bar is effective as to claims against
both the decedent's probate and nonprobate assets.

Date of First
Publication:

The notice agent declares under penalty of perjury under the laws
of the state of Washington on , [year] , at
[city] , [state] that the foregoing is true and
correct.

Notice Agent:

Attorney for the Notice Agent:
Address for Mailing or Service:
Court of Notice Agent's oath and declaration and cause number:

Sec. 10 RCW 11.42.070 and 1997 c 252 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The claimant, the claimant's attorney, or the claimant's agent
shall sign the claim and include in the claim the following
information:
(a) The name and address of the claimant;
(b) The name, address, if different from that of the claimant, and
nature of authority of an agent signing the claim on behalf of the
claimant;
(c) A statement of the facts or circumstances constituting the
basis of the claim;
(d) The amount of the claim; and
(e) If the claim is secured, unliquidated, contingent, or not yet
due, the nature of the security, the nature of the uncertainty, or the
date when it will become due.
Failure to describe correctly the information in (c), (d), or (e)
of this subsection, if the failure is not substantially misleading,
does not invalidate the claim.
(2) A claim does not need to be supported by affidavit.
(3) A claim must be presented within the time limits set forth in
RCW 11.42.050 by: (a) Serving on or mailing to, by regular first class
mail, the notice agent or the notice agent's attorney a copy of the
signed claim; and (b) filing the original of the signed claim with the
court in which the notice agent's declaration and oath were filed. A
claim is deemed presented upon the later of the date of postmark or
service on the notice agent, or the notice agent's attorney, and filing
with the court.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if a
claimant makes a written demand for payment within the time limits set
forth in RCW 11.42.050, the notice agent may waive formal defects and
elect to treat the demand as a claim properly filed under this chapter
if: (a) The claim was due; (b) the amount paid was the amount of
indebtedness over and above all payments and offsets; (c) the estate is
solvent; and (d) the payment is made in good faith. Nothing in this
chapter limits application of the doctrines of waiver, estoppel, or
detrimental claims or any other equitable principle.

Sec. 11 RCW 11.88.080 and 1990 c 122 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
When either parent is deceased, the surviving parent of any minor
child ((may,)) or a sole parent of a minor child, may by last will ((in
writing appoint)) or durable power of attorney nominate a guardian or
guardians of the person, or of the estate or both, of a minor child,
whether born at the time of ((making)) executing the ((will))
instrument or afterwards, to continue during the minority of such child
or for any less time. This nomination shall be effective in the event
of the death or incapacity of such parent. Every ((testamentary))
guardian of the estate of a child shall give bond in like manner and
with like conditions as required by RCW 11.88.100 and 11.88.110, and he
or she shall have the same powers and perform the same duties with
regard to the person and estate of the minor as a guardian appointed
under this chapter. The court shall confirm the parent's
((testamentary appointment)) nomination unless the court finds, based
upon evidence presented at a hearing on the matter, that the individual
((appointed)) nominated in the surviving parent's will or durable power
of attorney is not qualified to serve.

Sec. 12 RCW 11.94.010 and 2003 c 283 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever a principal designates another as his or her attorney
in fact or agent, by a power of attorney in writing, and the writing
contains the words "This power of attorney shall not be affected by
disability of the principal," or "This power of attorney shall become
effective upon the disability of the principal," or similar words
showing the intent of the principal that the authority conferred shall
be exercisable notwithstanding the principal's disability, the
authority of the attorney in fact or agent is exercisable on behalf of
the principal as provided notwithstanding later disability or
incapacity of the principal at law or later uncertainty as to whether
the principal is dead or alive. All acts done by the attorney in fact
or agent pursuant to the power during any period of disability or
incompetence or uncertainty as to whether the principal is dead or
alive have the same effect and inure to the benefit of and bind the
principal or the principal's guardian or heirs, devisees, and personal
representative as if the principal were alive, competent, and not
disabled. A principal may nominate, by a durable power of attorney,
the guardian or limited guardian of his or her estate or person for
consideration by the court if protective proceedings for the
principal's person or estate are thereafter commenced. The court shall
make its appointment in accordance with the principal's most recent
nomination in a durable power of attorney except for good cause or
disqualification. If a guardian thereafter is appointed for the
principal, the attorney in fact or agent, during the continuance of the
appointment, shall account to the guardian rather than the principal.
The guardian has the same power the principal would have had if the
principal were not disabled or incompetent, to revoke, suspend or
terminate all or any part of the power of attorney or agency.
(2) Persons shall place reasonable reliance on any determination of
disability or incompetence as provided in the instrument that specifies
the time and the circumstances under which the power of attorney
document becomes effective.
(3)(a) A principal may authorize his or her attorney-in-fact to
provide informed consent for health care decisions on the principal's
behalf. If a principal has appointed more than one agent with
authority to make mental health treatment decisions in accordance with
a directive under chapter 71.32 RCW, to the extent of any conflict, the
most recently appointed agent shall be treated as the principal's agent
for mental health treatment decisions unless provided otherwise in
either appointment.
(b) Unless he or she is the spouse, or adult child or brother or
sister of the principal, none of the following persons may act as the
attorney-in-fact for the principal: Any of the principal's physicians,
the physicians' employees, or the owners, administrators, or employees
of the health care facility or long-term care facility as defined in
RCW 43.190.020 where the principal resides or receives care. Except
when the principal has consented in a mental health advance directive
executed under chapter 71.32 RCW to inpatient admission or
electroconvulsive therapy, this authorization is subject to the same
limitations as those that apply to a guardian under RCW 11.92.043(5)
(a) through (c).
(4) A parent or guardian, by a properly executed power of attorney,
may authorize an attorney in fact to make health care decisions on
behalf of one or more of his or her children, or children for whom he
or she is the legal guardian, who are under the age of majority as
defined in RCW 26.28.015, to be effective if the child has no other
parent or legal representative readily available and authorized to give
such consent.
(5) A principal may further nominate a guardian or guardians of the
person, or of the estate or both, of a minor child, whether born at the
time of making the durable power of attorney or afterwards, to continue
during the disability of the principal, during the minority of the
child or for any less time by including such a provision in his or her
power of attorney.
(6) The authority of any guardian of the person of any minor child
shall supersede the authority of a designated attorney in fact to make
health care decisions for the minor only after such designated guardian
has been appointed by the court.
(7) In the event a conflict between the provisions of a will
nominating a testamentary guardian under the authority of RCW 11.88.080
and the nomination of a guardian under the authority of this statute,
the most recent designation shall control.

Sec. 13 RCW 11.98.039 and 1999 c 42 s 618 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Where a vacancy occurs in the office of the trustee and there
is a successor trustee who is willing to serve as trustee and (a) is
named in the governing instrument as successor trustee or (b) has been
selected to serve as successor trustee under the procedure established
in the governing instrument for the selection of a successor trustee,
the outgoing trustee, or any other interested party, shall give notice
of such vacancy, whether arising because of the trustee's resignation
or because of any other reason, and of the successor trustee's
agreement to serve as trustee, to ((all adult income beneficiaries of
the trust and to all known and identifiable adults for whom the income
of the trust is being accumulated)) each adult distributee or
permissible distributee of trust income or of trust principal or of
both trust income and trust principal. If there are no such adults, no
notice need be given. The successor trustee named in the governing
instrument or selected pursuant to the procedure therefor established
in the governing instrument shall be entitled to act as trustee except
for good cause or disqualification. The successor trustee shall serve
as of the effective date of the discharge of the predecessor trustee as
provided in RCW 11.98.041.
(2) Where a vacancy exists or occurs in the office of the trustee
and there is no successor trustee who is named in the governing
instrument or who has been selected to serve as successor trustee under
the procedure established in the governing instrument for the selection
of a successor trustee, and who is willing to serve as trustee, ((the
beneficiaries and the then-acting trustee, if any, of a)) then all
parties with an interest in the trust may agree to a nonjudicial change
of the trustee under RCW 11.96A.220. ((The trustee, or any beneficiary
if there is no then-acting trustee, shall give written notice of the
proposed change in trustee to every beneficiary or special
representative, and to the trustor if alive. The notice shall: (a)
State the name and mailing address of the trustee or the beneficiary
giving the notice; (b) include a copy of the governing instrument; (c)
state the name and mailing address of the successor trustee; and (d)
include a copy of the proposed successor trustee's agreement to serve
as trustee. The notice shall advise the recipient of the right to
petition for a judicial appointment or change in trustee as provided in
subsection (3) of this section. The notice shall include a form on
which consent or objection to the proposed change in trustee may be
indicated.)) The successor trustee shall serve as of the effective
date of the discharge of the predecessor trustee as provided in RCW
11.98.041 or, in circumstances where there is no predecessor trustee,
as of the effective date of the trustee's appointment.
(3) When there is a desire to name one or more co-trustees to serve
with the existing trustee, then all parties with an interest in the
trust may agree to the nonjudicial addition of one or more co-trustees
under RCW 11.96A.220. The additional co-trustee shall serve as of the
effective date of the co-trustee's appointment.
(4) Unless subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section applies, any
beneficiary of a trust, the trustor, if alive, or the trustee may
petition the superior court having jurisdiction for the appointment or
change of a trustee or co-trustee under the procedures provided in RCW
11.96A.080 through 11.96A.200: (a) Whenever the office of trustee
becomes vacant; (b) upon filing of a petition of resignation by a
trustee; or (c) ((upon the giving of notice of the change in trustee as
referred to in subsection (1) or (2) of this section; or (d))) for any
other reasonable cause.
(((4))) (5) For purposes of this subsection, the term fiduciary
includes both trustee and personal representative.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in the governing instrument, a
successor fiduciary, absent actual knowledge of a breach of fiduciary
duty: (i) Is not liable for any act or omission of a predecessor
fiduciary and is not obligated to inquire into the validity or
propriety of any such act or omission; (ii) is authorized to accept as
conclusively accurate any accounting or statement of assets tendered to
the successor fiduciary by a predecessor fiduciary; and (iii) is
authorized to receipt only for assets actually delivered and has no
duty to make further inquiry as to undisclosed assets of the trust or
estate.
(b) Nothing in this section relieves a successor fiduciary from
liability for retaining improper investments, nor does this section in
any way bar the successor fiduciary, trust beneficiaries, or other
party in interest from bringing an action against a predecessor
fiduciary arising out of the acts or omissions of the predecessor
fiduciary, nor does it relieve the successor fiduciary of liability for
its own acts or omissions except as specifically stated or authorized
in this section.

Sec. 14 RCW 21.35.005 and 2003 c 118 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Beneficiary form" means a registration of a security that
indicates the present owner of the security and the intention of the
owner regarding the person who will become the owner of the security
upon the death of the owner, referred to as a "beneficiary."
(2) "Devisee" means any person designated in a will to receive a
disposition of real or personal property.
(3) "Heirs" means those persons, including the surviving spouse,
who are entitled under the statutes of intestate succession to the
property of a decedent.
(4) "Person" means an individual, a corporation, an organization,
or other legal entity.
(5) "Personal representative" includes executor, administrator,
successor personal representative, special administrator, and persons
who perform substantially the same function under the law governing
their status.
(6) "Property" includes both real and personal property or any
interest therein and means anything that may be the subject of
ownership.
(7) "Register," including its derivatives, means to issue a
certificate showing the ownership of a certificated security or, in the
case of an uncertificated security, to initiate or transfer an account
showing ownership of securities.
(8) "Registering entity" means a person who originates or transfers
a security title by registration, and includes a broker maintaining
security accounts for customers and a transfer agent or other person
acting for or as an issuer of securities.
(9) "Security" means a share, participation, or other interest in
property, in a business, or in an obligation of an enterprise or other
issuer, and includes a certificated security, an uncertificated
security, and a security account.
(10) "Security account" means (a) a reinvestment account associated
with a security; a securities account with a broker; a cash balance in
a brokerage account; or cash, cash equivalents, interest, earnings, or
dividends earned or declared on a security in an account, a
reinvestment account, or a brokerage account, whether or not credited
to the account before the owner's death; (b) an agency account
including, without limitation, an investment management account,
investment advisory account, or custody account, with a trust company
or a trust division of a bank with trust powers, including the
securities in the account; a cash balance in the account; and cash,
cash equivalents, interest, earnings, or dividends earned or declared
on a security in the account, whether or not credited to the account
before the owner's death; or (c) a cash balance or other property held
for or due to the owner of a security as a replacement for or product
of an account security, whether or not credited to the account before
the owner's death.
(11) "State" includes any state of the United States, the District
of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and any territory or
possession subject to the legislative authority of the United States.

Sec. 15 RCW 22.28.030 and 1923 c 186 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever any safe deposit company shall let or lease any vault,
safe, box or other receptacle for the keeping or storage of personal
property such safe deposit company shall be bound to exercise due care
to prevent the opening of such vault, safe, box or receptacle by any
person other than the lessee thereof, or his or her duly authorized
agent, and ((said)) the parties may provide in writing the terms,
conditions, and liabilities in ((said)) the lease. Authorized agent as
used in this section includes, but is not limited to, a duly appointed
personal representative, an attorney in fact, a special representative,
or a trustee acting under a revocable living trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 RCW 11.04.270 (Limitation of liability for
debts) and 1965 c 145 s 11.04.270 are each repealed.

--- END ---