BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.06B.020 and 1998 c 173 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The agency council on coordinated transportation is created.
The council is composed of ((nine)) eleven voting members and eight
nonvoting, legislative members.
(2) The ((nine)) eleven voting members are the superintendent of
public instruction or a designee, the secretary of transportation or a
designee, the secretary of the department of social and health services
or a designee, a designee of the Washington utilities and
transportation commission, and ((six)) seven members appointed by the
governor as follows:
(a) One representative from the office of the governor;
(b) Two persons who are consumers of special needs transportation
services;
(c) One representative from the Washington association of pupil
transportation;
(d) One representative from the statewide metropolitan planning
organizations and regional transportation planning organizations
coordinating committee;
(e) One representative from the Washington state transit
association; and
(((e))) (f) One of the following:
(i) A representative from the community transportation association
of the Northwest; or
(ii) A representative from the community action council
association.
(3) The eight nonvoting members are legislators as follows:
(a) Four members from the house of representatives, two from each
of the two largest caucuses, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, two who are members of the house transportation policy
and budget committee and two who are members of the house
appropriations committee; and
(b) Four members from the senate, two from each of the two largest
caucuses, appointed by the president of the senate, two members of the
transportation committee and two members of the ways and means
committee.
(4) Gubernatorial appointees of the council will serve two-year
terms. Members may not receive compensation for their service on the
council, but will be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses
incurred in performing their duties as members as set forth in RCW
43.03.220.
(5) The secretary of transportation or a designee shall serve as
the chair.
(6) The department of transportation shall provide necessary staff
support for the council.
(7) The council may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from
public or private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the council and
spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income from the public or private
sources according to their terms, unless the receipt of the gifts,
grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17.710.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.06B.901 and 1999 c 385 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2008:
(1) RCW 47.06B.010 and 1999 c 385 s 1 & 1998 c 173 s 1;
(2) RCW 47.06B.012 and 1999 c 385 s 2;
(3) RCW 47.06B.015 and 1999 c 385 s 3;
(4) RCW 47.06B.020 and ((1999 c 385 s 4)) 2005 c ... s 1 (section
1 of this act) & 1998 c 173 s 2;
(5) RCW 47.06B.030 and 1999 c 385 s 5 & 1998 c 173 s 3; and
(6) RCW 47.06B.040 and 1999 c 385 s 6.

--- END ---