BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.36.035 and 1998 c 176 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax imposed by this chapter shall be computed by
multiplying the tax rate per gallon provided in this chapter by the
number of gallons of motor vehicle fuel subject to the motor vehicle
fuel tax.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, tax
reports shall be accompanied by a remittance payable to the state
treasurer covering the tax amount determined to be due for the
reporting period.
(3) If the tax is paid by electronic funds transfer, the tax shall
be paid on or before the ((tenth)) twenty-sixth calendar day of the
month ((that is the second month)) immediately following the reporting
period. ((When the reporting period is May, the tax shall be paid on
the last business day of June)) If the payment due date falls on a
Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday the next business day will be the
payment date.
(4) The tax shall be paid by electronic funds transfer whenever the
amount due is fifty thousand dollars or more.
(5) A motor vehicle fuel distributor shall remit tax on motor
vehicle fuel purchased from a motor vehicle fuel supplier, and due to
the state for that reporting period, to the motor vehicle fuel
supplier.
(6) At the election of the distributor, the payment of the motor
vehicle fuel tax owed on motor vehicle fuel purchased from a supplier
shall be remitted to the supplier on terms agreed upon between the
distributor and supplier or no later than ((two business days before
the last business)) seven business days before the twenty-sixth day of
the following month. This election shall be subject to a condition
that the distributor's remittances of all amounts of motor vehicle fuel
tax due to the supplier shall be paid by electronic funds transfer.
The distributor's election may be terminated by the supplier if the
distributor does not make timely payments to the supplier as required
by this section. This section shall not apply if the distributor is
required by the supplier to pay cash or cash equivalent for motor
vehicle fuel purchases.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.38.160 and 1998 c 176 s 68 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax imposed by this chapter shall be computed by
multiplying the tax rate per gallon provided in this chapter by the
number of gallons of special fuel subject to the special fuel tax.
(2) A special fuel distributor shall remit tax on special fuel
purchased from a special fuel supplier, and due to the state for that
reporting period, to the special fuel supplier.
(3) At the election of the distributor, the payment of the special
fuel tax owed on special fuel purchased from a supplier shall be
remitted to the supplier on terms agreed upon between the distributor
and the supplier or no later than ((two business days before the last
business)) seven business days before the twenty-sixth day of the
following month. This election shall be subject to a condition that
the distributor's remittances of all amounts of special fuel tax due to
the supplier shall be paid by electronic funds transfer. The
distributor's election may be terminated by the supplier if the
distributor does not make timely payments to the supplier as required
by this section. This section shall not apply if the distributor is
required by the supplier to pay cash or cash equivalent for special
fuel purchases.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the tax
return shall be accompanied by a remittance payable to the state
treasurer covering the tax amount determined to be due for the
reporting period.
(5) If the tax is paid by electronic funds transfer, the tax shall
be paid on or before the ((tenth)) twenty-sixth calendar day of the
month ((that is the second month)) immediately following the reporting
period. ((When the reporting period is May, the tax shall be paid on
the last state business day of June)) If the payment due date falls on
a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday the next business day will be the
payment date. If the tax is paid by electronic funds transfer and the
reporting period ends on a day other than the last day of a calendar
month as provided in RCW 82.38.150, the tax shall be paid on or before
the last state business day of the thirty-day period following the end
of the reporting period.
(6) The tax shall be paid by electronic funds transfer whenever the
amount due is fifty thousand dollars or more.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.36.405 (Liability, payment, and report of taxes due
before March 2000 -- Inventory report -- Penalties, interest) and 1998 c
176 s 47; and
(2) RCW 82.38.289 (Liability, payment, and report of taxes due
before March 2000 -- Inventory report -- Penalties, interest) and 1998 c
176 s 82.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---