BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness for
borrowed money that is secured by state transportation bond payment
revenue shall be issued by the state which will cause the aggregate
debt contracted by the state to exceed that amount for which payments
of principal and interest in any fiscal year would require the state to
expend more than twenty-two percent of the arithmetic mean of state
transportation bond revenue, for the three immediately preceding fiscal
years. Upon making this computation, the state treasurer shall follow
the certification and notification process outlined in RCW 39.42.070.
It is the duty of the state finance committee to compute annually the
amount required to pay principal of and interest on outstanding debt.
In making this computation, the state finance committee shall include
all borrowed money represented by bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness which are secured by the full faith and credit of the
state and are required to be paid, directly or indirectly, from state
transportation bond payment revenue and which are incurred by the
state, any department, authority, public corporation or quasi public
corporation of the state, or any other public agency created by the
state but not by counties, cities, towns, school districts, or other
municipal corporations, but shall exclude the following:
(a) Debt authorized after January 1, 2005, pursuant to section 3 of
Article VIII of the Washington state Constitution; and
(b) Indebtedness authorized and incurred after July 1, 2002,
pursuant to statute that requires that the state treasury be
reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and the interest on the
indebtedness, from tolls, fees, or other revenues derived from the
operation of a state transportation facility.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "state transportation bond
payment revenue" means revenue from license fees for motor vehicles and
excise taxes collected by the state on the sale, distribution, or use
of motor vehicle fuel or special fuel that may be used for the payment
of the principal and interest on general obligation bonds that are
exempt from the state debt limit under RCW 39.42.060. State
transportation bond payment revenue shall only include state motor
vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax imposed under RCW 82.36.025(1)
and 82.38.030(1) and distributed under RCW 46.68.090(2) (a), (c), and
(d) and motor vehicle license fees imposed under RCW 46.16.0621,
46.16.070, and chapter 46.87 RCW. State transportation bond payment
revenue does not include state motor vehicle license fees and fuel
taxes that are distributed as tribal reservation refunds or other
refunds, statutory distributions of revenue for the benefit of cities
and counties, or distributions to state accounts whose primary purpose
is the payment of bond debt. On or after the effective date of this
act, the treasurer shall compute state transportation bond payment
revenue for the three fiscal years immediately preceding this date, and
determine the arithmetic mean. This computation shall be performed
each year after the close of the fiscal year.

--- END ---