BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Periodontal disease is a serious public health problem that
poses a potential threat to the health of millions of Americans, three-quarters of whom will experience at least mild periodontal disease
during their lifetime;
(b) Studies have indicated that people with periodontal disease may
be at higher risk of developing heart disease, stroke, uncontrolled
diabetes, and respiratory disease. Women with periodontal disease may
be at a higher risk of delivering premature babies;
(c) Periodontal disease, a bacterial infection, is preventable;
(d) A lack of access to, and coverage for, preventative dental
health and periodontal services threatens the health status of
residents of the state; and
(e) Educating the public and the health care community about the
extent to which the lack of dental insurance coverage for periodontal
services is a barrier to accessing appropriate periodontal care is a
benefit to all the residents of the state.
(2) The office of the insurance commissioner must conduct a study
to:
(a) Determine the level of dental insurance coverage provided for
a range of services known to be effective in preventing and treating
periodontal disease; and
(b) Assess whether the level of dental coverage is adequate to meet
the public need and make appropriate recommendations to the legislature
about strategies for meeting those needs, and the costs and benefits of
implementing these strategies.
(3) In conducting the study required under subsection (2) of this
section, the office of the insurance commissioner must:
(a) Consult with public and private purchasers of health services.
This includes health carriers, health care providers, including but not
limited to dentists and periodontal specialists, and consumers of
dental health services, to facilitate in the design of the study; and
(b) Consider the following questions in assessing the level of
dental insurance coverage for services known to be effective in
preventing and treating periodontal disease:
(i) To what extent is coverage available for the range of services
that are generally recognized as necessary to meet basic oral health
needs?;
(ii) Does the available coverage encourage services that promote
prevention?;
(iii) Do different types of dental insurance plans, whether
indemnity, preferred provider organization, point of service, managed
care, or other types offer different levels of coverage and cost
sharing?;
(iv) If coverage for certain services is not available, to what
extent has a lack of coverage resulted in people not receiving needed
services?;
(v) If coverage for certain services is not available, has the lack
of coverage resulted in unreasonable financial hardship?; and
(vi) To what extent would broader coverage increase the cost of
health care services and premiums for coverage?
(4) The office of the insurance commissioner must submit a report
of its findings to the legislature by December 31, 2005, and the report
must include recommendations required under subsection (2)(b) of this
section.
(5) The office of the insurance commissioner may accept grants,
services, and property from the federal government, foundations,
organizations, medical schools, and other entities as are available for
carrying out the purposes of this act.

--- END ---