BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.44.037 and 1991 c 143 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 46.44.036 and subject to such
rules and regulations governing their operation as may be adopted by
the state department of transportation, operation of the following
combinations is lawful:
(1) A combination consisting of a truck tractor, a semitrailer, and
another semitrailer or a full trailer. In this combination a converter
gear used to convert a semitrailer into a full trailer shall be
considered to be a part of the full trailer and not a separate vehicle.
A converter gear being pulled without load and not used to convert a
semitrailer into a full trailer may be substituted in lieu of a full
trailer or a semitrailer in any lawful combination;
(2) A combination not exceeding seventy-five feet in overall length
consisting of four trucks or truck tractors used in driveaway service
where three of the vehicles are towed by the fourth in triple
saddlemount position;
(3) A combination consisting of a truck tractor carrying a freight
compartment no longer than eight feet, a semitrailer, and another
semitrailer or full trailer that meets the legal length requirement for
a truck and trailer combination set forth in RCW 46.44.030;
(4) A combination consisting of a motor vehicle weighing more than
four thousand pounds unladen, a travel trailer, and a trailer designed
for hauling a boat, snowmobiles, or nonhighway vehicles as defined in
RCW 46.09.020. The vehicles in combination must not exceed sixty-five
feet in length and must have a braking capacity that conforms to RCW
46.37.351 and progressive braking. The trailers must have connecting
devices designed and attached in such a manner to be capable of towing
the gross weight of the trailers in tow. A person operating this
combination must have an endorsement issued by the department, under
rules adopted by the department, permitting operation of this
combination. The department shall permit testing of applicants for
this endorsement by a third party testing program in accordance with
RCW 46.25.060. The department shall charge a fee of twenty-five
dollars for the endorsement.

--- END ---