BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that it is a
public health priority for young people to acquire the knowledge and
skills necessary for healthy development. Sexually transmitted
diseases, HIV infection, and unintended pregnancy do not contribute to
the healthy development of young people in Washington state. Yet,
rates of teen pregnancy, sexually transmitted diseases, and HIV
infection among young people in this state are unacceptably high.
(2) Over twelve thousand girls nineteen years of age and younger
become pregnant in Washington every year. Girls fifteen through
nineteen years of age have the highest chlamydia and the second-highest
gonorrhea infection rates among all age groups in this state. Levels
of chlamydia infection are likely equally high among Washington's teen
boys, who experience a disparity in screening. It is also estimated
that one-half of all new HIV infections in this country now occur among
people aged twenty-five and younger.
(3) Washington's adolescent health issues, like teen pregnancy and
sexually transmitted diseases, must be addressed with comprehensive
prevention efforts. The legislature intends to enhance the healthy
development of young people in Washington state by taking opportunities
to provide them with information needed to help reduce rates of teen
pregnancy, sexually transmitted diseases, and HIV infection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Students receiving health instruction paid for in whole or in
part with public funds may receive health information and disease
prevention instruction.
(2) "Health information and disease prevention instruction" means
medically and scientifically accurate curricula and information related
to sexual activity that:
(a) Is age appropriate;
(b) Encourages communication with parents and other trusted adults;
(c) Is respectful of the needs, attitudes, and perspectives of
individuals and communities;
(d) Encourages young people to develop and apply health-promoting
behaviors including disease prevention and detection and accessing
accurate health information;
(e) Teaches that abstinence from sexual activity is the only sure
way to avoid pregnancy and reduce the risk of sexually transmitted
diseases;
(f) Stresses the value of abstinence while addressing the health
needs of youth who are sexually active;
(g) Provides information about the health benefits and side effects
of contraceptives and barrier methods as a means to prevent pregnancy
and reduce the risk of sexually transmitted diseases and HIV/AIDS;
(h) Provides information about the stages, patterns, and
responsibilities associated with growth and development;
(i) Promotes the development of interpersonal skills including a
sense of dignity and self-worth and the communication, decision-making,
assertiveness, and refusal skills necessary to reduce health risks and
choose healthy behaviors; and
(j) Helps young people develop and maintain healthy, respectful,
and meaningful relationships.
(3) The department of health shall work in consultation with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop
guidelines for health information and disease prevention instruction
under this section.

--- END ---