BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.08.063 and 1998 c 270 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be in the county of Lincoln one judge of the superior
court; in the county of Skagit, ((three)) four judges of the superior
court; in the county of Walla Walla, two judges of the superior court;
in the county of Whitman, one judge of the superior court; in the
county of Yakima, eight judges of the superior court; in the county of
Adams, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Whatcom, three
judges of the superior court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The additional judicial position created by
section 1 of this act in Skagit county shall be effective only if the
county through its legislative authority documents its approval by
January 1, 2007, of the additional position and its agreement that it
will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the
expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by statute.
The additional expenses include, but are not limited to, expenses
incurred for court facilities.

--- END ---