BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.230.195 and 1999 c 373 s 603 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If students' scores on the test or assessments under RCW
((28A.230.190, 28A.230.230, and 28A.630.885)) 28A.655.070 indicate that
students need help in identified areas, the school district shall
evaluate its instructional practices and make appropriate adjustments.
(2) Each school district shall notify the parents of each student
of their child's performance on the test and assessments conducted
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.230.190 (Third grade achievement test) and 1999 c 373
s 201, 1998 c 319 s 202, 1997 c 262 s 5, 1990 c 101 s 6, 1985 c 403 s
1, 1984 c 278 s 8, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 98 s 1;
(2) RCW 28A.230.193 (Sixth grade achievement test) and 1999 c 373
s 301;
(3) RCW 28A.230.230 (Annual assessment of ninth grade students--Inventory for high school and beyond for use by eighth grade students)
and 1999 c 373 s 401 & 1990 c 101 s 2; and
(4) RCW 28A.230.260 (Annual report to the legislature) and 1990 c
101 s 5.

--- END ---