BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of the crime of failing to summon assistance
if:
(a) He or she knows that another person has suffered substantial
bodily harm as a result of a criminal act and is in need of assistance;
(b) He or she could reasonably summon assistance for the person in
need without danger to himself or herself and without interference with
an important duty owed to a third party;
(c) He or she fails to summon assistance for the person in need;
and
(d) Another person is not summoning assistance for the person in
need.
(2) The duty to summon assistance is satisfied by making reasonable
efforts to summon emergency police, fire, or medical assistance that
identifies the location of the victim.
(3) A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a misdemeanor.

--- END ---