BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The registration of a person who registered to vote before July 1,
2005, is canceled on July 1, 2007, and that person must reregister in
order to vote at an election held after that date. The registration of
a person who first registers to vote or reregisters after June 30,
2005, continues to be valid after July 1, 2007, unless canceled or
inactivated as otherwise provided by law.

--- END ---