BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The November 2, 2004, gubernatorial general election between
Dino Rossi and Christine Gregoire was the closest political race in the
history of Washington state;
(2) The election results between the two candidates, which differed
by less than one-hundredth of one percent, were certified on three
separate occasions, after an original tally of votes, a mandatory
machine recount, and a manual recount;
(3) Dino Rossi was twice certified as the governor-elect of
Washington, only to be defeated by Christine Gregoire in the manual
recount, an unprecedented event in the history of Washington;
(4) The election was marred by voting and counting problems that
were irreconcilable by both the counties and the secretary of state;
(5) As a result of those problems, the majority of the citizens of
Washington have lost confidence in the election process;
(6) As the elected representatives of the citizens of Washington,
it is important that the legislature take action pursuant to the
demands of the populous;
(7) The legislature must act to restore voter confidence in the
election system, resolve doubt in the eyes of the electorate, and
solidify the legitimacy of the next governor of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Under Article III, section 4 of the
Constitution of the state of Washington, the legislature is vested with
the power to contest an election and it has the power to decide a
contested election. As such, for the reasons set forth in section 1 of
this act, the legislature hereby contests the November 2, 2004,
gubernatorial general election. By the power vested in the legislature
by the Constitution of the state of Washington, the legislature
declares the results of the gubernatorial election of November 2, 2004,
to be null and void. It directs that an entirely new, special runoff
election be conducted to decide the next governor of Washington. This
gubernatorial runoff election shall be held on the date of George
Washington's birthday, Tuesday, February 22, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---