BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.08.625 and 2003 c 111 s 240 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A voter whose registration has been made inactive under this
chapter and who offers to vote at an ensuing election before two
federal elections have been held must be allowed to vote a regular
ballot and the voter's registration restored to active status.
(2) A voter whose registration has been properly canceled under
this chapter shall vote a provisional ballot. The voter shall mark the
provisional ballot in secrecy, the ballot placed in a security
envelope, the security envelope placed in a provisional ballot
envelope, and the reasons for the use of the provisional ballot noted.
The provisional ballot envelope shall have a place for the voter to
mark that he or she is a citizen of the United States and the notation,
"Check here if you are a citizen of the United States." Failure to
place a mark indicating citizenship on the provisional ballot envelope
does not affect the validity of the ballot.
(3) Upon receipt of such a voted provisional ballot the auditor
shall investigate the circumstances surrounding the original
cancellation. If he or she determines that the cancellation was in
error, the voter's registration must be immediately reinstated, and the
voter's provisional ballot must be counted. If the original
cancellation was not in error, the voter must be afforded the
opportunity to reregister at his or her correct address, and the
voter's provisional ballot must not be counted.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.40.091 and 2004 c 271 s 135 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot, a
security envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger
envelope in which to return the security envelope, and instructions on
how to mark the ballot and how to return it to the county auditor. The
instructions that accompany an absentee ballot for a partisan primary
must include instructions for voting the applicable ballot style, as
provided in chapter 29A.36 RCW. The larger return envelope must
contain a declaration by the absentee voter reciting his or her
qualifications and stating that he or she has not voted in any other
jurisdiction at this election, together with a summary of the penalties
for any violation of any of the provisions of this chapter. The return
envelope must provide space for the voter to indicate the date on which
the ballot was voted and for the voter to sign the oath. The return
envelope shall have a place for the voter to mark that he or she is a
citizen of the United States and the notation, "Check here if you are
a citizen of the United States." Failure to place a mark indicating
citizenship on the return envelope does not affect the validity of the
ballot. A summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this chapter
must be printed on the return envelope immediately adjacent to the
space for the voter's signature. The signature of the voter on the
return envelope must affirm and attest to the statements regarding the
qualifications of that voter and to the validity of the ballot. For
out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters, the signed
declaration on the return envelope constitutes the equivalent of a
voter registration for the election or primary for which the ballot has
been issued. The voter must be instructed to either return the ballot
to the county auditor by whom it was issued or attach sufficient first
class postage, if applicable, and mail the ballot to the appropriate
county auditor no later than the day of the election or primary for
which the ballot was issued.
If the county auditor chooses to forward absentee ballots, he or
she must include with the ballot a clear explanation of the
qualifications necessary to vote in that election and must also advise
a voter with questions about his or her eligibility to contact the
county auditor. This explanation may be provided on the ballot
envelope, on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on the ballot
itself. If the information is not included, the envelope must clearly
indicate that the ballot is not to be forwarded and that return postage
is guaranteed.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.84.130 and 2003 c 111 s 2107 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who:
(1) Knowingly provides false information on an application for
voter registration under any provision of this title;
(2) Knowingly makes or attests to a false declaration as to his or
her qualifications as a voter;
(3) Knowingly causes or permits himself or herself to be registered
using the name of another person;
(4) Knowingly causes himself or herself to be registered under two
or more different names;
(5) Knowingly causes himself or herself to be registered in two or
more counties;
(6) Offers to pay another person to assist in registering voters,
where payment is based on a fixed amount of money per voter
registration;
(7) Accepts payment for assisting in registering voters, where
payment is based on a fixed amount of money per voter registration;
((or))
(8) Knowingly causes any person to be registered or causes any
registration to be transferred or canceled except as authorized under
this title; or
(9) Knowingly falsely marks a provisional ballot envelope or
absentee ballot return envelope that he or she is a citizen of the
United States,
is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

--- END ---