BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.73.070 and 1994 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any activity
in connection with services provided by a common carrier pursuant to
its tariffs on file with the Washington utilities and transportation
commission or the Federal Communication Commission and any activity of
any officer, agent or employee of a common carrier who performs any act
otherwise prohibited by this law in the construction, maintenance,
repair and operations of the common carrier's communications services,
facilities, or equipment or incident to the use of such services,
facilities or equipment. Common carrier as used in this section means
any person engaged as a common carrier or public service company for
hire in intrastate, interstate or foreign communication by wire or
radio or in intrastate, interstate or foreign radio transmission of
energy.
(2) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:
(a) Any common carrier automatic number, caller, or location
identification service that has been approved by the Washington
utilities and transportation commission; ((or))
(b) A 911 or enhanced 911 emergency service as defined in RCW
82.14B.020, for purposes of aiding public health or public safety
agencies to respond to calls placed for emergency assistance; or
(c) A parent or guardian who is monitoring his or her own minor
child's communications or conversations, unless that parent or guardian
is acting at the insistence of agents of law enforcement.

--- END ---