BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.687 and 2003 c 353 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a child who is less than sixteen years of age is being
transported in a motor vehicle that is in operation and that is
required by RCW 46.37.510 to be equipped with a safety belt system in
a passenger seating position, or is being transported in a neighborhood
electric vehicle that is in operation, the driver of the vehicle shall
keep the child properly restrained as follows:
(a) If the child is less than six years old ((and/or)) or sixty
pounds and the passenger seating position equipped with a safety belt
system allows sufficient space for installation, then the child
((will)) must be restrained in a child restraint system that complies
with standards of the United States department of transportation and
that is secured in the vehicle in accordance with instructions of the
manufacturer of the child restraint system;
(b) If the child is less than one year of age or weighs less than
twenty pounds, the child shall be properly restrained in a rear-facing
infant seat;
(c) If the child is more than one but less than four years of age
or weighs less than forty pounds but at least twenty pounds, the child
shall be properly restrained in a forward facing child safety seat
restraint system;
(d) If the child is less than six but at least four years of age or
weighs less than sixty pounds but at least forty pounds, the child
shall be properly restrained in a child booster seat;
(e) If the child is six years of age or older or weighs more than
sixty pounds, the child shall be properly restrained with the motor
vehicle's safety belt properly adjusted and fastened around the child's
body or an appropriately fitting booster seat; and
(f) Enforcement of (a) through (e) of this subsection is subject to
a visual inspection by law enforcement to determine if the child
restraint system in use is appropriate for the child's individual
height, weight, and age. The visual inspection for usage of a forward
facing child safety seat must ensure that the seat in use is equipped
with a four-point shoulder harness system. The visual inspection for
usage of a booster seat must ensure that the seat belt properly fits
across the child's lap and the shoulder strap crosses the center of the
child's chest. The visual inspection for the usage of a seat belt by
a child must ensure that the lap belt properly fits across the child's
lap and the shoulder strap crosses the center of the child's chest. In
determining violations, consideration to the above criteria must be
given in conjunction with the provisions of (a) through (e) of this
subsection. The driver of a vehicle transporting a child who is under
the age of six years old or weighs less than sixty pounds, when the
vehicle is equipped with a passenger side air bag supplemental
restraint system, and the air bag system is activated, shall transport
the child in the back seat positions in the vehicle where it is
practical to do so.
(2) A person violating subsection (1)(a) through (e) of this
section may be issued a notice of traffic infraction under chapter
46.63 RCW. If the person to whom the notice was issued presents proof
of acquisition of an approved child passenger restraint system or a
child booster seat, as appropriate, within seven days to the
jurisdiction issuing the notice and the person has not previously had
a violation of this section dismissed, the jurisdiction shall dismiss
the notice of traffic infraction.
(3) Failure to comply with the requirements of this section shall
not constitute negligence by a parent or legal guardian; nor shall
failure to use a child restraint system be admissible as evidence of
negligence in any civil action.
(4) This section does not apply to: (a) For hire vehicles, (b)
vehicles designed to transport sixteen or less passengers, including
the driver, operated by auto transportation companies, as defined in
RCW 81.68.010, (c) vehicles providing customer shuttle service between
parking, convention, and hotel facilities, and airport terminals, and
(d) school buses.
(5) As used in this section "child booster seat" means a child
passenger restraint system that meets the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety
Standards set forth in 49 C.F.R. 571.213 that is designed to elevate a
child to properly sit in a federally approved lap/shoulder belt system.
(6) The requirements of subsection (1)(a) through (e) of this
section do not apply in any seating position where there is only a lap
belt available and the child weighs more than forty pounds.
(7) A person who has a current national certification as a child
passenger safety technician and who in good faith and not for
compensation provides inspection, adjustment, or educational services
regarding child passenger restraint systems is not liable for civil
damages resulting from any act or omission in providing the services,
other than acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful
or wanton misconduct.

--- END ---