BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.36.111 and 2004 c 271 s 128 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every ballot for a single combination of issues, offices, and
candidates shall be uniform within a precinct and shall identify the
type of primary or election, the county, and the date of the primary or
election, and the ballot or voting device shall contain instructions on
the proper method of recording a vote, including write-in votes and
abstentions. Each position, together with the names of the candidates
for that office and an opportunity for the voter to indicate abstention
from voting on that office, shall be clearly separated from other
offices or positions in the same jurisdiction. The offices in each
jurisdiction shall be clearly separated from each other. No paper
ballot or ballot card may be marked in any way that would permit the
identification of the person who voted that ballot.

--- END ---