BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.070 and 2003 c 186 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission may:
(1) Make rules and regulations for the proper administration of its
duties;
(2) Accept any grants of funds made with or without a matching
requirement by the United States, or any agency thereof, for purposes
in keeping with the purposes of this chapter; accept gifts, bequests,
devises and endowments for purposes in keeping with such purposes;
enter into cooperative agreements with and provide for private
nonprofit groups to use state park property and facilities to raise
money to contribute gifts, grants, and support to the commission for
the purposes of this chapter. The commission may assist the nonprofit
group in a cooperative effort by providing necessary agency personnel
and services, if available. However, none of the moneys raised may
inure to the benefit of the nonprofit group, except in furtherance of
its purposes to benefit the commission as provided in this chapter.
The agency and the private nonprofit group shall agree on the nature of
any project to be supported by such gift or grant prior to the use of
any agency property or facilities for raising money. Any such gifts
may be in the form of recreational facilities developed or built in
part or in whole for public use on agency property, provided that the
facility is consistent with the purposes of the agency;
(3) Require certification by the commission of all parks and
recreation workers employed in state aided or state controlled
programs;
(4) Act jointly, when advisable, with the United States, any other
state agencies, institutions, departments, boards, or commissions in
order to carry out the objectives and responsibilities of this chapter;
(5) Grant franchises and easements for any legitimate purpose on
parks or parkways, for such terms and subject to such conditions and
considerations as the commission shall specify;
(6) Charge such fees for services, utilities, and use of facilities
as the commission shall deem proper, except that the commission shall
not charge fees for basic parkland access;
(7) Enter into agreements whereby individuals or companies may rent
undeveloped parks or parkway land for grazing, agricultural, or mineral
development purposes upon such terms and conditions as the commission
shall deem proper, for a term not to exceed forty years;
(8) Determine the qualifications of and employ a director of parks
and recreation who shall receive a salary as fixed by the governor in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040 and determine the
qualifications and salary of and employ such other persons as may be
needed to carry out the provisions hereof; and
(9) Without being limited to the powers hereinbefore enumerated,
the commission shall have such other powers as in the judgment of a
majority of its members are deemed necessary to effectuate the purposes
of this chapter: PROVIDED, That the commission shall not have power to
supervise directly any local park or recreation district, and no funds
shall be made available for such purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---