BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are a
significant number of people from both urban and rural areas of the
state with the training, expertise, and interest in initiating a
livelihood in farming but who lack the financial resources to get
started. The legislature also finds that the average age of existing
farmers is increasing, the number of full-time commercial farms is
decreasing, and an increasing concern that there will be insufficient
young people who have both the capability and interest to fulfill the
needs for the next generation.
The legislature finds that there are a significant number of new
small farms in the state and a significant enrollment in agricultural
courses offered by public community colleges and universities and the
beginning farmer program offered by Washington State University
cooperative extension.
The purpose of this act is to establish a program to test the
feasibility, interest, and results of a beginning farmer loan program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.180 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission may develop and implement a program to provide
financing for beginning farmers. In developing the program, the
commission shall establish eligibility criteria for financing that will
enable it to choose applicants who are likely to repay loans made or
acquired by the commission and funded from the proceeds of commission
bonds.
(2) The commission may:
(a) Issue revenue bonds as defined in RCW 43.180.020(1) for the
purpose of financing loans to beginning farmers in accordance with RCW
43.180.150;
(b) Do all things necessary to provide for the exemption of
interest on its bonds from federal income taxation; and
(c) Participate fully in federal and other governmental programs
and take such actions as are necessary and consistent with this chapter
to secure to itself and the people of the state the benefits of those
programs for beginning farmers.

--- END ---