BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that economic
conditions in the agricultural industry located predominantly in rural
areas of the state have dramatically changed due to a multitude of
factors including international market forces, changes in consumer
preferences, available land for agricultural use, and relative
competitiveness of the region's agricultural economy. Further, in
order to proactively adjust to changing conditions, counties are
increasingly engaging in strategic planning processes to identify the
trends and develop strategies that will better allow their local
agricultural communities to identify and capitalize on new and changing
opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 15.04 RCW
to read as follows:
A matching fund program for strategic economic development plans
for agriculture is established, to be administered by the department.
The state matching funds shall not exceed fifty percent of the cost of
the planning process. The state portion for each county shall not
exceed forty thousand dollars per county.
The legislative authority of a county that wishes to engage in a
strategic economic development planning process for agriculture may
file an application with the department. Applications must be
submitted by September 15th of each year and awarded by October 15th of
each year.
The department and the involved county may contract with Washington
State University cooperative extension or the University of Washington
to facilitate discussions with an advisory committee appointed by the
county in the development of a strategic economic development plan for
agriculture for the involved county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2005, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---