BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that one of the
state's primary fish habitat protection statutes is the hydraulic
project approval program. This program is one of the state's oldest
environmental regulatory programs, and as a consequence it has been
developed in an incremental manner over many decades.
The legislature further finds that federal review of proposed in-water projects under provisions of the endangered species act are in
most conditions the equivalent of requirements under the state's
hydraulic project approval process, and that requiring projects to
receive dual approvals causes project delays, is redundant, and may
lead to conflicting project conditions.
The legislature further finds that it would benefit the department
of fish and wildlife, the regulated community, and the fisheries
resources of the state if this important regulatory program were
improved with measures to improve its efficiency and predictability, as
well as its coordination with the many local, state, and federal fish
and habitat protection statutes and regulatory programs that have been
created since the inception of the hydraulic project approval program.
The legislature therefore intends to improve the process of
regulating construction in state waters with policy measures that
improve predictability for entities that work in state waters, and make
the best use of limited state resources by ensuring that regulatory
reviews of in-water construction are made in an efficient manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The department must develop general permits for common or
routine activities to improve the predictability and efficiency of the
hydraulic project approval program. At a minimum, the department must,
by December 2006, develop general permits for the following activities:
(i) Routine repair and maintenance of existing over-water
serviceable structures, including replacement of up to sixty pilings;
(ii) Minor dredging of up to ten yards of sediment from an existing
channel, berthing area, or boat ramp;
(iii) Routine repair and maintenance of tide gates;
(iv) Construction of mooring dolphins and fender pilings;
(v) Routine repair, maintenance, or replacement of road and highway
structures such as culverts and ditches;
(vi) Routine repair and maintenance of bridges; and
(vii) Geotechnical or exploratory work conducted as part of project
planning or development.
(b) The department may develop additional general permits for in-water construction activities as available resources allow.
(2) General permits must contain conditions necessary to protect
fish life, and must clearly delineate predictable conditions and
restrictions that project applicants may incorporate into project
design and construction. The department must develop, in consultation
with an advisory committee, common technical provisions that must be
incorporated into general conditions for each general permit.
(3) The department shall post electronically and otherwise make
generally available the following information for each general permit:
(a) A description of activities covered;
(b) The conditions and practices a project applicant must follow to
receive coverage under the permit; and
(c) A notice of intent form for use by applicants to include
information on project location and habitat types affected.
(4) To receive coverage under a general permit, a project applicant
must:
(a) Send a notice of intent to follow the conditions of a general
permit to the department twenty-one days before construction is to
begin; and
(b) Post the general permit prominently at the worksite.
(5) Within ten days of receipt of a notice of intent from a project
applicant, the department must notify the applicant of the status of
general permit coverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Certain federal, state, and local regulatory review processes
may provide review and protection of fish life that is equivalent to
the review provided by the department under this chapter. This may
include, among other permits, federal review of a project under the
endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), a federal permit
under section 404 of the federal water pollution control act (33 U.S.C.
Sec. 1251 et seq.), state review of a project under section 401 of the
federal water pollution control act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.), or
local government review of a project to protect critical areas under
RCW 36.70A.060 or shorelines under chapter 90.58 RCW.
(2) At any point in project development or permitting, an applicant
may submit to the department a notice of intent to proceed under an
equivalent regulatory review. The notice must include a description of
the project, the habitat impacted, and the equivalent permits required
for the project. The department's regional manager of the hydraulic
project approval program shall make a determination regarding the
equivalency of other regulatory permits within fifteen days of
receiving the notice. If the notice of equivalency is approved, the
project is exempt from the requirement to receive hydraulic project
approval under this chapter. If the notice of equivalency is denied,
the department must provide the applicant, in writing, specific reasons
why the other regulatory reviews will not adequately protect fish life.
(3) Upon request by a county or city, the department shall certify
that a county or city, through its implementation of critical areas
protections, including fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas,
under RCW 36.70A.060, or development regulations implementing an
adopted and approved shoreline master program under chapter 90.58 RCW,
provides equivalent review and protection for fish life to that
otherwise provided by the department through issuance of a hydraulic
project approval. A city or county may request certification for all
hydraulic projects or certain hydraulic project types. If
certification is approved, project types specified in the certification
and within the jurisdiction of the city or county are exempt from the
requirement to receive hydraulic project approval under this chapter.
If the department rejects the request for certification, it shall
provide in writing a statement of how and why the regulations do not
provide equivalent protection for fish life, and provide
recommendations that would result in equivalency.
(4) Any person aggrieved by a decision under subsection (2) or (3)
of this section may appeal the decision according to the provisions of
chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must develop procedures to ensure consistency of
application of hydraulic project approval conditions, to include the
following:
(1) Common technical conditions for saltwater and freshwater
projects. These common technical conditions must, at a minimum,
address allowable in-water work periods, and must recognize the need to
maintain an economically competitive waterfront business and port
community, and must meet the needs of infrastructure development as
defined in RCW 90.74.010;
(2) Internal departmental permit review procedures that promote
consistency within and between regions; and
(3) Habitat protection guidance for regional staff that result in
predictable permit conditions for project applicants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An expedited dispute resolution process is created to resolve
disputes regarding hydraulic project approvals issued under this
chapter. The expedited dispute resolution process may be initiated by
a project applicant at any point prior to issuance of the final
hydraulic project approval. When a project applicant requests review
under the expedited dispute resolution process, the forty-five day
period for permit issuance is suspended until the review process is
complete.
(2) When a project applicant requests the expedited dispute
resolution process, the department must convene an expedited dispute
resolution process committee within fourteen days. The expedited
dispute resolution process committee consists of four members:
(a) The project contractor or engineer;
(b) A department engineer;
(c) The department's regional program manager; and
(d) An engineer or public works official designated by the local
government with jurisdiction over the project.
(3) The expedited dispute resolution process committee must conduct
a project review to determine whether the conditions in the proposed
hydraulic project approval are reasonable and necessary to protect fish
life. By majority vote, the committee may accept the permit
conditions, reject the permit conditions and return the permit to the
department for subsequent review, or determine alternative conditions
to be included in the final hydraulic project approval permit.
Decisions of the committee are binding on the department.
(4) The department must provide to each project applicant notice of
the applicant's right to an expedited dispute resolution conference,
and the procedures for informal and formal appeal. This information
must also include:
(a) Contact information for the department employee who will be
reviewing the project;
(b) Contact information for the department's regional program
manager responsible for overseeing the regional hydraulic project
activities at any point prior to the approval or denial of a hydraulic
project approval;
(c) The proper address to which requests for expedited dispute
resolution must be sent; and
(d) The proper address to which informal or formal appeals must be
sent.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.55.100 and 2004 c 32 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event that any person or government agency desires to
construct any form of hydraulic project or perform other work within
the bed of any state waters that will use, divert, obstruct, or change
the natural flow or bed of any of the salt or fresh waters of the
state, such person or government agency shall, before commencing
construction or work thereon and to ensure the proper protection of
fish life, secure the approval of the department as to the adequacy of
the means proposed for the protection of fish life. This approval
shall not be unreasonably withheld or unreasonably conditioned.
(2)(a) The department shall grant or deny approval of a standard
permit within forty-five calendar days of the receipt of a complete
application and notice of compliance with any applicable requirements
of the state environmental policy act, made in the manner prescribed in
this section. The period of forty-five calendar days may be extended,
if the permit is part of a multiagency permit streamlining effort and
all participating permitting agencies and the permit applicant agree to
an extended timeline longer than forty-five calendar days. The permit
must contain provisions allowing for minor modifications to the plans
and specifications without requiring reissuance of the permit.
(b) The applicant may document receipt of application by filing in
person or by registered mail. A complete application for approval
shall contain general plans for the overall project, complete plans and
specifications of the proposed construction or work within the mean
higher high water line in salt water or within the ordinary high water
line in fresh water, and complete plans and specifications for the
proper protection of fish life.
(c) The forty-five day requirement shall be suspended if:
(i) After ten working days of receipt of the application, the
applicant remains unavailable or unable to arrange for a timely field
evaluation of the proposed project;
(ii) The site is physically inaccessible for inspection; or
(iii) The applicant requests delay. Immediately upon determination
that the forty-five day period is suspended, the department shall
notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the delay.
(d) For purposes of this section, "standard permit" means a written
permit issued by the department when the conditions under subsections
(3) and (5)(b) of this section are not met.
(3)(a) The department may issue an expedited written permit in
those instances where normal permit processing would result in
significant hardship for the applicant or unacceptable damage to the
environment. In cases of imminent danger, the department shall issue
an expedited written permit, upon request, for work to repair existing
structures, move obstructions, restore banks, protect property, or
protect fish resources. Expedited permit requests require a complete
written application as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section
and shall be issued within fifteen calendar days of the receipt of a
complete written application. Approval of an expedited permit is valid
for up to sixty days from the date of issuance.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "imminent danger" means a
threat by weather, water flow, or other natural conditions that is
likely to occur within sixty days of a request for a permit
application.
(c) The department may not require the provisions of the state
environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition
of issuing a permit under this subsection.
(d) The department or the county legislative authority may
determine if an imminent danger exists. The county legislative
authority shall notify the department, in writing, if it determines
that an imminent danger exists.
(4) Approval of a standard permit is valid for a period of up to
five years from date of issuance. The permittee must demonstrate
substantial progress on construction of that portion of the project
relating to the approval within two years of the date of issuance. If
the department denies approval, the department shall provide the
applicant, in writing, a statement of the specific reasons why and how
the proposed project would adversely affect fish life. Protection of
fish life shall be the only ground upon which approval may be denied or
conditioned. Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to any denial of project
approval, conditional approval, or requirements for project
modification upon which approval may be contingent.
(5)(a) In case of an emergency arising from weather or stream flow
conditions or other natural conditions, the department, through its
authorized representatives, shall issue immediately, upon request, oral
approval for removing any obstructions, repairing existing structures,
restoring stream banks, or to protect property threatened by the stream
or a change in the stream flow without the necessity of obtaining a
written approval prior to commencing work. Conditions of an oral
approval to protect fish life shall be established by the department
and reduced to writing within thirty days and complied with as provided
for in this section. Oral approval shall be granted immediately, upon
request, for a stream crossing during an emergency situation.
(b) For purposes of this section and RCW 77.55.110, "emergency"
means an immediate threat to life, the public, property, or of
environmental degradation.
(c) The department or the county legislative authority may declare
and continue an emergency when one or more of the criteria under (b) of
this subsection are met. The county legislative authority shall
immediately notify the department if it declares an emergency under
this subsection.
(6)(a) The department shall, at the request of a county, develop
renewable five-year maintenance approval agreements, consistent with
comprehensive flood control management plans adopted under the
authority of RCW 86.12.200, or other watershed plan approved by a
county legislative authority, to allow for work on public and private
property for bank stabilization, bridge repair, removal of sand bars
and debris, channel maintenance, and other flood damage repair and
reduction activity under agreed-upon conditions and times without
obtaining permits for specific projects.
(b) The department shall, at the request of any person or
government agency, develop a renewable five-year maintenance approval
agreement or a hydraulic project approval mitigation agreement to allow
for work on public and private property for bank stabilization, bridge
repair, removal of sandbars and debris, channel maintenance, and other
flood damage repair and reduction activity under reasonable agreed-upon
conditions and times without obtaining permits for specific projects.
(7) This section shall not apply to the construction of any form of
hydraulic project or other work which diverts water for agricultural
irrigation or stock watering purposes authorized under or recognized as
being valid by the state's water codes, or when such hydraulic project
or other work is associated with streambank stabilization to protect
farm and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020. These
irrigation or stock watering diversion and streambank stabilization
projects shall be governed by RCW 77.55.110.
A landscape management plan approved by the department and the
department of natural resources under RCW 76.09.350(2), shall serve as
a hydraulic project approval for the life of the plan if fish are
selected as one of the public resources for coverage under such a plan.
(8) For the purposes of this section and RCW 77.55.110, "bed" means
the land below the ordinary high water lines of state waters. This
definition does not include irrigation ditches, canals, storm water
run-off devices, or other artificial watercourses except where they
exist in a natural watercourse that has been altered by man.
(9) The phrase "to construct any form of hydraulic project or
perform other work" does not include the act of driving across an
established ford. Driving across streams or on wetted stream beds at
areas other than established fords requires approval. Work within the
ordinary high water line of state waters to construct or repair a ford
or crossing requires approval.
(10) The department shall not require a fishway on a tide gate,
flood gate, or other associated man-made agricultural drainage
facilities as a condition of a hydraulic project approval if such
fishway was not originally installed as part of an agricultural
drainage system existing on or before May 20, 2003.
(11) Any condition requiring a self-regulating tide gate to achieve
fish passage in an existing hydraulic project approval under this
section may not be enforced.
(12) For the purposes of this section, "sandbars" includes, but is
not limited to, sand, gravel, rock, silt, and sediments.

--- END ---