BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) According to estimates of the department of community, trade,
and economic development, the efficiency standards set forth in this
act will save nine hundred thousand megawatt-hours of electricity,
thirteen million therms of natural gas, and two billion gallons of
water in the year 2020, fourteen years after the standards have become
effective, with a total net present value to buyers of four hundred
ninety million dollars in 2020.
(2) Efficiency standards for certain products sold or installed in
the state assure consumers and businesses that such products meet
minimum efficiency performance levels thus saving money on utility
bills.
(3) Efficiency standards save energy and reduce pollution and other
environmental impacts associated with the production, distribution, and
use of electricity and natural gas.
(4) Efficiency standards contribute to the economy of Washington by
helping to better balance energy supply and demand, thus reducing
pressure for higher natural gas and electricity prices. By saving
consumers and businesses money on energy bills, efficiency standards
help the state and local economy, since energy bill savings can be
spent on local goods and services.
(5) Efficiency standards can make electricity systems more reliable
by reducing the strain on the electricity grid during peak demand
periods. Furthermore, improved energy efficiency can reduce or delay
the need for new power plants, power transmission lines, and power
distribution system upgrades.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Automatic commercial ice cube machine" means a factory-made
assembly, not necessarily shipped in one package, consisting of a
condensing unit and ice-making section operating as an integrated unit
with means for making and harvesting ice cubes. It may also include
integrated components for storing or dispensing ice, or both.
(2) "Ballast" means a device used with an electric discharge lamp
to obtain necessary circuit conditions, such as voltage, current, and
waveform, for starting and operating the lamp.
(3) "Commercial clothes washer" means a soft mount horizontal or
vertical-axis clothes washer that: (a) Has a clothes container
compartment no greater than 3.5 cubic feet in the case of a horizontal-axis product or no greater than 4.0 cubic feet in the case of a
vertical-axis product; and (b) is designed for use by more than one
household, such as in multifamily housing, apartments, or coin
laundries.
(4) "Commercial prerinse spray valve" means a handheld device
designed and marketed for use with commercial dishwashing and
warewashing equipment and that sprays water on dishes, flatware, and
other food service items for the purpose of removing food residue prior
to their cleaning.
(5)(a) "Commercial refrigerators and freezers" means refrigerators,
freezers, or refrigerator-freezers designed for use by commercial or
institutional facilities for the purpose of storing or merchandising
food products, beverages, or ice at specified temperatures that: (i)
Incorporate most components involved in the vapor-compression cycle and
the refrigerated compartment in a single cabinet; and (ii) may be
configured with either solid or transparent doors as a reach-in
cabinet, pass-through cabinet, roll-in cabinet, or roll-through
cabinet.
(b) "Commercial refrigerators and freezers" does not include: (i)
Products with 85 cubic feet or more of internal volume; (ii) walk-in
refrigerators or freezers; (iii) consumer products that are federally
regulated pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6291 et seq.; (iv) products
without doors; or (v) freezers specifically designed for ice cream.
(6) "Compensation" means money or any other valuable thing,
regardless of form, received or to be received by a person for services
rendered.
(7) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(8)(a) "Digital television adapter" means an electronic product for
which the sole purpose is the conversion of digital video terrestrial
broadcast signals to analog national television system committee video
signals for use by an analog device such as a television.
(b) "Digital television adapter" does not include cable or
satellite television set-top boxes.
(9) "High-intensity discharge lamp" means a lamp in which light is
produced by the passage of an electric current through a vapor or gas,
and in which the light-producing arc is stabilized by bulb wall
temperature and the arc tube has a bulb wall loading in excess of three
watts per square centimeter.
(10) "Illuminated exit sign" means an internally illuminated sign
that is designed to be permanently fixed in place to identify a
building exit and consists of an electrically powered integral light
source that illuminates the legend "EXIT" and any directional
indicators and provides contrast between the legend, any directional
indicators, and the background.
(11)(a) "Low-voltage dry-type distribution transformer" means a
distribution transformer that: (i) Has an input voltage of 600 volts
or less; (ii) is air cooled; (iii) does not use oil as a coolant; and
(iv) is rated for operation at a frequency of 60 hertz.
(b) "Low-voltage dry-type transformer" does not include: (i)
Transformers with multiple voltage taps, with the highest voltage tap
equaling at least twenty percent more than the lowest voltage tap; or
(ii) transformers, such as those commonly known as drive transformers,
rectifier transformers, auto transformers, uninterruptible power system
transformers, impedance transformers, regulating transformers, sealed
and nonventilating transformers, machine tool transformers, welding
transformers, grounding transformers, or testing transformers, that are
designed to be used in a special purpose application and are unlikely
to be used in general purpose applications.
(12) "Metal halide lamp" means a high-intensity discharge lamp in
which the major portion of the light is produced by radiation of metal
halides and their products of dissociation, possibly in combination
with metallic vapors.
(13) "Metal halide lamp fixture" means a light fixture designed to
be operated with a metal halide lamp and a ballast for a metal halide
lamp.
(14) "Pass-through cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator or
freezer with hinged or sliding doors on both the front and rear of the
unit.
(15) "Probe-start metal halide ballast" means a ballast used to
operate metal halide lamps which does not contain an igniter and which
instead starts lamps by using a third starting electrode "probe" in the
arc tube.
(16) "Reach-in cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator or freezer
with hinged or sliding doors or lids, but does not include roll-in or
roll-through cabinets or pass-through cabinets.
(17)(a) "Roll-in cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator or
freezer with hinged or sliding doors that allow wheeled racks of
product to be rolled into the unit.
(b) "Roll-through cabinet" means a commercial refrigerator or
freezer with hinged or sliding doors on two sides of the cabinet that
allow wheeled racks of product to be rolled through the unit.
(18)(a) "Single-voltage external AC to DC power supply" means a
device that: (i) Is designed to convert line voltage alternating
current input into lower voltage direct current output; (ii) is able to
convert to only one DC output voltage at a time; (iii) is sold with, or
intended to be used with, a separate end-use product that constitutes
the primary power load; (iv) is contained within a separate physical
enclosure from the end-use product; (v) is connected to the end-use
product via a removable or hard-wired male/female electrical
connection, cable, cord, or other wiring; and (vi) has a nameplate
output power less than or equal to 250 watts.
(b) "Single-voltage external AC to DC power supply" does not
include: (i) Products with batteries or battery packs that physically
attach directly to the power supply unit; (ii) products with a battery
chemistry or type selector switch and indicator light; or (iii)
products with a battery chemistry or type selector switch and a state
of charge meter.
(19) "State-regulated incandescent reflector lamp" means a lamp
that is not colored or designed for rough or vibration service
applications, that has an inner reflective coating on the outer bulb to
direct the light, an E26 medium screw base, and a rated voltage or
voltage range that lies at least partially within 115 to 130 volts, and
that falls into one of the following categories:
(a) A bulged reflector or elliptical reflector bulb shape and which
has a diameter which equals or exceeds 2.25 inches;
(b) A reflector, parabolic aluminized reflector, or similar bulb
shape and which has a diameter of 2.25 to 2.75 inches.
(20) "Torchiere" means a portable electric lighting fixture with a
reflective bowl that directs light upward onto a ceiling so as to
produce indirect illumination on the surfaces below. "Torchiere" may
include downward directed lamps in addition to the upward, indirect
illumination.
(21) "Traffic signal module" means a standard (a) 8-inch or 200 mm
or (b) 12-inch or 300 mm traffic signal indication, consisting of a
light source, a lens, and all other parts necessary for operation.
(22) "Transformer" means a device consisting of two or more coils
of insulated wire and that is designed to transfer alternating current
by electromagnetic induction from one coil to another to change the
original voltage or current value.
(23)(a) "Unit heater" means a self-contained, vented fan-type
commercial space heater that uses natural gas or propane, and that is
designed to be installed without ducts within a heated space.
(b) "Unit heater" does not include any products covered by federal
standards established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6291 et seq. or any
product that is a direct vent, forced flue heater with a sealed
combustion burner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) This chapter applies to the following
types of new products sold, offered for sale, or installed in the
state: (a) Automatic commercial ice cube machines; (b) commercial
clothes washers; (c) commercial prerinse spray valves; (d) commercial
refrigerators and freezers; (e) digital television adapters; (f)
illuminated exit signs; (g) low-voltage dry-type distribution
transformers; (h) metal halide lamp fixtures; (i) single-voltage
external AC to DC power supplies; (j) state-regulated incandescent
reflector lamps; (k) torchieres; (l) traffic signal modules; and (m)
unit heaters. This chapter applies equally to products whether they
are sold, offered for sale, or installed as a stand-alone product or as
a component of another product.
(2) This chapter does not apply to (a) new products manufactured in
the state and sold outside the state, (b) new products manufactured
outside the state and sold at wholesale inside the state for final
retail sale and installation outside the state, (c) products installed
in mobile manufactured homes at the time of construction or (d)
products designed expressly for installation and use in recreational
vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The legislature establishes the following
minimum efficiency standards for the types of new products set forth in
section 3 of this act.
(1)(a) Automatic commercial ice cube machines must have daily
energy use and daily water use no greater than the applicable values in
the following table:

Equipment type Type of cooling Harvest rate
(lbs. ice/24 hrs.) Maximum
energy use
(kWh/100 lbs.) Maximum condenser
water use
(gallons/100 lbs. ice)

Ice-making head water <500 7.80 - .0055H 200 - .022H

>=500<1436 5.58 - .0011H 200 - .022H

>=1436 4.0 200 - .022H

Ice-making head air 450 10.26 - .0086H Not applicable

>=450 6.89 - .0011H Not applicable

Remote condensing but
not remote compressor air <1000 8.85 - .0038 Not applicable

>=1000 5.10 Not applicable

Remote condensing and
remote compressor air <934 8.85 - .0038H Not applicable

>=934 5.3 Not applicable

Self-contained models water <200 11.40 - .0190H 191 - .0315H

>=200 7.60 191 - .0315H

Self-contained models air <175 18.0 - .0469H Not applicable

>=175 9.80 Not applicable

Where H = harvest rate in pounds per twenty-four hours which must be reported within 5% of the tested value.
"Maximum water use" applies only to water used for the condenser.

(b) For purposes of this section, automatic commercial ice cube
machines shall be tested in accordance with ARI 810-2003 test method as
published by the air-conditioning and refrigeration institute. Ice-making heads include all automatic commercial ice cube machines that
are not split system ice makers or self-contained models as defined in
ARI 810-2003.
(2) Commercial clothes washers must have a minimum modified energy
factor of 1.26 and a maximum water consumption factor of 9.5. For the
purposes of this section, capacity, modified energy factor, and water
consumption factor are defined and measured in accordance with the
current federal test method for clothes washers as found at 10 C.F.R.
Sec. 430.23.
(3) Commercial prerinse spray valves must have a flow rate equal to
or less than 1.6 gallons per minute when measured in accordance with
the American society for testing and materials' "Standard Test Method
for Prerinse Spray Valves," ASTM F2324-03.
(4)(a) Commercial refrigerators and freezers must meet the
applicable requirements listed in the following table:

Equipment Type Doors Maximum Daily Energy Consumption (kWh)

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
refrigerators Solid 0.10V + 2.04

Transparent 0.12V + 3.34

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
"pulldown" refrigerators Transparent .126V + 3.51

Reach-in cabinets, pass-through cabinets,
and roll-in or roll-through cabinets that are
freezers Solid 0.40V + 1.38

Transparent 0.75V + 4.10

Reach-in cabinets that are refrigerator-freezers with an AV of 5.19 or higher
Solid
0.27AV - 0.71

kWh = kilowatt hours
V = total volume (ft3)
AV = adjusted volume = [1.63 x freezer volume (ft3)] + refrigerator volume (ft3)

(b) For purposes of this section, "pulldown" designates products
designed to take a fully stocked refrigerator with beverages at 90
degrees F and cool those beverages to a stable temperature of 38
degrees F within 12 hours or less. Daily energy consumption shall be
measured in accordance with the American national standards
institute/American society of heating, refrigerating and air-conditioning engineers test method 117-2002, except that the back-loading doors of pass-through and roll-through refrigerators and
freezers must remain closed throughout the test, and except that the
controls of all appliances must be adjusted to obtain the following
product temperatures.

Product or compartment type Integrated average product temperature in degrees Fahrenheit

Refrigerator 38 + 2

Freezer 0 + 2

(5) Digital television adapters may not use more than 1 watt in
"passive standby" mode and may not use more than 8 watts in "on" mode.
For the purposes of this section, "passive standby" mode and "on" mode
power consumption is measured in accordance with international
electrotechnical commission test method 62087:2002(E), "Methods of
Measurement for the Power Consumption of Audio, Video, and Related
Equipment."
(6) Illuminated exit signs must have an input power demand of five
watts or less per illuminated face. For the purposes of this section,
input power demand is measured in accordance with the United States
environmental protection agency's energy star exit sign program's
conditions for testing, version 3.0. Illuminated exit signs must meet
all applicable building and safety codes.
(7)(a) Low-voltage dry-type distribution transformers shall have
efficiencies not less than the applicable values in the following table
when tested at thirty-five percent of the rated output power:

Single Phase Three Phase

Rated power output in
kVa Minimum
efficiency % Rated power output in
kVa Minimum
efficiency %

> 15 <25 97.7 > 15 <30 97.0

> 25 <37.5 98.0 > 30 <45 97.5

> 37.5 <50 98.2 > 45 <75 97.7

> 50 <75 98.3 > 75 <112.5 98.0

> 75 <100 98.5 > 112.5 <150 98.2

> 100 <167 98.6 > 150 <225 98.3

> 167 <250 98.7 > 225 <300 98.5

> 250 <333 98.8 > 300 <500 98.6

333 98.9 > 500 <750 98.7

-- -- > 750 <1000 98.8

--
--
1000
98.9

kVa = kilovolt amperes

(b) For the purposes of this section, low-voltage dry-type
distribution transformer efficiency is measured in accordance with the
national electrical manufacturers association TP 2-1998 test method.
(8) Metal halide lamp fixtures designed to be operated with lamps
rated greater than or equal to 150 watts but less than or equal to 500
watts shall not contain a probe-start metal halide lamp ballast.
(9)(a) Single-voltage external AC to DC power supplies shall meet
the requirements in the following table:

Nameplate output Minimum Efficiency in Active Mode

< 1 Watt 0.49 * Nameplate Output

> or = 1 Watt and < or = 49 Watts 0.09 * Ln (Nameplate Output) + 0.49

> 49 Watts 0.84

Maximum Energy Consumption in No-Load Mode

< 10 Watts 0.5 Watts

> or = 10 Watts and < or = 250 Watts
0.75 Watts

Where Ln (Nameplate Output) - Natural Logarithm of the nameplate output expressed in Watts

(b) For the purposes of this section, efficiency of single-voltage
external AC to DC power supplies shall be measured in accordance with
the United States environmental protection agency's "Test Method for
Calculating the Energy Efficiency of Single-Voltage External AC to DC
and AC to AC Power Supplies", by Ecos Consulting and Power Electronics
Application Center, dated August 11, 2004.
(10)(a) State-regulated incandescent reflector lamps that are not
50 watt elliptical reflector lamps must meet the minimum efficacies in
the following table:

Wattage Minimum average lamp efficacy (lumens per watt)

40 - 50 10.5

51 - 66 11.0

67 - 85 12.5

86 - 115 14.0

116 - 155 14.5

156 - 205 15.0

(b) Lamp efficacy must be measured in accordance with the
applicable federal test method as found at 10 C.F.R. Sec. 430.23.
(11) Torchieres may not use more than 190 watts. A torchiere is
deemed to use more than 190 watts if any commercially available lamp or
combination of lamps can be inserted in a socket and cause the
torchiere to draw more than 190 watts when operated at full brightness.
(12)(a) Traffic signal modules must have maximum and nominal
wattage that do not exceed the applicable values in the following
table:

Module Type Maximum Wattage (at 74ºC) Nominal Wattage (at 25ºC)

12" red ball (or 300 mm circular) 17 11

8" red ball (or 200 mm circular) 13 8

12" red arrow (or 300 mm arrow) 12 9

12" green ball (or 300 mm circular) 15 15

8" green ball (or 200 mm circular) 12 12

12" green arrow (or 300 mm arrow) 11 11

mm = millimeter

(b) For the purposes of this section, maximum wattage and nominal
wattage must be measured in accordance with and under the testing
conditions specified by the institute for transportation engineers
"Interim LED Purchase Specification, Vehicle Traffic Control Signal
Heads, Part 2: Light Emitting Diode Vehicle Traffic Signal Modules."
(13) Unit heaters must be equipped with intermittent ignition
devices and must have either power venting or an automatic flue damper.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) On or after January 1, 2007, no new
commercial clothes washer, commercial prerinse spray valve, commercial
refrigerator or freezer, digital television adapter, illuminated exit
sign, low-voltage dry-type distribution transformer, single-voltage
external AC to DC power supply, state-regulated incandescent reflector
lamp, torchiere, traffic signal module, or unit heater may be sold or
offered for sale in the state unless the efficiency of the new product
meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in section 4 of
this act. On or after January 1, 2008, no new automatic commercial ice
cube machine or metal halide lamp fixtures may be sold or offered for
sale in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or
exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in section 4 of this act.
(2) On or after January 1, 2008, no new commercial clothes washer,
commercial prerinse spray valve, commercial refrigerator or freezer,
digital television adapter, illuminated exit sign, low-voltage dry-type
distribution transformer, single-voltage external AC to DC power
supply, state-regulated incandescent reflector lamp, torchiere, traffic
signal module, or unit heater may be installed for compensation in the
state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the
efficiency standards set forth in section 4 of this act. On or after
January 1, 2009, no new automatic commercial ice cube machine or metal
halide lamp fixtures may be installed for compensation in the state
unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the
efficiency standards set forth in section 4 of this act.
(3) Standards for metal halide lamp fixtures and state-regulated
incandescent reflector lamps are effective on the dates in subsections
(1) and (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department may recommend updates to the
energy efficiency standards and test methods for products listed in
section 3 of this act. The department may also recommend establishing
state standards for additional nonfederally covered products. In
making its recommendations, the department shall use the following
criteria: (1) Multiple manufacturers produce products that meet the
proposed standard at the time of recommendation, (2) products meeting
the proposed standard are available at the time of recommendation, (3)
the products are cost-effective to consumers on a life-cycle cost basis
using average Washington resource rates, (4) the utility of the energy
efficient product meets or exceeds the utility of the comparable
product available for purchase, and (5) the standard exists in at least
two other states in the United States. For recommendations concerning
commercial clothes washers, the department must also consider the
fiscal effects on the low-income, elderly, and student populations.
Any recommendations shall be transmitted to the appropriate committees
of the legislature sixty days before the start of any regular
legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The manufacturers of products covered by
this chapter must test samples of their products in accordance with the
test procedures under this chapter or those specified in the state
building code.
(2) Manufacturers of new products covered by section 3 of this act,
except for single-voltage external AC to DC power supplies, shall
certify to the department that the products are in compliance with this
chapter. This certification must be based on test results unless this
chapter does not specify a test method. The department shall establish
rules governing the certification of these products and may coordinate
with the certification programs of other states and federal agencies
with similar standards.
(3) Manufacturers of new products covered by section 3 of this act
shall identify each product offered for sale or installation in the
state as in compliance with this chapter by means of a mark, label, or
tag on the product and packaging at the time of sale or installation.
The department shall establish rules governing the identification of
these products and packaging, which shall be coordinated to the
greatest practical extent with the labeling programs of other states
and federal agencies with equivalent efficiency standards.
(4) The department may test products covered by section 3 of this
act. If products so tested are found not to be in compliance with the
minimum efficiency standards established under section 4 of this act,
the department shall: (a) Charge the manufacturer of the product for
the cost of product purchase and testing; and (b) make information
available to the public on products found not to be in compliance with
the standards.
(5) The department shall obtain in paper form the test methods
specified in section 4 of this act, which shall be available for public
use at the department's energy policy offices.
(6) The department shall investigate complaints received concerning
violations of this chapter. Any manufacturer or distributor who
violates this chapter shall be issued a warning by the director of the
department for any first violation. Repeat violations are subject to
a civil penalty of not more than two hundred fifty dollars a day.
Penalties assessed under this subsection are in addition to costs
assessed under subsection (4) of this section.
(7) The department may adopt rules as necessary to ensure the
proper implementation and enforcement of this chapter.
(8) The proceedings relating to this chapter are governed by the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---