BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Global warming is a matter of increasing concern for public
health and the environment, placing Washington's environment and
economy at risk.
(2) The risks from global warming include potential reductions in
the state's water supply due to changes in snowpack levels and the
timing of spring runoff; low river flows impacting energy generation,
salmon recovery, and infrastructure for roads; a higher sea level
resulting in increased beach erosion; increased risk of forest fires
and forest disease and insect infestations; and more extreme weather
events which will adversely impact agricultural production.
(3) Although the reduction of greenhouse gases will require the
action of all nations, it is the intent of the legislature that the
overall greenhouse gas emissions attributed to Washington is reduced.
(4) Motor vehicles are one of the largest contributors to
greenhouse gas emissions in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.120 RCW
to read as follows:
On or before December 31, 2005, the department shall adopt rules,
in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, to implement
the light duty motor vehicle emission standards of the state of
California, and shall amend these rules from time to time, in
accordance with changes in emission standards in California. These
regulations shall be applicable to motor vehicles with a model year
2009 and later. Rules shall incorporate by reference the California
motor vehicle emission standards set forth in final regulations issued
by the California air resources board pursuant to title 13 of the
California code of regulations and promulgated under the authority of
division 26 of the California health and safety code, as may be amended
from time to time. Nothing in this section limits the department's
authority to regulate motor vehicle emissions for any class of vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
After adoption of rules specified in section 2 of this act, no
vehicle shall be registered in the state for model year 2009 or later
unless the vehicle: (1) Is consistent with the vehicle emission
standards adopted by the department of ecology; or (2) has seven
thousand five hundred miles or more. The department of licensing, in
consultation with the department of ecology, may adopt rules necessary
to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 1991 c 199 s 229 (uncodified) is repealed.

--- END ---