BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Greenhouse gases trap heat and thus warm the earth because they
prevent a significant proportion of infrared radiation from escaping
into space. Concentration of greenhouse gases, especially carbon
dioxide, have increased substantially since the beginning of the
industrial revolution.
(2) The National Academy of Sciences has indicated that the
increase is due in large part to human activity. While scientific
uncertainties remain, the state should start addressing the factors
that contribute to climate change.
(3) Climate change has profound impacts on the state, including
loss of snow pack, reduction in summer irrigation water, hardships for
salmon and forests, and coastal erosion and flooding.
(4) Numerous other states have established greenhouse gases
reduction goals including Connecticut, Maine, New Jersey, New York, and
Oregon, as well as regional goals by the New England states and the
eastern Canadian provinces.
(5) Goals provide a clear performance target for statewide
activities to address greenhouse gases and climate change.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply to
sections 1 and 3 through 5 of this act, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Center" means the Washington State University climate and
rural energy development center as defined in RCW 28B.30.640.
(2) "Greenhouse gases" means carbon dioxide (CO2), nitrous oxide
(N2O), methane (CH4), ozone (O3), sulfur hexafluoride (SF6),
hydrofluorocarbons (HFCs), and perfluorocarbons (PFCs).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following shall be the goals of the
state of Washington to reduce emissions of greenhouse gases throughout
the state and across all major sectors:
(1) By December 1, 2010, the state of Washington will reduce its
total greenhouse gas emissions to a level that does not exceed the
total annual production of greenhouse gases produced within the state
in 1990.
(2) By December 1, 2020, the state of Washington will reduce its
total greenhouse gas emissions to a level that is at least ten percent
below the total annual production of greenhouse gases produced within
the state in 1990.
(3) Beyond 2020, the state of Washington will continue to reduce
its total greenhouse gas emissions to levels consistent with long-term
stabilization of greenhouse gas levels in the atmosphere and consistent
with the recommendations of the intergovernmental panel on climate
change.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The Washington State University center
for climate and rural development in cooperation with the department of
ecology, the department of community, trade, and economic development,
and other government entities, including local air pollution control
agencies, shall report to the legislature and governor every three
years on greenhouse gas emissions produced within the state and total
greenhouse gas emissions produced out of state as a result of in-state
energy demands. The report shall describe progress toward achieving
the goals set forth in section 3 of this act.
(2) The report shall cover all major sources of greenhouse gas
emissions and shall put particular emphasis on state government-related
emissions.
(3) The center, in cooperation with the department of ecology, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the energy
facility site evaluation council, and other interested parties, shall
create a greenhouse gas emissions registry by December 31, 2006. The
registry should provide a process for reporting emissions and a
mechanism to determine the state's status in attaining the emission
reduction goals. To the maximum extent possible, the center shall
coordinate with other states that have or are developing such
registries. The center may determine that Washington state
participation in an existing or proposed multistate climate registry is
sufficient to meet the requirements of this act.
(4) To the extent that there are state mandatory greenhouse gas
emissions reduction requirements for new power plants or other
emissions sources as required under chapter 80.70 RCW, those entities
that are bound by the requirement shall report their emissions
characteristics to the registry every three years, beginning no later
than December 31, 2007.
(5) The center may develop guidelines necessary for implementation
of this section. The guidelines shall make provisions for both
mandatory reporting by those entities covered by subsection (4) of this
section and voluntary reporting for all other entities that may wish to
use the registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The center together with the department
of community, trade, and economic development shall investigate
greenhouse gas reduction strategies for the state and report its
findings to the governor and legislature. The center shall make use of
all reports and analyses of state or region-specific greenhouse gas
reduction strategies. The report shall emphasize those strategies that
offer the potential to reduce overall costs and, in particular, could
result in economic development benefits to the state. The report shall
be delivered to the governor and legislature by July 1, 2006.
(2) The center, together with the department of ecology and the
department of community, trade, and economic development, shall
investigate the feasibility of a greenhouse gas cap and trade system
for reducing greenhouse gas emissions. The center shall produce a
report to the governor and legislature by December 31, 2006, that
includes explicit consideration of:
(a) Any existing system or proposed state or regional greenhouse
gas cap and trade systems;
(b) The feasibility and potential benefits of participating in a
multistate cap and trade system;
(c) Cap and trade systems that include, but are not limited to,
electricity load-based emissions.
(3) The center shall consult with agriculture, forestry,
conservation, and other interested parties on steps that the state can
take to promote viable and economically attractive greenhouse gas
trading markets for Washington companies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 70.94 RCW.

--- END ---