BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the use of
renewable energy resources generated from local sources such as solar
and wind power benefit our state by reducing the load on the state's
electric energy grid, by providing nonpolluting sources of electricity
generation, and by the creation of jobs for local industries that
develop and sell renewable energy products and technologies.
The legislature finds that Washington state has become a national
and international leader in the technologies related to the solar
electric markets. The state can support these industries by providing
incentives for the purchase of locally made renewable energy products.
Locally made renewable technologies benefit and protect the state's
environment. The legislature also finds that the state's economy can
be enhanced through the creation of incentives to develop additional
renewable energy industries in the state.
The legislature intends to provide incentives for the greater use
of locally created renewable energy technologies, support and retain
existing local industries, and create new opportunities for renewable
energy industries to develop in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Customer-generated electricity" means the alternating current
electricity that is generated from a renewable energy system located on
an individual's, businesses', or local government's real property that
is also provided electricity generated by a light and power business.
A system located on a leasehold interest does not qualify under this
definition. "Customer-generated electricity" does not include
electricity generated by a light and power business with greater than
one thousand megawatt hours of annual sales or a gas distribution
business.
(2) "Economic development kilowatt-hour" means the actual kilowatt-hour measurement of customer-generated electricity multiplied by the
appropriate economic development factor.
(3) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(4) "Renewable energy system" means a solar energy system, an
anaerobic digester as defined in RCW 82.08.900, or a wind generator
used for producing electricity.
(5) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity.
(6) "Solar inverter" means the device used to convert direct
current to alternating current in a photovoltaic cell system.
(7) "Solar module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Any individual, business, or local
governmental entity, not in the light and power business or in the gas
distribution business, may apply to the light and power business
serving the situs of the system, each fiscal year beginning on July 1,
2005, for an investment cost recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour
from a customer-generated electricity renewable energy system installed
on its property. No incentive may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated
before July 1, 2005.
(2)(a) Before submitting the application for the incentive allowed
under this section, the applicant shall submit to the department of
revenue and to the climate and rural energy development center at the
Washington State University, established under RCW 28B.30.642, a
certification in a form and manner prescribed by the department that
includes, but is not limited to, the following information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) That the electricity produced by the applicant meets the
definition of "customer-generated electricity" and that the renewable
energy system produces electricity with:
(A) Any solar inverters and solar modules manufactured in
Washington state;
(B) A wind generator powered by blades manufactured in Washington
state;
(C) A solar inverter manufactured in Washington state;
(D) A solar module manufactured in Washington state; or
(E) Solar or wind equipment manufactured outside of Washington
state;
(iv) That the electricity can be transformed or transmitted for
entry into or operation in parallel with electricity transmission and
distribution systems;
(v) The date that the renewable energy system received its final
electrical permit from the applicable local jurisdiction.
(b) Within thirty days of receipt of the certification the
department of revenue shall advise the applicant in writing whether the
renewable energy system qualifies for an incentive under this section.
The department may consult with the climate and rural energy
development center to determine eligibility for the incentive. System
certifications and the information contained therein are subject to
disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(3)(a) By August 1st of each year application for the incentive
shall be made to the light and power business serving the situs of the
system by certification in a form and manner prescribed by the
department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) The date of the letter from the department of revenue stating
that the renewable energy system is eligible for the incentives under
this section;
(iv) A statement of the amount of kilowatt-hours generated by the
renewable energy system in the prior fiscal year.
(b) Within sixty days of receipt of the incentive certification the
light and power business serving the situs of the system shall notify
the applicant in writing whether the incentive payment will be
authorized or denied. The business may consult with the climate and
rural energy development center to determine eligibility for the
incentive payment. Incentive certifications and the information
contained therein are subject to disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(c)(i) Persons receiving incentive payments shall keep and
preserve, for a period of five years, suitable records as may be
necessary to determine the amount of incentive applied for and
received. Such records shall be open for examination at any time upon
notice by the light and power business that made the payment or by the
department. If upon examination of any records or from other
information obtained by the business or department it appears that an
incentive has been paid in an amount that exceeds the correct amount of
incentive payable, the business may assess against the person for the
amount found to have been paid in excess of the correct amount of
incentive payable and shall add thereto interest on the amount.
(ii) If it appears that the amount of incentive paid is less than
the correct amount of incentive payable the business may authorize
additional payment.
(4) The investment cost recovery incentive may be paid fifteen
cents per economic development kilowatt-hour unless requests exceed the
amount authorized for credit to the participating light and power
business. For the purposes of this section, the rate paid for the
investment cost recovery incentive may be multiplied by the following
factors:
(a) For customer-generated electricity produced using solar modules
manufactured in Washington state, two and four-tenths;
(b) For customer-generated electricity produced using a solar or a
wind generator equipped with an inverter manufactured in Washington
state, one and two-tenths;
(c) For customer-generated electricity produced using an anaerobic
digester, or by other solar equipment or using a wind generator
equipped with blades manufactured in Washington state, one; and
(d) For all other customer-generated electricity produced by wind,
eight-tenths.
(5) No individual, household, business, or local governmental
entity is eligible for incentives for more than two thousand dollars
per year.
(6) If requests for the investment cost recovery incentive exceed
the amount of funds available for credit to the participating light and
power business, the incentive payments shall be reduced
proportionately.
(7) The climate and rural energy development center at Washington
State University energy program may establish guidelines and standards
for technologies that are identified as Washington manufactured and
therefore most beneficial to the state's environment.
(8) The environmental attributes of the renewable energy system
belong to the applicant, and do not transfer to the state or the light
and power business upon receipt of the investment cost recovery
incentive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A light and power business shall be
allowed a credit against taxes due under this chapter in an amount
equal to investment cost recovery incentive payments made in any fiscal
year under section 3 of this act. The credit shall be taken in a form
and manner as required by the department. The credit under this
section shall not exceed twenty-five one-hundredths of the businesses'
taxable power sales due under RCW 82.16.020(1)(b) or twenty-five
thousand dollars, whichever is greater. The credit may not exceed the
tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. Refunds shall not
be granted in the place of credits. Expenditures not used to earn a
credit in one fiscal year may not be used to earn a credit in
subsequent years.
(2) The right to earn tax credits under this section expires June
30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 82.16 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---