BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.44 RCW
to read as follows:
The chief of the Washington state patrol shall assign at least one
full-time officer from the agency's commercial vehicle division to work
solely to enforce the size, weight, and load laws under this chapter
with respect to truck operators supporting the construction of a third
runway at any airport owned and operated by a county-wide port district
with a county population greater than one million five hundred
thousand.

--- END ---