BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
To the extent the department contracts with an outside entity to
provide or operate galley food services on vessels within the existing
and future fleet, if any, neither the entity with whom the state
contracts, nor the persons employed by the entity, shall be considered
for any purposes an employee of the state of Washington or of any other
public agency.

--- END ---