BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the heightened
specter of terrorism has made the security and safety of hazardous
materials shipments a priority for shippers, carriers, and federal,
state, and local governments. Addressing such security and safety
concerns should be part of an overall strategy of managing risks
associated with transporting hazardous materials. The legislature
finds that this act is necessary to ensure the effectiveness and
efficiency of the Washington utilities and transportation commission's
existing hazardous material rail inspection program, which is conducted
pursuant to standards and procedures for state participation in
investigative and surveillance activities under federal railroad safety
laws and regulations.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.44.065 and 1961 c 14 s 81.44.065 are each amended
to read as follows:
The utilities and transportation commission shall exercise all
powers and duties in relation to the inspection of tracks, bridges,
structures, equipment, apparatus, and appliances of railroads with
respect to the safety of employees and the public and the
administration and enforcement of all laws providing for the protection
of the public and employees of railroads ((which prior to)) that before
April 1, 1955, were vested in and required to be performed by the
director of labor and industries.
A commission employee certified by the federal railroad
administration to perform hazardous materials inspections may enter the
property of any business that receives, ships, or offers for shipment
hazardous materials by rail, or that manufactures, marks, maintains,
reconditions, repairs, or tests containers that are represented,
marked, certified, or sold for use in the transportation of hazardous
materials by rail. Entry shall be at a reasonable time and in a
reasonable manner. The purpose of such entry is limited to performing
inspections, investigations, or surveillance of facilities, equipment,
records, and operations relating to the packaging, loading, unloading,
or transportation of hazardous materials by rail, pursuant only to the
state participation program outlined in 49 C.F.R. Part 212. The term
"business" is all inclusive and is not limited to common carriers or
public service companies.

--- END ---