BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.21.021 and 2002 c 257 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a mobile home park is closed or converted to another use
after December 31, 1995, eligible tenants shall be entitled to
assistance on a first-come, first-serve basis. The department shall
give priority for distribution of relocation assistance to tenants
residing in parks that are closed as a result of park-owner fraud or as
a result of health and safety concerns as determined by the local board
of health. Payments shall be made upon the department's verification
of eligibility, subject to the availability of remaining funds.
Eligibility for relocation assistance funds is limited to low-income
households. As used in this section, "low-income household" means a
single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose
adjusted income is less than eighty percent of the median family
income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the mobile or
manufactured home is located.
(2) Assistance for closures occurring after December 31, 1995, is
limited to persons who maintain ownership of and relocate their mobile
home or who dispose of a home not relocatable to a new site.
(3) Persons who removed and disposed of their mobile home or
maintained ownership of and relocated their mobile homes are entitled
to reimbursement of actual relocation expenses up to ((seven)) twelve
thousand dollars for a double-wide home and up to ((three)) seven
thousand five hundred dollars for a single-wide home.
(4) Any individual or organization may apply to receive funds from
the mobile home park relocation fund, for use in combination with funds
from public or private sources, toward relocation of tenants eligible
under this section. Funds received from the mobile home park
relocation fund shall only be used for relocation assistance expenses
or other mobile/manufactured home ownership expenses, that include down
payment assistance, if the owners are not planning to relocate their
mobile home as long as their original home is removed from the park.

--- END ---