BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.34.230 and 1995 c 318 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of acquiring conservation futures as well as
other rights and interests in real property pursuant to RCW 84.34.210
and 84.34.220, a county may levy an amount not to exceed ((six and one-quarter)) twelve and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation against the assessed valuation of all taxable property within
the county. The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 shall not apply to the
tax levy authorized in this section.
(2)(a) Of the amount levied by a county under subsection (1) of
this section that is in excess of six and one-quarter cents per
thousand dollars, at least one-half shall be used to acquire
conservation easements on farm and agricultural land or purchase the
development rights to farm and agricultural land. Such acquisition of
a conservation easement or purchase of development right shall be made
in a way to retain the long-term farm and agricultural use of the land.
(b) An amount levied by a county under subsection (1) of this
section that is in excess of six and one-quarter cents per thousand
dollars and that is not used under (a) of this subsection, may be used
in accordance with RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220.

--- END ---