BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.80.060 and 1992 c 101 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to qualify for state planning funds available to regional
transportation planning organizations, the regional transportation
planning organizations containing any county with a population in
excess of ((one million)) three hundred thousand shall provide voting
membership on its executive board, or equivalent board, to the state
transportation commission, the state department of transportation, and
the ((three)) four largest public port districts within the region as
determined by gross operating revenues. It shall further assure that
at least fifty percent of the county and city local elected officials
who serve on the executive board also serve on transit agency boards or
on a regional transit authority.

--- END ---