BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the welfare of
the people of the state of Washington is positively impacted through
the encouragement and expansion of key growth industries in the state.
The legislature further finds that targeting tax incentives to focus on
key growth industries is an important strategy to enhance the state's
business climate.
A recent report by the Washington State University energy program
recognized the solar electric industry as one of the state's important
growth industries. It is of great concern that businesses in this
industry have been increasingly expanding and relocating their
operations elsewhere. The report indicates that additional incentives
for the solar electric industry are needed in recognition of the unique
forces and issues involved in business decisions in this industry.
Therefore, the legislature intends to enact comprehensive tax
incentives for the solar electric industry that address activities of
the manufacture of these products and to encourage these industries to
locate in Washington. Tax incentives for the solar electric industry
are important in both retention and expansion of existing business and
attraction of new businesses, all of which will strengthen this growth
industry within our state, will create jobs, and will bring many
indirect benefits to the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules; as to
such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in
the case of manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the
gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at wholesale of solar energy systems using photovoltaic
modules manufactured by that person; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds
of sales of the solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.
(b) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(c) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2014.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.440 and 2004 c 174 s 5 and 2004 c 24 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in activities which are within the purview
of the provisions of two or more of sections RCW 82.04.230 to
82.04.298, inclusive, shall be taxable under each paragraph applicable
to the activities engaged in.
(2) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.2909(2), 82.04.250, 82.04.270,
section 2(2) of this act, or 82.04.260 (4) or (13) with respect to
selling products in this state shall be allowed a credit against those
taxes for any (a) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the
manufacturing of products so sold in this state, and/or (b) extracting
taxes paid with respect to the extracting of products so sold in this
state or ingredients of products so sold in this state. Extracting
taxes taken as credit under subsection (3) of this section may also be
taken under this subsection, if otherwise allowable under this
subsection. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the sale of those
products.
(3) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.240 or 82.04.260(1)(b) shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with
respect to extracting the ingredients of the products so manufactured
in this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the manufacturing
of those products.
(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1),
section 2(1) of this act, or 82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), (6), or (13) with
respect to extracting or manufacturing products in this state shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any (i) gross receipts taxes
paid to another state with respect to the sales of the products so
extracted or manufactured in this state, (ii) manufacturing taxes paid
with respect to the manufacturing of products using ingredients so
extracted in this state, or (iii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect
to manufacturing activities completed in another state for products so
manufactured in this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed
the tax liability arising under this chapter with respect to the
extraction or manufacturing of those products.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of
business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the
tax an income tax or value added tax; and
(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately
stated from the sales price.
(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the
United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of
such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign
country or political subdivision thereof.
(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and
includes (i) the taxes imposed in RCW 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1), ((and))
82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), and (13), and section 2(1) of this act; and
(ii) similar gross receipts taxes paid to other states.
(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act
or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes the
tax imposed in RCW 82.04.230 and similar gross receipts taxes paid to
other states.
(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used
in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through
82.04.212, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of
describing taxes imposed by other states.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to charges made
for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing of
investment projects, and tangible personal property that will be
incorporated as an ingredient or component of investment projects
during the course of constructing, used for the manufacture of solar
energy systems using photovoltaic modules into a solar energy system
located in a rural county. The exemption is available only when the
buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of
the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) To be eligible under this section the person must use the
investment project for the manufacturing of solar energy systems using
photovoltaic modules into a solar energy system for an eight-year
period, such period beginning the day the investment project commences
commercial production, or a portion of tax otherwise due shall be
immediately due and payable pursuant to subsection (3) of this section:
(a) Before commencing commercial production at the investment
project, the person must meet with the department to determine the date
on which commercial production commences. This date shall be used
throughout the eight-year period to determine whether any tax is to be
repaid. This information is not subject to the confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330.
(b) No application is necessary for the tax exemption. The person
is subject to all the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A person
taking the exemption under this section must report as required under
section 8 of this act.
(3) If the investment project is not used for manufacturing solar
energy systems using photovoltaic modules for any one calendar year,
one-eighth of the exempt sales and use taxes shall be due and payable
by April 1st of the following year. The department shall assess
interest, but not penalties, on the taxes for which the person is not
eligible. The interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes under this chapter, retroactively to the date
the exemption was claimed, and shall accrue until the taxes for which
the exemption was claimed are repaid.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Commencement of commercial production" is deemed to have
occurred when the equipment and process qualifications in the
investment project are completed and production for sale has begun.
(b) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the
project. An investment project does not include any portion of an
investment project undertaken by a light and power business as defined
in RCW 82.16.010(5), other than that portion of a cogeneration project
that is used to generate power for consumption within the manufacturing
site of which the cogeneration project is an integral part.
(c) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
(d) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures
including parking facilities, and expansion or renovation of existing
structures, for the purpose of increasing floor space or production
capacity used for manufacturing, including plant offices and warehouses
or other facilities for the storage of raw material or finished goods
if such facilities are an essential or an integral part of a factory,
mill, or plant, used for manufacturing. If a building is used partly
for manufacturing and partly for other purposes, the applicable tax
exemption shall be determined by apportionment of the costs of
construction under rules adopted by the department.
(e) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial
fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an integral and
necessary part of a manufacturing operation. "Qualified machinery and
equipment" includes manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys,
shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures;
and all equipment used to control or operate the machinery.
(f) "Rural county" means a county with a population density of
fewer than four persons per square mile.
(g) "Solar energy system" has the same meaning as provided in
section 2 of this act.
(5) No exemption may be taken after June 30, 2014, however all of
the eligibility criteria and limitations are applicable to any
exemptions claimed before that date.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an
ingredient or component of investment projects used for the manufacture
of solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules into a solar energy
system located in a rural county, as defined in section 4 of this act,
during the course of constructing such investment projects or to labor
and services rendered in respect to installing, during the course of
constructing, building fixtures not otherwise eligible for the
exemption under RCW 82.08.02565(2)(b).
(2) The eligibility requirements, conditions, and definitions in
section 4 of this act apply to this section.
(3) No exemption may be taken after June 30, 2014, however all of
the eligibility criteria and limitations are applicable to any
exemptions claimed before that date.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under section 2 of this act
for each full-time employment position created by persons engaged in
the business of manufacturing solar energy systems using photovoltaic
modules into a solar energy system. For the purposes of this section
"solar energy system" has the same meaning as provided in section 2 of
this act.
(2)(a) The credit under this section shall equal three thousand
dollars for each full-time employment position used in manufacturing
process that takes place in investment projects exempt from sales and
use tax under sections 4 and 5 of this act. A credit is earned for the
calendar year a person fills a position. Additionally a credit is
earned for each year the position is maintained over the subsequent
consecutive years, up to eight years. Those positions that are not
filled for the entire year are eligible for fifty percent of the credit
if filled less than six months, and the entire credit if filled six
months or more.
(b) To qualify for the credit, the manufacturing activity of the
person must be conducted at an investment project that qualifies for
the exemption from sales and use tax under sections 4 and 5 of this
act.
(3) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person is
subject to all of the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. In no case
may a credit earned during one calendar year be carried over to be
credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year. No
refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(4) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been claimed shall be immediately due. The
department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes for
which the person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
shall be retroactive to the date the tax credit was taken, and shall
accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.
(5) A person taking the credit under this section must report under
section 8 of this act.
(6) Credits may be taken after July 1, 2005, for those investment
projects at which commercial production began before June 30, 2014,
subject to all of the eligibility criteria and limitations of this
section.
(7) This section expires June 30, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Machinery and equipment exempt under RCW 82.08.02565 or
82.12.02565 used exclusively in the manufacture of solar energy systems
using photovoltaic modules into a solar energy system at an investment
project exempt from sales and use tax under sections 4 and 5 of this
act are exempt from property taxation. "Solar energy system" has the
same meaning as provided in section 2 of this act.
(2) A person seeking this exemption must make application to the
county assessor, on forms prescribed by the department.
(3) This section is effective for taxes levied for collection one
year after the effective date of this section and thereafter.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2014, for taxes levied for
collection in the following year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person who reports taxes under section 2 of this act or
who claims an exemption or credit under sections 4 through 6 of this
act, shall make an annual report to the department detailing
employment, wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits
per job at the manufacturing site. The report shall not include names
of employees. The report shall also detail employment by the total
number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions. The first
report filed under this subsection shall include employment, wage, and
benefit information for the twelve-month period immediately before
first use of a preferential tax rate under section 2 of this act, or
tax exemption or credit under sections 4 through 6 of this act. The
report is due by March 31st following any year in which a preferential
tax rate under section 2 of this act is used, or tax exemption or
credit under sections 4 through 6 of this act is claimed. This
information is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection the department shall declare the amount of taxes exempted or
credited, or reduced in the case of the preferential tax rate, for the
previous calendar year to be immediately due and payable. Excise taxes
payable under this subsection are subject to interest, but not
penalties, at the rate provided for delinquent taxes, as provided under
this chapter. The department shall assess interest, retroactively to
the date the exemption, credit, or preferential tax rate under section
2 of this act, was used. The interest shall be assessed at the rate
provided for delinquent excise taxes under this chapter, and shall
accrue until the taxes for which the exemption, credit, or preferential
tax rate was used are repaid. This information is not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---