BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.250 and 1987 c 109 s 83 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person, municipal corporation, firm, irrigation district,
association, corporation or water users' association hereafter desiring
to appropriate water for a beneficial use shall make an application to
the department for a permit to make such appropriation, and shall not
use or divert such waters until he has received a permit from the
department as in this chapter provided. The construction of any ditch,
canal or works, or performing any work in connection with said
construction or appropriation, or the use of any waters, shall not be
an appropriation of such water nor an act for the purpose of
appropriating water unless a permit to make said appropriation has
first been granted by the department((: PROVIDED, That)).
(2) A temporary permit may be granted upon a proper showing made to
the department to be valid only during the pendency of such application
for a permit unless sooner revoked by the department((: PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That)).
(3) Nothing in this chapter ((contained)) shall be deemed to affect
RCW 90.40.010 through 90.40.080 except that the notice and certificate
therein provided for in RCW 90.40.030 shall be addressed to the
department, and the department shall exercise the powers and perform
the duties prescribed by RCW 90.40.030.
(4) The department may permit by rule, under conditions appropriate
to the water resources inventory area, the use of rain barrels and
cisterns to collect rainwater intended to be put to a beneficial use on
the same property where the rainwater is captured.

--- END ---