BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.15.030 and 2000 c 11 s 66 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Moneys appropriated for this chapter shall be divided equally
between the habitat conservation and outdoor recreation accounts and
shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this chapter.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this act, moneys deposited in
these accounts shall be invested as authorized for other state funds,
and any earnings on them shall be credited to the respective account.
(3) All moneys deposited in the habitat conservation and outdoor
recreation accounts shall be allocated as provided under RCW 79A.15.040
and 79A.15.050 as grants to state or local agencies for acquisition,
development, and renovation within the jurisdiction of those agencies,
subject to legislative appropriation. The committee may use or permit
the use of any funds appropriated for this chapter as matching funds
where federal, local, or other funds are made available for projects
within the purposes of this chapter.
(4) Projects receiving grants under this chapter that are developed
or otherwise accessible for public recreational uses shall be available
to the public ((on a nondiscriminatory basis)).
(5) The committee may make grants to an eligible project from
((both)) the habitat conservation and outdoor recreation accounts and
any one or more of the applicable categories under such accounts
described in RCW 79A.15.040 and 79A.15.050.
(6) The committee may accept private donations to the habitat
conservation account and the outdoor recreation account for the
purposes specified in this chapter.
(7) The committee may apply up to three percent of the funds
appropriated for this chapter for the administration of the programs
and purposes specified in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79A.15 RCW
to read as follows:
In a county in which public land, federal land, and tribal land
together constitute more than seventy percent of the total area of the
county, a state or local agency must consult with the appropriate
county or city legislative authority with jurisdiction over the project
area prior to applying for funds for acquisition of property under this
chapter. Project applications that do not include a letter of support
from the county or city legislative authority must be given lower
priority in the grant evaluation process. If a project application
does not include a letter of support from the appropriate county or
city legislative authority, but is recommended for funding by the
committee, this information must be included in the prioritized list
submitted to the governor and the legislature under RCW 79A.15.060 and
79A.15.070.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.15.040 and 1999 c 379 s 917 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Moneys appropriated for this chapter to the habitat
conservation account shall be distributed in the following way:
(a) Not less than thirty-five percent for the acquisition and
development of critical habitat;
(b) Not less than twenty percent for the acquisition and
development of natural areas;
(c) Not less than fifteen percent for the acquisition and
development of urban wildlife habitat; ((and))
(d) ((The remaining amount shall be considered unallocated and))
Not less than ten percent through June 30, 2011, at which time the
amount shall become five percent, shall be used by the committee to
fund ((high priority acquisition and development needs for critical
habitat, natural areas, and urban wildlife habitat. During the fiscal
biennium ending June 30, 2001, the remaining amount reappropriated from
the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 1999, may be allocated for matching
grants for riparian zone habitat protection projects that implement
watershed plans under the program established in section 329(6),
chapter 235, Laws of 1997)) restoration and enhancement projects on
state lands. Only the department of natural resources and the
department of fish and wildlife may apply for these funds to be used on
existing habitat and natural area lands; and
(e) The remaining amount shall be considered unallocated and shall
be used by the committee to fund high priority acquisition and
development needs for critical habitat, natural areas, and urban
wildlife habitat.
(2) In distributing these funds, the committee retains discretion
to meet the most pressing needs for critical habitat, natural areas,
and urban wildlife habitat, and is not required to meet the percentages
described in subsection (1) of this section in any one biennium.
(3) Only state agencies may apply for acquisition and development
funds for ((critical habitat and)) natural areas projects under
subsection (1)(((a),)) (b)((, and (d))) of this section.
(4) State and local agencies may apply for acquisition and
development funds for critical habitat and urban wildlife habitat
projects under subsection (1)(a) and (c) ((and (d))) of this section.
(5)(a) Any lands that have been acquired with grants under this
section by the department of fish and wildlife are subject to an amount
in lieu of real property taxes and an additional amount for control of
noxious weeds as determined by RCW 77.12.203.
(b) Any lands that have been acquired with grants under this
section by the department of natural resources are subject to payments
in the amounts required under the provisions of sections 7 and 8 of
this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 79A.15.050 and 2003 c 184 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Moneys appropriated for this chapter to the outdoor recreation
account shall be distributed in the following way:
(a) Not less than ((twenty-five)) thirty percent to the state parks
and recreation commission for the acquisition ((and)), renovation, or
development of state parks, with at least ((seventy-five)) fifty
percent of ((this)) the money for acquisition costs((. However,
between July 27, 2003, and June 30, 2009, at least fifty percent of
this money for the acquisition and development of state parks must be
used for acquisition costs));
(b) Not less than ((twenty-five)) thirty percent for the
acquisition, development, and renovation of local parks, with at least
fifty percent of this money for acquisition costs;
(c) Not less than ((fifteen)) twenty percent for the acquisition
and development of trails;
(d) Not less than ten percent for the acquisition and development
of water access sites, with at least seventy-five percent of this money
for acquisition costs; ((and))
(e) Not less than five percent for development and renovation
projects on state recreation lands. Only the department of natural
resources and the department of fish and wildlife may apply for these
funds to be used on their existing recreation lands; and
(f) The remaining amount shall be considered unallocated and shall
be distributed by the committee to state and local agencies to fund
high priority acquisition and development needs for parks, trails, and
water access sites.
(2) In distributing these funds, the committee retains discretion
to meet the most pressing needs for state and local parks, trails, and
water access sites, and is not required to meet the percentages
described in subsection (1) of this section in any one biennium.
(3) Only local agencies may apply for acquisition, development, or
renovation funds for local parks under subsection (1)(b) of this
section.
(4) Only state and local agencies may apply for funds for trails
under subsection (1)(c) of this section.
(5) Only state and local agencies may apply for funds for water
access sites under subsection (1)(d) of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 79A.15.060 and 2000 c 11 s 67 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The committee may adopt rules establishing acquisition policies
and priorities for distributions from the habitat conservation account.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 79A.15.030(7), moneys appropriated
for this chapter may not be used by the committee to fund
((additional)) staff positions or other overhead expenses, or by a
state, regional, or local agency to fund operation ((and)) or
maintenance of areas acquired under this chapter((, except that the
committee may use moneys appropriated for this chapter for the fiscal
biennium ending June 30, 2001, for the administrative costs of
implementing the pilot watershed plan implementation program
established in section 329(6), chapter 235, Laws of 1997, and
developing an inventory of publicly owned lands established in section
329(7), chapter 235, Laws of 1997)).
(3) Moneys appropriated for this chapter may be used by grant
recipients for costs incidental to acquisition, including, but not
limited to, surveying expenses, fencing, and signing.
(4) ((Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section,)) The
committee may not approve a local project where the local agency share
is less than the amount to be awarded from the habitat conservation
account.
(5) ((During the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2001, the
committee may approve a riparian zone habitat protection project
established in section 329(6), chapter 235, Laws of 1997, where the
local agency share is less than the amount to be awarded from the
habitat conservation account.
(6))) In determining acquisition priorities with respect to the
habitat conservation account, the committee shall consider, at a
minimum, the following criteria:
(a) For critical habitat and natural areas proposals:
(i) Community support for the project;
(ii) Recommendations as part of a watershed plan or habitat
conservation plan, or a coordinated regionwide prioritization effort,
and for projects primarily intended to benefit salmon, limiting
factors, or critical pathways analysis;
(iii) Immediacy of threat to the site;
(((iii))) (iv) Uniqueness of the site;
(((iv))) (v) Diversity of species using the site;
(((v))) (vi) Quality of the habitat;
(((vi))) (vii) Long-term viability of the site;
(((vii))) (viii) Presence of endangered, threatened, or sensitive
species;
(((viii))) (ix) Enhancement of existing public property;
(((ix))) (x) Consistency with a local land use plan, or a regional
or statewide recreational or resource plan, including projects that
assist in the implementation of local shoreline master plans updated
according to RCW 90.58.080 or local comprehensive plans updated
according to RCW 36.70A.130; ((and
(x))) (xi) Educational and scientific value of the site;
(xii) Integration with recovery efforts for endangered, threatened,
or sensitive species;
(xiii) For critical habitat proposals by local agencies, the
statewide significance of the site.
(b) For urban wildlife habitat proposals, in addition to the
criteria of (a) of this subsection:
(i) Population of, and distance from, the nearest urban area;
(ii) Proximity to other wildlife habitat;
(iii) Potential for public use; and
(iv) Potential for use by special needs populations.
(((7))) (6) Before ((October)) November 1st of each even-numbered
year, the committee shall recommend to the governor a prioritized list
of state agency projects to be funded under RCW 79A.15.040(1) (a), (b),
and (c). The governor may remove projects from the list recommended by
the committee and shall submit this amended list in the capital budget
request to the legislature. The list shall include, but not be limited
to, a description of each project; and shall describe for each project
any anticipated restrictions upon recreational activities allowed prior
to the project.
(((8))) (7) Before ((October)) November 1st of each even-numbered
year, the committee shall recommend to the governor a prioritized list
of all local projects to be funded under RCW 79A.15.040(1) (a) and (c).
The governor may remove projects from the list recommended by the
committee and shall submit this amended list in the capital budget
request to the legislature. The list shall include, but not be limited
to, a description of each project and any particular match requirement,
and describe for each project any anticipated restrictions upon
recreational activities allowed prior to the project.

Sec. 6 RCW 79A.15.070 and 2000 c 11 s 68 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In determining which state parks proposals and local parks
proposals to fund, the committee shall use existing policies and
priorities.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 79A.15.030(7), moneys appropriated
for this chapter may not be used by the committee to fund
((additional)) staff or other overhead expenses, or by a state,
regional, or local agency to fund operation ((and)) or maintenance of
areas acquired under this chapter((, except that the committee may use
moneys appropriated for this chapter for the fiscal biennium ending
June 30, 2001, for the administrative costs of implementing the pilot
watershed plan implementation program established in section 329(6),
chapter 235, Laws of 1997, and developing an inventory of publicly
owned lands established in section 329(7), chapter 235, Laws of 1997)).
(3) Moneys appropriated for this chapter may be used by grant
recipients for costs incidental to acquisition and development,
including, but not limited to, surveying expenses, fencing, and
signing.
(4) The committee may not approve a project of a local agency where
the share contributed by the local agency is less than the amount to be
awarded from the outdoor recreation account.
(5) The committee may adopt rules establishing acquisition policies
and priorities for the acquisition and development of trails and water
access sites to be financed from moneys in the outdoor recreation
account.
(6) In determining the acquisition and development priorities, the
committee shall consider, at a minimum, the following criteria:
(a) For trails proposals:
(i) Community support for the project;
(ii) Immediacy of threat to the site;
(iii) Linkage between communities;
(iv) Linkage between trails;
(v) Existing or potential usage;
(vi) Consistency with ((an existing)) a local land use plan, or a
regional or statewide recreational or resource plan, including projects
that assist in the implementation of local shoreline master plans
updated according to RCW 90.58.080 or local comprehensive plans updated
according to RCW 36.70A.130;
(vii) Availability of water access or views;
(viii) Enhancement of wildlife habitat; and
(ix) Scenic values of the site.
(b) For water access proposals:
(i) Community support for the project;
(ii) Distance from similar water access opportunities;
(iii) Immediacy of threat to the site;
(iv) Diversity of possible recreational uses; ((and))
(v) Public demand in the area; and
(vi) Consistency with a local land use plan, or a regional or
statewide recreational or resource plan, including projects that assist
in the implementation of local shoreline master plans updated according
to RCW 90.58.080 or local comprehensive plans updated according to RCW
36.70A.130.
(7) Before ((October)) November 1st of each even-numbered year, the
committee shall recommend to the governor a prioritized list of state
agency projects to be funded under RCW 79A.15.050(1) (a), (c), and (d).
The governor may remove projects from the list recommended by the
committee and shall submit this amended list in the capital budget
request to the legislature. The list shall include, but not be limited
to, a description of each project; and shall describe for each project
any anticipated restrictions upon recreational activities allowed prior
to the project.
(8) Before ((October)) November 1st of each even-numbered year, the
committee shall recommend to the governor a prioritized list of all
local projects to be funded under RCW 79A.15.050(1) (b), (c), and (d).
The governor may remove projects from the list recommended by the
committee and shall submit this amended list in the capital budget
request to the legislature. The list shall include, but not be limited
to, a description of each project and any particular match requirement,
and describe for each project any anticipated restrictions upon
recreational activities allowed prior to the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 79.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The state treasurer, on behalf of the department, must distribute
to counties for all lands acquired for the purposes of this chapter an
amount in lieu of real property taxes equal to the amount of tax that
would be due if the land were taxable as open space land under chapter
84.34 RCW, plus an additional amount equal to the amount of weed
control assessment that would be due if such lands were privately
owned. The county assessor and county legislative authority shall
assist in determining the appropriate calculation of the amount of tax
that would be due under chapter 84.34 RCW. The county shall distribute
the amount received under this section in lieu of real property taxes
to all property taxing districts except the state in appropriate tax
code areas the same way it would distribute local property taxes from
private property. The county shall distribute the amount received
under this section for weed control to the appropriate weed district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 79.71 RCW
to read as follows:
The state treasurer, on behalf of the department, must distribute
to counties for all lands acquired for the purposes of this chapter an
amount in lieu of real property taxes equal to the amount of tax that
would be due if the land were taxable as open space land under chapter
84.34 RCW, plus an additional amount equal to the amount of weed
control assessment that would be due if such lands were privately
owned. The county assessor and county legislative authority shall
assist in determining the appropriate calculation of the amount of tax
that would be due under chapter 84.34 RCW. The county shall distribute
the amount received under this section in lieu of real property taxes
to all property taxing districts except the state in appropriate tax
code areas the same way it would distribute local property taxes from
private property. The county shall distribute the amount received
under this section for weed control to the appropriate weed district.

Sec. 9 RCW 84.33.140 and 2003 c 170 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When land has been designated as forest land under RCW
84.33.130, a notation of the designation shall be made each year upon
the assessment and tax rolls. A copy of the notice of approval
together with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for
the land shall, at the expense of the applicant, be filed by the
assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded.
(2) In preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002, for
taxes payable in 2003 and each January 1st thereafter, the assessor
shall list each parcel of designated forest land at a value with
respect to the grade and class provided in this subsection and adjusted
as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The assessor shall
compute the assessed value of the land using the same assessment ratio
applied generally in computing the assessed value of other property in
the county. Values for the several grades of bare forest land shall be
as follows:

LAND
GRADE OPERABILITY
CLASS VALUES
PER ACRE

1 $234

1 2 229

3 217

4 157

1 198

2 2 190

3 183

4 132

1 154

3 2 149

3 148

4 113

1 117

4 2 114

3 113

4 86

1 85

5 2 78

3 77

4 52

1 43

6 2 39

3 39

4 37

1 21

7 2 21

3 20

4 20

8 1

(3) On or before December 31, 2001, the department shall adjust by
rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, the forest land values contained in
subsection (2) of this section in accordance with this subsection, and
shall certify the adjusted values to the assessor who will use these
values in preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002. For the
adjustment to be made on or before December 31, 2001, for use in the
2002 assessment year, the department shall:
(a) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1996, and June 30, 2001, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(b) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1995, and June 30, 2000, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(c) Adjust the forest land values contained in subsection (2) of
this section by a percentage equal to one-half of the percentage change
in the average values of harvested timber reflected by comparing the
resultant values calculated under (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(4) For the adjustments to be made on or before December 31, 2002,
and each succeeding year thereafter, the same procedure described in
subsection (3) of this section shall be followed using harvester excise
tax returns filed under RCW 84.33.074. However, this adjustment shall
be made to the prior year's adjusted value, and the five-year periods
for calculating average harvested timber values shall be successively
one year more recent.
(5) Land graded, assessed, and valued as forest land shall continue
to be so graded, assessed, and valued until removal of designation by
the assessor upon the occurrence of any of the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove the designation;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership making the land exempt from ad
valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of forest land
designation continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or
devisee of a deceased owner, shall not, by itself, result in removal of
designation. The signed notice of continuance shall be attached to the
real estate excise tax affidavit provided for in RCW 82.45.150. The
notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared by the department.
If the notice of continuance is not signed by the new owner and
attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all compensating
taxes calculated under subsection (11) of this section shall become due
and payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The auditor
shall not accept an instrument of conveyance regarding designated
forest land for filing or recording unless the new owner has signed the
notice of continuance or the compensating tax has been paid, as
evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the
treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the new
assessed valuation calculated under subsection (11) of this section to
the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of
RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of
equalization to hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that:
(i) The land is no longer primarily devoted to and used for growing
and harvesting timber. However, land shall not be removed from
designation if a governmental agency, organization, or other recipient
identified in subsection (13) or (14) of this section as exempt from
the payment of compensating tax has manifested its intent in writing or
by other official action to acquire a property interest in the
designated forest land by means of a transaction that qualifies for an
exemption under subsection (13) or (14) of this section. The
governmental agency, organization, or recipient shall annually provide
the assessor of the county in which the land is located reasonable
evidence in writing of the intent to acquire the designated land as
long as the intent continues or within sixty days of a request by the
assessor. The assessor may not request this evidence more than once in
a calendar year;
(ii) The owner has failed to comply with a final administrative or
judicial order with respect to a violation of the restocking, forest
management, fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest
debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable rules under Title
76 RCW; or
(iii) Restocking has not occurred to the extent or within the time
specified in the application for designation of such land.
(6) Land shall not be removed from designation if there is a
governmental restriction that prohibits, in whole or in part, the owner
from harvesting timber from the owner's designated forest land. If
only a portion of the parcel is impacted by governmental restrictions
of this nature, the restrictions cannot be used as a basis to remove
the remainder of the forest land from designation under this chapter.
For the purposes of this section, "governmental restrictions" includes:
(a) Any law, regulation, rule, ordinance, program, or other action
adopted or taken by a federal, state, county, city, or other
governmental entity; or (b) the land's zoning or its presence within an
urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110.
(7) The assessor shall have the option of requiring an owner of
forest land to file a timber management plan with the assessor upon the
occurrence of one of the following:
(a) An application for designation as forest land is submitted; or
(b) Designated forest land is sold or transferred and a notice of
continuance, described in subsection (5)(c) of this section, is signed.
(8) If land is removed from designation because of any of the
circumstances listed in subsection (5)(a) through (c) of this section,
the removal shall apply only to the land affected. If land is removed
from designation because of subsection (5)(d) of this section, the
removal shall apply only to the actual area of land that is no longer
primarily devoted to the growing and harvesting of timber, without
regard to any other land that may have been included in the application
and approved for designation, as long as the remaining designated
forest land meets the definition of forest land contained in RCW
84.33.035.
(9) Within thirty days after the removal of designation as forest
land, the assessor shall notify the owner in writing, setting forth the
reasons for the removal. The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal
the removal to the county board of equalization in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(10) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal a copy of the notice
of removal with a notation of the action, if any, upon appeal, together
with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for the land
removed from designation shall, at the expense of the applicant, be
filed by the assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded and a
notation of removal from designation shall immediately be made upon the
assessment and tax rolls. The assessor shall revalue the land to be
removed with reference to its true and fair value as of January 1st of
the year of removal from designation. Both the assessed value before
and after the removal of designation shall be listed. Taxes based on
the value of the land as forest land shall be assessed and payable up
until the date of removal and taxes based on the true and fair value of
the land shall be assessed and payable from the date of removal from
designation.
(11) Except as provided in subsection (5)(c), (13), or (14) of this
section, a compensating tax shall be imposed on land removed from
designation as forest land. The compensating tax shall be due and
payable to the treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the
amount of this tax. As soon as possible after the land is removed from
designation, the assessor shall compute the amount of compensating tax
and mail a notice to the owner of the amount of compensating tax owed
and the date on which payment of this tax is due. The amount of
compensating tax shall be equal to the difference between the amount of
tax last levied on the land as designated forest land and an amount
equal to the new assessed value of the land multiplied by the dollar
rate of the last levy extended against the land, multiplied by a
number, in no event greater than nine, equal to the number of years for
which the land was designated as forest land, plus compensating taxes
on the land at forest land values up until the date of removal and the
prorated taxes on the land at true and fair value from the date of
removal to the end of the current tax year.
(12) Compensating tax, together with applicable interest thereon,
shall become a lien on the land which shall attach at the time the land
is removed from designation as forest land and shall have priority to
and shall be fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance,
mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with
which the land may become charged or liable. The lien may be
foreclosed upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in
the same manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent
real property taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any compensating tax
unpaid on its due date shall thereupon become delinquent. From the
date of delinquency until paid, interest shall be charged at the same
rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.
(13) The compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section shall not be imposed if the removal of designation under
subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other forest
land located within the state of Washington;
(b) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain,
or sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in
anticipation of the exercise of such power;
(c) A donation of fee title, development rights, or the right to
harvest timber, to a government agency or organization qualified under
RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those
sections, or the sale or transfer of fee title to a governmental entity
or a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW
64.04.130, exclusively for the protection and conservation of lands
recommended for state natural area preserve purposes by the natural
heritage council and natural heritage plan as defined in chapter 79.70
RCW or approved for state natural resources conservation area purposes
as defined in chapter 79.71 RCW. At such time as the land is not used
for the purposes enumerated, the compensating tax specified in
subsection (11) of this section shall be imposed upon the current
owner;
(d) The sale or transfer of fee title to the parks and recreation
commission for park and recreation purposes;
(e) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located that disallows the
present use of the land;
(f) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(g) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040;
(h) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34
RCW continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(13)(h); or
(i) The sale or transfer of land after the death of the owner of at
least a fifty percent interest in the land if the land has been
assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated as forest
land under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34 RCW
continuously since 1993 and the sale or transfer takes place after July
22, 2001, and on or before July 22, 2003, and the death of the owner
occurred after January 1, 1991. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(13)(i).
(14) In a county with a population of more than one million
inhabitants, the compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section shall not be imposed if the removal of designation as forest
land under subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) An action described in subsection (13) of this section; or
(b) A transfer of a property interest to a government entity, or to
a nonprofit historic preservation corporation or nonprofit nature
conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW 64.04.130, to protect or
enhance public resources, or to preserve, maintain, improve, restore,
limit the future use of, or otherwise to conserve for public use or
enjoyment, the property interest being transferred. At such time as
the property interest is not used for the purposes enumerated, the
compensating tax shall be imposed upon the current owner.

Sec. 10 RCW 77.12.203 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 15 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding RCW 84.36.010 or other statutes to the
contrary, the director shall pay by April 30th of each year on game
lands in each county, if requested by an election under RCW 77.12.201,
an amount in lieu of real property taxes equal to that amount paid on
similar parcels of open space land taxable under chapter 84.34 RCW or
the greater of seventy cents per acre per year or the amount paid in
1984 plus an additional amount for control of noxious weeds equal to
that which would be paid if such lands were privately owned. This
amount shall not be assessed or paid on department buildings,
structures, facilities, game farms, fish hatcheries, tidelands, or
public fishing areas of less than one hundred acres.
(2) "Game lands," as used in this section and RCW 77.12.201, means
those tracts one hundred acres or larger owned in fee by the department
and used for wildlife habitat and public recreational purposes. All
lands purchased for wildlife habitat, public access or recreation
purposes with federal funds in the Snake River drainage basin shall be
considered game lands regardless of acreage.
(3) This section shall not apply to lands transferred after April
23, 1990, to the department from other state agencies.
(4) The county shall distribute the amount received under this
section in lieu of real property taxes to all property taxing districts
except the state in appropriate tax code areas the same way it would
distribute local property taxes from private property. The county
shall distribute the amount received under this section for weed
control to the appropriate weed district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---