BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there has been no
review of the local government whistleblower act, chapter 42.41 RCW,
since its adoption in 1992. By examining a sample of local government
whistleblower programs for their effectiveness in fulfilling the policy
and intent of the act, the legislature intends to determine whether
changes to the act are needed or further review is warranted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall review a sample of local government whistleblower
programs. The committee, in its review, shall consider, but not be
limited to, the following factors: The effectiveness of local
reporting policies and investigation procedures including the officers
responsible for investigations; the role county prosecutors play in
employee whistleblower investigations; internal conflicts of interest
within the local government agency that may prevent robust
investigation of reports of improper governmental action; employee
awareness of the whistleblower program; employee confidence in program
performance; the effectiveness of the retaliatory action complaint
process; and the feasibility of providing an independent party to
receive the report of improper governmental action and/or conduct the
investigation. The committee shall make recommendations regarding
improvements to better facilitate the reporting and investigation of
improper governmental action in local governments. The committee shall
provide a final report on this review by December 1, 2006.

--- END ---