BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Columbia
river is a vital economic, cultural, and natural resource to the state
and its residents, and that the water of the mainstem of the river
provides critical support for municipal and agricultural uses, fish and
wildlife habitat, power production, and scenic and recreational uses.
While conflict and competition among these uses has prevailed in recent
years, the legislature recognizes the need for state action and state
investment to reliably secure the economic and natural resource
benefits associated with the water of the Columbia river. It is the
intent of the legislature to establish a new state water resource
management program for the mainstem of the Columbia river in order to
meet the water supply needs of growing communities and the local
economies on which they depend, and to do so in a manner that protects
and enhances the quality of the natural environment, including
streamflows necessary for the preservation of environmental values.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Mainstem account" means the Columbia river mainstem account.
(3) "Program" means the Columbia river mainstem water management
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Columbia river mainstem water
management program is hereby established. The goals of this water
management program are to:
(a) Meet the water supply needs of growing communities and the
local economies on which they depend by providing a timely and
affordable supply of water that will allow for new and reliable uses of
water from the Columbia river mainstem; and
(b) Manage water to protect and enhance the quality of the natural
environment, including streamflows necessary for the preservation of
environmental values by securing and dedicating water to improve
streamflows in the river mainstem.
(2) The objectives of the program are to:
(a) Improve the reliability of water rights issued by the
department between 1980 and 2003 that are subject to minimum instream
flows or other mitigation conditions to protect streamflows;
(b) Improve streamflows during the primary period of fish
outmigration on the mainstem; and
(c) Mitigate for the streamflow impacts of future water right
permits as provided by the program.
(3) The department shall administer the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department must implement the
program by:
(a) Acquiring water for the Columbia river mainstem through the
implementation of water conservation programs, changes in water
management with existing water storage and conveyance facilities, the
development of new or expanded multipurpose water storage projects, the
acquisition of water rights from willing sellers or donors, and other
means, as authorized and funded by the legislature for the purposes of
the program;
(b) Securing water acquired under (a) of this subsection in the
Columbia river mainstem account under the state trust water right
program; and
(c) Managing the mainstem account to make water available as
mitigation to willing applicants and to improve streamflows in the
Columbia river mainstem for the benefit of fish.
(2) Water may be deposited in the mainstem account in accordance
with applicable state laws for water right changes, amendments, and
transfers, or through government-to-government agreements, contracts,
assignments, and other instruments that ensure that a highly reliable
and long-term supply of water, in sufficient quantity, is available in
the mainstem account to meet identified needs. For the purposes of
this chapter, the department may secure water from Canada and other
governments to be deposited in, and accounted for, in the mainstem
account.
(3) Two-thirds of the water secured and deposited in the mainstem
account shall be allocated as mitigation water for new water uses
through a state mitigation program. One-third of the water shall be
permanently retained in the mainstem account to improve streamflows.
(4) The department shall manage water in the mainstem account that
is dedicated to improving streamflows in collaboration with the
department of fish and wildlife. The department of fish and wildlife
shall consult with natural resource managers in tribal governments and
federal agencies on how to maximize the benefits to fish from this
water.
(5) The amount of water in the mainstem account shall not govern,
be used to regulate, or be a determinative factor in the department's
water management decisions for water in rivers that are tributary to
the Columbia river.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The requirements of this section are
applicable to any new water uses authorized by the department under
this chapter.
(2) New water uses that would reduce the streamflows of the
Columbia river mainstem below Chief Joseph dam during the period of
April through August must be mitigated to avoid any reduction in
streamflows during this period. Mitigation must be secured and in
place before new water uses are authorized under this chapter.
(3) Applicants for new water right permits may develop their own
mitigation proposal, to be included as part of their application, or
they may participate in the state's mitigation program by requesting
water from the mainstem account. Mitigation proposals developed by an
applicant must meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section.
Where an applicant develops their own mitigation proposal, the
department must allocate water from the mainstem account to benefit
streamflows in the amount of one-half of the mitigation amount.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) An applicant for a new water right
permit, or a party seeking mitigation water for their existing water
right permit, from the Columbia river mainstem may request water from
the mainstem account. If sufficient mitigation water is available in
the mainstem account, the department shall enter into an agreement with
the requesting party to make mitigation water available consistent with
the requirements of this chapter.
(2) In exchange for mitigation water from the mainstem account, the
department shall require and collect an annual payment based on the
quantity of mitigation water specified in the agreement. For new
permits authorized under this chapter that will rely on mitigation from
the mainstem account, the department shall condition these permits to
require annual payment for the mitigation. The department shall
deposit those payments in the Columbia river mainstem investment
account created under section 8 of this act.
(3) The amount of the annual payment shall be established by rule
by the department. In determining the payment rates, the department
shall consider the following factors:
(a) Recovering the state's costs of acquiring water for the
mainstem account, including the administrative costs for managing the
mainstem account; and
(b) Ensuring an affordable supply of water to meet economic and
community development goals.
(4) In all cases, the costs of acquiring water dedicated to
improving streamflows shall be borne by the public and not by the water
user.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Where mitigation that meets the
requirements of section 5(2) of this act is secured, the department
must:
(a) Issue permits that could be exercised during periods of drought
in lieu of existing water right permits and certificates that are
subject to interruption when streamflows on the mainstem are below
adopted minimum instream flows; and
(b) Process pending and future applications for new water right
permits for the mainstem of the Columbia river.
(2) Water users seeking drought permits under subsection (1)(a) of
this section must submit an application by December 31, 2008.
(3) All applications for new water rights under this chapter will
be processed in accordance with RCW 90.03.250 through 90.03.330 and
other applicable provisions of law. For applications where mitigation
that meets the requirements of section 5(2) of this act is secured, the
department may process those applications ahead of previously filed
applications for which mitigation is not secured.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The Columbia river mainstem investment
account is hereby created in the state treasury. All receipts from
Columbia river-related mitigation agreements entered into by the
department under this chapter and any other money appropriated by the
legislature must be deposited into the account. Money in the account
may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes
of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) Site evaluation, feasibility, environmental studies, design and
engineering, and construction of off-channel storage facilities,
including aquifer storage facilities;
(b) Activities and investments necessary to acquire water from
conservation projects;
(c) Infrastructure evaluation, feasibility, environmental
evaluation, design and engineering, and construction modifying existing
storage facilities to provide additional capacity;
(d) Installation and monitoring streamflow and water measurement
devices;
(e) Administration of the Columbia river water management program
and compliance activities associated with the program;
(f) Acquisition of water through agreements with other governments
or federal agencies;
(g) Acquisition of existing state water rights from willing
sellers; and
(h) Bond issuance, sales, and debt service.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.84.092 and 2003 c 361 s 602, 2003 c 324 s 1, 2003
c 150 s 2, and 2003 c 48 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the Columbia river mainstem investment account,
the common school construction fund, the county criminal justice
assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred
compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of retirement systems expense
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, the
emergency reserve fund, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the regional transportation
investment district account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University
of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express
account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state
patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be
distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.84.092 and 2004 c 242 s 60 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the Columbia river mainstem investment account,
the common school construction fund, the county criminal justice
assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred
compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of retirement systems expense
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, the
emergency reserve fund, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the regional transportation
investment district account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University
of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express
account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public
safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state
patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be
distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The department shall adopt rules as
necessary to implement the program. Rules must be consistent with this
chapter and with other applicable laws.
(2) The department shall establish a monitoring program to track
conditions relevant to the effectiveness of the program, including, but
not limited to, the condition of streamflows in the mainstem, and the
number, types, and quantities of water uses approved under this
chapter.
(3) The department shall implement a compliance program, consistent
with RCW 90.03.605, to ensure compliance with the requirements of this
chapter. The department shall appoint one or more water masters for
the Columbia river mainstem to provide local technical assistance, and
to conduct other necessary compliance actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The department shall prepare a biennial
report on the status of the program. The report shall be transmitted
to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature and the
governor by December 31st of even-numbered years. The report shall
include, but not be limited to, information and evaluation of the
status of the mainstem account, the number, types, and quantities of
authorized new uses of water, the number and amount of payments
collected under the program, a summary of compliance monitoring and
enforcement activities on the Columbia river mainstem, including water
use measurement and reporting, the streamflow conditions in the
mainstem and in the primary tributaries to the Columbia river, and the
current and anticipated future conditions of water supplies in the
mainstem account and how those water supplies correspond to current and
anticipated future water needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Ten years after the effective date of this
section, and every ten years thereafter, the department shall conduct
a formal review of the effectiveness of the program. The review shall
include independent evaluations of the economic and scientific
information that provide the premises of the program. As part of the
biennial report required by section 12 of this act, the department
shall notify the governor and legislature of the timing and proposed
process for the formal review and shall request funding to conduct the
necessary independent reviews as part of their biennial budget request
to the governor. Upon completion of the review, the department shall
prepare and transmit a report of the findings of the review, including
any recommendations for legislative changes to the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Nothing in this act may be interpreted or
administered in a manner that impairs or diminishes a valid water
right, including rights established under state law and rights
established under federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for section 9 of this act which takes effect July
1, 2005, and section 10 of this act which takes effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Section 9 of this act expires July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 8 and 11 through 16 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

--- END ---