BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The aviation division of the department of transportation shall
conduct a statewide airport capacity and facilities assessment. The
assessment must include a statewide analysis of existing airport
facilities, and passenger and air cargo transportation capacity,
regarding both commercial aviation and general aviation; however, the
primary focus of the assessment must be on commercial aviation. The
assessment must at a minimum address the following issues:
(a) Existing airport facilities, both commercial and general
aviation, including air side, land side, and airport service
facilities;
(b) Existing air and airport capacity, including the number of
annual passengers and air cargo operations;
(c) Existing airport services, including fixed based operator
services, fuel services, and ground services; and
(d) Existing airspace capacity.
(2) The department shall consider existing information, technical
analyses, and other research the department deems appropriate. The
department may contract and consult with private independent
professional and technical experts regarding the assessment.
(3) The department shall submit the assessment to the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature, the governor, the
transportation commission, and regional transportation planning
organizations by July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) After submitting the assessment under section 1 of this act,
the aviation division of the department of transportation shall conduct
a statewide airport capacity and facilities market analysis. The
analysis must include a statewide needs analysis of airport facilities,
passenger and air cargo transportation capacity, and demand and
forecast market needs over the next twenty-five years with a more
detailed analysis of the Puget Sound, southwest Washington, Spokane,
and Tri-Cities regions. The analysis must address the forecasted needs
of both commercial aviation and general aviation; however, the primary
focus of the analysis must be on commercial aviation. The analysis
must at a minimum address the following issues:
(a) A forecast of future airport facility needs based on passenger
and air cargo operations and demand, airline planning, and a
determination of aviation trends, demographic, geographic, and market
factors that may affect future air travel demand;
(b) A determination of when the state's existing commercial service
airports will reach their capacity;
(c) The factors that may affect future air travel and when capacity
may be reached and in which location;
(d) The role of the state, metropolitan planning organizations,
regional transportation planning organizations, the federal aviation
administration, and airport sponsors in addressing statewide airport
facilities and capacity needs; and
(e) Whether the state, metropolitan planning organizations,
regional transportation planning organizations, the federal aviation
administration, or airport sponsors have identified options for
addressing long-range capacity needs at airports, or in regions, that
will reach capacity before the year 2030.
(2) The department shall consider existing information, technical
analyses, and other research the department deems appropriate. The
department may contract and consult with private independent
professional and technical experts regarding the analysis.
(3) The department shall submit the analysis to the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature, the governor, the
transportation commission, and regional transportation planning
organizations by July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon completion of both the statewide assessment and analysis
required under sections 1 and 2 of this act, and to the extent funds
are appropriated to the department for this purpose, the governor shall
appoint an aviation planning council to consist of the following
members: (a) The director of the aviation division of the department
of transportation, or a designee; (b) the director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development, or a designee; (c) a member
of the transportation commission, who shall be the chair of the
council; (d) two members of the general public with special knowledge
or background in airport issues; (e) a technical expert familiar with
federal aviation administration airspace and control issues; (f) a
commercial airport operator; (g) a member of a growth management
hearings board; (h) a representative of the Washington airport
management association; and (i) an airline representative. The chair
of the council may designate another councilmember to serve as the
acting chair in the absence of the chair. The department of
transportation shall provide all administrative and staff support for
the council.
(2) The purpose of the council is to make recommendations, based on
the findings of the assessment and analysis completed under sections 1
and 2 of this act, regarding how best to meet the statewide commercial
and general aviation capacity needs, as determined by the council. The
council shall determine which regions of the state are in need of
improvement regarding the matching of existing, or projected, airport
facilities, and the long-range capacity needs at airports within the
region expected to reach capacity before the year 2030. After
determining these areas, the council shall make recommendations
regarding the placement of future commercial and general aviation
airport facilities designed to meet the need for improved aviation
planning in the region.
(3) The council shall submit its recommendations to the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature, the governor, the
transportation commission, and applicable regional transportation
planning organizations.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2005, in the omnibus transportation appropriations act, this
act is null and void.

--- END ---