BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Citizens demand and deserve accountability of public programs.
Public programs must continuously improve in quality, efficiency, and
effectiveness in order to increase public trust;
(2) Washington state government and other entities that receive tax
dollars must continuously improve the way they operate and deliver
services so citizens receive maximum value for their tax dollars;
(3) An independent citizen oversight board is necessary to
establish an annual assessment and performance grading program to
ensure that government services, customer satisfaction, program
efficiency, and management systems are world class in performance; and
(4) Fair, independent, professional performance audits of state
agencies by the state auditor are essential to improving the efficiency
and effectiveness of government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of sections 3 through 6 of this act:
(1) "Board" means the citizen oversight board created in section 3
of this act.
(2) "Draft work plan" means the work plan for conducting
performance audits of state agencies proposed by the board and state
auditor after the statewide performance review.
(3) "Final performance audit report" means a written document
jointly released by the citizen oversight board and the state auditor
that includes the findings and comments from the preliminary
performance audit report.
(4) "Final work plan" means the work plan for conducting
performance audits of state agencies adopted by the board and state
auditor.
(5) "Performance audit" means an objective and systematic
assessment of a state agency or any of its programs, functions, or
activities by an independent evaluator in order to help public
officials improve efficiency, effectiveness, and accountability.
Performance audits include economy and efficiency audits and program
audits.
(6) "Preliminary performance audit report" means a written document
prepared after the completion of a performance audit to be submitted
for comment before the final performance audit report. The preliminary
performance audit report must contain the audit findings and any
proposed recommendations to improve the efficiency, effectiveness, or
accountability of the state agency being audited.
(7) "State agency" or "agency" means a state agency, department,
office, officer, board, commission, bureau, division, institution, or
institution of higher education. "State agency" includes all offices
of executive branch state government elected officials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The citizen oversight board is created to improve efficiency,
effectiveness, and accountability in state government.
(2) The board shall consist of seven members as follows:
(a) One member shall be the state auditor, who shall be a nonvoting
member;
(b) One member shall be the chair of the joint legislative audit
and review committee, who shall be a nonvoting member;
(c) Four of the members shall be selected by the governor as
follows: Each major caucus of the house of representatives and the
senate shall submit a list of three names. The lists may not include
the names of members of the legislature. The governor shall select a
person from each list provided by each caucus; and
(d) The governor shall select a member.
(3) The board shall elect a chair. Neither the chair of the joint
legislative audit and review committee nor the state auditor may serve
as chair.
(4) Appointees shall be individuals who have a basic understanding
of state government operations with knowledge and expertise in
performance management, quality management, strategic planning,
performance assessments, or closely related fields.
(5) Members selected under subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this
section shall serve for terms of four years, with the terms expiring on
June 30th on the fourth year of the term. However, in the case of the
initial members, two members shall serve four-year terms, two members
shall serve three-year terms, and one member shall serve a two-year
term, with each of the terms expiring on June 30th of the applicable
year. Appointees may be reappointed to serve more than one term.
(6) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall provide
clerical, technical, and management personnel to the board to serve as
the board's staff.
(7) The board shall meet at least once a quarter and may hold
additional meetings at the call of the chair or by a majority vote of
the members of the board.
(8) The members of the board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.220 and reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall establish an annual assessment and performance
grading program. The program shall consist of conducting annual
performance assessments and grading state agency performance.
Assessments shall be implemented on a phased-in schedule. Initial
areas to be assessed shall include quality management, productivity and
fiscal efficiency, program effectiveness, contract management and
oversight, internal audit, internal and external customer satisfaction,
statutory and regulatory compliance, and technology systems and on-line
services. As part of this program, the board shall:
(a) Consult with and seek input from elected officials, state
employees, and professionals with a background in performance
management for establishing the grading standards. In developing the
criteria, the board shall consider already developed best practices and
audit criteria used by government or nongovernment organizations.
Before the assessment, the agencies shall be given the criteria for the
assessment and the standards for grading;
(b) Contract or partner with public or private entities that have
expertise in public sector reviews and/or technical expertise in
individual assessment areas to perform the assessments and grading of
all state agencies. The board may contract or partner with more than
one entity for different assessment areas; and
(c) Submit the results of the assessment and grading program to the
governor, the office of financial management, appropriate legislative
committees, and the public by December 15th of each year. The results
of the annual assessments and performance grading shall be posted on
the internet.
(2) The board and the state auditor shall work together regarding
performance audits of state government.
(a) The board shall establish criteria for performance audits.
Agencies shall be audited using criteria that include generally
accepted government auditing standards as well as legislative mandates
and performance objectives established by state agencies. Mandates
include, but are not limited to, agency strategies, timelines, program
objectives, and mission and goals as required in RCW 43.88.090.
(b) Using the criteria developed in (a) of this subsection, the
board and the state auditor shall complete a statewide performance
review within one year of contracting as a preliminary to a draft work
plan for conducting performance audits. The board and the state
auditor shall develop a schedule and common methodology for conducting
these reviews.
(c) The board and the state auditor shall develop the draft work
plan for performance audits based on input from citizens, state
employees, state managers, the joint legislative audit and review
committee, public officials, and others. The draft work plan may
include a list of agencies, programs, or systems to be audited on a
timeline decided by the board and the state auditor based on a number
of factors including risk, importance, and citizen concerns. All
audits shall be designed to be completed within a six-month period.
(d) Before adopting the final work plan, the board shall consult
with the legislative auditor and other appropriate oversight and audit
entities to coordinate work plans and avoid duplication of effort in
their planned performance audits of state government agencies. The
board shall defer to the joint legislative audit and review committee
work plan if a similar audit is included on both work plans for
auditing. The final work plan must be agreed upon by the board and the
state auditor.
(e) The state auditor shall contract out for performance audits.
In conducting the audits, agency front-line employees and internal
auditors should be involved. The audits may include:
(i) Identification of programs and services that can be eliminated,
reduced, consolidated, or enhanced;
(ii) Identification of funding sources to the state agency, to
programs, and to services that can be eliminated, reduced,
consolidated, or enhanced;
(iii) Analysis of gaps and overlaps in programs and services and
recommendations for improving, dropping, blending, or separating
functions to correct gaps or overlaps;
(iv) Analysis and recommendations for pooling information
technology systems used within the state agency, and evaluation of
information processing and telecommunications policy, organization, and
management;
(v) Analysis of the roles and functions of the state agency, its
programs, and its services and their compliance with statutory
authority and recommendations for eliminating or changing those roles
and functions and ensuring compliance with statutory authority;
(vi) Recommendations for eliminating or changing statutes, rules,
and policy directives as may be necessary to ensure that the agency
carry out reasonably and properly those functions vested in the agency
by statute;
(vii) Verification of the reliability and validity of agency
performance data, self-assessments, and performance measurement systems
as required under RCW 43.88.090;
(viii) Identification of potential cost savings in the state
agency, its programs, and its services;
(ix) Identification and recognition of best practices;
(x) Evaluation of planning, budgeting, and program evaluation
policies and practices;
(xi) Evaluation of personnel systems operation and management;
(xii) Evaluation of state purchasing operations and management
policies and practices; and
(xiii) Evaluation of organizational structure and staffing levels,
particularly in terms of the ratio of managers and supervisors to
nonmanagement personnel.
(f) The state auditor and the board may develop a grading system
for the audits. The audit report may include the agency grade,
evaluation and identification of best practices, and findings and
recommendations for efficiency and effectiveness of state programs.
The board and the state auditor shall examine a system for grading the
audits. The board shall report its findings to the legislature by
December 31, 2005.
(g) The state auditor must solicit comments on preliminary
performance audit reports from the audited state agency, the office of
the governor, the office of financial management, the board, and the
joint legislative audit and review committee for comment. Comments
must be received within thirty days after receipt of the preliminary
performance audit report unless a different time period is approved by
the state auditor. All comments shall be incorporated into the final
performance audit report. The final performance audit report shall
include the objectives, scope, and methodology; the audit results,
including findings and recommendations; conclusions; and identification
of best practices.
(h) The final performance audit reports shall be submitted to the
board by the state auditor. The board and the state auditor shall
jointly release final performance audit reports to the citizens of
Washington, the governor, and the appropriate legislative committees.
Final performance audit reports shall be posted on the internet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the authority given the state auditor in RCW
43.88.160(6), the state auditor is authorized to contract for and
oversee performance audits pursuant to section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The audited agency is responsible for follow-up and corrective
action on all performance audit findings and recommendations. The
audited agency's plan for addressing each audit finding and
recommendation shall be included in the final audit report. The plan
shall provide the name of the contact person responsible for each
action, the action planned, and the anticipated completion date. If
the audited agency does not agree with the audit findings and
recommendations or believes action is not required, then the action
plan shall include an explanation and specific reasons.
For agencies under the authority of the governor, the governor may
require periodic progress reports from the audited agency until all
resolution has occurred.
For agencies under the authority of an elected official other than
the governor, the auditor and the board may require periodic reports of
the action taken by the audited agency until all resolution has
occurred.
The board may request status reports on specific audits or
findings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The citizen oversight board created in section 3 of this act and
its powers and duties shall be terminated June 30, 2012, as provided in
section 8 of this act. The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall contract with a private entity for the review in this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2013:
(1) Section 2 of this act;
(2) Section 3 of this act;
(3) Section 4 of this act;
(4) Section 5 of this act; and
(5) Section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each state agency shall, within available funds, develop and
implement a quality management program to improve the quality,
efficiency, and effectiveness of the public services it provides
through business process redesign, employee involvement, and other
quality management techniques. Each agency shall ensure that front
line agency employees are engaged in the program and shall provide
employees with the training necessary for successful implementation of
efforts toward quality improvement.
(2) Each agency shall, within available funds, ensure that its
quality management program:
(a) Identifies immediate-term and near-term opportunities to
improve services and reduce costs;
(b) Identifies goals and uses strategic business planning and
performance measures to establish priorities and measure progress
toward meeting them. Each state agency shall develop performance
measures to assess customer satisfaction, agency progress toward
accomplishing outcomes specified in the agency budget under RCW
43.88.090, and the impact of initiatives instituted under the quality
management program as a whole;
(c) Reports the results of its quality management program on a
regular basis. Each agency shall ensure that its report specifies
improved outcomes for public service and efficiency. Any agency in its
report may describe methods of measuring customer and stakeholder
satisfaction, of engaging agency employees in the program, and of
assessing the extent to which business practices have been changed to
improve quality, efficiency, and effectiveness;
(d) Evaluates the results of its quality, service, and management
improvement programs and assesses program effects upon leadership,
information and analysis, strategic planning, human resource
development and management, process improvement, business results, and
customer focus and satisfaction; and
(e) Develops a plan for quality improvement, documenting efforts
made up to the date of the report and addressing all matters enumerated
in this subsection.
(3) State agencies whose chief executives are appointed by the
governor shall report program results to the governor on a regular
basis. State agencies whose chief executives are elected officials
other than the governor shall report program results to the elected
official on a regular basis.
(4) Each state agency shall integrate efforts made under this
section with quality management programs undertaken under executive
order or other authority. The office of the secretary of state, the
department of social and health services, and the department of
corrections shall develop and implement a complete quality management
program by June 30, 2007. The office of insurance commissioner, the
department of natural resources, and four-year institutions of higher
education shall develop and implement a complete quality management
program by June 30, 2008. All other state agencies shall develop and
implement a complete quality management program by June 30, 2006.
(5) Starting in 2008 and at least once every three years
thereafter, the office of the secretary of state, the department of
social and health services, and the department of corrections shall
apply for the Washington state quality award, or an equivalent outside
quality assessment, for potential recognition. Starting in 2010 and at
least once every three years thereafter, the office of insurance
commissioner, the department of natural resources, and four-year
institutions of higher education, or their subdivisions, or both, shall
apply for the Washington state quality award or an equivalent outside
quality assessment, for potential recognition. Starting in 2007 and at
least once every three years thereafter, all other state agencies or
their subdivisions, or both, shall apply for the Washington state
quality award or an equivalent outside quality assessment, for
potential recognition. Every subdivision of a state agency with three
thousand or more full-time equivalent employees must complete an
application in each three-year period.
(6) For purposes of this section, "state agency" means those state
agencies within the executive branch of government including
institutions of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The senate and the house of representatives shall each develop and
implement quality improvement programs as described under section 9 of
this act by June 30, 2007, and shall report the results of these
efforts to the leadership of each major political party caucus within
its respective house.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 2.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The supreme court is encouraged to develop and implement quality
improvement programs, as described under section 9 of this act, for the
judicial branch of government, by June 30, 2007, and shall report the
results of these efforts to the chief justice. The programs may be
implemented directly by the supreme court or may be delegated to the
administrator for the courts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Local governments are encouraged to develop and implement
quality management programs as described in section 9 of this act.
(2) For purposes of this section, "local government" includes every
county, city, town, special district, municipal corporation, and quasi-municipal corporation in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2005, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---