BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that elevated levels
of arsenic and lead are present in some areas of Washington from
primarily three historical sources: Air emissions from metal smelters,
application of lead arsenate pesticides, and combustion of leaded
gasoline. This contamination, unlike that in most previously
recognized contaminated sites, tends to be distributed over a wide
geographic area and in a relatively thin layer near the ground surface.
Exposure to high levels of arsenic can cause more than thirty distinct
health effects, including nervous system damage, increased blood
pressure, heart attack, stroke, and cancer of the bladder, lung, skin,
and other organs. Lead can affect many parts of the body, causing
health effects that include increased blood pressure, kidney damage,
and brain damage. Although both children and adults can be adversely
affected by lead poisoning, it is a particular concern for young
children. Arsenic and lead are both considered persistent
contaminants, meaning that they bind strongly to soil and usually
remain in the environment without breaking down or losing their
toxicity, and thus can be a source of exposure for many decades.
Because children, particularly young children, are more vulnerable to
health effects from exposure to high levels of lead and arsenic, it is
necessary and appropriate that state and local health agencies provide
a focused program upon the health risks posed at child use areas in
schools, parks, and day-care settings.
Therefore, it is the purpose of this chapter to create the safe
playground soils program, through which technical and financial
assistance will be provided by state and local health jurisdictions to
the owners and operators of facilities having child use areas that may
contain soils with elevated levels of heavy metals. It is further the
purpose of this chapter to encourage testing of soils in such areas,
and to require testing in geographic zones at higher risk of soil
contamination.
The legislature further declares that the objective of this program
is to obtain comprehensive information on the presence of heavy metals
in child use areas, and to ensure that such information is made
available to, and in some circumstances specifically provided to,
parents of children attending or using the facility and the staff
members working at the facility. It is the underlying premise of this
program that comprehensive and high quality data and analysis, shared
with all interested persons, will be the basis for timely and effective
response measures to protect the health of children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter and sections 11 and 12 of this act unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Action level" means a soil concentration of a heavy metal
expressed in milligrams of heavy metal per kilogram of soil, that the
director of the department determines by rule is at a sufficiently low
level and distributed in such a way that public health may be protected
through implementation of best management practices.
(2) "Child use areas" means outdoor areas used frequently by
children twelve years and younger in age for recreational or
educational activities, located within the following facilities,
whether publicly or privately owned: (a) Schools and preschools; (b)
child-care centers and family day-care providers; (c) parks and
sportsfields; and (d) seasonal camps.
(3) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(4) "Heavy metals" means lead and arsenic. The department may
include by rule, additional heavy metals in this definition with regard
to specific activities of the program authorized in this chapter where
it determines that comparable public health benefits may be achieved by
applying the same testing and response measures to address
contamination from such metals.
(5) "Parents" means parents, guardians and custodians.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The safe playground soils program is
hereby created and consists of the elements described in this chapter
and sections 11 and 12 of this act. The department shall administer
the program with the assistance of the department of health and local
health jurisdictions. The objective of the program is to maximize the
reduction of health risks arising from the exposure of people,
particularly young children, to heavy metals in soils located in child
use areas. The department shall implement the program through a
coordinated program of child use area testing, reporting of test
results, and developing and implementing response measures where action
levels are exceeded. The department may, through an interagency
agreement, authorize the department of health or any local health
jurisdiction to administer any activity in the program that is not
otherwise assigned to the department of health or local health
jurisdictions by this chapter or sections 11 or 12 of this act. The
department shall administer the program statewide, while providing the
principal devotion of resources to the higher risk geographic zones
identified in section 5 of this act.
(2) The department may, through an interagency agreement, allocate
a portion of the funds provided in this chapter to other state agencies
to develop procedures and expertise needed to implement specific
elements of the safe playground soils program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department shall provide grants
through the local toxics control account to local health jurisdictions
for testing soils at child use areas for the presence of heavy metals.
(2) In areas where the local health jurisdiction elects not to
conduct soil testing at child use areas, the department shall test
soils when requested by the owners of facilities with child use areas.
(3) The department shall actively publicize the soil testing
program and solicit requests for soil testing with the objective of
obtaining soil test results expeditiously and implementing best
management practices where action level exceedances are found.
(4) The department and local health jurisdictions shall act
expeditiously on requests for soil testing, providing a high priority
in acting upon requests for testing at facilities located within the
higher risk zones identified in section 5 of this act.
(5) For the biennium ending June 30, 2007, if total soil testing
requests and costs of administering the program authorized by this
chapter exceed the amounts appropriated for this purpose, the
department shall request an additional appropriation at the next
session of the legislature sufficient to satisfy these needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The following geographic areas are
designated higher risk zones for potential soil contamination by heavy
metals:
(a) The area of potential heavy metal deposition to soils from the
Tacoma smelter, generally encompassing portions of King, Pierce,
Kitsap, and Thurston counties, and referred to as the Tacoma smelter
plume zone. The department shall by rule define this zone based upon
available information no later than July 1, 2006;
(b) Any other geographic area that is defined by a local health
jurisdiction or by the department by rule as having a high probability
of encompassing child use areas with heavy metals in soils exceeding
action levels.
(2) The agencies administering the grant program under section 4 of
this act shall use maximum efforts to notify all facilities with child
use areas within the Tacoma smelter plume zone of the availability of
the public grants and the program created under this chapter. The
agencies shall encourage facility owners to conduct soil testing within
child use areas if tests have not already been conducted.
(3) Not later than January 1, 2006, and January 1, 2008, the
department shall provide a report to the governor and to the
appropriate committees of the house of representatives and senate
regarding the extent of testing conducted in child use areas within
higher risk zones, including tests conducted with public grants and
other testing.
(4) Not later than July 1, 2009, the department and the department
of health shall jointly assess the level of testing of child use areas
within the Tacoma smelter plume zone and other zones designated by
local health jurisdictions or the department on or before July 1, 2007.
If the departments determine that soil tests have been conducted at
less than eighty percent of the child use areas within such zones, the
department of health shall adopt a rule no later than December 31,
2010, that requires soil tests to be conducted within such zones and
any additional zones designated by local health jurisdictions or the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The results of a soil test of a child
use area shall be made available upon request by the owner of the
facility to parents of children attending or visiting the facility and
staff members working at the facility. The facility owner shall use
reasonable measures to inform parents and staff members of the
existence of such test results, including posting of the information on
the facility's web site, if the facility maintains a web site.
(2) Where soil tests indicate that the child use area contains
soils exceeding action levels, the facility owner shall notify parents
and staff members of the results and actions that the owner is planning
in response. The facility owner shall also provide the test results to
the department, which shall forward the information to the local health
jurisdiction. With respect to publicly or privately owned parks, the
owner shall notify staff members and obtain guidance from the local
health jurisdiction as to the means to notify potential users of the
park facility.
(3) The owners of facilities with child use areas shall permit
parents of children attending the facility to obtain soil samples for
soil testing. Owners may impose reasonable conditions on access for
obtaining soil samples, and owners may require that a split sample be
provided to them.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) In consultation with the department of
health, the department shall adopt best management practice guidelines
for facilities having elevated levels of heavy metals in child use area
soils. The guidelines shall recommend a range of alternative measures
considering the concentration, extent, and location of contamination
and the nature and frequency of child use of the area.
(2) The department may provide grants to local health jurisdictions
for technical assistance to owners of facilities with child use areas
to implement best management practices.
(3) The department may provide grants to owners of facilities with
child use areas to implement best management practices pursuant to
plans developed under section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The owner of a facility with a child use
area for which soil tests indicate the presence of heavy metals
exceeding action levels shall implement best management practices
consistent with the guidelines adopted under section 7 of this act.
Within ninety days of receipt of the soil tests the owner shall inform
the department in writing of the owner's intended plan for implementing
best management practices. The plan shall also be made available to
the parents and staff members who work at the facility.
(2) An owner completing implementation of best management practices
shall inform the department in writing and may request that the
department provide a recognition of voluntary cleanup letter under
section 9 of this act. Information regarding the implementation of
best management practices shall be made available to the parents and
staff members who work at the facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The owner of a facility with a child use
area that implements best management practices may request that the
department issue a recognition of voluntary cleanup letter. The letter
may be issued by the department where it concludes, based upon
documentation submitted by the facility and any site visits and
additional analysis that the department may choose to conduct, that the
owner has implemented best management practices consistent with the
guidelines adopted under section 7 of this act. The department may
charge a fee for the department's costs reasonably attributable to
reviewing the request and issuing the letter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Nothing in this chapter or section 11 or 12
of this act is intended to limit the authority of the department or
other agencies to require actions to address soil contamination of
child use areas under other laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 70.105D
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a policy regarding enforcement
of this chapter through orders to owners of facilities implementing
best management practices at child use areas under chapter 70.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 10 of this act). The policy shall establish the
primary objective of reducing exposure of children to heavy metals in
soils through the testing and action steps of chapter 70.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 10 of this act), rather than the enforcement
authorities of this chapter.
(2) The policy shall not apply:
(a) If the facility owner fails to complete implementation of best
management practices in a timely manner as determined by the
department;
(b) If the facility owner refuses to provide information to the
department or to provide reasonable access to the child use area by the
department for soil testing or other site inspection;
(c) To hazardous substances not included within the best management
practices plan developed under section 8 of this act, or to areas
within the facility that are not child use areas addressed in the plan;
or
(d) To ground water contamination whose source is heavy metals in
the child use area.
(3) The policy in this section shall not affect the availability to
the facility owner of the option to pursue and reach a settlement
agreement under RCW 70.105D.040. It also shall not affect the owner's
election to conduct a voluntary cleanup or to request a no further
action letter from the department under the authority of this chapter.
(4) Except as expressly provided in this section, nothing in
chapter 70.-- RCW (sections 1 through 10 of this act) affects or limits
the provisions of this chapter.
(5) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2009, the department of social and health services
shall adopt as a condition of licensing day-care centers and family
day-care providers that the facility is in compliance with applicable
testing requirements and implementation of best management practices
under chapter 70.-- RCW (sections 1 through 10 of this act). The
requirements shall include, but are not limited to, a condition of the
license that requires implementation of best management practices where
soil test results exceed action levels established by the department of
ecology under section 3 of this act. The department of social and
health services shall also require that an applicant for a new license
to operate a facility located or to be located within a higher risk
zone designated under section 5 of this act must test soils located
within the proposed child use area and commit to implementation of best
management practices in the event that the test results indicate an
exceedance above action levels.
(2) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The sum of one million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the state toxics
control account to the department of ecology for the biennium ending
June 30, 2007, to carry out the purposes of this act.

--- END ---