BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall adopt rules, under RCW 41.06.400(2)(b),
developing policies, procedures, and mandatory training programs on
sexual harassment for all state employees. The cost of the training
programs shall be borne by state agencies within existing resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---