BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that human
trafficking is growing to epidemic proportions and that our state is
impacted. Human trafficking is one of the greatest threats to human
dignity. It is the commodification of human beings and an assault on
human values. Washington is, and must continue to be, a national
leader at the state level in the fight against human trafficking.
The legislature recognizes there are many state agencies and
private organizations that might be called on to provide services to
victims of trafficking of humans. Victims of human trafficking are
often in need of services such as emergency medical attention, food and
shelter, vocational and English language training, mental health
counseling, and legal support. The state intends to improve the
response of state, local, and private entities to incidents of
trafficking of humans. Victims would be better served if there is an
established, coordinated system of identifying the needs of trafficking
victims, protocols for training of service delivery agencies and staff,
timely and appropriate delivery of services, and better investigations
and prosecutions of trafficking.
Leadership in providing services to victims of trafficking of
humans also extends beyond government efforts and is grounded in the
work of highly dedicated individuals and community-based groups.
Without these efforts the struggle against human trafficking will be
very difficult to win. The legislature, therefore, finds that such
efforts merit regular public recognition and appreciation. Such
recognition and appreciation will encourage the efforts of all persons
to end human trafficking, and provide the public with information and
education about the necessity of its involvement in this struggle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 7.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2005, the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development, or the director's designee, shall
within existing resources convene and chair a work group to develop
written protocols for delivery of services to victims of trafficking of
humans. The director shall invite appropriate federal agencies to
consult with the work group for the purpose of developing protocols
that, to the extent possible, are in concert with federal statutes,
regulations, and policies. In addition to the director of the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the following
shall be members of the work group: The secretary of the department of
health, the secretary of the department of social and health services,
the attorney general, the director of the department of labor and
industries, the commissioner of the employment security department, a
representative of the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys,
the chief of the Washington state patrol, two members selected by the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and five members,
selected by the director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development from a list submitted by public and private sector
organizations that provide assistance to persons who are victims of
trafficking. The attorney general, the chief of the Washington state
patrol, and the secretaries or directors may designate a person to
serve in their place.
Members of the work group shall serve without compensation.
(2) The protocols must meet all of the following minimum standards:
(a) The protocols must apply to the following state agencies: The
department of community, trade, and economic development, the
department of health, the department of social and health services, the
attorney general's office, the Washington state patrol, the department
of labor and industries, and the employment security department;
(b) The protocols must provide policies and procedures for
interagency coordinated operations and cooperation with government
agencies and nongovernmental organizations, agencies, and
jurisdictions, including law enforcement agencies and prosecuting
attorneys;
(c) The protocols must include the establishment of a data base
electronically available to all affected agencies which contains the
name, address, and telephone numbers of agencies that provide services
to victims of human trafficking; and
(d) The protocols must provide guidelines for providing for the
social service needs of victims of trafficking of humans, including
housing, health care, and employment.
(3) By January 1, 2006, the work group shall finalize the written
protocols and submit them with a report to the legislature and the
governor.
(4) The protocols shall be reviewed on a biennial basis by the work
group to determine whether revisions are appropriate. The director of
the department of community, trade, and economic development, or the
director's designee, shall within existing resources reconvene and
chair the work group for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is created an award to honor and recognize individuals
and groups, public or private, who have made noteworthy efforts to
fight human trafficking or to provide services to the victims of human
trafficking.
(2) The governor, in conjunction with the director, shall identify
and honor up to two individuals or groups, public or private, in
Washington state who have made noteworthy efforts to fight human
trafficking or to provide services to the victims of human trafficking.
The award shall be given annually, commencing September 2005,
consistent with the availability of qualified nominees. The director
shall appoint a broad-based advisory committee that includes community
advocacy and other organizations and agencies serving trafficking
victims, immigrants, and others affected by trafficking.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---