BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.52.117 and 1994 c 261 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who does any of the following is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment not to exceed one year, or by a
fine not to exceed five thousand dollars, or by both fine and
imprisonment:
(a) Owns, possesses, keeps, or trains any animal with the intent
that the animal shall be engaged in an exhibition of fighting with
another animal;
(b) Sells or purchases any dog (Canidae) with the intent that the
dog shall be engaged in an exhibition of fighting with another animal;
(c) For amusement or gain causes any animal to fight with another
animal, or causes any animals to injure each other; or
(((c))) (d) Permits any act in violation of (a) ((or)), (b), or (c)
of this subsection to be done on any premises under his or her charge
or control, or promotes or aids or abets any such act.
(2) Any person who is knowingly present, as a spectator, at any
place or building where preparations are being made for an exhibition
of the fighting of animals, with the intent to be present at such
preparations, or is knowingly present at such exhibition or at any
other fighting or injuring as described in subsection (1)(((b))) (c) of
this section, with the intent to be present at such exhibition,
fighting, or injuring, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(3) Nothing in this section may prohibit the following:
(a) The use of dogs in the management of livestock, as defined by
chapter 16.57 RCW, by the owner of the livestock or the owner's
employees or agents or other persons in lawful custody of the
livestock;
(b) The use of dogs in hunting as permitted by law; or
(c) The training of animals or the use of equipment in the training
of animals for any purpose not prohibited by law.
(4) Mere ownership or possession of any animal does not create a
presumption that the animal is owned or possessed for any purpose
prohibited under this section.

--- END ---