BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.09.250 and 2003 c 216 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The secretary is authorized to site, construct, occupy, and
operate (i) a secure community transition facility on McNeil Island for
persons authorized to petition for a less restrictive alternative under
RCW 71.09.090(1) and who are conditionally released; and (ii) a special
commitment center on McNeil Island with up to four hundred four beds as
a total confinement facility under this chapter, subject to
appropriated funding for those purposes. The secure community
transition facility shall be authorized for the number of beds needed
to ensure compliance with the orders of the superior courts under this
chapter and the federal district court for the western district of
Washington. The total number of beds in the secure community
transition facility shall be limited to twenty-four, consisting of up
to fifteen transitional beds and up to nine pretransitional beds. The
residents occupying the transitional beds shall be the only residents
eligible for transitional services occurring in Pierce county. In no
event shall more than fifteen residents of the secure community
transition facility be participating in off-island transitional,
educational, or employment activity at the same time in Pierce county.
For each resident who participates in off-island activities, a
transportation route plan shall be developed by the department. The
department shall provide the Pierce county sheriff, or his or her
designee, with a list of the fifteen residents so designated, along
with their photographs and physical descriptions, and the list shall be
immediately updated whenever a residential change occurs. The Pierce
county sheriff, or his or her designee, shall be provided an
opportunity to confirm the residential status of each resident leaving
McNeil Island.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "transitional beds" means beds
only for residents who are judged by a qualified expert to be suitable
to leave the island for treatment, education, and employment.
(2)(a) The secretary is authorized to site, either within the
secure community transition facility established pursuant to subsection
(1)(a)(i) of this section, or within the special commitment center, up
to nine pretransitional beds.
(b) Residents assigned to pretransitional beds shall not be
permitted to leave McNeil Island for education, employment, treatment,
or community activities in Pierce county.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, "pretransitional beds" means
beds for residents whose progress toward a less secure residential
environment and transition into more complete community involvement is
projected to take substantially longer than a typical resident of the
special commitment center.
(3) Notwithstanding RCW 36.70A.103 or any other law, this statute
preempts and supersedes local plans, development regulations,
permitting requirements, inspection requirements, and all other laws as
necessary to enable the secretary to site, construct, occupy, and
operate a secure community transition facility on McNeil Island and a
total confinement facility on McNeil Island.
(4) To the greatest extent possible, until June 30, 2003, persons
who were not civilly committed from the county in which the secure
community transition facility established pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section is located may not be conditionally released to a setting
in that same county less restrictive than that facility.
(5) As of June 26, 2001, the state shall immediately cease any
efforts in effect on such date to site secure community transition
facilities, other than the facility authorized by subsection (1) of
this section, and shall instead site such facilities in accordance with
the provisions of this section.
(6) The department must:
(a) Identify the minimum and maximum number of secure community
transition facility beds in addition to the facility established under
subsection (1) of this section that may be necessary for the period of
May 2004 through May 2007 and provide notice of these numbers to all
counties by August 31, 2001; and
(b) Develop and publish policy guidelines for the siting and
operation of secure community transition facilities.
(7)(a) The total number of secure community transition facility
beds that may be required to be sited in a county between June 26,
2001, and June 30, 2008, may be no greater than the total number of
persons civilly committed from that county, or detained at the special
commitment center under a pending civil commitment petition from that
county where a finding of probable cause had been made on April 1,
2001. The total number of secure community transition facility beds
required to be sited in each county between July 1, 2008, and June 30,
2015, may be no greater than the total number of persons civilly
committed from that county or detained at the special commitment center
under a pending civil commitment petition from that county where a
finding of probable cause had been made as of July 1, 2008.
(b) Counties and cities that provide secure community transition
facility beds above the maximum number that they could be required to
site under this subsection are eligible for a bonus grant under the
incentive provisions in RCW 71.09.255. The county where the special
commitment center is located shall receive this bonus grant for the
number of beds in the facility established in subsection (1) of this
section in excess of the maximum number established by this subsection.
(c) No secure community transition facilities in addition to the
one established in subsection (1) of this section may be required to be
sited in the county where the special commitment center is located
until after June 30, 2008, provided however, that the county and its
cities may elect to site additional secure community transition
facilities and shall be eligible under the incentive provisions of RCW
71.09.255 for any additional facilities meeting the requirements of
that section.
(8) In identifying potential sites within a county for the location
of a secure community transition facility, the department shall work
with and assist local governments to provide for the equitable
distribution of such facilities. In coordinating and deciding upon the
siting of secure community transition facilities, great weight shall be
given by the county and cities within the county to:
(a) The number and location of existing residential facility beds
operated by the department of corrections or the mental health division
of the department of social and health services in each jurisdiction in
the county; and
(b) The number of registered sex offenders classified as level II
or level III and the number of sex offenders registered as homeless
residing in each jurisdiction in the county.
(9)(a) "Equitable distribution" means siting or locating secure
community transition facilities in a manner that will not cause a
disproportionate grouping of similar facilities either in any one
county, or in any one jurisdiction or community within a county, as
relevant; and
(b) "Jurisdiction" means a city, town, or geographic area of a
county in which distinct political or judicial authority may be
exercised.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.09.275 and 2003 c 216 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the department does not provide a separate vessel for
transporting residents of the secure community transition facility
established in RCW 71.09.250(1) between McNeil Island and the mainland,
the department shall:
(a) Separate residents from minors and vulnerable adults, except
vulnerable adults who have been found to be sexually violent predators.
(b) Not transport residents during times when children are normally
coming to and from the mainland for school.
(2) The department shall designate a separate waiting area at the
points of debarkation, and residents shall be required to remain in
this area while awaiting transportation.
(3) The department shall provide law enforcement agencies in the
counties and cities in which residents of the secure community
transition facility established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250(1)(a)(i)
regularly participate in employment, education, or social services, or
through which these persons are regularly transported, with a copy of
the department's approved transportation route plan and the court's
order of conditional release with respect to these persons.
(4) An escort shall make a good faith effort to notify law
enforcement agencies in the counties and cities in which residents of
the secure transition facility regularly participate in employment,
education, or social services, or through which these persons are
regularly transported, of any deviation from the transportation route
plan, either before commencing or while transporting, or as soon
thereafter as can be safely accomplished.

--- END ---