BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.040 and 2003 c 53 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person, whether an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the
crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree, if the
person owns, has in his or her possession, or has in his or her control
any firearm after having previously been convicted or found not guilty
by reason of insanity in this state or elsewhere of any serious offense
as defined in this chapter.
(b) Unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree is a class
B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2)(a) A person, whether an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the
crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the second degree, if the
person does not qualify under subsection (1) of this section for the
crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree and the
person owns, has in his or her possession, or has in his or her control
any firearm:
(i) After having previously been convicted or found not guilty by
reason of insanity in this state or elsewhere of any felony not
specifically listed as prohibiting firearm possession under subsection
(1) of this section, or any of the following crimes when committed by
one family or household member against another, committed on or after
July 1, 1993: Assault in the fourth degree, coercion, stalking,
reckless endangerment, criminal trespass in the first degree, or
violation of the provisions of a protection order or no-contact order
restraining the person or excluding the person from a residence (RCW
26.50.060, 26.50.070, 26.50.130, or 10.99.040);
(ii) After having previously been involuntarily committed for
mental health treatment under RCW 71.05.320, 71.34.090, chapter 10.77
RCW, or equivalent statutes of another jurisdiction, unless his or her
right to possess a firearm has been restored as provided in RCW
9.41.047;
(iii) If the person is under eighteen years of age, except as
provided in RCW 9.41.042; and/or
(iv) If the person is free on bond or personal recognizance pending
trial, appeal, or sentencing for a serious offense as defined in RCW
9.41.010.
(b) Unlawful possession of a firearm in the second degree is a
class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(3) Notwithstanding RCW 9.41.047 or any other provisions of law, as
used in this chapter, a person has been "convicted", whether in an
adult court or adjudicated in a juvenile court, at such time as a plea
of guilty has been accepted, or a verdict of guilty has been filed,
notwithstanding the pendency of any future proceedings including but
not limited to sentencing or disposition, post-trial or post-factfinding motions, and appeals. Conviction includes a dismissal
entered after a period of probation, suspension or deferral of
sentence, and also includes equivalent dispositions by courts in
jurisdictions other than Washington state. A person shall not be
precluded from possession of a firearm if the conviction has been the
subject of a pardon, annulment, certificate of rehabilitation, or other
equivalent procedure based on a finding of the rehabilitation of the
person convicted or the conviction or disposition has been the subject
of a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based on a
finding of innocence. Where no record of the court's disposition of
the charges can be found, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that
the person was not convicted of the charge.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) or (2) of this section, a person
convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of an offense
prohibiting the possession of a firearm under this section other than
murder, manslaughter, robbery, rape, indecent liberties, arson,
assault, kidnapping, extortion, burglary, or violations with respect to
controlled substances under RCW 69.50.401 and 69.50.410, who received
a probationary sentence under RCW 9.95.200, and who received a
dismissal of the charge under RCW 9.95.240, shall not be precluded from
possession of a firearm as a result of the conviction or finding of not
guilty by reason of insanity. Notwithstanding any other provisions of
this section, if a person is prohibited from possession of a firearm
under subsection (1) or (2) of this section and has not previously been
convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of a sex offense
prohibiting firearm ownership under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section and/or any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
with a maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, the
individual may petition a court of record to have his or her right to
possess a firearm restored:
(a) Under RCW 9.41.047; and/or
(b)(i) If the conviction or finding of not guilty by reason of
insanity was for a felony offense, after five or more consecutive years
in the community without being convicted or found not guilty by reason
of insanity or currently charged with any felony, gross misdemeanor, or
misdemeanor crimes, if the individual has no prior felony convictions
that prohibit the possession of a firearm counted as part of the
offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; or
(ii) If the conviction or finding of not guilty by reason of
insanity was for a nonfelony offense, after three or more consecutive
years in the community without being convicted or found not guilty by
reason of insanity or currently charged with any felony, gross
misdemeanor, or misdemeanor crimes, if the individual has no prior
felony convictions that prohibit the possession of a firearm counted as
part of the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525 and the individual has
completed all conditions of the sentence.
(5) In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, if a
person under the age of eighteen years is found by a court to have
possessed a firearm in a vehicle in violation of subsection (1) or (2)
of this section or to have committed an offense while armed with a
firearm during which offense a motor vehicle served an integral
function, the court shall notify the department of licensing within
twenty-four hours and the person's privilege to drive shall be revoked
under RCW 46.20.265.
(6) Nothing in chapter 129, Laws of 1995 shall ever be construed or
interpreted as preventing an offender from being charged and
subsequently convicted for the separate felony crimes of theft of a
firearm or possession of a stolen firearm, or both, in addition to
being charged and subsequently convicted under this section for
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second degree.
Notwithstanding any other law, if the offender is convicted under this
section for unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second
degree and for the felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession of
a stolen firearm, or both, then the offender shall serve consecutive
sentences for each of the felony crimes of conviction listed in this
subsection.
(7) Each firearm unlawfully possessed under this section shall be
a separate offense.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.41.047 and 1996 c 295 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time a person is convicted or found not guilty by reason
of insanity of an offense making the person ineligible to possess a
firearm, or at the time a person is committed by court order under RCW
71.05.320, 71.34.090, or chapter 10.77 RCW for mental health treatment,
the convicting or committing court shall notify the person, orally and
in writing, that the person must immediately surrender any concealed
pistol license and that the person may not possess a firearm unless his
or her right to do so is restored by a court of record. For purposes
of this section a convicting court includes a court in which a person
has been found not guilty by reason of insanity.
The convicting or committing court also shall forward a copy of the
person's driver's license or identicard, or comparable information, to
the department of licensing, along with the date of conviction or
commitment.
(2) Upon receipt of the information provided for by subsection (1)
of this section, the department of licensing shall determine if the
convicted or committed person has a concealed pistol license. If the
person does have a concealed pistol license, the department of
licensing shall immediately notify the license-issuing authority which,
upon receipt of such notification, shall immediately revoke the
license.
(3)(a) A person who is prohibited from possessing a firearm, by
reason of having been involuntarily committed for mental health
treatment under RCW 71.05.320, 71.34.090, chapter 10.77 RCW, or
equivalent statutes of another jurisdiction may, upon discharge,
petition a court of record to have his or her right to possess a
firearm restored. At the time of commitment, the court shall
specifically state to the person that he or she is barred from
possession of firearms.
(b) The secretary of social and health services shall develop
appropriate rules to create an approval process under this subsection.
The rules must provide for the restoration of the right to possess a
firearm upon a showing in a court of competent jurisdiction that the
person is no longer required to participate in an inpatient or
outpatient treatment program, is no longer required to take medication
to treat any condition related to the commitment, and does not present
a substantial danger to himself or herself, others, or the public.
Unlawful possession of a firearm under this subsection shall be
punished as a class C felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(c) A person petitioning the court under this subsection (3) shall
bear the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the
circumstances resulting in the commitment no longer exist and are not
reasonably likely to recur. If a preponderance of the evidence in the
record supports a finding that the person petitioning the court has
engaged in violence and that it is more likely than not that the person
will engage in violence after his or her right to possess a firearm is
restored, the person shall bear the burden of proving by clear, cogent,
and convincing evidence that he or she does not present a substantial
danger to the safety of others.
(4) No person who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity
may petition a court for restoration of the right to possess a firearm
unless the person meets the requirements for the restoration of the
right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.040(4).

Sec. 3 RCW 9.41.060 and 1998 c 253 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of RCW 9.41.050 shall not apply to:
(1) Marshals, sheriffs, prison or jail wardens or their deputies,
or other law enforcement officers of this state or another state;
(2) Members of the armed forces of the United States or of the
national guard or organized reserves, when on duty;
(3) Officers or employees of the United States duly authorized to
carry a concealed pistol;
(4) Any person engaged in the business of manufacturing, repairing,
or dealing in firearms, or the agent or representative of the person,
if possessing, using, or carrying a pistol in the usual or ordinary
course of the business;
(5) Regularly enrolled members of any organization duly authorized
to purchase or receive pistols from the United States or from this
state;
(6) Regularly enrolled members of clubs organized for the purpose
of target shooting, when those members are at or are going to or from
their places of target practice;
(7) Regularly enrolled members of clubs organized for the purpose
of modern and antique firearm collecting, when those members are at or
are going to or from their collector's gun shows and exhibits;
(8) Any person engaging in a lawful outdoor recreational activity
such as hunting, fishing, camping, hiking, or horseback riding, only
if, considering all of the attendant circumstances, including but not
limited to whether the person has a valid hunting or fishing license,
it is reasonable to conclude that the person is participating in lawful
outdoor activities or is traveling to or from a legitimate outdoor
recreation area;
(9) Any person while carrying a pistol unloaded and in a closed
opaque case or secure wrapper; or
(10) Law enforcement officers retired for service or physical
disabilities, except for those law enforcement officers retired because
of mental or stress-related disabilities. This subsection applies only
to a retired officer who has: (a) Obtained documentation from a law
enforcement agency within Washington state from which he or she retired
that is signed by the agency's chief law enforcement officer and that
states that the retired officer was retired for service or physical
disability; and (b) not been convicted or found not guilty by reason of
insanity of a crime making him or her ineligible for a concealed pistol
license.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.41.075 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 408 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The license shall be revoked by the license-issuing authority
immediately upon:
(a) Discovery by the issuing authority that the person was
ineligible under RCW 9.41.070 for a concealed pistol license when
applying for the license or license renewal;
(b) Conviction of the licensee, or the licensee being found not
guilty by reason of insanity, of an offense, or commitment of the
licensee for mental health treatment, that makes a person ineligible
under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm;
(c) Conviction of the licensee for a third violation of this
chapter within five calendar years; or
(d) An order that the licensee forfeit a firearm under RCW
9.41.098(1)(d).
(2)(a) Unless the person may lawfully possess a pistol without a
concealed pistol license, an ineligible person to whom a concealed
pistol license was issued shall, within fourteen days of license
revocation, lawfully transfer ownership of any pistol acquired while
the person was in possession of the license.
(b) Upon discovering a person issued a concealed pistol license was
ineligible for the license, the issuing authority shall contact the
department of licensing to determine whether the person purchased a
pistol while in possession of the license. If the person did purchase
a pistol while in possession of the concealed pistol license, if the
person may not lawfully possess a pistol without a concealed pistol
license, the issuing authority shall require the person to present
satisfactory evidence of having lawfully transferred ownership of the
pistol. The issuing authority shall require the person to produce the
evidence within fifteen days of the revocation of the license.
(3) When a licensee is ordered to forfeit a firearm under RCW
9.41.098(1)(d), the issuing authority shall:
(a) On the first forfeiture, revoke the license for one year;
(b) On the second forfeiture, revoke the license for two years; or
(c) On the third or subsequent forfeiture, revoke the license for
five years.
Any person whose license is revoked as a result of a forfeiture of
a firearm under RCW 9.41.098(1)(d) may not reapply for a new license
until the end of the revocation period.
(4) The issuing authority shall notify, in writing, the department
of licensing of the revocation of a license. The department of
licensing shall record the revocation.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.05.390 and 2004 c 166 s 6, 2004 c 157 s 5, and 2004
c 33 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Except as provided in this section, the fact of admission and all
information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course
of providing services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of
services at public or private agencies shall be confidential.
Information and records may be disclosed only:
(1) In communications between qualified professional persons to
meet the requirements of this chapter, in the provision of services or
appropriate referrals, or in the course of guardianship proceedings.
The consent of the patient, or his or her guardian, shall be obtained
before information or records may be disclosed by a professional person
employed by a facility unless provided to a professional person:
(a) Employed by the facility;
(b) Who has medical responsibility for the patient's care;
(c) Who is a county designated mental health professional;
(d) Who is providing services under chapter 71.24 RCW;
(e) Who is employed by a state or local correctional facility where
the person is confined or supervised; or
(f) Who is providing evaluation, treatment, or follow-up services
under chapter 10.77 RCW.
(2) When the communications regard the special needs of a patient
and the necessary circumstances giving rise to such needs and the
disclosure is made by a facility providing outpatient services to the
operator of a care facility in which the patient resides.
(3) When the person receiving services, or his or her guardian,
designates persons to whom information or records may be released, or
if the person is a minor, when his or her parents make such
designation.
(4) To the extent necessary for a recipient to make a claim, or for
a claim to be made on behalf of a recipient for aid, insurance, or
medical assistance to which he or she may be entitled.
(5) For either program evaluation or research, or both: PROVIDED,
That the secretary adopts rules for the conduct of the evaluation or
research, or both. Such rules shall include, but need not be limited
to, the requirement that all evaluators and researchers must sign an
oath of confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning
persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency,
or person) I, . . . . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or
otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any
information obtained in the course of such evaluation or research
regarding persons who have received services such that the person who
received such services is identifiable.
I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information
may subject me to civil liability under the provisions of state law.

/s/ . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(6)(a) To the courts as necessary to the administration of this
chapter or to a court ordering an evaluation or treatment under chapter
10.77 RCW solely for the purpose of preventing the entry of any
evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any order
entered under this chapter.
(b) To a court or its designee in which a motion under chapter
10.77 RCW has been made for involuntary medication of a defendant for
the purpose of competency restoration.
(c) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purpose
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(7) To law enforcement officers, public health officers, or
personnel of the department of corrections or the indeterminate
sentence review board for persons who are the subject of the records
and who are committed to the custody or supervision of the department
of corrections or indeterminate sentence review board which information
or records are necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their
office. Except for dissemination of information released pursuant to
RCW 71.05.425 and 4.24.550, regarding persons committed under this
chapter under RCW 71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(2)(c) after dismissal of
a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the extent of information
that may be released is limited as follows:
(a) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, the
fact and date of discharge or release, and the last known address shall
be disclosed upon request;
(b) The law enforcement and public health officers or personnel of
the department of corrections or indeterminate sentence review board
shall be obligated to keep such information confidential in accordance
with this chapter;
(c) Additional information shall be disclosed only after giving
notice to said person and his or her counsel and upon a showing of
clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that such information is
necessary and that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality
are and will be maintained. However, in the event the said person has
escaped from custody, said notice prior to disclosure is not necessary
and that the facility from which the person escaped shall include an
evaluation as to whether the person is of danger to persons or property
and has a propensity toward violence;
(d) Information and records shall be disclosed to the department of
corrections pursuant to and in compliance with the provisions of RCW
71.05.445 for the purposes of completing presentence investigations or
risk assessment reports, supervision of an incarcerated offender or
offender under supervision in the community, planning for and provision
of supervision of an offender, or assessment of an offender's risk to
the community; and
(e) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(8) To the attorney of the detained person.
(9) To the prosecuting attorney as necessary to carry out the
responsibilities of the office under RCW 71.05.330(2) and
71.05.340(1)(b) and 71.05.335. The prosecutor shall be provided access
to records regarding the committed person's treatment and prognosis,
medication, behavior problems, and other records relevant to the issue
of whether treatment less restrictive than inpatient treatment is in
the best interest of the committed person or others. Information shall
be disclosed only after giving notice to the committed person and the
person's counsel.
(10) To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person, when
the identity of the person is known to the public or private agency,
whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is known to have
been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may designate a
representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure shall be made
by the professional person in charge of the public or private agency or
his or her designee and shall include the dates of commitment,
admission, discharge, or release, authorized or unauthorized absence
from the agency's facility, and only such other information that is
pertinent to the threat or harassment. The decision to disclose or not
shall not result in civil liability for the agency or its employees so
long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross
negligence.
(11) To appropriate corrections and law enforcement agencies all
necessary and relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent
situation that poses a significant and imminent risk to the public.
The decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for
the mental health service provider or its employees so long as the
decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence.
(12) To the persons designated in RCW 71.05.425 for the purposes
described in that section.
(13) Civil liability and immunity for the release of information
about a particular person who is committed to the department under RCW
71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(2)(c) after dismissal of a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030, is governed by RCW 4.24.550.
(14) To a patient's next of kin, guardian, or conservator, if any,
in the event of death, as provided in RCW 71.05.400.
(15) To the department of health for the purposes of determining
compliance with state or federal licensure, certification, or
registration rules or laws. However, the information and records
obtained under this subsection are exempt from public inspection and
copying pursuant to chapter 42.17 RCW.
(16) To mark headstones or otherwise memorialize patients interred
at state hospital cemeteries. The department of social and health
services shall make available the name, date of birth, and date of
death of patients buried in state hospital cemeteries fifty years after
the death of a patient.
(17) To law enforcement officers and to prosecuting attorneys as
are necessary to enforce RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(ii). The extent of
information that may be released is limited as follows:
(a) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, an
official copy of any order or orders of commitment, and an official
copy of any written or oral notice of ineligibility to possess a
firearm that was provided to the person pursuant to RCW 9.41.047(1),
shall be disclosed upon request;
(b) The law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may only release
the information obtained to the person's attorney as required by court
rule and to a jury or judge, if a jury is waived, that presides over
any trial at which the person is charged with violating RCW
9.41.040(2)(a)(ii);
(c) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
The fact of admission, as well as all records, files, evidence,
findings, or orders made, prepared, collected, or maintained pursuant
to this chapter shall not be admissible as evidence in any legal
proceeding outside this chapter without the written consent of the
person who was the subject of the proceeding except in a subsequent
criminal prosecution of a person committed pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3)
or 71.05.320(2)(c) on charges that were dismissed pursuant to chapter
10.77 RCW due to incompetency to stand trial or in a civil commitment
proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW. The records and files
maintained in any court proceeding pursuant to this chapter shall be
confidential and available subsequent to such proceedings only to the
person who was the subject of the proceeding or his or her attorney.
In addition, the court may order the subsequent release or use of such
records or files only upon good cause shown if the court finds that
appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality are and will be
maintained.

Sec. 6 RCW 71.34.200 and 2000 c 75 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The fact of admission and all information obtained through
treatment under this chapter is confidential. Confidential information
may be disclosed only:
(1) In communications between mental health professionals to meet
the requirements of this chapter, in the provision of services to the
minor, or in making appropriate referrals;
(2) In the course of guardianship or dependency proceedings;
(3) To persons with medical responsibility for the minor's care;
(4) To the minor, the minor's parent, and the minor's attorney,
subject to RCW 13.50.100;
(5) When the minor or the minor's parent designates in writing the
persons to whom information or records may be released;
(6) To the extent necessary to make a claim for financial aid,
insurance, or medical assistance to which the minor may be entitled or
for the collection of fees or costs due to providers for services
rendered under this chapter;
(7) To the courts as necessary to the administration of this
chapter;
(8) To law enforcement officers or public health officers as
necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their office. However,
only the fact and date of admission, and the date of discharge, the
name and address of the treatment provider, if any, and the last known
address shall be disclosed upon request;
(9) To law enforcement officers, public health officers, relatives,
and other governmental law enforcement agencies, if a minor has escaped
from custody, disappeared from an evaluation and treatment facility,
violated conditions of a less restrictive treatment order, or failed to
return from an authorized leave, and then only such information as may
be necessary to provide for public safety or to assist in the
apprehension of the minor. The officers are obligated to keep the
information confidential in accordance with this chapter;
(10) To the secretary for assistance in data collection and program
evaluation or research, provided that the secretary adopts rules for
the conduct of such evaluation and research. The rules shall include,
but need not be limited to, the requirement that all evaluators and
researchers sign an oath of confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning
persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency,
or person) I, . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or otherwise
make known to unauthorized persons or the public any information
obtained in the course of such evaluation or research regarding minors
who have received services in a manner such that the minor is
identifiable.
I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information
may subject me to civil liability under state law.

/s/ . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(11) To appropriate law enforcement agencies, upon request, all
necessary and relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent
situation that poses a significant and imminent risk to the public.
The decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for
the mental health service provider or its employees so long as the
decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence;
(12) To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person, when
the identity of the person is known to the public or private agency,
whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is known to have
been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may designate a
representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure shall be made
by the professional person in charge of the public or private agency or
his or her designee and shall include the dates of admission,
discharge, authorized or unauthorized absence from the agency's
facility, and only such other information that is pertinent to the
threat or harassment. The decision to disclose or not shall not result
in civil liability for the agency or its employees so long as the
decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence;
(13) To a minor's next of kin, attorney, guardian, or conservator,
if any, the information that the minor is presently in the facility or
that the minor is seriously physically ill and a statement evaluating
the mental and physical condition of the minor as well as a statement
of the probable duration of the minor's confinement;
(14) Upon the death of a minor, to the minor's next of kin;
(15) To a facility in which the minor resides or will reside;
(16) To law enforcement officers and to prosecuting attorneys as
are necessary to enforce RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(ii). The extent of
information that may be released is limited as follows:
(a) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, an
official copy of any order or orders of commitment, and an official
copy of any written or oral notice of ineligibility to possess a
firearm that was provided to the person pursuant to RCW 9.41.047(1),
shall be disclosed upon request;
(b) The law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may only release
the information obtained to the person's attorney as required by court
rule and to a jury or judge, if a jury is waived, that presides over
any trial at which the person is charged with violating RCW
9.41.040(2)(a)(ii);
(c) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
This section shall not be construed to prohibit the compilation and
publication of statistical data for use by government or researchers
under standards, including standards to assure maintenance of
confidentiality, set forth by the secretary. The fact of admission and
all information obtained pursuant to this chapter are not admissible as
evidence in any legal proceeding outside this chapter, except
guardianship or dependency, without the written consent of the minor or
the minor's parent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---