BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.04.150 and 2001 c 312 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission must appoint an advisory committee to generally
represent the interests of disabled hunters and fishers on matters
including, but not limited to, special hunts, modified sporting
equipment, access to public land, and hunting and fishing
opportunities. The advisory committee is composed of seven members,
each being a person with a disability. The advisory committee members
must represent the entire state. The members must be appointed so that
each of the six department administrative regions, as they existed on
January 1, 2001, are represented with one resident on the advisory
committee. One additional member must be appointed at large. The
chair of the advisory committee must be a member of the advisory
committee and shall be selected by the members of the advisory
committee.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a person with a disability
includes but is not limited to:
(a) A permanently disabled person who is not ambulatory over
natural terrain without a prosthesis or assistive device;
(b) A permanently disabled person who is unable to walk without the
use of assistance from a brace, cane, crutch, wheelchair, scooter,
walker, or other assistive device;
(c) A person who has a cardiac condition to the extent that the
person's functional limitations are severe;
(d) A person who is restricted by lung disease to the extent that
the person's functional limitations are severe;
(e) A person who is totally blind or visually impaired; or
(f) A permanently disabled person with upper or lower extremity
impairments who does not have the use of one or both upper or lower
extremities.
(3) The members of the advisory committee are appointed for a four-year term. If a vacancy occurs on the advisory committee prior to the
expiration of a term, the commission must appoint a replacement within
sixty days to complete the term.
(4) The advisory committee must meet at least semiannually, and may
meet at other times as requested by a majority of the advisory
committee members for any express purpose that directly relates to the
duties set forth in subsection (1) of this section. A majority of
members currently serving on the advisory committee constitutes a
quorum. The department must provide staff support for all official
advisory committee meetings.
(5) Each member of the advisory committee shall serve without
compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The members of the advisory committee, or individuals acting on
their behalf, are immune from civil liability for official acts
performed in the course of their duties.
(((7) The provisions of this section constitute a pilot program
that expires July 1, 2005. On December 1, 2004, the commission shall
present a report to the appropriate legislative committees detailing
the effectiveness of the advisory committee, including[,] but not
limited to, the participation levels, general interest, quality of
advice, and recommendations as to the advisory committee's continuance
or modification.))

--- END ---