BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.24.010 and 1999 c 148 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Municipal corporation" or "municipality" includes any county,
city, town or combination thereof, fire protection district, local law
enforcement agency, or any emergency medical service district or other
special district, authorized by law to protect life or property within
its boundaries through a fire department, emergency workers, or reserve
officers.
(2) "Fire department" means any regularly organized fire department
or emergency medical service district consisting wholly of volunteer
fire fighters, or any part-paid and part-volunteer fire department duly
organized and maintained by any municipality: PROVIDED, That any such
municipality wherein a part-paid fire department is maintained may by
appropriate legislation permit the full-paid members of its department
to come under the provisions of chapter 41.16 RCW.
(3) "Fire fighter" includes any fire fighter or emergency worker
who is a member of any fire department of any municipality but shall
not include ((full time, paid)) fire fighters who are ((members of))
eligible for participation in the Washington law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system or the Washington public
employees' retirement system, with respect to periods of service
rendered in such capacity.
(4) "Emergency worker" means any emergency medical service
personnel, regulated by chapters 18.71 and 18.73 RCW, who is a member
of an emergency medical service district but shall not include ((full-time, paid)) emergency medical service personnel who are ((members of))
eligible for participation in the Washington public employees'
retirement system, with respect to periods of service rendered in such
capacity.
(5) "Performance of duty" or "performance of service" shall be
construed to mean and include any work in and about company quarters,
any fire station, any law enforcement office or precinct, or any other
place under the direction or general orders of the chief or other
officer having authority to order such member to perform such work;
responding to, working at, or returning from an alarm of fire,
emergency call, or law enforcement duties; drill or training; or any
work performed of an emergency nature in accordance with the rules and
regulations of the fire department or local law enforcement agency.
(6) "State board" means the state board for volunteer fire fighters
and reserve officers.
(7) "Board of trustees" or "local board" means: (a) For matters
affecting fire fighters, a fire fighter board of trustees created under
RCW 41.24.060; (b) for matters affecting an emergency worker, an
emergency medical service district board of trustees created under RCW
41.24.330; or (c) for matters affecting reserve officers, a reserve
officer board of trustees created under RCW 41.24.460.
(8) "Appropriate legislation" means an ordinance when an ordinance
is the means of legislating by any municipality, and resolution in all
other cases.
(9) "Reserve officer" means the same as defined by the Washington
state criminal justice training commission under chapter 43.101 RCW,
but shall not include ((full-time, paid law)) enforcement officers who
are ((members of)) eligible for participation in the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system or the
Washington public employees' retirement system, with respect to periods
of service rendered in such capacity.
(10) "Participant" means: (a) For purposes of relief, any reserve
officer who is or may become eligible for relief under this chapter or
any fire fighter or emergency worker; and (b) for purposes of
retirement pension, any fire fighter, emergency worker, or reserve
officer who is or may become eligible to receive a benefit of any type
under the retirement provisions of this chapter, or whose beneficiary
may be eligible to receive any such benefit.
(11) "Relief" means all medical, death, and disability benefits
available under this chapter that are made necessary from death,
sickness, injury, or disability arising in the performance of duty,
including benefits provided under RCW 41.24.110, 41.24.150, 41.24.160,
41.24.175, 41.24.220, and 41.24.230, but does not include retirement
pensions provided under this chapter.
(12) "Retirement pension" means retirement payments for the
performance of service, as provided under RCW 41.24.170, 41.24.172,
41.24.175, 41.24.180, and 41.24.185.
(13) "Principal fund" means the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund created under RCW
41.24.030.
(14) "Administrative fund" means the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' administrative fund created under RCW 41.24.030.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.24.030 and 1999 c 148 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund is created in the state treasury as a trust fund
for the benefit of the participants covered by this chapter consisting
of:
(a) All bequests, fees, gifts, emoluments, or donations given or
paid to the fund.
(b) An annual fee for each member of its fire department to be paid
by each municipal corporation for the purpose of affording relief
provided in this chapter for fire fighters as follows:
(i) ((Ten)) Thirty dollars for each volunteer or part-paid member
of its fire department;
(ii) A sum equal to one and one-half of one percent of the annual
salary attached to the rank of each full-paid member of its fire
department, prorated for 1970 on the basis of services prior to March
1, 1970.
(c) An annual fee for each emergency worker of an emergency medical
service district paid by the district that is sufficient to pay the
full costs of covering the emergency worker under the relief provisions
of this chapter, including operating expenses. The state board shall
determine the amount of this fee based on the latest actuarial
valuation of the system.
(d) Where a municipal corporation has elected to make relief
provisions of this chapter available to its reserve officers, an annual
fee for each reserve officer paid by the municipal corporation that is
sufficient to pay the full costs of covering the reserve officer under
the relief provisions of this chapter, including operating expenses.
The state board shall determine the amount of this fee based on the
latest actuarial valuation of the system.
(e) Where a municipal corporation has elected to make the
retirement pension provisions of this chapter available to members of
its fire department, an annual fee of sixty dollars for each of its
fire fighters electing to enroll, thirty dollars of which shall be paid
by the municipality and thirty dollars of which shall be paid by the
fire fighter. However, nothing in this section prohibits any
municipality from voluntarily paying the fire fighters' fee for this
retirement pension coverage.
(f) Where an emergency medical service district has elected to make
the retirement pension provisions of this chapter available to its
emergency workers, for each emergency worker electing to enroll: (i)
An annual fee of thirty dollars shall be paid by the emergency worker;
and (ii) an annual fee paid by the emergency medical service district
that, together with the thirty-dollar fee per emergency worker, is
sufficient to pay the full costs of covering the emergency worker under
the retirement pension benefits provided under this chapter, including
operating expenses. The state board shall determine the amount of this
fee based on the latest actuarial valuation of the system. However,
nothing in this section prohibits any emergency medical service
district from voluntarily paying the emergency workers' fees for this
retirement pension coverage.
(g) Where a municipal corporation has elected to make the
retirement pension provisions of this chapter available to its reserve
officers, for each reserve officer electing to enroll: (i) An annual
fee of thirty dollars shall be paid by the reserve officer; and (ii) an
annual fee paid by the municipal corporation that, together with the
thirty-dollar fee per reserve officer, is sufficient to pay the full
costs of covering the reserve officer under the retirement pension
benefits provided under this chapter, including operating expenses.
The state board shall determine the amount of this fee based on the
latest actuarial valuation of the system. However, nothing in this
section prohibits any municipal corporation from voluntarily paying the
reserve officers' fees for this retirement pension coverage.
(h) Moneys transferred from the administrative fund, as provided
under subsection (4) of this section, which may only be used to pay
relief and retirement pensions for fire fighters.
(i) Earnings from the investment of moneys in the principal fund.
(2) The state investment board, upon request of the state treasurer
shall have full power to invest, reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or
exchange investments acquired from that portion of the amounts credited
to the principal fund as is not, in the judgment of the state board,
required to meet current withdrawals. Investments shall be made in the
manner prescribed by RCW 43.84.150 and not otherwise.
All bonds, investments, or other obligations purchased by the state
investment board shall be placed in the custody of the state treasurer,
and he or she shall collect the principal thereof and interest thereon
when due.
The state investment board may sell any of the bonds, investments,
or obligations so acquired and the proceeds thereof shall be paid to
the state treasurer.
(3) The interest, earnings, and proceeds from the sale and
redemption of any investments held by the principal fund and invested
by the state investment board shall be credited to and form a part of
the principal fund, less the allocation to the state investment board
expense account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160.
Subject to restrictions contained in this chapter, all amounts
credited to the principal fund shall be available for making the
benefit payments required by this chapter.
The state treasurer shall make an annual report showing the
condition of the fund.
(4) The volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the
fund, including unanticipated revenues under RCW 43.79.270, may be
spent only after appropriation, and may be used only for operating
expenses of the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief
and pension principal fund, the operating expenses of the volunteer
fire fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, or for
transfer from the administrative fund to the principal fund.
(a) Forty percent of all moneys received by the state from taxes on
fire insurance premiums shall be paid into the state treasury and
credited to the administrative fund.
(b) The state board shall compute a percentage of the amounts
credited to the administrative fund to be paid into the principal fund.
(c) For the purpose of providing amounts to be used to defray the
cost of administration of the principal and administrative funds, the
state board shall ascertain at the beginning of each biennium and
request from the legislature an appropriation from the administrative
fund sufficient to cover estimated expenses for the biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an injured volunteer seeks damages from a third party, the
state board may also seek recovery of actual costs from the responsible
third party. A volunteer seeking damages from a third party is
required to notify the state board about the legal proceeding.
(2) The state board is responsible for its proportionate share of
the costs and attorneys' fees of the legal proceedings.
(3) Any recovery is subject to a lien by the state board for its
share under this section.
(4) This section does not restrict or prohibit the state board's
right to seek recovery from a third party when a volunteer fire fighter
is injured.

--- END ---