BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 88.02.220 and 1991 c 339 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
A vessel dealer who receives cash or a negotiable instrument of
deposit in excess of one thousand dollars, or a deposit of any amount
that will be held for more than fourteen calendar days, shall place the
funds in a separate trust account.
(1) The cash or negotiable instrument must be set aside immediately
upon receipt for the trust account, or endorsed to such a trust account
immediately upon receipt.
(2) The cash or negotiable instrument must be deposited in the
trust account ((by the close of banking hours on the day following the
receipt)) within forty-eight hours of acceptance of offer by seller and
buyer. The offer must be made to the seller within forty-eight hours
of receipt of the funds, or the cash or negotiable instrument must be
either returned to the buyer or deposited into the trust account.
(3) After delivery of the purchaser's vessel the vessel dealer
shall remove the deposited funds from the trust account.
(4) The dealer shall ((not commingle the purchaser's funds with any
other funds at any time)) place the purchaser's funds in a separate
noninterest bearing trust account.
(5) The funds shall remain in the trust account until the delivery
of the purchased vessel. However, upon written agreement from the
purchaser, the vessel dealer may remove and release trust funds before
delivery.

--- END ---