BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
The legislature finds an urgent and substantial need to enhance the
development of all infants and toddlers with disabilities in Washington
in order to minimize developmental delays and to maximize individual
potential for learning and functioning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2009, each school district shall provide or
contract for early intervention services to all eligible children with
disabilities from birth to three years of age. Eligibility shall be
determined according to Part C of the federal individuals with
disabilities education act and as specified in the Washington
Administrative Code. School districts shall provide or contract for
early intervention services in partnership with local birth-to-three
lead agencies and birth-to-three providers. Services provided under
this section shall not supplant services or funding currently provided
in the state for early intervention services to eligible children with
disabilities from birth to three years of age. The state-designated
birth-to-three lead agency shall be payor of last resort for birth-to-three early intervention services provided under this section.
(2) The services in this section are not part of the state's
program of basic education pursuant to Article IX of the state
Constitution.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.155.070 and 1995 c 77 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Special educational and training programs provided by the state and
the school districts thereof for children with disabilities ((may))
shall be extended to include children of preschool age. School
districts ((which extend such special programs to children of preschool
age)) shall be entitled to the regular apportionments from state and
county school funds, as provided by law, and in addition to allocations
from state excess cost funds made available for such special services
for those children with disabilities who are given such special
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 3 of this act takes effect September
1, 2009.

--- END ---