BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.151 and 1997 c 410 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of any activated authority or the department, may
classify air contaminant sources, by ordinance, resolution, rule or
regulation, which in its judgment may cause or contribute to air
pollution, according to levels and types of emissions and other
characteristics which cause or contribute to air pollution, and may
require registration or reporting or both for any such class or
classes. Classifications made pursuant to this section may be for
application to the area of jurisdiction of such authority, or the state
as a whole or to any designated area within the jurisdiction, and shall
be made with special reference to effects on health, economic and
social factors, and physical effects on property.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any
person operating or responsible for the operation of air contaminant
sources of any class for which the ordinances, resolutions, rules or
regulations of the department or board of the authority, require
registration and reporting shall register therewith and make reports
containing information as may be required by such department or board
concerning location, size and height of contaminant outlets, processes
employed, nature of the contaminant emission and such other information
as is relevant to air pollution and available or reasonably capable of
being assembled. The department or board may require that such
registration be accompanied by a fee and may determine the amount of
such fee for such class or classes: PROVIDED, That the amount of the
fee shall only be to compensate for the costs of administering such
registration program which shall be defined as initial registration and
annual or other periodic reports from the source owner providing
information directly related to air pollution registration, on-site
inspections necessary to verify compliance with registration
requirements, data storage and retrieval systems necessary for support
of the registration program, emission inventory reports and emission
reduction credits computed from information provided by sources
pursuant to registration program requirements, staff review, including
engineering analysis for accuracy and currentness, of information
provided by sources pursuant to registration program requirements,
clerical and other office support provided in direct furtherance of the
registration program, and administrative support provided in directly
carrying out the registration program: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any such
registration made with either the board or the department shall
preclude a further registration with any other board or the department.
All registration program fees collected by the department shall be
deposited in the air pollution control account. All registration
program fees collected by the local air authorities shall be deposited
in their respective treasuries.
(3) If a registration or report has been filed for a grain
warehouse or grain elevator as required under this section,
registration, reporting, or a registration program fee shall not, after
January 1, 1997, again be required under this section for the warehouse
or elevator unless the capacity of the warehouse or elevator as listed
as part of the license issued for the facility has been increased since
the date the registration or reporting was last made. If the capacity
of the warehouse or elevator listed as part of the license is
increased, any registration or reporting required for the warehouse or
elevator under this section must be made by the date the warehouse or
elevator receives grain from the first harvest season that occurs after
the increase in its capacity is listed in the license.
This subsection does not apply to a grain warehouse or grain
elevator if the warehouse or elevator handles more than ten million
bushels of grain annually.
(4) For the purposes of ((this)) subsection((,)) (3) of this
section:
(a) A "grain warehouse" or "grain elevator" is an establishment
classified in standard industrial classification (SIC) code 5153 for
wholesale trade for which a license is required and includes, but is
not limited to, such a licensed facility that also conducts cleaning
operations for grain; ((and))
(b) A "license" is a license issued by the department of
agriculture licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator
under chapter 22.09 RCW or a license issued by the federal government
licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator for
purposes similar to those of licensure for the facility under chapter
22.09 RCW; and
(c) "Grain" means a grain or a pulse.
((This subsection does not apply to a grain warehouse or grain
elevator if the warehouse or elevator handles more than ten million
bushels of grain annually.))

--- END ---