BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
establish a boating safety education program that contributes to the
reduction of accidents and increases the enjoyment of boating by all
operators of all recreational vessels on the waters of this state.
Based on the 2003 report to the legislature titled "Recreational
Boating Safety in Washington, A Report on Methods to Achieve Safer
Boating Practices," the legislature recognizes that boating accidents
also occur in nonmotorized vessels in this state, but, at this time
there is no national educational standard for nonmotorized vessels.
Therefore, the commission is hereby authorized and directed to work
with agencies and organizations representing nonmotorized vessel
activities and individuals operating nonmotorized vessels to decrease
accidents of operators in these vessels. It is also the intent of the
legislature to encourage boating safety education programs that use
volunteer and private sector efforts to enhance boating safety and
education for operators of nonmotorized vessels to work closely with
the state parks and recreation commission in its efforts to reduce all
boating accidents in this state.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.60.010 and 2003 c 39 s 45 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Accredited course" means a mandatory course of instruction on
boating safety education that has been approved by the commission.
(2) "Boat wastes" includes, but is not limited to, sewage, garbage,
marine debris, plastics, contaminated bilge water, cleaning solvents,
paint scrapings, or discarded petroleum products associated with the
use of vessels.
(((2))) (3) "Boater" means any person on a vessel on waters of the
state of Washington.
(((3))) (4) "Boater education card" means a card issued to a person
who has successfully completed a boating safety education test and has
paid the registration fee for a serial number record to be maintained
in the commission's data base.
(5) "Boating educator" means a person providing an accredited
course.
(6) "Carrying passengers for hire" means carrying passengers in a
vessel on waters of the state for valuable consideration, whether given
directly or indirectly or received by the owner, agent, operator, or
other person having an interest in the vessel. This shall not include
trips where expenses for food, transportation, or incidentals are
shared by participants on an even basis. Anyone receiving compensation
for skills or money for amortization of equipment and carrying
passengers shall be considered to be carrying passengers for hire on
waters of the state.
(((4))) (7) "Certificate of accomplishment" means a form of
certificate approved by the commission and issued by a boating educator
to a person who has successfully completed an accredited course.
(8) "Commission" means the state parks and recreation commission.
(((5))) (9) "Darkness" means that period between sunset and
sunrise.
(((6))) (10) "Environmentally sensitive area" means a restricted
body of water where discharge of untreated sewage from boats is
especially detrimental because of limited flushing, shallow water,
commercial or recreational shellfish, swimming areas, diversity of
species, the absence of other pollution sources, or other
characteristics.
(((7))) (11) "Guide" means any individual, including but not
limited to subcontractors and independent contractors, engaged for
compensation or other consideration by a whitewater river outfitter for
the purpose of operating vessels. A person licensed under RCW
77.65.480 or 77.65.440 and acting as a fishing guide is not considered
a guide for the purposes of this chapter.
(((8))) (12) "Marina" means a facility providing boat moorage
space, fuel, or commercial services. Commercial services include but
are not limited to overnight or live-aboard boating accommodations.
(((9))) (13) "Motor driven boats and vessels" means all boats and
vessels which are self propelled.
(((10))) (14) "Motor vessel safety operating and equipment
checklist" means a printed list of the safety requirements for a vessel
with a motor installed or attached to the vessel being rented,
chartered, or leased and meeting minimum requirements adopted by the
commission in accordance with section 3 of this act.
(15) "Muffler" or "muffler system" means a sound suppression device
or system, including an underwater exhaust system, designed and
installed to abate the sound of exhaust gases emitted from an internal
combustion engine and that prevents excessive or unusual noise.
(((11))) (16) "Operate" means to steer, direct, or otherwise have
physical control of a vessel that is underway.
(((12))) (17) "Operator" means an individual who steers, directs,
or otherwise has physical control of a vessel that is underway or
exercises actual authority to control the person at the helm.
(((13))) (18) "Observer" means the individual riding in a vessel
who is responsible for observing a water skier at all times.
(((14))) (19) "Owner" means a person who has a lawful right to
possession of a vessel by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, inheritance,
or legal action whether or not the vessel is subject to a security
interest.
(((15))) (20) "Person" means any individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, nonprofit corporation or organization,
limited liability company, firm, association, or other legal entity
located within or outside this state.
(((16))) (21) "Personal flotation device" means a buoyancy device,
life preserver, buoyant vest, ring buoy, or buoy cushion that is
designed to float a person in the water and that is approved by the
commission.
(((17))) (22) "Personal watercraft" means a vessel of less than
sixteen feet that uses a motor powering a water jet pump, as its
primary source of motive power and that is designed to be operated by
a person sitting, standing, or kneeling on, or being towed behind the
vessel, rather than in the conventional manner of sitting or standing
inside the vessel.
(((18))) (23) "Polluted area" means a body of water used by boaters
that is contaminated by boat wastes at unacceptable levels, based on
applicable water quality and shellfish standards.
(((19))) (24) "Public entities" means all elected or appointed
bodies, including tribal governments, responsible for collecting and
spending public funds.
(((20))) (25) "Reckless" or "recklessly" means acting carelessly
and heedlessly in a willful and wanton disregard of the rights, safety,
or property of another.
(((21))) (26) "Rental motor vessel" means a motor vessel that is
legally owned by a person that is registered as a rental and leasing
agency for recreational motor vessels, and for which there is a written
and signed rental, charter, or lease agreement between the owner, or
owner's agent, of the vessel and the operator of the vessel.
(27) "Sewage pumpout or dump unit" means:
(a) A receiving chamber or tank designed to receive vessel sewage
from a "porta-potty" or a portable container; and
(b) A stationary or portable mechanical device on land, a dock,
pier, float, barge, vessel, or other location convenient to boaters,
designed to remove sewage waste from holding tanks on vessels.
(((22))) (28) "Underway" means that a vessel is not at anchor, or
made fast to the shore, or aground.
(((23))) (29) "Vessel" includes every description of watercraft on
the water, other than a seaplane, used or capable of being used as a
means of transportation on the water. However, it does not include
inner tubes, air mattresses, sailboards, and small rafts or flotation
devices or toys customarily used by swimmers.
(((24))) (30) "Water skiing" means the physical act of being towed
behind a vessel on, but not limited to, any skis, aquaplane, kneeboard,
tube, or any other similar device.
(((25))) (31) "Waters of the state" means any waters within the
territorial limits of Washington state.
(((26))) (32) "Whitewater river outfitter" means any person who is
advertising to carry or carries passengers for hire on any whitewater
river of the state, but does not include any person whose only service
on a given trip is providing instruction in canoeing or kayaking
skills.
(((27))) (33) "Whitewater rivers of the state" means those rivers
and streams, or parts thereof, within the boundaries of the state as
listed in RCW 79A.60.470 or as designated by the commission under RCW
79A.60.495.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall establish and implement by rule a program
to provide required boating safety education. The boating safety
education program shall include training on preventing the spread of
aquatic invasive species. The program shall be phased in so that all
boaters not exempted under section 4(3) of this act are required to
obtain a boater education card by January 1, 2016. To obtain a boater
education card, a boater shall provide a certificate of accomplishment
issued by a boating educator for taking and passing an accredited
boating safety education course, or pass an equivalency exam, or
provide proof of completion of a course that meets the standard adopted
by the commission.
(2) As part of the boating safety education program, the commission
shall:
(a) Establish a program to be phased over eleven years starting
July 1, 2005, with full implementation by January 1, 2016. The period
July 1, 2005, through December 31, 2007, will be program development,
boater notification of the new requirements for mandatory education,
and processing cards to be issued to individuals having taken an
accredited course prior to January 1, 2008. The schedule for phase-in
of the mandatory education requirement by age group is as follows:
January 1, 2008 - All boat operators twenty years old and younger;
January 1, 2009 - All boat operators twenty-five years old and younger;
January 1, 2010 - All boat operators thirty years old and younger;
January 1, 2011 - All boat operators thirty-five years old and younger;
January 1, 2012 - All boat operators forty years old and younger;
January 1, 2013 - All boat operators fifty years old and younger;
January 1, 2014 - All boat operators sixty years old and younger;
January 1, 2015 - All boat operators seventy years old and younger;
January 1, 2016 - All boat operators;
(b) Establish a minimum standard of boating safety education
accomplishment. The standard must be consistent with the applicable
standard established by the national association of state boating law
administrators;
(c) Adopt minimum standards for boating safety education course of
instruction and examination that ensures compliance with the national
association of state boating law administrators minimum standards;
(d) Approve and provide accreditation to boating safety education
courses operated by volunteers, or commercial or nonprofit
organizations, including, but not limited to, courses given by the
United States coast guard auxiliary and the United States power
squadrons;
(e) Develop an equivalency examination that may be taken as an
alternative to the boating safety education course;
(f) Establish a fee of ten dollars for the boater education card to
fund all commission activities related to the boating safety education
program created by this act, including the initial costs of developing
the program. Any surplus funds resulting from the fees received shall
be distributed by the commission as grants to local marine law
enforcement programs approved by the commission as provided in RCW
88.02.040;
(g) Establish a fee for the replacement of the boater education
card that covers the cost of replacement;
(h) Consider and evaluate public agency and commercial
opportunities to assist in program administration with the intent to
keep administrative costs to a minimum;
(i) Approve and provide accreditation to boating safety education
courses offered online; and
(j) Provide a report to the legislature by January 1, 2008, on its
progress of implementation of the mandatory education program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 79A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person shall operate or permit the operation of motor driven
boats and vessels with a mechanical power of fifteen horsepower or
greater unless the person:
(a) Is at least twelve years of age, except that an operator of a
personal watercraft shall comply with the age requirements under RCW
79A.60.190; and
(b)(i) Has in his or her possession a boater education card, unless
exempted under subsection (3) of this section; or
(ii) Is accompanied by and is under the direct supervision of a
person sixteen years of age or older who is in possession of a boater
education card, or who is not yet required to possess the card as
provided in the program phase in section 3(2)(a) of this act.
(2) Any person who can demonstrate they have successfully
completed, prior to the effective date of this act, a boating safety
education course substantially equivalent to the standards adopted by
the commission shall be eligible for a boater education card upon
application to the commission and payment of the fee, without having to
take a course or equivalency exam as provided in section 3(1) of this
act. Successful completion of a boating safety education course could
include an original or copy of an original certificate issued by the
commission, the United States coast guard auxiliary, or the United
States power squadrons, or official certification by these
organizations that the individual successfully completed a course
substantially equivalent to the standards adopted by the commission.
(3) The following persons are not required to carry a boater
education card:
(a) The operator of a vessel engaged in a lawful commercial fishery
operation as licensed by the department of fish and wildlife under
Title 77 RCW. However, the person when operating a vessel for
recreational purposes must carry a boater education card;
(b) Any person who possesses a valid marine operator license issued
by the United States coast guard when operating a vessel authorized by
such coast guard license. However, the person when operating a vessel
for recreational purposes must carry a boater education card;
(c) Any person who is legally engaged in the operation of a vessel
that is exempt from vessel registration requirements under chapter
88.02 RCW and applicable rules and is used for purposes of law
enforcement or official government work. However, the person when
operating a vessel for recreational purposes must carry a boater
education card;
(d) Any person at least twelve years old renting, chartering, or
leasing a motor driven boat or vessel with an engine power of fifteen
horsepower or greater who completes a commission-approved motor vessel
safety operating and equipment checklist each time before operating the
motor driven boat or vessel, except that an operator of a personal
watercraft shall comply with the age requirements under RCW 79A.60.190;
(e) Any person who is not a resident of Washington state and who
does not operate a motor driven boat or vessel with an engine power of
fifteen horsepower or greater in waters of the state for more than
sixty consecutive days;
(f) Any person who is not a resident of Washington state and who
holds a current out-of-state or out-of-country certificate or card that
is equivalent to the rules adopted by the commission;
(g) Any person who has purchased the boat or vessel within the last
sixty days, and has a bill of sale in his or her possession to document
the date of purchase;
(h) Any person, including those less than twelve years of age, who
is involved in practicing for, or engaging in, a permitted racing event
where a valid document has been issued by the appropriate local, state,
or federal government agency for the event, and is available for
inspection on-site during the racing event;
(i) Any person who is not yet required to have a boater education
card under the phased schedule in section 3(2)(a) of this act; and
(j) Any person born before January 1, 1955.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (3)(a) through (i) of this
section, a boater must carry a boater education card while operating a
vessel and is required to present the boater education card to a law
enforcement officer upon request.
(5) Failure to possess a boater education card required by this
section is an infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW. The penalty shall be
waived if the boater provides proof to the court within sixty days that
he or she has received a boater education card.
(6) No person shall permit the rental, charter, or lease of a motor
driven boat or vessel with an engine power of fifteen horsepower or
greater to a person without first reviewing with that person, and all
other persons who may be permitted by the person to operate the vessel,
all the information contained in the motor vessel safety operating and
equipment checklist.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 79A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The boating safety education certification account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from fees collected
for the issuance of a boater education card shall be deposited in the
account and shall be used only for the administration of sections 3 and
4 of this act. Only the state parks and recreation commission may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

--- END ---