BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.84.280 and 2003 c 111 s 2116 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that paying a worker, whose task it is to
secure the signatures of voters on initiative or referendum petitions,
on the basis of the number of signatures the worker secures on the
petitions encourages the introduction of fraud in the signature
gathering process. It has been shown that such a form of payment ((may
act as)) has been an incentive in this state and region for ((the))
some workers to encourage a person to sign a petition which the person
is not qualified to sign or to sign a petition for a ballot measure
even if the person has already signed a petition for the measure.
Other workers, paid on a per-signature basis, have forged signatures on
petitions. Such payments also threaten the integrity of the initiative
and referendum process by providing an incentive for misrepresenting
the nature or effect of a ballot measure in securing petition
signatures for the measure.
The legislature intends to provide consistency between voter
registration workers and initiative and referendum workers since
Washington state bars per-signature payment when registering voters.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.84.250 and 2003 c 111 s 2113 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
Every person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor who:
(1) For any consideration or gratuity or promise thereof, signs or
declines to sign any initiative or referendum petition; or
(2) Provides or receives consideration for soliciting or procuring
signatures on an initiative or referendum petition if any part of the
consideration is based upon the number of signatures solicited or
procured, or offers to provide or agrees to receive such consideration
any of which is based on the number of signatures solicited or
procured; or
(3) Gives or offers any consideration or gratuity to any person to
induce him or her to sign or not to sign or to vote for or against any
initiative or referendum measure; or
(4) Interferes with or attempts to interfere with the right of any
voter to sign or not to sign an initiative or referendum petition or
with the right to vote for or against an initiative or referendum
measure by threats, intimidation, or any other corrupt means or
practice; or
(5) Receives, handles, distributes, pays out, or gives away,
directly or indirectly, money or any other thing of value contributed
by or received from any person, firm, association, or corporation whose
residence or principal office is, or the majority of whose members or
stockholders have their residence outside, the state of Washington, for
any service rendered for the purpose of aiding in procuring signatures
upon any initiative or referendum petition or for the purpose of aiding
in the adoption or rejection of any initiative or referendum measure.
This subsection does not apply to or prohibit any activity that is
properly reported in accordance with the applicable provisions of
chapter 42.17 RCW.
A gross misdemeanor under this section is punishable to the same
extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

--- END ---