BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 88.16.035 and 1987 c 264 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board of pilotage commissioners shall:
(1) Adopt rules, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW ((as now existing or
hereafter amended)), necessary for the enforcement and administration
of this chapter;
(2) ((License)) (a) Issue training licenses and pilot licenses to
pilot applicants meeting the qualifications ((and passing the
examination as)) provided for in RCW 88.16.090 ((as now or hereafter
amended)) and such additional qualifications as may be determined by
the board;
(b) Establish a comprehensive training program to assist in the
training and evaluation of pilot applicants before final licensing; and
((to))
(c) Establish additional training requirements, including a program
of continuing education developed after consultation with pilot
organizations, including those located within the state of Washington,
as required to maintain a competent pilotage service;
(3) Maintain a register of pilots, records of pilot accidents and
other history pertinent to pilotage, along with a roster of vessels,
agents, owners, operators, and masters necessary for the maintenance of
a roster of persons interested in and concerned with pilotage and
maritime safety;
(4) Determine from time to time the number of pilots necessary to
be licensed in each district of the state to optimize the operation of
a safe, fully regulated, efficient, and competent pilotage service in
each district;
(5) Annually fix the pilotage tariffs for pilotage services
performed aboard vessels as required by this chapter: PROVIDED, That
the board may fix extra compensation for extra services to vessels in
distress, for awaiting vessels, or for being carried to sea on vessels
against the will of the pilot, and for such other services as may be
determined by the board;
(((5))) (6) File annually with the governor and the chairs of the
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives a
report which includes, but is not limited to, the following: The
number, names, addresses, ages, pilot license number, and years of
service as a Washington licensed pilot of any person licensed by the
board as a Washington state pilot; the names, employment, and other
information of the members of the board; the total number of pilotage
assignments by pilotage district, including information concerning the
various types and sizes of vessels and the total annual tonnage; the
annual earnings of individual pilots before and after deduction for
expenses of pilot organizations, including extra compensation as a
separate category; the annual expenses of private pilot associations,
including personnel employed and capital expenditures; the status of
pilotage tariffs, extra compensation, and travel; the retirement
contributions paid to pilots and the disposition thereof; the number of
groundings, mishaps, or other incidents which are reported to or
investigated by the board, and which are determined to be accidents, as
defined by the board, including the vessel name, location of incident,
pilot's name, and disposition of the case together with information
received before the board acted from all persons concerned, including
the United States coast guard; the names, qualifications, time
scheduled for examinations, and the district of persons desiring to
apply for Washington state pilotage licenses; summaries of dispatch
records, quarterly reports from pilots, and the bylaws and operating
rules of pilotage organizations; the names, sizes in deadweight tons,
surcharges, if any, port of call, name of the pilot, and names and
horsepower of tug boats for any and all oil tankers subject to the
provisions of RCW 88.16.190 together with the names of any and all
vessels for which the United States coast guard requires special
handling pursuant to their authority under the Ports and Waterways
Safety Act of 1972; the expenses of the board; and any and all other
information which the board deems appropriate to include;
(((6))) (7) Publish a manual which includes the pilotage act and
other statutes of Washington state and the federal government which
affect pilotage, including the rules of the board, together with such
additional information as may be informative for pilots, agents,
owners, operators, and masters. Such manual shall be distributed
without cost to all pilots and governmental agencies upon request. All
other copies shall be sold for a five dollar fee with proceeds to be
credited to the pilotage account;
(((7))) (8) Appoint advisory committees and employ marine experts
as necessary to carry out its duties under this chapter;
(((8))) (9) Provide for the maintenance of efficient and competent
pilotage service on all waters covered by this chapter; and do such
other things as are reasonable, necessary, and expedient to insure
proper and safe pilotage upon the waters covered by this chapter and
facilitate the efficient administration of this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 88.16.090 and 1999 sp.s. c 1 s 607 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person may pilot any vessel subject to ((the provisions of))
this chapter on waters covered by this chapter only if ((appointed
and)) licensed to pilot such vessels on ((said)) such waters under
((and pursuant to the provisions of)) this chapter.
(2)(a) A person is eligible to be ((appointed)) licensed as a pilot
if the person:
(i) Is a citizen of the United States((,));
(ii) Is over the age of twenty-five years and under the age of
seventy years((,));
(iii) Is a resident of the state of Washington at the time of
((appointment and only if the pilot applicant)) licensure as a pilot;
(iv)(A) Holds at the time of application, as a minimum, a United
States government license as ((a)) master of ((ocean or near coastal))
steam or motor vessels of not more than one thousand six hundred gross
register tons ((or as a master of)) (three thousand international
tonnage convention tons) upon oceans, near coastal waters, or inland
((steam or motor vessels of not more than one thousand six hundred
gross tons,)) waters; or the then most equivalent federal license as
determined by the board; any such license to have been held by the
applicant for a period of at least two years ((prior to taking the
Washington state pilotage examination and)) before application;
(B) Holds at the time of licensure as a pilot, after successful
completion of the board-required training program, a first class United
States endorsement without restrictions on ((that)) the United States
government license ((to pilot in)) for the pilotage district((s for))
in which the pilot applicant desires to be licensed((, and if the pilot
applicant meets)); however, all applicants for a pilot examination
scheduled to be given before July 1, 2008, must have the United States
pilotage endorsement at the time of application; and
(C) The board may establish such other federal license requirements
for applicants and pilots as it deems appropriate; and
(v) Successfully completes a board-specified training program.
(b) In addition to the requirements of (a) of this subsection, a
pilot applicant must meet such other qualifications as may be required
by the board.
(c) A person applying for a license under this section shall not
have been convicted of an offense involving drugs or the personal
consumption of alcohol in the twelve months prior to the date of
application. This restriction does not apply to license renewals under
this section.
(3) ((Pilots shall be licensed hereunder for a term of five years
from and after the date of the issuance of their respective state
licenses. Such licenses shall thereafter be renewed as of course,
unless the board shall withhold same for good cause. Each pilot shall
pay to the state treasurer an annual license fee as follows: For the
period beginning July 1, 1995, through June 30, 2001, the fee shall be
two thousand five hundred dollars; and for the period beginning July 1,
2001, the fee shall be three thousand dollars. The fees shall be
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the pilotage account.
The board may assess partially active or inactive pilots a reduced
fee)) The board may establish such other training license and pilot
license requirements as it deems appropriate.
(4) Pilot applicants shall be ((required to pass a written and oral
examination administered and graded by the board which shall test such
applicants on this chapter, the rules of the board, local harbor
ordinances, and such other matters as may be required to compliment
[complement] the United States examinations and qualifications. The
board shall hold examinations at such times as will, in the judgment of
the board, ensure the maintenance of an efficient and competent
pilotage service. An examination shall be scheduled for the Puget
Sound pilotage district if there are three or fewer successful
candidates from the previous examination who are waiting to become
pilots in that district.)) evaluated and ranked in a manner specified
by the board based on their experience, other qualifications as may be
set by the board, performance on a written examination or examinations
established by the board, and performance in such other evaluation
exercises as may be required by the board, for entry into a board-specified training program.
When the board determines that the demand for pilots requires entry
of an applicant into the training program it shall issue a training
license to that applicant, but under no circumstances may an applicant
be issued a training license more than four years after taking the
written entry examination. The training license authorizes the trainee
to do such actions as are specified in the training program.
After the completion of the training program the board shall
evaluate the trainee's performance and knowledge. The board, as it
deems appropriate, may then issue a pilot license, delay the issuance
of the pilot license, deny the issuance of the pilot license, or
require further training and evaluation.
(5) ((The board shall develop an examination and grading sheet for
each pilotage district, for the testing and grading of pilot
applicants. The examinations shall be administered to pilot applicants
and shall be updated as required to reflect changes in law, rules,
policies, or procedures.)) The board may appoint a special independent
((examination)) committee or may contract with a firm knowledgeable and
experienced in the development of professional tests and evaluations
for development and grading of ((said)) the examinations and other
evaluation methods. Active licensed state pilots may be consulted for
the general development of any examinations and evaluation exercises
but shall have no knowledge of the specific questions. The pilot
members of the board may participate in the grading of examinations.
If the board does appoint a special examination or evaluation
development committee it is authorized to pay the members of ((said))
the committee the same compensation and travel expenses as received by
members of the board. ((When grading examinations the board shall
carefully follow the grading sheet prepared for that examination. The
board shall develop a "sample examination" which would tend to indicate
to an applicant the general types of questions on pilot examinations,
but such sample questions shall not appear on any actual
examinations.)) Any person who willfully gives advance knowledge of
information contained on a pilot examination or other evaluation
exercise is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(6) Pilots are licensed under this section for a term of five years
from and after the date of the issuance of their respective state
licenses. Licenses must thereafter be renewed as a matter of course,
unless the board withholds the license for good cause. Each pilot
shall pay to the state treasurer an annual license fee of three
thousand dollars. The fees must be deposited in the state treasury to
the credit of the pilotage account. The board may assess partially
active or inactive pilots a reduced fee.
(7) All pilots and applicants are subject to an annual physical
examination by a physician chosen by the board. The physician shall
examine the applicant's heart, blood pressure, circulatory system,
lungs and respiratory system, eyesight, hearing, and such other items
as may be prescribed by the board. After consultation with a physician
and the United States coast guard, the board shall establish minimum
health standards to ensure that pilots licensed by the state are able
to perform their duties. Within ninety days of the date of each annual
physical examination, and after review of the physician's report, the
board shall make a determination of whether the pilot or ((candidate))
applicant is fully able to carry out the duties of a pilot under this
chapter. The board may in its discretion check with the appropriate
authority for any convictions of offenses involving drugs or the
personal consumption of alcohol in the prior twelve months.
(((7) The board shall prescribe, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, a
number of familiarization trips, between a minimum number of twenty-five and a maximum of one hundred, which pilot applicants must make in
the pilotage district for which they desire to be licensed.
Familiarization trips any particular applicant must make are to be
based upon the applicant's vessel handling experience.))
(8) The board may require vessel simulator training for a pilot
applicant and shall require vessel simulator training for a licensed
pilot subject to RCW 88.16.105. The board shall also require vessel
simulator training in the first year of active duty for a new pilot and
at least once every five years for all active pilots.
(9) The board shall prescribe, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, such
reporting requirements and review procedures as may be necessary to
assure the accuracy and validity of license and service claims((, and
records of familiarization trips of pilot candidates)). Willful
misrepresentation of such required information by a pilot ((candidate))
applicant shall result in disqualification of the ((candidate)) pilot
applicant.
(((10) The board shall adopt rules to establish time periods and
procedures for additional training trips and retesting as necessary for
pilots who at the time of their licensing are unable to become active
pilots.))

Sec. 3 RCW 88.16.118 and 1984 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ship's pilot licensed to act as such by the state of
Washington shall not be liable for damages in excess of the amount of
five thousand dollars for damages or loss occasioned by the pilot's
errors, omissions, fault, or neglect in the performance of pilotage or
pilot training services, except as may arise by reason of the willful
misconduct or gross negligence of ((the)) that pilot. A ship's pilot
trainee licensed to act as such by the state of Washington is not
liable for damages in excess of the amount of five thousand dollars for
damages or loss occasioned by the pilot trainee's errors, omissions,
fault, or neglect in the performance of pilotage or pilot training
services, except as may arise by reason of the willful misconduct or
gross negligence of that pilot trainee.
(2) When a pilot or pilot trainee boards a vessel, that pilot or
pilot trainee becomes a servant of the vessel and its owner and
operator. Nothing in this section exempts the vessel, its owner or
operator from liability for damage or loss occasioned by that ship to
a person or property on the ground that (((1))) (a) the ship was
piloted by a Washington state licensed pilot or pilot trainee, or
(((2))) (b) the damage or loss was occasioned by the error, omission,
fault, or neglect of a Washington state licensed pilot or pilot
trainee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---