BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.61.132 and 1989 c 319 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
For any real estate transaction proposed to result in a project
that provides programming and activities for disadvantaged youth, the
funding endowment for which equals or exceeds twenty million dollars,
and that requires the transfer of title of surplus district property to
a charitable organization as so recognized by its 501(c)(3) federal
income taxation status, every metropolitan park district may, by simple
majority vote of its board of park commissioners, sell, exchange, or
otherwise dispose of any real or personal property acquired for park or
recreational purposes when such property is declared surplus for park
or other recreational purposes: PROVIDED, That where the property is
acquired by donation or dedication for park or recreational purposes,
the consent of the donor or dedicator, his or her heirs, successors, or
assigns is first obtained if the consent of the donor is required in
the instrument conveying the property to the metropolitan park
district. In the event the donor or dedicator, his or her heirs,
successors, or assigns cannot be located after a reasonable search, the
metropolitan park district may petition the superior court in the
county where the property is located for approval of the sale. If
sold, all sales shall be by public bids and sale made only to the
highest or best bidder.
Every metropolitan park district may, by unanimous decision of its
board of park commissioners, sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of
any real or personal property acquired for park or recreational
purposes when such property is declared surplus for park or other
recreational purposes: PROVIDED, That where the property is acquired
by donation or dedication for park or recreational purposes, the
consent of the donor or dedicator, his or her heirs, successors, or
assigns is first obtained if the consent of the donor is required in
the instrument conveying the property to the metropolitan park
district. In the event the donor or dedicator, his or her heirs,
successors, or assigns cannot be located after a reasonable search, the
metropolitan park district may petition the superior court in the
county where the property is located for approval of the sale. If
sold, all sales shall be by public bids and sale made only to the
highest and best bidder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act expires December 31,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---