BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the use of
legal, consumer fireworks by many communities is an integral part of
their New Year's and Fourth of July celebrations.
(2) Counties, cities, and towns that allow the sale of consumer
fireworks expend considerable resources in enforcing state and local
consumer fireworks regulations during the peak holiday periods of New
Year's and Fourth of July. Since effective enforcement helps to ensure
the safe and responsible use of consumer fireworks, the legislature
finds that counties, cities, and towns would benefit from a revenue
source to support local enforcement efforts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) As an additional surcharge, the
legislative authority of any county, city, or town may adopt an
ordinance that imposes a surcharge on consumer fireworks, as defined by
RCW 70.77.136, within its jurisdiction, whereby sellers of consumer
fireworks, who operate under an approved local permit, shall remit such
tax receipts directly to the county, city, or town that imposes the
sales tax.
(2) Any surcharge on consumer fireworks imposed by a county alone
shall not apply to the sale of consumer fireworks within a city or town
located in the county, but the tax rate established by a county, if
any, shall constitute the tax rate through the unincorporated areas of
the county.
(3) The legislative authority of any county, city, or town may not
impose a surcharge on consumer fireworks in an amount greater than four
percent.
(4)(a) The premises and paraphernalia, and all the books and
records of any seller of consumer fireworks, who operates under an
approved local permit, and any person, company, association, or
organization receiving profits therefrom, or having any interest
therein, is subject to inspection and audit at any reasonable time,
with or without notice, upon demand, by an agent of any county, city,
or town that imposes a sales tax on consumer fireworks, for the purpose
of determining compliance or noncompliance with this section and any
rules or local regulations or ordinances adopted pursuant thereto.
(b) A reasonable time for the purpose of this section shall be:
(i) If the items or records to be inspected or audited are located
anywhere upon a premises any portion of which is regularly open to the
public or members and guests, any time when the premises are so open,
or at which they are usually open; or
(ii) If the items or records to be inspected or audited are not
located upon a premises set out in (b)(i) of this subsection, any time
between the hours of eight a.m. and nine p.m., Monday through Friday.
(5) Counties, cities, and towns that collect the surcharge on
consumer fireworks authorized in this section shall use such taxes
primarily for the education regarding and the enforcement of state and
local fireworks regulations.

--- END ---