BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 17.10.145 and 1997 c 353 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
All state agencies shall control noxious weeds on lands they own,
lease, or otherwise control through integrated pest management
practices, and shall give first priority to the control of class A and
B designate noxious weeds occurring within five hundred feet of
adjacent private property. Agencies shall develop plans in cooperation
with county noxious weed control boards to control noxious weeds in
accordance with standards in this chapter. All state agencies' lands
must comply with this chapter, regardless of noxious weed control
efforts on adjacent lands.

--- END ---