BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many within the
state executive branch use the consensus process for developing either
proposed executive request legislation or agency rules. The
legislature finds that while there are many benefits in the use of
well-designed and administered consensus processes, there is also the
potential for a misunderstanding of or a misuse in the consensus
process.
The legislature finds that the longstanding recognition of the
right to free speech includes the right to place in the official state
record a position of concern or opposition for the product reached
through a consensus process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
When a state agency uses the consensus process to develop either
executive request legislation or rules adopted pursuant to chapter
34.05 RCW, the agency shall announce at the beginning of the process
that there is an opportunity at the end of the process for either
participants or persons who requested to participate but were
disallowed from participating, to file written statements of support,
concern, or opposition that will be appended to the final consensus
document.
Each state agency that uses the consensus process to formulate
proposed executive request legislation or agency rules shall allow
citizens to place a written statement of position in the official file
regarding the product that is declared by the state agency as a
consensus agreement. These position statements shall be filed within
sixty days of the completion of the consensus process. These
statements shall be retained in the agency's public record file and
available in accordance with procedures established under the open
public records act under this chapter.

--- END ---