BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that new advances
in technology and the development of industry standards now allow law
enforcement agencies with different automatic fingerprint
identification system manufacturers to be interoperable. Furthermore,
the legislature recognizes that requiring all law enforcement agencies
to purchase or lease automatic fingerprint identification system
equipment from the same vendor utilized by the Washington state patrol
creates a noncompetitive environment, which prevents local law
enforcement agencies from negotiating lower prices. It is therefore
the intent of this legislation to allow local law enforcement agencies
to purchase or lease any automatic fingerprint identification system,
provided that the system complies with national industry standards for
interoperability as developed by the national institute of standards
and technology.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.570 and 1987 c 450 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No local law enforcement agency may establish or operate an
automatic fingerprint identification system unless((:
(a))) both the hardware and software of the local system ((are))
use an interface compatible with the state system under RCW
43.43.560((; and
(b) The local system is equipped to receive and answer inquiries
from the Washington state patrol automatic fingerprint identification
system and transmit data to the Washington state patrol automatic
fingerprint identification system)). The local law enforcement agency
shall be able to transmit a tenprint record to the state system through
any available protocol which meets accepted industry standards, and the
state system must be able to accept tenprint records which comply with
those requirements. When industry transmission protocols change, the
Washington state patrol shall incorporate these new standards as
funding and reasonable system engineering practices permit. The
tenprint transmission from any local law enforcement agency must be in
accordance with the current version of the state electronic fingerprint
transmission specification.
(2) No later than January 1, 2007, the Washington state patrol's
automatic fingerprint identification system shall be capable of
instantly accepting electronic latent search records from any
Washington state local law enforcement agency. If specific funding for
the purposes of this subsection is not provided by June 30, 2006, in
the omnibus appropriations act, or if funding is not obtained from
another source by June 30, 2006, this subsection is null and void.
(3) A local law enforcement agency operating an automatic
fingerprint identification system shall transmit data on fingerprint
entries to the Washington state patrol electronically ((by computer)).
This requirement shall be in addition to those under RCW 10.98.050 and
43.43.740.
(((3) Counties or local agencies that purchased or signed a
contract to purchase an automatic fingerprint identification system
prior to January 1, 1987, are exempt from the requirements of this
section. The Washington state patrol shall charge fees for processing
latent fingerprints submitted to the patrol by counties or local
jurisdictions exempted from the requirements of this section. The fees
shall cover, as nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs to
the patrol of processing such fingerprints.))
(4) Any personnel functions necessary to prepare fingerprints for
searches under this section shall be the responsibility of the
submitting agency.
(5) The Washington state patrol shall adopt rules to implement this
section.

--- END ---