BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.235 and 2000 c 5 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules providing a procedure and
criteria for certifying one or more organizations to perform
independent review of health care disputes described in RCW 48.43.535.
(2) The rules must require that the organization ensure:
(a) The confidentiality of medical records transmitted to an
independent review organization for use in independent reviews;
(b) That each health care provider, physician, or contract
specialist making review determinations for an independent review
organization is qualified. Physicians, other health care providers,
and, if applicable, contract specialists must be appropriately
licensed, certified, or registered as required in Washington state or
in at least one state with standards substantially comparable to
Washington state. Reviewers may be drawn from nationally recognized
centers of excellence, academic institutions, and recognized leading
practice sites. Expert medical reviewers should have substantial,
recent clinical experience dealing with the same or similar health
conditions. The organization must have demonstrated expertise and a
history of reviewing health care in terms of medical necessity,
appropriateness, and the application of other health plan coverage
provisions;
(c) That any physician, health care provider, or contract
specialist making a review determination in a specific review is free
of any actual or potential conflict of interest or bias. Neither the
expert reviewer, nor the independent review organization, nor any
officer, director, or management employee of the independent review
organization may have any material professional, familial, or financial
affiliation with any of the following: The health carrier;
professional associations of carriers and providers; the provider; the
provider's medical or practice group; the health facility at which the
service would be provided; the developer or manufacturer of a drug or
device under review; or the enrollee;
(d) The fairness of the procedures used by the independent review
organization in making the determinations;
(e) That each independent review organization make its
determination:
(i) Not later than the earlier of:
(A) The fifteenth day after the date the independent review
organization receives the information necessary to make the
determination; or
(B) The twentieth day after the date the independent review
organization receives the request that the determination be made. In
exceptional circumstances, when the independent review organization has
not obtained information necessary to make a determination, a
determination may be made by the twenty-fifth day after the date the
organization received the request for the determination; and
(ii) In cases of a condition that could seriously jeopardize the
enrollee's health or ability to regain maximum function, not later than
the earlier of:
(A) Seventy-two hours after the date the independent review
organization receives the information necessary to make the
determination; or
(B) The eighth day after the date the independent review
organization receives the request that the determination be made;
(f) That timely notice is provided to enrollees of the results of
the independent review, including the clinical basis for the
determination;
(g) That the independent review organization has a quality
assurance mechanism in place that ensures the timeliness and quality of
review and communication of determinations to enrollees and carriers,
and the qualifications, impartiality, and freedom from conflict of
interest of the organization, its staff, and expert reviewers; and
(h) That the independent review organization meets any other
reasonable requirements of the department directly related to the
functions the organization is to perform under this section and RCW
48.43.535, and related to assessing fees to carriers in a manner
consistent with the maximum fee schedule developed under this section.
(3) To be certified as an independent review organization under
this chapter, an organization must submit to the department an
application in the form required by the department. The application
must include:
(a) For an applicant that is publicly held, the name of each
stockholder or owner of more than five percent of any stock or options;
(b) The name of any holder of bonds or notes of the applicant that
exceed one hundred thousand dollars;
(c) The name and type of business of each corporation or other
organization that the applicant controls or is affiliated with and the
nature and extent of the affiliation or control;
(d) The name and a biographical sketch of each director, officer,
and executive of the applicant and any entity listed under (c) of this
subsection and a description of any relationship the named individual
has with:
(i) A carrier;
(ii) A utilization review agent;
(iii) A nonprofit or for-profit health corporation;
(iv) A health care provider;
(v) A drug or device manufacturer; or
(vi) A group representing any of the entities described by (d)(i)
through (v) of this subsection;
(e) The percentage of the applicant's revenues that are anticipated
to be derived from reviews conducted under RCW 48.43.535;
(f) A description of the areas of expertise of the health care
professionals and contract specialists making review determinations for
the applicant; and
(g) The procedures to be used by the independent review
organization in making review determinations regarding reviews
conducted under RCW 48.43.535.
(4) If at any time there is a material change in the information
included in the application under subsection (3) of this section, the
independent review organization shall submit updated information to the
department.
(5) An independent review organization may not be a subsidiary of,
or in any way owned or controlled by, a carrier or a trade or
professional association of health care providers or carriers.
(6) An independent review organization, and individuals acting on
its behalf, are immune from suit in a civil action when performing
functions under chapter 5, Laws of 2000. However, this immunity does
not apply to an act or omission made in bad faith or that involves
gross negligence.
(7) Independent review organizations must be free from interference
by state government in its functioning except as provided in subsection
(8) of this section.
(8) The rules adopted under this section shall include provisions
for terminating the certification of an independent review organization
for failure to comply with the requirements for certification. The
department may review the operation and performance of an independent
review organization in response to complaints or other concerns about
compliance. No later than January 1, 2006, the department shall
develop a reasonable maximum fee schedule that independent review
organizations shall use to assess carriers for conducting reviews
authorized under RCW 48.43.535.
(9) In adopting rules for this section, the department shall take
into consideration standards for independent review organizations
adopted by national accreditation organizations. The department may
accept national accreditation or certification by another state as
evidence that an organization satisfies some or all of the requirements
for certification by the department as an independent review
organization.

--- END ---