BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The use of wireless communications devices
by motorists has increased in recent years. While wireless
communications devices have assisted with quick reporting of road
emergencies, their use has also contributed to accidents and other
mishaps on Washington state roadways. When motorists hold a wireless
communications device in one hand and drive with the other, their
chances of becoming involved in a traffic mishap increase. It is the
legislature's intent to phase out the use of hand-held wireless
communications devices by motorists while operating a vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person
operating a moving motor vehicle while holding a wireless
communications device to his or her ear is guilty of a traffic
infraction.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to a person
operating:
(a) An authorized emergency vehicle;
(b) A moving motor vehicle using a wireless communications device
in hands-free mode;
(c) A moving motor vehicle using a hand-held wireless
communications device to:
(i) Report illegal activity;
(ii) Summon medical or other emergency help;
(iii) Prevent injury to a person or property.
(3) For purposes of this section, "hands-free mode" means the use
of a wireless communications device with a speaker phone, headset, or
earpiece.
(4) The state preempts the field of regulating the use of wireless
communications devices in motor vehicles, and this section supersedes
any local laws, ordinances, orders, rules, or regulations enacted by a
political subdivision or municipality to regulate the use of wireless
communications devices by the operator of a motor vehicle.
(5) Enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may be
accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor
vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of this title or an
equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.
(6) Infractions that result from the use of a wireless
communication device while operating a motor vehicle under this section
shall not become part of the driver's record under RCW 46.52.101 and
46.52.120. Additionally, a finding that a person has committed a
traffic infraction under this section shall not be made available to
insurance companies or employers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 For the first six months after the effective
date of this act, law enforcement officers may only issue verbal
warnings for violations of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2006.

--- END ---