BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
In lieu of the license tab fees provided in RCW 46.16.0621, private
use one or two wheeled trailers of two thousand pounds scale weight or
less may be licensed upon the payment of a license fee in the sum of
four dollars and fifty cents or, if the trailer was previously licensed
in this state and has not been registered in another jurisdiction in
the intervening period, a renewal license fee in the sum of three
dollars and twenty-five cents, but only if the trailer is operated upon
public highways. The license fee must be collected annually for each
registration year or fraction of a registration year. This reduced
license fee applies only to trailers operated for personal use of the
owners, and not trailers held for rental to the public or used in any
commercial or business endeavor. The fee from this section must be
deposited in the state patrol highway account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is effective with registration fees
that are due or will become due October 1, 2005, and thereafter.

--- END ---