BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of transportation may impose mitigation fees, or
require mitigation, from development activity that creates additional
significant demand and need for transportation improvements to highways
of statewide significance or related facilities or state highways in
urban growth areas as defined in RCW 36.70A.030, as determined by the
department. This authority may be exercised only under this chapter.
(2) The mitigation or mitigation fee(s):
(a) Must be determined within the time frame and in conjunction
with the process established under this chapter;
(b) May be imposed only for state transportation improvements that
are reasonably related to the development activity;
(c) May not exceed a proportionate share of the costs of state
transportation improvements that are reasonably related to the
development activity;
(d) Must be used for state transportation improvements that will
reasonably benefit the development activity;
(e) Must be spent in all cases within six years of collection, or
the unspent funds must be refunded; and
(f) Must be transparent and the method and details of how the
mitigation or mitigation fee was derived must be included in the
assessment.
(3)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, the determination of the
mitigation, or the collection of mitigation fees, must be included in
the local entity's mitigation assessment.
(b) If there is no local mitigation assessment, or if the
department of transportation chooses to assess its mitigation
separately, then the department of transportation may submit the
mitigation or mitigation fee, or both, separately from the local
jurisdiction, consistent with the mitigation process established under
this chapter. However, the development activity may not be charged
twice for any particular mitigation required.
(c) Regardless of whether the mitigation or mitigation fee is
assessed under (a) or (b) of this subsection (3), local jurisdictions
may fund the department of transportation mitigation fee through
alternative revenue sources.
(4) The department shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW
regarding:
(a) The criteria applicable to a determination under subsection (1)
of this section as to whether development activity creates additional
significant demand and need for transportation improvements to highways
of statewide significance or related facilities or state highways in
urban growth areas as defined in RCW 36.70A.030;
(b) A formula or method for calculating the amount of mitigation or
mitigation fees, or both, to be imposed on the development activity,
considering (i) the type of development activity subject to the fees
and (ii) the proportionate share of the costs of state transportation
improvements that are reasonably related to the development activity;
(c) Provisions outlining the types of nonfee-based mitigation that
are allowed, establishing standards for such mitigation and outlining
oversight procedures for such mitigation;
(d) The administration and collection of the fees;
(e) The provision that a development activity may not be charged
twice for any particular mitigation required;
(f) The allowance of an adjustment to the standard mitigation fee
at the time the fee is imposed to consider unusual circumstances in
specific cases to ensure that mitigation fees are imposed fairly;
(g) An administrative appeals process for the appeal of a
mitigation fee that is in compliance with RCW 43.21C.075; and
(h) Procedures for refunding funds not spent within six years.
(5) The following development activities are exempt from this
section:
(a) Residential development meeting the criteria of "affordable
housing" as defined in RCW 43.63A.510; or
(b) Development that generates less than twenty-five "peak hour
trips" on a highway of statewide significance or on its related
facilities or state highways in urban growth areas as defined in RCW
36.70A.030. However, development activity subject to this exemption
may choose, at the developer's option, to subject the development
activity to the provisions of this section.
(6) Infrastructure improvement projects currently funded by
federal, state, or local revenue shall not be included as part of a
mitigation, or mitigation fee, assessed on development activity.
(7) Mitigation fees imposed under this section must be deposited
into the transportation mitigation fee account, hereby created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Expenditures from the account must be
used only for the purpose or purposes for which the mitigation fees
were imposed, and according to subsection (2) of this section. Only
the secretary of transportation or the secretary's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within two working days of receipt of notification or
application for a development project that is either (a) subject to a
State Environmental Policy Act review under this chapter or (b) that is
adjacent to a highway of statewide significance or a state highway in
an urban growth area as defined in RCW 36.70A.030, the local
governmental entity receiving the application or notification shall
notify the department of transportation of the proposed project.
Before preparing the environmental impact statement or issuing a
threshold determination, the lead agency shall consult with the
department of transportation. Any significant adverse impacts
identified by the department of transportation must be included in the
environmental impact statement or the threshold determination. The
department of transportation must notify the lead agency of any such
impacts in a timely manner to allow the responsible official to comply
with RCW 43.21C.033.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.02.100 and 1992 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person required to pay a fee pursuant to RCW 43.21C.060 or
section 1 of this act for system improvements shall not be required to
pay an impact fee under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 for those same
system improvements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of transportation may impose mitigation or
mitigation fees, or both, according to sections 1 and 2 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2004 c 246 s 8 and 2004 c 58 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future
teachers conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative
account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion
account, the produce railcar pool account, the rural rehabilitation
account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic
facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse
racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the
Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, ((and))
the Washington horse racing commission operating account (earnings from
the Washington horse racing commission operating account must be
credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund
account), and the transportation mitigation fee account. However, the
earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to
the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of transportation may impose and collect latecomer
fees on behalf of another entity for infrastructure improvement
projects initially funded partially or entirely by private sources.
However, there must be an agreement in place between the department of
transportation and the entity before the imposition and collection of
any such fees, that specifies (1) the collection process; (2) the
maximum amount that may be collected; and (3) the period of time during
which the collection may occur.

--- END ---