BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature believes that electronic
monitoring, as an alternative to incarceration, is a proper and cost-effective method of punishment and supervision for many criminal
offenders. The legislature further finds that advancements in
electronic monitoring technology have made the technology more common
and acceptable to criminal justice system personnel, policymakers, and
the general public.
In an effort to reduce prison and jail populations, many states
are increasing their utilization of electronic monitoring. However,
Washington state's use of electronic monitoring has been relatively
stagnate.
The intent of this act is to determine what electronic monitoring
policies and programs have been implemented in the other forty-nine
states, in order that Washington state can learn from the other states'
experiences.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs shall conduct a comprehensive study on electronic
monitoring in every state. The study shall review and analyze each
state's activity regarding electronic monitoring. Specifically, the
study shall include:
(a) How often electronic monitoring is used;
(b) A description of laws and circumstances of when an offender is
placed on electronic monitoring;
(c) The discovery and analysis of specific programs used to promote
electronic monitoring and how they are operated;
(d) The type of electronic monitoring technology used;
(e) Evaluation of offender pay programs and the amount of money
recovered from these programs;
(f) Overall perceptions of electronic monitoring from the criminal
justice community, and any real or perceived problems or concerns with
electronic monitoring;
(g) Estimates on savings realized by utilizing electronic
monitoring.
(2) The findings and any recommendations from the study shall be
placed into a final report and presented to the legislature no later
than December 31, 2005.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.737 and 2002 c 175 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an offender violates any condition or requirement of
community custody, the department may transfer the offender to a more
restrictive confinement status to serve up to the remaining portion of
the sentence, less credit for any period actually spent in community
custody or in detention awaiting disposition of an alleged violation
and subject to the limitations of subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) For a sex offender sentenced to a term of community custody
under RCW 9.94A.670 who violates any condition of community custody,
the department may impose a sanction of up to sixty days' confinement
in a local correctional facility for each violation. If the department
imposes a sanction, the department shall submit within seventy-two
hours a report to the court and the prosecuting attorney outlining the
violation or violations and the sanctions imposed.
(b) For a sex offender sentenced to a term of community custody
under RCW 9.94A.710 who violates any condition of community custody
after having completed his or her maximum term of total confinement,
including time served on community custody in lieu of earned release,
the department may impose a sanction of up to sixty days in a local
correctional facility for each violation.
(c) For an offender sentenced to a term of community custody under
RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650, or 9.94A.715, or under RCW 9.94A.545,
for a crime committed on or after July 1, 2000, who violates any
condition of community custody after having completed his or her
maximum term of total confinement, including time served on community
custody in lieu of earned release, the department may impose a sanction
of up to sixty days in total confinement for each violation. The
department may impose sanctions such as work release, home detention
with electronic monitoring, work crew, community restitution, inpatient
treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling sessions,
supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any other
sanctions available in the community.
(d) For an offender sentenced to a term of community placement
under RCW 9.94A.705 who violates any condition of community placement
after having completed his or her maximum term of total confinement,
including time served on community custody in lieu of earned release,
the department may impose a sanction of up to sixty days in total
confinement for each violation. The department may impose sanctions
such as work release, home detention with electronic monitoring, work
crew, community restitution, inpatient treatment, daily reporting,
curfew, educational or counseling sessions, supervision enhanced
through electronic monitoring, or any other sanctions available in the
community.
(3) If an offender is accused of violating any condition or
requirement of community custody, he or she is entitled to a hearing
before the department prior to the imposition of sanctions. The
hearing shall be considered as offender disciplinary proceedings and
shall not be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The department shall
develop hearing procedures and a structure of graduated sanctions.
(4) The hearing procedures required under subsection (3) of this
section shall be developed by rule and include the following:
(a) Hearing officers shall report through a chain of command
separate from that of community corrections officers;
(b) The department shall provide the offender with written notice
of the violation, the evidence relied upon, and the reasons the
particular sanction was imposed. The notice shall include a statement
of the rights specified in this subsection, and the offender's right to
file a personal restraint petition under court rules after the final
decision of the department;
(c) The hearing shall be held unless waived by the offender, and
shall be electronically recorded. For offenders not in total
confinement, the hearing shall be held within fifteen working days, but
not less than twenty-four hours, after notice of the violation. For
offenders in total confinement, the hearing shall be held within five
working days, but not less than twenty-four hours, after notice of the
violation;
(d) The offender shall have the right to: (i) Be present at the
hearing; (ii) have the assistance of a person qualified to assist the
offender in the hearing, appointed by the hearing officer if the
offender has a language or communications barrier; (iii) testify or
remain silent; (iv) call witnesses and present documentary evidence;
and (v) question witnesses who appear and testify; and
(e) The sanction shall take effect if affirmed by the hearing
officer. Within seven days after the hearing officer's decision, the
offender may appeal the decision to a panel of three reviewing officers
designated by the secretary or by the secretary's designee. The
sanction shall be reversed or modified if a majority of the panel finds
that the sanction was not reasonably related to any of the following:
(i) The crime of conviction; (ii) the violation committed; (iii) the
offender's risk of reoffending; or (iv) the safety of the community.
(5) For purposes of this section, no finding of a violation of
conditions may be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.
(6) The department shall work with the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs to establish and operate an electronic
monitoring program for low-risk offenders who violate the terms of
their community custody. Between January 1, 2006, and December 31,
2006, the department shall endeavor to place at least one hundred low-risk community custody violators on the electronic monitoring program
per day if there are at least that many low-risk offenders who qualify
for the electronic monitoring program.
(7) Local governments, their subdivisions and employees, the
department and its employees, and the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs and its employees shall be immune from civil
liability for damages arising from incidents involving low-risk
offenders who are placed on electronic monitoring unless it is shown
that an employee acted with gross negligence or bad faith.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires December 31, 2006.

--- END ---