BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.250 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 424 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every person who:
(1) Manufactures, sells, or disposes of or possesses any instrument
or weapon of the kind usually known as slung shot, sand club, or metal
knuckles, or spring blade knife, or any knife the blade of which is
automatically released by a spring mechanism or other mechanical
device, or any knife having a blade which opens, or falls, or is
ejected into position by the force of gravity, or by an outward,
downward, or centrifugal thrust or movement;
(2) Furtively carries with intent to conceal any dagger, dirk,
pistol, or other dangerous weapon; or
(3) Uses any contrivance or device for suppressing the noise of any
firearm unless the suppressor is legally registered and possessed in
accordance with federal law,
is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

--- END ---