BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35A.11.110 and 1993 c 303 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the legislative body of
any code city, by resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote of the full
legislative body, may authorize any of its members to serve as
volunteer fire fighters, volunteer ambulance personnel, or reserve law
enforcement officers, or ((both)) two or more of such positions, and to
receive the same compensation, insurance, and other benefits as are
applicable to other volunteer fire fighters, volunteer ambulance
personnel, or reserve law enforcement officers employed by the code
city.

--- END ---