BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.555 and 2004 c 248 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the fees authorized in this chapter, the department
shall include a surcharge to fund biotoxin testing and monitoring by
the department of health of beaches used for recreational shellfishing,
and to fund monitoring by the Olympic region harmful algal bloom
program of the Olympic natural resources center at the University of
Washington. A surcharge of three dollars applies to resident and
nonresident shellfish and seaweed licenses as authorized by RCW
77.32.520(3) (a) and (b); a surcharge of two dollars applies to
resident and nonresident adult combination licenses as authorized by
RCW 77.32.470(2)(a); a surcharge of two dollars applies to annual
resident and nonresident razor clam licenses as authorized by RCW
77.32.520(4); and a surcharge of one dollar applies to the three-day
razor clam license authorized by RCW 77.32.520(5). Amounts collected
from these surcharges must be deposited in the general fund -- local
account managed by the department of health, except that one hundred
fifty thousand dollars per year shall be deposited in the general
fund--local account managed by the University of Washington.
Amounts in excess of the annual costs of the department of health
recreational shellfish testing and monitoring program shall be
transferred to the general fund by the department of health. Unspent
amounts from the surcharges deposited in the general fund--local
accounts managed by the department of health and the University of
Washington shall carry over to ensuing biennia to pay for the ongoing
costs of the programs. The department of health and the University of
Washington shall, by December 1st of each year, provide a letter to the
relevant legislative policy and fiscal committees on the status of
expenditures. This letter shall include, but is not limited to, the
annual appropriation amount, the amount not expended, account fund
balance, and reasons for not spending the full annual appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---