BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state patrol shall adopt personnel policies that
ensure that patrol officers do not improperly use their position or
authority as patrol officers in dealing with personal matters, legal or
otherwise, or in dealing with other persons with whom they have a
personal matter. These policies must include, at a minimum, provisions
that prohibit patrol officers from:
(1) Taking part in the investigation or processing of a case or
complaint in which they have a personal interest;
(2) Using their unique position or authority as a patrol officer to
investigate a personal matter, legal or otherwise;
(3) Using their position or authority to investigate, follow, place
under surveillance, intimidate, or harass a person with whom they have
a personal matter, legal or otherwise;
(4) Using the information resources that are available to them as
patrol officers to investigate a personal matter or a person with whom
they have a personal matter; and
(5) Investigating or engaging other officers to investigate a
personal matter of a patrol officer or a person with whom a patrol
officer has a personal matter unless investigation of the matter is
within the proper function of the state patrol and the investigation
takes place through the normal process of investigating a case or
complaint.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Law enforcement agencies shall adopt
personnel policies that ensure that law enforcement officers do not
improperly use their position or authority as officers in dealing with
personal matters, legal or otherwise, or in dealing with other persons
with whom they have a personal matter. These policies must include, at
a minimum, provisions that prohibit officers from:
(1) Taking part in the investigation or processing of a case or
complaint in which they have a personal interest;
(2) Using their unique position or authority as an officer to
investigate a personal matter, legal or otherwise;
(3) Using their position or authority as officers to investigate,
follow, place under surveillance, intimidate, or harass a person with
whom they have a personal matter, legal or otherwise;
(4) Using the information resources that are available to them as
officers to investigate a personal matter or a person with whom they
have a personal matter; and
(5) Investigating or engaging other officers to investigate a
personal matter of an officer or a person with whom an officer has a
personal matter unless investigation of the matter is within the proper
function of the law enforcement agency and the investigation takes
place through the normal process of investigating a case or complaint.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 10 RCW.

--- END ---