BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.21J.010 and 1995 c 226 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of this chapter to provide financial resources
to make substantial progress toward: (a) Implementing the Puget Sound
water quality management plan and other watershed-based management
strategies and plans; (b) ameliorating degradation to watersheds; and
(c) keeping and creating stable, environmentally sound, good wage
employment in Washington state. The legislature intends that
employment under this chapter is not to result in the displacement or
partial displacement, whether by the reduction of hours of nonovertime
work, wages, or other employment benefits, of currently employed
workers, including but not limited to state civil service employees, or
of currently or normally contracted services.
(2) It is the purpose of this chapter to:
(a) Implement clean water, forest, and habitat restoration projects
that will produce measurable improvements in water and habitat quality,
that rate highly when existing environmental ranking systems are
applied, and that provide economic stability.
(b) Facilitate the coordination and consistency of federal, state,
tribal, local, and private water and habitat protection and enhancement
programs in the state's watersheds.
(c) Fund necessary projects for which a public planning process has
been completed.
(d) Provide immediate funding to create jobs and training for
environmental restoration and enhancement jobs for unemployed workers
and displaced workers in impact areas, especially rural natural
resources-dependent communities.
(3) For purposes of this chapter "impact areas" means: (a)
Distressed counties as defined in RCW ((43.165.010(3)(a))) 43.168.020;
and (b) ((subcounty areas in those counties not covered under (a) of
this subsection that are rural natural resources impact areas as
defined in RCW 43.31.601; (c) urban subcounty areas as defined in RCW
43.165.010(3)(c); and (d))) areas that the task force determines are
likely to experience dislocations in the near future from downturns in
natural resource-based industries.
(4) For purposes of this chapter, "high-risk youth" means youth
eligible for Washington conservation corps programs under chapter
43.220 RCW or Washington service corps programs under chapter 50.65
RCW.
(5) For purposes of this chapter, "dislocated forest products
worker" has the meaning set forth in *RCW 50.70.010.
(6) For purposes of this chapter, "task force" means the
environmental enhancement and job creation task force created under RCW
43.21J.030.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.63A.230 and 1993 c 280 s 63 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) The department of community, trade, and economic
development shall ((integrate an employee ownership program within its
existing technical assistance programs. The employee ownership program
shall)) provide technical assistance to cooperatives authorized under
chapter 23.78 RCW and conduct educational programs on employee
ownership and self-management. The department shall include
information on the option of employee ownership wherever appropriate in
its various programs.
(((2) The department shall maintain a list of firms and individuals
with expertise in the field of employee ownership and utilize such
firms and individuals, as appropriate, in delivering and coordinating
the delivery of technical, managerial, and educational services. In
addition, the department shall work with and rely on the services of
the employment security department and state institutions of higher
education to promote employee ownership.
(3) The department shall report to the governor, the appropriate
economic development committees of the senate and the house of
representatives, and the ways and means committees of each house by
December 1 of 1988, and each year thereafter, on the accomplishments of
the employee-ownership program. Such reports shall include the number
and types of firms assisted, the number of jobs created by such firms,
the types of services, the number of workshops presented, the number of
employees trained, and the results of client satisfaction surveys
distributed to those using the services of the program.
(4) For purposes of this section, an employee stock ownership plan
qualifies as a cooperative if at least fifty percent, plus one share,
of its voting shares of stock are voted on a one-person-one-vote
basis.))

Sec. 3 RCW 43.168.020 and 1999 c 164 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Director" means the director of community, trade, and economic
development.
(3) "Distressed area" means: (a) A rural county; (b) a county
which has an unemployment rate which is twenty percent above the state
average for the immediately previous three years; (c) a county that has
a median household income that is less than seventy-five percent of the
state median household income for the previous three years; (d) a
metropolitan statistical area, as defined by the office of federal
statistical policy and standards, United States department of commerce,
in which the average level of unemployment for the calendar year
immediately preceding the year in which an application is filed under
this chapter exceeds the average state unemployment for such calendar
year by twenty percent; or (e) an area within a county, which area:
(i) Is composed of contiguous census tracts; (ii) has a minimum
population of five thousand persons; (iii) has at least seventy percent
of its families and unrelated individuals with incomes below eighty
percent of the county's median income for families and unrelated
individuals; and (iv) has an unemployment rate which is at least forty
percent higher than the county's unemployment rate((; or (f) a county
designated as a rural natural resources impact area under RCW 43.31.601
if an application is filed by July 1, 1997)). For purposes of this
definition, "families and unrelated individuals" has the same meaning
that is ascribed to that term by the federal department of housing and
urban development in its regulations authorizing action grants for
economic development and neighborhood revitalization projects.
(4) "Fund" means the rural Washington loan fund.
(5) "Local development organization" means a nonprofit organization
which is organized to operate within an area, demonstrates a commitment
to a long-standing effort for an economic development program, and
makes a demonstrable effort to assist in the employment of unemployed
or underemployed residents in an area.
(6) "Project" means the establishment of a new or expanded business
in an area which when completed will provide employment opportunities.
"Project" also means the retention of an existing business in an area
which when completed will provide employment opportunities.
(7) "Rural county" means a county with a population density of
fewer that one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the
office of financial management.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.168.040 and 1987 c 461 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Subject to the restrictions contained in this chapter, the
((committee)) director is authorized to approve applications of local
governments for federal community development block grant funds which
the local governments would use to make loans to finance business
projects within their jurisdictions. Applications approved by the
((committee)) director under this chapter shall conform to applicable
federal requirements.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.168.050 and 1993 c 512 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((committee)) director may only approve an application
providing a loan for a project which the ((committee)) director finds:
(a) Will result in the creation of employment opportunities, the
maintenance of threatened employment, or development or expansion of
business ownership by minorities and women;
(b) ((Has been approved by the director as conforming)) Will
conform to federal rules and regulations governing the spending of
federal community development block grant funds;
(c) Will be of public benefit and for a public purpose, and that
the benefits, including increased or maintained employment, improved
standard of living, the employment of disadvantaged workers, and
development or expansion of business ownership by minorities and women,
will primarily accrue to residents of the area;
(d) Will probably be successful;
(e) Would probably not be completed without the loan because other
capital or financing at feasible terms is unavailable or the return on
investment is inadequate.
(2) The ((committee)) director shall, subject to federal block
grant criteria, give higher priority to economic development projects
that contain provisions for child care.
(3) The ((committee)) director may not approve an application if it
fails to provide for adequate reporting or disclosure of financial data
to the ((committee)) director. The ((committee)) director may require
an annual or other periodic audit of the project books.
(4) The ((committee)) director may require that the project be
managed in whole or in part by a local development organization and may
prescribe a management fee to be paid to such organization by the
recipient of the loan or grant.
(5)(((a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the
committee shall not approve any application which would result in a
loan or grant in excess of three hundred fifty thousand dollars.
(b))) The ((committee)) director may approve an application which
results in a loan or grant of up to ((seven hundred thousand)) one
million dollars ((if the application has been approved by the
director)).
(6) The ((committee)) director shall fix the terms and rates
pertaining to ((its)) fund loans.
(7) Should there be more demand for loans than funds available for
lending, the ((committee)) director shall provide loans for those
projects which will lead to the greatest amount of employment or
benefit to a community. In determining the "greatest amount of
employment or benefit" the ((committee)) director shall also consider
the employment which would be saved by its loan and the benefit
relative to the community, not just the total number of new jobs or
jobs saved.
(8) To the extent permitted under federal law the ((committee))
director shall require applicants to provide for the transfer of all
payments of principal and interest on loans to the ((Washington state
development loan)) fund created under this chapter. Under
circumstances where the federal law does not permit the ((committee))
director to require such transfer, the ((committee)) director shall
give priority to applications where the applicants on their own
volition make commitments to provide for the transfer.
(9) The ((committee)) director shall not approve any application to
finance or help finance a shopping mall.
(10) For loans not made to minority and women-owned businesses, the
((committee)) director shall make at least eighty percent of the
appropriated funds available to projects located in distressed areas,
and may make up to twenty percent available to projects located in
areas not designated as distressed. For loans not made to minority and
women-owned businesses, the ((committee)) director shall not make funds
available to projects located in areas not designated as distressed if
the fund's net worth is less than seven million one hundred thousand
dollars.
(11) If an objection is raised to a project on the basis of unfair
business competition, the ((committee)) director shall evaluate the
potential impact of a project on similar businesses located in the
local market area. A grant may be denied by the ((committee)) director
if a project is not likely to result in a net increase in employment
within a local market area.
(12) For loans to minority and women-owned businesses who do not
meet the credit criteria, the ((committee)) director may consider
nontraditional credit standards to offset past discrimination that has
precluded full participation of minority or women-owned businesses in
the economy. For applicants with high potential who do not meet the
credit criteria, the ((committee)) director shall consider developing
alternative borrowing methods. For applicants denied loans due to
credit problems, the ((committee)) department shall provide financial
counseling within available resources and provide referrals to credit
rehabilitation services. In circumstances of competing applications,
priority shall be given to members of eligible groups which previously
have been least served by this fund.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.168.060 and 1985 c 164 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The department shall provide adequate and appropriate staff and
other support to the committee. A record of committee proceedings
shall be maintained by the department.)) The department is encouraged
to work with local development organizations to promote applications
for loans by the fund. The department shall also provide assistance to
local development organizations and local governments to identify
viable projects for consideration ((by the committee)). The department
shall adopt such rules and regulations as are appropriate for ((the
committee to carry out its authority under)) implementation of this
chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.168.070 and 1993 c 512 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((committee)) director may receive and approve applications on
a monthly basis but shall receive and approve applications on at least
a quarterly basis for each fiscal year. The ((committee)) director
shall make every effort to simplify the loan process for applicants.
Department staff shall process and assist in the preparation of
applications. Each application shall show in detail the nature of the
project, the types and numbers of jobs to be created, wages to be paid
to new employees, and methods to hire unemployed persons from the area.
Each application shall contain a credit analysis of the business to
receive the loan. ((The chairperson of the committee may convene the
committee)) The director may respond on short notice ((to respond)) to
applications of a serious or immediate nature.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.168.090 and 1985 c 164 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall ((make available for)) use ((by the
committee)) for the fund an amount of federal community development
block grant funds equal to the amount of state funds transferred or
appropriated to the department for purposes of supplementing the
department's block grant funds.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.168.100 and 1993 c 512 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((committee)) director may make grants of state funds to local
governments which qualify as "entitlement communities" under the
federal law authorizing community development block grants. These
grants may only be made on the condition that the entitlement community
provide the ((committee)) director with assurances that it will: (1)
Spend the grant moneys for purposes and in a manner which satisfies
state constitutional requirements; (2) spend the grant moneys for
purposes and in a manner which would satisfy federal requirements; and
(3) spend at least the same amount of the grant for loans to businesses
from the federal funds received by the entitlement community.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.168.130 and 1998 c 245 s 52 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((committee)) director shall develop performance standards for
judging the effectiveness of the program. Such standards shall
include, to the extent possible, examining the effectiveness of grants
in regard to:
(1) Job creation for individuals of low and moderate income;
(2) Retention of existing employment;
(3) The creation of new employment opportunities;
(4) The diversification of the economic base of local communities;
(5) The establishment of employee cooperatives;
(6) The provision of assistance in cases of employee buy-outs of
firms to prevent the loss of existing employment;
(7) The degree of risk assumed by the ((development loan)) fund,
with emphasis on loans which did not receive financing from commercial
lenders, but which are considered financially sound.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.168.150 and 1993 c 512 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the restrictions contained in this chapter, the
((committee)) director is authorized to approve applications of
minority and women-owned businesses for loans or loan guarantees from
the fund. Applications approved by the ((committee)) director under
this chapter shall conform to applicable federal requirements. The
((committee)) director shall prioritize available funds for loan
guarantees rather than loans when possible. The ((committee)) director
may enter into agreements with other public or private lending
institutions to develop a joint loan guarantee program for minority and
women-owned businesses. If such a program is developed, the
((committee)) director may provide funds, in conjunction with the other
organizations, to operate the program. This section does not preclude
the ((committee)) director from making individual loan guarantees.
To the maximum extent practicable, the funds available under this
section shall be made available on an equal basis to minority and
women-owned businesses. The ((committee)) director shall submit to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives
quarterly reports that detail the number of loans approved and the
characteristics of the recipients by ethnic and gender groups.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.330.050 and 1993 c 280 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall be responsible for promoting community and
economic development within the state by assisting the state's
communities to increase the quality of life of their citizens and their
economic vitality, and by assisting the state's businesses to maintain
and increase their economic competitiveness, while maintaining a
healthy environment. Community and economic development efforts shall
include: Efforts to increase economic opportunity; local planning to
manage growth; the promotion and provision of affordable housing and
housing-related services; providing public infrastructure; business and
trade development; assisting firms and industrial sectors to increase
their competitiveness; fostering the development of minority and women-owned businesses; facilitating technology development, transfer, and
diffusion; community services and advocacy for low-income persons; and
public safety efforts. The department shall have the following general
functions and responsibilities:
(1) Provide advisory assistance to the governor, other state
agencies, and the legislature on community and economic development
matters and issues;
(2) Assist the governor in coordinating the activities of state
agencies that have an impact on local government and communities;
(3) Cooperate with the Washington state economic development
commission, the legislature, and the governor in the development and
implementation of strategic plans for the state's community and
economic development efforts;
(4) Solicit private and federal grants for economic and community
development programs and administer such programs in conjunction with
other programs assigned to the department by the governor or the
legislature;
(5) Cooperate with and provide technical and financial assistance
to local governments, businesses, and community-based organizations
serving the communities of the state for the purpose of aiding and
encouraging orderly, productive, and coordinated development of the
state, and, unless stipulated otherwise, give additional consideration
to local communities and individuals with the greatest relative need
and the fewest resources;
(6) Participate with other states or subdivisions thereof in
interstate programs and assist cities, counties, municipal
corporations, governmental conferences or councils, and regional
planning commissions to participate with other states and provinces or
their subdivisions;
(7) Hold public hearings and meetings to carry out the purposes of
this chapter;
(8) Conduct research and analysis in furtherance of the state's
economic and community development efforts including maintenance of
current information on market, demographic, and economic trends as they
affect different industrial sectors, geographic regions, and
communities with special economic and social problems in the state; and
(9) Develop a schedule of fees for services where appropriate.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.330.060 and 1993 c 280 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall (a) assist in expanding the state's role
as an international center of trade, culture, and finance((. The
department shall)); (b) promote and market the state's products and
services both nationally and internationally; (c) work in close
cooperation with other private and public international trade efforts
((and)); (d) act as a centralized location for the assimilation and
distribution of trade information; and (e) establish and operate
foreign offices promoting overseas trade and commerce.
(2) The department shall identify and work with Washington
businesses that can use local, state, and federal assistance to
increase domestic and foreign exports of goods and services.
(3) The department shall work generally with small businesses and
other employers to facilitate resolution of siting, regulatory,
expansion, and retention problems. This assistance shall include but
not be limited to assisting in work force training and infrastructure
needs, identifying and locating suitable business sites, and resolving
problems with government licensing and regulatory requirements. The
department shall identify gaps in needed services and develop steps to
address them including private sector support and purchase of these
services.
(4) The department shall work to increase the availability of
capital to small businesses by developing new and flexible investment
tools ((and)); by assisting in targeting and improving the efficiency
of existing investment mechanisms; and by assisting in the procurement
of managerial and technical assistance necessary to attract potential
investors.
(5) The department shall assist women and minority-owned businesses
in overcoming barriers to ((increased investment and employment and
becoming full participants in Washington's traded sector economy))
entrepreneurial success. The department shall contract with public and
private agencies, institutions, and organizations to conduct
entrepreneurial training courses for minority and women-owned
businesses. The instruction shall be intensive, practical training
courses in financing, marketing, managing, accounting, and
recordkeeping for a small business, with an emphasis on federal, state,
local, or private programs available to assist small businesses.
Instruction shall be offered in major population centers throughout the
state at times and locations that are convenient for minority and women
small business owners.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.330.090 and 2003 c 153 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall work with private sector organizations,
local governments, local associate development organizations, and
higher education and training institutions to assist in the development
of strategies to diversify the economy, facilitate technology transfer
and diffusion, and increase value-added production by focusing on
targeted sectors. The targeted sectors may include, but are not
limited to, software, forest products, biotechnology, environmental
industries, recycling markets and waste reduction, aerospace, food
processing, tourism, film and video, microelectronics, new materials,
robotics, and machine tools. The department shall, on a continuing
basis, evaluate the potential return to the state from devoting
additional resources to a targeted sector's approach to economic
development and including additional sectors in its efforts. The
department shall use information gathered in each service delivery
region in formulating its sectoral strategies and in designating new
targeted sectors.
(2) The department shall pursue a coordinated program to expand the
tourism industry throughout the state in cooperation with the public
and private tourism development organizations. The department, in
operating its tourism program, shall:
(a) Promote Washington as a tourism destination to national and
international markets to include nature-based and wildlife viewing
tourism;
(b) Provide information to businesses and local communities on
tourism opportunities that could expand local revenues;
(c) Assist local communities to strengthen their tourism
partnerships, including their relationships with state and local
agencies;
(d) Provide leadership training and assistance to local communities
to facilitate the development and implementation of local tourism
plans;
(e) Coordinate the development of a statewide tourism and marketing
plan. The department's tourism planning efforts shall be carried out
in conjunction with public and private tourism development
organizations including the department of fish and wildlife and other
appropriate agencies. The plan shall specifically address mechanisms
for: (i) Funding national and international marketing and nature-based
tourism efforts; (ii) interagency cooperation; and (iii) integrating
the state plan with local tourism plans.
(3) The department may, in carrying out its efforts to expand the
tourism industry in the state:
(a) Solicit and receive gifts, grants, funds, fees, and endowments,
in trust or otherwise, from tribal, local or other governmental
entities, as well as private sources, and may expend the same or any
income therefrom for tourism purposes. All revenue received for
tourism purposes shall be deposited into the tourism development and
promotion account created in RCW 43.330.094;
(b) Host conferences and strategic planning workshops relating to
the promotion of nature-based and wildlife viewing tourism;
(c) Conduct or contract for tourism-related studies;
(d) Contract with individuals, businesses, or public entities to
carry out its tourism-related activities under this section;
(e) Provide tourism-related organizations with marketing and other
technical assistance;
(f) Evaluate and make recommendations on proposed tourism-related
policies.
(4)(a) The department shall promote, market, and encourage growth
in the production of films and videos, as well as television
commercials within the state; to this end the department is directed to
assist in the location of a film and video production studio within the
state.
(b) The department may, in carrying out its efforts to encourage
film and video production in the state, solicit and receive gifts,
grants, funds, fees, and endowments, in trust or otherwise, from
tribal, local, or other governmental entities, as well as private
sources, and may expend the same or any income therefrom for the
encouragement of film and video production. All revenue received for
such purposes shall be deposited into the film and video promotion
account created in RCW 43.330.092.
(5) In assisting in the development of a targeted sector, the
department's activities may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Conducting focus group discussions, facilitating meetings, and
conducting studies to identify members of the sector, appraise the
current state of the sector, and identify issues of common concern
within the sector;
(b) Supporting the formation of industry associations, publications
of association directories, and related efforts to create or expand the
activities or industry associations;
(c) Assisting in the formation of flexible networks by providing
(i) agency employees or private sector consultants trained to act as
flexible network brokers and (ii) funding for potential flexible
network participants for the purpose of organizing or implementing a
flexible network;
(d) Helping establish research consortia;
(e) Facilitating joint training and education programs;
(f) Promoting cooperative market development activities;
(g) Analyzing the need, feasibility, and cost of establishing
product certification and testing facilities and services; and
(h) Providing for methods of electronic communication and
information dissemination among firms and groups of firms to facilitate
network activity.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.330.092 and 1997 c 220 s 222 are each amended to
read as follows:
The film and video promotion account is created in the state
treasury. All revenue received for film and video promotion purposes
under RCW 43.330.090(4)(b) and all receipts from RCW 36.102.060(14)
must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used by
the department of community, trade, and economic development only for
the purposes of promotion of the film and video production industry in
the state of Washington.

Sec. 16 RCW 47.36.330 and 1999 c 213 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Not more than six business signs may be permitted on motorist
information sign panels authorized by RCW 47.36.310 and 47.36.320.
(2) The maximum distance that eligible service facilities may be
located on either side of an interchange or intersection to qualify for
a business sign are as follows:
(a) On interstate highways, gas, food, or lodging activities shall
be located within three miles. Camping or tourist-oriented activities
shall be within five miles.
(b) On noninterstate highways, gas, food, lodging, recreation, or
tourist-oriented activities shall be located within five miles.
(3)(a) If no eligible services are located within the distance
limits prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, the distance
limits shall be increased until an eligible service of a type being
considered is reached, up to a maximum of fifteen miles.
(b) The department may erect and maintain signs on an alternate
route that is longer than fifteen miles if it is safer and still
provides reasonable and convenient travel to an eligible service.
(c) The department may erect and maintain signs on a route up to a
maximum of twenty miles if it qualifies as an eligible service and is
within a distressed area ((under the criteria of chapter 43.165 RCW))
as defined in RCW 43.168.020.

Sec. 17 RCW 43.31.522 and 1993 c 280 s 46 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 43.31.524 ((and 43.31.526)):
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) (("Center" means the business assistance center established
under RCW 43.31.083.
(3))) "Director" means the director of community, trade, and
economic development.
(((4))) (3) "Local nonprofit organization" means a local nonprofit
organization organized to provide economic development or community
development services, including but not limited to associate
development organizations, economic development councils, and community
development corporations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.31.057 (Washington products -- Expansion of market--Pamphlet) and 1993 c 280 s 39 & 1986 c 183 s 2;
(2) RCW 43.31.093 (Minority and women-owned small businesses--Entrepreneurial training courses) and 1995 c 399 s 71 & 1993 c 512 s 6;
(3) RCW 43.31.145 (Foreign offices -- Promotion of overseas trade and
commerce) and 1991 c 24 s 7 & 1985 c 466 s 18;
(4) RCW 43.31.390 (Information from environmental profile -- Use in
brochures and presentations -- Availability to local economic development
groups) and 1985 c 466 s 33 & 1984 c 94 s 4;
(5) RCW 43.31.403 (Investment opportunities office -- Finding and
purpose) and 1989 c 312 s 1;
(6) RCW 43.31.406 (Investment opportunities office -- Definitions)
and 1989 c 312 s 2;
(7) RCW 43.31.409 (Investment opportunities office -- Created) and
1993 c 280 s 42 & 1989 c 312 s 3;
(8) RCW 43.31.411 (Investment opportunities office -- Duties) and
1998 c 245 s 61, 1993 c 280 s 43, & 1989 c 312 s 4;
(9) RCW 43.31.414 (Investment opportunities office -- Service fees)
and 1989 c 312 s 5;
(10) RCW 43.31.417 (Investment opportunities office -- Contracting
authority) and 1989 c 312 s 6;
(11) RCW 43.31.526 (Marketplace program -- Contracts to foster
linkages -- Department duties) and 1998 c 245 s 62, 1994 c 47 s 2, 1993
c 280 s 48, 1990 c 57 s 4, & 1989 c 417 s 4;
(12) RCW 43.63A.240 (Senior environmental corps -- Finding) and 1992
c 63 s 1;
(13) RCW 43.63A.245 (Senior environmental corps -- Definitions) and
1999 c 151 s 1201, 1993 c 280 s 64, & 1992 c 63 s 2;
(14) RCW 43.63A.247 (Senior environmental corps -- Created) and 1994
c 264 s 25, 1993 c 280 s 65, & 1992 c 63 s 3;
(15) RCW 43.63A.249 (Senior environmental corps -- Goals) and 1992 c
63 s 4;
(16) RCW 43.63A.265 (Senior environmental corps -- Department
duties -- Volunteers may not displace currently employed workers) and
1992 c 63 s 6;
(17) RCW 43.63A.270 (Senior environmental corps -- Volunteer activity
to be governed by agreement) and 1992 c 63 s 7;
(18) RCW 43.63A.715 (Rural enterprise zones--Establishment--Applications--Authority of zones) and 1997 c 366 s 9;
(19) RCW 43.160.115 (Cooperation with Washington state development
loan fund committee required -- Transfer of funds) and 1995 c 399 s 87,
1987 c 422 s 7, 1987 c 195 s 12, & 1985 c 164 s 14;
(20) RCW 43.160.180 (Private activity bond subcommittee) and 1995
c 399 s 88, 1987 c 422 s 9, & 1985 c 446 s 15;
(21) RCW 43.165.010 (Definitions) and 1996 c 290 s 2, 1995 c 399 s
91, 1987 c 461 s 1, & 1985 c 229 s 1;
(22) RCW 43.168.031 (State development loan fund committee--Terminated June 30, 1994 -- Powers and duties transferred) and 1995 c 399
s 92 & 1988 c 186 s 7;
(23) RCW 43.170.010 (Legislative findings) and 1982 c 44 s 1;
(24) RCW 43.170.020 (Definitions) and 1995 c 399 s 93, 1985 c 466
s 60, & 1982 c 44 s 2;
(25) RCW 43.170.030 (Small business innovators' opportunity
program -- Pilot project established -- Composition and structure -- User
fee) and 1995 c 399 s 94, 1985 c 466 s 61, & 1982 c 44 s 3;
(26) RCW 43.170.040 (Chairman of program) and 1982 c 44 s 4;
(27) RCW 43.170.060 (Eligibility) and 1982 c 44 s 6;
(28) RCW 43.170.070 (Referral to investment opportunities office)
and 1995 c 399 s 95 & 1989 c 312 s 9;
(29) RCW 43.172.005 (Intent) and 1993 c 512 s 1;
(30) RCW 43.172.010 (Definitions) and 1993 c 512 s 2;
(31) RCW 43.172.011 (Definitions -- Bonding program) and 1995 c 399
s 96 & 1993 c 512 s 16;
(32) RCW 43.172.020 (Small business bonding assistance program--Implementation -- Rules) and 1995 c 399 s 97 & 1993 c 512 s 17;
(33) RCW 43.172.030 (Assistance from other agencies) and 1993 c 512
s 18;
(34) RCW 43.172.040 (Entrepreneurial training course) and 1993 c
512 s 19;
(35) RCW 43.172.050 (Entrepreneurial accreditation of small
contracting businesses) and 1993 c 512 s 20;
(36) RCW 43.172.060 (Professional services assistance -- One-time
grants) and 1993 c 512 s 21;
(37) RCW 43.172.070 (Grant administration) and 1993 c 512 s 22;
(38) RCW 43.172.080 (Bond guarantees -- Generally) and 1993 c 512 s
23;
(39) RCW 43.172.090 (Bond guarantees -- Approval process) and 1993 c
512 s 24;
(40) RCW 43.172.100 (Small business bonding assistance program
fund -- Expenditures) and 1993 c 512 s 25;
(41) RCW 43.172.110 (Small business bonding assistance program
fund -- Support) and 1993 c 512 s 26;
(42) RCW 43.172.120 (Gifts, grants, endowments) and 1993 c 512 s
27;
(43) RCW 43.172.900 (Short title -- 1993 c 512) and 1993 c 512 s 38;
(44) RCW 43.172.901 (Part headings and section captions -- 1993 c
512) and 1993 c 512 s 40;
(45) RCW 43.172.902 (Severability -- 1993 c 512) and 1993 c 512 s 41;
(46) RCW 43.172.903 (Effective date -- 1993 c 512) and 1993 c 512 s
42;
(47) RCW 43.330.180 (Grant program for business recruitment
efforts) and 1999 c 108 s 2;
(48) RCW 43.21A.670 (Senior environmental corps -- Department powers
and duties) and 1992 c 63 s 9;
(49) RCW 43.23.240 (Senior environmental corps -- Department powers
and duties) and 1992 c 63 s 8;
(50) RCW 43.30.470 (Senior environmental corps) and 2003 c 334 s
124 & 1992 c 63 s 10;
(51) RCW 43.70.450 (Senior environmental corps -- Department powers
and duties) and 1992 c 63 s 12;
(52) RCW 77.12.750 (Senior environmental corps -- Department powers
and duties) and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 72 & 1992 c 63 s 13;
(53) RCW 79A.05.350 (Senior environmental corps -- Commission powers
and duties) and 1992 c 63 s 14; and
(54) RCW 90.71.090 (Senior environmental corps -- Authority powers
and duties) and 1992 c 63 s 15.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 This act does not affect any existing right
acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the sections amended
or repealed in this act or under any rule or order adopted under those
sections, nor does it affect any proceeding instituted under those
sections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---