BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.73 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "District" means a transportation benefit district created
under this chapter.
(2) "City" means a city or town.
(3) "Transportation improvement" means:
(a) A capital improvement or improvements relating to, or in
support of, all or a portion of a highway that has been designated, in
whole or in part, as a highway of statewide significance, and may
include the following associated capital improvements:
(i) Approaches to highways of statewide significance;
(ii) High-occupancy vehicle lanes;
(iii) Flyover ramps;
(iv) Park and ride lots;
(v) Bus pullouts;
(vi) Vans for vanpools;
(vii) Buses; and
(viii) Signalization, ramp metering, and other transportation
system management improvements.
(b) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
city street, county road, existing highway, or the creation of a new
highway that intersects with a highway of statewide significance, but
only if the cumulative transportation benefit district contribution to
all projects constructed under this subsection (3)(b) does not exceed
twenty percent of the revenues generated by the district, or forty
percent of the revenues generated by the district for projects in a
rural county. For purposes of this subsection (3)(b), "rural county"
means a county smaller than two hundred twenty-five square miles or as
defined in RCW 43.168.020.
(4) Operations, preservation, and maintenance are excluded from the
definition of transportation improvements under subsection (3) of this
section, except for operation, preservation, and maintenance costs of
tolled facilities, including the costs of collecting the tolls, if toll
revenues have been pledged for the payment of contracts.
(5) "Highway of statewide significance" means an existing or
proposed state route or federal interstate designated as a highway of
statewide significance by the transportation commission, its successor
entity, or the legislature.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.73.020 and 1989 c 53 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, the legislative
authority of a county or city may establish ((one or more)) a
transportation benefit district((s)) within the county or city area or
within the area specified in subsection (2) of this section, for the
purpose of acquiring, constructing, improving, providing, and funding
((any city street, county road, or state highway)) a transportation
improvement within the district that is (((1))) consistent with any
existing state, regional, and local transportation plans((, (2))) and
necessitated by existing or reasonably foreseeable congestion levels
((attributable to economic growth, and (3) partially funded by local
government or private developer contributions, or a combination of such
contributions)). ((Such)) The transportation improvements shall be
owned by the county of jurisdiction if located in an unincorporated
area, by the city of jurisdiction if located in an incorporated area,
or by the state in cases where the transportation improvement is or
becomes a state highway((; and all such)). However, if deemed
appropriate by the governing body of the transportation benefit
district, a transportation improvement may be owned by a participating
port district or transit district, unless otherwise prohibited by law.
Transportation improvements shall be administered and maintained as
other public streets, roads, ((and)) highways, and capital
improvements. ((The district may not include any area within the
corporate limits of a city unless the city legislative authority has
agreed to the inclusion pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW. The agreement
shall specify the area and such powers as may be granted to the benefit
district.))
(2) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, the district may
include area within more than one county, city, port district, county
transportation authority, or public transportation benefit area, if the
legislative authority of each participating jurisdiction has agreed to
the inclusion as provided in an interlocal agreement adopted pursuant
to chapter 39.34 RCW. However, the boundaries of the district shall
include all territory within the boundaries of the participating
jurisdictions comprising the district.
(3) The members of the ((county)) legislative authority proposing
to establish the district, acting ex officio and independently, shall
((compose)) constitute the governing body of the district: PROVIDED,
That where a ((transportation benefit)) district includes ((any portion
of an incorporated city, town, or another county, the district may be
governed as provided in an interlocal agreement adopted pursuant to
chapter 39.34 RCW)) area within more than one jurisdiction under
subsection (2) of this section, the district shall be governed under an
interlocal agreement adopted pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW. However,
the governing body shall be composed of at least five members including
at least one elected official from the legislative authority of each
participating jurisdiction.
(4) The ((county)) treasurer of the jurisdiction proposing to
establish the district shall act as the ex officio treasurer of the
district, unless an interlocal agreement states otherwise.
(5) The electors of the district shall all be registered voters
residing within the district. ((For purposes of this section, the term
"city" means both cities and towns.))
(6) The authority under this section, regarding the establishment
of or the participation in a district, shall not apply to:
(a) Counties with a population greater than one million five
hundred thousand persons and any adjoining counties with a population
greater than five hundred thousand persons;
(b) Cities with any area within the counties under (a) of this
subsection; and
(c) Other jurisdictions with any area within the counties under (a)
of this subsection.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.73.040 and 1989 c 53 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A transportation benefit district is a quasi-municipal
corporation, an independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of
Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing
district" within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state
Constitution.
(2) A transportation benefit district constitutes a body corporate
and possesses all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes
as well as all other powers that may now or hereafter be specifically
conferred by statute, including, but not limited to, the authority to
hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into contracts, to
acquire, hold, and dispose of real and personal property, and to sue
and be sued. Public works contract limits applicable to the
jurisdiction that established the district ((shall)) apply to the
district.
(3) To carry out the purposes of this chapter, and subject to the
provisions of section 18 of this act, a district is authorized to
impose the following taxes, fees, charges, and tolls:
(a) A sales and use tax in accordance with section 14 of this act;
(b) A local option fuel tax in accordance with section 15 of this
act;
(c) A vehicle fee in accordance with section 16 of this act;
(d) An employer excise tax in accordance with section 17 of this
act;
(e) A fee or charge in accordance with RCW 36.73.120. However, if
a county or city within the district area is levying a fee or charge
for a transportation improvement, the fee or charge shall be credited
against the amount of the fee or charge imposed by the district.
Developments consisting of less than twenty residences are exempt from
the fee or charge under RCW 36.73.120; and
(f)(i) Vehicle tolls on state routes or federal highways, city
streets, or county roads, within the boundaries of the district, unless
otherwise prohibited by law. The department of transportation shall
administer the collection of vehicle tolls authorized on state routes
or federal highways, unless otherwise specified in law or by contract,
and the state transportation commission, or its successor, shall set
and impose the tolls in amounts sufficient to implement the district's
transportation improvement finance plan. The district shall administer
the collection of vehicle tolls authorized on city streets or county
roads, and shall set and impose the tolls in amounts sufficient to
implement the district's transportation improvement plan.
(ii) Tolls may only be imposed under this section on a new
transportation improvement made by the district, and revenue from the
tolls may only be used to support that transportation improvement.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.73.050 and 1987 c 327 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((A city or county)) The legislative ((authority)) authorities
proposing to establish a ((transportation benefit)) district, or to
modify the boundaries of an existing district, or to dissolve an
existing district((,)) shall conduct a hearing at the time and place
specified in a notice published at least once, not less than ten days
before the hearing, in a newspaper of general circulation within the
proposed district. Subject to the provisions of section 20 of this
act, the legislative ((authority)) authorities shall make provision for
a district to be automatically dissolved when all indebtedness of the
district has been retired and anticipated responsibilities have been
satisfied. This notice shall be in addition to any other notice
required by law to be published. The notice shall, where applicable,
specify the functions or activities proposed to be provided or funded,
or the additional functions or activities proposed to be provided or
funded, by the district. Additional notice of the hearing may be given
by mail, by posting within the proposed district, or in any manner the
((city or county)) legislative ((authority deems)) authorities deem
necessary to notify affected persons. All hearings shall be public and
the ((city or county)) legislative ((authority)) authorities shall hear
objections from any person affected by the formation, modification of
the boundaries, or dissolution of the district.
(2) Following the hearing held pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, the ((city or county)) legislative ((authority)) authorities
may establish a ((transportation benefit)) district, modify the
boundaries or functions of an existing district, or dissolve an
existing district, if the ((city or county)) legislative ((authority
finds)) authorities find the action to be in the public interest and
((adopts)) adopt an ordinance providing for the action. The ordinance
establishing a district shall specify the functions or activities to be
exercised or funded and establish the boundaries of the district. ((A
district shall include only those areas which can reasonably be
expected to benefit from improvements to be funded by the district.))
Subject to the provisions of section 19 of this act, functions or
activities proposed to be provided or funded by the district may not be
expanded beyond those specified in the notice of hearing, unless
additional notices are made, further hearings on the expansion are
held, and further determinations are made that it is in the public
interest to so expand the functions or activities proposed to be
provided or funded.
(((3) At any time before the city or county legislative authority
establishes a transportation benefit district pursuant to this section,
all further proceedings shall be terminated upon the filing of a
verified declaration of termination signed by the owners of real
property consisting of at least sixty percent of the assessed valuation
in the proposed district.))

Sec. 5 RCW 36.73.060 and 1987 c 327 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ((transportation benefit)) district may levy an ad valorem
property tax in excess of the one percent limitation upon the property
within the district for a one-year period whenever authorized by the
voters of the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII,
section 2(a) of the state Constitution.
(2) A district may provide for the retirement of voter-approved
general obligation bonds, issued for capital purposes only, by levying
bond retirement ad valorem property tax levies in excess of the one
percent limitation whenever authorized by the voters of the district
pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state Constitution and RCW
84.52.056.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.73.070 and 1987 c 327 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To carry out the purposes of this chapter and notwithstanding
RCW 39.36.020(1), a ((transportation benefit)) district may issue
general obligation bonds, not to exceed an amount, together with any
other outstanding nonvoter-approved general obligation indebtedness,
equal to ((three-eighths of)) one and one-half percent of the value of
taxable property within the district, as the term "value of taxable
property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015. A district may additionally
issue general obligation bonds for capital purposes only, together with
any outstanding general obligation indebtedness, not to exceed an
amount equal to ((one and one-fourth)) five percent of the value of the
taxable property within the district, as the term "value of taxable
property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015, when authorized by the voters of
the district pursuant to Article VIII, section 6 of the state
Constitution, and ((to)) may also provide for the retirement thereof by
excess property tax levies as provided in RCW 36.73.060(2). The
district may, if applicable, submit a single proposition to the voters
that, if approved, authorizes both the issuance of the bonds and the
bond retirement property tax levies.
(2) General obligation bonds with a maturity in excess of forty
years shall not be issued. The governing body of the ((transportation
benefit)) district shall by resolution determine for each general
obligation bond issue the amount, date, terms, conditions,
denominations, maximum fixed or variable interest rate or rates,
maturity or maturities, redemption rights, registration privileges,
manner of execution, manner of sale, callable provisions, if any,
covenants, and form, including registration as to principal and
interest, registration as to principal only, or bearer. Registration
may include, but not be limited to: (a) A book entry system of
recording the ownership of a bond whether or not physical bonds are
issued; or (b) recording the ownership of a bond together with the
requirement that the transfer of ownership may only be effected by the
surrender of the old bond and either the reissuance of the old bond or
the issuance of a new bond to the new owner. Facsimile signatures may
be used on the bonds and any coupons. Refunding general obligation
bonds may be issued in the same manner as general obligation bonds are
issued.
(3) Whenever general obligation bonds are issued to fund specific
projects or enterprises that generate revenues, charges, user fees, or
special assessments, the ((transportation benefit)) district ((which
issues the bonds)) may specifically pledge all or a portion of the
revenues, charges, user fees, or special assessments to refund the
general obligation bonds. The district may also pledge any other
revenues that may be available to the district.
(4) In addition to general obligation bonds, a district may issue
revenue bonds to be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46
RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 36.73.080 and 1987 c 327 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ((transportation benefit)) district may form a local
improvement district to provide any transportation improvement it has
the authority to provide, impose special assessments on all property
specially benefited by the transportation improvements, and issue
special assessment bonds or revenue bonds to fund the costs of the
transportation improvement. Local improvement districts shall be
created and administered, and assessments shall be made and collected,
in the manner and to the extent provided by law to cities and towns
pursuant to chapters 35.43, 35.44, 35.49, 35.50, 35.51, 35.53, and
35.54 RCW. However, the duties devolving upon the city or town
treasurer under these chapters shall be imposed upon the district
treasurer for the purposes of this section. A local improvement
district may only be formed under this section pursuant to the petition
method under RCW 35.43.120 and 35.43.125.
(2) The governing body of a ((transportation benefit)) district
shall by resolution establish for each special assessment bond issue
the amount, date, terms, conditions, denominations, maximum fixed or
variable interest rate or rates, maturity or maturities, redemption
rights, registration privileges, if any, covenants, and form, including
registration as to principal and interest, registration as to principal
only, or bearer. Registration may include, but not be limited to: (a)
A book entry system of recording the ownership of a bond whether or not
physical bonds are issued; or (b) recording the ownership of a bond
together with the requirement that the transfer of ownership may only
be effected by the surrender of the old bond and either the reissuance
of the old bond or the issuance of a new bond to the new owner.
Facsimile signatures may be used on the bonds and any coupons. The
maximum term of any special assessment bonds shall not exceed thirty
years beyond the date of issue. Special assessment bonds issued
pursuant to this section shall not be an indebtedness of the
((transportation benefit)) district issuing the bonds, and the interest
and principal on the bonds shall only be payable from special
assessments made for the improvement for which the bonds were issued
and any local improvement guaranty fund that the ((transportation
benefit)) district has created. The owner or bearer of a special
assessment bond or any interest coupon issued pursuant to this section
shall not have any claim against the ((transportation benefit))
district arising from the bond or coupon except for the payment from
special assessments made for the improvement for which the bonds were
issued and any local improvement guaranty fund the ((transportation
benefit)) district has created. The district issuing the special
assessment bonds is not liable to the owner or bearer of any special
assessment bond or any interest coupon issued pursuant to this section
for any loss occurring in the lawful operation of its local improvement
guaranty fund. The substance of the limitations included in this
subsection (2) shall be plainly printed, written, or engraved on each
special assessment bond issued pursuant to this section.
(3) Assessments shall reflect any credits given by a
((transportation benefit)) district for real property or property right
donations made pursuant to RCW 47.14.030.
(4) The governing body may establish, administer, and pay
((moneys)) money into a local improvement guaranty fund, in the manner
and to the extent provided by law to cities and towns under chapter
35.54 RCW, to guarantee special assessment bonds issued by the
((transportation benefit)) district.

Sec. 8 RCW 36.73.100 and 1987 c 327 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The proceeds of any bond issued pursuant to RCW 36.73.070 or
36.73.080 may be used to pay costs incurred on ((such)) a bond issue
related to the sale and issuance of the bonds. ((Such)) These costs
include payments for fiscal and legal expenses, obtaining bond ratings,
printing, engraving, advertising, and other similar activities.
(2) In addition, proceeds of bonds used to fund capital projects
may be used to pay the necessary and related engineering,
architectural, planning, and inspection costs.

Sec. 9 RCW 36.73.110 and 1987 c 327 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
A ((transportation benefit)) district may accept and expend or use
gifts, grants, and donations.

Sec. 10 RCW 36.73.120 and 1988 c 179 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((A transportation benefit)) Subject to the provisions in
section 18 of this act, a district may impose a fee or charge on the
construction or reconstruction of residential buildings, commercial
buildings, industrial buildings, or on any other building or building
space or appurtenance ((thereto)), or on the development, subdivision,
classification, or reclassification of land, only if done in accordance
with chapter 39.92 RCW.
(2) Any fee or charge imposed under this section shall be used
exclusively for transportation improvements constructed by a
((transportation benefit)) district. The fees or charges ((so))
imposed must be reasonably necessary as a result of the impact of
development, construction, or classification or reclassification of
land on identified transportation needs.
(3) ((When fees or charges are imposed by a district within which
there is more than one city or both incorporated and unincorporated
areas, the legislative authority for each city in the district and the
county legislative authority for the unincorporated area must approve
the imposition of such fees or charges before they take effect.)) If a
county or city within the district area is levying a fee or charge for
a transportation improvement, the fee or charge shall be credited
against the amount of the fee or charge imposed by the district.
(4) Developments consisting of less than twenty residences are
exempt from the fee or charge under this section.

Sec. 11 RCW 36.73.130 and 1987 c 327 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
A ((transportation benefit)) district may exercise the power of
eminent domain to obtain property for its authorized purposes in the
same manner as authorized for the city or county legislative authority
that established the district.

Sec. 12 RCW 36.73.140 and 1987 c 327 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
A ((transportation benefit)) district has the same powers as a
county or city to contract for street, road, or state highway
improvement projects and to enter into reimbursement contracts provided
for in chapter 35.72 RCW.

Sec. 13 RCW 36.73.150 and 1987 c 327 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of transportation, counties, ((and)) cities, and
other jurisdictions may give funds to ((transportation benefit))
districts for the purposes of financing ((street, road, or highway))
transportation improvements ((projects)) under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions in section 18 of this act, a
transportation benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW may fix and
impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this
chapter. The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the boundaries of the
district. The rate of tax shall not exceed five-tenths of one percent
of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the
article used, in the case of a use tax.
(2) Money received from the tax imposed under this section must be
spent in accordance with the requirements of chapter 36.73 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county;
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030; and
(c) "District" means a transportation benefit district under
chapter 36.73 RCW.
(2) A transportation benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW,
subject to the conditions of this section and the provisions of section
18 of this act, may levy additional excise taxes equal to ten percent
of the statewide motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 on
each gallon of motor vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on
each gallon of special fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the
boundaries of the district. Vehicles paying an annual license fee
under RCW 82.38.075 are exempt from the district's fuel excise tax.
The additional excise taxes are subject to the same exceptions and
rights of refund as applicable to other motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW. The tax
imposed under this section may not be levied less than one month from
the date the election results under section 18 of this act are
certified. The commencement date for the levy of any tax under this
section will be the first day of January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax under this section on
each gallon of motor vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is
imposed upon the distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of the
district to a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the
fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a district shall contract with the department of
revenue for the administration and collection of the taxes. The
contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to exceed one
percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be deposited into
the local tax administration account created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend money from this
account, upon appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes
imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer shall distribute the proceeds of the
additional taxes under this section on a monthly basis to the district
levying the tax, after the deductions for payments and expenditures as
provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) (a) and (b).
(8) The proceeds of the additional taxes levied by a district under
this section must be used in accordance with chapter 36.73 RCW, but
only for those areas that are considered "highway purposes" as that
term is construed in Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution.
(9) A district may only levy the tax under this section if the
district is comprised of boundaries identical to the boundaries of a
county or counties. A district may not levy the tax under this section
if a member county is levying the tax under RCW 82.80.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions of section 18 of this act, a
transportation benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW may fix and
impose an annual vehicle fee, not to exceed one hundred dollars per
vehicle registered in the district, for each vehicle subject to license
tab fees under RCW 46.16.0621 and for each vehicle subject to gross
weight fees under RCW 46.16.070 with an unladen weight of six thousand
pounds or less.
(2) The department of licensing shall administer and collect the
fee. The department shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed one percent of the fees collected, for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The department
shall remit remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer.
The state treasurer shall distribute the proceeds to the district on a
monthly basis.
(3) No fee under this section may be collected until six months
after approval by the district voters under section 18 of this act.
(4) The vehicle fee under this section applies only when renewing
a vehicle registration, and is effective upon the registration renewal
date as provided by the department of licensing.
(5) The following vehicles are exempt from the fee under this
section:
(a) Farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and
46.04.181;
(b) Off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020;
(c) Vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW and the
international registration plan; and
(d) Snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to the provisions of section 18 of this act, a
transportation benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW may impose an
excise tax, for the privilege of engaging in business, of up to two
dollars per employee per month on all employers or any class or classes
of employers, public and private, including the state located in the
agency's jurisdiction, measured by the number of full-time equivalent
employees. In no event may the total taxes imposed under this section
exceed two dollars per employee per month for any single employer. The
district imposing the tax authorized in this section may provide for
exemptions from the tax for such educational, cultural, health,
charitable, or religious organizations as it deems appropriate.
(b) Transportation benefit districts may contract with the state
department of revenue or other appropriate entities for administration
and collection of the tax. Such contract shall provide for deduction
of an amount for administration and collection expenses, not to exceed
one percent of the fees collected.
(2) The tax shall not apply to employment of a person when the
employer has paid for at least half of the cost of a transit pass
issued by a transit agency for that employee, valid for the period for
which the tax would otherwise be owed.
(3)(a) A transportation benefit district shall adopt rules that
exempt an employer, who enters into an agreement under (b) of this
subsection, from all or a portion of the tax under subsection (1)(a) of
this section.
(b) A transportation benefit district may enter into an agreement,
designed to reduce the number of employees who drive in single-occupant
vehicles during peak commuting periods, with employers subject to the
tax under subsection (1)(a) of this section. The agreement shall
include a list of specific actions that the employer will undertake to
be entitled to the exemption. Employers having an exemption from all
or part of the tax through this subsection shall annually certify to
the district that the employer is fulfilling the terms of the
agreement. The exemption continues as long as the employer is in
compliance with the agreement.
(4) The tax under this section may be imposed only to the extent
the tax has not been imposed by a county within the district area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 36.73 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Taxes, fees, charges, and tolls may not be imposed by a
district without approval of a majority of the voters in the district
voting on a proposition at a general or special election. The
proposition must include a specific description of the transportation
improvement or improvements proposed by the district and the proposed
taxes, fees, charges, and tolls imposed by the district to raise
revenue to fund the improvement or improvements.
(2) Voter approval under this section shall be accorded substantial
weight regarding the validity of a transportation improvement as
defined in section 1 of this act.
(3) A district may not increase any taxes, fees, charges, or tolls
imposed under this chapter once the taxes, fees, charges, or tolls take
effect, unless authorized by the district voters pursuant to section 19
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 36.73 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a transportation improvement cost exceeds its original cost
by more than twenty percent as identified in a district's original
finance plan, the district governing body shall submit to the voters in
the district a ballot measure that redefines the scope of the
transportation improvement, its schedule, its costs or changes in the
revenue sources. If a majority of the voters of the district fail to
approve the redefined transportation improvement, the district shall,
to the extent practicable, continue to work on and complete the
transportation improvement that was originally approved by the voters,
and take reasonable steps to use, preserve, or connect any improvement
already constructed. If a majority of the district voters approve the
redefined transportation improvement, the district shall work on and
complete the projects under the redefined plan.
(2) A district shall issue an annual report, indicating the status
of transportation improvement costs, transportation improvement
expenditures, revenues, and construction schedules, to the public and
to newspapers of record in the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 36.73 RCW
to read as follows:
Within thirty days of the completion of the construction of the
transportation improvement or series of improvements authorized by a
district, the district shall terminate day-to-day operations and exist
solely as a limited entity that oversees the collection of revenue and
the payment of debt service or financing still in effect, if any. The
district shall accordingly adjust downward its employees,
administration, and overhead expenses. Any taxes, fees, charges, or
tolls imposed by the district terminate when the financing or debt
service on the transportation improvement or series of improvements
constructed is completed and paid, thirty days from which point the
district shall dissolve itself and cease to exist. If there is no debt
outstanding, then the district shall dissolve within thirty days from
completion of construction of the transportation improvement or series
of improvements authorized by the district. Notice of dissolution must
be published in newspapers of general circulation within the district
at least three times in a period of thirty days. Creditors must file
claims for payment of claims due within thirty days of the last
published notice or the claim is extinguished.

Sec. 21 RCW 82.14.050 and 2003 c 168 s 201 and 2003 c 83 s 208
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The counties, cities, and transportation authorities under RCW
82.14.045, public facilities districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57
RCW, public transportation benefit areas under RCW 82.14.440, ((and))
regional transportation investment districts, and transportation
benefit districts under chapter 36.73 RCW shall contract, prior to the
effective date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and use
tax, the administration and collection to the state department of
revenue, which shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected for
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department. The
remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this chapter that is
collected by the department of revenue shall be deposited by the state
department of revenue in the local sales and use tax account hereby
created in the state treasury. Moneys in the local sales and use tax
account may be spent only for distribution to counties, cities,
transportation authorities, public facilities districts, public
transportation benefit areas, ((and)) regional transportation
investment districts, and transportation benefit districts imposing a
sales and use tax. All administrative provisions in chapters 82.03,
82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be
amended, shall, insofar as they are applicable to state sales and use
taxes, be applicable to taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter.
Counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities
districts, and regional transportation investment districts may not
conduct independent sales or use tax audits of sellers registered under
the streamlined sales tax agreement. Except as provided in RCW
43.08.190, all earnings of investments of balances in the local sales
and use tax account shall be credited to the local sales and use tax
account and distributed to the counties, cities, transportation
authorities, public facilities districts, public transportation benefit
areas, ((and)) regional transportation investment districts, and
transportation benefit districts monthly.

Sec. 22 RCW 82.14.060 and 1991 c 207 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Monthly the state treasurer shall make distribution from the local
sales and use tax account to the counties, cities, transportation
authorities, ((and)) public facilities districts, and transportation
benefit districts the amount of tax collected on behalf of each taxing
authority, less the deduction provided for in RCW 82.14.050. The state
treasurer shall make the distribution under this section without
appropriation.
In the event that any ordinance or resolution imposes a sales and
use tax at a rate in excess of the applicable limits contained herein,
such ordinance or resolution shall not be considered void in toto, but
only with respect to that portion of the rate which is in excess of the
applicable limits contained herein.

Sec. 23 RCW 35.21.225 and 1989 c 53 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislative authority of a city may establish ((one or more
transportation benefit districts within a city for the purpose of
acquiring, constructing, improving, providing, and funding any city
street, county road, or state highway improvement that is (1)
consistent with state, regional, and local transportation plans, (2)
necessitated by existing or reasonably foreseeable congestion levels
attributable to economic growth, and (3) partially funded by local
government or private developer contributions, or a combination of such
contributions. Such transportation improvements shall be owned by the
city of jurisdiction if located in an incorporated area, by the county
of jurisdiction if located in an unincorporated area, or by the state
in cases where the transportation improvement is or becomes a state
highway; and all such transportation improvements shall be administered
as other public streets, roads, and highways. The district may include
any area within the corporate limits of another city if that city has
agreed to the inclusion pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW. The district
may include any unincorporated area if the county legislative authority
has agreed to the inclusion pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW. The
agreement shall specify the area and such other powers as may be
granted to the benefit district.
The members of the city legislative authority, acting ex officio
and independently, shall compose the governing body of the district.
The city treasurer shall act as the ex officio treasurer of the
district: PROVIDED, That where a transportation benefit district
includes any unincorporated area or portion of another city, the
district may be governed as provided in an interlocal agreement adopted
pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW. The electors of the district shall all
be registered voters residing within the district. For the purposes of
this section, the term "city" means both cities and towns)) a
transportation benefit district subject to the provisions of chapter
36.73 RCW.

Sec. 24 RCW 47.56.075 and 2002 c 56 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((department)) commission shall approve for construction only
such toll roads as the legislature specifically authorizes or such toll
facilities as are specifically sponsored by a regional transportation
investment district, transportation benefit district, city, town, or
county.

Sec. 25 RCW 82.80.030 and 2002 c 56 s 412 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions of this section, the legislative
authority of a county, city, or district may fix and impose a parking
tax on all persons engaged in a commercial parking business within its
respective jurisdiction. A city or county may impose the tax only to
the extent that it has not been imposed by the district, and a district
may impose the tax only to the extent that it has not been imposed by
a city or county. The jurisdiction of a county, for purposes of this
section, includes only the unincorporated area of the county. The
jurisdiction of a city or district includes only the area within its
boundaries.
(2) In lieu of the tax in subsection (1) of this section, a city,
a county in its unincorporated area, or a district may fix and impose
a tax for the act or privilege of parking a motor vehicle in a facility
operated by a commercial parking business.
The city, county, or district may provide that:
(a) The tax is paid by the operator or owner of the motor vehicle;
(b) The tax applies to all parking for which a fee is paid, whether
paid or leased, including parking supplied with a lease of
nonresidential space;
(c) The tax is collected by the operator of the facility and
remitted to the city, county, or district;
(d) The tax is a fee per vehicle or is measured by the parking
charge;
(e) The tax rate varies with zoning or location of the facility,
the duration of the parking, the time of entry or exit, the type or use
of the vehicle, or other reasonable factors; and
(f) Tax exempt carpools, vehicles with handicapped decals, or
government vehicles are exempt from the tax.
(3) "Commercial parking business" as used in this section, means
the ownership, lease, operation, or management of a commercial parking
lot in which fees are charged. "Commercial parking lot" means a
covered or uncovered area with stalls for the purpose of parking motor
vehicles.
(4) The rate of the tax under subsection (1) of this section may be
based either upon gross proceeds or the number of vehicle stalls
available for commercial parking use. The rates charged must be
uniform for the same class or type of commercial parking business.
(5) The county, city, or district levying the tax provided for in
subsection (1) or (2) of this section may provide for its payment on a
monthly, quarterly, or annual basis. Each local government may develop
by ordinance or resolution rules for administering the tax, including
provisions for reporting by commercial parking businesses, collection,
and enforcement.
(6) The proceeds of the commercial parking tax fixed and imposed by
a city or county under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be
used ((strictly)) for transportation purposes in accordance with RCW
82.80.070 or for transportation improvements in accordance with chapter
36.73 RCW. The proceeds of the parking tax imposed by a district must
be used as provided in chapter 36.120 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Subject to the provisions under chapter 36.73 RCW, a transportation
benefit district may authorize vehicle tolls on state routes or federal
highways, city streets, or county roads, within the boundaries of the
district, unless otherwise prohibited by law. The department of
transportation shall administer the collection of vehicle tolls
authorized on state routes or federal highways, unless otherwise
specified in law or by contract, and the state transportation
commission, or its successor, shall set and impose the tolls in amounts
sufficient to implement the district's transportation improvement
finance plan. The district shall administer the collection of vehicle
tolls authorized on city streets or county roads, and shall set and
impose the tolls in amounts sufficient to implement the district's
transportation improvement plan. However, tolls may only be imposed
under this section on a new transportation improvement made by the
district, and revenue from the tolls may only be used to support that
transportation improvement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 This act takes effect August 1, 2005.

--- END ---