BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The federal government has established an
eighteen-month moratorium on the exemption under 42 U.S.C. 1395nn that
allows physicians to refer patients to physician-owned specialty
hospitals. The moratorium effectively prevents the establishment of
any new physician-owned specialty hospitals reimbursed under medicare
and other federal health programs until the medicare payment advisory
commission and the secretary of health and human services each conduct
a study to assess physician-owned specialty hospitals. The legislature
finds that imposing a similar moratorium on the licensing of any new
physician-owned specialty hospital until the results of the medicare
payment advisory commission and health and human services' studies are
available is necessary to enable the legislature to determine the
appropriate regulation of physician-owned specialty hospitals in
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) From January 1, 2005, until July 1,
2006, no specialty hospital in which a physician, or an immediate
family member of a physician, has an ownership or investment interest
shall be granted a license under chapter 70.41 RCW.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Specialty hospital" means a subclass of hospital that is
primarily or exclusively engaged in the care and treatment of one of
the following categories: (i) Patients with a cardiac condition; (ii)
patients with an orthopedic condition; (iii) patients receiving a
surgical procedure; and (iv) any other specialized category of services
that the secretary of health and human services designates as a
specialty hospital.
(b) An ownership or investment interest in a specialty hospital may
be through equity, debt, or other means and includes an interest in an
entity that holds an ownership or investment interest in a specialty
hospital.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---