BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A work group is created to study
opportunities to improve the forest health issues enumerated in RCW
76.06.140 that are facing forest land in Washington and to help the
commissioner of public lands develop a strategic plan under section 3,
chapter 218, Laws of 2004. The work group may, if deemed necessary,
identify and focus on regions of the state where forest health issues
enumerated in section 1 of this act are the most critical.
(2)(a) The work group is comprised of individuals selected on the
basis of their knowledge of forests, forest ecology, or forest health
issues and, if determined by the commissioner of public lands to be
necessary, should represent a mix of individuals with knowledge
regarding specific regions of the state. Members of the work group
shall be appointed by the commissioner of public lands, unless
otherwise specified, and shall include:
(i) The commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's
designee, who shall serve as chair;
(ii) A representative of a statewide industrial timber landowner's
group;
(iii) A landowner representative from the small forest landowner
advisory committee established in RCW 76.13.110;
(iv) A representative of a college within a state university that
specializes in forestry or natural resources science;
(v) A representative of an environmental organization;
(vi) A representative of a county that has within its borders
state-owned forest lands that are known to suffer from the forest
health deficiencies enumerated in RCW 76.06.140;
(vii) A representative of the Washington state department of fish
and wildlife;
(viii) A forest hydrologist, an entomologist, and a fire ecologist,
if available;
(ix) A representative of the governor appointed by the governor;
and
(x) A representative of a professional forestry organization.
(b) In addition to the membership of the work group outlined in
this section, the commissioner of public lands shall also invite the
full and equal participation of:
(i) A representative of a tribal government located in a region of
the state where the forest health issues enumerated in RCW 76.06.140
are present; and
(ii) A representative of both the United States forest service and
the United States fish and wildlife service stationed to work primarily
in Washington.
(3) The work group shall:
(a) Determine whether the goals and requirements of chapter 76.06
RCW are being met with regard to the identification, designation, and
reduction of significant forest insect and disease threats to public
and private forest resources, and whether the provisions of chapter
76.06 RCW are the most effective and appropriate way to address forest
health issues;
(b) Study what incentives could be used to assist landowners with
the costs of creating and maintaining forest health;
(c) Identify opportunities and barriers for improved prevention of
losses of public and private resources to forest insects, diseases,
wind, and fire;
(d) Assist the commissioner in developing a strategic plan under
section 3, chapter 218, Laws of 2004 for increasing forest resistance
and resilience to forest insects, disease, wind, and fire in
Washington;
(e) Develop funding alternatives for consideration by the
legislature;
(f) Explore possible opportunities for the state to enter into
cooperative agreements with the federal government, or other avenues
for the state to provide input on the management of federally owned
land in Washington;
(g) Develop recommendations for the proper treatment of infested
and fire and wind damaged forests on public and private lands within
the context of working with interdisciplinary teams under the forest
practices act to ensure that forest health is achieved with the
protection of fish, wildlife, and other public resources;
(h) Analyze the state noxious weed control statutes and procedures
(chapter 17.10 RCW) and the extreme hazard regulations adopted under
the forest protection laws, to determine if the policies and procedures
of these laws are applicable, or could serve as a model to support
improved forest health; and
(i) Recommend whether the work group should be extended beyond the
time that the required report has been submitted.
(4) The work group shall submit to the department of natural
resources and the appropriate standing committees of the legislature,
no later than December 30, 2006, its findings and recommendations for
legislation that is necessary to implement the findings.
(5) The department of natural resources shall provide technical and
staff support from existing staff for the work group created by this
section.
(6) The work group is required to hold a minimum of five meetings,
at diverse locations throughout the state, to gather public input
regarding the group's proposed legislation.
(7) This section expires June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---