BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 68.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Multiple interment" means two or more human remains are buried in
the ground, in outer burial enclosures or chambers, placed one on top
of another, with a ground level surface the same size as a single grave
or right of interment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 68.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every cemetery shall disclose and give to the person making
cemetery arrangements a written statement, contract, or other document
that indicates all the items of property, merchandise, and service that
the customer is purchasing, and the price of those items.
(2) Any cemetery offering single burial use of multiple interment
space must disclose on the interment statement, contract, or other
document, the definition of multiple interment.

--- END ---