BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that state hospitals
provide benefits to local communities but also impose a financial
burden on the cities and towns responsible for providing law
enforcement services to those state hospitals. Residents, patients,
and staff are part of the communities in which these hospitals are
located. The legislature endeavors to establish a process whereby
cities and towns can enter into law enforcement contracts with the
department of social and health services to partially defray the
jurisdiction's law enforcement costs associated with providing these
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a state hospital is located within the corporate limits of
a city or town that has recurring law enforcement costs associated with
responding to actions of residents of the state hospital, at the
request of the city or town the department shall contract with the city
or town to pay an equitable share for law enforcement services. The
contract shall be negotiated as provided in subsection (2) of this
section and shall provide for payment by the department to the city or
town, within the limits specified in this section.
(2) The parties negotiating a law enforcement contract under this
section shall conduct the negotiation in good faith. Each state
hospital and the city or town within which jurisdiction the institution
is located shall jointly develop a written protocol governing mutual
communications and law enforcement responses to the hospital. Local
law enforcement must respond without additional payments when called in
accordance with the local community's standard for police intervention.
The department may not agree to reimburse the city or town for more
than one-half of the cost for law enforcement services provided by the
city or town, as determined in the contract. Reimbursement shall be
limited to funds available.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(b) "State hospital" means a state hospital as defined by RCW
72.23.010.

--- END ---