BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public health
hazards associated with environmental lead exposure represent a
significant and preventable public health problem. Lead negatively
affects every system of the body. It is harmful to individuals of all
ages and is especially harmful to children, fetuses, and adults of
child-bearing age. The effects of lead on a child's cognitive,
behavioral, and developmental abilities may necessitate large
expenditures of public funds for health care and special education.
The irreversible damage to children and subsequent expenditures could
be avoided if exposure to lead is reduced.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of health is directed to
implement a public health education program aimed at reducing childhood
exposure to lead in residential settings. The program will continue
the current efforts of the department to identify areas around the
state where lead exposure poses a threat to children and families, and
will provide information, education, and training to areas of concern.
The program will especially focus on older housing stock, and the
residential hazards of lead-based paint. The department is directed to
seek federal funding for the lead hazards education project and to
operate it using these funds. The department is not required to
implement the public health lead hazard education project if federal
funds are not obtained for this purpose in the biennium ending July 1,
2007.

--- END ---