BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.53.902 and 1995 c 374 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is unlawful for any person to distribute an adulterated feed.
A commercial feed is deemed to be adulterated:
(1) If it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance
which may render it injurious to health; but in case the substance is
not an added substance, such commercial feed shall not be considered
adulterated under this subsection if the quantity of such substance in
such commercial feed does not ordinarily render it injurious to health;
or
(2) If it bears or contains any added poisonous, added deleterious,
or added nonnutritive substance which is unsafe within the meaning of
section 406 of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act (other than one
which is (a) a pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural
commodity; or (b) a food additive); or
(3) If it is, or it bears, or contains any food additive which is
unsafe within the meaning of section 409 of the federal food, drug, and
cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 348); or
(4) If it is ruminant feed and is, bears, or contains any animal
protein prohibited in ruminant feed that is unsafe within the meaning
of federal regulations promulgated under section 409 of the federal
food, drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 348); or
(5) If it is a raw agricultural commodity and it bears or contains
a pesticide chemical which is unsafe within the meaning of section
408(a) of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act: PROVIDED, That
where a pesticide chemical has been used in or on a raw agricultural
commodity in conformity with an exemption granted or a tolerance
prescribed under section 408 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic
Act and such raw agricultural commodity has been subjected to
processing such as canning, cooking, freezing, dehydrating, or milling,
the residue of such pesticide chemical remaining in or on such
processed feed shall not be deemed unsafe if such residue in or on the
raw agricultural commodity has been removed to the extent possible in
good manufacturing practice and the concentration of such residue in
the processed feed is not greater than the tolerance prescribed for the
raw agricultural commodity unless the feeding of such processed feed
will result or is likely to result in a pesticide residue in the edible
product of the animal, which is unsafe within the meaning of section
408(a) of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act; or
(((5))) (6) If it is, or it bears or contains any color additive
which is unsafe within the meaning of section 706 of the federal food,
drug, and cosmetic act; or
(((6))) (7) If it is, or it bears or contains any new animal drug
that is unsafe within the meaning of section 512 of the federal food,
drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 360b); or
(((7))) (8) If any valuable constituent has been in whole or in
part omitted or abstracted therefrom or any less valuable substance
substituted therefor; or
(((8))) (9) If its composition or quality falls below or differs
from that which it is purported or is represented to possess by its
labeling; or
(((9))) (10) If it contains a drug and the methods used in or the
facilities or controls used for its manufacture, processing, or
packaging do not conform to current good manufacturing practice rules
adopted by the department to assure that the drug meets the
requirements of this chapter as to safety and has the identity and
strength and meets the quality and purity characteristics that it
purports or is represented to possess. In adopting such rules, the
department shall adopt the current good manufacturing practice
regulations for type A medicated articles and type B and type C
medicated feeds established under authority of the federal food, drug,
and cosmetic act, unless the department determines that they are not
appropriate to the conditions that exist in this state; or
(((10))) (11) If it contains viable, prohibited (primary) noxious
weed seeds in excess of one per pound, or if it contains viable,
restricted (secondary) noxious weed seeds in excess of twenty-five per
pound. The primary and secondary noxious weed seeds shall be those as
named pursuant to the provisions of chapter 15.49 RCW and rules adopted
thereunder.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.53.904 and 1965 ex.s. c 31 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person convicted of violating any of the provisions of this
chapter or the rules and regulations issued thereunder or who shall
impede, obstruct, hinder, or otherwise prevent or attempt to prevent
the department in the performance of its duty in connection with the
provisions of this chapter, shall be adjudged guilty of a misdemeanor
((and shall be fined not less than fifty dollars nor more than one
hundred dollars for the first violation, and not less than two hundred
dollars nor more than five hundred dollars for a subsequent violation))
as provided in RCW 9A.20.021. In all prosecutions under this chapter
involving the composition of a lot of commercial feed, a certified copy
of the official analysis signed by the department shall be accepted as
prima facie evidence of the composition.
(2) Any person convicted of intentionally violating RCW
15.53.902(4) or the rules issued thereunder is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor as provided in RCW 9A.20.021.
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the
department to report for prosecution or for the institution of seizure
proceedings as a result of minor violations of this chapter when it
believes that the public interest will be best served by a suitable
notice of warning in writing.
(((3))) (4) It shall be the duty of each prosecuting attorney to
whom any violation is reported to cause appropriate proceedings to be
instituted and prosecuted in a court of competent jurisdiction without
delay. Before the department reports a violation for such prosecution,
an opportunity shall be given the distributor to present ((his)) the
distributor's view in writing or orally to the department.
(((4))) (5) The department is hereby authorized to apply for and
the court to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any
person from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of
this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter
notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law. Said
injunction to be issued without bond.

--- END ---