BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The K-12 finance study executive
committee is created to conduct a comprehensive K-12 education finance
study. The comprehensive study shall address the following:
(a) The constitutional and legal requirements underlying the
current finance system and how those requirements are affected by the
goal under education reform to provide all students with the
opportunity to achieve the state standards;
(b) The strengths and weaknesses of the current state and local
finance formulas and how those formulas are used by local school
districts to meet state requirements and student learning goals;
(c) Potential changes to the current finance system including the
methods of allocating funds and the levels of funding and how student
achievement is affected;
(d) Reviewing the funding systems in at least five other states.
(2) Members of the K-12 finance study executive committee shall
include: The governor or the governor's designee; the superintendent
of public instruction or the superintendent's designee; one member from
the senate democratic caucus and one member from the senate republican
caucus appointed by the president of the senate; and one member from
the house of representatives democratic caucus and one member from the
house of representatives republican caucus appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives.
(3) The K-12 finance study executive committee shall select the
person or entity to conduct the study and shall approve the expenditure
of funds. The executive committee shall form an advisory committee
with the members appointed jointly by the governor and the
superintendent of public instruction including representatives of
school boards, school superintendents, school principals, school
business managers, certificated instructional staff, classified school
employees, parents, business, and the public. The advisory committee
shall advise both the executive committee and the person or entity
conducting the study.
(4) The study shall be completed by December 10, 2005. The results
shall be reported to the governor, the legislature, and the
superintendent of public instruction.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---