BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.32.010 and 1971 ex.s. c 265 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of this chapter is to provide a mechanism for the
payment of covered claims ((under certain insurance policies)) to avoid
excessive delay in payment and to avoid financial loss to claimants or
policyholders under certain policies of insurance covered by the scope
of this chapter because of the insolvency of an insurer, to assist in
the detection and prevention of insurer insolvencies, and to provide an
association to assess the cost of such protection among insurers.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.32.020 and 1987 c 185 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter ((shall apply)) applies to all kinds of direct
insurance, except life, title, surety, disability, credit, mortgage
guaranty, workers' compensation, and ocean marine ((insurance)).
Workers' compensation as used in this section does not include
longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.32.030 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 109 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Account" means one of the ((two)) three accounts created in
RCW 48.32.040 ((as now or hereafter amended)).
(2) "Association" means the Washington insurance guaranty
association created in RCW 48.32.040.
(3) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of this state.
(4) "Covered claim" means:
(a) Except for longshore and harbor workers' compensation act
insurance, an unpaid claim, including one for unearned premiums,
((which)) that arises out of and is within the coverage of an insurance
policy to which this chapter applies issued by an insurer, if such
insurer becomes an insolvent insurer after the first day of April, 1971
and (((a))) (i) the claimant or insured is a resident of this state at
the time of the insured event; or (((b))) (ii) the property from which
the claim arises is permanently located in this state. "Covered claim"
((shall)) does not include any amount due any reinsurer, insurer,
insurance pool, or underwriting association, as subrogation recoveries
or otherwise((: PROVIDED, That)). However, a claim for any such
amount asserted against a person insured under a policy issued by an
insurer which has become an insolvent insurer, which, if it were not a
claim by or for the benefit of a reinsurer, insurer, insurance pool, or
underwriting association, would be a "covered claim" may be filed
directly with the receiver of the insolvent insurer, but in no event
may any such claim be asserted in any legal action against the insured
of such insolvent insurer. In addition, "covered claim" ((shall)) does
not include any claim filed with the association subsequent to the
final date set by the court for the filing of claims against the
liquidator or receiver of an insolvent insurer; and
(b) For longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance,
an unpaid claim, excluding one for unearned premiums, for benefits due
an injured worker under the longshore and harbor workers' compensation
act that is within the coverage of an insurance policy to which this
chapter applies issued by an insurer, if that insurer becomes an
insolvent insurer after the effective date of this section and (i) the
worksite from which the injury occurred is within this state or on the
navigable waters within or immediately offshore of this state, or (ii)
the worksite from which the injury occurred is outside this state, the
injured worker is a permanent resident of this state, the injured
worker is temporarily working at the worksite from which the injury
occurred, and the injured worker is not covered under a policy of
longshore and harbor workers' compensation insurance issued in another
state. "Covered claim" does not include any amount due any insurer,
reinsurer, insurance pool, or underwriting association, as subrogation
recoveries or otherwise.
(5) "Insolvent insurer" means:
(a) An insurer (((a))) (i) authorized to transact insurance in this
state either at the time the policy was issued or when the insured
event occurred and (((b))) (ii) determined to be insolvent and ordered
liquidated by a court of competent jurisdiction, and which adjudication
was subsequent to the first day of April, 1971; and
(b) In the case of an insurer writing longshore and harbor workers'
compensation act insurance, an insurer (i) authorized to write this
class of insurance at the time the policy was written and (ii)
determined to be insolvent and ordered liquidated by a court of
competent jurisdiction subsequent to the effective date of this
section.
(6) "Longshore and harbor workers' compensation act" means the
longshore and harbor workers' compensation act as defined in U.S.C.
Title 33, Chapter 18, 901 et seq. and its extensions commonly known as
the defense base act, outer continental shelf lands act,
nonappropriated funds instrumentalities act, District of Columbia
workers' compensation act, and the war hazards act.
(((6))) (7) "Member insurer" means any person who (a) writes any
kind of insurance to which this chapter applies under RCW 48.32.020,
including the exchange of reciprocal or interinsurance contracts, and
(b) holds a certificate of authority to transact insurance in this
state.
(((7))) (8) "Net direct written premiums" means direct gross
premiums written in this state on insurance policies to which this
chapter applies, less return premiums thereon and dividends paid or
credited to policyholders on such direct business. "Net direct written
premiums" does not include premiums on contracts between insurers or
reinsurers.
(((8))) (9) "Person" means any individual, corporation,
partnership, association, or voluntary organization.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.32.040 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 109 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is hereby created a nonprofit unincorporated legal entity to
be known as the Washington insurance guaranty association. All
insurers defined as member insurers in RCW 48.32.030(((6) as now or
hereafter amended)) shall be and remain members of the association as
a condition of their authority to transact insurance in this state.
The association shall perform its functions under a plan of operation
established and approved under RCW 48.32.070 and shall exercise its
powers through a board of directors established under RCW 48.32.050
((as now or hereafter amended)). For purposes of administration and
assessment, the association shall be divided into ((two)) three
separate accounts: (1) The automobile insurance account; ((and)) (2)
the account for longshore and harbor workers' compensation act
insurance; and (3) the account for all other insurance to which this
chapter applies.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.32.050 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 109 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of the association shall consist of not
less than five nor more than nine persons serving terms as established
in the plan of operation. The members of the board shall be selected
by member insurers subject to the approval of the commissioner.
Vacancies on the board shall be filled for the remaining period of the
term by a majority vote of the remaining board members, subject to the
approval of the commissioner.
(2) In approving selections to the board, the commissioner shall
consider among other things whether all member insurers are fairly
represented. In the event of the insolvency of a member insurer who
writes longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance, at
least one member of the board must represent the interests of this
class of insurer, and this member shall be added to the board at the
next annual meeting following the insolvency.
(3) Members of the board may be reimbursed from the assets of the
association for expenses incurred by them as members of the board of
directors.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.32.060 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 109 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The association shall:
(a)(i) For other than covered claims involving the longshore and
harbor workers' compensation act, be obligated to the extent of the
covered claims existing prior to the order of liquidation and arising
within thirty days after the order of liquidation, or before the policy
expiration date if less than thirty days after the order of
liquidation, or before the insured replaces the policy or on request
effects cancellation, if he or she does so within thirty days of the
order of liquidation, but such an obligation ((shall)) includes only
that amount of each covered claim which is in excess of one hundred
dollars and is less than three hundred thousand dollars. In no event
shall the association be obligated to a policyholder or claimant in an
amount in excess of the face amount of the policy from which the claim
arises.
(ii) For covered claims involving longshore and harbor workers'
compensation act insurance, be obligated to the extent of covered
claims for insolvencies occurring after the effective date of this
section. This obligation is for the statutory obligations established
under the longshore and harbor workers' compensation act. However, the
insured employer shall reimburse the association for any deductibles
that are owed as part of the insured's obligations.
(b) Be deemed the insurer to the extent of its obligation on the
covered claims and to such extent shall have all rights, duties, and
obligations of the insolvent insurer as if the insurer had not become
insolvent.
(c)(i) Allocate claims paid and expenses incurred among the ((two))
three accounts enumerated in RCW 48.32.040 ((as now or hereafter
amended)) separately, and assess member insurers separately for each
account amounts necessary to pay the obligations of the association
under ((subsection (1)))(a) ((above)) of this subsection subsequent to
an insolvency, the expenses of handling covered claims subsequent to an
insolvency, the cost of examinations under RCW 48.32.110, and other
expenses authorized by this chapter. Except as provided for in this
subsection for member insurers who write longshore and harbor workers'
compensation act insurance, the assessments of each member insurer
shall be in the proportion that the net direct written premiums of the
member insurer for the calendar year preceding the assessment on the
kinds of insurance in the account bears to the net direct written
premiums of all member insurers for the calendar year preceding the
assessment on the kinds of insurance in the account. Each member
insurer shall be notified of the assessment not later than thirty days
before it is due. No member insurer may be assessed in any year on any
account an amount greater than two percent of that member insurer's net
direct written premiums for the calendar year preceding the assessment
on the kinds of insurance in the account. If the maximum assessment,
together with the other assets of the association in any account, does
not provide in any one year in any account an amount sufficient to make
all necessary payments from that account, the funds available may be
prorated and the unpaid portion shall be paid as soon thereafter as
funds become available. The association shall pay claims in any order
which it may deem reasonable, including the payment of claims in the
order such claims are received from claimants or in groups or
categories of claims, or otherwise. The association may exempt or
defer, in whole or in part, the assessment of any member insurer, if
the assessment would cause the member insurer's financial statement to
reflect amounts of capital or surplus less than the minimum amounts
required for a certificate of authority by any jurisdiction in which
the member insurer is authorized to transact insurance. Each member
insurer serving as a servicing facility may set off against any
assessment, authorized payments made on covered claims and expenses
incurred in the payment of such claims by such member insurer if they
are chargeable to the account for which the assessment is made.
(ii) For member insurers who write longshore and harbor workers'
compensation act insurance, (c)(i) of this subsection applies except as
modified by the following:
(A) Beginning July 1, 2005, and prior to an insolvency, each member
insurer who writes longshore and harbor workers' compensation act
insurance in this state, whether on a primary or excess coverage basis,
shall be assessed at a rate to be determined by the association, but
not more than an annual rate of three percent of the net direct written
premium for the calendar year preceding the assessment on this kind of
insurance. Insurer assessments prior to an insolvency shall continue
until a fund is established that equals four percent of the aggregate
net direct premium for the calendar year preceding the assessment on
all insurers authorized to write this kind of insurance;
(B) Subsequent to an insolvency, each member insurer who writes
longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance in this state,
whether on a primary or excess coverage basis, shall be assessed at a
rate to be determined by the association, but not more than an annual
rate of three percent of the net direct written premium for the
calendar year preceding the assessment on this kind of insurance.
Insurer assessments subsequent to an insolvency shall continue until a
fund is established that the association deems sufficient to meet all
claim and loan obligations of the fund, provided that the net fund
balance may not at any time exceed four percent of the aggregate net
direct premium for the calendar year preceding the assessment on all
insurers authorized to write this kind of insurance; and
(C) If any insurer fails to provide its net direct written premium
data in an accurate and timely manner upon request by the association,
the association may, at its discretion, substitute that insurer's
direct written premiums for workers' compensation reported or
reportable in its statutory annual statement page fourteen data for the
state of Washington.
(d) Investigate claims brought against the association and adjust,
compromise, settle, and pay covered claims to the extent of the
association's obligation and deny all other claims.
(e) Notify such persons as the commissioner directs under RCW
48.32.080(2)(a).
(f) Handle claims through its employees or through one or more
insurers or other persons designated as servicing facilities.
Designation of a servicing facility is subject to the approval of the
commissioner, but such designation may be declined by a member insurer.
(g) Reimburse each servicing facility for obligations of the
association paid by the facility and for expenses incurred by the
facility while handling claims on behalf of the association and shall
pay the other expenses of the association authorized by this chapter.
(2) The association may:
(a) Appear in, defend, and appeal any action on a claim brought
against the association.
(b) Employ or retain such persons as are necessary to handle claims
and perform other duties of the association.
(c) Borrow funds necessary to effect the purposes of this chapter
in accord with the plan of operation. If such a loan is related to the
account for longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurance,
the association may seek such a loan from the Washington longshore and
harbor workers' compensation act insurance assigned risk plan under RCW
48.22.070 or from other interested parties.
(d) Sue or be sued.
(e) Negotiate and become a party to such contracts as are necessary
to carry out the purpose of this chapter.
(f) Perform such other acts as are necessary or proper to
effectuate the purpose of this chapter.
(g) Refund to the member insurers in proportion to the contribution
of each member insurer to that account that amount by which the assets
of the account exceed the liabilities, if, at the end of any calendar
year, the board of directors finds that the assets of the association
in any account exceed the liabilities of that account as estimated by
the board of directors for the coming year.
(3) The association shall not access any funds from the automobile
insurance account or the account for all other insurance to which this
chapter applies to cover the cost of claims or administration arising
under the account for longshore and harbor workers' compensation act
insurance.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.32.100 and 1987 c 185 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person having a claim against his or her insurer under any
provision in his or her insurance policy which is also a covered claim
shall be required to exhaust first ((his)) any right under ((such))
that policy. Any amount payable on a covered claim under this chapter
shall be reduced by the amount of ((such)) a recovery under the
claimant's insurance policy.
(2) Any person having a claim ((which)) that may be recovered under
more than one insurance guaranty association or its equivalent shall
seek recovery first from the association of the place of residence of
the insured except that if it is a first party claim for damage to
property with a permanent location, from the association of the
location of the property, and if it is a workers' compensation claim or
a longshore and harbor workers' compensation act claim, from the
association of the permanent residence of the claimant. Any recovery
under this chapter shall be reduced by the amount of the recovery from
any other insurance guaranty association or its equivalent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---