BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Under the terms and conditions of this
chapter, the state of Washington seeks to join with other states and
establish the interstate insurance product regulation compact and thus
become a member of the interstate insurance product regulation
commission. The insurance commissioner is hereby designated to serve
as the representative of this state to the commission. The purposes of
the compact under this chapter are, through means of joint and
cooperative action among the compacting states:
(1) To promote and protect the interest of consumers of individual
and group annuity, life insurance, disability income, and long-term
care insurance products;
(2) To develop uniform standards for insurance products covered
under the compact;
(3) To establish a central clearinghouse to receive and provide
prompt review of insurance products covered under the compact and, in
certain cases, advertisements related thereto, submitted by insurers
authorized to do business in one or more compacting states;
(4) To give appropriate regulatory approval to those product
filings and advertisements satisfying the applicable uniform standard;
(5) To improve coordination of regulatory resources and expertise
between state insurance departments regarding the setting of uniform
standards and review of insurance products covered under the compact;
(6) To create the interstate insurance product regulation
commission; and
(7) To perform these and such other related functions as may be
consistent with the state regulation of the business of insurance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advertisement" means any material designed to create public
interest in a product, or induce the public to purchase, increase,
modify, reinstate, borrow on, surrender, replace, or retain a policy,
as more specifically defined in the rules and operating procedures of
the commission.
(2) "Bylaws" means those bylaws established by the commission for
its governance, or for directing or controlling the commission's
actions or conduct.
(3) "Compact" means the compact set forth in this chapter.
(4) "Compacting state" means any state which has enacted the
compact and which has not withdrawn under section 14(1) of this act or
been terminated under section 14(2) of this act.
(5) "Commission" means the interstate insurance product regulation
commission established in section 3 of this act.
(6) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner or the chief
insurance regulatory official of a state including but not limited to
commissioner, superintendent, director, or administrator.
(7) "Domiciliary state" means the state in which an insurer is
incorporated or organized; or, in the case of an alien insurer, its
state of entry.
(8) "Insurer" means any entity licensed by a state to issue
contracts of insurance for any of the lines of insurance covered by the
compact.
(9) "Member" means the person chosen by a compacting state as its
representative to the commission, or his or her designee.
(10) "Noncompacting state" means any state which is not at the time
a compacting state.
(11) "Operating procedures" mean procedures adopted by the
commission implementing a rule, uniform standard, or a provision of the
compact.
(12) "Product" means the form of a policy or contract, including
any application, endorsement, or related form which is attached to and
made a part of the policy or contract, and any evidence of coverage or
certificate, for an individual or group annuity, life insurance,
disability income, or long-term care insurance product that an insurer
is authorized to issue.
(13) "Rule" means a statement of general or particular
applicability and future effect adopted by the commission, including a
uniform standard developed under section 7 of this act, designed to
implement, interpret, or prescribe law or policy or describing the
organization, procedure, or practice requirements of the commission,
which shall have the force and effect of law in the compacting states.
(14) "State" means any state, district, or territory of the United
States of America.
(15) "Third-party filer" means an entity that submits a product
filing to the commission on behalf of an insurer.
(16) "Uniform standard" means a standard adopted by the commission
for a product line, under section 7 of this act, and includes all of
the product requirements in aggregate. However, each uniform standard
shall be construed, whether express or implied, to prohibit the use of
any inconsistent, misleading, or ambiguous provisions in a product and
the form of the product made available to the public shall not be
unfair, inequitable, or against public policy as determined by the
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The compacting states hereby create and
establish a joint public agency known as the interstate insurance
product regulation commission. Under section 4 of this act, the
commission will have the power to develop uniform standards for product
lines, receive and provide prompt review of products filed therewith,
and give approval to those product filings satisfying applicable
uniform standards. However, it is not intended for the commission to
be the exclusive entity for receipt and review of insurance product
filings. This section does not prohibit any insurer from filing its
product in any state wherein the insurer is licensed to conduct the
business of insurance; and any such filing shall be subject to the laws
of the state where filed.
(2) The commission is a body corporate and politic, and an
instrumentality of the compacting states.
(3) The commission is solely responsible for its liabilities except
as otherwise specifically provided in the compact.
(4) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the
commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of
competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the commission is
located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The commission shall have the following
powers:
(1) To adopt rules, under section 7 of this act, which shall have
the force and effect of law and shall be binding in the compacting
states to the extent and in the manner provided in the compact;
(2) To exercise its rule-making authority and establish reasonable
uniform standards for products covered under the compact, and
advertisement related thereto, which shall have the force and effect of
law and shall be binding in the compacting states, but only for those
products filed with the commission. However, a compacting state shall
have the right to opt out of such uniform standard under section 7 of
this act, to the extent and in the manner provided in this compact.
Any uniform standard established by the commission for long-term care
insurance products may provide the same or greater protections for
consumers as, but shall not provide less than, those protections set
forth in the national association of insurance commissioners' long-term
care insurance model act and long-term care insurance model regulation,
respectively, adopted as of 2001. The commission shall consider
whether any subsequent amendments to the long-term care insurance model
act or long-term care insurance model regulation adopted by the
national association of insurance commissioners require amending of the
uniform standards established by the commission for long-term care
insurance products;
(3) To receive and review in an expeditious manner products filed
with the commission, and rate filings for disability income and long-term care insurance products, and give approval of those products and
rate filings that satisfy the applicable uniform standard, where such
approval shall have the force and effect of law and be binding on the
compacting states to the extent and in the manner provided in the
compact;
(4) To receive and review in an expeditious manner advertisement
relating to long-term care insurance products for which uniform
standards have been adopted by the commission, and give approval to all
advertisement that satisfies the applicable uniform standard. For any
product covered under this compact, other than long-term care insurance
products, the commission shall have the authority to require an insurer
to submit all or any part of its advertisement with respect to that
product for review or approval prior to use, if the commission
determines that the nature of the product is such that an advertisement
of the product could have the capacity or tendency to mislead the
public. The actions of the commission as provided in this section
shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in the
compacting states to the extent and in the manner provided in the
compact;
(5) To exercise its rule-making authority and designate products
and advertisement that may be subject to a self-certification process
without the need for prior approval by the commission;
(6) To adopt operating procedures, under section 7 of this act,
which shall be binding in the compacting states to the extent and in
the manner provided in the compact;
(7) To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in its name
as the commission. However, the standing of any state insurance
department to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be
affected;
(8) To issue subpoenas requiring the attendance and testimony of
witnesses and the production of evidence;
(9) To establish and maintain offices;
(10) To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(11) To borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel,
including, but not limited to, employees of a compacting state;
(12) To hire employees, professionals, or specialists, and elect or
appoint officers, and to fix their compensation, define their duties,
and give them appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the
compact, and determine their qualifications; and to establish the
commission's personnel policies and programs relating to, among other
things, conflicts of interest, rates of compensation, and
qualifications of personnel;
(13) To accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of
money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and to receive,
utilize, and dispose of the same. However, the commission shall strive
to avoid any appearance of impropriety;
(14) To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of,
or otherwise to own, hold, improve, or use, any property, real,
personal, or mixed. However, the commission shall strive to avoid any
appearance of impropriety;
(15) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon,
or otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal, or mixed;
(16) To remit filing fees to compacting states as may be set forth
in the bylaws, rules, or operating procedures;
(17) To enforce compliance by compacting states with rules, uniform
standards, operating procedures, and bylaws;
(18) To provide for dispute resolution among compacting states;
(19) To advise compacting states on issues relating to insurers
domiciled or doing business in noncompacting jurisdictions, consistent
with the purposes of the compact;
(20) To provide advice and training to those personnel in state
insurance departments responsible for product review, and to be a
resource for state insurance departments;
(21) To establish a budget and make expenditures;
(22) To borrow money;
(23) To appoint committees, including advisory committees
comprising members, state insurance regulators, state legislators or
their representatives, insurance industry and consumer representatives,
and such other interested persons as may be designated in the bylaws;
(24) To provide and receive information from, and to cooperate
with, law enforcement agencies;
(25) To adopt and use a corporate seal; and
(26) To perform such other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of the compact consistent with the
state regulation of the business of insurance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1)(a) Each compacting state shall have and
be limited to one member. Each member shall be qualified to serve in
that capacity pursuant to applicable law of the compacting state. Any
member may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law
of the state from which he or she shall be appointed. Any vacancy
occurring in the commission shall be filled in accordance with the laws
of the compacting state wherein the vacancy exists. This section does
not affect the manner in which a compacting state determines the
election or appointment and qualification of its own commissioner.
(b) Each member shall be entitled to one vote and shall have an
opportunity to participate in the governance of the commission in
accordance with the bylaws. Notwithstanding any provision in this
chapter to the contrary, no action of the commission with respect to
the adoption of a uniform standard shall be effective unless two-thirds
of the members vote in favor thereof.
(c) The commission shall, by a majority of the members, prescribe
bylaws to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to
carry out the purposes, and exercise the powers, of the compact,
including, but not limited to:
(i) Establishing the fiscal year of the commission;
(ii) Providing reasonable procedures for appointing and electing
members, as well as holding meetings, of the management committee;
(iii) Providing reasonable standards and procedures for: (A) The
establishment and meetings of other committees; and (B) governing any
general or specific delegation of any authority or function of the
commission;
(iv) Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting
meetings of the commission that consists of a majority of commission
members, ensuring reasonable advance notice of each such meeting and
providing for the right of citizens to attend each such meeting with
enumerated exceptions designed to protect the public's interest, the
privacy of individuals, and insurers' proprietary information,
including trade secrets. The commission may meet in camera only after
a majority of the entire membership votes to close a meeting. As soon
as practicable, the commission must make public: (A) A copy of the
vote to close the meeting revealing the vote of each member with no
proxy votes allowed; and (B) votes taken during such meeting;
(v) Establishing the titles, duties, and authority and reasonable
procedures for the election of the officers of the commission;
(vi) Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the
establishment of the personnel policies and programs of the commission.
Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar laws of any
compacting state, the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel
policies and programs of the commission;
(vii) Adopting a code of ethics to address permissible and
prohibited activities of commission members and employees; and
(viii) Providing a mechanism for winding up the operations of the
commission and the equitable disposition of any surplus funds that may
exist after the termination of the compact and after the payment or
reserving of all of its debts and obligations.
(d) The commission shall publish its bylaws in a convenient form
and file a copy thereof and a copy of any amendment thereto with the
appropriate agency or officer in each of the compacting states.
(2)(a) A management committee comprising no more than fourteen
members shall be established as follows:
(i) One member from each of the six compacting states with the
largest premium volume for individual and group annuities, life,
disability income, and long-term care insurance products, determined
from the records of the national association of insurance commissioners
for the prior year;
(ii) Four members from those compacting states with at least two
percent of the market based on the premium volume described under
(a)(i) of this subsection, other than the six compacting states with
the largest premium volume, selected on a rotating basis as provided in
the bylaws; and
(iii) Four members from those compacting states with less than two
percent of the market, based on the premium volume described under
(a)(i) of this subsection, with one selected from each of the four zone
regions of the national association of insurance commissioners as
provided in the bylaws.
(b) The management committee shall have such authority and duties
as may be set forth in the bylaws, including but not limited to:
(i) Managing the affairs of the commission in a manner consistent
with the bylaws and purposes of the commission;
(ii) Establishing and overseeing an organizational structure
within, and appropriate procedures for, the commission to provide for
the creation of uniform standards and other rules, receipt and review
of product filings, administrative and technical support functions,
review of decisions regarding the disapproval of a product filing, and
the review of elections made by a compacting state to opt out of a
uniform standard. However, a uniform standard shall not be submitted
to the compacting states for adoption unless approved by two-thirds of
the members of the management committee;
(iii) Overseeing the offices of the commission; and
(iv) Planning, implementing, and coordinating communications and
activities with other state, federal, and local government
organizations in order to advance the goals of the commission.
(c) The commission shall elect annually officers from the
management committee, with each having such authority and duties, as
may be specified in the bylaws.
(d) The management committee may, subject to the approval of the
commission, appoint or retain an executive director for such period,
upon such terms and conditions and for such compensation as the
commission may deem appropriate. The executive director shall serve as
secretary to the commission, but shall not be a member of the
commission. The executive director shall hire and supervise such other
staff as may be authorized by the commission.
(3)(a) A legislative committee comprising state legislators or
their designees shall be established to monitor the operations of, and
make recommendations to, the commission, including the management
committee. However, the manner of selection and term of any
legislative committee member shall be as set forth in the bylaws.
Prior to the adoption by the commission of any uniform standard,
revision to the bylaws, annual budget, or other significant matter as
may be provided in the bylaws, the management committee shall consult
with and report to the legislative committee.
(b) The commission shall establish two advisory committees, one of
which shall comprise consumer representatives independent of the
insurance industry, and the other comprising insurance industry
representatives.
(c) The commission may establish additional advisory committees as
its bylaws may provide for the carrying out of its functions.
(4) The commission shall maintain its corporate books and records
in accordance with the bylaws.
(5)(a) The members, officers, executive director, employees, and
representatives of the commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any
claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other
civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act,
error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the
claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities. However,
this subsection (5)(a) does not protect any such person from suit or
liability for any damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the
intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of that person.
(b) The commission shall defend any member, officer, executive
director, employee, or representative of the commission in any civil
action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the person against
whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities.
However, this subsection (5)(b) does not prohibit that person from
retaining his or her own counsel. Also, the actual or alleged act,
error, or omission may not have resulted from that person's intentional
or willful and wanton misconduct.
(c) The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member,
officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the
commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained
against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or
omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment,
duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis
for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment,
duties, or responsibilities. However, the actual or alleged act,
error, or omission may not have resulted from the intentional or
willful and wanton misconduct of that person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The commission shall meet and take such
actions as are consistent with the provisions of the compact and the
bylaws.
(2) Each member of the commission shall have the right and power to
cast a vote to which that compacting state is entitled and to
participate in the business and affairs of the commission. A member
shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws.
The bylaws may provide for members' participation in meetings by
telephone or other means of communication.
(3) The commission shall meet at least once during each calendar
year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The commission shall adopt reasonable
rules, including uniform standards, and operating procedures in order
to effectively and efficiently achieve the purposes of the compact. In
the event the commission exercises its rule-making authority in a
manner that is beyond the scope of the purposes of this chapter, then
such an action by the commission shall be invalid and have no force and
effect.
(2) Rules and operating procedures shall be made pursuant to a
rule-making process that conforms to the model state administrative
procedure act of 1981 as amended, as may be appropriate to the
operations of the commission. Before the commission adopts a uniform
standard, the commission shall give written notice to the relevant
state legislative committees in each compacting state responsible for
insurance issues of its intention to adopt the uniform standard. The
commission in adopting a uniform standard shall consider fully all
submitted materials and issue a concise explanation of its decision.
(3) A uniform standard shall become effective ninety days after its
adoption by the commission or such later date as the commission may
determine. However, a compacting state may opt out of a uniform
standard as provided in this section. "Opt out" means any action by a
compacting state to decline to adopt or participate in an adopted
uniform standard. All other rules and operating procedures, and
amendments thereto, shall become effective as of the date specified in
each rule, operating procedure, or amendment.
(4)(a) A compacting state may opt out of a uniform standard, either
by legislation or regulation adopted by the insurance department under
the compacting state's administrative procedure act. If a compacting
state elects to opt out of a uniform standard by rule, it must: (i)
Give written notice to the commission no later than ten business days
after the uniform standard is adopted, or at the time the state becomes
a compacting state; and (ii) find that the uniform standard does not
provide reasonable protections to the citizens of the state, given the
conditions in the state.
(b) The commissioner shall make specific findings of fact and
conclusions of law, based on a preponderance of the evidence, detailing
the conditions in the state which warrant a departure from the uniform
standard and determining that the uniform standard would not reasonably
protect the citizens of the state. The commissioner must consider and
balance the following factors and find that the conditions in the state
and needs of the citizens of the state outweigh: (i) The intent of the
legislature to participate in, and the benefits of, an interstate
agreement to establish national uniform consumer protections for the
products subject to this chapter; and (ii) the presumption that a
uniform standard adopted by the commission provides reasonable
protections to consumers of the relevant product.
(c) A compacting state may, at the time of its enactment of the
compact, prospectively opt out of all uniform standards involving long-term care insurance products by expressly providing for such opt out in
the enacted compact, and such an opt out shall not be treated as a
material variance in the offer or acceptance of any state to
participate in the compact. Such an opt out shall be effective at the
time of enactment of the compact by the compacting state and shall
apply to all existing uniform standards involving long-term care
insurance products and those subsequently promulgated.
(5) If a compacting state elects to opt out of a uniform standard,
the uniform standard shall remain applicable in the compacting state
electing to opt out until such time the opt out legislation is enacted
into law or the regulation opting out becomes effective. Once the opt
out of a uniform standard by a compacting state becomes effective as
provided under the laws of that state, the uniform standard shall have
no further force and effect in that state unless and until the
legislation or regulation implementing the opt out is repealed or
otherwise becomes ineffective under the laws of the state. If a
compacting state opts out of a uniform standard after the uniform
standard has been made effective in that state, the opt out shall have
the same prospective effect as provided under section 14 of this act
for withdrawals.
(6) If a compacting state has formally initiated the process of
opting out of a uniform standard by regulation, and while the
regulatory opt out is pending, the compacting state may petition the
commission, at least fifteen days before the effective date of the
uniform standard, to stay the effectiveness of the uniform standard in
that state. The commission may grant a stay if it determines the
regulatory opt out is being pursued in a reasonable manner and there is
a likelihood of success. If a stay is granted or extended by the
commission, the stay or extension thereof may postpone the effective
date by up to ninety days, unless affirmatively extended by the
commission. However, a stay may not be permitted to remain in effect
for more than one year unless the compacting state can show
extraordinary circumstances which warrant a continuance of the stay,
including, but not limited to, the existence of a legal challenge which
prevents the compacting state from opting out. A stay may be
terminated by the commission upon notice that the rule-making process
has been terminated.
(7) Not later than thirty days after a rule or operating procedure
is adopted, any person may file a petition for judicial review of the
rule or operating procedure. However, the filing of such a petition
shall not stay or otherwise prevent the rule or operating procedure
from becoming effective unless the court finds that the petitioner has
a substantial likelihood of success. The court shall give deference to
the actions of the commission consistent with applicable law and shall
not find the rule or operating procedure to be unlawful if the rule or
operating procedure represents a reasonable exercise of the
commission's authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The commission shall adopt rules
establishing conditions and procedures for public inspection and
copying of its information and official records, except such
information and records involving the privacy of individuals and
insurers' trade secrets. The commission may adopt additional rules
under which it may make available to federal and state agencies,
including law enforcement agencies, records and information otherwise
exempt from disclosure, and may enter into agreements with such
agencies to receive or exchange information or records subject to
nondisclosure and confidentiality provisions.
(2) Except as to privileged records, data, and information, the
laws of any compacting state pertaining to confidentiality or
nondisclosure shall not relieve any compacting state commissioner of
the duty to disclose any relevant records, data or information to the
commission. However, disclosure to the commission does not waive or
otherwise affect any confidentiality requirement. Also, except as
otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, the commission shall not
be subject to the compacting state's laws pertaining to confidentiality
and nondisclosure with respect to records, data, and information in its
possession. Confidential information of the commission shall remain
confidential after such information is provided to any commissioner.
(3) The commission shall monitor compacting states for compliance
with duly adopted bylaws, rules, including uniform standards, and
operating procedures. The commission shall notify any noncomplying
compacting state in writing of its noncompliance with commission
bylaws, rules or operating procedures. If a noncomplying compacting
state fails to remedy its noncompliance within the time specified in
the notice of noncompliance, the compacting state shall be deemed to be
in default as set forth in section 14 of this act.
(4) The commissioner of any state in which an insurer is authorized
to do business, or is conducting the business of insurance, shall
continue to exercise his or her authority to oversee the market
regulation of the activities of the insurer in accordance with the
provisions of the state's law. The commissioner's enforcement of
compliance with the compact is governed by the following provisions:
(a) With respect to the commissioner's market regulation of a
product or advertisement that is approved or certified to the
commission, the content of the product or advertisement shall not
constitute a violation of the provisions, standards, or requirements of
the compact except upon a final order of the commission, issued at the
request of a commissioner after prior notice to the insurer and an
opportunity for hearing before the commission.
(b) Before a commissioner may bring an action for violation of any
provision, standard, or requirement of the compact relating to the
content of an advertisement not approved or certified to the
commission, the commission, or an authorized commission officer or
employee, must authorize the action. However, authorization under this
subsection (4)(b) does not require notice to the insurer, opportunity
for hearing, or disclosure of requests for authorization or records of
the commission's action on such requests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The commission shall attempt, upon the
request of a member, to resolve any disputes or other issues that are
subject to this compact and which may arise between two or more
compacting states, or between compacting states and noncompacting
states, and the commission shall adopt an operating procedure providing
for resolution of such disputes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Insurers and third-party filers seeking
to have a product approved by the commission shall file the product
with, and pay applicable filing fees to, the commission. This chapter
does not restrict or otherwise prevent an insurer from filing its
product with the insurance department in any state wherein the insurer
is licensed to conduct the business of insurance, and such filing shall
be subject to the laws of the states where filed.
(2) The commission shall establish appropriate filing and review
processes and procedures pursuant to commission rules and operating
procedures. The commission shall adopt rules to establish conditions
and procedures under which the commission will provide public access to
product filing information. In establishing such rules, the commission
shall consider the interests of the public in having access to such
information, as well as protection of personal medical and financial
information and trade secrets, that may be contained in a product
filing or supporting information.
(3) Any product approved by the commission may be sold or otherwise
issued in those compacting states for which the insurer is legally
authorized to do business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Not later than thirty days after the
commission has given notice of a disapproved product or advertisement
filed with the commission, the insurer or third-party filer whose
filing was disapproved may appeal the determination to a review panel
appointed by the commission. The commission shall adopt rules to
establish procedures for appointing such review panels and provide for
notice and hearing. An allegation that the commission, in disapproving
a product or advertisement filed with the commission, acted
arbitrarily, capriciously, or in a manner that is an abuse of
discretion or otherwise not in accordance with the law, is subject to
judicial review in accordance with section 3(4) of this act.
(2) The commission shall have authority to monitor, review, and
reconsider products and advertisement subsequent to their filing or
approval upon a finding that the product does not meet the relevant
uniform standard. Where appropriate, the commission may withdraw or
modify its approval after proper notice and hearing, subject to the
appeal process in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The commission shall pay or provide for
the payment of the reasonable expenses of its establishment and
organization. To fund the cost of its initial operations, the
commission may accept contributions and other forms of funding from the
national association of insurance commissioners, compacting states, and
other sources. Contributions and other forms of funding from other
sources shall be of such a nature that the independence of the
commission concerning the performance of its duties shall not be
compromised.
(2) The commission shall collect a filing fee from each insurer and
third-party filer filing a product with the commission to cover the
cost of the operations and activities of the commission and its staff
in a total amount sufficient to cover the commission's annual budget.
(3) The commission's budget for a fiscal year shall not be approved
until it has been subject to notice and comment as set forth in section
7 of this act.
(4) The commission shall be exempt from all taxation in and by the
compacting states.
(5) The commission shall not pledge the credit of any compacting
state, except by and with the appropriate legal authority of that
compacting state.
(6) The commission shall keep complete and accurate accounts of all
its internal receipts, including grants and donations, and
disbursements of all funds under its control. The internal financial
accounts of the commission shall be subject to the accounting
procedures established under its bylaws. The financial accounts and
reports including the system of internal controls and procedures of the
commission shall be audited annually by an independent certified public
accountant. Upon the determination of the commission, but no less
frequently than every three years, the review of the independent
auditor shall include a management and performance audit of the
commission. The commission shall make an annual report to the governor
and legislature of the compacting states, which shall include a report
of the independent audit. The commission's internal accounts shall not
be confidential and such materials may be shared with the commissioner
of any compacting state upon request. However, any work papers related
to any internal or independent audit and any information regarding the
privacy of individuals and insurers' proprietary information, including
trade secrets, shall remain confidential.
(7) A compacting state does not have any claim to or ownership of
any property held by or vested in the commission or to any commission
funds held under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) Any state is eligible to become a
compacting state.
(2) The compact shall become effective and binding upon legislative
enactment of the compact into law by two compacting states. However,
the commission shall become effective for purposes of adopting uniform
standards for, reviewing, and giving approval or disapproval of
products filed with the commission that satisfy applicable uniform
standards only after twenty-six states are compacting states or,
alternatively, by states representing greater than forty percent of the
premium volume for life insurance, annuity, disability income, and
long-term care insurance products, based on records of the national
association of insurance commissioners for the prior year. Thereafter,
it shall become effective and binding as to any other compacting state
upon enactment of the compact into law by that state.
(3) Amendments to the compact may be proposed by the commission for
enactment by the compacting states. An amendment does not become
effective and binding upon the commission and the compacting states
unless and until all compacting states enact the amendment into law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1)(a) Once effective, the compact shall
continue in force and remain binding upon each and every compacting
state. However, a compacting state may withdraw from the compact by
enacting a statute specifically repealing the statute which enacted the
compact into law.
(b) The effective date of withdrawal is the effective date of the
repealing statute. However, the withdrawal shall not apply to any
product filings approved or self-certified, or any advertisement of
such products, on the date the repealing statute becomes effective,
except by mutual agreement of the commission and the withdrawing state
unless the approval is rescinded by the withdrawing state as provided
in (e) of this subsection.
(c) The commissioner of the withdrawing state shall immediately
notify the management committee in writing upon the introduction of
legislation repealing the compact in the withdrawing state.
(d) The commission shall notify the other compacting states of the
introduction of such legislation within ten days after its receipt of
notice thereof.
(e) The withdrawing state is responsible for all obligations,
duties, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of
withdrawal, including any obligations, the performance of which extend
beyond the effective date of withdrawal, except to the extent those
obligations may have been released or relinquished by mutual agreement
of the commission and the withdrawing state. The commission's approval
of products and advertisement prior to the effective date of withdrawal
shall continue to be effective and be given full force and effect in
the withdrawing state, unless formally rescinded by the withdrawing
state in the same manner as provided by the laws of the withdrawing
state for the prospective disapproval of products or advertisement
previously approved under state law.
(f) Reinstatement following withdrawal of any compacting state
shall occur upon the effective date of the withdrawing state reenacting
the compact.
(2)(a) If the commission determines that any compacting state has
at any time defaulted in the performance of any of its obligations or
responsibilities under the compact, the bylaws, or adopted rules or
operating procedures, then, after notice and hearing as set forth in
the bylaws, all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred by the
compact on the defaulting state shall be suspended from the effective
date of default as fixed by the commission. The grounds for default
include, but are not limited to, failure of a compacting state to
perform its obligations or responsibilities, and any other grounds
designated in commission rules. The commission shall immediately
notify the defaulting state in writing of the defaulting state's
suspension pending a cure of the default. The commission shall
stipulate the conditions and the time period within which the
defaulting state must cure its default. If the defaulting state fails
to cure the default within the time period specified by the commission,
the defaulting state shall be terminated from the compact and all
rights, privileges, and benefits conferred by the compact shall be
terminated from the effective date of termination.
(b) Product approvals by the commission or product self-certifications, or any advertisement in connection with such product,
that are in force on the effective date of termination shall remain in
force in the defaulting state in the same manner as if the defaulting
state had withdrawn voluntarily under subsection (1) of this section.
(c) Reinstatement following termination of any compacting state
requires a reenactment of the compact.
(3)(a) The compact dissolves effective upon the date of the
withdrawal or default of the compacting state which reduces membership
in the compact to one compacting state.
(b) Upon the dissolution of the compact, the compact becomes null
and void and shall be of no further force or effect, and the business
and affairs of the commission shall be wound up and any surplus funds
shall be distributed in accordance with the bylaws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1)(a) The compact does not prevent the
enforcement of any other law of a compacting state, except as provided
in (b) of this subsection.
(b) For any product approved or certified to the commission, the
rules, uniform standards, and any other requirements of the commission
shall constitute the exclusive provisions applicable to the content,
approval, and certification of such products. For advertisement that
is subject to the commission's authority, any rule, uniform standard,
or other requirement of the commission which governs the content of the
advertisement shall constitute the exclusive provision that a
commissioner may apply to the content of the advertisement. However,
no action taken by the commission shall abrogate or restrict: (i) The
access of any person to state courts; (ii) remedies available under
state law related to breach of contract, tort, or other laws not
specifically directed to the content of the product; (iii) state law
relating to the construction of insurance contracts; or (iv) the
authority of the attorney general of the state, including but not
limited to maintaining any actions or proceedings, as authorized by
law.
(c) All insurance products filed with individual states shall be
subject to the laws of those states.
(2)(a) All lawful actions of the commission, including all rules
and operating procedures adopted by the commission, are binding upon
the compacting states.
(b) All agreements between the commission and the compacting states
are binding in accordance with their terms.
(c) Upon the request of a party to a conflict over the meaning or
interpretation of commission actions, and upon a majority vote of the
compacting states, the commission may issue advisory opinions regarding
the meaning or interpretation in dispute.
(d) In the event any provision of the compact exceeds the
constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any compacting
state, the obligations, duties, powers, or jurisdiction sought to be
conferred by that provision upon the commission shall be ineffective as
to that compacting state, and those obligations, duties, powers, or
jurisdiction shall remain in the compacting state and shall be
exercised by the agency thereof to which those obligations, duties,
powers, or jurisdiction are delegated by law in effect at the time the
compact becomes effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This chapter shall be liberally construed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 17 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

--- END ---