BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.31.020 and 1998 c 284 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this chapter, other than as to RCW
48.31.010, and in addition to persons included under RCW 48.99.010, the
term "insurer" shall be deemed to include an insurer authorized under
chapter 48.05 RCW, an insurer or institution holding a certificate of
exemption under RCW 48.38.010, a health care service contractor
registered under chapter 48.44 RCW, and a health maintenance
organization registered under chapter 48.46 RCW, as well as all persons
engaged as, or purporting to be engaged as insurers, institutions
issuing charitable gift annuities, health care service contractors, or
health maintenance organizations in this state, and to persons in
process of organization to become insurers, institutions issuing
charitable gift annuities, health care service contractors, or health
maintenance organizations.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Exceeded its powers" means the following conditions:
(i) The insurer has refused to permit examination of its books,
papers, accounts, records, or affairs by the commissioner, his or her
deputies, employees, or duly commissioned examiners;
(ii) A domestic insurer has unlawfully removed from this state
books, papers, accounts, or records necessary for an examination of the
insurer;
(iii) The insurer has failed to promptly comply with the applicable
financial reporting statutes or rules and departmental requests
relating thereto;
(iv) The insurer has neglected or refused to observe an order of
the commissioner to make good, within the time prescribed by law, any
prohibited deficiency in its capital, capital stock, or surplus;
(v) The insurer is continuing to transact insurance or write
business after its license has been revoked or suspended by the
commissioner;
(vi) The insurer, by contract or otherwise, has unlawfully or has
in violation of an order of the commissioner or has without first
having obtained written approval of the commissioner if approval is
required by law:
(A) Totally reinsured its entire outstanding business; or
(B) Merged or consolidated substantially its entire property or
business with another insurer;
(vii) The insurer engaged in any transaction in which it is not
authorized to engage under the laws of this state; or
(viii) The insurer refused to comply with a lawful order of the
commissioner.
(b) "Consent" means agreement to administrative supervision by the
insurer.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.31.115 and 1993 c 462 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The persons entitled to protection under this section are:
(a) The commissioner and any other receiver or administrative
supervisor responsible for conducting a delinquency proceeding under
this chapter, including present and former commissioners,
administrative supervisors, and receivers; and
(b) The commissioner's employees, meaning all present and former
special deputies and assistant special deputies and special receivers
and special administrative supervisors appointed by the commissioner
and all persons whom the commissioner, special deputies, or assistant
special deputies have employed to assist in a delinquency proceeding
under this chapter. Attorneys, accountants, auditors, and other
professional persons or firms who are retained as independent
contractors, and their employees, are not considered employees of the
commissioner for purposes of this section.
(2) The commissioner and the commissioner's employees are immune
from suit and liability, both personally and in their official
capacities, for a claim for damage to or loss of property or personal
injury or other civil liability caused by or resulting from an alleged
act or omission of the commissioner or an employee arising out of or by
reason of his or her duties or employment. However, nothing in this
subsection may be construed to hold the commissioner or an employee
immune from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or
liability caused by the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of
the commissioner or an employee.
(3) If a legal action is commenced against the commissioner or an
employee, whether against him or her personally or in his or her
official capacity, alleging property damage, property loss, personal
injury, or other civil liability caused by or resulting from an alleged
act or omission of the commissioner or an employee arising out of or by
reason of his or her duties or employment, the commissioner and any
employee shall be indemnified from the assets of the insurer for all
expenses, attorneys' fees, judgments, settlements, decrees, or amounts
due and owing or paid in satisfaction of or incurred in the defense of
the legal action unless it is determined upon a final adjudication on
the merits that the alleged act or omission of the commissioner or
employee giving rise to the claim did not arise out of or by reason of
his or her duties or employment, or was caused by intentional or
willful and wanton misconduct.
(a) Attorneys' fees and related expenses incurred in defending a
legal action for which immunity or indemnity is available under this
section shall be paid from the assets of the insurer, as they are
incurred, in advance of the final disposition of such action upon
receipt of an undertaking by or on behalf of the commissioner or
employee to repay the attorneys' fees and expenses if it is ultimately
determined upon a final adjudication on the merits and that the
commissioner or employee is not entitled to immunity or indemnity under
this section.
(b) Any indemnification under this section is an administrative
expense of the insurer.
(c) In the event of an actual or threatened litigation against the
commissioner or an employee for which immunity or indemnity may be
available under this section, a reasonable amount of funds that in the
judgment of the commissioner may be needed to provide immunity or
indemnity shall be segregated and reserved from the assets of the
insurer as security for the payment of indemnity until all applicable
statutes of limitation have run or all actual or threatened actions
against the commissioner or an employee have been completely and
finally resolved, and all obligations of the insurer and the
commissioner under this section have been satisfied.
(d) In lieu of segregation and reserving of funds, the commissioner
may obtain a surety bond or make other arrangements that will enable
the commissioner to secure fully the payment of all obligations under
this section.
(4) If a legal action against an employee for which indemnity may
be available under this section is settled before final adjudication on
the merits, the insurer shall pay the settlement amount on behalf of
the employee, or indemnify the employee for the settlement amount,
unless the commissioner determines:
(a) That the claim did not arise out of or by reason of the
employee's duties or employment; or
(b) That the claim was caused by the intentional or willful and
wanton misconduct of the employee.
(5) In a legal action in which the commissioner is a defendant,
that portion of a settlement relating to the alleged act or omission of
the commissioner is subject to the approval of the court before which
the delinquency proceeding is pending. The court may not approve that
portion of the settlement if it determines:
(a) That the claim did not arise out of or by reason of the
commissioner's duties or employment; or
(b) That the claim was caused by the intentional or willful and
wanton misconduct of the commissioner.
(6) Nothing in this section removes or limits an immunity,
indemnity, benefit of law, right, or defense otherwise available to the
commissioner, an employee, or any other person, not an employee under
subsection (1)(b) of this section, who is employed by or in the office
of the commissioner or otherwise employed by the state.
(7)(a) Subsection (2) of this section applies to any suit based in
whole or in part on an alleged act or omission that takes place on or
after July 25, 1993.
(b) No legal action lies against the commissioner or an employee
based in whole or in part on an alleged act or omission that took place
before July 25, 1993, unless suit is filed and valid service of process
is obtained within twelve months after July 25, 1993.
(c) Subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section apply to a suit
that is pending on or filed after July 25, 1993, without regard to when
the alleged act or omission took place.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) An insurer may be subject to
administrative supervision by the commissioner if upon examination or
at any other time it appears in the commissioner's discretion that:
(a) The insurer's condition renders the continuance of its business
hazardous to the public or to its insureds;
(b) The insurer has or appears to have exceeded its powers granted
under its certificate of authority and applicable law;
(c) The insurer has failed to comply with the applicable provisions
of Title 48 RCW;
(d) The business of the insurer is being conducted fraudulently; or
(e) The insurer gives its consent.
(2) If the commissioner determines that the conditions set forth in
subsection (1) of this section exist, the commissioner shall:
(a) Notify the insurer of his or her determination;
(b) Furnish to the insurer a written list of the requirements to
abate this determination; and
(c) Notify the insurer that it is under the supervision of the
commissioner and that the commissioner is applying and effectuating the
provisions of this chapter. Action by the commissioner shall be
subject to review pursuant to chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW.
(3) If placed under administrative supervision, the insurer has
sixty days, or another period of time as designated by the
commissioner, to comply with the requirements of the commissioner
subject to the provisions of this chapter.
(4) If it is determined after notice and hearing that the
conditions giving rise to the supervision still exist at the end of the
supervision period under subsection (3) of this section, the
commissioner may extend the period.
(5) If it is determined that none of the conditions giving rise to
the supervision exist, the commissioner shall release the insurer from
supervision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as set forth in this section,
proceedings, hearings, notices, correspondence, reports, records, and
other information in the possession of the commissioner relating to the
supervision of any insurer under this chapter are confidential and are
not subject to chapter 42.17 RCW, are not subject to subpoena, and are
not subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil
action, except as provided by this section. However, the commissioner
is authorized to use the documents, materials, or other information in
the furtherance of any regulatory or legal action brought as part of
the commissioner's official duties.
(2) The employees of the commissioner have access to these
proceedings, hearings, notices, correspondence, reports, records, or
information as permitted by the commissioner. Neither the commissioner
nor any person who received documents, materials, or other information
while acting under the authority of the commissioner is permitted or
required to testify in any private civil action concerning any
confidential documents, materials, or information subject to subsection
(1) of this section.
(3) The commissioner may share the notices, correspondence,
reports, records, or information with other state, federal, and
international regulatory agencies, with the national association of
insurance commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and with
state, federal, and international law enforcement authorities, if the
commissioner determines that the disclosure is necessary or proper for
the enforcement of the laws of this or another state of the United
States, and provided that the recipient agrees to maintain the
confidentiality of the documents, material, or other information. No
waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality may
occur as a result of the sharing of documents, materials, or other
information under this subsection.
(4) The commissioner may open the proceedings or hearings or make
public the notices, correspondence, reports, records, or other
information if the commissioner deems that it is in the best interest
of the public or in the best interest of the insurer or its insureds,
creditors, or the general public.
(5) This section does not apply to hearings, notices,
correspondence, reports, records, or other information obtained upon
the appointment of a receiver for the insurer by a court of competent
jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 During the period of supervision, the
commissioner or the commissioner's designated appointee shall serve as
the administrative supervisor. The commissioner may provide that the
insurer may not do any of the following things during the period of
supervision, without the prior approval of the commissioner or the
appointed supervisor:
(1) Dispose of, convey, or encumber any of its assets or its
business in force;
(2) Withdraw any of its bank accounts;
(3) Lend any of its funds;
(4) Invest any of its funds;
(5) Transfer any of its property;
(6) Incur any debt, obligation, or liability;
(7) Merge or consolidate with another company;
(8) Approve new premiums or renew any policies;
(9) Enter into any new reinsurance contract or treaty;
(10) Terminate, surrender, forfeit, convert, or lapse any insurance
policy, certificate, or contract, except for nonpayment of premiums
due;
(11) Release, pay, or refund premium deposits; accrued cash or loan
values; unearned premiums; or other reserves on any insurance policy,
certificate, or contract;
(12) Make any material change in management; or
(13) Increase salaries and benefits of officers or directors or the
preferential payment of bonuses, dividends, or other payments deemed
preferential.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 During the period of supervision the insurer
may contest an action taken or proposed to be taken by the supervisor
specifying the manner wherein the action being complained of would not
result in improving the condition of the insurer. Denial of the
insurer's request upon reconsideration entitles the insurer to request
a proceeding under chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 48.31.020, 48.31.115, and sections 3
through 6, 8, and 9 of this act do not preclude the commissioner from
initiating judicial proceedings to place an insurer in rehabilitation
or liquidation proceedings or other delinquency proceedings, however
designated under the laws of this state, regardless of whether the
commissioner has previously initiated administrative supervision
proceedings under this chapter against the insurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The commissioner may meet with a supervisor
appointed under this chapter and with the attorney or other
representative of the supervisor, without the presence of any other
person, at the time of any proceeding or during the pendency of any
proceeding held under authority of this chapter to carry out the
commissioner's duties under this chapter or for the supervisor to carry
out his or her duties under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The commissioner may adopt rules to
implement and administer RCW 48.31.020, 48.31.115, and sections 3
through 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 3 through 9 of this act are each
added to chapter 48.31 RCW.

--- END ---