BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act is intended to satisfy the
directive from the centers for medicare and medicaid services requiring
states to implement changes to their medicare supplement insurance
requirements to comply with the standards prescribed by the medicare
modernization act that are consistent with amendments to the national
association of insurance commissioners medicare supplement insurance
minimum standards model act along with other corrections to be
compliant with federal requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.66 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An issuer may not deny or condition the issuance or
effectiveness of any medicare supplement policy or certificate
available for sale in this state, or discriminate in the pricing of a
policy or certificate, because of the health status, claims experience,
receipt of health care, or medical condition of an applicant in the
case of an application for a policy or certificate that is submitted
prior to or during the six-month period beginning with the first day of
the first month in which an individual is both sixty-five years of age
or older and is enrolled for benefits under medicare part B. Each
medicare supplement policy and certificate currently available from an
insurer must be made available to all applicants who qualify under this
subsection without regard to age.
(2) If an applicant qualifies under this section and submits an
application during the time period referenced in subsection (1) of this
section and, as of the date of application, has had a continuous period
of creditable coverage of at least three months, the issuer may not
exclude benefits based on a preexisting condition.
(3) If an applicant qualified under this section submits an
application during the time period referenced in subsection (1) of this
section and, as of the date of application, has had a continuous period
of creditable coverage that is less than three months, the issuer must
reduce the period of any preexisting condition exclusion by the
aggregate of the period of creditable coverage applicable to the
applicant as of the enrollment date.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.66.020 and 1996 c 269 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Medicare supplemental insurance" or "medicare supplement
insurance policy" refers to a group or individual policy of disability
insurance or a subscriber contract of a health care service contractor,
a health maintenance organization, or a fraternal benefit society,
which relates its benefits to medicare, or which is advertised,
marketed, or designed primarily as a supplement to reimbursements under
medicare for the hospital, medical, or surgical expenses of persons
eligible for medicare. Such term does not include:
(a) A policy or contract of one or more employers or labor
organizations, or of the trustees of a fund established by one or more
employers or labor organizations, or combination thereof, for employees
or former employees, or combination thereof, or for members or former
members, or combination thereof, of the labor organizations; or
(b) A policy issued pursuant to a contract under section 1876 of
the federal social security act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq.), or an
issued policy under a demonstration specified in 42 U.S.C. Sec.
1395(g)(1); or
(c) ((Insurance policies or health care benefit plans, including
group conversion policies, provided to medicare eligible persons, that
are not marketed or held to be medicare supplement policies or benefit
plans)) Medicare advantage plans established under medicare part C; or
(d) Outpatient prescription drug plans established under medicare
part D; or
(e) Any health care prepayment plan that provides benefits pursuant
to an agreement under section 1833(a)(1)(A) of the federal social
security act.
(2) "Medicare" means the "Health Insurance for the Aged Act," Title
XVIII of the Social Security Amendments of 1965, as then constituted or
later amended.
(3) "Medicare advantage plan" means a plan of coverage for health
benefits under medicare part C as defined in 42 U.S.C. Sec.
1395w-28(b), and includes:
(a) Coordinated care plans which provide health care services,
including but not limited to health maintenance organization plans
(with or without a point-of-service option), plans offered by
provider-sponsored organizations, and preferred provider organization
plans;
(b) Medical savings account plans coupled with a contribution into
a medicare advantage plan medical savings account; and
(c) Medicare advantage private fee-for-service plans.
(4) "Medicare eligible expenses" means health care expenses of the
kinds covered by medicare parts A and B, to the extent recognized as
reasonable and medically necessary by medicare.
(((4))) (5) "Applicant" means:
(a) In the case of an individual medicare supplement insurance
policy or subscriber contract, the person who seeks to contract for
insurance benefits; and
(b) In the case of a group medicare supplement insurance policy or
subscriber contract, the proposed certificate holder.
(((5))) (6) "Certificate" means any certificate delivered or issued
for delivery in this state under a group medicare supplement insurance
policy.
(((6))) (7) "Loss ratio" means the incurred claims as a percentage
of the earned premium computed under rules adopted by the insurance
commissioner.
(((7))) (8) "Preexisting condition" means a covered person's
medical condition that caused that person to have received medical
advice or treatment during a specified time period immediately prior to
the effective date of coverage.
(((8))) (9) "Disclosure form" means the form designated by the
insurance commissioner which discloses medicare benefits, the
supplemental benefits offered by the insurer, and the remaining amount
for which the insured will be responsible.
(((9))) (10) "Issuer" includes insurance companies, health care
service contractors, health maintenance organizations, fraternal
benefit societies, and any other entity delivering or issuing for
delivery medicare supplement policies or certificates to a resident of
this state.
(11) "Bankruptcy" means when a medicare advantage organization that
is not an issuer has filed, or has had filed against it, a petition for
declaration of bankruptcy and has ceased doing business in the state.
(12) "Continuous period of creditable coverage" means the period
during which an individual was covered by creditable coverage, if
during the period of the coverage the individual had no breaks in
coverage greater than sixty-three days.
(13)(a) "Creditable coverage" means, with respect to an individual,
coverage of the individual provided under any of the following:
(i) A group health plan;
(ii) Health insurance coverage;
(iii) Part A or part B of Title XVIII of the social security act
(medicare);
(iv) Title XIX of the social security act (medicaid), other than
coverage consisting solely of benefits under section 1928;
(v) Chapter 55 of Title 10 U.S.C. (CHAMPUS);
(vi) A medical care program of the Indian health service or of a
tribal organization;
(vii) A state health benefits risk pool;
(viii) A health plan offered under chapter 89 of Title 5 U.S.C.
(federal employees health benefits program);
(ix) A public health plan as defined in federal regulation; and
(x) A health benefit plan under section 5(e) of the peace corps act
(22 U.S.C. Sec. 2504(e)).
(b) "Creditable coverage" does not include one or more, or any
combination, of the following:
(i) Coverage only for accident or disability income insurance, or
any combination thereof;
(ii) Coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance;
(iii) Liability insurance, including general liability insurance
and automobile liability insurance;
(iv) Worker's compensation or similar insurance;
(v) Automobile medical payment insurance;
(vi) Credit-only insurance;
(vii) Coverage for on-site medical clinics; and
(viii) Other similar insurance coverage, specified in federal
regulations, under which benefits for medical care are secondary or
incidental to other insurance benefits.
(c) "Creditable coverage" does not include the following benefits
if they are provided under a separate policy, certificate, or contract
of insurance or are otherwise not an integral part of the plan:
(i) Limited scope dental or vision benefits;
(ii) Benefits for long-term care, nursing home care, home health
care, community-based care, or any combination thereof; and
(iii) Other similar, limited benefits as are specified in federal
regulations.
(d) "Creditable coverage" does not include the following benefits
if offered as independent, noncoordinated benefits:
(i) Coverage only for a specified disease or illness; and
(ii) Hospital indemnity or other fixed indemnity insurance.
(e) "Creditable coverage" does not include the following if it is
offered as a separate policy, certificate, or contract of insurance:
(i) Medicare supplemental health insurance as defined under section
1882(g)(1) of the social security act;
(ii) Coverage supplemental to the coverage provided under chapter
55 of Title 10 U.S.C.; and
(iii) Similar supplemental coverage provided to coverage under a
group health plan.
(14) "Employee welfare benefit plan" means a plan, fund, or program
of employee benefits as defined in 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1002 (employee
retirement income security act).
(15) "Insolvency" means when an issuer, licensed to transact the
business of insurance in this state, has had a final order of
liquidation entered against it with a finding of insolvency by a court
of competent jurisdiction in the issuer's state of domicile.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.66.045 and 2004 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every issuer of a medicare supplement insurance policy or
certificate providing coverage to a resident of this state issued on or
after January 1, 1996, shall:
(1) Unless otherwise provided for in RCW 48.66.055, issue coverage
under its standardized benefit plans B, C, D, E, F, ((and)) G, K, and
L without evidence of insurability to any resident of this state who is
eligible for both medicare hospital and physician services by reason of
age or by reason of disability or end-stage renal disease, if the
medicare supplement policy replaces another medicare supplement
standardized benefit plan policy or certificate B, C, D, E, F, ((or))
G, K, or L, or other more comprehensive coverage than the replacing
policy;
(2) Unless otherwise provided for in RCW 48.66.055, issue coverage
under its standardized plans A, H, I, and J without evidence of
insurability to any resident of this state who is eligible for both
medicare hospital and physician services by reason of age or by reason
of disability or end-stage renal disease, if the medicare supplement
policy replaces another medicare supplement policy or certificate which
is the same standardized plan as the replaced policy. After December
31, 2005, plans H, I, and J may be replaced only by the same plan if
that plan has been modified to remove outpatient prescription drug
coverage; and
(3) Set rates only on a community-rated basis. Premiums shall be
equal for all policyholders and certificate holders under a
standardized medicare supplement benefit plan form, except that an
issuer may vary premiums based on spousal discounts, frequency of
payment, and method of payment including automatic deposit of premiums
and may develop no more than two rating pools that distinguish between
an insured's eligibility for medicare by reason of:
(a) Age; or
(b) Disability or end-stage renal disease.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.66.055 and 2002 c 300 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Under this section, persons eligible for a medicare supplement
policy or certificate are those individuals described in subsection (3)
of this section who, subject to subsection (3)(b)(ii) of this section,
apply to enroll under the policy not later than sixty-three days after
the date of the termination of enrollment described in subsection (3)
of this section, and who submit evidence of the date of termination or
disenrollment, or medicare part D enrollment, with the application for
a medicare supplement policy.
(2) With respect to eligible persons, an issuer may not deny or
condition the issuance or effectiveness of a medicare supplement policy
described in subsection (4) of this section that is offered and is
available for issuance to new enrollees by the issuer, shall not
discriminate in the pricing of such a medicare supplement policy
because of health status, claims experience, receipt of health care, or
medical condition, and shall not impose an exclusion of benefits based
on a preexisting condition under such a medicare supplement policy.
(3) "Eligible persons" means an individual that meets the
requirements of (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of this subsection, as
follows:
(a) The individual is enrolled under an employee welfare benefit
plan that provides health benefits that supplement the benefits under
medicare; and the plan terminates, or the plan ceases to provide all
such supplemental health benefits to the individual;
(b)(i) The individual is enrolled with a ((medicare+choice))
medicare advantage organization under a ((medicare+choice)) medicare
advantage plan under part C of medicare, and any of the following
circumstances apply, or the individual is sixty-five years of age or
older and is enrolled with a program of all inclusive care for the
elderly (PACE) provider under section 1894 of the social security act,
and there are circumstances similar to those described in this
subsection (3)(b) that would permit discontinuance of the individual's
enrollment with the provider if the individual were enrolled in a
((medicare+choice)) medicare advantage plan:
(A) The certification of the organization or plan ((under this
subsection (3)(b))) has been terminated((, or the organization or plan
has notified the individual of an impending termination of such a
certification));
(B) The organization has terminated or otherwise discontinued
providing the plan in the area in which the individual resides((, or
has notified the individual of an impending termination or
discontinuance of such a plan));
(C) The individual is no longer eligible to elect the plan because
of a change in the individual's place of residence or other change in
circumstances specified by the secretary of the United States
department of health and human services, but not including termination
of the individual's enrollment on the basis described in section
1851(g)(3)(B) of the federal social security act (where the individual
has not paid premiums on a timely basis or has engaged in disruptive
behavior as specified in standards under section 1856 of the federal
social security act), or the plan is terminated for all individuals
within a residence area;
(D) The individual demonstrates, in accordance with guidelines
established by the secretary of the United States department of health
and human services, that:
(I) The organization offering the plan substantially violated a
material provision of the organization's contract under this part in
relation to the individual, including the failure to provide an
enrollee on a timely basis medically necessary care for which benefits
are available under the plan or the failure to provide such covered
care in accordance with applicable quality standards; or
(II) The organization, an agent, or other entity acting on the
organization's behalf materially misrepresented the plan's provisions
in marketing the plan to the individual; or
(E) The individual meets other exceptional conditions as the
secretary of the United States department of health and human services
may provide.
(ii)(A) An individual described in (b)(i) of this subsection may
elect to apply (a) of this subsection by substituting, for the date of
termination of enrollment, the date on which the individual was
notified by the ((medicare+choice)) medicare advantage organization of
the impending termination or discontinuance of the ((medicare+choice))
medicare advantage plan it offers in the area in which the individual
resides, but only if the individual disenrolls from the plan as a
result of such notification.
(B) In the case of an individual making the election under
(b)(ii)(A) of this subsection, the issuer involved shall accept the
application of the individual submitted before the date of termination
of enrollment, but the coverage under subsection (1) of this section
((shall)) is only ((become)) effective upon termination of coverage
under the ((medicare+choice)) medicare advantage plan involved;
(c)(i) The individual is enrolled with:
(A) An eligible organization under a contract under section 1876
(medicare risk or cost);
(B) A similar organization operating under demonstration project
authority, effective for periods before April 1, 1999;
(C) An organization under an agreement under section 1833(a)(1)(A)
(health care prepayment plan); or
(D) An organization under a medicare select policy; and
(ii) The enrollment ceases under the same circumstances that would
permit discontinuance of an individual's election of coverage under
(b)(i) of this subsection;
(d) The individual is enrolled under a medicare supplement policy
and the enrollment ceases because:
(i)(A) Of the insolvency of the issuer or bankruptcy of the
nonissuer organization; or
(B) Of other involuntary termination of coverage or enrollment
under the policy;
(ii) The issuer of the policy substantially violated a material
provision of the policy; or
(iii) The issuer, an agent, or other entity acting on the issuer's
behalf materially misrepresented the policy's provisions in marketing
the policy to the individual;
(e)(i) The individual was enrolled under a medicare supplement
policy and terminates enrollment and subsequently enrolls, for the
first time, with any ((medicare+choice)) medicare advantage
organization under a ((medicare+choice)) medicare advantage plan under
part C of medicare, any eligible organization under a contract under
section 1876 (medicare risk or cost), any similar organization
operating under demonstration project authority, any PACE program under
section 1894 of the social security act((, an organization under an
agreement under section 1833(a)(1)(A) (health care prepayment plan),))
or a medicare select policy; and
(ii) The subsequent enrollment under (e)(i) of this subsection is
terminated by the enrollee during any period within the first twelve
months of such subsequent enrollment (during which the enrollee is
permitted to terminate such subsequent enrollment under section 1851(e)
of the federal social security act); ((or))
(f) The individual, upon first becoming eligible for benefits under
part A of medicare at age sixty-five, enrolls in a ((medicare+choice))
medicare advantage plan under part C of medicare, or in a PACE program
under section 1894, and disenrolls from the plan or program by not
later than twelve months after the effective date of enrollment; or
(g) The individual enrolls in a medicare part D plan during the
initial enrollment period and, at the time of enrollment in part D, was
enrolled under a medicare supplement policy that covers outpatient
prescription drugs, and the individual terminates enrollment in the
medicare supplement policy and submits evidence of enrollment in
medicare part D along with the application for a policy described in
subsection (4)(d) of this section.
(4) An eligible person under subsection (3) of this section is
entitled to a medicare supplement policy as follows:
(a) A person eligible under subsection (3)(a), (b), (c), and (d) of
this section is entitled to a medicare supplement policy that has a
benefit package classified as plan A through ((G)) F (including F with
a high deductible), K, or L, offered by any issuer;
(b)(i) Subject to (b)(ii) of this subsection, a person eligible
under subsection (3)(e) of this section is entitled to the same
medicare supplement policy in which the individual was most recently
previously enrolled, if available from the same issuer, or, if not so
available, a policy described in (a) of this subsection; ((and))
(ii) After December 31, 2005, if the individual was most recently
enrolled in a medicare supplement policy with an outpatient
prescription drug benefit, a medicare supplement policy described in
this subsection (4)(b)(ii) is:
(A) The policy available from the same issuer but modified to
remove outpatient prescription drug coverage; or
(B) At the election of the policyholder, an A, B, C, F (including
F with a high deductible), K, or L policy that is offered by any
issuer;
(c) A person eligible under subsection (3)(f) of this section is
entitled to any medicare supplement policy offered by any issuer; and
(d) A person eligible under subsection (3)(g) of this section is
entitled to a medicare supplement policy that has a benefit package
classified as plan A, B, C, F (including F with a high deductible), K,
or L and that is offered and is available for issuance to new enrollees
by the same issuer that issued the individual's medicare supplement
policy with outpatient prescription drug coverage.
(5)(a) At the time of an event described in subsection (3) of this
section, and because of which an individual loses coverage or benefits
due to the termination of a contract, agreement, policy, or plan, the
organization that terminates the contract or agreement, the issuer
terminating the policy, or the administrator of the plan being
terminated, respectively, must notify the individual of his or her
rights under this section, and of the obligations of issuers of
medicare supplement policies under subsection (1) of this section. The
notice must be communicated contemporaneously with the notification of
termination.
(b) At the time of an event described in subsection (3) of this
section, and because of which an individual ceases enrollment under a
contract, agreement, policy, or plan, the organization that offers the
contract or agreement, regardless of the basis for the cessation of
enrollment, the issuer offering the policy, or the administrator of the
plan, respectively, must notify the individual of his or her rights
under this section, and of the obligations of issuers of medicare
supplement policies under subsection (1) of this section. The notice
must be communicated within ten working days of the issuer receiving
notification of disenrollment.
(6) Guaranteed issue time periods:
(a) In the case of an individual described in subsection (3)(a) of
this section, the guaranteed issue period begins on the later of: (i)
The date the individual receives a notice of termination or cessation
of all supplemental health benefits (or, if a notice is not received,
notice that a claim has been denied because of a termination or
cessation), or (ii) the date that the applicable coverage terminates or
ceases, and ends sixty-three days thereafter;
(b) In the case of an individual described in subsection (3)(b),
(c), (e), or (f) of this section whose enrollment is terminated
involuntarily, the guaranteed issue period begins on the date that the
individual receives a notice of termination and ends sixty-three days
after the date the applicable coverage is terminated;
(c) In the case of an individual described in subsection (3)(d)(i)
of this section, the guaranteed issue period begins on the earlier of:
(i) The date that the individual receives a notice of termination, a
notice of the issuer's bankruptcy or insolvency, or other such similar
notice if any, and (ii) the date that the applicable coverage is
terminated, and ends on the date that is sixty-three days after the
date the coverage is terminated;
(d) In the case of an individual described in subsection (3)(b),
(d)(ii) and (iii), (e), or (f) of this section, who disenrolls
voluntarily, the guaranteed issue period begins on the date that is
sixty days before the effective date of the disenrollment and ends on
the date that is sixty-three days after the effective date;
(e) In the case of an individual described in subsection (3)(g) of
this section, the guaranteed issue period begins on the date the
individual receives notice pursuant to section 1882(v)(2)(B) of the
federal social security act from the medicare supplement issuer during
the sixty-day period immediately preceding the initial part D
enrollment period and ends on the date that is sixty-three days after
the effective date of the individual's coverage under medicare part D;
and
(f) In the case of an individual described in subsection (3) of
this section but not described in the preceding provisions of this
subsection, the guaranteed issue period begins on the effective date of
disenrollment and ends on the date that is sixty-three days after the
effective date.
(7) In the case of an individual described in subsection (3)(e) of
this section whose enrollment with an organization or provider
described in subsection (3)(e)(i) of this section is involuntarily
terminated within the first twelve months of enrollment, and who,
without an intervening enrollment, enrolls with another organization or
provider, the subsequent enrollment is an initial enrollment as
described in subsection (3)(e) of this section.
(8) In the case of an individual described in subsection (3)(f) of
this section whose enrollment with a plan or in a program described in
subsection (3)(f) of this section is involuntarily terminated within
the first twelve months of enrollment, and who, without an intervening
enrollment, enrolls in another plan or program, the subsequent
enrollment is an initial enrollment as described in subsection (3)(f)
of this section.
(9) For purposes of subsection (3)(e) and (f) of this section, an
enrollment of an individual with an organization or provider described
in subsection (3)(e)(i) of this section, or with a plan or in a program
described in subsection (3)(f) of this section is not an initial
enrollment under this subsection after the two-year period beginning on
the date on which the individual first enrolled with such an
organization, provider, plan, or program.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.66.130 and 2002 c 300 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On or after January 1, 1996, and notwithstanding any other
provision of Title 48 RCW, a medicare supplement policy or certificate
shall not exclude or limit benefits for losses incurred more than three
months from the effective date of coverage because it involved a
preexisting condition.
(2) On or after January 1, 1996, a medicare supplement policy or
certificate shall not define a preexisting condition more restrictively
than as a condition for which medical advice was given or treatment was
recommended by or received from a physician, or other health care
provider acting within the scope of his or her license, within three
months before the effective date of coverage.
(3) If a medicare supplement insurance policy or certificate
contains any limitations with respect to preexisting conditions, such
limitations must appear as a separate paragraph of the policy or
certificate and be labeled as "Preexisting Condition Limitations."
(4) No exclusion or limitation of preexisting conditions may be
applied to policies or certificates replaced in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 48.66.045 if the policy or certificate replaced had
been in effect for at least three months.
(5) If a medicare supplement policy or certificate replaces another
medicare supplement policy or certificate, the replacing issuer shall
waive any time periods applicable to preexisting conditions, waiting
periods, elimination periods, and probationary periods in the new
medicare supplement policy or certificate for similar benefits to the
extent such time was spent under the original policy.
(6) If a medicare supplement policy or certificate replaces another
medicare supplement policy or certificate which has been in effect for
at least three months, the replacing policy shall not provide any time
period applicable to preexisting conditions, waiting periods,
elimination periods, and probationary periods for benefits similar to
those contained in the original policy or certificate.

--- END ---