BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The public employees' benefits board, under
chapter 41.05 RCW, shall study alternatives for the provision of a high
deductible health plan and health savings accounts for employees that
conform to section 223, Part VII of subchapter B of chapter 1 of the
internal revenue code of 1986.
The board shall submit a report to the legislature by December 1,
2005, on options for implementation of a pilot program and a full scale
offering. The board's report shall include estimates of the fiscal
impact of each option.

--- END ---