BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that a recent
United States geological survey of hydrology in the Methow river basin
determined that the artificial recharge of Twin Lakes aquifer and
surface waters would likely provide environmental benefits to the
Methow river during critical periods of low flow. The legislature also
finds that a department of ecology funded assessment indicates that a
significant portion of the current decline in aquifer levels in the
Twin Lakes basin is the result of irrigation transportation
efficiencies implemented by Wolf Creek reclamation district. The
legislature therefore intends that a pilot project be conducted to
determine the best approach to restore aquifer levels, and the
associated environmental benefits, and to study the potential role of
artificial recharge in meeting the existing needs of people and the
environment in the Methow river basin by temporarily putting water into
Barnsley and Big Twin Lakes and the aquifer in continuity with the
lakes.
(2) The legislature directs the department of ecology, in
cooperation with the United States geological survey and the bureau of
reclamation, to conduct a Twin Lakes restoration pilot project and to
make diligent efforts to: (a) Locate the most appropriate source or
sources of water; (b) utilize appropriate water right mechanisms to
permit the temporary use of that water; (c) restore Barnsley and Twin
Lakes surface waters and the aquifer in continuity with the lakes to an
elevation of one thousand seven hundred ninety-six feet (up to but not
exceeding the dead tree line) utilizing methods such as ground water
injection and direct introduction of water into Barnsley and Big Twin
Lakes; (d) maintain such levels, with a fluctuation of no more than two
feet below the prescribed elevation; and (e) measure and study the
resulting hydrological effects of such a recharge within the Methow
river basin and the Twin Lakes basin.
(3) Before December 1, 2005, and December 1, 2006, the department
of ecology shall provide reports to the appropriate legislative
committees summarizing the progress of the pilot project. Before June
30, 2007, the department of ecology shall provide a report of
hydrological findings to the appropriate legislative committees.
(4) Temporary water right permits issued for the Twin Lakes
restoration pilot project terminate June 30, 2007, or upon the
department of ecology's issuance or denial of a permanent water right
for Twin Lakes restoration, whichever occurs first.

--- END ---