BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 60.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any owner of property subject to a recorded claim of lien under
this chapter, or contractor, subcontractor, lender, or lien claimant
who believes the claim of lien to be frivolous and made without
reasonable cause, or clearly excessive may apply by motion to the
superior court for the county where the property is located, for an
order directing the lien claimant to appear before the court at a time
no earlier than six nor later than fifteen days following the date of
service of the application and order on the lien claimant, and show
cause, if any he or she has, why the relief requested should not be
granted. The motion shall state the grounds upon which relief is
asked, and shall be supported by the affidavit of the applicant or his
or her attorney setting forth a concise statement of the facts upon
which the motion is based.
(2) The order shall clearly state that if the lien claimant fails
to appear at the time and place noted the lien shall be released, with
prejudice, and that the lien claimant shall be ordered to pay the costs
requested by the applicant including reasonable attorneys' fees.
(3) If no action to foreclose the lien claim has been filed, the
clerk of the court shall assign a cause number to the application and
obtain from the applicant a filing fee of thirty-five dollars. If an
action has been filed to foreclose the lien claim, the application
shall be made a part of that action.
(4) The applicant must give notice of the hearing to the lien
claimant by providing copies of the motion, order, and any other
documents filed with the court, to the lien claimant by first class
mail, by certified or registered mail, or by personal service.
(5) If, following a hearing on the matter, the court determines
that the lien is frivolous and made without reasonable cause, or
clearly excessive, the court shall issue an order releasing the lien if
frivolous and made without reasonable cause, or reducing the lien if
clearly excessive, and awarding costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to
the applicant to be paid by the lien claimant. If the court determines
that the lien is not frivolous and was made with reasonable cause, and
is not clearly excessive, the court shall issue an order so stating and
awarding costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to the lien claimant to
be paid by the applicant.
(6) Proceedings under this section shall not affect other rights
and remedies available to the parties under this chapter or otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 60.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of licensing, and the department's agents and
subagents, shall not transfer title of a vehicle through the chattel
lien process under this chapter and chapter 60.10 RCW unless an
affidavit of sale and the following documentation is submitted: (1) A
certified copy of the lien filing that is filed with the county
auditor; (2) a copy of the letter, sent by the lien claimant via first
class mail, and certified or registered mail, including the return
receipt, to the address of the current registered owner notifying the
current registered owner of the lien filing; and (3) an affidavit of
service by mail.

Sec. 3 RCW 60.10.030 and 1969 c 82 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A lien foreclosure authorized by RCW 60.10.020 may be summarily
foreclosed by notice and sale as provided herein. The lien holder may
sell, or otherwise dispose of the collateral in its then condition or
following any commercially reasonable preparation or processing. The
proceeds of disposition shall be applied in the order following to
(a) the reasonable expenses of retaking, holding, preparing for
sale, selling and the like and, to the extent provided for in the
agreement and not prohibited by law, the reasonable attorneys' fees and
legal expenses incurred by the secured party;
(b) the satisfaction of indebtedness secured by the lien under
which the disposition is made;
(c) the satisfaction of indebtedness secured by any subordinate
security interest in the collateral if written notification of demand
therefor is received before distribution of the proceeds is completed.
If requested by the lien holder, the holder of a subordinate security
interest must seasonably furnish reasonable proof of his or her
interest, and unless ((he does so)) that is done, the lien holder need
not comply with ((his)) that demand.
(2) The lien holder must account to the lien debtor for any
surplus, and, unless otherwise agreed, the lien debtor is not liable
for any deficiency.
(3) Disposition of the collateral may be by public or private
proceedings and may be made by way of one or more contracts. Sale or
other disposition may be as a unit or in parcels and at any time and
place and on any terms but every aspect of the disposition including
the method, manner, time, place and terms must be commercially
reasonable which shall be construed as provided in RCW 60.10.070.
Unless collateral is perishable or threatens to decline speedily in
value or is of a type customarily sold on a recognized market,
reasonable notification of the time and place of any public sale or
reasonable notification of the time after which any private sale or
other intended disposition is to be made shall be sent by the lien
holder to the lien debtor, by first class mail, and registered or
certified mail, and except in the case of consumer goods to any other
person who has a security interest in the collateral and who has duly
filed a financing statement indexed in the name of the lien debtor in
this state or who is known by the lien holder to have a security
interest in the collateral. The lien holder may buy at any public sale
and if the collateral is of a type customarily sold in a recognized
market or is of a type which is the subject of widely distributed
standard price quotations he or she may buy at private sale. Before
accepting any bid or offer for purchase, the lien holder shall inform
the bidder or purchaser of the existence of any prior lien or security
interest in the collateral, and the identity of the holder of the prior
lien or security interest. If the lien holder does not know this
information, he or she shall advise the prospective purchaser of that.

Sec. 4 RCW 60.10.040 and 1995 c 62 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
When a lien is foreclosed in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter, the disposition transfers to a purchaser for value all of the
lien debtor's rights therein, discharges the lien under which it is
made and any security interest or lien subordinate thereto. The
purchaser takes free of all such rights and interests even though the
lien holder fails to comply with the requirements of this chapter:
(1) In the case of a public sale, if the purchaser has no knowledge
of any defects in the sale and if he or she does not buy in collusion
with the lien holder, other bidders, or the person conducting the sale;
or
(2) In any other case, if the purchaser acts in good faith.
The purchaser takes subject to any security interest or lien that
is superior to the lien under which the sale is made. In the case of
property that is subject to a certificate of title, the department of
licensing and the department's agents and subagents shall not transfer
title through this process unless the new certificate of title reflects
the security interest that is superior to the lien under which the sale
is made. If a new certificate of title is issued that does not reflect
the security interest that is superior to the lien under which the sale
is made, the holder of such interest may request and obtain from the
department of licensing a replacement certificate of title reflecting
such security interest, and showing the purchaser as the registered
owner. The department of licensing shall notify the purchaser of the
issuance of any replacement title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect October 1, 2006.

--- END ---