BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Expenses incurred by a newly elected county officer before taking
office that relate to a course of training and education pertaining to
the administration and operations of county government, including the
reasonable costs of housing, travel, and meals, may be paid from public
funds appropriated for those purposes. All expenses not paid for by
state funds may be paid from funds of the county where that official
was elected or appointed.

--- END ---