BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.24.020 and 1955 c 303 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
The lives of a group of individuals may be insured under a policy
issued to an employer, or to the trustees of a fund established by an
employer, which employer or trustee is deemed the policyholder,
insuring employees of the employer for the benefit of persons other
than the employer, subject to the following requirements:
(1) The employees eligible for insurance under the policy shall be
all of the employees of the employer, or all of any class or classes
thereof determined by conditions pertaining to their employment. The
policy may provide that the term "employees" shall include the
employees of one or more subsidiary corporations, and the employees,
individual proprietors, and partners of one or more affiliated
corporations, proprietors or partnerships if the business of the
employer and of such affiliated corporations, proprietors or
partnerships is under common control through stock ownership, contract
or otherwise. The policy may provide that the term "employees" shall
include the individual proprietor or partners if the employer is an
individual proprietor or a partnership. The policy may provide that
the term "employees" shall include retired employees.
(2) The premium for the policy shall be paid by the policyholder,
either wholly from the employer's funds or funds contributed by him or
her, or partly from such funds and partly from funds contributed by the
insured employees, or from funds contributed entirely by the insured
employees. ((No policy may be issued on which the entire premium is to
be derived from funds contributed by the insured employees. A policy
on which part of the premium is to be derived from funds contributed by
the insured employees may be placed in force only if at least seventy-five percent of the then eligible employees, excluding any as to whom
evidence of individual insurability is not satisfactory to the insurer,
elect to make the required contributions.)) A policy on which no part
of the premium is to be derived from funds contributed by the insured
employees must insure all eligible employees, or all except any as to
whom evidence of individual insurability is not satisfactory to the
insurer.
(3) The policy must cover at least ((ten)) two employees at date of
issue.
(4) The amounts of insurance under the policy must be based upon
some plan precluding individual selection either by the employees or by
the employer or trustees.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.24.030 and 1993 c 132 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Insurance under any group life insurance policy issued pursuant
to RCW 48.24.020, or 48.24.050, or 48.24.060, or 48.24.070 or 48.24.090
may((, if seventy-five percent of the then insured employees or labor
union members or public employee association members or members of the
Washington state patrol elect,)) be extended to insure the spouse and
dependent children, or any class or classes thereof, of each such
insured employee or member who so elects, in amounts in accordance with
a plan which precludes individual selection by the employees or members
or by the employer or labor union or trustee, and which insurance on
the life of any one family member including a spouse shall not be in
excess of ((fifty percent of the insurance on the life of the insured
employee or member)) the amount purchased by the insured employee.
Premiums for the insurance on such family members shall be paid by
the policyholder, either from the employer's funds ((or)), funds
contributed ((by)) to him or her, employee's funds, trustee's funds, or
labor union funds((, and/or from funds contributed by the insured
employees or members, or from both)).
(2) Such a spouse insured pursuant to this section shall have the
same conversion right as to the insurance on his or her life as is
vested in the employee or member under this chapter.

--- END ---