BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Too many families with children in Washington are unable to
afford shelter, clothing, and other necessities of life; basic
necessities that are at the core of economic security and family
stability.
(2) Parents who lack resources for shelter, clothing, and
transportation are less likely to obtain employment or have the ability
to adequately provide for their children's physical and emotional well-being and educational success.
(3) Washington's temporary assistance for needy families helps
financially struggling families find jobs, keep their jobs, get better
jobs, and build a better life for their children through the WorkFirst
program.
(4) Participation in the WorkFirst program through temporary
assistance for needy families is an important step towards self-sufficiency and decreased long-term reliance on governmental
assistance.
(5) Removing this barrier to participation in temporary assistance
for needy families and WorkFirst will serve to strengthen families and
communities throughout the state.
(6) Preventing even one percent of these individuals from
reoffending by extending economic and employment opportunities will
result in law enforcement and correctional savings that substantially
exceed the cost of temporary assistance for needy families and
WorkFirst services.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.08.025 and 2004 c 54 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Public assistance may be awarded to any applicant:
(a) Who is in need and otherwise meets the eligibility requirements
of department assistance programs; and
(b) Who has not made a voluntary assignment of property or cash for
the purpose of qualifying for an assistance grant; and
(c) Who is not an inmate of a public institution except as a
patient in a medical institution or except as an inmate in a public
institution who could qualify for federal aid assistance: PROVIDED,
That the assistance paid by the department to recipients in nursing
homes, or receiving nursing home care, may cover the cost of clothing
and incidentals and general maintenance exclusive of medical care and
health services. The department may pay a grant to cover the cost of
clothing and personal incidentals in public or private medical
institutions and institutions for tuberculosis. The department shall
allow recipients in nursing homes to retain, in addition to the grant
to cover the cost of clothing and incidentals, wages received for work
as a part of a training or rehabilitative program designed to prepare
the recipient for less restrictive placement to the extent permitted
under Title XIX of the federal social security act.
(2) Any person otherwise qualified for temporary assistance for
needy families under this title who has resided in the state of
Washington for fewer than twelve consecutive months immediately
preceding application for assistance is limited to the benefit level in
the state in which the person resided immediately before Washington,
using the eligibility rules and other definitions established under
this chapter, that was obtainable on the date of application in
Washington state, if the benefit level of the prior state is lower than
the level provided to similarly situated applicants in Washington
state. The benefit level under this subsection shall be in effect for
the first twelve months a recipient is on temporary assistance for
needy families in Washington state.
(3) Any person otherwise qualified for temporary assistance for
needy families who is assessed through the state alcohol and substance
abuse program as drug or alcohol-dependent and requiring treatment to
become employable shall be required by the department to participate in
a drug or alcohol treatment program as a condition of benefit receipt.
(4) ((In order to be eligible for temporary assistance for needy
families benefits, any applicant with a felony conviction after August
21, 1996, involving drug use or possession, must: (a) Have been
assessed as chemically dependent by a chemical dependency program
approved under chapter 70.96A RCW and be participating in or have
completed a coordinated rehabilitation plan consisting of chemical
dependency treatment and vocational services; and (b) have not been
convicted of a felony involving drug use or possession in the three
years prior to the most current conviction.
(5))) Pursuant to 21 U.S.C. 862a(d)(1), the department shall exempt
individuals from the eligibility restrictions of 21 U.S.C. 862a(a)(1)
and (2) to ensure eligibility for temporary assistance for needy
families benefits and federal food assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect September 1, 2005.

--- END ---