BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All waters of the state as defined in chapter 90.48 RCW may be
used to fight forest fires, range fires, or fires of a similar nature.
No agency of the state nor any local government may require prior
approval for this use nor may any conditions be placed on such use of
public waters.
(2) This policy regarding unrestricted use of state waters shall be
part of all levels of fire fighting training programs. All state and
local governments shall inform persons involved with fire suppression
of the ability to use any public waters for fire control.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 76.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All waters of the state as defined in chapter 90.48 RCW may be
used to fight forest fires, range fires, or fires of a similar nature.
No agency of the state nor any local government may require prior
approval for this use nor may any conditions be placed on such use of
public waters.
(2) This policy regarding unrestricted use of state waters shall be
part of all levels of fire fighting training programs. All state and
local governments shall inform persons involved with fire suppression
of the ability to use any public waters for fire control.

--- END ---