BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall protect gray wolves and develop management
programs on publicly owned lands that will encourage the natural
regeneration of gray wolves in areas with suitable habitat. Gray
wolves may not be transplanted, augmented, or introduced into the
state. Only gray wolves that are native to Washington state may be
utilized by the department for management programs. The department is
directed to fully participate in all discussions and negotiations with
federal and state agencies relating to the management of gray wolves
and shall fully communicate, support, and implement the policies of
this section.
(2)(a) For any person or circumstance, whether or not subject to
the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the provisions of
this subsection (2) apply.
(b) A person releasing a gray wolf within Washington state's
borders, or near our state or international borders with full knowledge
that the natural range of the gray wolf released may extend into
Washington state, shall:
(i) Implant each gray wolf to be released with a microchip
containing, at a minimum, the following specific information for that
particular gray wolf: (A) The date and location, by township, range,
and section, of original capture; (B) the date and location, by
township, range, and section, of any release or planned release; and
(C) labeling methods and information to facilitate tracking of the DNA
sample obtained from that particular gray wolf.
(ii) Obtain, and transmit in a timely manner to the director, a DNA
sample from each gray wolf to be released, along with documentation
providing the following specific information for that particular gray
wolf: (A) The date and location, by township, range, and section, of
original capture; (B) the date and location, by township, range, and
section, of any subsequent, actual release; (C) the type and location
of the microchip planted; and (D) labeling methods and information to
facilitate tracking of the DNA sample obtained from that particular
gray wolf.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---