BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95.040 and 1991 c 319 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created a solid waste advisory committee to provide
consultation to the department of ecology concerning matters covered by
this chapter. The committee shall advise on the development of
programs and regulations for solid and dangerous waste handling,
resource recovery, and recycling, and shall supply recommendations
concerning methods by which existing solid and dangerous waste
handling, resource recovery, and recycling practices and the laws
authorizing them may be supplemented and improved.
(2) The committee shall consist of at least eleven members,
including the assistant director for waste management programs within
the department. The director shall appoint members with due regard to
the interests of the public, local government, tribes, agriculture,
industry, public health, recycling industries, solid waste collection
industries, ((and)) resource recovery industries, and nonprofit
organizations collecting reusable materials to support charitable
programs. The term of appointment shall be determined by the director.
The committee shall elect its own chair and meet at least four times a
year, in accordance with such rules of procedure as it shall establish.
Members shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be
reimbursed their travel expenses while engaged in business of the
committee in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now
existing or hereafter amended.
(3) The committee shall each year recommend to the governor a
recipient for a "governor's award of excellence" which the governor
shall award for outstanding achievement by an industry, company, or
individual in the area of hazardous waste or solid waste management.

--- END ---