BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging in this state in the business of
providing staffing services; as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(2) For the purpose of this section, "staffing services" means an
arrangement in which the taxpayer recruits and hires employees from the
labor market and assigns them on a temporary basis to perform services
for another to support, or supplement, the customer's work force, or to
provide assistance in special work situations such as employee
absences, skill shortages, and seasonal workloads, or to perform
special assignments or projects, all under the direction and
supervision of the customer. "Staffing services" does not include
permanent employee leasing or permanent employee placement services.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.460 and 2004 c 174 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person rendering services taxable under RCW 82.04.290
((or)), 82.04.2908, or section 1 of this act and maintaining places of
business both within and without this state which contribute to the
rendition of such services shall, for the purpose of computing tax
liability under RCW 82.04.290 ((or)), 82.04.2908, or section 1 of this
act, apportion to this state that portion of the person's gross income
which is derived from services rendered within this state. Where such
apportionment cannot be accurately made by separate accounting methods,
the taxpayer shall apportion to this state that proportion of the
taxpayer's total income which the cost of doing business within the
state bears to the total cost of doing business both within and without
the state.
(2) Notwithstanding the provision of subsection (1) of this
section, persons doing business both within and without the state who
receive gross income from service charges, as defined in RCW 63.14.010
(relating to amounts charged for granting the right or privilege to
make deferred or installment payments) or who receive gross income from
engaging in business as financial institutions within the scope of
chapter 82.14A RCW (relating to city taxes on financial institutions)
shall apportion or allocate gross income taxable under RCW 82.04.290 to
this state pursuant to rules promulgated by the department consistent
with uniform rules for apportionment or allocation developed by the
states.
(3) The department shall by rule provide a method or methods of
apportioning or allocating gross income derived from sales of telephone
services taxed under this chapter, if the gross proceeds of sales
subject to tax under this chapter do not fairly represent the extent of
the taxpayer's income attributable to this state. The rules shall be,
so far as feasible, consistent with the methods of apportionment
contained in this section and shall require the consideration of those
facts, circumstances, and apportionment factors as will result in an
equitable and constitutionally permissible division of the services.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.190 and 2004 c 174 s 4 and 2004 c 2 s 8 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
"Consumer" means the following:
(1) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any
article of tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the
person's business and including, among others, without limiting the
scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve,
construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers
other than for the purpose (a) of resale as tangible personal property
in the regular course of business or (b) of incorporating such property
as an ingredient or component of real or personal property when
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving,
constructing, or decorating such real or personal property of or for
consumers or (c) of consuming such property in producing for sale a new
article of tangible personal property or a new substance, of which such
property becomes an ingredient or component or as a chemical used in
processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a
chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new
article being produced for sale or (d) purchases for the purpose of
consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is
subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary
purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon;
(2)(a) Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.290 or 82.04.2908; (b) any person who purchases, acquires, or
uses any telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than for
resale in the regular course of business; (c) any person who purchases,
acquires, or uses any service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a) or any
amusement and recreation service defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), other
than for resale in the regular course of business; ((and)) (d) any
person who is an end user of software; and (e) any person who
purchases, acquires, or uses staffing services to perform any service
defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050;
(3) Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the
building, repairing or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington or by
the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or
vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind as
defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of
such publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right of
way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle by installing, placing or spreading the property in
or upon the right of way of such street, place, road, highway,
easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in or upon the site of such
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility;
(4) Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of
possession to or an easement in real property which is being
constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or otherwise altered by a
person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal corporations
or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and services
rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road
purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and
county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82
RCW in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property.
Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this definition
shall be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";
(5) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession to personal property which is being constructed, repaired,
improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered by a person engaged
in business;
(6) Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created
pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing land
and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality
thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to
chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person shall be a consumer within the
meaning of this subsection in respect to tangible personal property
incorporated into, installed in, or attached to such building or other
structure by such person, except that consumer does not include any
person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating,
or improving new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon,
or above real property of or for the United States, or any
instrumentality thereof, if the investment project would qualify for
sales and use tax deferral under chapter 82.63 RCW if undertaken by a
private entity;
(7) Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the
rental of which is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under
RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or charge made for
tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the
machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful
life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other
subsection of this section shall be construed to modify any other
definition of "consumer"; and
(8) Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other
byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and development.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.290 and 2004 c 174 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal
to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business
multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business
activity other than ((or in addition to those enumerated in RCW
82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250, 82.04.255, 82.04.260, 82.04.270,
82.04.298, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280, 82.04.2907, 82.04.272, 82.04.2906,
and 82.04.2908, and)) an activity taxed explicitly under another
section in this chapter or subsection (1) of this section; as to such
persons the amount of tax on account of such activities shall be equal
to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 1.5
percent.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section includes, among others, and
without limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to materials
used in the performance of such business passes to another by
accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged
in the business of rendering any type of service which does not
constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of
advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials
furnished to an agent by his principal or supplier to be used for
informational, educational and promotional purposes shall not be
considered a part of the agent's remuneration or commission and shall
not be subject to taxation under this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.08.054 and 2003 c 168 s 210 are each amended to
read as follows:
Sellers, or buyers remitting tax directly to the department, shall
compute the tax due under this chapter and chapters 82.12 and 82.14 RCW
by carrying the computation to the third decimal place and rounding to
a whole cent using a method that rounds up to the next cent whenever
the third decimal place is greater than four. Sellers may elect to
compute the tax due on a transaction on an item or an invoice basis.
This rounding rule shall be applied to the aggregated state and local
taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
Persons providing staffing services as defined in section 1 of this
act are not liable to collect and remit the retail sales tax to the
department when performing services that are defined as a retail sale.
The consumer of such staffing services shall be required to remit the
sales tax on the sale of or charges for the staffing services directly
to the department.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.08.050 and 2003 c 168 s 203, 2003 c 76 s 3, and
2003 c 53 s 400 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 6 of this act, the tax hereby
imposed shall be paid by the buyer to the seller, and each seller shall
collect from the buyer the full amount of the tax payable in respect to
each taxable sale in accordance with the schedule of collections
adopted by the department pursuant to the provisions of RCW 82.08.060.
(2) The tax required by this chapter, to be collected by the
seller, shall be deemed to be held in trust by the seller until paid to
the department, and any seller who appropriates or converts the tax
collected to his or her own use or to any use other than the payment of
the tax to the extent that the money required to be collected is not
available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(3) In case any seller fails to collect the tax herein imposed or,
having collected the tax, fails to pay it to the department in the
manner prescribed by this chapter, whether such failure is the result
of his or her own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond his
or her control, he or she shall, nevertheless, be personally liable to
the state for the amount of the tax, unless the seller has taken from
the buyer a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470, a copy of a direct
pay permit issued under RCW 82.32.087, information required under the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement, or information required under
rules adopted by the department. Sellers shall not be relieved from
personal liability for the amount of the tax unless they maintain
proper records of exempt transactions and provide them to the
department when requested.
(4) The amount of tax, until paid by the buyer to the seller or to
the department, shall constitute a debt from the buyer to the seller
and any seller who fails or refuses to collect the tax as required with
intent to violate the provisions of this chapter or to gain some
advantage or benefit, either direct or indirect, and any buyer who
refuses to pay any tax due under this chapter is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
(5) The tax required by this chapter to be collected by the seller
shall be stated separately from the selling price in any sales invoice
or other instrument of sale. On all retail sales through vending
machines, the tax need not be stated separately from the selling price
or collected separately from the buyer. For purposes of determining
the tax due from the buyer to the seller, or the department, and from
the seller to the department it shall be conclusively presumed that the
selling price quoted in any price list, sales document, contract or
other agreement between the parties does not include the tax imposed by
this chapter, but if the seller advertises the price as including the
tax or that the seller is paying the tax, the advertised price shall
not be considered the selling price, except in cases where the buyer is
required to pay the tax directly to the department.
(6) Where a buyer has failed to pay to the seller the tax imposed
by this chapter and the seller has not paid the amount of the tax to
the department, the department may, in its discretion, proceed directly
against the buyer for collection of the tax, in which case a penalty of
ten percent may be added to the amount of the tax for failure of the
buyer to pay the same to the seller, regardless of when the tax may be
collected by the department; and all of the provisions of chapter 82.32
RCW, including those relative to interest and penalties, shall apply in
addition; and, for the sole purpose of applying the various provisions
of chapter 82.32 RCW, the twenty-fifth day of the month following the
tax period in which the purchase was made shall be considered as the
due date of the tax.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (6) of this section,
any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by
this chapter if:
(a) The person's activities in this state, whether conducted
directly or through another person, are limited to:
(i) The storage, dissemination, or display of advertising;
(ii) The taking of orders; or
(iii) The processing of payments; and
(b) The activities are conducted electronically via a web site on
a server or other computer equipment located in Washington that is not
owned or operated by the person making sales into this state nor owned
or operated by an affiliated person. "Affiliated persons" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.424.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section expires when: (a) The United
States congress grants individual states the authority to impose sales
and use tax collection duties on remote sellers; or (b) it is
determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a judgment not
subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use tax collection
duties on remote sellers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act applies to staffing services, as
defined in section 1 of this act, rendered on or after April 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---