BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.19.565 and 1998 c 111 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of general administration shall establish a motor
vehicle transportation service which is hereby empowered to:
(1) Provide suitable motor vehicle transportation services to any
state agency on either a temporary or permanent basis upon requisition
from a state agency and upon such demonstration of need as the
department may require;
(2) Provide motor pools for the use of state agencies located in
the Olympia ((and Seattle)) area((s)) and such additional motor pools
at other locations in the state as may be necessary to provide
economic, efficient, and effective motor vehicle transportation
services to state agencies. Such additional motor pools may be under
either the direct control of the department or under the supervision of
another state agency by agreement with the department;
(3) Establish an equitable schedule of rental and mileage charges
to agencies for motor vehicle transportation services furnished which
shall be designed to provide funds to cover replacement of vehicles
after one hundred twenty thousand miles of use, working capital
reserves, and to recover the actual total costs of motor pool
operations including but not limited to vehicle operation expense,
depreciation expense, interest and other financing expenses, overhead,
and nonrecoverable collision or other damage to vehicles((. Additions
to capital such as the purchase of additional vehicles shall be
budgeted and purchased from funds appropriated for such purposes under
such procedures as may be provided by law; and));
(4) Adopt a vehicle retention policy that retains vehicles until at
least one hundred twenty thousand miles of use. The vehicle retention
policy shall specify the extent of damage to a vehicle that would
require disposal prior to one hundred twenty thousand miles of use.
Disposal of vehicles without significant damage prior to one hundred
twenty thousand miles of use shall occur only after the department can
demonstrate in a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature that earlier disposal of vehicles will reduce routine
maintenance and repair costs and/or increase resale price sufficient to
reduce the rates charged to state agencies. The reduced rates cited in
this report shall be used in subsequent budget requests for the
department; and
(5) Establish guidelines, procedures, and standards for fleet
operations that other state agencies and institutions of higher
education may adopt. The guidelines, procedures, and standards shall
be consistent with and carry out the objectives of any general policies
adopted by the office of financial management under RCW 43.41.130.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.19.615 and 1998 c 105 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director of general administration shall deposit in the general
administration services account all receipts, including the initial
transfer of automobile pool capital from the highway equipment fund and
any other funds transferred, rentals or other fees and charges for
transportation services furnished, proceeds from the sale of surplus or
replaced property under the control of the supervisor of motor
transport and other income, and from which shall be paid operating
costs, including salaries and wages, administrative expense, overhead,
the cost of replacement vehicles, additional passenger vehicles
((authorized pursuant to RCW 43.19.565)), and any other expenses. ((If
it is necessary at any time for the department to request any
appropriation from the general fund or various dedicated, revolving, or
trust funds to purchase additional vehicles, any appropriation therefor
may provide that such advance shall be repaid together with reasonable
interest from surpluses of the general administration services
account.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 43.19.605 (Motor vehicle transportation
service -- Reimbursement for property transferred -- Credits -- Accounting--Disputes) and 1998 c 105 s 11, 1989 c 57 s 6, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 167 s
11 are each repealed.

--- END ---