BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 73.04.150 and 2001 c 268 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby created a joint committee on veterans' and
military affairs. The committee shall consist of: (a) Eight members
of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, four of whom
shall be members of the majority party and four of whom shall be
members of the minority party; and (b) eight members of the house of
representatives appointed by the speaker, four of whom shall be members
of the majority party and four of whom shall be members of the minority
party. Members of the committee shall be appointed before the close of
the ((2001)) 2005 legislative session, and before the close of each
regular session during an odd-numbered year thereafter.
(2) Each member's term of office shall run from the close of the
session in which he or she was appointed until the close of the next
regular session held in an odd-numbered year. If a successor is not
appointed during a session, the member's term shall continue until the
member is reappointed or a successor is appointed. The term of office
for a committee member who does not continue as a member of the senate
or house of representatives shall cease upon the convening of the next
session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year after the
member's appointment, or upon the member's resignation, whichever is
earlier. Vacancies on the committee shall be filled by appointment in
the same manner as described in subsection (1) of this section. All
such vacancies shall be filled from the same political party and from
the same house as the member whose seat was vacated.
(3) The committee shall establish an executive committee of four
members ((representing the majority and minority caucuses of each)),
two of whom are members of the senate and two of whom are members of
the house of representatives. The executive committee shall appoint
one cochair from the two executive committee members who are senators
and one cochair from the two executive committee members who are
representatives. The two cochairs shall be from different political
parties and their terms of office shall run from the close of the
session in which they are appointed until the close of the next regular
session in an odd-numbered year. The executive committee is
responsible for performing all general administrative and personnel
duties assigned to it in the rules and procedures adopted by the joint
committee, as well as other duties delegated to it by the joint
committee.
(4) The joint committee on veterans' and military affairs has the
following powers and duties:
(a) To study veterans' issues, active military forces issues, and
national guard and reserve component issues, and make recommendations
to the legislature; and
(b) To study structure and administration of the department of
veterans affairs and the military department, and make recommendations
to the legislature.
(5) The joint committee shall adopt rules and procedures for its
orderly operation. The joint committee may create subcommittees to
perform duties under this section.
(((6) This section expires December 31, 2005.))

--- END ---