BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.77.020 and 1998 c 297 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At any and all stages of the proceedings pursuant to this
chapter, any person subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be
entitled to the assistance of counsel, and if the person is indigent
the court shall appoint counsel to assist him or her. A person may
waive his or her right to counsel; but such waiver shall only be
effective if a court makes a specific finding that he or she is or was
competent to so waive. In making such findings, the court shall be
guided but not limited by the following standards: Whether the person
attempting to waive the assistance of counsel, does so understanding:
(a) The nature of the charges;
(b) The statutory offense included within them;
(c) The range of allowable punishments thereunder;
(d) Possible defenses to the charges and circumstances in
mitigation thereof; and
(e) All other facts essential to a broad understanding of the whole
matter.
(2) Whenever any person is subjected to an examination pursuant to
any provision of this chapter, he or she may retain an expert or
professional person to perform an examination in his or her behalf. In
the case of a person who is indigent, the court shall upon his or her
request assist the person in obtaining an expert or professional person
to perform an examination or participate in the hearing on his or her
behalf. An expert or professional person obtained by an indigent
person pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be compensated
for his or her services out of funds of the department, in an amount
determined by the secretary to be fair and reasonable.
(3) Any time the defendant is being examined by court appointed
experts or professional persons pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter, the defendant shall be entitled to have his or her attorney
present. ((The defendant may refuse to answer any question if he or
she believes his or her answers may tend to incriminate him or her or
form links leading to evidence of an incriminating nature.))
(4) If a defendant refuses to answer questions or to participate in
good faith in an examination conducted in response to the defendant's
assertion of an insanity defense, the court shall exclude from evidence
at trial any testimony or evidence from any expert or professional
person obtained or retained by the defendant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to all examinations
performed on or after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---