BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.53.904 and 1965 ex.s. c 31 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person ((convicted of)) violating any of the provisions of
this chapter or the rules and regulations issued thereunder or who
shall impede, obstruct, hinder, or otherwise prevent or attempt to
prevent the department in the performance of its duty in connection
with the provisions of this chapter((, shall be adjudged guilty of a
misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than fifty dollars nor more
than one hundred dollars)) commits a class 2 civil infraction for the
first violation, and ((not less than two hundred dollars nor more than
five hundred dollars)) commits a class 1 civil infraction for a
subsequent violation. In all ((prosecutions)) adjudications under this
chapter involving the composition of a lot of commercial feed, a
certified copy of the official analysis signed by the department shall
be accepted as prima facie evidence of the composition.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the
department to report for ((prosecution)) adjudications or for the
institution of seizure proceedings as a result of minor violations of
this chapter when it believes that the public interest will be best
served by a suitable notice of warning in writing.
(3) It shall be the duty of each prosecuting attorney to whom any
violation is reported to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted
and ((prosecuted)) adjudicated in a court of competent jurisdiction
without delay. Before the department reports a violation for such
((prosecution)) adjudication, an opportunity shall be given the
distributor to present his or her view in writing or orally to the
department.
(4) The department is hereby authorized to apply for and the court
to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person
from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of this
chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter
notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law. ((Said)) Such
injunction to be issued without bond.

Sec. 2 RCW 16.52.095 and 1994 c 261 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall not be lawful for any person to cut off more than one-half
of the ear or ears of any domestic animal such as an ox, cow, bull,
calf, sheep, goat or hog, or dog, and any person cutting off more than
one-half of the ear or ears of any such animals, ((shall be deemed
guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be fined in any sum
less than twenty dollars)) commits a class 4 civil infraction. This
section does not apply if cutting off more than one-half of the ear of
the animal is a customary husbandry practice.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.32.180 and 1943 c 117 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person violating any provision of this chapter ((shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not
less than one hundred dollars)) commits a class 2 civil infraction for
the first offense, and ((not less than two hundred dollars for the
second and)) commits a class 1 civil infraction for each and every
subsequent offense, and each day that any violation continues shall
constitute a separate offense.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.76.110 and 2003 c 53 s 148 are each amended to read
as follows:
((It is hereby declared to be unlawful for)) Any person or persons
((hereafter)) who, without the written consent of the owner or owners
thereof, ((to)) fills with ale, porter, lager beer or soda, mineral
water or other beverages, for sale or to be furnished to customers, any
such casks, barrels, kegs, bottles or boxes so marked or stamped, or
((to)) sells, disposes of, buys or traffics in, or wantonly destroys
any such cask, barrel, keg, bottle or box so marked, stamped, by the
owner or owners thereof, after such owner or owners ((shall)) have
complied with the provisions of RCW 19.76.100 commits a class 1 civil
infraction.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.84.040 and 1907 c 253 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person, firm, or corporation who ((shall)) violates any of the
provisions of this chapter ((shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor,
and shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars nor more than one
thousand dollars for each offense)) commits a class 1 civil infraction.

Sec. 6 RCW 24.03.420 and 1969 ex.s. c 163 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each corporation, domestic or foreign, that fails or refuses to
answer truthfully and fully within the time prescribed by this chapter
interrogatories propounded by the secretary of state in accordance with
the provisions of this chapter((, shall be deemed to be guilty of a
misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof may be fined in any amount not
exceeding five hundred dollars)) commits a class 1 civil infraction.

Sec. 7 RCW 24.03.425 and 2004 c 265 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each director and officer of a corporation, domestic or foreign,
who fails or refuses within the time prescribed by this chapter to
answer truthfully and fully interrogatories propounded to him or her by
the secretary of state in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter, or who signs any articles, statement, report, application or
other record filed with the secretary of state which is known to such
officer or director to be false in any material respect, ((shall be
deemed to be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof may
be fined in any amount not exceeding five hundred dollars)) commits a
class 1 civil infraction.

Sec. 8 RCW 24.06.465 and 2003 c 53 s 165 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each corporation, domestic or foreign, ((which)) that fails or
refuses to file its annual report for any year within the time
prescribed by this chapter shall be subject to a penalty as established
and assessed by the secretary of state.
(2) Each corporation, domestic or foreign, ((which)) that fails or
refuses to answer truthfully and fully within the time prescribed by
this chapter any interrogatories propounded by the secretary of state
in accordance with the provisions of this chapter((, is guilty of a
misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined in an amount not
to exceed five hundred dollars)) commits a class 1 civil infraction on
each ((count)) violation.

Sec. 9 RCW 24.06.470 and 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 94 are each amended
to read as follows:
Each director and officer of a corporation, domestic or foreign,
who fails or refuses within the time prescribed by this chapter, to
answer truthfully and fully any interrogatories propounded to him or
her by the secretary of state in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter, or who signs any articles, statement, report, application, or
other document filed with the secretary of state, which is known to
such officer or director to be false in any material respect, ((shall
be deemed to be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof
shall be fined in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars))
commits a class 1 civil infraction on each ((count)) violation.

Sec. 10 RCW 26.04.110 and 1967 c 26 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person solemnizing a marriage, who shall willfully refuse or
neglect to make and deliver to the county auditor for record, the
certificates mentioned in RCW 26.04.090, within the time in such
section specified, ((shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon
conviction shall pay for such refusal, or neglect, a fine of not less
than twenty-five nor more than three hundred dollars)) commits a class
1 civil infraction.

Sec. 11 RCW 26.04.240 and Code 1881 s 2395 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who ((shall)) undertakes to join others in marriage
knowing that he or she is not lawfully authorized so to do, or any
person authorized to solemnize marriage, who shall join persons in
marriage contrary to the provisions of this chapter (chapter 26.04
RCW), ((shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not
more than five hundred, nor less than one hundred dollars)) commits a
class 1 civil infraction.

Sec. 12 RCW 28A.535.070 and 1985 c 7 s 90 are each amended to
read as follows:
When authorized to issue bonds, as provided in this chapter the
board of directors shall immediately cause to be sent to the
appropriate county treasurer, notice thereof. The county officials
charged by law with the duty of levying taxes for the payment of said
bonds and interest shall do so as provided in RCW 39.46.110.
The annual expense of such district shall not thereafter exceed the
annual revenue thereof, and any officer of such district who ((shall))
knowingly aids in increasing the annual expenditure in excess of the
annual revenue of such district, in addition to any other penalties,
whether civil or criminal, as provided by law, ((shall be deemed to be
guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished by a fine not exceeding
five hundred dollars)) commits a class 1 civil infraction.

Sec. 13 RCW 35.34.280 and 1985 c 175 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Upon the conviction of)) Any city or town official, department
head, or other city or town employee ((of)) who knowingly ((failing,))
fails or ((refusing)) refuses, without just cause, to perform any duty
imposed upon such officer or employee by this chapter, or city charter
or city or town ordinance, in connection with the giving of notice, the
preparing and filing of estimates of revenues or expenditures or other
information required for preparing a budget report in the time and
manner required, or of knowingly making expenditures in excess of
budget appropriations, ((the official or employee shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars))
commits a class 1 civil infraction for each separate violation.

Sec. 14 RCW 35A.33.160 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.33.160 are each
amended to read as follows:
((Upon the conviction of)) Any city official, department head, or
other city employee ((of)) who knowingly ((failing,)) fails or
((refusing)) refuses, without just cause, to perform any duty imposed
upon such officer or employee by this chapter, or city ordinance or
charter, in connection with the giving of notice, the preparing and
filing of estimates of revenues or expenditures or other information
required for preparing a budget report in the time and manner required,
or of knowingly making expenditures in excess of budget appropriations,
((he shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than
five hundred dollars)) commits a class 1 civil infraction for each
separate violation.

Sec. 15 RCW 35A.34.280 and 1985 c 175 s 60 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Upon the conviction of)) Any city official, department head, or
other city employee ((of)) who knowingly ((failing,)) fails or
((refusing)) refuses, without just cause, to perform any duty imposed
upon such officer or employee by this chapter, or city charter or city
ordinance, in connection with the giving of notice, the preparing and
filing of estimates of revenues or expenditures or other information
required for preparing a budget report in the time and manner required,
or of knowingly making expenditures in excess of budget appropriations,
((the official or employee shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall
be fined not more than five hundred dollars)) commits a class 1 civil
infraction for each separate violation.

Sec. 16 RCW 36.40.240 and 1963 c 4 s 36.40.240 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter ((shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined
not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than five hundred dollars))
commits a class 1 civil infraction.

Sec. 17 RCW 48.36A.360 and 1987 c 366 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person who willfully makes a false or fraudulent statement
in or relating to an application for membership or for the purpose of
obtaining money from or a benefit in any society, shall upon conviction
be fined not less than one hundred dollars nor more than five hundred
dollars or imprisonment in the county jail not less than thirty days
nor more than one year, or both.
(2) Any person who willfully makes a false or fraudulent statement
in any verified report or declaration under oath required or authorized
by this chapter, or of any material fact or thing contained in a sworn
statement concerning the death or disability of an insured for the
purpose of procuring payment of a benefit named in the certificate,
shall be guilty of false swearing and shall be subject to the penalties
under RCW 9A.72.040.
(3) Any person who solicits membership for, or in any manner
assists in procuring membership in, any society not licensed to do
business in this state ((shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon
conviction be fined not less than fifty dollars nor more than two
hundred dollars)) commits a class 2 civil infraction.
(4) Any person guilty of a willful violation of, or neglect or
refusal to comply with, the provisions of this chapter for which a
penalty is not otherwise prescribed((, shall upon conviction, be
subject to a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars)) commits a class
2 civil infraction.

Sec. 18 RCW 49.12.130 and 1913 c 174 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any employer who discharges, or in any other manner discriminates
against any employee because such employee has testified or is about to
testify, or because such employer believes that ((said)) the employee
may testify in any investigation or proceedings relative to the
enforcement of RCW 49.12.010 through 49.12.180, ((shall be deemed
guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished
by a fine of from twenty-five dollars to one hundred dollars)) commits
a class 2 civil infraction for each such ((misdemeanor)) violation.

Sec. 19 RCW 70.54.030 and 1909 c 16 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person who ((shall)) places or causes to be placed within any
watershed from which any city or municipal corporation of any adjoining
state obtains its water supply, any substance which either by itself or
in connection with other matter will corrupt, pollute, or impair the
quality of ((said)) the water supply, or the owner of any dead animal
who ((shall)) knowingly leaves or causes to be left the carcass or any
portion thereof within any such watershed in such condition as to in
any way corrupt or pollute such water supply ((shall be deemed guilty
of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by fine in any
sum not exceeding five hundred dollars)) commits a class 1 civil
infraction.

Sec. 20 RCW 70.90.205 and 1987 c 222 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The violation of any provisions of this chapter and any rules
adopted under this chapter ((shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a
fine of not more than five hundred dollars)) is a class 1 civil
infraction.

Sec. 21 RCW 70.95B.140 and 1973 c 139 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person, including any firm, corporation, municipal corporation,
or other governmental subdivision or agency, violating any provisions
of this chapter or the rules and regulations adopted hereunder((, is
guilty of a misdemeanor)) commits a class 2 civil infraction. Each day
of operation in such violation of this chapter or any rules or
regulations adopted hereunder ((shall)) constitutes a separate offense.
((Upon conviction, violators shall be fined an amount not exceeding one
hundred dollars for each offense.)) It ((shall be)) is the duty of the
prosecuting attorney or the attorney general, as appropriate, to secure
injunctions of continuing violations of any provisions of this chapter
or the rules and regulations adopted hereunder.

Sec. 22 RCW 70.119.130 and 1991 c 305 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person, including any operator or any firm, association,
corporation, municipal corporation, or other governmental subdivision
or agency, who, after thirty days' written notice, operates a public
water system which is not in compliance with RCW 70.119.030(1)((, shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor)) commits a class 2 civil infraction. Each
month of such operation out of compliance with RCW 70.119.030(1) shall
constitute a separate offense. ((Upon conviction, violators shall be
fined an amount not exceeding one hundred dollars for each offense.))
It ((shall be)) is the duty of the prosecuting attorney or the attorney
general, as appropriate to secure injunctions of continuing violations
of any provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulations adopted
hereunder: PROVIDED, That, except in the case of fraud, deceit, or
gross negligence under RCW 70.119.110, no revocation, citation, or
charge shall be made under RCW 70.119.110 and 70.119.130 until a proper
written notice of violation is received and a reasonable opportunity
for correction has been given.

Sec. 23 RCW 72.40.100 and 1987 c 202 s 229 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any parent, guardian, or educational service district
superintendent who, without proper cause, fails to carry into effect
the provisions of this chapter ((shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and
upon conviction thereof, upon the complaint of any officer or citizen
of the county or state, before any district or superior court, shall be
fined in any sum not less than fifty nor more than two hundred
dollars)) commits a class 1 civil infraction.

Sec. 24 RCW 73.04.020 and 1891 c 14 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any such officer who may require and accept fees for such services
((shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and on conviction thereof
shall be fined in any sum not less than ten dollars nor more than fifty
dollars)) commits a class 3 civil infraction.

Sec. 25 RCW 78.04.050 and 1901 c 120 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any violation of any of the provisions of RCW 78.04.040 by any
officer or agent of such corporation ((shall)) constitutes a
((misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof every such officer or agent
shall be fined in a sum not greater than two hundred dollars)) class 1
civil infraction for each offense.

Sec. 26 RCW 81.44.105 and 1961 c 14 s 81.44.105 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every violation of RCW 81.44.101 through 81.44.105 is a
((misdemeanor and shall be punishable by a fine of not more than one
hundred dollars)) class 3 civil infraction.

Sec. 27 RCW 84.08.050 and 2003 c 53 s 407 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of revenue shall:
(a) Require individuals, partnerships, companies, associations and
corporations to furnish information as to their capital, funded debts,
investments, value of property, earnings, taxes and all other facts
called for on these subjects so that the department may determine the
taxable value of any property or any other fact it may consider
necessary to carry out any duties now or hereafter imposed upon it, or
may ascertain the relative burdens borne by all kinds and classes of
property within the state, and for these purposes their records, books,
accounts, papers and memoranda shall be subject to production and
inspection, investigation and examination by the department, or any
employee thereof designated by the department for such purpose, and any
or all real and/or personal property in this state shall be subject to
visitation, investigation, examination and/or listing at any and all
times by the department or by any employee thereof designated by the
department.
(b) Summon witnesses to appear and testify on the subject of
capital, funded debts, investments, value of property, earnings, taxes,
and all other facts called for on these subjects, or upon any matter
deemed material to the proper assessment of property, or to the
investigation of the system of taxation, or the expenditure of public
funds for state, county, district and municipal purposes: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, No person shall be required to testify outside of the county
in which the taxpayer's residence, office or principal place of
business, as the case may be, is located. Such summons shall be served
in like manner as a subpoena issued out of the superior court and be
served by the sheriff of the proper county, and such service certified
by him or her to the department without compensation therefor. Persons
appearing before the department in obedience to a summons shall in the
discretion of the department receive the same compensation as witnesses
in the superior court.
(c) Thoroughly investigate all complaints which may be made to it
of illegal, unjust or excessive taxation, and shall endeavor to
ascertain to what extent and in what manner, if at all, the present
system is inequal or oppressive.
(2) Any member of the department or any employee thereof designated
for that purpose may administer oaths to witnesses.
(3)(a) In case any witness shall fail to obey the summons to
appear, or refuse to testify, or shall fail or refuse to comply with
any of the provisions of subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section, such
person, for each separate or repeated offense, ((shall be deemed guilty
of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined in any sum
not less than fifty dollars, nor more than five thousand dollars))
commits a class 1 civil infraction.
(b) Any person who shall testify falsely is guilty of perjury and
shall be punished under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

Sec. 28 RCW 88.02.110 and 1993 c 244 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a violation of
this chapter and the rules adopted by the department pursuant to these
statutes is a ((misdemeanor punishable only by a fine not to exceed one
hundred dollars)) class 3 civil infraction per vessel for the first
violation. Subsequent violations in the same year are subject to the
following ((fines)):
(a) ((For the)) A second violation((, a fine of two hundred
dollars)) is a class 2 civil infraction per vessel;
(b) ((For the)) A third ((and)) or successive violation((s, a fine
of four hundred dollars)) is a class 1 civil infraction per vessel.
(2) After subtraction of court costs and administrative collection
fees, moneys collected under this section shall be credited to the
current expense fund of the ((arresting)) adjudicating jurisdiction.
(3) All law enforcement officers shall have the authority to
enforce this chapter, and the rules adopted by the department pursuant
to these statutes within their respective jurisdictions: PROVIDED,
That a city, town, or county may contract with a fire protection
district for such enforcement and fire protection districts are
authorized to engage in such activities.

Sec. 29 RCW 90.36.050 and 1901 c 121 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person whether as owner, lessee, agent, or manager having
possession or control of any such well, violating the provisions of
((this act shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction
thereof, shall be fined in any sum not exceeding two hundred dollars))
RCW 90.36.020 through 90.36.040 commits a class 1 civil infraction for
each and every such ((offense)) violation, and ((the further sum of two
hundred dollars for)) each ten days during which such violation
((shall)) continues shall be considered a separate violation.

--- END ---