BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.450 and 2000 c 109 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A big game hunting license is required to hunt for big game.
A big game license allows the holder to hunt for forest grouse,
unclassified wildlife, and the individual species identified within a
specific big game combination license package. Each big game license
includes one transport tag for each species purchased in that package.
A hunter may not purchase more than one license for each big game
species except as authorized by rule of the commission. The fees for
annual big game combination packages are as follows:
(a) Big game number 1: Deer, elk, bear, and cougar. The fee for
this license is sixty-six dollars for residents, six hundred sixty
dollars for nonresidents, and thirty-three dollars for youth.
(b) Big game number 2: Deer and elk. The fee for this license is
fifty-six dollars for residents, five hundred sixty dollars for
nonresidents, and twenty-eight dollars for youth.
(c) Big game number 3: Deer or elk, bear, and cougar. At the time
of purchase, the holder must identify either deer or elk. The fee for
this license is forty-six dollars for residents, four hundred sixty
dollars for nonresidents, and twenty-three dollars for youth.
(d) Big game number 4: Deer or elk. At the time of purchase, the
holder must identify either deer or elk. The fee for this license is
thirty-six dollars for residents, three hundred sixty dollars for
nonresidents, and eighteen dollars for youth.
(e) Big game number 5: Bear and cougar. The fee for this license
is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred dollars for nonresidents,
and ten dollars for youth.
(2) In the event that the commission authorizes a two animal big
game limit, the fees for the second animal are as follows:
(a) Elk: The fee is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.
(b) Deer: The fee is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.
(c) Bear: The fee is ten dollars for residents, one hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.
(d) Cougar: The fee is ten dollars for residents, one hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.
(3) In the event that the commission authorizes a special permit
hunt for goat, sheep, or moose, the permit fees are as follows:
(a) Mountain goat: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents,
one thousand dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.
(b) Sheep: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents, one
thousand dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.
(c) Moose: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents, one
thousand dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.
(4) Multiple season big game permit: The commission may, by rule,
offer permits for hunters to hunt deer or elk during more than one
general season. Only one deer or elk may be harvested annually under
a multiple season big game permit. The fee is one hundred fifty
dollars for residents and one thousand five hundred dollars for
nonresidents. All revenue derived from the sale of multiple season big
game permits must be deposited in a separate account within the state
wildlife fund and must be used only for big game management.
(5) Authorization to hunt the species set out under subsection
(3)(a) through (c) of this section or in multiple seasons as set out in
subsection (4) of this section is by special permit ((identified))
issued under RCW 77.32.370.
(((4))) (6) The commission may adopt rules to reduce the price of
a license or eliminate the transportation tag requirements concerning
bear or cougar when necessary to meet harvest objectives.

--- END ---