BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.470 and 2003 c 181 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A personal use saltwater, freshwater, combination, temporary,
or family fishing weekend license is required for all persons fifteen
years of age or older to fish for or possess fish taken for personal
use from state waters or offshore waters.
(2) The fees for annual personal use saltwater, freshwater, or
combination licenses are as follows:
(a) A combination license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish, shellfish, and seaweed from state waters or offshore waters. The
fee for this license is thirty-six dollars for residents, seventy-two
dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.
(b) A saltwater license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish taken from saltwater areas. The fee for this license is eighteen
dollars for residents, thirty-six dollars for nonresidents, and five
dollars for resident seniors.
(c) A freshwater license allows the holder to fish for, take, or
possess food fish or game fish species in all freshwater areas. The
fee for this license is twenty dollars for residents, forty dollars for
nonresidents, and five dollars for resident seniors.
(3)(a) A temporary combination fishing license is valid for ((two))
one to five consecutive days and allows the holder to fish for or
possess fish, shellfish, and seaweed taken from state waters or
offshore waters. The fee for this temporary fishing license is
((six)):
(i) One day - Seven dollars for ((both)) residents and fourteen
dollars for nonresidents((.));
(ii) Two days - Ten dollars for residents and twenty dollars for
nonresidents;
(iii) Three days - Thirteen dollars for residents and twenty-six
dollars for nonresidents;
(iv) Four days - Fifteen dollars for residents and thirty dollars
for nonresidents; and
(v) Five days - Seventeen dollars for residents and thirty-four
dollars for nonresidents.
(b) The fee for a charter stamp is seven dollars for a one-day
charter license for residents and nonresidents.
(c) A transaction fee to support the automated licensing system
will be taken from the amounts set forth in this subsection for
temporary licenses.
(d) Except for active duty military personnel serving in any branch
of the United States armed forces, ((this)) the temporary combination
fishing license is not valid on game fish species for an eight-consecutive-day period beginning on the opening day of the lowland lake
fishing season.
(4) A family fishing weekend license allows for a maximum of six
anglers: One resident and five youth; two residents and four youth; or
one resident, one nonresident, and four youth. This license allows the
holders to fish for or possess fish taken from state waters or offshore
waters. The fee for this license is twenty dollars. This license is
only valid during periods as specified by rule of the department.
(5) The commission may adopt rules to create and sell combination
licenses for all hunting and fishing activities at or below a fee equal
to the total cost of the individual license contained within any
combination.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.32.430 and 2004 c 107 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Catch record card information is necessary for proper
management of the state's food fish and game fish species and shellfish
resources. Catch record card administration shall be under rules
adopted by the commission. There is no charge for an initial catch
record card. Each subsequent or duplicate catch record card costs ten
dollars.
(2) A license to take and possess Dungeness crab is only valid in
Puget Sound waters east of the Bonilla-Tatoosh line if the fisher has
in possession a valid catch record card officially endorsed for
Dungeness crab. The endorsement shall cost no more than three dollars,
including any or all fees authorized under RCW 77.32.050, when
purchased for a personal use saltwater, combination, or shellfish and
seaweed license. The endorsement shall cost no more than one dollar,
including any or all fees authorized under RCW 77.32.050, when
purchased for a temporary combination fishing license authorized under
RCW 77.32.470(3)(a).
(3) Catch record cards issued with affixed temporary short-term
charter stamp licenses are not subject to the ten-dollar charge nor to
the Dungeness crab endorsement fee provided for in this section.
Charter boat or guide operators issuing temporary short-term charter
stamp licenses shall affix the stamp to each catch record card issued
before fishing commences. Catch record cards issued with a temporary
short-term charter stamp are valid for ((two consecutive days)) one
day.
(4) The department shall include provisions for recording marked
and unmarked salmon in catch record cards issued after March 31, 2004.
(5) The funds received from the sale of catch record cards and the
Dungeness crab endorsement must be deposited into the wildlife fund.
The funds received from the Dungeness crab endorsement may be used only
for the sampling, monitoring, and management of catch associated with
the Dungeness crab recreational fisheries. Moneys allocated under this
section shall supplement and not supplant other federal, state, and
local funds used for Dungeness crab recreational fisheries management.

--- END ---