BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.070 and 2004 c 248 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Applicants for a license, permit, tag, or stamp shall furnish
the information required by the director. However, the director may
not require the purchaser of a razor clam license under RCW 77.32.520
to provide any personal information except for proof of residency. The
commission may adopt rules requiring licensees or permittees to keep
records and make reports concerning the taking of or effort to harvest
fish, shellfish, and wildlife. The reporting requirement may be waived
where, for any reason, the department is not able to receive the
report. The department must provide reasonable options for a licensee
to submit information to a live operator prior to the reporting
deadline.
(2) The commission may, by rule, set an administrative penalty for
failure to comply with rules requiring the reporting of taking or
effort to harvest wildlife. The commission may also adopt rules
requiring hunters who have not reported for the previous license year
to complete a report and pay the assessed administrative penalty before
a new hunting license is issued.
(a) The total administrative penalty per hunter set by the
commission must not exceed ten dollars.
(b) By December 31st of each year, the department shall report the
rate of hunter compliance with the harvest reporting requirement, the
administrative penalty imposed for failing to report, and the amount of
administrative penalties collected during that year to the appropriate
fiscal and policy committees of the senate and house of
representatives.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.15.280 and 1998 c 190 s 47 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of violating rules requiring reporting of
fish or wildlife harvest if the person:
(a) Fails to make a harvest log report of a commercial fish or
shellfish catch in violation of any rule of the commission or the
director;
(b) Fails to maintain a trapper's report or taxidermist ledger in
violation of any rule of the commission or the director;
(c) Fails to submit any portion of a big game animal for a required
inspection required by rule of the commission or the director; or
(d) Fails to return a catch record card ((or wildlife harvest
report)) to the department as required by rule of the commission or
director.
(2) Violating rules requiring reporting of fish or wildlife harvest
is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.12.170 and 2004 c 248 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established in the state treasury the state wildlife
fund which consists of moneys received from:
(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;
(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department
purposes;
(c) The assessment of administrative penalties, and the sale of
licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by chapter 77.32 RCW and
RCW 77.65.490, except annual resident adult saltwater and all annual
razor clam and shellfish licenses, which shall be deposited into the
state general fund;
(d) Fees for informational materials published by the department;
(e) Fees for personalized vehicle license plates as provided in
chapter 46.16 RCW;
(f) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this title;
(g) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife
losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320;
(h) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter
82.27 RCW;
(i) The sale of personal property seized by the department for
fish, shellfish, or wildlife violations;
(j) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles
authorized by the commission; and
(k) The sale of watchable wildlife decals under RCW 77.32.560.
(2) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury
to be credited to the state wildlife fund.

--- END ---