BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.460 and 2000 c 109 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A small game hunting license is required to hunt for all
classified wild animals and wild birds, except big game. A small game
license also allows the holder to hunt for unclassified wildlife.
((The small game license includes one transport tag for turkey.))
(a) The fee for this license is thirty dollars for residents, one
hundred fifty dollars for nonresidents, and fifteen dollars for youth.
(b) The fee for this license if purchased in conjunction with a big
game combination license package is sixteen dollars for residents,
eighty dollars for nonresidents, and eight dollars for youth.
(c) The fee for a three-consecutive-day small game license is fifty
dollars for nonresidents.
(2) In addition to a small game license, a turkey tag is required
to hunt for turkey.
(a) The fee for a primary turkey tag is twelve dollars for
residents and forty dollars for nonresidents. A primary turkey tag
will, on request, be issued to the purchaser of a youth small game
license at no charge. Fifty percent of the moneys received from
primary turkey tags must be deposited in the state wildlife account and
must be appropriated solely for the purposes of turkey and upland game
bird management and shall not supplant existing funds provided for
these purposes.
(b) The fee for each additional turkey tag is eighteen dollars for
residents, sixty dollars for nonresidents, and nine dollars for youth.

--- END ---