BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.65.010 and 1998 c 190 s 93 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by this title, a person may not
engage in any of the following activities without a license or permit
issued by the director:
(a) Commercially fish for or take food fish or shellfish;
(b) Deliver from a commercial fishing vessel food fish or shellfish
taken for commercial purposes in offshore waters. As used in this
subsection, "deliver" means arrival at a place or port, and includes
arrivals from offshore waters to waters within the state and arrivals
from state or offshore waters;
(c) Operate a charter boat or commercial fishing vessel engaged in
a fishery;
(d) Engage in processing or wholesaling food fish or shellfish; or
(e) Act as a guide for salmon for personal use in freshwater rivers
and streams, other than that part of the Columbia river below the
bridge at Longview.
(2) No person may engage in the activities described in subsection
(1) of this section unless the licenses or permits required by this
title are in the person's possession, and the person is the named
license holder or an alternate operator designated on the license and
the person's license is not suspended.
(3) A valid Oregon license that is equivalent to a license under
this title is valid in the concurrent waters of the Columbia river if
the state of Oregon recognizes as valid the equivalent Washington
license. The director may identify by rule what Oregon licenses are
equivalent.
(4) No license or permit is required for the production or
harvesting of private sector cultured aquatic products as defined in
RCW 15.85.020 or for the delivery, processing, or wholesaling of such
aquatic products. However, if a means of identifying such products is
required by rules adopted under RCW 15.85.060, the exemption from
licensing or permit requirements established by this subsection applies
only if the aquatic products are identified in conformance with those
rules.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.65.170 and 2000 c 107 s 38 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A salmon delivery license is required for a commercial fishing
vessel to deliver salmon taken for commercial purposes in offshore
waters to a place or port in the state. As used in this section,
"deliver" and "delivery" mean arrival at a place or port, and include
arrivals from offshore waters to waters within the state and arrivals
ashore from offshore waters. The annual fee for a salmon delivery
license is three hundred eighty dollars for residents and six hundred
eighty-five dollars for nonresidents. The annual surcharge under RCW
77.95.090 is one hundred dollars for each license. Holders of
nonlimited entry delivery licenses issued under RCW 77.65.210 may apply
the nonlimited entry delivery license fee against the salmon delivery
license fee.
(2) Only a person who meets the qualifications established in RCW
77.70.090 may hold a salmon delivery license issued under this section.
(3) A salmon delivery license authorizes no taking of salmon or
other food fish or shellfish from the waters of the state.
(4) If the director determines that the operation of a vessel under
a salmon delivery license results in the depletion or destruction of
the state's salmon resource or the delivery into this state of salmon
products prohibited by law, the director may revoke the license under
the procedures of chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.65.190 and 2000 c 107 s 40 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person who does not qualify for a license under RCW 77.70.090
shall obtain a nontransferable emergency salmon delivery license to
make one delivery from a commercial fishing vessel of salmon taken for
commercial purposes in offshore waters. As used in this section,
"delivery" means arrival at a place or port, and include arrivals from
offshore waters to waters within the state and arrivals ashore from
offshore waters. The director shall not issue an emergency salmon
delivery license unless, as determined by the director, a bona fide
emergency exists. The license fee is two hundred twenty-five dollars
for residents and four hundred seventy-five dollars for nonresidents.
An applicant for an emergency salmon delivery license shall designate
no more than one vessel that will be used with the license. Alternate
operator licenses are not required of persons delivering salmon under
an emergency salmon delivery license. Emergency salmon delivery
licenses are not renewable.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.65.210 and 2000 c 107 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person
may not use a commercial fishing vessel to deliver food fish or
shellfish taken for commercial purposes in offshore waters to a port in
the state without a nonlimited entry delivery license. As used in this
section, "deliver" and "delivery" mean arrival at a place or port, and
include arrivals from offshore waters to waters within the state and
arrivals ashore from offshore waters. As used in this section, "food
fish" does not include salmon. As used in this section, "shellfish"
does not include ocean pink shrimp ((or)), coastal crab, or fish or
shellfish taken under an emerging commercial fisheries license if taken
from off-shore waters. The annual license fee for a nonlimited entry
delivery license is one hundred ten dollars for residents and two
hundred dollars for nonresidents.
(2) Holders of salmon troll fishery licenses issued under RCW
77.65.160, salmon delivery licenses issued under RCW 77.65.170, crab
pot fishery licenses issued under RCW 77.65.220, food fish trawl -- Non-Puget Sound fishery licenses, and emerging commercial fishery licenses
issued under RCW 77.65.200, Dungeness crab -- coastal fishery licenses,
ocean pink shrimp delivery licenses, ((and)) shrimp trawl -- Non-Puget
Sound fishery licenses, and emerging commercial fishery licenses issued
under RCW 77.65.220 may deliver food fish or shellfish taken in
offshore waters without a nonlimited entry delivery license.
(3) A nonlimited entry delivery license authorizes no taking of
food fish or shellfish from state waters.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.65.390 and 2000 c 107 s 51 are each amended to read
as follows:
An ocean pink shrimp delivery license is required for a commercial
fishing vessel to deliver ocean pink shrimp taken for commercial
purposes in offshore waters and delivered to a port in the state. As
used in this section, "deliver" and "delivery" mean arrival at a place
or port, and include arrivals from offshore waters to waters within the
state and arrivals from state or offshore waters. The annual license
fee is one hundred fifty dollars for residents and three hundred
dollars for nonresidents. Ocean pink shrimp delivery licenses are
transferable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
ninety days after this act is signed by the governor.

--- END ---