BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.320 and 2001 c 253 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may make agreements with persons, political
subdivisions of this state, or the United States or its agencies or
instrumentalities, regarding fish, shellfish, and wildlife-oriented
recreation and the propagation, protection, conservation, and control
of fish, shellfish, and wildlife.
(2) The director may make written agreements with the owners or
lessees of real or personal property to provide for the use of the
property for fish, shellfish, and wildlife-oriented recreation. These
agreements terminate upon the sale of any portion of the real or
personal property covered under an agreement. The director may only
enter into agreements with a lessee where the owner of the real or
personal property provides written consent to the agreement.
(a) The department may furnish money, material, or labor under
these agreements where the agreements provide for public access to the
real property.
(b) The director may adopt rules governing the conduct of persons
in or on the real property.
(3) The director may accept compensation for fish, shellfish, and
wildlife losses or gifts or grants of personal property for use by the
department.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.24.210 and 2003 c 39 s 2 and 2003 c 16 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this
section, any public or private landowners or others in lawful
possession and control of any lands whether designated resource, rural,
or urban, or water areas or channels and lands adjacent to such areas
or channels, who allow members of the public to use them for the
purposes of outdoor recreation, which term includes, but is not limited
to, the cutting, gathering, and removing of firewood by private persons
for their personal use without purchasing the firewood from the
landowner, hunting, fishing, camping, picnicking, swimming, hiking,
bicycling, skateboarding or other nonmotorized wheel-based activities,
hanggliding, paragliding, rock climbing, the riding of horses or other
animals, clam digging, pleasure driving of off-road vehicles,
snowmobiles, and other vehicles, boating, nature study, winter or water
sports, viewing or enjoying historical, archaeological, scenic, or
scientific sites, without charging a fee of any kind therefor, shall
not be liable for unintentional injuries to such users.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this
section, any public or private landowner or others in lawful possession
and control of any lands whether rural or urban, or water areas or
channels and lands adjacent to such areas or channels, who offer or
allow such land to be used for purposes of a fish or wildlife
cooperative project or who contract with the state to provide fish and
wildlife-related recreational access, or allow access to such land for
cleanup of litter or other solid waste, shall not be liable for
unintentional injuries to any volunteer group or to any other users.
(3) Any public or private landowner, or others in lawful possession
and control of the land, may charge an administrative fee of up to
twenty-five dollars for the cutting, gathering, and removing of
firewood from the land.
(4) Nothing in this section shall prevent the liability of a
landowner or others in lawful possession and control for injuries
sustained to users by reason of a known dangerous artificial latent
condition for which warning signs have not been conspicuously posted.
A fixed anchor used in rock climbing and put in place by someone other
than a landowner is not a known dangerous artificial latent condition
and a landowner under subsection (1) of this section shall not be
liable for unintentional injuries resulting from the condition or use
of such an anchor. Nothing in RCW 4.24.200 and ((4.24.210)) this
section limits or expands in any way the doctrine of attractive
nuisance. Usage by members of the public, volunteer groups, or other
users is permissive and does not support any claim of adverse
possession.
(5) For purposes of this section, a license or permit issued for
statewide use under authority of chapter 79A.05 RCW or Title 77 RCW is
not a fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A surcharge of five dollars for residents and twenty-five
dollars for nonresidents is applied to all big game and all small game
licenses not purchased with a big game license for management of
recreational access and habitat enhancement agreements as authorized in
RCW 77.12.320. The surcharge for the three-day nonresident small game
license is five dollars.
(2) All revenue derived from this surcharge must be deposited in a
separate account within the state wildlife fund and must be used only
for the management and implementation of wildlife recreational access
and habitat enhancement agreements authorized in RCW 77.12.320.
Administrative costs charged to this program may not exceed ten percent
of annual expenditures.

--- END ---