BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall charge a fee of ten dollars per business
location for the administration and enforcement of the minor work
permit requirements of RCW 49.12.121 or 49.12.123 or a rule or order
adopted under RCW 49.12.121 or 49.12.123. The fee shall be used solely
to review minor work permit applications to verify that minors employed
at business locations are performing work duties limited to those
allowed under the permit and to verify that minors are no longer
employed at business locations that have not renewed their annual minor
work permits. Fees collected from minor work permits shall be
deposited in the state general fund and may be appropriated by the
legislature for the purposes of this section.

--- END ---