BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.070 and 1993 c 404 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of labor and industries may charge fees to awarding
agencies on public works for the approval of statements of intent to
pay prevailing wages and the certification of affidavits of wages paid.
The department may also charge fees to persons or organizations
requesting the arbitration of disputes under RCW 39.12.060. The amount
of the fees shall be established by rules adopted by the department
under the procedures in the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW. The fees shall apply to all approvals, certifications, and
arbitration requests made after the effective date of the rules. All
fees shall be deposited in the public works administration account.
((On the fifteenth day of the first month of each quarterly period, an
amount equalling thirty percent of the revenues received into the
public works administration account shall be transferred into the
general fund.)) The department may refuse to arbitrate for
contractors, subcontractors, persons, or organizations which have not
paid the proper fees. The department may, if necessary, request the
attorney general to take legal action to collect delinquent fees.
The department shall set the fees permitted by this section at a
level that generates revenue that is as near as practicable to the
amount of the appropriation to administer this chapter, including, but
not limited to, the performance of adequate wage surveys, and to
investigate and enforce all alleged violations of this chapter,
including, but not limited to, incorrect statements of intent to pay
prevailing wage, incorrect certificates of affidavits of wages paid,
and wage claims, as provided for in this chapter and chapters 49.48 and
49.52 RCW. However, the fees charged for the approval of statements of
intent to pay prevailing wages and the certification of affidavits of
wages paid shall be no greater than twenty-five dollars.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.12.080 and 2001 c 219 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The public works administration account is created in the state
treasury. The department of labor and industries shall deposit in the
account all moneys received from fees or civil penalties collected
under RCW 39.12.050, 39.12.065, and 39.12.070. Appropriations from the
account((, not including moneys transferred to the general fund
pursuant to RCW 39.12.070,)) may be made only for the purposes of
administration of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the
performance of adequate wage surveys, and for the investigation and
enforcement of all alleged violations of this chapter as provided for
in this chapter and chapters 49.48 and 49.52 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2007.

--- END ---