BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. The
legislature finds that over five thousand state residents per year file
cases and complaints with the department of labor and industries
alleging they have been denied payment for work they performed. The
department of labor and industries currently does not have an effective
means of addressing these complaints in order to ensure workers are
paid the wages they are owed.
The legislature further finds that the Washington state minimum
wage law and wage claim laws do not authorize adequate penalties
against violators. To improve compliance, the department of labor and
industries should be allowed to assess interest on back wages and
impose civil penalties against employers who are found to be not in
compliance with chapters 49.46 and 49.48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
DEFINITIONS. For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries, or the director's authorized representative.
(3) "Recordkeeping requirement" means a recordkeeping requirement
set forth in RCW 49.12.041, 49.12.050, 49.12.105, 49.46.040, 49.46.070,
or 49.52.050, and any related rules adopted by the department.
(4) "Wage payment requirement" means a wage payment requirement set
forth in chapter 49.12, 49.30, 49.46, or 49.52 RCW or this chapter, and
any related rules adopted by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
COMPLAINT AND DISPUTE OF WAGE CLAIMS. (1) An employee who believes
he or she is owed wages by an employer may file with the department a
written complaint alleging a violation of a wage payment requirement.
(2) The department shall promptly determine whether the complaint
shall be accepted or denied. If the department accepts the claim it
shall notify the complainant that the claim has been accepted or
rejected. If the claim is accepted, the department shall notify the
employer unless such notification to the employer would compromise any
investigation by the department or is prohibited by law.
(3) Once the complaint is accepted the department shall conduct an
evaluation which shall include, but is not limited to:
(a) Telephonic, electronic mail, or written correspondence with
either the worker or workers, the employer, or others that may have
knowledge and information about the complaint; or
(b) Interviews of the worker or workers, employer, or others that
may have knowledge or information about the complaint.
(4) Based on the evaluation of the complaint the department will
notify the employer that:
(a) A specified amount of additional wages were determined to be
owed together with the name of each claimant, together with the amount
owed each claimant; or
(b) No wages are owed.
(5) Within ten business days of receipt of the department's
evaluation of wages owed, the employer must notify the department that
it:
(a) Agrees with the department's evaluation of wages owed and
provide payment of the wages assessed to the department for
disbursement to the complainant or complainants;
(b) Disagrees with the department's evaluation and provide an
explanation of the basis for disagreement; or
(c) Agrees or disagrees in part with the department's evaluation
and provide an explanation of the basis for disagreement.
(6) After the department receives written notice under subsection
(5)(b) or (c) of this section that a wage claim is disputed or if the
employer does not respond to the department's evaluation of wages owed
under subsection (4) of this section, the department shall review the
employee's complaint and the employer's statement and written evidence,
and issue a written notice stating:
(a) The department's intent to dismiss or not pursue the wage
complaint; or
(b) The department's intent to investigate the wage complaint.
(7) Nothing in this section may be construed to affect
investigations that are conducted absent a wage complaint or for
situations where additional workers are identified as a result of a
wage complaint.
(8) Nothing in this section may be construed to negate a wage
complaint brought by an employee. The timelines associated with this
section may be waived or extended by the department for good cause.
(9) Unless specified, notification under this section may be either
verbal or in writing.
(10) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit an
informal resolution of the wage complaint by the employer and the
employee.

Sec. 4 RCW 49.48.040 and 1987 c 172 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department ((of labor and industries)) may:
(a) Conduct investigations to enforce and ensure compliance with
this chapter and chapters 39.12, 49.12, 49.30, 49.46, and 49.52 RCW,
upon receiving a complaint under section 3 of this act or obtaining
information indicating an employer may be committing a violation under
these chapters ((39.12, 49.46, and 49.48 RCW, conduct investigations to
ensure compliance with chapters 39.12, 49.46, and 49.48 RCW));
(b) ((Order the payment of)) Issue a citation or notice of
assessment ordering an employer to pay all wages owed the ((workers))
employees, including interest of up to one percent per month on the
unpaid wages to the employee, and to pay any assessed penalties; and
(c) Institute actions necessary ((for the collection of the sums
determined owed; and
(c) Take assignments of wage claims and prosecute actions for the
collection of wages of persons who are financially unable to employ
counsel when in the judgment of the director of the department the
claims are valid and enforceable in the courts)) to recover wages
determined to be owed to employees in superior court or other court of
competent jurisdiction of the county where the violation is alleged to
have occurred, or the department may use the procedures for recovery of
wages in a court action set forth in this chapter and chapter 49.52
RCW.
(2) The director ((of the department or any authorized
representative)) may, for the purpose of carrying out RCW 49.48.010 and
49.48.040 through 49.48.080: (a) Issue subpoenas to compel the
attendance of witnesses or parties and the production of books, papers,
or records; (b) administer oaths and examine witnesses under oath; (c)
take the verification of proof of instruments of writing; and (d) take
depositions and affidavits. If assignments for wage claims are taken,
court costs shall not be payable by the department for prosecuting such
suits.
(3) The director shall have a seal inscribed "Department of Labor
and Industries--State of Washington" and all courts shall take judicial
notice of such seal. Obedience to subpoenas issued by the director
((or authorized representative)) shall be enforced by the courts in any
county.
(4) The director ((or authorized representative)) shall have free
access to all places and works of labor. Any employer or any agent or
employee of such employer who refuses the director ((or authorized
representative)) admission therein, or who, when requested by the
director ((or authorized representative)), willfully neglects or
refuses to furnish the director ((or authorized representative)) any
statistics or information pertaining to his or her lawful duties, which
statistics or information may be in his or her possession or under the
control of the employer or agent, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
(5) The department shall commence a civil action or issue a
citation or notice of assessment within three years after the cause of
action accrues, unless a longer period of time applies under law.

Sec. 5 RCW 49.48.060 and 1971 ex.s. c 55 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If upon investigation by the director, ((after taking
assignments of any wage claim under RCW 49.48.040,)) it appears to the
director that the employer is representing to his or her employees that
he or she is able to pay wages for their services and that the
employees are not being paid for their services, the director may
require the employer to give a bond in such sum as the director deems
reasonable and adequate in the circumstances, with sufficient surety,
conditioned that the employer will for a definite future period not
exceeding six months conduct his or her business and pay his or her
employees in accordance with the laws of the state of Washington.
(2) If within ten days after demand for such bond the employer
fails to provide the same, the director may commence a suit against the
employer in the superior court of appropriate jurisdiction to compel
him or her to furnish such bond or cease doing business until he or she
has done so. The employer shall have the burden of proving the amount
thereof to be excessive.
(3) If the court finds that there is just cause for requiring such
bond and that the same is reasonable, necessary or appropriate to
secure the prompt payment of the wages of the employees of such
employer and his or her compliance with RCW 49.48.010 through
49.48.080, the court shall enjoin such employer from doing business in
this state until the requirement is met, or shall make other, and may
make further, orders appropriate to compel compliance with the
requirement.
((Upon being informed of a wage claim against an employer or former
employer, the director shall, if such claim appears to be just,
immediately notify the employer or former employer, of such claim by
mail. If the employer or former employer fails to pay the claim or
make satisfactory explanation to the director of his failure to do so,
within thirty days thereafter, the employer or former employer shall be
liable to a penalty of ten percent of that portion of the claim found
to be justly due. The director shall have a cause of action against
the employer or former employer for the recovery of such penalty, and
the same may be included in any subsequent action by the director on
said wage claim, or may be exercised separately after adjustment of
such wage claim without court action.))

Sec. 6 RCW 49.48.070 and 1935 c 96 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the duty of the director ((of labor and industries)) to
inquire diligently for any violations of RCW 49.48.010 and 49.48.040
through 49.48.080, and to institute the actions for penalties herein
provided, and to enforce generally the provisions of RCW 49.48.010 and
49.48.040 through 49.48.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
CITATIONS AND ASSESSMENTS OF CIVIL PENALTIES. (1)(a) An employer
found to have violated a wage payment requirement in a citation or
notice of assessment issued by the director shall pay the wages due,
including interest of up to one percent per month on the unpaid wages,
to the employee, and may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than
ten times the wages due for each violation per employee. Each day a
violation occurs is a separate violation. The director may also claim
the remedies in RCW 49.52.070.
(b) If the employer pays all wages due to the employee, the
director may waive collection of a penalty assessed under subsection
(1) of this section in whole or in part.
(2) An employer found to have violated a recordkeeping requirement
may be assessed a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars
and not more than one thousand dollars for each violation per employee,
and may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than one thousand
dollars for each subsequent violation found in the citation or notice
of assessment. Each day a violation occurs is a separate violation.
(3) The director may require payment of wages determined to be
unpaid and may assess civil penalties authorized by this section. When
considering the amount of penalties for multiple violations found in a
citation and notice of assessment, the director shall consider the good
faith of the employer, the appropriateness of the penalty with respect
to the number of affected employees of the employer being charged for
each violation, the gravity of the violations, the duration of the
violations, the size of the employer's business, the history of
previous violations, any voluntary resolution of the claim between the
claimant and the employer, and other relevant factors.
(4) Civil penalties collected under this section shall be paid to
the director for deposit in the supplemental pension fund established
under RCW 51.44.033.
(5) The employer shall pay wages and the civil penalty amount
assessed under this section within thirty days of receipt of the notice
of assessment or file an appeal of the citation or the notice of
assessment penalty in writing to the director as provided in section 8
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
ADMINISTRATIVE APPEALS. (1) A person, firm, or corporation
aggrieved by a citation or notice of assessment issued by the
department under this chapter may appeal the action or decision to the
director by filing notice of the appeal with the director within thirty
days of the department's issuance of a citation or notice of
assessment. A citation or notice of assessment not appealed within the
thirty-day period is final and binding, and not subject to further
appeal.
(2) Upon receipt of an appeal, the director shall assign the
hearing to an administrative law judge of the office of administrative
hearings to conduct the hearing and issue an initial order. The
hearing and review procedures shall be conducted in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW. A party aggrieved by the initial order may file a
petition for administrative review of the initial order with the
director within thirty days of the administrative law judge's issuance
of the initial order.
(3) The director shall issue all final orders after the initial
order. The final order of the director is subject to appeal in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) A notice of appeal filed with the director under this section
shall stay the effectiveness of a citation or notice of assessment of
a penalty pending final review of the appeal by the director as
provided for in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(5) Orders that are not appealed within the time period specified
in this section and chapter 34.05 RCW are final and binding, and not
subject to further appeal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
COLLECTION PROCEDURES. (1) If an employer defaults in a payment of
wages and civil penalties payable to the department after a final order
is issued under this chapter, the director may file with the clerk of
any county within the state, a warrant in the amount of the notice of
assessment, plus interest, penalties, and any filing fees. The clerk
of the county in which the warrant is filed shall immediately designate
a superior court cause number for the warrant, and the clerk shall
cause to be entered in the judgment docket under the superior court
cause number assigned to the warrant, the name of the employer
mentioned in the warrant, the amount of payment, penalty, fine due on
it, or filing fee, and the date when the warrant was filed. The
aggregate amount of the warrant as docketed becomes a lien upon the
title to, and interest in, all real and personal property of the
employer against whom the warrant is issued, the same as a judgment in
a civil case docketed in the office of the clerk. The sheriff shall
proceed upon the warrant in all respects and with like effect as
prescribed by law with respect to execution or other process issued
against rights or property upon judgment in a court of competent
jurisdiction. The warrant so docketed is sufficient to support the
issuance of writs of garnishment in favor of the state in a manner
provided by law in case of judgment, wholly or partially unsatisfied.
The clerk of the court is entitled to a filing fee which will be added
to the amount of the warrant. A copy of the warrant shall be mailed to
the employer within three days of filing with the clerk.
(2)(a) The director may issue to any person, firm, corporation,
other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the
state, a public corporation, or any agency of the state, a notice and
order to withhold and deliver property of any kind when he or she has
reason to believe that there is in the possession of the person, firm,
corporation, other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision
of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state, property that
is or will become due, owing, or belonging to an employer upon whom a
notice of assessment has been served by the department for payments,
penalties, or fines due to the department. The effect of a notice and
order is continuous from the date the notice and order is first made
until the liability out of which the notice and order arose is
satisfied or becomes unenforceable because of lapse of time. The
department shall release the notice and order when the liability out of
which the notice and order arose is satisfied or becomes unenforceable
by reason of lapse of time and shall notify the person against whom the
notice and order was made that the notice and order has been released.
(b) The notice and order to withhold and deliver must be served by
the sheriff of the county or by the sheriff's deputy, by certified
mail, return receipt requested, or by an authorized representative of
the director. A person, firm, corporation, other entity, municipal
corporation, political subdivision of the state, public corporation, or
agency of the state upon whom service has been made shall answer the
notice within twenty days exclusive of the day of service, under oath
and in writing, and shall make true answers to the matters inquired of
in the notice and order. Upon service of the notice and order, if the
party served possesses any property that may be subject to the claim of
the department, the party shall promptly deliver the property to the
director. The director shall hold the property in trust for
application on the employer's indebtedness to the department, or for
return without interest, in accordance with a final determination of a
petition for review. In the alternative, the party shall furnish a
good and sufficient surety bond satisfactory to the director
conditioned upon final determination of liability. If a party served
and named in the notice fails to answer the notice within the time
prescribed in this section, the court may render judgment by default
against the party for the full amount claimed by the director in the
notice, together with costs. If a notice is served upon an employer
and the property subject to it is wages, the employer may assert in the
answer all exemptions provided for by chapter 6.27 RCW to which the
wage earner is entitled.
(3) In addition to the procedure for collection of a payment,
penalty, or fine due to the department as set forth in this section,
the department may recover civil penalties or wages imposed under this
chapter in a civil action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction
of the county where the violation is alleged to have occurred.
(4) This section does not affect other collection remedies that are
otherwise provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
ELECTION OF REMEDY. An employee may elect to pursue a private
right of action against an employer for payment of wages or file a wage
complaint with the department. If, at any time, an employee elects to
bring a private right of action, the department shall discontinue any
action that it is taking to recover wages for the employee.
Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit the department
from seeking penalties for violations of wage payment requirements, or
to affect actions where additional workers were identified as a result
of a wage complaint, or actions conducted absent a wage complaint.
The filing of a written wage complaint by an employee with the
department shall toll the statute of limitations for a private right of
action until such time that the department either: (1) Issues a
citation or notice of assessment or initiates a civil action; or (2)
notifies the employee in writing of the department's intent to dismiss
or not pursue the wage complaint.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
RULE-MAKING AUTHORITY. The director may adopt rules to carry out
the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
RULE-MAKING AUTHORITY. The director may adopt rules to carry out
the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are
not any part of the law.

--- END ---