BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.34.010 and 2003 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
The number of district judges to be elected in each county shall
be: Adams, two; Asotin, one; Benton, three; Chelan, two; Clallam, two;
Clark, six; Columbia, one; Cowlitz, two; Douglas, one; Ferry, one;
Franklin, one; Garfield, one; Grant, two; Grays Harbor, two; Island,
one; Jefferson, one; King, twenty-one; Kitsap, ((three)) four;
Kittitas, two; Klickitat, two; Lewis, two; Lincoln, one; Mason, one;
Okanogan, two; Pacific, two; Pend Oreille, one; Pierce, eleven; San
Juan, one; Skagit, two; Skamania, one; Snohomish, eight; Spokane, ten;
Stevens, one; Thurston, ((two)) three; Wahkiakum, one; Walla Walla,
two; Whatcom, two; Whitman, one; Yakima, four. This number may be
increased only as provided in RCW 3.34.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 For the purposes of RCW 3.34.025, the
district judge position for Clark county created in chapter 97, Laws of
2003, is hereby recreated as of the effective date of this section.

--- END ---