BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94.040 and 1995 c 314 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person serving a sentence in any state correctional
institution who, without legal authorization, while in the institution
or while being conveyed to or from the institution, or while under the
custody or supervision of institution officials, officers, or
employees, or while on any premises subject to the control of the
institution, knowingly possesses or carries upon his or her person or
has under his or her control any weapon, firearm, or any instrument
which, if used, could produce serious bodily injury to the person of
another, is guilty of a class B felony.
(2) Every person confined in a county or local correctional
institution who, without legal authorization, while in the institution
or while being conveyed to or from the institution, or while under the
custody or supervision of institution officials, officers, or
employees, or while on any premises subject to the control of the
institution, knowingly possesses or has under his or her control ((a
deadly)) any weapon, ((as defined in RCW 9A.04.110)) firearm, or any
instrument that, if used, could produce serious bodily injury to the
person of another, is guilty of a class ((B)) C felony.
(3) The sentence imposed under this section shall be in addition to
any sentence being served.

--- END ---