BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.68A.105 and 1995 c 353 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9.68A.100, a
person who is either convicted or given a deferred sentence or a
deferred prosecution or who has entered into a statutory or
nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for violating
RCW 9.68A.100 or a comparable county or municipal ordinance shall be
assessed a two hundred fifty dollar fee.
(b) The court may not suspend payment of all or part of the fee
unless it finds that the person does not have the ability to pay.
(c) When a minor has been adjudicated a juvenile offender or has
entered into a statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement for an
offense which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a violation
of RCW 9.68A.100 or a comparable county or municipal ordinance, the
court shall assess the fee under (a) of this subsection. The court may
not suspend payment of all or part of the fee unless it finds that the
minor does not have the ability to pay the fee.
(2) The fee assessed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
collected by the clerk of the court and distributed each month to the
state treasurer for deposit in the prostitution prevention and
intervention account under RCW 43.63A.740 for the purpose of funding
prostitution prevention and intervention activities.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement" means an
agreement under RCW 13.40.080 or any written agreement between a person
accused of an offense listed in subsection (1) of this section and a
court or a county or city prosecutor, or a designee thereof, whereby
the person agrees to fulfill certain conditions in lieu of prosecution;
and
(b) "Deferred sentence" means a sentence that will not be carried
out if the defendant meets certain requirements, such as complying with
the conditions of probation.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.88.120 and 1995 c 353 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.010,
9A.88.030, and 9A.88.090, a person who is either convicted or given a
deferred sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a
statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest
for violating RCW 9A.88.010, 9A.88.030, 9A.88.090, or comparable county
or municipal ordinances shall be assessed a fifty dollar fee.
(b) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.110, a person
who is either convicted or given a deferred sentence or a deferred
prosecution or who has entered into a statutory or nonstatutory
diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for violating RCW
9A.88.110 or a comparable county or municipal ordinance shall be
assessed a one hundred fifty dollar fee.
(c) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.070 and
9A.88.080, a person who is either convicted or given a deferred
sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a statutory
or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for
violating RCW 9A.88.070, 9A.88.080, or comparable county or municipal
ordinances shall be assessed a three hundred dollar fee.
(2) The court may not suspend payment of all or part of the fee
unless it finds that the person does not have the ability to pay.
(3) When a minor has been adjudicated a juvenile offender or has
entered into a statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement for an
offense which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a violation
under this chapter or comparable county or municipal ordinances, the
court shall assess the fee as specified under subsection (1) of this
section. The court may not suspend payment of all or part of the fee
unless it finds that the minor does not have the ability to pay the
fee.
(4) Any fee assessed under this section shall be collected by the
clerk of the court and distributed each month to the state treasurer
for deposit in the prostitution prevention and intervention account
under RCW 43.63A.740 for the purpose of funding prostitution prevention
and intervention activities.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement" means an
agreement under RCW 13.40.080 or any written agreement between a person
accused of an offense listed in subsection (1) of this section and a
court or a county or city prosecutor, or a designee thereof, whereby
the person agrees to fulfill certain conditions in lieu of prosecution;
and
(b) "Deferred sentence" means a sentence that will not be carried
out if the defendant meets certain requirements, such as complying with
the conditions of probation.

--- END ---