BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.270 and 2001 c 180 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Notwithstanding any provision of)) Except as provided in
chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.28, 41.32, 41.35, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW
((to the contrary)), on and after March 19, 1976, any member or former
member who (a) receives a retirement allowance earned by said former
member as deferred compensation from any public retirement system
authorized by the general laws of this state, or (b) is eligible to
receive a retirement allowance from any public retirement system listed
in RCW 41.50.030, but chooses not to apply, or (c) is the beneficiary
of a disability allowance from any public retirement system listed in
RCW 41.50.030 shall be estopped from becoming a member of or accruing
any contractual rights whatsoever in any other public retirement system
listed in RCW 41.50.030: PROVIDED, That (a) and (b) of this subsection
shall not apply to persons who have accumulated less than fifteen years
service credit in any such system.
(2) Nothing in this section is intended to apply to any retirement
system except those listed in RCW 41.50.030 and the city employee
retirement systems for Seattle, Tacoma, and Spokane. Subsection (1)(b)
of this section does not apply to a dual member as defined in RCW
41.54.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.32.860 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 9 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Except under RCW 41.32.862, no retiree shall be eligible to
receive such retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is
employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010,
41.32.010, ((or)) 41.35.010, or 41.37.010, or as a law enforcement
officer or fire fighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030.
(2) If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this section,
his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the
employment that caused the suspension of benefits. Upon reinstatement,
the retiree's benefits shall be actuarially recomputed pursuant to the
rules adopted by the department.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.34.070 and 1998 c 117 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the member retires, becomes disabled, or otherwise
terminates employment, the balance in the member's account may be
distributed in accordance with an option selected by the member either
as a lump sum or pursuant to other options authorized by the board.
(2) If the member dies while in service, the balance of the
member's account may be distributed in accordance with an option
selected by the member either as a lump sum or pursuant to other
options authorized by the board. The distribution is as follows:
(a) The distribution shall be made to such person or persons as the
member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and
filed with the department((.));
(b) If there be no such designated person or persons still living
at the time of the member's death, the balance of the member's account
in the retirement system, less any amount identified as owing to an
obligee upon withdrawal of such account balance pursuant to a court
order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's
surviving spouse as if in fact such spouse had been nominated by
written designation((, or));
(c) If there is no surviving spouse, then to such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by
written designation duly executed and filed with the department; or
(d) If there is no such designated person or persons still living
at the time of the member's death, then to the member's legal
representatives.
(3) If a member has a terminal illness and terminates from
employment, the member may choose to have the balance in the member's
account distributed as a lump sum payment based on the most recent
valuation in order to expedite the distribution. The department shall
make this payment within ten working days after receipt of notice of
termination of employment, documentation verifying the terminal
illness, and an application for payment.
(4) The distribution under subsections (1), (2), or (3) of this
section shall be less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon
withdrawal pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.37.010 and 2004 c 242 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Retirement system" means the Washington public safety
employees' retirement system provided for in this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created
in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(3) "State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of
Washington.
(4) "Employer" means the Washington state department of
corrections, the Washington state parks and recreation commission, the
Washington state gambling commission, the Washington state patrol, the
Washington state liquor control board, county corrections departments,
((and)) city corrections departments not covered under chapter 41.28
RCW, or other employers employing statewide elective officials.
(5) "Member" means any employee employed by an employer on a full-time, fully compensated basis within the following job classes in
effect as of January 1, 2004: City corrections officers, jailers,
police support officers, custody officers, and bailiffs; county
corrections officers, jailers, custody officers, and sheriffs
corrections officers; county probation officers and probation
counselors; state correctional officers, correctional sergeants, and
community corrections officers; liquor enforcement officers; park
rangers; commercial vehicle enforcement officers; and gambling special
agents.
(6)(a) "Compensation earnable" for members, means salaries or wages
earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services,
including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries
deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b),
414(h), and 457 of the United States internal revenue code, but shall
exclude nonmoney maintenance compensation and lump sum or other
payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation,
unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay.
(b) "Compensation earnable" for members also includes the following
actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:
(i) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on
reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer
to an individual in lieu of reinstatement, which are awarded or granted
as the equivalent of the salary or wage which the individual would have
earned during a payroll period shall be considered compensation
earnable to the extent provided in this subsection, and the individual
shall receive the equivalent service credit;
(ii) In any year in which a member serves in the legislature, the
member shall have the option of having such member's compensation
earnable be the greater of:
(A) The compensation earnable the member would have received had
such member not served in the legislature; or
(B) Such member's actual compensation earnable received for
nonlegislative public employment and legislative service combined. Any
additional contributions to the retirement system required because
compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater
than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be
paid by the member for both member and employer contributions;
(iii) Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045,
and 72.09.240;
(iv) Compensation that a member would have received but for a
disability occurring in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW
41.37.070;
(v) Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the
leave sharing program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through
41.04.670; and
(vi) Compensation that a member receives for being in standby
status. For the purposes of this section, a member is in standby
status when not being paid for time actually worked and the employer
requires the member to be prepared to report immediately for work, if
the need arises, although the need may not arise.
(7) "Service" means periods of employment by a member on or after
July 1, 2006, for one or more employers for which compensation earnable
is paid. Compensation earnable earned for ninety or more hours in any
calendar month shall constitute one service credit month. Compensation
earnable earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours
in any calendar month shall constitute one-half service credit month of
service. Compensation earnable earned for less than seventy hours in
any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service credit month of
service. Time spent in standby status, whether compensated or not, is
not service.
Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in
the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits.
(a) Service in any state elective position shall be deemed to be
full-time service.
(b) A member shall receive a total of not more than twelve service
credit months of service for such calendar year. If an individual is
employed in an eligible position by one or more employers the
individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during
any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours
is rendered.
(8) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.
(9) "Service credit month" means a month or an accumulation of
months of service credit which is equal to one.
(10) "Membership service" means all service rendered as a member.
(11) "Beneficiary" means any person in receipt of a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer by another person.
(12) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may
determine.
(13) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all contributions
standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the
regular interest thereon.
(14) "Average final compensation" means the member's average
compensation earnable of the highest consecutive sixty months of
service credit months prior to such member's retirement, termination,
or death. Periods constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be
used in the calculation of average final compensation except under RCW
41.37.290.
(15) "Final compensation" means the annual rate of compensation
earnable by a member at the time of termination of employment.
(16) "Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated
contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(17) "Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions
made by the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(18) "Retirement allowance" means monthly payments to a retiree or
beneficiary as provided in this chapter.
(19) "Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free
from the employer's direction and control over the performance of work.
The department shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection
consistent with common law.
(20) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when
computed upon the basis of such mortality and other tables as may be
adopted by the director.
(21) "Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a
retirement allowance as provided by this chapter.
(22) "Eligible position" means any permanent, full-time, fully
compensated position included in subsection (5) of this section.
(23) "Ineligible position" means any position which does not
conform with the requirements set forth in subsection (22) of this
section.
(24) "Leave of absence" means the period of time a member is
authorized by the employer to be absent from service without being
separated from membership.
(25) "Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer while a member.
(26) "Director" means the director of the department.
(27) "State elective position" means any position held by any
person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed
as a member of the legislature.
(28) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(29) "Plan" means the Washington public safety employees'
retirement system plan 2.
(30) "Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual
average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage
earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor statistics, United States department of labor.
(31) "Index A" means the index for the year prior to the
determination of a postretirement adjustment.
(32) "Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.
(33) "Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index
B.
(34) "Separation from service" occurs when a person has terminated
all employment with an employer.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.37.020 and 2004 c 242 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Membership in the retirement system shall consist of all regularly
compensated public safety employees who are members as defined in RCW
41.37.010(5), with the following exceptions:
(1) Persons in ineligible positions;
(2)(a) Persons holding elective offices or persons appointed
directly by the governor to statewide elective offices: PROVIDED, That
such persons shall have the option of ((applying for)) continuing
membership during such periods of employment: AND PROVIDED FURTHER,
That any persons holding or who have held elective offices or persons
appointed by the governor who are members in the retirement system and
who have, prior to becoming such members, previously held an elective
office, and did not at the start of such initial or successive terms of
office exercise their option to become members, may apply for
membership to be effective during such term or terms of office, and
shall be allowed to establish the service credit applicable to such
term or terms of office upon payment of the employee contributions
therefor by the employee with interest as determined by the director
and employer contributions therefor by the employer or employee with
interest as determined by the director: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That all
contributions with interest submitted by the employee under this
subsection shall be placed in the employee's individual account in the
employee's savings fund and be treated as any other contribution made
by the employee, with the exception that any contributions submitted by
the employee in payment of the employer's obligation, together with the
interest the director may apply to the employer's contribution, shall
not be considered part of the member's annuity for any purpose except
withdrawal of contributions;
(b) A member holding elective office who has elected to apply for
membership pursuant to (a) of this subsection and who later wishes to
be eligible for a retirement allowance shall have the option of ending
his or her membership in the retirement system. A member wishing to
end his or her membership under this subsection must file on a form
supplied by the department a statement indicating that the member
agrees to irrevocably abandon any claim for service for future periods
served as an elected official. A member who receives more than fifteen
thousand dollars per year in compensation for his or her elective
service, adjusted annually for inflation by the director, is not
eligible for the option provided by this subsection (2)(b);
(3) Retirement system retirees: PROVIDED, That following
reemployment in an eligible position, a retiree may elect to
prospectively become a member of the retirement system if otherwise
eligible;
(4) Persons enrolled in state-approved apprenticeship programs,
authorized under chapter 49.04 RCW, and who are employed by employers
to earn hours to complete such apprenticeship programs, if the employee
is a member of a union-sponsored retirement plan and is making
contributions to such a retirement plan or if the employee is a member
of a Taft-Hartley retirement plan;
(5) Persons rendering professional services to an employer on a
fee, retainer, or contract basis or when the income from these services
is less than fifty percent of the gross income received from the
person's practice of a profession; and
(6) Employees who (a) are not citizens of the United States, (b)
are not covered by chapter 41.48 RCW, (c) are not excluded from
membership under this chapter or chapter 41.04 RCW, (d) are residents
of this state, and (e) make an irrevocable election to be excluded from
membership, in writing, which is submitted to the director within
thirty days after employment in an eligible position.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.37.050 and 2004 c 242 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment in an eligible position with
an employer as defined in this chapter sooner than one calendar month
after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement
allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for every eight
hours worked during that month. This reduction will be applied each
month until the retiree remains absent from employment with an employer
for one full calendar month.
(b) If a retiree enters employment in an eligible position with an
employer as defined in chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(c) The benefit reduction provided in (a) and (b) of this
subsection will accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per
month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied
to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) A retiree who has satisfied the break in employment requirement
of subsection (1) of this section may work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours per calendar year in an eligible position as defined in RCW
41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, without suspension of his or her
benefit.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under this
chapter, he or she terminates his or her retirement status and becomes
a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the period of
membership and the individual shall make contributions and receive
membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again retire
if eligible in accordance with this chapter. However, if the right to
retire is exercised to become effective before the member has rendered
two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and survivor
options the member had at the time of the member's previous retirement
shall be reinstated.
(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the select
committee on pension policy.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.37.250 and 2004 c 242 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 11.07.010, if a member or a vested
member who has not completed at least ten years of service dies, the
amount of the accumulated contributions standing to that member's
credit in the retirement system at the time of the member's death, less
any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of
accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW
41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or
persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by
written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If
there is no designated person or persons still living at the time of
the member's death, the member's accumulated contributions standing to
the member's credit in the retirement system, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact that
spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there is no
surviving spouse, then to the member's legal representatives.
(2) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies, the surviving spouse or
eligible child or children shall elect to receive either:
(a) A retirement allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.37.210, actuarially reduced by the amount of any lump sum benefit
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670 and
actuarially adjusted to reflect a joint and one hundred percent
survivor option under RCW 41.37.170 and, except under subsection (4) of
this section, if the member was not eligible for normal retirement at
the date of death a further reduction as described in RCW 41.37.210; if
a surviving spouse who is receiving a retirement allowance dies leaving
a child or children of the member under the age of majority, then the
child or children shall continue to receive an allowance in an amount
equal to that which was being received by the surviving spouse, share
and share alike, until the child or children reach the age of majority;
if there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive an allowance at the
time of the member's death, the member's child or children under the
age of majority shall receive an allowance, share and share alike,
calculated under this section making the assumption that the ages of
the spouse and member were equal at the time of the member's death; or
(b) The member's accumulated contributions, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670.
(3) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies and is not survived by a
spouse or an eligible child, then the accumulated contributions
standing to the member's credit, less any amount identified as owing to
an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid:
(a) To a person or persons, estate, trust, or organization as the
member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and
filed with the department; or
(b) If there is no designated person or persons still living at the
time of the member's death, then to the member's legal representatives.
(4) A member who is killed in the course of employment, as
determined by the director of the department of labor and industries,
is not subject to ((an actuarial)) reduction under RCW 41.37.210. The
member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.37.190.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.40.197 and 1995 c 345 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 1995, and annually thereafter, the retirement
allowance of a person meeting the requirements of this section shall be
increased by the annual increase amount.
(2) The following persons shall be eligible for the benefit
provided in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) A beneficiary who has received a retirement allowance for at
least one year and has attained at least age sixty-six by July 1st in
the calendar year in which the annual increase is given; or
(b) A beneficiary whose retirement allowance is lower than the
minimum benefit provided under RCW 41.40.1984.
(3) ((The following persons shall also be eligible for the benefit
provided in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) A beneficiary receiving the minimum benefit on June 30, 1995,
under RCW 41.40.198; or
(b) A recipient of a survivor benefit on June 30, 1995, which has
been increased by RCW 41.40.325.
(4))) If otherwise eligible, those receiving an annual adjustment
under RCW 41.40.188(1)(c) shall be eligible for the annual increase
adjustment in addition to the benefit that would have been received
absent this section.
(((5))) (4) Those receiving a benefit under RCW 41.40.220(1), or a
survivor of a disabled member under RCW 41.44.170(5) shall be eligible
for the benefit provided by this section.
(((6))) (5) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal
this section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a
contractual right to receive this postretirement adjustment not granted
prior to that time.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.40.850 and 2000 c 247 s 315 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 41.40.037, no retiree under the
provisions of plan 3 shall be eligible to receive such retiree's
monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an eligible
position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, ((or)) 41.35.010, or
41.37.010, or as a law enforcement officer or fire fighter as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, except that a retiree who ends his or her membership
in the retirement system pursuant to RCW 41.40.023(3)(b) is not subject
to this section if the retiree's only employment is as an elective
official of a city or town.
(2) If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this section,
his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the
employment that caused his or her benefits to be suspended. Upon
reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be actuarially recomputed
pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.
(3) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 41.45.070 and 2003 c 92 s 5 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the basic employer contribution rate established
in RCW 41.45.060 or 41.45.054, the department shall also charge
employers of public employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement
system, school employees' retirement system, or Washington state patrol
retirement system members an additional supplemental rate to pay for
the cost of additional benefits, if any, granted to members of those
systems. Except as provided in subsections (6) and (7) of this
section, the supplemental contribution rates required by this section
shall be calculated by the state actuary and shall be charged
regardless of language to the contrary contained in the statute which
authorizes additional benefits.
(2) In addition to the basic member, employer, and state
contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.0604 for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2, the department
shall also establish supplemental rates to pay for the cost of
additional benefits, if any, granted to members of the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2. Except as
provided in subsection (6) of this section, these supplemental rates
shall be calculated by the actuary retained by the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' board and the state actuary through the
process provided in RCW 41.26.720(1)(a) and the state treasurer shall
transfer the additional required contributions regardless of language
to the contrary contained in the statute which authorizes the
additional benefits.
(3) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
benefit increases provided to active members of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
Washington state patrol retirement system, shall be calculated as the
level percentage of all members' pay needed to fund the cost of the
benefit not later than June 30, 2024.
(4) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
benefit increases provided to active and retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the teachers'
retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, or the school employees'
retirement system plan 2 and plan 3 shall be calculated as the level
percentage of all members' pay needed to fund the cost of the benefit,
as calculated under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, or 41.45.067.
(5) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
postretirement adjustments which are provided on a nonautomatic basis
to current retirees shall be calculated as the percentage of pay needed
to fund the adjustments as they are paid to the retirees. The
supplemental rate charged under this section to fund automatic
postretirement adjustments for active or retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 shall be calculated as the level percentage of pay needed to
fund the cost of the automatic adjustments not later than June 30,
2024.
(6) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 340, Laws of
1998.
(7) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW;
section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998; or section 701, chapter 341,
Laws of 1998.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 41.35.050 (Information furnished by employees, appointive
and elective officials) and 1998 c 341 s 6;
(2) RCW 41.37.040 (Employee information--Required) and 2004 c 242
s 7;
(3) RCW 41.40.032 (Information furnished by employees, appointive
and elective officials) and 1991 c 35 s 76, 1949 c 240 s 8, & 1947 c
274 s 1;
(4) 2003 1st sp.s. c 11 s 3; and
(5) RCW 41.50.067 (Adopted employer rates -- Notification to
employers) and 1993 c 519 s 21.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 4 through 7 of this act take
effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Section 10 of this act expires July 1,
2006.

--- END ---