BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.10.130 and 2003 c 301 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Public bodies may use a job order contract for public works
projects when:
(a) A public body has made a determination that the use of job
order contracts will benefit the public by providing an effective means
of reducing the total lead-time and cost for public works projects or
repair required at public facilities through the use of unit price
books and work orders by eliminating time-consuming, costly aspects of
the traditional public works process, which require separate
contracting actions for each small project;
(b) The work order to be issued for a particular project does not
exceed two hundred thousand dollars;
(c) Less than twenty percent of the dollar value of the work order
consists of items of work not contained in the unit price book; and
(d) At least eighty percent of the job order contract must be
subcontracted to entities other than the job order contractor.
(2) Public bodies shall award job order contracts through a
competitive process utilizing public requests for proposals. Public
bodies shall make an effort to solicit proposals from a certified
minority or certified woman-owned contractor to the extent permitted by
the Washington state civil rights act, RCW 49.60.400. The public body
shall publish, at least once in a legal newspaper of general
circulation published in or as near as possible to that part of the
county in which the public works will be done, a request for proposals
for job order contracts and the availability and location of the
request for proposal documents. The public body shall ensure that the
request for proposal documents at a minimum includes:
(a) A detailed description of the scope of the job order contract
including performance, technical requirements and specifications,
functional and operational elements, minimum and maximum work order
amounts, duration of the contract, and options to extend the job order
contract;
(b) The reasons for using job order contracts;
(c) A description of the qualifications required of the proposer;
(d) The identity of the specific unit price book to be used;
(e) The minimum contracted amount committed to the selected job
order contractor;
(f) A description of the process the public body will use to
evaluate qualifications and proposals, including evaluation factors and
the relative weight of factors. The public body shall ensure that
evaluation factors include, but are not limited to, proposal price and
the ability of the proposer to perform the job order contract. In
evaluating the ability of the proposer to perform the job order
contract, the public body may consider: The ability of the
professional personnel who will work on the job order contract; past
performance on similar contracts; ability to meet time and budget
requirements; ability to provide a performance and payment bond for the
job order contract; recent, current, and projected work loads of the
proposer; location; and the concept of the proposal;
(g) The form of the contract to be awarded;
(h) The method for pricing renewals of or extensions to the job
order contract;
(i) A notice that the proposals are subject to the provisions of
RCW 39.10.100; and
(j) Other information relevant to the project.
(3) A public body shall establish a committee to evaluate the
proposals. After the committee has selected the most qualified
finalists, the finalists shall submit final proposals, including sealed
bids based upon the identified unit price book. Such bids may be in
the form of coefficient markups from listed price book costs. The
public body shall award the contract to the firm submitting the highest
scored final proposal using the evaluation factors and the relative
weight of factors published in the public request for proposals.
(4) The public body shall provide a protest period of at least ten
business days following the day of the announcement of the apparent
successful proposal to allow a protester to file a detailed statement
of the grounds of the protest. The public body shall promptly make a
determination on the merits of the protest and provide to all proposers
a written decision of denial or acceptance of the protest. The public
body shall not execute the contract until two business days following
the public body's decision on the protest.
(5) The public body shall issue no work orders until it has
approved, in consultation with the office of minority and women's
business enterprises or the equivalent local agency, a plan prepared by
the job order contractor that equitably spreads certified women and
minority business enterprise subcontracting opportunities, to the
extent permitted by the Washington state civil rights act, RCW
49.60.400, among the various subcontract disciplines.
(6) Job order contracts may be executed for an initial contract
term of not to exceed two years, with the option of extending or
renewing the job order contract for one year. All extensions or
renewals must be priced as provided in the request for proposals. The
extension or renewal must be mutually agreed to by the public body and
the job order contractor.
(7) The maximum total dollar amount that may be awarded under a job
order contract shall not exceed three million dollars in the first year
of the job order contract, five million dollars over the first two
years of the job order contract, and, if extended or renewed, eight
million dollars over the three years of the job order contract.
(8) For each job order contract, public bodies shall not issue more
than two work orders equal to or greater than one hundred fifty
thousand dollars in a twelve-month contract performance period.
(9) All work orders issued for the same project shall be treated as
a single work order for purposes of the one hundred fifty thousand
dollar limit on work orders in subsection (8) of this section and the
two hundred thousand dollar limit on work orders in subsection (1)(b)
of this section.
(10) Any new permanent, enclosed building space constructed under
a work order shall not exceed two thousand gross square feet.
(11) Each public body may have no more than two job order contracts
in effect at any one time, except that the department of general
administration may have no more than ten job order contracts in effect
at any one time for the purpose of providing regional contracts.
(12) For purposes of chapters 39.08, 39.12, 39.76, and 60.28 RCW,
each work order issued shall be treated as a separate contract. The
alternate filing provisions of RCW 39.12.040(2) shall apply to each
work order that otherwise meets the eligibility requirements of RCW
39.12.040(2).
(13) The requirements of RCW 39.30.060 do not apply to requests for
proposals for job order contracts.
(14) Job order contractors shall pay prevailing wages for all work
that would otherwise be subject to the requirements of chapter 39.12
RCW. Prevailing wages for all work performed pursuant to each work
order must be the rates in effect at the time the individual work order
is issued.
(15) If, in the initial contract term, the public body, at no fault
of the job order contractor, fails to issue the minimum amount of work
orders stated in the public request for proposals, the public body
shall pay the contractor an amount equal to the difference between the
minimum work order amount and the actual total of the work orders
issued multiplied by an appropriate percentage for overhead and profit
contained in the general conditions for Washington state facility
construction. This will be the contractor's sole remedy.
(16) All job order contracts awarded under this section must be
executed before July 1, 2007, however the job order contract may be
extended or renewed as provided for in this section.
(17) For purposes of this section, "public body" includes any
school district.

--- END ---