BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative youth advisory council is established to
examine issues of importance to youth, including but not limited to
education, employment, strategies to increase youth participation in
state and municipal government, safe environments for youth, substance
abuse, emotional and physical health, foster care, poverty,
homelessness, and youth access to services on a statewide and municipal
basis.
(2) The council consists of twenty-two members age eighteen and
younger, as provided in this subsection. The council shall select a
chair from among its members.
(a) Five members shall be selected by each of the two major
caucuses in the senate, appointed by the secretary of the senate.
(b) Five members shall be selected by each of the two major
caucuses in the house of representatives, appointed by the chief clerk
of the house of representatives.
(c) The governor shall appoint two members.
(3) Except for initial members, members shall serve two-year terms,
and if eligible, may be reappointed for subsequent two-year terms.
One-half of the initial members shall be appointed to one-year terms,
and these appointments shall be made in such a way as to preserve
overall representation on the committee.
(4) The council shall have the following duties:
(a) Advising the legislature on proposed and pending legislation,
including state budget expenditures and policy matters relating to
youth;
(b) Advising the standing committees of the legislature and study
commissions, committees, and task forces regarding issues relating to
youth;
(c) Conducting periodic seminars for its members regarding
leadership, government, and the legislature;
(d) Meeting at least three times but not more than six times per
year, including not more than two public hearings on issues of
importance to youth; and
(e) Reporting annually by February 15th to the legislature on its
activities, including proposed legislation that implements
recommendations of the council.
(5) Members shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(6) Senate committee services and the house of representatives
office of program research shall provide staff assistance to the
council.

--- END ---