BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.50.435 and 2003 c 53 s 346 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who violates RCW 69.50.401 by manufacturing,
selling, delivering, or possessing with the intent to manufacture,
sell, or deliver a controlled substance listed under RCW 69.50.401 or
who violates RCW 69.50.410 by selling for profit any controlled
substance or counterfeit substance classified in schedule I, RCW
69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of marihuana to a person:
(a) In a school;
(b) On a school bus;
(c) Within ((one thousand)) two hundred feet of a school bus route
stop designated by the school district during the period of time when
students are waiting for a school bus or being discharged from a school
bus;
(d) Within ((one thousand)) two hundred feet of the perimeter of
the school grounds during regular school hours;
(e) In a public park;
(f) In a public housing project designated by a local governing
authority as a drug-free zone;
(g) On a public transit vehicle;
(h) In a public transit stop shelter;
(i) At a civic center designated as a drug-free zone by the local
governing authority; or
(j) Within one thousand feet of the perimeter of a facility
designated under (i) of this subsection, if the local governing
authority specifically designates the one thousand foot perimeter
may be punished by a fine of up to twice the fine otherwise authorized
by this chapter, but not including twice the fine authorized by RCW
69.50.406, or by imprisonment of up to twice the imprisonment otherwise
authorized by this chapter, but not including twice the imprisonment
authorized by RCW 69.50.406, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
The provisions of this section shall not operate to more than double
the fine or imprisonment otherwise authorized by this chapter for an
offense.
(2) It is not a defense to a prosecution for a violation of this
section that the person was unaware that the prohibited conduct took
place while in a school or school bus or within ((one thousand)) two
hundred feet of the school or school bus route stop during the
restricted times, in a public park, in a public housing project
designated by a local governing authority as a drug-free zone, on a
public transit vehicle, in a public transit stop shelter, at a civic
center designated as a drug-free zone by the local governing authority,
or within one thousand feet of the perimeter of a facility designated
under subsection (1)(i) of this section, if the local governing
authority specifically designates the one thousand foot perimeter.
(3) It is not a defense to a prosecution for a violation of this
section or any other prosecution under this chapter that persons under
the age of eighteen were not present in the school, the school bus, the
public park, the public housing project designated by a local governing
authority as a drug-free zone, or the public transit vehicle, or at the
school bus route stop, the public transit vehicle stop shelter, at a
civic center designated as a drug-free zone by the local governing
authority, or within one thousand feet of the perimeter of a facility
designated under subsection (1)(i) of this section, if the local
governing authority specifically designates the one thousand foot
perimeter at the time of the offense or, for violation of subsection
(1)(a) or (b) of this section, that school was not in session.
(4) It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution for a violation
of this section that the prohibited conduct took place entirely within
a private residence, that no person under eighteen years of age or
younger was present in such private residence at any time during the
commission of the offense, and that the prohibited conduct did not
involve delivering, manufacturing, selling, or possessing with the
intent to manufacture, sell, or deliver any controlled substance in RCW
69.50.401 for profit. The affirmative defense established in this
section shall be proved by the defendant by a preponderance of the
evidence. This section shall not be construed to establish an
affirmative defense with respect to a prosecution for an offense
defined in any other section of this chapter.
(5) In a prosecution under this section, a map produced or
reproduced by any municipality, school district, county, transit
authority engineer, or public housing authority for the purpose of
depicting the location and boundaries of the area on or within ((one
thousand)) two hundred feet of any property used for a school((,)) or
school bus route stop, or within one thousand feet of any public park,
public housing project designated by a local governing authority as a
drug-free zone, public transit vehicle stop shelter, or a civic center
designated as a drug-free zone by a local governing authority, or a
true copy of such a map, shall under proper authentication, be
admissible and shall constitute prima facie evidence of the location
and boundaries of those areas if the governing body of the
municipality, school district, county, or transit authority has adopted
a resolution or ordinance approving the map as the official location
and record of the location and boundaries of the area on or within
((one thousand)) two hundred feet of the school((,)) or school bus
route stop, or within one thousand feet of any public park, public
housing project designated by a local governing authority as a drug-free zone, public transit vehicle stop shelter, or civic center
designated as a drug-free zone by a local governing authority. Any map
approved under this section or a true copy of the map shall be filed
with the clerk of the municipality or county, and shall be maintained
as an official record of the municipality or county. This section
shall not be construed as precluding the prosecution from introducing
or relying upon any other evidence or testimony to establish any
element of the offense. This section shall not be construed as
precluding the use or admissibility of any map or diagram other than
the one which has been approved by the governing body of a
municipality, school district, county, transit authority, or public
housing authority if the map or diagram is otherwise admissible under
court rule.
(6) As used in this section the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "School" has the meaning under RCW 28A.150.010 or 28A.150.020.
The term "school" also includes a private school approved under RCW
28A.195.010;
(b) "School bus" means a school bus as defined by the
superintendent of public instruction by rule which is owned and
operated by any school district and all school buses which are
privately owned and operated under contract or otherwise with any
school district in the state for the transportation of students. The
term does not include buses operated by common carriers in the urban
transportation of students such as transportation of students through
a municipal transportation system;
(c) "School bus route stop" means a school bus stop as designated
by a school district, not including areas along a school bus route
further than two hundred feet from a school bus route stop;
(d) "Public park" means land, including any facilities or
improvements on the land, that is operated as a park by the state or a
local government;
(e) "Public transit vehicle" means any motor vehicle, street car,
train, trolley vehicle, or any other device, vessel, or vehicle which
is owned or operated by a transit authority and which is used for the
purpose of carrying passengers on a regular schedule;
(f) "Transit authority" means a city, county, or state
transportation system, transportation authority, public transportation
benefit area, public transit authority, or metropolitan municipal
corporation within the state that operates public transit vehicles;
(g) "Stop shelter" means a passenger shelter designated by a
transit authority;
(h) "Civic center" means a publicly owned or publicly operated
place or facility used for recreational, educational, or cultural
activities;
(i) "Public housing project" means the same as "housing project" as
defined in RCW 35.82.020.

--- END ---