BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.40.170 and 2002 c 27 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member who has served or shall serve on active federal
service in the military or naval forces of the United States and who
left or shall leave an employer to enter such service shall be deemed
to be on military leave of absence if he or she has resumed or shall
resume employment as an employee within one year from termination
thereof.
(2) If he or she has applied or shall apply for reinstatement of
employment, within one year from termination of the military service,
and is refused employment for reasons beyond his or her control, he or
she shall, upon resumption of service within ten years have such
service credited to him or her.
(3) In any event, after completing twenty-five years of creditable
service, any member may have service in the armed forces credited to
him or her as a member whether or not he or she left the employ of an
employer to enter the armed service: PROVIDED, That in no instance,
described in this section, shall military service in excess of five
years be credited: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each instance the
member must restore all withdrawn accumulated contributions, which
restoration must be completed within five years of membership service
following the first resumption of employment or complete twenty-five
years of creditable service: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section
will not apply to any individual, not a veteran within the meaning of
RCW 41.04.005.
(4) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member
who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of
the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may,
on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service
credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in
the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased
member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or
children:
(a) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while
serving in the uniformed services; and
(b) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable
service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death.
(5) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in
the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit
under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed
services if:
(a) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or
she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions
or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services; and
(b) The member provides to the director proof of honorable
discharge from the uniformed services.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.40.710 and 2000 c 247 s 1106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a
member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided
for under the provisions of RCW 41.40.610 through 41.40.740.
(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an
authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor
organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor
organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period
of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence.
This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the
member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of
leave. The compensation earnable reported for a member who establishes
service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary
paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member
shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit
during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member
is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such
credit may be obtained only if:
(a) The member makes both the plan 2 employer and member
contributions plus interest as determined by the department for the
period of the authorized leave of absence within five years of
resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner; or
(b) If not within five years of resumption of service but prior to
retirement, pay the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be
based on the average of the member's compensation earnable at both the
time the authorized leave of absence was granted and the time the
member resumed employment.
(4) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
((armed forces)) uniformed services of the United States shall be
entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of
military service. This subsection shall be administered in a manner
consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services
employment and reemployment rights act.
(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection
if:
(i) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the
uniformed services of the United States ((armed forces)), the member
applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member
immediately prior to the member entering the ((United States armed
forces)) uniformed services; and
(ii) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW
41.45.061 and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or
prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or
(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the
member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the
member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii), (d)(iii),
or (e)(iii) of this subsection, the department shall establish the
member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its
contribution required under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 for
the period of military service, plus interest as determined by the
department.
(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii)
of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would
have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with
reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the
year prior to when the member went on military leave.
(d) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member
who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of
the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may,
on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service
credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in
the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased
member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or
children:
(i) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while
serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable
service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and
(iii) Pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45
RCW within five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution
of any benefit, whichever comes first.
(e) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in
the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit
under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed
services if:
(i) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or
she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions
or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) The member provides to the director proof of honorable
discharge from the uniformed services; and
(iii) The member pays the employee contributions required under
chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the director's determination of
total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever
comes first.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.40.805 and 2000 c 247 s 306 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a
member's employer shall continue to receive service credit.
(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an
authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor
organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor
organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period
of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence.
This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the
member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of
leave. The earnable compensation reported for a member who establishes
service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary
paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member
shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit
during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member
is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such
credit may be obtained only if:
(a) The member makes the contribution on behalf of the employer,
plus interest, as determined by the department; and
(b) The member makes the employee contribution, plus interest, as
determined by the department, to the defined contribution portion.
The contributions required shall be based on the average of the
member's earnable compensation at both the time the authorized leave of
absence was granted and the time the member resumed employment.
(4) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
((armed forces)) uniformed services of the United States shall be
entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of
military service if within ninety days of the member's honorable
discharge from the uniformed services of the United States ((armed
forces)), the member applies for reemployment with the employer who
employed the member immediately prior to the member entering the
((United States armed forces)) uniformed services. This subsection
shall be administered in a manner consistent with the requirements of
the federal uniformed services employment and reemployment rights act.
The department shall establish the member's service credit and
shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW
41.45.060 and 41.45.067 for the period of military service, plus
interest as determined by the department. Service credit under this
subsection may be obtained only if the member makes the employee
contribution to the defined contribution portion as determined by the
department.
The contributions required shall be based on the compensation the
member would have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be
estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the
member in the year prior to when the member went on military leave.
(a) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member
who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of
the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may,
on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service
credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in
the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased
member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or
children:
(i) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while
serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable
service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and
(iii) Pays the employee contributions required under this
subsection within five years of the date of death or prior to the
distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first.
(b) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in
the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit
under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed
services if:
(i) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or
she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions
or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) The member provides to the director proof of honorable
discharge from the uniformed services; and
(iii) The member pays the employee contributions required under
this subsection within five years of the director's determination of
total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever
comes first.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.35.470 and 1998 c 341 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a
member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided
for under the provisions of RCW 41.35.400 through 41.35.599.
(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an
authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor
organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor
organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period
of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence.
This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the
member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of
leave. The compensation earnable reported for a member who establishes
service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary
paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member
shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit
during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member
is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such
credit may be obtained only if:
(a) The member makes both the plan 2 employer and member
contributions plus interest as determined by the department for the
period of the authorized leave of absence within five years of
resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner; or
(b) If not within five years of resumption of service but prior to
retirement, pay the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be
based on the average of the member's compensation earnable at both the
time the authorized leave of absence was granted and the time the
member resumed employment.
(4) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
((armed forces)) uniformed services of the United States shall be
entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of
military service. This subsection shall be administered in a manner
consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services
employment and reemployment rights act.
(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection
if:
(i) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the
uniformed services of the United States ((armed forces)), the member
applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member
immediately prior to the member entering the ((United States armed
forces)) uniformed services; and
(ii) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW
41.35.430 within five years of resumption of service or prior to
retirement, whichever comes sooner; or
(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the
member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the
member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii), (d)(iii),
or (e)(iii) of this subsection, the department shall establish the
member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its
contribution required under RCW 41.35.430 for the period of military
service, plus interest as determined by the department.
(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii)
of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would
have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with
reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the
year prior to when the member went on military leave.
(d) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member
who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of
the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may,
on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service
credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in
the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased
member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or
children:
(i) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while
serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable
service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and
(iii) Pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45
RCW within five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution
of any benefit, whichever comes first.
(e) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in
the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit
under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed
services if:
(i) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or
she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions
or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) The member provides to the director proof of honorable
discharge from the uniformed services; and
(iii) The member pays the employee contributions required under
chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the director's determination of
total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever
comes first.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.35.650 and 1998 c 341 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a
member's employer shall continue to receive service credit.
(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an
authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor
organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor
organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period
of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence.
This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the
member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of
leave. The earnable compensation reported for a member who establishes
service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary
paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member
shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit
during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member
is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such
credit may be obtained only if:
(a) The member makes the contribution on behalf of the employer,
plus interest, as determined by the department; and
(b) The member makes the employee contribution, plus interest, as
determined by the department, to the defined contribution portion.
The contributions required shall be based on the average of the
member's earnable compensation at both the time the authorized leave of
absence was granted and the time the member resumed employment.
(4) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
((armed forces)) uniformed services of the United States shall be
entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of
military service if within ninety days of the member's honorable
discharge from the uniformed services of the United States ((armed
forces)), the member applies for reemployment with the employer who
employed the member immediately prior to the member entering the
((United States armed forces)) uniformed services. This subsection
shall be administered in a manner consistent with the requirements of
the federal uniformed services employment and reemployment rights act.
The department shall establish the member's service credit and
shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW
41.35.720 for the period of military service, plus interest as
determined by the department. Service credit under this subsection may
be obtained only if the member makes the employee contribution to the
defined contribution portion as determined by the department.
The contributions required shall be based on the compensation the
member would have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be
estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the
member in the year prior to when the member went on military leave.
(a) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member
who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of
the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may,
on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service
credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in
the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased
member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or
children:
(i) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while
serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable
service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and
(iii) Pays the employee contributions required under this
subsection within five years of the date of death or prior to the
distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first.
(b) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in
the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit
under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed
services if:
(i) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or
she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions
or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) The member provides to the director proof of honorable
discharge from the uniformed services; and
(iii) The member pays the employee contributions required under
this subsection within five years of the director's determination of
total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever
comes first.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.32.260 and 1992 c 212 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any member whose public school service is interrupted by active
service to the United States as a member of its ((military, naval or
air service)) uniformed services, or to the state of Washington, as a
member of the legislature, may upon becoming reemployed in the public
schools, receive credit for that service upon presenting satisfactory
proof, and contributing to the member reserve, either in a lump sum or
installments, amounts determined by the director. Except that no
military service credit in excess of five years shall be established or
reestablished after July 1, 1961, unless the service was actually
rendered during time of war. This section shall be administered in a
manner consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed
services employment and reemployment rights act.
(1) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member
who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of
the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may,
on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service
credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in
the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased
member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or
children:
(a) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while
serving in the uniformed services;
(b) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable
service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and
(c) Pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45
RCW within five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution
of any benefit, whichever comes first.
(2) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in
the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit
under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed
services if:
(a) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or
she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions
or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;
(b) The member provides to the director proof of honorable
discharge from the uniformed services; and
(c) The member pays the employee contributions required under
chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the director's determination of
total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever
comes first.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.32.810 and 1996 c 61 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a
member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided
for under the provisions of RCW 41.32.755 through 41.32.825.
(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an
authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor
organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor
organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period
of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence.
This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the
member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of
leave. The earnable compensation reported for a member who establishes
service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary
paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) Except as specified in subsection (6) of this section, a member
shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit
during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member
is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such
credit may be obtained only if the member makes both the employer and
member contributions plus interest as determined by the department for
the period of the authorized leave of absence within five years of
resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner.
(4) If a member fails to meet the time limitations of subsection
(3) of this section, the member may receive a maximum of two years of
service credit during a member's working career for those periods when
a member is on unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. This
may be done by paying the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior
to retirement.
(5) For the purpose of subsection (3) of this section, the
contribution shall not include the contribution for the unfunded
supplemental present value as required by RCW 41.32.775. The
contributions required shall be based on the average of the member's
earnable compensation at both the time the authorized leave of absence
was granted and the time the member resumed employment.
(6) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
((armed forces)) uniformed services of the United States shall be
entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of
military service. This subsection shall be administered in a manner
consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services
employment and reemployment rights act.
(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection
if:
(i) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the
uniformed services of the United States ((armed forces)), the member
applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member
immediately prior to the member entering the ((United States armed
forces)) uniformed services; and
(ii) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW
41.32.775 within five years of resumption of service or prior to
retirement, whichever comes sooner; or
(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the
member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the
member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii), (d)(iii),
or (e)(iii) of this subsection, the department shall establish the
member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its
contribution required under RCW 41.32.775 for the period of military
service, plus interest as determined by the department.
(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii)
of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would
have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with
reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the
year prior to when the member went on military leave.
(d) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member
who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of
the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may,
on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service
credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in
the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased
member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or
children:
(i) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while
serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable
service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and
(iii) Pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45
RCW within five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution
of any benefit, whichever comes first.
(e) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in
the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit
under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed
services if:
(i) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or
she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions
or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) The member provides to the director proof of honorable
discharge from the uniformed services; and
(iii) The member pays the employee contributions required under
chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the director's determination of
total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever
comes first.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.32.865 and 1996 c 61 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a
member's employer shall continue to receive service credit.
(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an
authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor
organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor
organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period
of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence.
This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the
member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of
leave. The earnable compensation reported for a member who establishes
service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary
paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member
shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit
during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member
is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such
credit may be obtained only if:
(a) The member makes the contribution on behalf of the employer,
plus interest, as determined by the department; and
(b) The member makes the employee contribution, plus interest, as
determined by the department, to the defined contribution portion.
The contributions required shall be based on the average of the
member's earnable compensation at both the time the authorized leave of
absence was granted and the time the member resumed employment.
(4) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
((armed forces)) uniformed services of the United States shall be
entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of
military service if within ninety days of the member's honorable
discharge from the uniformed services of the United States ((armed
forces)), the member applies for reemployment with the employer who
employed the member immediately prior to the member entering the
((United States armed forces)) uniformed services. This subsection
shall be administered in a manner consistent with the requirements of
the federal uniformed services employment and reemployment rights act.
The department shall establish the member's service credit and
shall bill the employer for its contribution required under chapter
239, Laws of 1995 for the period of military service, plus interest as
determined by the department. Service credit under this subsection may
be obtained only if the member makes the employee contribution to the
defined contribution portion as determined by the department.
The contributions required shall be based on the compensation the
member would have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be
estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the
member in the year prior to when the member went on military leave.
(a) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member
who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of
the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may,
on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service
credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in
the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased
member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or
children:
(i) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while
serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable
service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and
(iii) Pays the employee contributions required under this
subsection within five years of the date of death or prior to the
distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first.
(b) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in
the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit
under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed
services if:
(i) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or
she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions
or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) The member provides to the director proof of honorable
discharge from the uniformed services; and
(iii) The member pays the employee contributions required under
this subsection within five years of the director's determination of
total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever
comes first.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.26.520 and 2002 c 28 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a
member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided
for under the provisions of RCW 41.26.410 through 41.26.550.
(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an
authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor
organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor
organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period
of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence.
This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the
member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of
leave. The basic salary reported for a member who establishes service
credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to
the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) Except as specified in subsection (7) of this section, a member
shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit
during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member
is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such
credit may be obtained only if the member makes the employer, member,
and state contributions plus interest as determined by the department
for the period of the authorized leave of absence within five years of
resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner.
(4) A law enforcement member may be authorized by an employer to
work part time and to go on a part-time leave of absence. During a
part-time leave of absence a member is prohibited from any other
employment with their employer. A member is eligible to receive credit
for any portion of service credit not earned during a month of part-time leave of absence if the member makes the employer, member, and
state contributions, plus interest, as determined by the department for
the period of the authorized leave within five years of resumption of
full-time service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner. Any
service credit purchased for a part-time leave of absence is included
in the two-year maximum provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) If a member fails to meet the time limitations of subsection
(3) or (4) of this section, the member may receive a maximum of two
years of service credit during a member's working career for those
periods when a member is on unpaid leave of absence authorized by an
employer. This may be done by paying the amount required under RCW
41.50.165(2) prior to retirement.
(6) For the purpose of subsection (3) or (4) of this section the
contribution shall not include the contribution for the unfunded
supplemental present value as required by RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and
41.45.067. The contributions required shall be based on the average of
the member's basic salary at both the time the authorized leave of
absence was granted and the time the member resumed employment.
(7) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
((armed forces)) uniformed services of the United States shall be
entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of
military service. This subsection shall be administered in a manner
consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services
employment and reemployment rights act.
(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection
if:
(i) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the
uniformed services of the United States ((armed forces)), the member
applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member
immediately prior to the member entering the ((United States armed
forces)) uniformed services; and
(ii) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW
41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of
service or prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or
(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the
member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the
member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii), (d)(iii),
or (e)(iii) of this subsection, the department shall establish the
member's service credit and shall bill the employer and the state for
their respective contributions required under RCW 41.26.450 for the
period of military service, plus interest as determined by the
department.
(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii)
of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would
have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with
reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the
year prior to when the member went on military leave.
(d) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member
who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of
the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may,
on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service
credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in
the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased
member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or
children:
(i) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while
serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable
service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and
(iii) Pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45
RCW within five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution
of any benefit, whichever comes first.
(e) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in
the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit
under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed
services if:
(i) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or
she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions
or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) The member provides to the director proof of honorable
discharge from the uniformed services; and
(iii) The member pays the employee contributions required under
chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the director's determination of
total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever
comes first.
(8) A member receiving benefits under Title 51 RCW who is not
receiving benefits under this chapter shall be deemed to be on unpaid,
authorized leave of absence.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.43.260 and 2002 c 27 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon retirement from service as provided in RCW 43.43.250, a member
shall be granted a retirement allowance which shall consist of:
(1) A prior service allowance which shall be equal to two percent
of the member's average final salary multiplied by the number of years
of prior service rendered by the member.
(2) A current service allowance which shall be equal to two percent
of the member's average final salary multiplied by the number of years
of service rendered while a member of the retirement system.
(3)(a) Any member commissioned prior to January 1, 2003, with
twenty-five years service in the Washington state patrol may have the
member's service in the ((armed forces)) uniformed services credited as
a member whether or not the individual left the employ of the
Washington state patrol to enter such ((armed forces)) uniformed
services: PROVIDED, That in no instance shall military service in
excess of five years be credited: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each
instance, a member must restore all withdrawn accumulated
contributions, which restoration must be completed on the date of the
member's retirement, or as provided under RCW 43.43.130, whichever
occurs first: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section shall not apply
to any individual, not a veteran within the meaning of RCW 41.06.150.
(b) A member who leaves the Washington state patrol to enter the
((armed forces)) uniformed services of the United States shall be
entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of
military service. This subsection shall be administered in a manner
consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services
employment and reemployment rights act.
(i) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection
if:
(A) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the
uniformed services of the United States ((armed forces)), the member
applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member
immediately prior to the member entering the ((United States armed
forces)) uniformed services; and
(B) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW
41.45.0631 and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or
prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or
(C) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the member's
honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the member
pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
(ii) Upon receipt of member contributions under (b)(i)(B),
(b)(iv)(C), and (b)(v)(C) of this subsection, the department shall
establish the member's service credit and shall bill the employer for
its contribution required under RCW 41.45.060 for the period of
military service, plus interest as determined by the department.
(iii) The contributions required under (b)(i)(B), (b)(iv)(C), and
(b)(v)(C) of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the
member would have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be
estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the
member in the year prior to when the member went on military leave.
(iv) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member
who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of
the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may,
on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service
credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in
the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased
member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or
children:
(A) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while
serving in the uniformed services;
(B) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable
service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and
(C) If the member was commissioned on or after January 1, 2003,
pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45 RCW within
five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution of any
benefit, whichever comes first.
(v) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in
the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit
under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed
services if:
(A) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or
she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions
or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;
(B) The member provides to the director proof of honorable
discharge from the uniformed services; and
(C) If the member was commissioned on or after January 1, 2003, the
member pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45 RCW
within five years of the director's determination of total disability
or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first.
(4) In no event shall the total retirement benefits from
subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, of any member exceed
seventy-five percent of the member's average final salary.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2001, and every year thereafter, the
department shall determine the following information for each retired
member or beneficiary whose retirement allowance has been in effect for
at least one year:
(a) The original dollar amount of the retirement allowance;
(b) The index for the calendar year prior to the effective date of
the retirement allowance, to be known as "index A";
(c) The index for the calendar year prior to the date of
determination, to be known as "index B"; and
(d) The ratio obtained when index B is divided by index A.
The value of the ratio obtained shall be the annual adjustment to
the original retirement allowance and shall be applied beginning with
the July payment. In no event, however, shall the annual adjustment:
(i) Produce a retirement allowance which is lower than the original
retirement allowance;
(ii) Exceed three percent in the initial annual adjustment; or
(iii) Differ from the previous year's annual adjustment by more
than three percent.
For the purposes of this section, "index" means, for any calendar
year, that year's average consumer price index for the Seattle-Tacoma-Bremerton Washington area for urban wage earners and clerical workers,
all items, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States
department of labor.
The provisions of this section shall apply to all members presently
retired and to all members who shall retire in the future.

Sec. 11 RCW 41.37.260 and 2004 c 242 s 32 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a
member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided
for under RCW 41.37.190 through 41.37.290.
(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an
authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor
organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor
organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period
of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence.
This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the
member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of
leave. The compensation earnable reported for a member who establishes
service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary
paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member
shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit
during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member
is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. This
credit may be obtained only if:
(a) The member makes both the employer and member contributions
plus interest as determined by the department for the period of the
authorized leave of absence within five years of resumption of service
or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner; or
(b) If not within five years of resumption of service but prior to
retirement, pay the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be
based on the average of the member's compensation earnable at both the
time the authorized leave of absence was granted and the time the
member resumed employment.
(4) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
((armed forces)) uniformed services of the United States shall be
entitled to retirement system service credit for up to five years of
military service. This subsection shall be administered in a manner
consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services
employment and reemployment rights act.
(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection
if:
(i) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the
uniformed services of the United States ((armed forces)), the member
applies for reemployment with the employer who employed the member
immediately prior to the member entering the ((United States armed
forces)) uniformed services; and
(ii) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW
41.37.220 within five years of resumption of service or prior to
retirement, whichever comes sooner; or
(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the
member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the
member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii), (d)(iii),
or (e)(iii) of this subsection, the department shall establish the
member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its
contribution required under RCW 41.37.220 for the period of military
service, plus interest as determined by the department.
(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii)
of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would
have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with
reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the
year prior to when the member went on military leave.
(d) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member
who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of
the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may,
on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service
credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in
the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased
member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or
children:
(i) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while
serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable
service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death; and
(iii) Pays the employee contributions required under chapter 41.45
RCW within five years of the date of death or prior to the distribution
of any benefit, whichever comes first.
(e) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in
the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit
under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed
services if:
(i) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or
she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions
or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services;
(ii) The member provides to the director proof of honorable
discharge from the uniformed services; and
(iii) The member pays the employee contributions required under
chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the director's determination of
total disability or prior to the distribution of any benefit, whichever
comes first.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Section 11 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

--- END ---