BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the department proposes to withhold the driving
privilege of a person or disqualify a person from operating a
commercial motor vehicle and this action is made mandatory by the
provisions of this chapter or other law, the department must give
notice to the person in writing by posting in the United States mail,
appropriately addressed, postage prepaid, or by personal service.
Notice by mail is given upon deposit in the United States mail. Notice
given under this subsection must specify the date upon which the
driving privilege is to be withheld which shall not be less than forty-five days after the original notice is given.
(2) Within fifteen days after notice has been given to a person
under subsection (1) of this section, the person may request in writing
an administrative review before the department. If the request is
mailed, it must be postmarked within fifteen days after the date the
department has given notice. If a person fails to request an
administrative review within fifteen days after the date the department
gives notice, the person is considered to have defaulted and loses his
or her right to an administrative review unless the department finds
good cause for a request after the fifteen-day period.
(a) An administrative review under this subsection shall consist
solely of an internal review of documents and records submitted or
available to the department, unless the person requests an interview
before the department, in which case all or any part of the
administrative review may, at the discretion of the department, be
conducted by telephone or other electronic means.
(b) The only issues to be addressed in the administrative review
are:
(i) Whether the records relied on by the department identify the
correct person; and
(ii) Whether the information transmitted from the court or other
reporting agency or entity regarding the person accurately describes
the action taken by the court or other reporting agency or entity.
(c) For the purposes of this section, the notice received from a
court or other reporting agency or entity, regardless of form or
format, is prima facie evidence that the information from the court or
other reporting agency or entity regarding the person is accurate. A
person requesting administrative review has the burden of showing by a
preponderance of the evidence that the person is not subject to the
withholding of the driving privilege.
(d) The action subject to the notification requirements of
subsection (1) of this section shall be stayed during the
administrative review process.
(e) Judicial review of a department order affirming the action
subject to the notification requirements of subsection (1) of this
section after an administrative review shall be available in the same
manner as provided in RCW 46.20.308(9). The department shall certify
its record to the court within thirty days after service upon the
department of the petition for judicial review. The action subject to
the notification requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall
not automatically be stayed during the judicial review. If judicial
relief is sought for a stay or other temporary remedy from the
department's action, the court shall not grant relief unless the court
finds that the appellant is likely to prevail in the appeal and that
without a stay the appellant will suffer irreparable injury.
(3) The department may adopt rules that are considered necessary or
convenient by the department for purposes of administering this
section, including, but not limited to, rules regarding expedited
procedures for issuing orders and expedited notice procedures.
(4) This section does not apply where an opportunity for an
informal settlement, driver improvement interview, or formal hearing is
otherwise provided by law or rule of the department.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.265 and 2003 c 20 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other authority to revoke driving privileges
under this chapter, the department shall revoke all driving privileges
of a juvenile when the department receives notice from a court pursuant
to RCW 9.41.040(5), 13.40.265, 66.44.365, 69.41.065, 69.50.420,
69.52.070, or a substantially similar municipal ordinance adopted by a
local legislative authority, or from a diversion unit pursuant to RCW
13.40.265. ((The revocation shall be imposed without hearing.))
(2) The driving privileges of the juvenile revoked under subsection
(1) of this section shall be revoked in the following manner:
(a) Upon receipt of the first notice, the department shall impose
a revocation for one year, or until the juvenile reaches seventeen
years of age, whichever is longer.
(b) Upon receipt of a second or subsequent notice, the department
shall impose a revocation for two years or until the juvenile reaches
eighteen years of age, whichever is longer.
(c) Each offense for which the department receives notice shall
result in a separate period of revocation. All periods of revocation
imposed under this section that could otherwise overlap shall run
consecutively up to the juvenile's twenty-first birthday, and no period
of revocation imposed under this section shall begin before the
expiration of all other periods of revocation imposed under this
section or other law. Periods of revocation imposed consecutively
under this section shall not extend beyond the juvenile's twenty-first
birthday.
(3)(a) If the department receives notice from a court that the
juvenile's privilege to drive should be reinstated, the department
shall immediately reinstate any driving privileges that have been
revoked under this section if the minimum term of revocation as
specified in RCW 13.40.265(1)(c), 66.44.365(3), 69.41.065(3),
69.50.420(3), 69.52.070(3), or similar ordinance has expired, and
subject to subsection (2)(c) of this section.
(b) The juvenile may seek reinstatement of his or her driving
privileges from the department when the juvenile reaches the age of
twenty-one. A notice from the court reinstating the juvenile's driving
privilege shall not be required if reinstatement is pursuant to this
subsection.
(4)(a) If the department receives notice pursuant to RCW
13.40.265(2)(b) from a diversion unit that a juvenile has completed a
diversion agreement for which the juvenile's driving privileges were
revoked, the department shall reinstate any driving privileges revoked
under this section as provided in (b) of this subsection, subject to
subsection (2)(c) of this section.
(b) If the diversion agreement was for the juvenile's first
violation of chapter 66.44, 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW, the department
shall not reinstate the juvenile's privilege to drive until the later
of ninety days after the date the juvenile turns sixteen or ninety days
after the juvenile entered into a diversion agreement for the offense.
If the diversion agreement was for the juvenile's second or subsequent
violation of chapter 66.44, 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW, the department
shall not reinstate the juvenile's privilege to drive until the later
of the date the juvenile turns seventeen or one year after the juvenile
entered into the second or subsequent diversion agreement.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.270 and 2004 c 231 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any person is convicted of any offense for which this
title makes mandatory the ((suspension or revocation of the driver's
license)) withholding of the driving privilege of such person by the
department, the ((privilege of the person to operate a vehicle is
suspended until the department takes the action required by this
chapter, and the)) court in which such conviction is had shall
forthwith ((secure the immediate forfeiture of the driver's license of
such convicted person and immediately forward such driver's license to
the department, and on failure of such convicted person to deliver such
driver's license the judge shall cause such person to be confined for
the period of such suspension or revocation or until such driver's
license is delivered to such judge: PROVIDED, That if the convicted
person testifies that he or she does not and at the time of the offense
did not have a current and valid vehicle driver's license, the judge
shall cause such person to be charged with the operation of a motor
vehicle without a current and valid driver's license and on conviction
punished as by law provided, and the department may not issue a
driver's license to such persons during the period of suspension or
revocation: PROVIDED, ALSO, That if the driver's license of such
convicted person has been lost or destroyed and such convicted person
makes an affidavit to that effect, sworn to before the judge, the
convicted person may not be so confined, but the department may not
issue or reissue a driver's license for such convicted person during
the period of such suspension or revocation: PROVIDED, That)) mark the
person's Washington state driver's license or permit to drive, if any,
in a manner authorized by the department. A valid driver's license or
permit to drive marked under this subsection shall remain in effect
until the person's driving privilege is withheld by the department
pursuant to notice given under section 1 of this act, unless the
license or permit expires or otherwise becomes invalid prior to the
effective date of this action. Perfection of notice of appeal shall
stay the execution of sentence including the ((suspension and/or
revocation of the driver's license)) withholding of the driving
privilege.
(2) Every court having jurisdiction over offenses committed under
this chapter, or any other act of this state or municipal ordinance
adopted by a local authority regulating the operation of motor vehicles
on highways, or any federal authority having jurisdiction over offenses
substantially the same as those set forth in Title 46 RCW which occur
on federal installations within this state, shall forward to the
department within ten days of a forfeiture of bail or collateral
deposited to secure the defendant's appearance in court, a payment of
a fine or penalty, a plea of guilty or a finding of guilt, or a finding
that any person has committed a traffic infraction an abstract of the
court record in the form prescribed by rule of the supreme court,
showing the conviction of any person or the finding that any person has
committed a traffic infraction in said court for a violation of any
said laws other than regulations governing standing, stopping, parking,
and pedestrian offenses.
(3) Every state agency or municipality having jurisdiction over
offenses committed under this chapter, or under any other act of this
state or municipal ordinance adopted by a state or local authority
regulating the operation of motor vehicles on highways, may forward to
the department within ten days of failure to respond, failure to pay a
penalty, failure to appear at a hearing to contest the determination
that a violation of any statute, ordinance, or regulation relating to
standing, stopping, parking, or other infraction issued under RCW
46.63.030(1)(d) has been committed, or failure to appear at a hearing
to explain mitigating circumstances, an abstract of the citation record
in the form prescribed by rule of the department, showing the finding
by such municipality that two or more violations of laws governing
standing, stopping, and parking or one or more other infractions issued
under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d) have been committed and indicating the nature
of the defendant's failure to act. Such violations or infractions may
not have occurred while the vehicle is stolen from the registered owner
or is leased or rented under a bona fide commercial vehicle lease or
rental agreement between a lessor engaged in the business of leasing
vehicles and a lessee who is not the vehicle's registered owner. The
department may enter into agreements of reciprocity with the duly
authorized representatives of the states for reporting to each other
violations of laws governing standing, stopping, and parking.
(4) For the purposes of Title 46 RCW the term "conviction" means a
final conviction in a state or municipal court or by any federal
authority having jurisdiction over offenses substantially the same as
those set forth in Title 46 RCW which occur on federal installations in
this state, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to
secure a defendant's appearance in court, the payment of a fine, a plea
of guilty, or a finding of guilt on a traffic law violation charge,
regardless of whether the imposition of sentence or sanctions are
deferred or the penalty is suspended, but not including entry into a
deferred prosecution agreement under chapter 10.05 RCW.
(5) For the purposes of Title 46 RCW the term "finding that a
traffic infraction has been committed" means a failure to respond to a
notice of infraction or a determination made by a court pursuant to
this chapter. Payment of a monetary penalty made pursuant to RCW
46.63.070(2) is deemed equivalent to such a finding.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.285 and 2001 c 64 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall ((forthwith)) revoke the license of any driver
for the period of one calendar year unless otherwise provided in this
section, upon receiving a record of the driver's conviction of any of
the following offenses, when the conviction has become final:
(1) For vehicular homicide the period of revocation shall be two
years. The revocation period shall be tolled during any period of
total confinement for the offense;
(2) Vehicular assault. The revocation period shall be tolled
during any period of total confinement for the offense;
(3) Driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a narcotic drug, or under the influence of any
other drug to a degree which renders the driver incapable of safely
driving a motor vehicle, for the period prescribed in RCW 46.61.5055;
(4) Any felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used;
(5) Failure to stop and give information or render aid as required
under the laws of this state in the event of a motor vehicle accident
resulting in the death or personal injury of another or resulting in
damage to a vehicle that is driven or attended by another;
(6) Perjury or the making of a false affidavit or statement under
oath to the department under Title 46 RCW or under any other law
relating to the ownership or operation of motor vehicles;
(7) Reckless driving upon a showing by the department's records
that the conviction is the third such conviction for the driver within
a period of two years.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.20.289 and 2002 c 279 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall suspend all driving privileges of a person
when the department receives notice from a court under RCW
46.63.070(6), 46.63.110(((5))) (6), or 46.64.025 that the person has
failed to respond to a notice of traffic infraction, failed to appear
at a requested hearing, violated a written promise to appear in court,
or has failed to comply with the terms of a notice of traffic
infraction or citation, other than for a standing, stopping, or parking
violation, provided that the traffic infraction or traffic offense is
committed on or after the effective date of this act. A suspension
under this section takes effect ((thirty days after the date the
department mails notice of the suspension)) pursuant to the provisions
of section 1 of this act, and remains in effect until the department
has received a certificate from the court showing that the case has
been adjudicated, and until the person meets the requirements of RCW
46.20.311. In the case of failure to respond to a traffic infraction
issued under RCW 46.55.105, the department shall suspend all driving
privileges until the person provides evidence from the court that all
penalties and restitution have been paid. A suspension under this
section does not take effect if, prior to the effective date of the
suspension, the department receives a certificate from the court
showing that the case has been adjudicated.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.20.324 and 1965 ex.s. c 121 s 31 are each amended
to read as follows:
Unless otherwise provided by law, a person shall not be entitled to
a driver improvement interview or formal hearing ((as hereinafter
provided)) under the provisions of RCW 46.20.322 through 46.20.333 when
the person:
(1) ((When the action by the department is made mandatory by the
provisions of this chapter or other law)) Has been granted the
opportunity for an administrative review, informal settlement, or
formal hearing under section 1 of this act, RCW 46.20.308, 46.25.120,
46.25.125, 46.65.065, 74.20A.320, or by rule of the department; or
(2) ((When the person)) Has refused or neglected to submit to an
examination as required by RCW 46.20.305.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.20.334 and 1972 ex.s. c 29 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless otherwise provided by law, any person denied a license or a
renewal of a license or whose license has been suspended or revoked by
the department ((except where such suspension or revocation is
mandatory under the provisions of this chapter)) shall have the right
within thirty days, after receiving notice of the decision following a
formal hearing to file a notice of appeal in the superior court in the
county of his residence. The hearing on the appeal hereunder shall be
de novo.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.63.110 and 2003 c 380 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and
fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by this chapter or
title.
(2) The monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.55.105(2) is two
hundred fifty dollars for each offense. No penalty assessed under this
subsection (2) may be reduced.
(3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of
monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions. This rule shall
also specify the conditions under which local courts may exercise
discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic infractions.
The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust this
schedule every two years for inflation.
(4) There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction
relates to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty imposed pursuant to
this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary penalty not
to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of
traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law,
ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty
set by the local legislative body.
(5) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are
civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed for violations of
chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles
are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary penalties
which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.
(6) Whenever a monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other
monetary obligation is imposed by a court under this chapter it is
immediately payable. If the ((person is unable to pay at that time the
court may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the period in which
the penalty may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or before the
time established for payment the court shall notify the department of
the failure to pay the penalty)) court determines, in its discretion,
that a person is not able to pay a monetary obligation in full, and not
more than one year has passed since the later of the effective date of
this act or the date the monetary obligation initially became due and
payable, the court shall enter into a payment plan with the person,
unless the person has previously been granted a payment plan with
respect to the same monetary obligation, or unless the person is in
noncompliance of any existing or prior payment plan, in which case the
court may, at its discretion, implement a payment plan. If the court
has notified the department that the person has failed to pay or comply
and the person has subsequently entered into a payment plan and made an
initial payment, the court shall notify the department that the
infraction has been adjudicated, and the department shall rescind any
suspension of the person's driver's license or driver's privilege based
on failure to respond to that infraction. "Payment plan," as used in
this section, means a plan that requires reasonable payments based on
the financial ability of the person to pay. The person may voluntarily
pay an amount at any time in addition to the payments required under
the payment plan.
(a) If a payment required to be made under the payment plan is
delinquent or the person fails to complete a community restitution
program on or before the time established under the payment plan,
unless the court determines good cause therefor and adjusts the payment
plan or the community restitution plan accordingly, the court shall
notify the department of the person's failure to meet the conditions of
the plan, and the department shall suspend the person's driver's
license or driving privilege until ((the penalty has)) all monetary
obligations, including those imposed under subsections (3) and (4) of
this section, have been paid ((and the penalty provided in subsection
(4) of this section has been paid)), and court authorized community
restitution has been completed, or until the department has been
notified that the court has entered into a new time payment or
community restitution agreement with the person.
(b) If a person has not entered into a payment plan with the court
and has not paid the monetary obligation in full on or before the time
established for payment, the court shall notify the department of the
delinquency. The department shall suspend the person's driver's
license or driving privilege until all monetary obligations have been
paid, including those imposed under subsections (3) and (4) of this
section, or until the person has entered into a payment plan under this
section.
(c) If the payment plan is to be administered by the court, the
court may assess the person a reasonable administrative fee to be
wholly retained by the city or county with jurisdiction. The
administrative fee shall not exceed ten dollars per infraction or
twenty-five dollars per payment plan, whichever is less.
(d) Nothing in this section precludes a court from contracting with
outside entities to administer its payment plan system. When outside
entities are used for the administration of a payment plan, the court
may assess the person a reasonable fee for such administrative
services, which fee may be calculated on a periodic, percentage, or
other basis.
(e) If a court authorized community restitution program for
offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court may allow
conversion of all or part of the monetary obligations due under this
section to court authorized community restitution in lieu of time
payments if the person is unable to make reasonable time payments.
(7) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section
and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a
person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed
a fee of five dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances shall
this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical
services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040.
(8)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this
section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this
section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction other
than of RCW 46.61.527 shall be assessed an additional penalty of twenty
dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend the additional
penalty unless the court finds the offender to be indigent. If a court
authorized community restitution program for offenders is available in
the jurisdiction, the court shall allow offenders to offset all or a
part of the penalty due under this subsection (8) by participation in
the court authorized community restitution program.
(b) Eight dollars and fifty cents of the additional penalty under
(a) of this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer. The
remaining revenue from the additional penalty must be remitted under
chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited as
provided in RCW 43.08.250. The balance of the revenue received by the
county or city treasurer under this subsection must be deposited into
the county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city
or county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any
liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.
(9) If a legal proceeding, such as garnishment, has commenced to
collect any delinquent amount owed by the person for any penalty
imposed by the court under this section, the court may, at its
discretion, enter into a payment plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---