BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.13A RCW
to read as follows:
The board of commissioners of a water-sewer district, with fewer
than two hundred fifty customers on the effective date of this act, and
the city council of a code city with a population greater than one
hundred thousand on the effective date of this act, may provide for
assumption by the city of the district in accordance with RCW
35.13A.020, except as provided herein, pursuant to the terms and
conditions of a contract executed in accordance with RCW 35.13A.070.
None of the territory of the water-sewer district need be included
within the territory of the city. The contract and assumption shall be
approved by resolution of the board of commissioners and ordinance of
the city council. If the water-sewer district has no indebtedness or
monetary obligations on the date of assumption, the city shall use any
surplus funds only for water services delivered to and water facilities
constructed in the former territory of the district, unless provided
otherwise in the contract. In connection with the assumption, the
water-sewer district or the city, or both, may provide for dissolution
of the district pursuant to RCW 35.13A.080.

--- END ---