BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a child's early
attachment to his or her parent influences physical and intellectual
development, forms the foundation for psychological development, and
becomes the prototype for subsequent interpersonal relationships. The
legislature also finds that the late stages of gestation, birth, and
first two years of life are critical in an infant's development of
conscience, and his or her ability to trust and relate to others, and
establish the foundation for key protective factors such as
intelligence, trust, and empathy. The legislature finds that when
these are depressed or when an infant is mistreated, it may lead to
early aggression, impulsive temperament, and violent behavior which are
the strongest developmental predictors of future involvement in violent
behavior. The legislature finds persuasive research that strongly
indicates that the best way to improve later developmental outcomes is
to improve mother-child interaction and prevent early loss of primary
relationships or breaks in caregiving.
The legislature also finds persuasive national statistics that
demonstrate that incarcerated mothers who develop strong parenting
skills and bond with their children are less likely to reoffend.
Consequently, the legislature finds that the residential parenting
program at the women's correctional center protects public safety and
promotes outcomes that are socially and fiscally responsible by
reducing recidivism and reducing the likelihood that a child of an
incarcerated mother will become at-risk for committing criminal
offenses as a juvenile or adult.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall maintain a residential parenting program at
its major correctional institution for women to allow those inmates who
meet eligibility requirements to keep their infants with them during
their incarceration. The program shall provide an appropriate living
situation for the infants, promote positive parenting skills, and
facilitate transition services back into the community.

Sec. 3 RCW 72.09.010 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to establish a comprehensive
system of corrections for convicted law violators within the state of
Washington to accomplish the following objectives.
(1) The system should ensure the public safety. The system should
be designed and managed to provide the maximum feasible safety for the
persons and property of the general public, the staff, and the inmates.
(2) The system should punish the offender for violating the laws of
the state of Washington. This punishment should generally be limited
to the denial of liberty of the offender.
(3) The system should positively impact offenders by stressing
personal responsibility and accountability and by discouraging
recidivism.
(4) The system should treat all offenders fairly and equitably
without regard to race, religion, sex, national origin, residence, or
social condition.
(5) The system, as much as possible, should reflect the values of
the community including:
(a) Avoiding idleness. Idleness is not only wasteful but
destructive to the individual and to the community.
(b) Adoption of the work ethic. It is the community expectation
that all individuals should work and through their efforts benefit both
themselves and the community.
(c) Maintaining, to the extent appropriate, any existing parent-child relationship with their children. The community expects parents
to be responsible for their children and for their parenting decisions.
Where the court and/or the department has not prohibited contact or
terminated parental rights, and where the inmate's parental role will
continue on release, incarceration should not provide an excuse to
avoid this responsibility.
(d) Providing opportunities for self improvement. All individuals
should have opportunities to grow and expand their skills and abilities
so as to fulfill their role in the community.
(((d))) (e) Linking the receipt or denial of privileges to
responsible behavior and accomplishments. The individual who works to
improve himself or herself and the community should be rewarded for
these efforts. As a corollary, there should be no rewards for no
effort.
(((e))) (f) Sharing in the obligations of the community. All
citizens, the public and inmates alike, have a personal and fiscal
obligation in the corrections system. All communities must share in
the responsibility of the corrections system.
(6) The system should provide for prudent management of resources.
The avoidance of unnecessary or inefficient public expenditures on the
part of offenders and the department is essential. Offenders must be
accountable to the department, and the department to the public and the
legislature. The human and fiscal resources of the community are
limited. The management and use of these resources can be enhanced by
wise investment, productive programs, the reduction of duplication and
waste, and the joining together of all involved parties in a common
endeavor. Since most offenders return to the community, it is wise for
the state and the communities to make an investment in effective
rehabilitation programs for offenders and the wise use of resources.
(7) The system should provide for restitution. Those who have
damaged others, persons or property, have a responsibility to make
restitution for these damages.
(8) The system should be accountable to the citizens of the state.
In return, the individual citizens and local units of government must
meet their responsibilities to make the corrections system effective.
(9) The system should meet those national standards which the state
determines to be appropriate.

Sec. 4 RCW 72.09.015 and 2004 c 167 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Base level of correctional services" means the minimum level
of field services the department of corrections is required by statute
to provide for the supervision and monitoring of offenders.
(2) "Contraband" means any object or communication the secretary
determines shall not be allowed to be: (a) Brought into; (b) possessed
while on the grounds of; or (c) sent from any institution under the
control of the secretary.
(3) "County" means a county or combination of counties.
(4) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(5) "Earned early release" means earned release as authorized by
RCW 9.94A.728.
(6) "Extended family visit" means an authorized visit between an
inmate and a member of his or her immediate family that occurs in a
private visiting unit located at the correctional facility where the
inmate is confined.
(7) "Good conduct" means compliance with department rules and
policies.
(8) "Good performance" means successful completion of a program
required by the department, including an education, work, or other
program.
(9) "Immediate family" means the inmate's children, stepchildren,
grandchildren, great grandchildren, parents, stepparents, grandparents,
great grandparents, siblings, and a person legally married to an
inmate. "Immediate family" does not include an inmate adopted by
another inmate or the immediate family of the adopted or adopting
inmate.
(10) "Indigent inmate," "indigent," and "indigency" mean an inmate
who has less than a ten-dollar balance of disposable income in his or
her institutional account on the day a request is made to utilize funds
and during the thirty days previous to the request.
(11) "Inmate" means a person committed to the custody of the
department, including but not limited to persons residing in a
correctional institution or facility and persons released on furlough,
work release, or community custody, and persons received from another
state, state agency, county, or federal jurisdiction.
(12) "Privilege" means any goods or services, education or work
programs, or earned early release days, the receipt of which are
directly linked to an inmate's (a) good conduct; and (b) good
performance. Privileges do not include any goods or services the
department is required to provide under the state or federal
Constitution or under state or federal law.
(13) "Residential parenting program" means a program for infants
born of eligible inmates to develop a parent-child relationship with
their inmate mothers through the mother's participation in a
residential program that permits her to actively parent her child.
(14) "Secretary" means the secretary of corrections or his or her
designee.
(((14))) (15) "Significant expansion" includes any expansion into
a new product line or service to the class I business that results from
an increase in benefits provided by the department, including a
decrease in labor costs, rent, or utility rates (for water, sewer,
electricity, and disposal), an increase in work program space, tax
advantages, or other overhead costs.
(((15))) (16) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of a
correctional facility under the jurisdiction of the Washington state
department of corrections, or his or her designee.
(((16))) (17) "Unfair competition" means any net competitive
advantage that a business may acquire as a result of a correctional
industries contract, including labor costs, rent, tax advantages,
utility rates (water, sewer, electricity, and disposal), and other
overhead costs. To determine net competitive advantage, the
correctional industries board shall review and quantify any expenses
unique to operating a for-profit business inside a prison.
(((17))) (18) "Washington business" means an in-state manufacturer
or service provider subject to chapter 82.04 RCW existing on June 10,
2004.
(((18))) (19) "Work programs" means all classes of correctional
industries jobs authorized under RCW 72.09.100.

Sec. 5 RCW 72.09.450 and 1996 c 277 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An inmate shall not be denied access to services or supplies
required by state or federal law solely on the basis of his or her
inability to pay for them.
(2) An eligible inmate mother shall not be denied entrance into the
residential parenting program on the basis of indigence.
(3) The department shall record all lawfully authorized assessments
for services or supplies as a debt to the department. The department
shall recoup the assessments when the inmate's institutional account
exceeds the indigency standard, and may pursue other remedies to recoup
the assessments after the period of incarceration.
(((3))) (4) The department shall record as a debt any costs
assessed by a court against an inmate plaintiff where the state is
providing defense pursuant to chapter 4.92 RCW. The department shall
recoup the debt when the inmate's institutional account exceeds the
indigency standard and may pursue other remedies to recoup the debt
after the period of incarceration.
(((4))) (5) In order to maximize the cost-efficient collection of
unpaid offender debt existing after the period of an offender's
incarceration, the department is authorized to use the following
nonexclusive options: (a) Use the collection services available
through the department of general administration, or (b)
notwithstanding any provision of chapter 41.06 RCW, contract with
collection agencies for collection of the debts. The costs for general
administration or collection agency services shall be paid by the
debtor. Any contract with a collection agency shall only be awarded
after competitive bidding. Factors the department shall consider in
awarding a collection contract include but are not limited to a
collection agency's history and reputation in the community; and the
agency's access to a local data base that may increase the efficiency
of its collections. The servicing of an unpaid obligation to the
department does not constitute assignment of a debt, and no contract
with a collection agency may remove the department's control over
unpaid obligations owed to the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Participation in the residential parenting program is not a right
and decisions about admission to the program shall be made on a case-by-case basis.
(1) No inmate who is the subject of a no contact order which
prohibits contact with minor children or has a documented history of
sex offenses against children is eligible to participate.
(2) The department shall maintain published procedures including
notice provisions for application and approval of the application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall maintain a separate financial account for
infant participants in the residential parenting program. Funds
deposited to the infant's account are not subject to the mandatory
inmate deductions required by RCW 72.09.111.
(2) Infant participants are eligible for temporary assistance for
needy families grants and women infants children funds for child-related expenses. The department shall hold these funds in the
infant's account.
(3) Child support payments made for the support of the infant and
not subject to an assignment pursuant to Title IV-D of the federal
social security act shall be held in the infant's account.
(4) Funds in the infant's account may be used only for the infant's
needs and expenses and equipment needed for proper infant care. Such
funds may not be used to pay for maternal expenses and may not be
applied to the mother's legal financial obligations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---