BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.49 RCW
to read as follows:
An owner of a vessel that is not registered as required by chapter
88.02 RCW and for which watercraft excise tax is due under this chapter
is liable for a penalty in the following amount:
(1) One hundred dollars for the owner's first violation;
(2) Two hundred dollars for the owner's second violation involving
the same or any other vessel; or
(3) Four hundred dollars for the owner's third and successive
violations involving the same or any other vessel.
The department may collect this penalty under the procedures
established in chapter 82.32 RCW. The penalty imposed under this
section is in addition to any other civil or criminal penalty imposed
by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 88.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A marina that leases permanent moorage to vessels must require
the following information from the lessee as a condition of leasing
moorage space:
(a) The name, address, and telephone number of the legal owner of
the vessel;
(b) The name of the lessee, if different than the owner;
(c) The vessel's hull identification number;
(d) The vessel's Coast Guard registration (if applicable);
(e) The date on which the moorage lease began; and
(f) The vessel's country or state of registration and registration
number.
A marina shall make available copies of these records, or shall
permit any authorized agent of the department of revenue to inspect
these records at a mutually agreed time, within thirty days of request
by the department.
(2) A marina that leases permanent moorage to vessels must require
proof of vessel registration or a written statement of intent to
register a vessel as a condition of leasing moorage space. If the
applicant's vessel is not registered in this state, the marina must
inform the moorage applicant of the state law requiring vessel
registration and the penalties assessed for failure to comply with the
state's vessel registration laws. After this, it is the moorage
applicant's responsibility to register the vessel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act applies to any
violation that occurs on or after the effective date of this act.
Section 2 of this act applies to any lease of permanent moorage that
continues in effect beyond or is entered into, renewed, or extended on
or after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect August 1, 2005.

--- END ---