BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the existing
state and federal regulatory framework for wetland and aquatic resource
mitigation is an important tool used to offset impacts to aquatic
lands.
(2) The legislature further finds that because impacts to wetlands
and aquatic resources often affect state-owned aquatic lands, the
department should work within established state and federal regulatory
mitigation processes to develop a single pilot mitigation bank on
state-owned aquatic lands.
(3) The intent of this chapter is to establish the proprietary
mechanisms for the department to develop, implement, and manage a
single pilot mitigation bank on state-owned aquatic lands. Additional
authority will be needed if the department seeks to establish more than
one mitigation bank.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Compensatory mitigation" means the process of restoring,
creating, enhancing, or, in exceptional circumstances, preserving
wetlands, other aquatic resources, or uplands for the purposes of
compensating for the unavoidable adverse environmental impacts of a
project that remain after all appropriate and practicable avoidance and
minimization has been achieved.
(2) "Credit" means a unit of trade representing the increase in the
ecological value of a site due to improvements made to the habitat
conditions of the site, as measured by acreage, functions, or values,
or by some other regulatory approved assessment method.
(3) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(4) "Mitigation" means the sequential process of avoiding impacts,
minimizing impacts, and compensating for the remaining unavoidable
impacts of a project.
(5) "Mitigation bank" means a site or sites where wetlands, aquatic
resources, or uplands are restored, created, enhanced, or in
exceptional circumstances, preserved expressly for the purpose of
providing compensatory mitigation in advance of authorized project
impacts to similar resources.
(6) "Mitigation banking agreement" means a legal agreement between
the department and a public or private entity under which the parties
to the agreement agree to jointly develop, implement, and manage a
single pilot mitigation bank that is located on state-owned aquatic
lands and is approved through state or federal regulatory mitigation
processes.
(7) "Mitigation banking partners" means public or private entities
with which the department has entered into a mitigation banking
agreement under section 3 of this act.
(8) "Project" means a physical construction project that develops
or redevelops land in a way that results in unavoidable adverse
environmental impacts that remain after all appropriate and practicable
avoidance and minimization has been achieved.
(9) "Site" means a mitigation bank site, or a site where
compensatory mitigation has or will occur.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department may enter into mitigation
banking agreements with public or private entities to develop,
implement, and manage a single pilot mitigation bank that is located on
state-owned aquatic lands and is approved through state or federal
regulatory mitigation processes. A mitigation banking agreement must
establish the business relationship between the department and its
mitigation banking partner, clearly identifying the assets each entity
will contribute to the pilot mitigation bank project. The agreement is
not subject to the provisions of RCW 79.90.480 or 79.90.500.
(2) The department and its mitigation banking partners must develop
and adopt a management plan, for the pilot mitigation bank, that is
approved through state or federal regulatory mitigation processes and,
if applicable, by the city or county in which the aquatic lands are
located. The department must work cooperatively with other applicable
public agencies or private entities in the development of the
management plan, or in the establishment of specifications for the
plan. The department and its mitigation banking partners are
responsible for expenses incurred in the development of the management
plan. All management plans adopted under this section must include:
(a) Details for the creation, restoration, enhancement, or
preservation of the wetlands, other aquatic resources, or uplands on
the pilot mitigation bank site;
(b) Details of the long-term management actions that will occur on
the site, when the actions will occur, and where those actions will
occur within the site; and
(c) Details on the amount of funding necessary for the long-term
management endowment and details as to how the amount was calculated
under section 4 of this act.
(3) The service area for the pilot mitigation bank must be based on
the geographic and functional connectivity of the pilot mitigation bank
site with the impacting project sites, which must be determined and
approved through state or federal regulatory mitigation processes.
(4) Consistent with state and federal regulatory mitigation
processes, state-owned aquatic lands utilized as the pilot mitigation
bank will not be available for other uses that will change the intent
of the site as a mitigation site or compromise the ecological functions
of the site.
(5)(a) The department may sell mitigation bank credits generated
from the pilot mitigation bank and receive revenues from the sale of
mitigation bank credits generated from the pilot mitigation bank that
have been sold by its mitigation banking partners.
(b) The department and its mitigation banking partners must
determine the economic value of the mitigation bank credits for the
pilot mitigation bank. The economic value of the mitigation bank
credits will not be subject to the provisions of RCW 79.90.480 or
79.90.500. The department and its mitigation banking partners must
sell the credits for no less than market value, as determined using
appropriate mitigation credit market appraisal techniques. The
economic value of the mitigation bank credits may include the costs
associated with the habitat improvements made to the site and the value
associated with the use of state-owned aquatic lands for the mitigation
bank.
(c) All moneys received by the department from the sale of
mitigation bank credits generated from the pilot mitigation bank, in
excess of a long-term management endowment created in section 4 of this
act and in excess of the revenues to mitigation banking partners, must
be deposited according to RCW 79.90.245 and 79.64.040, and paid to
towns according to RCW 79.92.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department or its mitigation banking
partners will create an endowment for the purpose of generating funds
that are to be used for the long-term monitoring, maintenance, and
management of the pilot mitigation bank.
(2) The department or its mitigation banking partners will assume
long-term management responsibility for the pilot mitigation bank after
the amount of money necessary to establish the endowment that will
adequately cover the costs of long-term monitoring, maintenance, and
management is determined by the department, documented in the
management plan, and approved through state or federal regulatory
mitigation processes.
(3) The amount of money necessary to establish the endowment must
be based on the specific conditions of the pilot mitigation bank site
and the long-term management plan for the site, as approved through
state or federal regulatory mitigation processes.
(4)(a) If the department assumes the long-term management
responsibility for the pilot mitigation bank, the revenue from the sale
of mitigation bank credits generated to establish the endowment must be
deposited into the aquatic lands compensatory mitigation endowment
account established in section 5 of this act.
(b) The department must keep separate accounting records for moneys
received into the aquatic lands compensatory mitigation endowment
account from the sale of mitigation bank credits to ensure that funding
for long-term management is fully secured and expended as approved
through state or federal regulatory mitigation processes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The aquatic lands compensatory
mitigation endowment account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from moneys received by the department for the
purpose of creating a long-term management endowment under section 4 of
this act must be deposited into the account.
(2) The moneys in the account must be invested for the benefit of
the pilot mitigation bank site that the department has agreed to manage
under this chapter.
(3) The account must be administered by the state investment board.
The principal of the account is irreducible. Disbursements from the
account in an amount equal to the site management costs for the pilot
mitigation bank, adjusted annually by the inflation rate, must be
deposited into the aquatic lands compensatory mitigation management
account, created in section 6 of this act, upon authorization of the
commissioner of public lands and the director of the state investment
board, provided the principal of the compensatory mitigation endowment
account is not reduced. Allocations to the state investment board
expense account under RCW 43.33A.160 may also be made from this
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The aquatic lands compensatory
mitigation management account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. The account will receive revenues from the aquatic lands
compensatory mitigation endowment account as described in section 5 of
this act.
(2) The moneys in the account must be used solely by the department
for the purpose of performing long-term monitoring, maintenance, and
management of the pilot mitigation bank site that is located on state-owned aquatic lands. Only the commissioner of public lands or the
commissioner's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The purchase and sale of mitigation bank
credits, generated by the single pilot mitigation bank authorized in
this chapter, are to be voluntarily agreed to by the department and
public or private third-party entities that are required to fulfill
regulatory compensatory mitigation obligations. Mitigation credits
made available through the pilot mitigation bank should be one of
several options for third parties to meet their regulatory compensatory
mitigation obligations. The department may not require a third party
to buy mitigation credits from the pilot mitigation bank as a condition
to use state-owned aquatic lands. If a third party agrees through the
regulatory mitigation process to purchase credits from the pilot
mitigation bank to fulfill its compensatory mitigation obligations for
impacts to state-owned aquatic lands, the third party must complete the
purchase prior to the department issuing a use authorization for the
impacting project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Nothing in this chapter affects the
authority of the department to exchange, sell, or transfer jurisdiction
of state-owned tidelands and shorelands or accept gifts of aquatic
lands under RCW 79.90.457, 79.90.580, or 79.90.475 except that state-owned aquatic lands used for the pilot mitigation bank will not be
transferred out of state ownership and control.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 By December 31, 2010, the department must
provide a report to the appropriate committees of the senate and house
of representatives that provides the status of the pilot mitigation
bank in regards to regulatory certification, management plan
development, service area determination, credit determination,
valuation, and sale, and endowment fund creation and expenditure.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2004 c 246 s 8 and 2004 c 58 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future
teachers conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative
account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion
account, the produce railcar pool account, the rural rehabilitation
account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic
facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse
racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the
Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, ((and))
the Washington horse racing commission operating account (earnings from
the Washington horse racing commission operating account must be
credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund
account), the aquatic lands compensatory mitigation endowment account,
and the aquatic lands compensatory mitigation management account.
However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 79 RCW.

--- END ---