BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.18.545 and 2002 c 360 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Adverse action" has the same meaning as defined in the fair
credit reporting act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq. Adverse actions
include, but are not limited to:
(i) Cancellation, denial, or nonrenewal of personal insurance
coverage;
(ii) Charging a higher insurance premium for personal insurance
than would have been offered if the credit history or insurance score
had been more favorable, whether the charge is by:
(A) Application of a rating rule;
(B) Assignment to a rating tier that does not have the lowest
available rates; or
(C) Placement with an affiliate company that does not offer the
lowest rates available to the consumer within the affiliate group of
insurance companies; or
(iii) Any reduction, adverse, or unfavorable change in the terms of
coverage or amount of any personal insurance due to a consumer's credit
history or insurance score. A reduction, adverse, or unfavorable
change in the terms of coverage occurs when:
(A) Coverage provided to the consumer is not as broad in scope as
coverage requested by the consumer but available to other insureds of
the insurer or any affiliate; or
(B) The consumer is not eligible for benefits such as dividends
that are available through affiliate insurers.
(b) "Affiliate" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.31B.005(1).
(c) "Consumer" means an individual policyholder or applicant for
insurance.
(d) "Consumer report" has the same meaning as defined in the fair
credit reporting act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.
(e) "Credit history" means any written, oral, or other
communication of any information by a consumer reporting agency bearing
on a consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity
that is used or expected to be used, or collected in whole or in part,
for the purpose of serving as a factor in determining personal
insurance premiums or eligibility for coverage.
(f) "Insurance score" means a number or rating that is derived from
an algorithm, computer application, model, or other process that is
based in whole or in part on credit history.
(g) "Personal insurance" means:
(i) Private passenger automobile coverage;
(ii) Homeowner's coverage, including mobile homeowners,
manufactured homeowners, condominium owners, and renter's coverage;
(iii) Dwelling property coverage;
(iv) Earthquake coverage for a residence or personal property;
(v) Personal liability and theft coverage;
(vi) Personal inland marine coverage; and
(vii) Mechanical breakdown coverage for personal auto or home
appliances.
(h) "Prior credit history" means the credit history obtained by the
insurer and used at the issuance or prior renewal of the policy.
(i) "Tier" means a category within a single insurer into which
insureds with substantially like insuring, risk or exposure factors,
and expense elements are placed for purposes of determining rate or
premium.
(j) "Updated credit history" means the most recent version of any
credit history obtained by an insurer since issuance or prior renewal
of the policy.
(2) An insurer that takes adverse action against a consumer based
in whole or in part on credit history or insurance score shall provide
written notice to the applicant or named insured. The notice must
state the significant factors of the credit history or insurance score
that resulted in the adverse action. The insurer shall also inform the
consumer that the consumer is entitled to a free copy of their consumer
report under the fair credit reporting act.
(3) An insurer shall not cancel or nonrenew personal insurance
based in whole or in part on a consumer's credit history or insurance
score. An offer of placement with an affiliate insurer does not
constitute cancellation or nonrenewal under this section. At renewal,
an insurer shall not use a policyholder's updated credit history to
determine premium when the updated credit history is less favorable to
the policyholder than the prior credit history. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to prevent an insurer from using factors
other than a policyholder's updated credit score in determining premium
increases, or to prevent inclusion of a policyholder's prior credit
history in premium decisions at renewal.
(4) An insurer may use credit history to deny personal insurance
only in combination with other substantive underwriting factors. For
the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Deny" means an insurer refuses to offer insurance coverage to
a consumer;
(b) An offer of placement with an affiliate insurer does not
constitute denial of coverage; and
(c) An insurer may reject an application when coverage is not bound
or cancel an insurance contract within the first sixty days after the
effective date of the contract.
(5) Insurers shall not deny personal insurance coverage based on:
(a) The absence of credit history or the inability to determine the
consumer's credit history, if the insurer has received accurate and
complete information from the consumer;
(b) The number of credit inquiries;
(c) Credit history or an insurance score based on collection
accounts identified with a medical industry code;
(d) The initial purchase or finance of a vehicle or house that adds
a new loan to the consumer's existing credit history, if evident from
the consumer report; however, an insurer may consider the bill payment
history of any loan, the total number of loans, or both;
(e) The consumer's use of a particular type of credit card, charge
card, or debit card; or
(f) The consumer's total available line of credit; however, an
insurer may consider the total amount of outstanding debt in relation
to the total available line of credit.
(6)(a) If disputed credit history is used to determine eligibility
for coverage and a consumer is placed with an affiliate that charges
higher premiums or offers less favorable policy terms:
(i) The insurer shall reissue or rerate the policy retroactive to
the effective date of the current policy term; and
(ii) The policy, as reissued or rerated, shall provide premiums and
policy terms the consumer would have been eligible for if accurate
credit history had been used to determine eligibility.
(b) This subsection only applies if the consumer resolves the
dispute under the process set forth in the fair credit reporting act
and notifies the insurer in writing that the dispute has been resolved.
(7) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section.
(8) This section applies to all personal insurance policies issued
or renewed after January 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect December 31, 2005.

--- END ---