BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 57.08.081 and 2003 c 394 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to RCW 57.08.005(6), the commissioners of any district
shall provide for revenues by fixing rates and charges for furnishing
sewer and drainage service and facilities to those to whom service is
available or for providing water, such rates and charges to be fixed as
deemed necessary by the commissioners, so that uniform charges will be
made for the same class of customer or service and facility. Rates and
charges may be combined for the furnishing of more than one type of
sewer or drainage service and facilities.
(2) In classifying customers of such water, sewer, or drainage
system, the board of commissioners may in its discretion consider any
or all of the following factors: The difference in cost to various
customers; the location of the various customers within and without the
district; the difference in cost of maintenance, operation, repair, and
replacement of the various parts of the system; the different character
of the service furnished various customers; the quantity and quality of
the service and facility furnished; the time of its use; the
achievement of water conservation goals and the discouragement of
wasteful practices; capital contributions made to the system including
but not limited to assessments; and any other matters which present a
reasonable difference as a ground for distinction. Rates shall be
established as deemed proper by the commissioners and as fixed by
resolution and shall produce revenues sufficient to take care of the
costs of maintenance and operation, revenue bond and warrant interest
and principal amortization requirements, and all other charges
necessary for efficient and proper operation of the system. Prior to
furnishing services, a district may require a deposit to guarantee
payment for services. However, failure to require a deposit does not
affect the validity of any lien authorized by this section.
(3) The commissioners shall enforce collection of connection
charges, and rates and charges for water supplied against property
owners connecting with the system or receiving such water, and for
sewer and drainage services charged against property to which and its
owners to whom the service is available, such charges being deemed
charges against the property served, by addition of penalties of not
more than ten percent thereof in case of failure to pay the charges at
times fixed by resolution. The commissioners may provide by resolution
that where either connection charges or rates and charges for services
supplied are delinquent for any specified period of time but not more
than twelve months, the district shall certify the delinquencies to the
auditor of the county in which the real property is located, and the
charges and any penalties added thereto and interest thereon at the
rate of not more than the prime lending rate of the district's bank
plus four percentage points per year shall be a lien against the
property upon which the service was received, subject only to the lien
for general taxes, and provided that the lien may not apply to charges
that are more than twelve months past due.
(4) The district may, at any time after the connection charges or
rates and charges for services supplied or available and penalties are
delinquent for a period of sixty days, bring suit in foreclosure by
civil action in the superior court of the county in which the real
property is located. The court may not allow more than twelve months'
charges or charges that are more than twelve months past due. The
court may allow, in addition to the costs and disbursements provided by
statute, attorneys' fees, title search and report costs, and expenses
as it adjudges reasonable. The action shall be in rem, and may be
brought in the name of the district against an individual or against
all of those who are delinquent in one action. The laws and rules of
the court shall control as in other civil actions.
(5) In addition to the right to foreclose provided in this section,
the district may also cut off all or part of the service after charges
for water or sewer service supplied or available are delinquent for a
period of thirty days but not for more than twelve months' charges or
charges more than twelve months past due.
(6) A district may determine how to apply partial payments on past
due accounts.
(7) A district may provide a real property owner or the owner's
designee with duplicate bills for service to tenants, or may notify an
owner or the owner's designee that a tenant's service account is
delinquent. However, if an owner or the owner's designee notifies the
district in writing that a property served by the district is a rental
property, asks to be notified of a tenant's delinquency, and has
provided, in writing, a complete and accurate mailing address, the
district shall notify the owner or the owner's designee of a tenant's
delinquency at the same time and in the same manner the district
notifies the tenant of the tenant's delinquency or by mail. When a
district provides a real property owner or the owner's designee with
duplicates of tenant utility service bills or notice that a tenant's
utility account is delinquent, the district shall notify the tenant
that it is providing the duplicate bills or delinquency notice to the
owner or the owner's designee. After January 1, 1999, if a district
fails to notify the owner of a tenant's delinquency after receiving a
written request to do so and after receiving the other information
required by this subsection (7), the district shall have no lien
against the premises for the tenant's delinquent and unpaid charges.

--- END ---