BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
All state-purchased health care that provides coverage for
prostheses shall include coverage for hearing aids, provided that such
services are delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's
physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner as authorized by
the nursing care quality assurance commission under chapter 18.79 RCW
or physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW.
This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of
standard health plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of the state health care authority to negotiate rates and
contract with specific providers for the delivery of prostheses. This
section does not apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental
contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW
to read as follows:
An insurer that offers to any individual a health benefit plan that
provides coverage for prostheses shall include coverage for hearing
aids, provided that such services are delivered upon the recommendation
of the patient's physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner as
authorized by the nursing care quality assurance commission under
chapter 18.79 RCW or physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW.
This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of
standard health plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of the state health care authority to negotiate rates and
contract with specific providers for the delivery of prostheses. This
section does not apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental
contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A group insurance contract or blanket disability insurance contract
that provides coverage for prostheses shall include coverage for
hearing aids, provided that such services are delivered upon the
recommendation of the patient's physician or advanced registered nurse
practitioner as authorized by the nursing care quality assurance
commission under chapter 18.79 RCW or physician assistant under chapter
18.71A RCW.
This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of
standard health plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of the state health care authority to negotiate rates and
contract with specific providers for the delivery of prostheses. This
section does not apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental
contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
A health service contractor that provides coverage for prostheses
shall include coverage for hearing aids, provided that such services
are delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician or
advanced registered nurse practitioner as authorized by the nursing
care quality assurance commission under chapter 18.79 RCW or physician
assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW.
This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of
standard health plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of the state health care authority to negotiate rates and
contract with specific providers for the delivery of prostheses. This
section does not apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental
contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
A health maintenance organization that provides coverage for
prostheses shall include coverage for hearing aids, provided that such
services are delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's
physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner as authorized by
the nursing care quality assurance commission under chapter 18.79 RCW
or physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW.
This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of
standard health plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of the state health care authority to negotiate rates and
contract with specific providers for the delivery of prostheses. This
section does not apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental
contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.

--- END ---