BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington's
coastal and ocean resources are among the most important of its natural
resources and that the state holds these resources in trust for the
people of Washington. Ocean based activities, such as fishing,
aquaculture, tourism, recreation, and marine transportation have
historically played a vital role in Washington's economy and culture.
New ocean uses are being proposed in such areas as renewable energy,
marine biotechnology, and ocean observing. A healthy ocean is an
integral part of the high quality of life enjoyed in the state.
Therefore, the people of Washington have an obligation to be good
stewards of the ocean so that coastal and ocean resources are preserved
for future generations.
Washington's coastal and ocean resources face significant
challenges, including the preservation of water quality, fish
populations, and fish and wildlife habitat, and the utilization of
opportunities offered by new sustainable use activities. Coordinated
policy regarding Washington's coastal and ocean resources will improve
the efficiency and effectiveness of the state's ocean related programs
and activities. The coordination of Washington's scientific resources
will increase the quality and quantity of information available to
assess current and proposed use activities. Additionally, the movement
of ocean currents, atmospheric winds, and marine fish and wildlife
across state and national borders and the multijurisdictional reach of
many users of the coast and sea make cooperation between Washington and
adjacent jurisdictions necessary.
Between 2001 and 2004, two high level commissions, the United
States commission on ocean policy and the Pew oceans commission,
studied and issued reports documenting the state of our nation's oceans
and provided ocean policy recommendations. In response to the final
report of the United States commission on ocean policy, the president
issued the United States ocean action plan and created the cabinet-level committee on ocean policy in December 2004. Through these
actions, the federal government has evidenced an intent to facilitate
coordination between federal, state, tribal, local governments, and
other interested groups and to provide funding for ocean resources
programs and activities.
An evaluation of the condition of the state's coastal and ocean
resources and the development of options for addressing the
opportunities and challenges facing these resources will facilitate the
adoption of a more efficient and effective ocean policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The ocean policy review commission is
established.
(2) The commission is composed of the following members:
(a) The governor or the governor's designee;
(b) One representative from each major caucus in the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) One representative from each major caucus in the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(d) The director of the department of fish and wildlife or the
director's designee;
(e) The commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's
designee; and
(f) Six individuals appointed by the governor possessing recognized
expertise on ocean policy, program, or research issues. The governor
shall consult with a wide range of sources when appointing commission
members, including leaders from each major caucus of the senate and
house of representatives.
(3) The ocean policy review commission shall be convened by the
governor no later than June 1, 2005. Upon convening, the commission
shall select a chair to preside over commission meetings and a vice-chair to preside in the chair's absence.
(4) The commission shall convene a working group to provide
information, suggestions, and feedback to the commission as it carries
out the requirements of sections 3 and 4 of this act. The commission
shall determine the composition of the working group, which should
include, but is not limited to, a representative or representatives of:
(a) The federal government;
(b) Tribal government;
(c) Local coastal government;
(d) Port districts;
(e) Organizations engaged in environmental protection;
(f) Businesses engaged in fishing; and
(g) Organizations engaged in ocean science or technology.
(5) Staff to the ocean policy review commission must be provided by
the department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, and the
department of natural resources. Upon request by the commission, any
state agency must provide information within the scope of the
commission's work. The commission may also contract for technical
assistance on any topic or element of the commission's review with the
University of Washington, where expertise in marine affairs and ocean
and fishery sciences is extensive.
(6) Members of the ocean policy review commission and the working
group shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The ocean policy review commission shall,
upon convening, examine the findings and recommendations of the United
States commission on ocean policy and the Pew oceans commission. The
commission shall identify ocean and coastal programs currently
operating in the state. Additionally, the commission shall identify
recommendations from the United States commission on ocean policy and
the Pew oceans commission that could be implemented immediately or by
December 31, 2006. The commission shall report these findings and
recommendations to the governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 31,
2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) In addition to the requirements in
section 3 of this act, the ocean policy review commission shall:
(a) Review and summarize the condition of Washington's coastal and
ocean resources and their contribution to the state's character,
quality of life, and economic vitality;
(b) Review and summarize the various interests, roles, and
responsibilities of public entities, tribal interests, and other
stakeholders in the protection and management of Washington's coastal
and ocean resources;
(c) Identify and recommend ways to more effectively protect and
manage coastal and ocean resources and take advantage of appropriate
new opportunities to use such resources;
(d) Identify and recommend ways to improve coordination between
state agencies on coastal and ocean resources issues;
(e) Identify and recommend ways to improve the state's coordination
with Oregon, British Columbia, the federal government, other states,
and tribal and local governments on coastal and ocean resources issues;
(f) Identify and recommend ways to improve coordination of
scientific and technological information and capabilities within the
state; and
(g) Identify and recommend ways to finance coastal and ocean
protection, management, and development programs.
(2) In carrying out this section, the ocean policy review
commission shall provide for extensive public participation. The
commission shall schedule its meetings in locations throughout the
state, including meetings in at least five different coastal locations.
Additionally, the commission shall attempt to schedule its meetings in
locations and at times convenient for public attendance.
(3) The ocean policy review commission shall report these findings
and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 31, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The ocean policy review commission and its
powers and duties terminate June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.143 RCW
to read as follows:
The coastal and ocean resources account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from gifts or grants to the
account, or legislative appropriations to the account, must be
deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may only be
used for coastal and ocean resources programs or activities. Only the
governor or the governor's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The governor or the governor's designee
shall work to secure federal grants and other sources of funding for
inclusion in the coastal and ocean resources account during the
existence of the ocean policy review commission.
(2) The governor or the governor's designee, with participation by
the members of the ocean policy review commission, shall represent the
state in coastal and ocean resources discussions with the federal
government, other states, and tribal and local governments during the
existence of the ocean policy review commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2005.

--- END ---