BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.220.080 and 2004 c 126 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall include information
on motorcycle awareness, approved by the ((Motorcycle Safety
Foundation)) director of licensing, in instructional material used in
traffic safety education courses, to ensure new operators of motor
vehicles have been instructed in the importance of safely sharing the
road with motorcyclists.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.82.420 and 2004 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The advisory committee shall compile and furnish to each qualifying
applicant for an instructor's license or a driver training school
license a basic minimum required curriculum. The basic minimum
required curriculum shall also include (1) information on the effects
of alcohol and drug use on motor vehicle operators, including
information on drug and alcohol related traffic injury and mortality
rates in the state of Washington; (2) current penalties for driving
under the influence of drugs or alcohol; and (3) information on
motorcycle awareness, approved by the ((Motorcycle Safety Foundation))
director, to ensure new operators of motor vehicles have been
instructed in the importance of safely sharing the road with
motorcyclists. Should the director be presented with acceptable proof
that any licensed instructor or driver training school is not showing
proper diligence in teaching such basic minimum curriculum as required,
the instructor or school shall be required to appear before the
advisory committee and show cause why the license of the instructor or
school should not be revoked for such negligence. If the committee
does not accept such reasons as may be offered, the director may revoke
the license of the instructor or school, or both.

--- END ---