BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the legislature's intent to
provide funding for the development and implementation of an automated
system for the electronic processing of the real estate excise tax.
The legislature finds that due to the numerous users of the real estate
excise tax information, and the many entities involved in its workflow,
that county systems must be compatible with the automated system
developed by the state department of revenue.
(2) The legislature finds that under current law an electronic real
estate excise tax affidavit that is signed with a digital signature
under chapter 19.34 RCW is a legally valid document and pursuant to RCW
5.46.010, electronic facsimiles, scanned signatures, and digital and
other electronic conversions of written signatures satisfy the
signature component of the affidavit requirement under this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.45.180 and 1998 c 106 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For taxes collected by the county under this chapter, the
county treasurer shall collect a ((two-dollar)) ten-dollar fee on all
transactions required by this chapter where the transaction does not
require the payment of tax. A total of ((two)) ten dollars shall be
collected in the form of a tax and fee, where the calculated tax
payment is less than ((two)) five dollars. Five dollars of the ten-dollar fee shall be deposited in the county treasurer's real estate
excise tax electronic technology account. The county treasurer shall
place one percent of the proceeds of the tax imposed by this chapter
and the treasurer's fee in the county current expense fund to defray
costs of collection and shall pay over to the state treasurer and
account to the department of revenue for the remainder of the proceeds
at the same time the county treasurer remits funds to the state under
RCW 84.56.280. The state treasurer shall deposit the proceeds in the
general fund for the support of the common schools.
(2) For taxes collected by the department of revenue under this
chapter, the department shall remit the tax to the state treasurer who
shall deposit the proceeds of any state tax in the general fund for the
support of the common schools. The state treasurer shall deposit the
proceeds of any local taxes imposed under chapter 82.46 RCW in the
local real estate excise tax account hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the local real estate excise tax account may be
spent only for distribution to counties, cities, and towns imposing a
tax under chapter 82.46 RCW. Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all
earnings of investments of balances in the local real estate excise tax
account shall be credited to the local real estate excise tax account
and distributed to the counties, cities, and towns monthly. Monthly
the state treasurer shall make distribution from the local real estate
excise tax account to the counties, cities, and towns the amount of tax
collected on behalf of each taxing authority. The state treasurer
shall make the distribution under this subsection without
appropriation.
(3)(a) The real estate excise tax electronic technology account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. An appropriation is not
required for expenditure and the account is not subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(b) The county treasurer shall collect an additional five-dollar
fee on all taxable transactions required by this chapter. The county
treasurer shall remit this fee to the state treasurer at the same time
the county treasurer remits funds to the state under RCW 84.56.280.
The state treasurer shall place money from this fee in the real estate
excise tax electronic technology account. By the twentieth day of the
subsequent month, the state treasurer shall distribute to each county
treasurer according to the following formula: Three-quarters of the
funds available shall be equally distributed among the thirty-nine
counties; and the balance will be ratably distributed among the
counties in direct proportion to their population as it relates to the
total state's population based on most recent statistics by the office
of financial management.
(c) When received by the county treasurer, the funds shall be
placed in a special real estate excise tax electronic technology fund
held by the county treasurer to be used exclusively for the
development, implementation, and maintenance of an electronic
processing and reporting system for real estate excise tax affidavits.
Funds may be expended to make the system compatible with the automated
real estate excise tax system developed by the department of revenue
and compatible with the processes used in the offices of the county
assessor and county auditor. Any funds held in the account that are
not expended by July 1, 2015, revert to the county capital improvements
fund in accordance with RCW 82.46.010.
(4) The five-dollar technology fee collected under subsections (1)
and (3)(b) of this section shall expire on June 30, 2010.

--- END ---