BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.570 and 2003 c 295 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every seven hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred forty hours per month. Any monthly
benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the
benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any
retired teacher or retired administrator who enters service in any
public educational institution in Washington state ((and who has
satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this
section)) at least one calendar month after his or her accrual date
shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in such service,
after the retiree has rendered service for more than ((one thousand
five hundred)) eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a school year. When
a retired teacher or administrator renders service beyond eight hundred
sixty-seven hours, the department shall collect from the employer the
applicable employer retirement contributions for the entire duration of
the member's employment during that fiscal year.
(3) Any retired teacher or retired administrator who enters service
in any public educational institution in Washington state one and one-half calendar months or more after his or her accrual date and:
(a) Is hired into a special education, science, or mathematics
position for which the school board has documented a justifiable need
to hire a retiree;
(b) Is hired through the established process, with public
advertising, for the position with the approval of the school board of
the prospective employer; and
(c) The employer retains records of the procedures followed and the
decisions made in hiring the retired teacher or retired administrator
and provides those records in the event of an audit;
shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in that service
after the retiree has rendered service for more than one thousand five
hundred hours in a school year.
(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the select
committee on pension policy. By December 1st of each year, the
superintendent of public instruction may recommend to the appropriate
legislative fiscal committees a list of employment positions to be
considered by the legislature for inclusion in subsection (3) of this
section. In the case of each position, the recommendation shall
include a documented and justifiable need to hire retirees into that
position.
(((4))) (5) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal
this section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a
contractual right to be employed for more than five hundred twenty-five
hours per year without a reduction of his or her pension.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A retiree from plan 1 of the teachers'
retirement system who entered employment with an employer under RCW
41.32.570(2) as it existed prior to its amendment by chapter . . .,
Laws of 2005 (this act) may continue to receive pension payments,
subject to the terms and conditions of that statute, until December 31,
2005.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.40.037 and 2003 c 412 s 5 and 2003 c 295 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a retiree from
plan 1 who enters employment with an employer at least one calendar
month after his or her accrual date may continue to receive pension
payments while engaged in such service for up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours of service in a calendar year without a reduction of
pension.
(b) A retiree from plan 1 who enters employment with an employer at
least three calendar months after his or her accrual date and:
(i) Is hired into ((a position for which the employer has
documented a justifiable need to hire a retiree into the position)) one
of the following employment positions: Actuary, including an actuary
associate, correctional health specialist, dentist, pharmacist,
physician, public health advisor, radiation health physicist, or
radiology technician;
(ii) Is hired through the established process, with public
advertising, for the position with the approval of: A school board for
a school district; the chief executive officer of a state agency
employer; the secretary of the senate for the senate; the chief clerk
of the house of representatives for the house of representatives; the
secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of
representatives jointly for the joint legislative audit and review
committee, the legislative transportation committee, the joint
committee on pension policy, the legislative evaluation and
accountability program, the legislative systems committee, and the
statute law committee; or according to rules adopted for the rehiring
of retired plan 1 members for a local government employer, including
public advertising; and
(iii) The employer retains records of the procedures followed and
decisions made in hiring the retiree, and provides those records in the
event of an audit; ((and
(iv) The employee has not already rendered a cumulative total of
more than one thousand nine hundred hours of service while in receipt
of pension payments beyond an annual threshold of eight hundred sixty-seven hours;))
shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in that service
after the retiree has rendered service for more than one thousand five
hundred hours in a calendar year. ((The one thousand nine hundred hour
cumulative total under this subsection applies prospectively to those
retiring after July 27, 2003, and retroactively to those who retired
prior to July 27, 2003, and shall be calculated from the date of
retirement.))
(c) When a plan 1 member renders service beyond eight hundred
sixty-seven hours, the department shall collect from the employer the
applicable employer retirement contributions for the entire duration of
the member's employment during that calendar year.
(d) A retiree from plan 2 or plan 3 who has satisfied the break in
employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section may work up to
eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a calendar year in an eligible
position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, or as
a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
without suspension of his or her benefit.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the
period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and
receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again
retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However, if the
right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous
retirement shall be reinstated.
(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the select
committee on pension policy. By December 1st of each year, the
department of personnel, the superintendent of public instruction, and
any other employer listed in subsection (2)(b) of this section may
recommend to the appropriate legislative fiscal committees a list of
employment positions to be considered by the legislature for inclusion
in subsection (2)(b) of this section. In the case of each position,
the recommendation shall include a documented and justifiable need to
hire retirees into that position.
(5) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to be employed for more than five months in a calendar year
without a reduction of his or her pension.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.40.037 and 2004 c 242 s 63 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a retiree from
plan 1 who enters employment with an employer at least one calendar
month after his or her accrual date may continue to receive pension
payments while engaged in such service for up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours of service in a calendar year without a reduction of
pension.
(b) A retiree from plan 1 who enters employment with an employer at
least three calendar months after his or her accrual date and:
(i) Is hired into ((a position for which the employer has
documented a justifiable need to hire a retiree into the position)) one
of the following employment positions: Actuary, including an actuary
associate, correctional health specialist, dentist, pharmacist,
physician, public health advisor, radiation health physicist, or
radiology technician;
(ii) Is hired through the established process, with public
advertising, for the position with the approval of: A school board for
a school district; the chief executive officer of a state agency
employer; the secretary of the senate for the senate; the chief clerk
of the house of representatives for the house of representatives; the
secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of
representatives jointly for the joint legislative audit and review
committee, the legislative transportation committee, the joint
committee on pension policy, the legislative evaluation and
accountability program, the legislative systems committee, and the
statute law committee; or according to rules adopted for the rehiring
of retired plan 1 members for a local government employer, including
public advertising; and
(iii) The employer retains records of the procedures followed and
decisions made in hiring the retiree, and provides those records in the
event of an audit; ((and
(iv) The employee has not already rendered a cumulative total of
more than one thousand nine hundred hours of service while in receipt
of pension payments beyond an annual threshold of eight hundred sixty-seven hours;))
shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in that service
after the retiree has rendered service for more than one thousand five
hundred hours in a calendar year. ((The one thousand nine hundred hour
cumulative total under this subsection applies prospectively to those
retiring after July 27, 2003, and retroactively to those who retired
prior to July 27, 2003, and shall be calculated from the date of
retirement.))
(c) When a plan 1 member renders service beyond eight hundred
sixty-seven hours, the department shall collect from the employer the
applicable employer retirement contributions for the entire duration of
the member's employment during that calendar year.
(d) A retiree from plan 2 or plan 3 who has satisfied the break in
employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section may work up to
eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a calendar year in an eligible
position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or
41.40.010, or as a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her benefit.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the
period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and
receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again
retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However, if the
right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous
retirement shall be reinstated.
(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the select
committee on pension policy. By December 1st of each year, the
department of personnel, the superintendent of public instruction, and
any other employer listed in subsection (2)(b) of this section may
recommend to the appropriate legislative fiscal committees a list of
employment positions to be considered by the legislature for inclusion
in subsection (2)(b) of this section. In the case of each position,
the recommendation shall include a documented and justifiable need to
hire retirees into that position.
(5) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to be employed for more than five months in a calendar year
without a reduction of his or her pension.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A retiree from plan 1 of the public
employees' retirement system who entered employment with an employer
under RCW 41.40.037(2)(b) as it existed prior to its amendment by
chapter . . ., Laws of 2005 (this act) may continue to receive pension
payments, subject to the terms and conditions of that statute, until
December 31, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for section 4 of this act which takes effect July
1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2006.

--- END ---