BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.600.310 and 1994 c 205 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not
yet received the credits required for the award of a high school
diploma ((or its equivalent)) and are eligible to be in the eleventh or
twelfth grades may apply to a participating institution of higher
education to enroll in courses or programs offered by the institution
of higher education. A student receiving home-based instruction
enrolling in a public high school for the sole purpose of participating
in courses or programs offered by institutions of higher education
shall not be counted by the school district in any required state or
federal accountability reporting if the student's parents or guardians
filed a declaration of intent to provide home-based instruction and the
student received home-based instruction during the school year before
the school year in which the student intends to participate in courses
or programs offered by the institution of higher education. Students
receiving home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW and students
attending private schools approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW shall not
be required to meet the student learning goals, obtain a certificate of
academic achievement or a certificate of individual achievement to
graduate from high school, or to master the essential academic learning
requirements. However, students are eligible to enroll in courses or
programs in participating universities only if the board of directors
of the student's school district has decided to participate in the
program. Participating institutions of higher education, in
consultation with school districts, may establish admission standards
for these students. If the institution of higher education accepts a
secondary school pupil for enrollment under this section, the
institution of higher education shall send written notice to the pupil
and the pupil's school district within ten days of acceptance. The
notice shall indicate the course and hours of enrollment for that
pupil.
(2) The pupil's school district shall transmit to the institution
of higher education an amount per each full-time equivalent college
student at statewide uniform rates for vocational and nonvocational
students. The superintendent of public instruction shall separately
calculate and allocate moneys appropriated for basic education under
RCW 28A.150.260 to school districts for purposes of making such
payments and for granting school districts seven percent thereof to
offset program related costs. The calculations and allocations shall
be based upon the estimated statewide annual average per full-time
equivalent high school student allocations under RCW 28A.150.260,
excluding small high school enhancements, and applicable rules adopted
under chapter 34.05 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction, the
higher education coordinating board, and the state board for community
and technical colleges shall consult on the calculation and
distribution of the funds. The institution of higher education shall
not require the pupil to pay any other fees. The funds received by the
institution of higher education from the school district shall not be
deemed tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the institution
of higher education. A student enrolled under this subsection shall
not be counted for the purpose of determining any enrollment
restrictions imposed by the state on the institution of higher
education.

--- END ---