BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.52.378 and 1987 c 505 s 84 are each amended to read
as follows:
The executive board of any operating agency constructing,
operating, terminating, or decommissioning a nuclear power plant under
a site certification agreement issued pursuant to chapter 80.50 RCW
shall appoint an administrative auditor. The administrative auditor
shall be deemed an officer under chapter 42.23 RCW. The appointment of
the administrative auditor shall be in addition to the appointment of
the auditor for the issuance of warrants and other purposes as provided
in RCW 43.52.375. ((The executive board shall retain a qualified firm
or firms to conduct performance audits which is in fact independent and
does not have any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract with
the operating agency other than its employment hereunder. No member or
employee of any such firm shall be connected with the operating agency
as an officer, employee, or contractor.)) The administrative auditor
((and the firm or firms)) shall be independently and directly
responsible to the executive board of the operating agency. The
executive board shall require ((a firm)) the administrative auditor to
conduct continuing audits of the methods, procedures and organization
used by the operating agency to control costs, schedules, productivity,
contract amendments, project design and any other topics deemed
desirable by the executive board. The executive board may also require
((a firm)) the administrative auditor to analyze particular technical
aspects of the operating agency's projects and contract amendments.
The ((firm or firms)) administrative auditor shall provide advice to
the executive board in its management and control of the operating
agency. At least once each year, the ((firm or firms)) administrative
auditor shall prepare and furnish a report of its actions and
recommendations to the executive board for the purpose of enabling it
to attain the highest degree of efficiency in the management and
control of any thermal power project under construction or in
operation. ((The administrative auditor shall assist the firm or firms
in the performance of its duties.)) The administrative auditor ((and
the firm or firms)) shall consult regularly with the executive board
and furnish any information or data to the executive board which the
administrative auditor((, firm,)) or executive board deems helpful in
accomplishing the purpose above stated. The administrative auditor
shall perform such other duties as the executive board shall prescribe
to accomplish the purposes of this section.
Upon the concurrent request of the chairmen of the senate or house
energy and utilities committees, the operating agency shall report to
the committees on a quarterly basis.

--- END ---