BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that all public
assistance programs be administered to provide appropriate access and
benefits to eligible recipients for as long as they need assistance and
are eligible. Welfare fraud in any form undermines the purpose of
public assistance and the very spirit in which it is provided.
(2) In an effort to ensure the integrity of all public assistance
programs in the state of Washington there is established in the office
of the attorney general, the office of inspector general. The office
of inspector general shall be directed by the inspector general who
shall be appointed by the attorney general. The office of inspector
general shall investigate welfare fraud and public assistance fraud in
Washington state. Welfare includes public assistance programs and
benefits, temporary assistance for needy families, WorkFirst,
electronic benefits transfer, food stamps, and child care benefits.
Medicaid fraud shall be referred to the medicaid fraud control unit of
the office of the attorney general for investigation.
(3) It is the duty of the office of inspector general to prevent,
detect, and eliminate fraud, waste, abuse, mismanagement, and
misconduct in welfare and public assistance programs receiving or
administering state or federal government funds. Office of inspector
general duties shall include investigation of recipients, providers,
contractors, and vendors of these benefits.
(4) The office of inspector general shall work in concert with
other agencies in accomplishing its mission to prevent and detect fraud
and abuse of welfare, public assistance, and state and federal funds.
The office of inspector general shall coordinate services with local,
state, and federal law enforcement agencies.
(5) Funding for the office of inspector general shall be provided
by transferring funding for three full-time equivalent positions from
the division of fraud investigations within the department of social
and health services and transferring all funding for three full-time
equivalent positions to the office of the attorney general solely for
the purpose of funding the office of inspector general.
(6) The office of inspector general shall respond to any and all
allegations of fraud or abuse of welfare and public assistance funds
regardless of the source of the allegations. Allegations of fraud or
abuse may be brought to the attention of the office of inspector
general by agency employees, citizens of Washington state, providers,
recipients, vendors, contractors, and law enforcement. Under no
circumstances shall any individual or organization that brings
allegations of fraud or abuse to the attention of the office of
inspector general be retaliated against.
(7) The office of inspector general shall publish a report to the
legislature annually which shall include a narrative and corresponding
statistical data on its activities. This annual report may include
recommendations for agency operations and policies, legislative action,
government oversight, or funding. The report is due January 1, 2006,
and each year thereafter.

--- END ---