BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.15.100 and 1995 c 302 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each agency shall make application for a license or renewal of
license to the department of social and health services on forms
prescribed by the department and shall complete, sign, and swear to the
contents of the application under penalty of perjury. A licensed
agency having foster-family homes under its supervision may make
application for a license on behalf of any such foster-family home.
Such a foster home license shall cease to be valid when the home is no
longer under the supervision of that agency. Upon receipt of such
application, the department shall either grant or deny a license within
ninety days unless the application is for licensure as a foster-family
home, in which case RCW 74.15.040 shall govern. A license shall be
granted if the agency meets the minimum requirements set forth in
chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 and the departmental requirements
consistent herewith, except that an initial license may be issued as
provided in RCW 74.15.120. Licenses provided for in chapter 74.15 RCW
and RCW 74.13.031 shall be issued for a period of three years. The
licensee, however, shall advise the secretary of any material change in
circumstances which might constitute grounds for reclassification of
license as to category. The license issued under this chapter is not
transferable and applies only to the licensee and the location stated
in the application. For licensed foster-family and family day-care
homes having an acceptable history of child care, the license may
remain in effect for two weeks after a move, except that for the
foster-family home this will apply only if the family remains intact.

--- END ---