BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.15.030 and 2000 c 162 s 20 and 2000 c 122 s 40 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The secretary shall have the power and it shall be the secretary's
duty:
(1) In consultation with the children's services advisory
committee, and with the advice and assistance of persons representative
of the various type agencies to be licensed, to designate categories of
facilities for which separate or different requirements shall be
developed as may be appropriate whether because of variations in the
ages, sex and other characteristics of persons served, variations in
the purposes and services offered or size or structure of the agencies
to be licensed hereunder, or because of any other factor relevant
thereto;
(2) In consultation with the children's services advisory
committee, and with the advice and assistance of persons representative
of the various type agencies to be licensed, to adopt and publish
minimum requirements for licensing applicable to each of the various
categories of agencies to be licensed.
The minimum requirements shall be limited to:
(a) Ensuring that each agency licensed under this chapter shall
have a unique identifying number issued upon application that shall be
used in all transactions with the department and which can be used to
track and trace all payments made to that agency. The unique
identifying number assigned shall not be the agency's social security
number;
(b) The size and suitability of a facility and the plan of
operation for carrying out the purpose for which an applicant seeks a
license;
(((b))) (c) The character, suitability and competence of an agency
and other persons associated with an agency directly responsible for
the care and treatment of children, expectant mothers or
developmentally disabled persons. In consultation with law enforcement
personnel, the secretary shall investigate the conviction record or
pending charges and dependency record information under chapter 43.43
RCW of each agency and its staff seeking licensure or relicensure. No
unfounded allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020 may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption
agency, or any other provider licensed under this chapter. In order to
determine the suitability of applicants for an agency license,
licensees, their employees, and other persons who have unsupervised
access to children in care, and who have not resided in the state of
Washington during the three-year period before being authorized to care
for children shall be fingerprinted. The fingerprints shall be
forwarded to the Washington state patrol and federal bureau of
investigation for a criminal history records check. The fingerprint
criminal history records checks will be at the expense of the licensee
except that in the case of a foster family home, if this expense would
work a hardship on the licensee, the department shall pay the expense.
The licensee may not pass this cost on to the employee or prospective
employee, unless the employee is determined to be unsuitable due to his
or her criminal history record. The secretary shall use the
information solely for the purpose of determining eligibility for a
license and for determining the character, suitability, and competence
of those persons or agencies, excluding parents, not required to be
licensed who are authorized to care for children, expectant mothers,
and developmentally disabled persons. Criminal justice agencies shall
provide the secretary such information as they may have and that the
secretary may require for such purpose;
(((c))) (d) The number of qualified persons required to render the
type of care and treatment for which an agency seeks a license;
(((d))) (e) The safety, cleanliness, and general adequacy of the
premises to provide for the comfort, care and well-being of children,
expectant mothers or developmentally disabled persons;
(((e))) (f) The provision of necessary care, including food,
clothing, supervision and discipline; physical, mental and social well-being; and educational, recreational and spiritual opportunities for
those served;
(((f))) (g) The financial ability of an agency to comply with
minimum requirements established pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW
74.13.031; and
(((g))) (h) The maintenance of records pertaining to the admission,
progress, health and discharge of persons served;
(3) To investigate any person, including relatives by blood or
marriage except for parents, for character, suitability, and competence
in the care and treatment of children, expectant mothers, and
developmentally disabled persons prior to authorizing that person to
care for children, expectant mothers, and developmentally disabled
persons. However, if a child is placed with a relative under RCW
13.34.065 or 13.34.130, and if such relative appears otherwise suitable
and competent to provide care and treatment the criminal history
background check required by this section need not be completed before
placement, but shall be completed as soon as possible after placement;
(4) On reports of alleged child abuse and neglect, to investigate
agencies in accordance with chapter 26.44 RCW, including child day-care
centers and family day-care homes, to determine whether the alleged
abuse or neglect has occurred, and whether child protective services or
referral to a law enforcement agency is appropriate;
(5) To issue, revoke, or deny licenses to agencies pursuant to
chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031. Licenses shall specify the
category of care which an agency is authorized to render and the ages,
sex and number of persons to be served;
(6) To prescribe the procedures and the form and contents of
reports necessary for the administration of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW
74.13.031 and to require regular reports from each licensee;
(7) To inspect agencies periodically to determine whether or not
there is compliance with chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 and the
requirements adopted hereunder;
(8) To review requirements adopted hereunder at least every two
years and to adopt appropriate changes after consultation with the
child care coordinating committee and other affected groups for child
day-care requirements and with the children's services advisory
committee for requirements for other agencies; and
(9) To consult with public and private agencies in order to help
them improve their methods and facilities for the care of children,
expectant mothers and developmentally disabled persons.

--- END ---