BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.12.340 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 111 are each
amended to read as follows:
The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations
governing the provision of day care as a part of child welfare services
when the secretary determines that a need exists for such day care and
that it is in the best interests of the child, the parents, or the
custodial parent and in determining the need for such day care priority
shall be given to geographical areas having the greatest need for such
care and to members of low-income groups in the population: PROVIDED,
That where the family is financially able to pay part or all of the
costs of such care, fees shall be imposed and paid according to the
financial ability of the family.
Each child eligible for state-subsidized child care shall be
assigned a unique identifying number upon application for state-subsidized child care that can be used to track the attendance and
state financial support provided to that child. The unique identifying
number assigned shall not be the applicant's social security number.

--- END ---