BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.26.010 and 1985 c 449 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds and declares that it is in the public
interest of the people of the state of Washington to encourage
maintenance, improvement, and preservation of privately owned historic
landmarks ((as the state approaches its Centennial year of 1989)). The
legislature further recognizes it is a public good to keep historic
private property on the tax rolls at its maximum value, rather than
having such property fall into disrepair, and that well-maintained and
preserved historic property enhances a community's sense of culture and
pride. To achieve this purpose, this chapter provides special
valuation for improvements to historic property and property tax
exemptions for maintenance and repair activities.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.26.020 and 1986 c 221 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Historic property" means real property together with
improvements thereon, except property listed in a register primarily
for objects buried below ground, which is:
(a) Listed in a local register of historic places created by
comprehensive ordinance, certified by the secretary of the interior as
provided in P.L. 96-515; or
(b) Listed in the national register of historic places.
(2) "Cost" means the actual cost of rehabilitation, which cost
shall be at least twenty-five percent of the assessed valuation of the
historic property, exclusive of the assessed value attributable to the
land, prior to rehabilitation.
(3) "Special valuation" means the determination of the assessed
value of the historic property subtracting, for up to ten years, such
cost as is approved by the local review board.
(4) "State review board" means the advisory council on historic
preservation established under chapter 27.34 RCW, or any successor
agency designated by the state to act as the state historic
preservation review board under federal law.
(5) "Local review board" means a local body designated by the local
legislative authority.
(6) "Owner" means the owner of record.
(7) "Rehabilitation" is the process of returning a property to a
state of utility through repair or alteration, which makes possible an
efficient contemporary use while preserving those portions and features
of the property which are significant to its architectural and cultural
values.
(8) "Maintenance and repair activity" means the act or process of
applying measures to sustain the existing form, integrity, and
materials of an historic property. Maintenance and repair activities
include, but are not limited to, exterior cladding repair; repainting
and in-kind replacement; masonry cleaning and repointing; window, door,
porch, and chimney repair and in-kind replacement; reroofing in-kind;
and minor structural repairs. Activities also include, but are not
limited to, interior repainting; replastering; flooring repair,
refinishing and in-kind replacement; repair and replacement of plumbing
fixtures, fittings, and equipment; and repair and replacement of
lighting fixtures, electrical equipment, and heating equipment.
(9) "Maintenance and repair expenditures" means out-of-pocket
expenses incurred for maintenance and repair activity by the property
owner after January 1, 2004.
(10) "Qualified historic property" means historic property that (a)
is listed on the Washington heritage register or the national register
of historic places, and if within a historical district, is a
contributing building as defined by regulations of the United States
department of the interior; (b) is residential property occupied by the
owner; and (c) has incurred expenditures within the last five years for
maintenance and repair activities that exceed ten percent of the
assessed value of the residential structure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Historic property that is designated as
qualified historic property under section 4 of this act is exempt from
property taxes levied for any state purpose for the year of
designation. This exemption cannot be claimed more than once in a
five-year period. This exemption cannot be claimed if the owner of
historic property is participating in the special valuation program, as
defined in RCW 84.26.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Within ten days after the filing of the
application for a property tax exemption for maintenance and repair
activity in the county assessor's office, the county assessor shall
refer each application to the local review board.
(2) The review board shall approve the application if the property:
(a) Is listed on the Washington heritage register or the national
register of historic places;
(b) Is residential property occupied by the owner;
(c) Incurs expenditures for maintenance and repair activity that
exceed ten percent of the assessed value of the residential structure;
and
(d) Complies with minimum standards of maintenance that protect
those elements which qualify the property as historically significant.
(3) The assessed value of the residential structure in the year of
application shall be used for purposes of comparing maintenance and
repair expenditures to assessed value.
(4) Maintenance and repair expenditures made after January 1, 2005,
may be used to satisfy the ten percent threshold. Expenditures which
exceed ten percent may be carried forward and used together with any
additional maintenance and repair expenditures in application for
exemption in future years. Expenditures that are used to satisfy the
ten percent requirement in one year may not be carried forward and used
in the application for exemption in future years.
(5) An application for designation as qualified historic property
shall be approved or denied by the local review board before December
31st of the calendar year in which the application is made.
(6) The local review board is authorized to examine the maintenance
and repair records of applicants.
(7) The review board shall notify the county assessor and the
applicant of the approval or denial of the application.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.26.040 and 1986 c 221 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
An owner of property desiring special valuation, or an exemption
for maintenance and repair activities under this chapter, shall apply
to the assessor of the county in which the property is located upon
forms prescribed by the department of revenue and supplied by the
county assessor. For application under the special valuation program,
the application form shall include a statement that the applicant is
aware of the potential tax liability involved when the property ceases
to be eligible for special valuation. For the special valuation
program, applications shall be made no later than October 1 of the
calendar year preceding the first assessment year for which
classification is requested. For the maintenance and repair activities
exemptions, applications shall be made no later than October 1st for
exemption from taxes payable the following year. The assessor may
charge only such fees as are necessary to process and record documents
pursuant to this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.26.110 and 1985 c 449 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The local legislative authority and the local review board may
request the assistance of the state historic preservation officer in
conducting special valuation and property tax exemption activities.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.26.130 and 2001 c 185 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any decision by a local review board on an application for
classification as historic property eligible for special valuation or
property tax exemption for maintenance and repair activity may be
appealed to superior court under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598 in
addition to any other remedy at law. Any decision on the
disqualification of historic property eligible for special valuation,
property tax exemption for maintenance and repair activity, or any
other dispute, may be appealed to the county board of equalization in
accordance with RCW 84.40.038.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2006 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 3 and 4 of this act are each added
to chapter 84.26 RCW.

--- END ---