BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a person who is
injured as a result of engaging in criminal activity should not be
entitled to recover damages for that injury if the criminal activity
was an actual cause of the injury and the circumstances of the injury
warrant preclusion of liability as a matter of social policy and common
sense. The law provides a complete defense against a personal injury
action if the injured person was engaged in a felony at the time of the
injury. The legislature intends to extend this policy to situations
involving gross misdemeanor and misdemeanor crimes if the person is
found to have committed the offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
It is a complete defense to any action for damages for personal
injury or wrongful death that the person injured or killed was engaged
in the commission of a gross misdemeanor or a misdemeanor at the time
of the occurrence causing the injury or death and the gross misdemeanor
or misdemeanor was a proximate cause of the injury or death. However,
the defense provided in this section applies only if the injury or
death was not caused by an act of the person claiming the defense and,
in the case of a personal injury action, the person injured has been
convicted of the offense that was a proximate cause of the injury, or
in the case of a wrongful death action, the court finds by clear,
cogent, and convincing evidence that the person killed committed the
offense that was a proximate cause of the death. Nothing in this
section shall affect a right of action under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1983, nor
shall anything in this section affect a right of action under the
common law doctrine of attractive nuisance when the only offense
committed or intended to be committed is trespass.

--- END ---