BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 27.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All of the services of any county or regional law library under
this chapter may be delivered through one or more on-line electronic
legal research facilities supplied or contracted for by a county or
counties.
(2) No county is required to provide law library services in any
manner other than that authorized in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) No county may maintain more than one library facility with
legal research materials in the form of printed material, including but
not limited to books, periodicals, or reports. Any county that
maintains such a facility may also maintain one or more separate
electronic research facilities.

--- END ---