BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The school district board of directors may adopt a resolution
authorizing each member of the school district board of directors to
receive compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars for
each day during which the member attends an official meeting of the
group or performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the
chairperson of the board.
(2) A person shall not receive compensation for a day of service
under this section if:
(a) The person occupies a position normally regarded as full time
in nature, in any agency of the federal government, Washington state
government, Washington state local government, or school district in
Washington state; and
(b) Receives any compensation from such government for working that
day.

--- END ---