BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The racial and ethnic diversity of the population of Washington
is increasing;
(b) Employers' demand for well-educated and well-trained graduates
of all ethnic backgrounds is increasing;
(c) Special efforts should be made to increase the participation of
people of color in higher education programs;
(d) Some of Washington's students of color would benefit from an
opportunity to study in specialized programs or institutions of higher
education located in other states;
(e) The state could benefit by creating pilot projects that study
creative, cost-effective ways to meet the postsecondary education needs
of Washington's students; and
(f) Historically Black colleges enroll and graduate the majority of
African-American professionals and Ph.D. candidates in the United
States.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to direct the higher
education coordinating board to establish a pilot project that permits
a limited number of students to use their state need grant awards to
study at Morehouse College, Howard University, Spelman College,
Grambling State University, and Tuskegee University.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The historically Black college fund pilot project is created.
Through the pilot project, up to one hundred students may use their
state-funded need grant awards when they study at Morehouse College,
Howard University, Spelman College, Grambling State University, or
Tuskegee University.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall administer the historically Black college fund
pilot project.
(2) The board shall permit up to one hundred needy Washington
residents domiciled in Washington for at least one year before
enrollment to use their state need grant awards if the students are
enrolled half-time or more in Morehouse College, Howard University,
Spelman College, Grambling State University, or Tuskegee University.
(3) The board may adopt rules to establish eligibility criteria for
student and institutional participation in the pilot project.
(4) The board shall limit participation in the pilot project to no
more than a total of one hundred students during the course of the
project.
(5) By December 15, 2010, the board shall report to the governor
and appropriate committees of the legislature on the results of the
pilot project. The report shall include a recommendation on the extent
financial aid portability programs should be revised or expanded for
Washington's students.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2010.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.10.790 and 2004 c 275 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Washington residents attending any nonprofit college or
university in another state which has a reciprocity agreement with the
state of Washington shall be eligible for the student financial aid
program outlined in chapter 28B.92 RCW if (((1))) (a) they qualify as
a "needy student" under RCW 28B.92.030(3), and (((2))) (b) the
institution attended is a member institution of an accrediting
association recognized by rule of the ((higher education coordinating))
board for the purposes of this section and is specifically encompassed
within or directly affected by such reciprocity agreement and agrees to
and complies with program rules ((and regulations)) pertaining to such
students and institutions adopted pursuant to RCW 28B.92.150.
(2) Washington residents participating in the pilot project under
section 2 of this act are eligible for the student financial aid
program outlined in RCW 28B.92.010 through 28B.92.150 if the residents
(a) qualify as needy students under RCW 28B.92.030(3), (b) are enrolled
at an eligible institution as defined by the board under section 3 of
this act, and (c) meet any additional criteria established by the board
for participation in the pilot project.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.92.030 and 2004 c 275 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Institution or institutions of higher education" means:
(a) Any public university, college, community college, or technical
college operated by the state of Washington or any political
subdivision thereof; ((or))
(b) Until June 30, 2010, any institution of higher education that
meets the eligibility requirements established by the board under
section 3 of this act; or
(c) Any other university, college, school, or institute in the
state of Washington offering instruction beyond the high school level
which is a member institution of an accrediting association recognized
by rule of the board for the purposes of this section: PROVIDED, That
any institution, branch, extension or facility operating within the
state of Washington which is affiliated with an institution operating
in another state must be a separately accredited member institution of
any such accrediting association, or a branch of a member institution
of an accrediting association recognized by rule of the board for
purposes of this section, that is eligible for federal student
financial aid assistance and has operated as a nonprofit college or
university delivering on-site classroom instruction for a minimum of
twenty consecutive years within the state of Washington, and has an
annual enrollment of at least seven hundred full-time equivalent
students: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no institution of higher education
shall be eligible to participate in a student financial aid program
unless it agrees to and complies with program rules and regulations
adopted pursuant to RCW 28B.92.150.
(2) "Financial aid" means loans and/or grants to needy students
enrolled or accepted for enrollment as a student at institutions of
higher education.
(3) "Needy student" means a post high school student of an
institution of higher education who demonstrates to the board the
financial inability, either through the student's parents, family
and/or personally, to meet the total cost of board, room, books, and
tuition and incidental fees for any semester or quarter.
(4) "Disadvantaged student" means a post high school student who by
reason of adverse cultural, educational, environmental, experiential,
familial or other circumstances is unable to qualify for enrollment as
a full time student in an institution of higher education, who would
otherwise qualify as a needy student, and who is attending an
institution of higher education under an established program designed
to qualify the student for enrollment as a full time student.
(5) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.

--- END ---