BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.95M RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2006, a person who is known to be pregnant or
who is under three years of age shall not be vaccinated with a mercury-containing vaccine or injected with a mercury-containing product that
does not meet food and drug administration vaccine licensure
requirements.
(2) The secretary of the department of health may, upon declaration
of a public health emergency, suspend the requirements of this section
for the duration of the emergency.

--- END ---