BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.42.010 and 1993 c 203 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1)(a) "Amusement apparatus" means an "amusement structure" or
"amusement ride," as defined in subsections (2)(a) and (3)(a) of this
section, but does not include any structure, device, ride, or other
apparatus excluded from the definition of either "amusement structure"
or "amusement ride" under subsection (2)(b) or (3)(b) of this section.
(b) An amusement apparatus may be (i) situated inside, outside, or
as part of a building; (ii) stationary or mobile; or (iii) temporarily
or permanently installed in a location.
(2)(a) Amusement structure" means electrical or mechanical devices
or combinations of one or more structures and devices (i) operated for
revenue; and ((to provide)) (ii) providing amusement or entertainment
to ((viewers or audiences at carnivals, fairs, or amusement parks))
persons who climb in or upon the structure. "Amusement structure"
((also means a bungee jumping device regardless of where located))
includes climbing walls and inflatable bounce-houses.
(b) "Amusement structure" does not include ((games in which a
member of the public must perform an act, nor concessions at which
customers may make purchases)) booths or other enclosures typically
found at carnivals, fairs, or amusement parks in or from which are
offered (i) games, such as coin-toss, ring-throw, or darts, that do not
involve the transportation of the participant; or (ii) concessions.
(((2))) (3)(a) "Amusement ride" means any vehicle, boat, bungee
jumping device, or other mechanical device (i) operated for revenue;
(ii) moving independently or upon or within a structure, along cables
or rails, through the air by centrifugal force or otherwise, or across
water((,)); and (iii) that is used to convey one or more individuals
for amusement, entertainment, diversion, or recreation. "Amusement
ride" includes((, but is not limited to,)) devices commonly known as
skyrides, ferris wheels, carousels, parachute towers, tunnels of love,
bungee jumping devices, go carts, bumper cars, and roller coasters.
(b) "Amusement ride" does not include: (((a))) (i) Conveyances for
persons in recreational winter sports activities such as ski lifts, ski
tows, j-bars, t-bars, and similar devices subject to regulation under
chapter ((70.88 RCW; (b))) 79A.40 RCW; (ii) any stationary single-passenger or dual passenger coin-operated ride that is manually,
mechanically, or electrically operated and customarily placed in a
public location and that does not normally require the supervision or
services of an operator; (((c))) (iii) nonmechanized playground
equipment not operated for revenue, including but not limited to,
swings, seesaws, stationary spring-mounted animal features, rider-propelled merry-go-rounds, climbers, slides, trampolines, and physical
fitness devices; or (((d))) (iv) water slides.
(((3))) (4) "Department" means the department of labor and
industries.
(((4))) (5) "Insurance policy" means an insurance policy written by
an insurer authorized to do business in this state under Title 48 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.42.020 and 1993 c 203 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Before)) Except as provided under section 3 of this act, when
operating, renting, or leasing any amusement ((ride or structure))
apparatus, the owner or operator of the apparatus shall:
(1) ((Obtain a permit)) Possess a valid amusement apparatus
operating decal issued pursuant to RCW 67.42.030;
(2) ((Have the amusement ride or structure inspected for safety at
least once annually by an insurer, a person with whom the insurer has
contracted, or a person who meets the qualifications set by the
department and obtain from the insurer or person a written certificate
that the inspection has been made and that the amusement ride or
structure meets the standards for coverage and is covered by the
insurer as required by subsection (3) of this section. A bungee
jumping device, including, but not limited to, the crane, tower,
balloon or bridge, person lift basket, platforms, bungee cords, end
attachments, anchors, carabiners or locking devices, harnesses, landing
devices, and additional ride operation hardware shall be inspected for
safety prior to beginning operation and annually by an insurer, a
person with whom the insurer has contracted, or a person authorized by
the department to inspect bungee jumping devices. The operator of the
bungee jumping device shall obtain a written certificate which states
that the required inspection has been made and the bungee jumping
device meets the standards for coverage and is covered by the insurer
as required by subsection (3) of this section;
(3))) Have and keep in effect an insurance policy in an amount not
less than one million dollars per occurrence insuring: (a) The owner
or operator; and (b) any municipality or county on whose property the
amusement ((ride or structure stands)) apparatus is located, or any
municipality or county which has contracted with the owner or operator
against liability for injury to persons arising out of the use of the
amusement ((ride or structure)) apparatus;
(((4) File with the department the inspection certificate and
insurance policy required by this section; and
(5))) (3) File with each sponsor, lessor, landowner, or other
person responsible for an amusement ((structure or ride)) apparatus
being offered for use by the public a certificate stating that the
insurance required by subsection (((3))) (2) of this section is in
effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 67.42 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall require that an amusement apparatus
operating decal be obtained by:
(1) A person operating or otherwise making an amusement apparatus
available without charge to the person's family or invitees at his or
her place of residence, but only if (i) the person operating the
apparatus owns the residence; or (ii) the owner of the residence has
authorized the use of the apparatus; or
(2) A person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
operating an amusement apparatus when the apparatus is part of an act
or stage performance to entertain an audience, and access to the
apparatus by the general public is prohibited.

Sec. 4 RCW 67.42.025 and 1986 c 86 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An amusement ((ride)) apparatus that has been inspected in any
state, territory, or possession of the United States that, in the
discretion of the department, has a level of regulation comparable to
this chapter, shall be deemed to meet the inspection requirement of
this chapter.
(2) An amusement ((ride)) apparatus inspector who is authorized to
inspect amusement ((rides)) apparatus in any state, territory, or
possession of the United States, who, in the discretion of the
department, has a level of qualifications comparable to those required
under this chapter, shall be deemed qualified to inspect amusement
((rides)) apparatus under this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 67.42.030 and 1985 c 262 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Application for an operating permit to operate an amusement
ride or structure shall be made on an annual basis by the owner or
operator of the amusement ride or structure. The)) An application for
an amusement apparatus operating decal shall be made on forms or in a
manner prescribed by the department and shall include the application
fee required by rule and the certificates of insurance and inspection
required by RCW 67.42.020(2) and 67.42.030(2).
(2) An applicant for an amusement apparatus operating decal shall
identify the apparatus for which a decal is being applied and:
(a) Certify that all of the components of the apparatus have been
inspected for safety (i) after the date of any invalidating event
identified in RCW 67.42.040(2) (a) through (d); and (ii) no more than
ninety days before the date of the application; and
(b) Submit an original or certified copy of a statement from (i)
the applicant's insurer; (ii) a qualified inspector retained by the
applicant's insurer; or (iii) a person meeting the qualifications for
an amusement apparatus inspector as established by the department by
rule, verifying the date of the inspection and that the apparatus meets
or exceeds the safety standards applicable to the apparatus as adopted
by the department under this chapter.
(3) If the requirements of this section are met, the department
shall issue ((a)) an amusement apparatus operating decal with each
permit to the applicant.
(4) When the amusement apparatus identified in the application is
operated, rented, leased, or otherwise made available to the public,
the decal shall be ((affixed on or adjacent to the control panel of the
amusement ride or structure)) displayed in a location visible to the
patrons of the ((ride or structure)) apparatus.

Sec. 6 RCW 67.42.040 and 1993 c 203 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section or unless
a shorter period is specified by the department, permits issued under
RCW 67.42.030 ((are)) is valid for ((a one-year period)) one year from
the date of issuance, and is not transferrable.
(2) ((If an amusement ride or structure)) An amusement apparatus
operating decal becomes invalid immediately when the insurance policy
required by RCW 67.42.020(2) is canceled; or when the amusement
apparatus for which the decal has been issued:
(a) Is materially rebuilt or materially modified so as to change
the original action of the amusement ((ride or structure, the amusement
ride or structure shall be subject to a new inspection under RCW
67.42.020 and the owner or operator shall apply for a new permit under
RCW 67.42.030.
(3) If an amusement ride or structure for which a permit has been
issued pursuant to RCW 67.42.030));
(b) Is a bungee jumping device or a permanently installed amusement
apparatus and the device or apparatus is moved and installed in another
((place but is not materially rebuilt or materially modified so as to
change the original action of the amusement ride or structure, no new
permit is required prior to the expiration of the permit.
(4))) location;
(c) Is a bungee jumping device ((or a)) and any part of ((a)) the
device, including, but not limited to, the crane, tower, platforms,
bungee cords, end attachments, carabiners or locking devices,
harnesses, person lift basket, mobile crane, balloon or balloon basket,
anchor or anchor attachment structure, or landing device, ((that is
replaced shall be reinspected by an insurer, a person with whom the
insurer has contracted, or by a person authorized by the department to
inspect bungee jumping devices, and the owner or operator of the device
shall apply for a new permit under RCW 67.42.030.
(5) A bungee jumping operator shall have any bungee jumping device
or structure that is moved and installed in another location
reinspected by an insurer, a person with whom the insurer has
contracted, or a person authorized by the department to inspect bungee
jumping devices before beginning operation.
(6) Any new operator who purchases an existing bungee jumping
device or structure must have the bungee jumping device inspected and
permitted as required under RCW 67.42.020 before beginning operation))
is repaired or replaced.
(d) Is a climbing wall and any personal restraining device or part
of a restraining device is repaired or replaced.
(e) Is sold, or ownership of the apparatus is otherwise transferred
to a new owner.

Sec. 7 RCW 67.42.050 and 1985 c 262 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to
administer this chapter, including provisions relating to (a) inspector
qualifications and safety standards; (b) issuance of orders and
rulings, including demand and findings; (c) citations and penalties,
not to exceed ten thousand dollars per violation; and (d) any other
actions as may be necessary for the implementation and enforcement of
this chapter. Such rules may exempt amusement ((rides or structures))
apparatus otherwise subject to this chapter if the amusement ((rides or
structures are)) apparatus is located on lands owned by (([the])) the
United States government or its agencies and are required to comply
with federal safety standards at least equal to those under this
chapter.
(2) The department may order in writing the cessation of the
operation of an amusement ((ride or structure)) apparatus:
(a) For which no valid permit is in effect ((or));
(b) For which the owner or operator does not have an insurance
policy as required by RCW 67.42.020;
(c) Is found by the department to be unsafe; or
(d) Incident reporting is required by rule.
(3) All proceedings relating to ((permits)) applications,
citations, or orders to cease operation under this chapter shall be
conducted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 67.42.060 and 1993 c 203 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may ((charge)) establish by rule a reasonable
fee ((not to exceed ten dollars for each permit issued)) to review each
application received under RCW 67.42.030.
(2) In establishing the fee for reviewing applications received
during the first fiscal year after the effective date of this act, the
department may (a) exceed the fiscal growth factor limit as provided
under RCW 43.135.055, but may not establish a fee exceeding (i) one
hundred fifty dollars for each application relating to a bungee jumping
device; or (ii) twenty dollars for each application relating to any
other amusement apparatus; and (b) provide for a reduced per apparatus
fee for reviewing applications submitted at the same time that relate
to more than five materially identical apparatus.
(3) Subsequent fee changes shall be subject to the fiscal growth
factor limit as provided under RCW 43.135.055.
(4) All fees, penalties, and other amounts collected by the
department under this chapter shall be deposited in the ((state
general)) electrical license fund. ((This subsection does not apply to
permits issued under RCW 67.42.030 to operate a bungee jumping device.
(2) The department may charge a reasonable fee not to exceed one
hundred dollars for each permit issued under RCW 67.42.030 to operate
a bungee jumping device. Fees collected under this subsection shall be
deposited in the state general fund for appropriation for the
permitting and inspection of bungee jumping devices under this
chapter.)) No amount deposited under the authority of this section may
be used for any purpose other than the regulation of amusement
apparatus under this chapter.

Sec. 9 RCW 67.42.070 and 1985 c 262 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is a gross misdemeanor for any person ((who operates)) to
operate: (1) An amusement ((ride or structure)) apparatus without
((complying with the requirements of this chapter is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor)) a valid amusement apparatus operating decal, and any
person is injured by the operation of the apparatus; or (2) a bungee
jumping device from or over any location where written permission of
the owner is required by RCW 67.42.090, and the operator has not
obtained the written permission of the owner.

Sec. 10 RCW 67.42.080 and 1985 c 262 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing contained in this chapter prevents a county or municipality
from adopting and enforcing ordinances which relate to the operation of
amusement ((rides or structures)) apparatus and supplement the
provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 11 RCW 67.42.090 and 1993 c 203 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Bungee jumping from a publicly owned bridge or publicly owned
land is ((allowed only if)) prohibited unless permission has been
granted, in writing, by a public officer designated by the chief
executive officer of the government body that has jurisdiction over the
bridge or land.
(2) Bungee jumping over or into publicly owned waters is ((allowed
only if)) prohibited unless permission has been granted, in writing, by
a public officer designated by the government body that has
jurisdiction over the body of water.
(3) Bungee jumping from a privately owned bridge is ((allowed only
if)) prohibited unless permission has been granted, in writing, by the
owner of the bridge.

Sec. 12 RCW 19.28.351 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 910 are each
amended to read as follows:
All sums received from licenses, permit fees, or other sources,
herein shall be paid to the state treasurer and placed in a special
fund designated as the "electrical license fund," and paid out upon
vouchers duly and regularly issued therefor and approved by the
director of labor and industries or the director's designee following
determination by the board that the sums are necessary to accomplish
the intent of chapters 19.28 and 67.42 RCW. The treasurer shall keep
an accurate record of payments into, or receipts of, the fund, and of
all disbursements therefrom, and shall distinguish deposits and
disbursement made pursuant to chapter 19.28 RCW from those made
pursuant to chapter 67.42 RCW.
During the 2003-2005 biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys
from the electrical license fund to the state general fund such amounts
as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

--- END ---