BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.010 and 2001 c 251 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Sexual intercourse" (a) has its ordinary meaning and occurs
upon any penetration, however slight, and
(b) Also means any penetration of the vagina or anus however
slight, by an object, when committed on one person by another, whether
such persons are of the same or opposite sex, except when such
penetration is accomplished for medically recognized treatment or
diagnostic purposes, and
(c) Also means any act of sexual contact between persons involving
the sex organs of one person and the mouth or anus of another whether
such persons are of the same or opposite sex.
(2) "Sexual contact" means any touching of the sexual or other
intimate parts of a person done for the purpose of gratifying sexual
desire of either party or a third party.
(3) "Married" means one who is legally married to another, but does
not include a person who is living separate and apart from his or her
spouse and who has filed in an appropriate court for legal separation
or for dissolution of his or her marriage.
(4) "Mental incapacity" is that condition existing at the time of
the offense which prevents a person from understanding the nature or
consequences of the act of sexual intercourse whether that condition is
produced by illness, defect, the influence of a substance or from some
other cause.
(5) "Physically helpless" means a person who is unconscious or for
any other reason is physically unable to communicate unwillingness to
an act.
(6) "Forcible compulsion" means physical force which overcomes
resistance, or a threat, express or implied, that places a person in
fear of death or physical injury to herself or himself or another
person, or in fear that she or he or another person will be kidnapped.
(7) "Consent" means that at the time of the act of sexual
intercourse or sexual contact there are actual words or conduct
indicating freely given agreement to have sexual intercourse or sexual
contact.
(8) "Significant relationship" means a situation in which the
perpetrator is:
(a) A person who undertakes the responsibility, professionally or
voluntarily, to provide education, health, welfare, or organized
recreational activities principally for minors;
(b) A person who in the course of his or her employment supervises
minors; or
(c) A person who provides welfare, health or residential
assistance, personal care, or organized recreational activities to
frail elders or vulnerable adults, including a provider, employee,
temporary employee, volunteer, or independent contractor who supplies
services to long-term care facilities licensed or required to be
licensed under chapter 18.20, 18.51, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW, and home
health, hospice, or home care agencies licensed or required to be
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, but not including a consensual
sexual partner.
(9) "Abuse of a supervisory position" means:
(a) To use a direct or indirect threat or promise to ((use))
exercise authority to the detriment or benefit of a minor; or
(b) To exploit a significant relationship in order to obtain the
consent of a minor.
(10) "Developmentally disabled," for purposes of RCW
9A.44.050(1)(c) and 9A.44.100(1)(c), means a person with a
developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.
(11) "Person with supervisory authority," for purposes of RCW
9A.44.050(1) (c) or (e) and 9A.44.100(1) (c) or (e), means any
proprietor or employee of any public or private care or treatment
facility who directly supervises developmentally disabled, mentally
disordered, or chemically dependent persons at the facility.
(12) "Mentally disordered person" for the purposes of RCW
9A.44.050(1)(e) and 9A.44.100(1)(e) means a person with a "mental
disorder" as defined in RCW 71.05.020.
(13) "Chemically dependent person" for purposes of RCW
9A.44.050(1)(e) and 9A.44.100(1)(e) means a person who is "chemically
dependent" as defined in RCW 70.96A.020(4).
(14) "Health care provider" for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050 and
9A.44.100 means a person who is, holds himself or herself out to be, or
provides services as if he or she were: (a) A member of a health care
profession under chapter 18.130 RCW; or (b) registered under chapter
18.19 RCW or licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, regardless of whether
the health care provider is licensed, certified, or registered by the
state.
(15) "Treatment" for purposes of RCW 9A.44.050 and 9A.44.100 means
the active delivery of professional services by a health care provider
which the health care provider holds himself or herself out to be
qualified to provide.
(16) "Frail elder or vulnerable adult" means a person sixty years
of age or older who has the functional, mental, or physical inability
to care for himself or herself. "Frail elder or vulnerable adult" also
includes a person found incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW, a person
over eighteen years of age who has a developmental disability under
chapter 71A.10 RCW, a person admitted to a long-term care facility that
is licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 18.20, 18.51,
72.36, or 70.128 RCW, and a person receiving services from a home
health, hospice, or home care agency licensed or required to be
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.44.093 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 357 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of sexual misconduct with a minor in the
first degree when: (a) The person has, or knowingly causes another
person under the age of eighteen to have, sexual intercourse with
another person who is at least sixteen years old but less than eighteen
years old and not married to the perpetrator, if the perpetrator is at
least sixty months older than the victim, is in a significant
relationship to the victim, and abuses a supervisory position within
that relationship in order to engage in or cause another person under
the age of eighteen to engage in sexual intercourse with the victim;
((or)) (b) the person is a school employee who has, or knowingly causes
another person under the age of eighteen to have, sexual intercourse
with a registered student of the school who is at least sixteen years
old and not married to the employee, if the employee is at least sixty
months older than the student; or (c) the person is a foster parent who
has, or knowingly causes another person under the age of eighteen to
have, sexual intercourse with his or her foster child who is at least
sixteen.
(2) Sexual misconduct with a minor in the first degree is a class
C felony.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "school employee" means an
employee of a common school defined in RCW 28A.150.020, or a grade
kindergarten through twelve employee of a private school under chapter
28A.195 RCW, who is not enrolled as a student of the common school or
private school.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.44.096 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 358 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of sexual misconduct with a minor in the
second degree when: (a) The person has, or knowingly causes another
person under the age of eighteen to have, sexual contact with another
person who is at least sixteen years old but less than eighteen years
old and not married to the perpetrator, if the perpetrator is at least
sixty months older than the victim, is in a significant relationship to
the victim, and abuses a supervisory position within that relationship
in order to engage in or cause another person under the age of eighteen
to engage in sexual contact with the victim; ((or)) (b) the person is
a school employee who has, or knowingly causes another person under the
age of eighteen to have, sexual contact with a registered student of
the school who is at least sixteen years old and not married to the
employee, if the employee is at least sixty months older than the
student; or (c) the person is a foster parent who has, or knowingly
causes another person under the age of eighteen to have, sexual contact
with his or her foster child who is at least sixteen.
(2) Sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree is a gross
misdemeanor.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "school employee" means an
employee of a common school defined in RCW 28A.150.020, or a grade
kindergarten through twelve employee of a private school under chapter
28A.195 RCW, who is not enrolled as a student of the common school or
private school.

--- END ---