BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.38.060 and 1993 c 62 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To implement this chapter, the department ((has authority to))
may:
(((1))) (a) Establish mechanisms to recover actual costs incurred
in producing and providing otherwise nonfunded labor market
information.
(((a))) (i) If the commissioner, in his or her discretion,
determines that providing labor market information is in the public
interest, the requested information may be provided at reduced costs.
(((b))) (ii) The department shall provide access to labor market
information products that constitute public records available for
public inspection and copying under chapter 42.17 RCW, at fees not
exceeding those allowed under RCW 42.17.300 and consistent with the
department's fee schedule;
(((2))) (b) Receive federal set aside funds from several federal
programs that are authorized to fund state and local labor market
information and are required to use such information in support of
their programs;
(((3))) (c) Enter into agreements with other public agencies for
statistical analysis, research, or evaluation studies of local, state,
and federally funded employment, training, education, and job creation
programs to increase the efficiency or quality of service provided to
the public consistent with chapter 50.13 RCW;
(((4))) (d) Coordinate with other state agencies to study ways to
standardize federal and state multi-agency administrative records, such
as unemployment insurance information and other information to produce
employment, training, education, and economic analysis needed to
improve labor market information products and services; and
(((5))) (e) Produce agricultural labor market information and
economic analysis needed to facilitate the efficient and effective
matching of the local supply and demand of agricultural labor critical
to an effective agricultural labor exchange in Washington state.
Information collected for an agricultural labor market information
effort will be coordinated with other federal, state, and local
statistical agencies to minimize reporting burden through cooperative
data collection efforts for statistical analysis, research, or studies.
(2) Whenever the department surveys either current or former
unemployment insurance benefit recipients, it shall note, in large
font, on both the survey instrument and on all accompanying
correspondence that participation in the survey is entirely voluntary.

--- END ---