BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Autism is a complex developmental disability that typically
appears during the first three years of life;
(2) As many as one million five hundred thousand Americans are
believed to have some form of autism;
(3) The number of children with autism is increasing;
(4) Autistic behaviors not only make life difficult for people with
autism but also make life hard for their families, health care
providers, and teachers;
(5) Families coping with this devastating illness are searching for
answers about its causes, diagnosis, prevention, and treatment;
(6) Presently, there is no effective means to prevent, fully treat,
or cure the disorder;
(7) Early intervention is critical for affected children to gain
maximum benefit from current therapies;
(8) Strategies about how to best prevent, identify, treat, and
accommodate the needs of children with autism and their families are
urgently needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The caring for Washington children with
autism task force is created to study and make recommendations to the
legislature regarding the growing incidence of autism and ways to
improve the delivery and coordination of autism services in the state.
(2) The committee shall consist of fourteen members: Four members
of the legislature, including two members of the senate appointed by
the president of the senate, one of the majority party and one of the
minority party, and two members of the house of representatives
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, including one
of the majority party and one of the minority party; and ten additional
members appointed by the governor, who shall include at least:
(a) Two parents of children with autism;
(b) A representative of the autism center at the University of
Washington;
(c) A representative of the department of health;
(d) A representative of the department of social and health
services;
(e) A representative of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction;
(f) A representative of a local school district; and
(g) A representative of an educational service district.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Review the available literature and consult with experts to
gain an understanding of the causes of the disorder and its incidence
in Washington;
(b) Assess the availability of services currently provided for
early screening, diagnosis, and treatment of the disorder;
(c) Assess the availability of services to assist families of
individuals with autism;
(d) Review the effectiveness of programs and services provided to
individuals with autism and their families;
(e) Review other issues and concerns that the task force believes
would be helpful in arriving at sound policy recommendations; and
(f) Complete its review and submit its recommendations to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature and the
governor by December 1, 2006.
(4) The department of health shall be the lead agency in providing
staff needed for the performance of the work of the task force. The
department may seek additional staff assistance from the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the committee staff of the
legislature.

--- END ---