BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.08.625 and 2003 c 111 s 240 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A voter whose registration has been made inactive under this
chapter and who offers to vote at an ensuing election before two
federal elections have been held must be allowed to vote a regular
ballot and the voter's registration restored to active status.
(2) A voter whose registration has been properly canceled under
this chapter shall vote a provisional ballot. The voter shall mark the
provisional ballot in secrecy, the ballot placed in a security
envelope, the security envelope placed in a provisional ballot
envelope, and the reasons for the use of the provisional ballot noted.
(3) Upon receipt of such a voted provisional ballot the auditor
shall investigate the circumstances surrounding the original
cancellation. If he or she determines that the cancellation was in
error, the voter's registration must be immediately reinstated, and the
voter's provisional ballot must be counted. If the original
cancellation was not in error, the voter must be afforded the
opportunity to reregister at his or her correct address, and the
voter's provisional ballot must not be counted.
(4) The names and addresses of provisional voters is not a matter
of public record, and no one other than an election officer may contact
an individual provisional voter.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.24.050 and 2003 c 111 s 605 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except where otherwise provided by this title, declarations of
candidacy for the following offices shall be filed during regular
business hours with the filing officer no earlier than the fourth
Monday in ((July)) June and no later than the following Friday in the
year in which the office is scheduled to be voted upon:
(1) Offices that are scheduled to be voted upon for full terms or
both full terms and short terms at, or in conjunction with, a state
general election; and
(2) Offices where a vacancy, other than a short term, exists that
has not been filled by election and for which an election to fill the
vacancy is required in conjunction with the next state general
election.
This section supersedes all other statutes that provide for a
different filing period for these offices.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.40.070 and 2004 c 266 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except where a recount or litigation under RCW ((29A.68.010))
29A.68.011 is pending, the county auditor shall have sufficient
absentee ballots available for absentee voters of that county at least
((twenty)) thirty-four days before any primary, general election, or
special election. The county auditor must mail absentee ballots to
each voter for whom the county auditor has received a request
((nineteen)) thirty-three days before the primary or election at least
((eighteen)) thirty-two days before the primary or election. For a
request for an absentee ballot received after the ((nineteenth))
thirty-third day before the primary or election, the county auditor
shall make every effort to mail ballots within one business day, and
shall mail the ballots within two business days.
(2) The county auditor shall make every effort to mail ballots to
overseas and service voters earlier than ((eighteen)) thirty-two days
before a primary or election.
(3) Each county auditor shall certify to the office of the
secretary of state the dates the ballots prescribed in subsection (1)
of this section were available and mailed.
(4) If absentee ballots will not be available or mailed as
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, the county auditor shall
immediately certify to the office of the secretary of state when
absentee ballots will be available and mailed. Copies of this
certification must be provided to the county canvassing board, the
press, jurisdictions with issues on the ballot in the election, and any
candidates.
(5) If absentee ballots were not available or mailed as prescribed
in subsection (1) of this section, for a reason other than a recount or
litigation, the county auditor, in consultation with the certification
and training program of the office of the secretary of state, shall
submit a report to the office of the secretary of state outlining why
the deadline was missed and what corrective actions will be taken in
future elections to ensure that absentee ballots are available and
mailed as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(6) Failure to have absentee ballots available and mailed as
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section does not by itself provide
a basis for an election contest or other legal challenge to the results
of a primary, general election, or special election.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.40.091 and 2004 c 271 s 135 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot, a
security envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger
envelope in which to return the security envelope, and instructions on
how to mark the ballot and how to return it to the county auditor. The
instructions that accompany an absentee ballot for a partisan primary
must include instructions for voting the applicable ballot style, as
provided in chapter 29A.36 RCW. The larger return envelope must
contain a declaration by the absentee voter reciting his or her
qualifications and stating that he or she has not voted in any other
jurisdiction at this election, together with a summary of the penalties
for any violation of any of the provisions of this chapter. The return
envelope must provide space for the voter to indicate the date on which
the ballot was voted and for the voter to sign the oath. A summary of
the applicable penalty provisions of this chapter must be printed on
the return envelope immediately adjacent to the space for the voter's
signature. The signature of the voter on the return envelope must
affirm and attest to the statements regarding the qualifications of
that voter and to the validity of the ballot. For out-of-state voters,
overseas voters, and service voters, the signed declaration on the
return envelope constitutes the equivalent of a voter registration for
the election or primary for which the ballot has been issued. The
voter must be instructed to either return the ballot to the county
auditor by whom it was issued or attach sufficient first class postage,
if applicable, and mail the ballot to the appropriate county auditor
((no later than the day of the election or primary for which the ballot
was issued)) in accordance with the time requirements of RCW
29A.40.110.
If the county auditor chooses to forward absentee ballots, he or
she must include with the ballot a clear explanation of the
qualifications necessary to vote in that election and must also advise
a voter with questions about his or her eligibility to contact the
county auditor. This explanation may be provided on the ballot
envelope, on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on the ballot
itself. If the information is not included, the envelope must clearly
indicate that the ballot is not to be forwarded and that return postage
is guaranteed.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.40.110 and 2003 c 111 s 1011 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The opening and subsequent processing of return identification
envelopes for any primary or election may begin on or after the tenth
day before the primary or election. The tabulation of absentee ballots
must not commence until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or
election.
(2) After opening the return identification envelopes, the county
canvassing board or its representative shall place all of the ballots
in secure storage until after 8:00 p.m. of the day of the primary or
election. Absentee ballots that are to be tabulated on an electronic
vote tallying system may be taken from the inner security envelopes and
all the normal procedural steps may be performed to prepare these
ballots for tabulation.
(3) Before opening a returned absentee ballot, the canvassing
board, or its designated representatives, shall examine the postmark,
statement, and signature on the return identification envelope that
contains the security envelope and absentee ballot. ((They)) An
absentee ballot may be counted only if the return identification
envelope was signed by the date of the primary or election for which it
was issued and is in the office of the county auditor before the close
of the polls on the day of the primary or election for which it was
issued. However, an absentee ballot from an out-of-state, overseas, or
service voter may be counted if it was mailed no later than the day of
the primary or election for which it was issued. The canvassing board
or its representative shall verify that the voter's signature on the
return envelope is the same as the signature of that voter in the
registration files of the county. For registered voters casting
absentee ballots, the date on the return identification envelope to
which the voter has attested determines the validity, as to the ((time
of voting)) date of mailing for that absentee ballot if the postmark is
missing or is illegible. For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and
service voters, the date on the return identification envelope to which
the voter has attested determines the validity as to the ((time of
voting)) date of mailing for that absentee ballot. For any absentee
ballot, a variation between the signature of the voter on the return
envelope and the signature of that voter in the registration files due
to the substitution of initials or the use of common nicknames is
permitted so long as the surname and handwriting are clearly the same.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.40.130 and 2003 c 111 s 1013 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each county auditor shall maintain in his or her office, open for
public inspection, a record of the requests he or she has received for
absentee ballots under this chapter.
The information from the requests shall be recorded and lists of
this information shall be available no later than twenty-four hours
after their receipt.
This information about absentee voters shall be available according
to the date of the requests and by legislative district. It shall
include the name of each applicant, the address and precinct in which
the voter maintains a voting residence, the date on which an absentee
ballot was issued to this voter, if applicable, the type of absentee
ballot, and the address to which the ballot was or is to be mailed, if
applicable.
The auditor shall make copies of these records available to the
public for the actual cost of production or copying. However, these
records may not be used by anyone other than an election officer to
contact an individual absentee voter.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.48.010 and 2004 c 266 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor may designate any precinct having fewer than two
hundred active registered voters at the time of closing of voter
registration as provided in RCW 29A.08.140 as a mail ballot precinct.
The county auditor shall notify each registered voter by mail that for
all future primaries and elections the voting in his or her precinct
will be by mail ballot only. In determining the number of registered
voters in a precinct for the purposes of this section, persons who are
ongoing absentee voters under RCW 29A.40.040 shall not be counted.
Nothing in this section may be construed as altering the vote tallying
requirements of RCW 29A.60.230.
The auditor shall mail each active voter a ballot at least
((eighteen)) thirty-two days before a primary, general election, or
special election. The auditor shall send each inactive voter either a
ballot or an application to receive a ballot at least ((eighteen))
thirty-two days before a primary, general election, or special
election. The auditor shall determine which of the two is to be sent.
If the inactive voter returns a voted ballot, the ballot shall be
counted and the voter's status restored to active. If the inactive
voter completes and returns an application, a ballot shall be sent and
the voter's status restored to active. The requirements regarding
certification, reporting, and the mailing of overseas and military
ballots in RCW ((29.36.270)) 29A.40.070 apply to mail ballot precincts.
If the precinct exceeds two hundred registered voters, or the
auditor determines to return to a polling place election environment,
the auditor shall notify each registered voter, by mail, of this and
shall provide the address of the polling place to be used.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.48.050 and 2003 c 111 s 1205 are each amended to
read as follows:
The voter shall return the ballot to the county auditor in the
return identification envelope. ((If)) Whether mailed or returned
otherwise, a ballot must be ((postmarked not later than the date of the
primary or election. Otherwise, the ballot must be deposited at the
office of the county auditor or the designated place of deposit not
later than 8:00 p.m. on the date of the primary or election)) returned
in accordance with the time requirements as provided for an absentee
ballot under RCW 29A.40.110.

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.60.160 and 2003 c 111 s 1516 are each amended to
read as follows:
At least every third day after a primary or election and before
certification of the election results, except Sundays and legal
holidays, the county auditor, as delegated by the county canvassing
board, shall process absentee ballots and canvass the votes cast at
that primary or election, if the county auditor is in possession of
more than twenty-five ballots that have yet to be canvassed. The
county auditor, as delegated by the county canvassing board, may use
his or her discretion in determining when to process the remaining
absentee ballots and canvass the votes during the final four days
before the certification of election results in order to protect the
secrecy of any ballot. In counties where this process has not been
delegated to the county auditor, the county auditor shall convene the
county canvassing board to process absentee ballots and canvass the
votes cast at the primary or election as set forth in this section.
Each absentee ballot previously not canvassed that was received by
the county auditor two days or more before processing absentee ballots
and canvassing the votes as delegated by or processed by the county
canvassing board, that ((either was received by the county auditor
before the closing of the polls on the day of the primary or election
for which it was issued, or that bears a postmark on or before the
primary or election for which it was issued)) was returned in
accordance with the time requirements as provided for an absentee
ballot under RCW 29A.40.110, must be processed at that time. The
tabulation of votes that results from that day's canvass must be made
available to the general public immediately upon completion of the
canvass.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 29A.60
RCW to read as follows:
If the county auditor receives an absentee or mail ballot in a
return identification envelope on which the voter's signature is
missing, illegible, or does not match the registration file, only the
county auditor or other election officer may contact the voter
regarding the signature. The names of voters in these cases is not a
matter of public record.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.24.210 (Vacancy in partisan elective office -- Special
filing period) and 2005 c 2 s 10 (Initiative Measure No. 872) & 2003 c
111 s 621;
(2) RCW 29A.24.211 (Vacancy in partisan elective office--Special
filing period) and 2004 c 271 s 116; and
(3) RCW 29A.28.011 (Major party ticket) and 2004 c 271 s 191.

--- END ---