BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.101.085 and 2001 c 167 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to its other powers granted under this chapter, the
commission has authority and power to:
(1) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules as necessary to carry out this
chapter;
(2) Issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with
investigations, hearings, or other proceedings held under this chapter;
(3) Take or cause to be taken depositions and other discovery
procedures as needed in investigations, hearings, and other proceedings
held under this chapter;
(4) Appoint members of a hearings board as provided under RCW
43.101.380;
(5) Enter into contracts for professional services determined by
the commission to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this
chapter;
(6) Grant, deny, or revoke certification of peace officers and
corrections officers under the provisions of this chapter;
(7) Designate individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and
statements of charges under the provisions of this chapter; and
(8) Employ such investigative, administrative, and clerical staff
as necessary for the enforcement of this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.101.010 and 2003 c 39 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
When used in this chapter:
(1) The term "commission" means the Washington state criminal
justice training commission.
(2) The term "boards" means the education and training standards
boards, the establishment of which are authorized by this chapter.
(3) The term "criminal justice personnel" means any person who
serves in a county, city, state, or port commission agency engaged in
crime prevention, crime reduction, or enforcement of the criminal law.
(4) The term "law enforcement personnel" means any public employee
or volunteer having as a primary function the enforcement of criminal
laws in general or any employee or volunteer of, or any individual
commissioned by, any municipal, county, state, or combination thereof,
agency having as its primary function the enforcement of criminal laws
in general as distinguished from an agency possessing peace officer
powers, the primary function of which is the implementation of
specialized subject matter areas. For the purposes of this subsection
"primary function" means that function to which the greater allocation
of resources is made.
(5) The term "correctional personnel" means any employee or
volunteer who by state, county, municipal, or combination thereof,
statute has the responsibility for the confinement, care, management,
training, treatment, education, supervision, or counseling of those
individuals whose civil rights have been limited in some way by legal
sanction.
(6) The term "state juvenile services personnel" means any employee
or volunteer who by state statute has the responsibility for the
confinement, care, management, training, treatment, education,
supervision, or counseling of those juveniles remanded to state custody
whose civil rights have been limited in some way by legal sanction.
(7) A peace officer or corrections officer is "convicted" at the
time a plea of guilty has been accepted, or a verdict of guilty or
finding of guilt has been filed, notwithstanding the pendency of any
future proceedings, including but not limited to sentencing, posttrial
or postfact-finding motions and appeals. "Conviction" includes a
deferral of sentence and also includes the equivalent disposition by a
court in a jurisdiction other than the state of Washington.
(((7))) (8) "Discharged for disqualifying misconduct" means:
(a) A peace officer is terminated from employment for: (((a))) (i)
Conviction of (((i))) (A) any crime committed under color of authority
as a peace officer, (((ii))) (B) any crime involving dishonesty or
false statement within the meaning of Evidence Rule 609(a), (((iii)))
(C) the unlawful use or possession of a controlled substance, or
(((iv))) (D) any other crime the conviction of which disqualifies a
Washington citizen from the legal right to possess a firearm under
state or federal law; (((b))) (ii) conduct that would constitute any of
the crimes addressed in (a)(i) of this subsection; or (((c))) (iii)
knowingly making materially false statements during disciplinary
investigations, where the false statements are the sole basis for the
termination.
(((8))) (b) A corrections officer is terminated from employment
for: (i) Conviction of (A) any crime committed under color of
authority as a corrections officer, (B) any crime involving dishonesty
or false statement within the meaning of Evidence Rule 609(a), or (C)
the unlawful use or possession of a controlled substance; (ii) conduct
that would constitute any of the crimes addressed in (b)(i) of this
subsection; or (iii) knowingly making materially false statements
during disciplinary investigations, where the false statements are the
sole basis for the termination.
(9) A peace officer or corrections officer is "discharged for
disqualifying misconduct" within the meaning of subsection (((7))) (8)
of this section under the ordinary meaning of the term and when the
totality of the circumstances support a finding that the officer
resigned in anticipation of discipline, whether or not the misconduct
was discovered at the time of resignation, and when such discipline, if
carried forward, would more likely than not have led to discharge for
disqualifying misconduct within the meaning of subsection (((7))) (8)
of this section.
(((9))) (10) When used in context of proceedings referred to in
this chapter, "final" means that the peace officer or corrections
officer has exhausted all available civil service appeals, collective
bargaining remedies, and all other such direct administrative appeals,
and the officer has not been reinstated as the result of the action.
Finality is not affected by the pendency or availability of state or
federal administrative or court actions for discrimination, or by the
pendency or availability of any remedies other than direct civil
service and collective bargaining remedies.
(((10))) (11) "Peace officer" means any law enforcement personnel
subject to the basic law enforcement training requirement of RCW
43.101.200 and any other requirements of that section, notwithstanding
any waiver or exemption granted by the commission, and notwithstanding
the statutory exemption based on date of initial hire under RCW
43.101.200. Commissioned officers of the Washington state patrol,
whether they have been or may be exempted by rule of the commission
from the basic training requirement of RCW 43.101.200, are included as
peace officers for purposes of this chapter. Fish and wildlife
officers with enforcement powers for all criminal laws under RCW
77.15.075 are peace officers for purposes of this chapter.
(12) "Corrections officer" means any corrections personnel or state
juvenile services personnel subject to the basic corrections training
requirement of RCW 43.101.220 and any other requirements of that
section, notwithstanding any waiver or exemption granted by the
commission, and notwithstanding the statutory exemption based on date
of initial hire under RCW 43.101.220. State juvenile services
personnel who are required by agency policy and procedure to adhere to
an evidence-based model for service delivery shall be exempted from the
certification requirements of this chapter upon request of the
employing agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) As a condition of continuing employment
as corrections officers, all Washington state corrections officers
shall: (a) Timely obtain certification as corrections officers, or
timely obtain exemption therefrom, by meeting all requirements of RCW
43.101.220, as that section is administered under the rules of the
commission, as well as by meeting any additional requirements under
this chapter; and (b) maintain the basic certification as corrections
officers under this chapter. The commission shall certify corrections
officers who have satisfied, or have been exempted by statute or by
rule from, the basic training requirements of RCW 43.101.220 on or
before January 1, 2006. Thereafter, the commission may revoke
certification pursuant to this chapter.
(2) The commission shall allow a corrections officer to retain
status as a certified corrections officer as long as the officer: (a)
Timely meets the basic corrections officer training requirements, or is
exempted therefrom, in whole or in part, under RCW 43.101.220 or under
rule of the commission; (b) meets or is exempted from any other
requirements under this chapter as administered under the rules adopted
by the commission; (c) is not denied certification by the commission
under this chapter; and (d) has not had certification revoked by the
commission.
(3) As a prerequisite to certification, as well as a prerequisite
to pursuit of a hearing under section 9 of this act, a corrections
officer must, on a form devised or adopted by the commission, authorize
the release to the commission of his or her personnel files,
termination papers, criminal investigation files, or other files,
papers, or information that are directly related to a certification
matter or decertification matter before the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Upon request by a corrections officer's
employer or on its own initiative, the commission may deny or revoke
certification of any corrections officer after written notice and
hearing, if a hearing is timely requested by the corrections officer
under section 9 of this act, based upon a finding of one or more of the
following conditions:
(1) The corrections officer has failed to timely meet all
requirements for obtaining a certificate of basic corrections training,
or a certificate of exemption from the training;
(2) The corrections officer has knowingly falsified or omitted
material information on an application for training or certification to
the commission;
(3) The corrections officer has been convicted at any time of a
felony offense under the laws of this state or has been convicted of a
federal or out-of-state offense comparable to a felony under the laws
of this state; except that if a certified corrections officer was
convicted of a felony before being employed as a corrections officer,
and the circumstances of the prior felony conviction were fully
disclosed to his or her employer before being hired, the commission may
revoke certification only with the agreement of the employing
corrections agency;
(4) The corrections officer has been discharged for disqualifying
misconduct, the discharge is final, and some or all of the acts or
omissions forming the basis for the discharge proceedings occurred on
or after January 1, 2006;
(5) The corrections officer's certificate was previously issued by
administrative error on the part of the commission; or
(6) The corrections officer has interfered with an investigation or
action for denial or revocation of certificate by: (a) Knowingly
making a materially false statement to the commission; or (b) in any
matter under investigation by or otherwise before the commission,
tampering with evidence or tampering with or intimidating any witness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A person denied a certification based
upon dismissal or withdrawal from a basic corrections academy for any
reason not also involving discharge for disqualifying misconduct is
eligible for readmission and certification upon meeting standards
established in rules of the commission, which rules may provide for
probationary terms on readmission.
(2) A person whose certification is denied or revoked based upon
prior administrative error of issuance, failure to cooperate, or
interference with an investigation is eligible for certification upon
meeting standards established in rules of the commission, rules which
may provide for a probationary period of certification in the event of
reinstatement of eligibility.
(3) A person whose certification is denied or revoked based upon a
felony criminal conviction is not eligible for certification at any
time.
(4) A corrections officer whose certification is denied or revoked
based upon discharge for disqualifying misconduct, but not also based
upon a felony criminal conviction, may, five years after the revocation
or denial, petition the commission for reinstatement of the certificate
or for eligibility for reinstatement. The commission shall hold a
hearing on the petition to consider reinstatement, and the commission
may allow reinstatement based upon standards established in rules of
the commission. If the certificate is reinstated or eligibility for
certification is determined, the commission may establish a
probationary period of certification.
(5) A corrections officer whose certification is revoked based
solely upon a criminal conviction may petition the commission for
reinstatement immediately upon a final judicial reversal of the
conviction. The commission shall hold a hearing on request to consider
reinstatement, and the commission may allow reinstatement based on
standards established in rules of the commission. If the certificate
is reinstated or if eligibility for certification is determined, the
commission may establish a probationary period of certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A corrections officer's certification lapses
automatically when there is a break of more than twenty-four
consecutive months in the officer's service as a full-time corrections
officer. A break in full-time corrections service which is due solely
to the pendency of direct review or appeal from a disciplinary
discharge, or to the pendency of a work-related injury, does not cause
a lapse in certification. The officer may petition the commission for
reinstatement of certification. Upon receipt of a petition for
reinstatement of a lapsed certificate, the commission shall determine
under this chapter and any applicable rules of the commission if the
corrections officer's certification status is to be reinstated, and the
commission shall also determine any requirements which the officer must
meet for reinstatement. The commission may adopt rules establishing
requirements for reinstatement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Upon termination of a corrections officer
for any reason, including resignation, the agency of termination shall,
within fifteen days of the termination, notify the commission on a
personnel action report form provided by the commission. The agency of
termination shall, upon request of the commission, provide such
additional documentation or information as the commission deems
necessary to determine whether the termination provides grounds for
revocation under section 4 of this act. The commission shall maintain
these notices in a permanent file, subject to RCW 43.101.400.
Agencies employing state juvenile services personnel who are exempt
from the certification requirements of this chapter shall provide the
same termination information to assist the commission in oversight of
certified corrections officers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A corrections officer or duly authorized
representative of a corrections agency may submit a written complaint
to the commission charging that a corrections officer's certificate
should be denied or revoked, and specifying the grounds for the charge.
Filing a complaint does not make a complainant a party to the
commission's action. The commission has sole discretion whether to
investigate a complaint, and the commission has sole discretion whether
to investigate matters relating to certification, denial of
certification, or revocation of certification on any other basis,
without restriction as to the source or the existence of a complaint.
A person who files a complaint in good faith under this section is
immune from suit or any civil action related to the filing or the
contents of the complaint.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) If the commission determines, upon
investigation, that there is probable cause to believe that a
corrections officer's certification should be denied or revoked under
section 4 of this act, the commission must prepare and serve upon the
officer a statement of charges. Service on the officer must be by mail
or by personal service on the officer. Notice of the charges must also
be mailed to or otherwise served upon the officer's agency of
termination and any current corrections employer. The statement of
charges must be accompanied by a notice that to receive a hearing on
the denial or revocation, the officer must, within sixty days of
communication of the statement of charges, request a hearing before the
hearings board appointed under RCW 43.101.380. Failure of the officer
to request a hearing within the sixty-day period constitutes a default,
whereupon the commission may enter an order under RCW 34.05.440.
(2) If a hearing is requested, the date of the hearing must be
scheduled not earlier than ninety days nor later than one hundred
eighty days after communication of the statement of charges to the
officer; the one hundred eighty-day period may be extended on mutual
agreement of the parties or for good cause. The commission shall give
written notice of hearing at least twenty days prior to the hearing,
specifying the time, date, and place of hearing.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.101.380 and 2001 c 167 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The procedures governing adjudicative proceedings before
agencies under chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act,
govern hearings before the commission and govern all other actions
before the commission unless otherwise provided in this chapter. The
standard of proof in actions before the commission is clear, cogent,
and convincing evidence.
(2) ((On all appeals brought)) In all hearings requested under RCW
43.101.155 or section 9 of this act, a five-member hearings panel shall
both hear the case and make the commission's final administrative
decision. Members of the commission ((or)), the board on law
enforcement training standards and education, or the board on
corrections training standards and education, may but need not be
appointed to the hearings panels. The commission shall appoint as
follows two or more panels to hear ((appeals from)) decertification
actions:
(a) When ((an appeal)) a hearing is ((filed)) requested in relation
to decertification of a Washington peace officer who is not a peace
officer of the Washington state patrol, the commission shall appoint to
the panel: (i) One police chief; (ii) one sheriff; (iii) two peace
officers who are at or below the level of first line supervisor, who
are from city or county law enforcement agencies, and who have at least
ten years' experience as peace officers; and (iv) one person who is not
currently a peace officer and who represents a community college or
four-year college or university.
(b) When ((an appeal)) a hearing is ((filed)) requested in relation
to decertification of a peace officer of the Washington state patrol,
the commission shall appoint to the panel: (i) Either one police chief
or one sheriff; (ii) one administrator of the state patrol; (iii) one
peace officer who is at or below the level of first line supervisor,
who is from a city or county law enforcement agency, and who has at
least ten years' experience as a peace officer; (iv) one state patrol
officer who is at or below the level of first line supervisor, and who
has at least ten years' experience as a peace officer; and (v) one
person who is not currently a peace officer and who represents a
community college or four-year college or university.
(c) When a hearing is requested in relation to decertification of
a Washington corrections officer, the commission shall appoint to the
panel: (i) Two heads of either a city or county corrections agency or
facility or of a Washington state department of corrections facility;
(ii) two corrections officers who are at or below the level of first
line supervisor, who are from city, county, or state corrections
agencies, and who have at least ten years' experience as corrections
officers; and (iii) one person who is not currently a corrections
officer and who represents a community college or four-year college or
university.
(d) Persons appointed to hearings panels by the commission shall,
in relation to any decertification matter on which they sit, have the
powers, duties, and immunities, and are entitled to the emoluments,
including travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060, of regular commission members.
(3) Where the charge upon which revocation or denial is based is
that a peace officer or corrections officer was "discharged for
disqualifying misconduct," and the discharge is "final," within the
meaning of RCW 43.101.105(4) or section 4(4) of this act, and the
officer received a civil service hearing or arbitration hearing
culminating in an affirming decision following separation from service
by the employer, the hearings panel may revoke or deny certification if
the hearings panel determines that the discharge occurred and was based
on disqualifying misconduct; the hearings panel need not redetermine
the underlying facts but may make this determination based solely on
review of the records and decision relating to the employment
separation proceeding. However, the hearings panel may, in its
discretion, consider additional evidence to determine whether such a
discharge occurred and was based on such disqualifying misconduct. The
hearings panel shall, upon written request by the subject peace officer
or corrections officer, allow the peace officer or corrections officer
to present additional evidence of extenuating circumstances.
Where the charge upon which revocation or denial of certification
is based is that a peace officer or corrections officer "has been
convicted at any time of a felony offense" within the meaning of RCW
43.101.105(3) or section 4(3) of this act, the hearings panel shall
revoke or deny certification if it determines that the peace officer or
corrections officer was convicted of a felony. The hearings panel need
not redetermine the underlying facts but may make this determination
based solely on review of the records and decision relating to the
criminal proceeding. However, the hearings panel shall, upon the
panel's determination of relevancy, consider additional evidence to
determine whether the peace officer or corrections officer was
convicted of a felony.
Where the charge upon which revocation or denial is based is under
RCW 43.101.105 (1), (2), (5), or (6) or section 4(1), (2), (5), or (6)
of this act, the hearings panel shall determine the underlying facts
relating to the charge upon which revocation or denial of certification
is based.
(4) The commission's final administrative decision is subject to
judicial review under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 An individual whose peace officer
certification is denied or revoked pursuant to this chapter may not
thereafter be certified as a corrections officer without first
satisfying the requirements of eligibility for certification or
reinstatement of certification. A corrections officer whose
corrections officer certification is denied or revoked pursuant to this
chapter may not thereafter be certified as a peace officer without
first satisfying the requirements of eligibility for certification or
reinstatement of certification.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.101.400 and 2001 c 167 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, the
following records of the commission are confidential and exempt from
public disclosure: (a) The contents of personnel action reports filed
under RCW 43.101.135 or section 7 of this act; (b) all files, papers,
and other information obtained by the commission pursuant to RCW
43.101.095(3) or section 3 of this act; and (c) all investigative files
of the commission compiled in carrying out the responsibilities of the
commission under this chapter. Such records are not subject to public
disclosure, subpoena, or discovery proceedings in any civil action,
except as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(2) Records which are otherwise confidential and exempt under
subsection (1) of this section may be reviewed and copied: (a) By the
officer involved or the officer's counsel or authorized representative,
who may review the officer's file and may submit any additional
exculpatory or explanatory evidence, statements, or other information,
any of which must be included in the file; (b) by a duly authorized
representative of (i) the agency of termination, or (ii) a current
employing law enforcement or corrections agency, which may review and
copy its employee-officer's file; or (c) by a representative of or
investigator for the commission.
(3) Records which are otherwise confidential and exempt under
subsection (1) of this section may also be inspected at the offices of
the commission by a duly authorized representative of a law enforcement
or corrections agency considering an application for employment by a
person who is the subject of a record. A copy of records which are
otherwise confidential and exempt under subsection (1) of this section
may later be obtained by an agency after it hires the applicant. In
all other cases under this subsection, the agency may not obtain a copy
of the record.
(4) Upon a determination that a complaint is without merit, that a
personnel action report filed under RCW 43.101.135 does not merit
action by the commission, or that a matter otherwise investigated by
the commission does not merit action, the commission shall purge
records addressed in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) The hearings, but not the deliberations, of the hearings board
are open to the public. The transcripts, admitted evidence, and
written decisions of the hearings board on behalf of the commission are
not confidential or exempt from public disclosure, and are subject to
subpoena and discovery proceedings in civil actions.
(6) Every individual, legal entity, and agency of federal, state,
or local government is immune from civil liability, whether direct or
derivative, for providing information to the commission in good faith.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.101.030 and 1999 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall consist of ((fourteen)) fifteen members, who
shall be selected as follows:
(1) The governor shall appoint two incumbent sheriffs and two
incumbent chiefs of police.
(2) The governor shall appoint one officer at or below the level of
first line supervisor from a county law enforcement agency ((and)), one
officer at or below the level of first line supervisor from a municipal
law enforcement agency, and one corrections officer at or below the
level of first line supervisor. Each appointee under this subsection
(2) shall have at least ten years experience as a law enforcement
officer.
(3) The governor shall appoint one person employed in a county
correctional system and one person employed in the state correctional
system.
(4) The governor shall appoint one incumbent county prosecuting
attorney or municipal attorney.
(5) The governor shall appoint one elected official of a local
government.
(6) The governor shall appoint one private citizen.
(7) The three remaining members shall be:
(a) The attorney general;
(b) The special agent in charge of the Seattle office of the
federal bureau of investigation; and
(c) The chief of the state patrol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 3 through 9 and 11 of this act are
each added to chapter 43.101 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act takes effect January 1, 2006.

--- END ---