BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.12.370 and 2004 c 230 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other authority which it may have, the
department of licensing may furnish lists of registered and legal
owners of motor vehicles only for the purposes specified in this
section to:
(1) The manufacturers of motor vehicles, or their authorized
agents, to be used to enable those manufacturers to carry out the
provisions of the National Traffic and Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1966
(15 U.S.C. sec. 1382-1418), including amendments or additions thereto,
respecting safety-related defects in motor vehicles;
(2) Any governmental agency of the United States or Canada, or
political subdivisions thereof, to be used by it or by its authorized
commercial agents or contractors only in connection with the
enforcement of motor vehicle or traffic laws by, or programs related to
traffic safety of, that government agency. Only such parts of the list
as are required for completion of the work required of the agent or
contractor shall be provided to such agent or contractor;
(3) A commercial parking company requiring the names and addresses
of registered owners to notify them of outstanding parking violations.
Subject to the disclosure agreement provisions of RCW 46.12.380 and the
requirements of Executive Order 97-01, the department may provide only
the parts of the list that are required for completion of the work
required of the company;
(4) An authorized agent or contractor of the department, to be used
only in connection with providing motor vehicle excise tax, licensing,
title, and registration information to motor vehicle dealers;
(5) Any business regularly making loans to other persons to finance
the purchase of motor vehicles, to be used to assist the person
requesting the list to determine ownership of specific vehicles for the
purpose of determining whether or not to provide such financing; or
(6) A company or its agents operating a toll facility under chapter
47.46 RCW or other applicable authority requiring the names, addresses,
and vehicle information of motor vehicle registered owners to identify
toll violators.
Where both a mailing address and residence address are recorded on
the vehicle record and are different, only the mailing address will be
disclosed. Both addresses will be disclosed in response to requests
for disclosure from law enforcement agencies or government entities
with enforcement, investigative, or taxing authority and only for use
in the normal course of conducting their business. The residence
address may also be disclosed for use in court proceedings or
preparation for court proceedings.
If a list of registered and legal owners of motor vehicles is used
for any purpose other than that authorized in this section, the
manufacturer, governmental agency, commercial parking company,
authorized agent, contractor, financial institution, toll facility
operator, or their authorized agents or contractors responsible for the
unauthorized disclosure or use will be denied further access to such
information by the department of licensing.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.12.380 and 1995 c 254 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 42.17 RCW, the name
or address of an individual vehicle owner shall not be released by the
department, county auditor, or agency or firm authorized by the
department except under the following circumstances:
(a) The requesting party is a business entity that requests the
information for use in the course of business;
(b) The request is a written request that is signed by the person
requesting disclosure that contains the full legal name and address of
the requesting party, that specifies the purpose for which the
information will be used; and
(c) The requesting party enters into a disclosure agreement with
the department in which the party promises that the party will use the
information only for the purpose stated in the request for the
information; and that the party does not intend to use, or facilitate
the use of, the information for the purpose of making any unsolicited
business contact with a person named in the disclosed information. The
term "unsolicited business contact" means a contact that is intended to
result in, or promote, the sale of any goods or services to a person
named in the disclosed information. The term does not apply to
situations where the requesting party and such person have been
involved in a business transaction prior to the date of the disclosure
request and where the request is made in connection with the
transaction.
(2) Where both a mailing address and residence address are recorded
on the vehicle record and are different, only the mailing address will
be disclosed. Both addresses will be disclosed in response to requests
for disclosure from law enforcement agencies or government entities
with enforcement, investigative, or taxing authority and only for use
in the normal course of conducting their business. The residence
address may also be disclosed for use in court proceedings or
preparation for court proceedings.
(3) The disclosing entity shall retain the request for disclosure
for three years.
(((3))) (4) Whenever the disclosing entity grants a request for
information under this section by an attorney or private investigator,
the disclosing entity shall provide notice to the vehicle owner, to
whom the information applies, that the request has been granted. The
notice also shall contain the name and address of the requesting party.
(((4))) (5) Any person who is furnished vehicle owner information
under this section shall be responsible for assuring that the
information furnished is not used for a purpose contrary to the
agreement between the person and the department.
(((5))) (6) This section shall not apply to requests for
information by governmental entities or requests that may be granted
under any other provision of this title expressly authorizing the
disclosure of the names or addresses of vehicle owners.
(((6))) (7) This section shall not apply to title history
information under RCW 19.118.170.

--- END ---