BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.66.020 and 2003 c 27 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
If the value of the claim or the amount at issue does not exceed
((fifty)) seventy-five thousand dollars, exclusive of interest, costs,
and attorneys' fees, the district court shall have jurisdiction and
cognizance of the following civil actions and proceedings:
(1) Actions arising on contract for the recovery of money;
(2) Actions for damages for injuries to the person, or for taking
or detaining personal property, or for injuring personal property, or
for an injury to real property when no issue raised by the answer
involves the plaintiff's title to or possession of the same and actions
to recover the possession of personal property;
(3) Actions for a penalty;
(4) Actions upon a bond conditioned for the payment of money, when
the amount claimed does not exceed ((fifty)) seventy-five thousand
dollars, though the penalty of the bond exceeds that sum, the judgment
to be given for the sum actually due, not exceeding the amount claimed
in the complaint;
(5) Actions on an undertaking or surety bond taken by the court;
(6) Actions for damages for fraud in the sale, purchase, or
exchange of personal property;
(7) Proceedings to take and enter judgment on confession of a
defendant;
(8) Proceedings to issue writs of attachment, garnishment and
replevin upon goods, chattels, moneys, and effects;
(9) All other actions and proceedings of which jurisdiction is
specially conferred by statute, when the title to, or right of
possession of real property is not involved; and
(10) Actions arising under the provisions of chapter 19.190 RCW.

--- END ---