BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.52.210 and 2003 c 111 s 1305 are each amended to
read as follows:
All city and town primaries shall be nonpartisan. Primaries for
special purpose districts, except those districts that require
ownership of property within the district as a prerequisite to voting,
shall be nonpartisan. City, town, and district primaries shall be held
as provided in RCW ((29A.04.310)) 29A.04.311, except where the charter
of a first class city provides for a ranked voting system, in which
case a primary election is not necessary.
The purpose of this section is to establish the holding of a
primary, subject to the exemptions in RCW 29A.52.220, as a uniform
procedural requirement to the holding of city, town, and district
elections, except where the charter of a first class city provides for
a ranked voting system. These provisions supersede any and all other
statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
election requirements.
If a first class city provides for a ranked voting system in its
charter, the secretary of state shall assist the county auditor with
implementation of the ranked voting system.

--- END ---