BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office of privacy protection is created in the office of
the attorney general under the direction of the attorney general and
the secretary of state. The office's purpose is protecting the privacy
of individuals' personal information in a manner consistent with the
Washington state Constitution by identifying consumer problems in the
privacy area and facilitating development of fair information
practices.
(2) The office shall inform the public of potential options for
protecting the privacy of, and avoiding the misuse of, personal
information.
(3) The office shall make recommendations to organizations for
privacy policies and practices that promote and protect the interests
of Washington consumers.
(4) The office may promote voluntary and mutually agreed upon
nonbinding arbitration and mediation of privacy-related disputes where
appropriate.
(5) The director of the office of privacy protection shall do all
of the following:
(a) Receive complaints from individuals concerning any person
obtaining, compiling, maintaining, using, disclosing, or disposing of
personal information in a manner that may be potentially unlawful or
violate a stated privacy policy relating to that individual, and
provide advice, information, and referral, where available;
(b) Provide information to consumers on effective ways of handling
complaints that involve violations of privacy-related laws, including
identity theft and identity fraud. If appropriate local, state, or
federal agencies are available to assist consumers with those
complaints, the director shall refer those complaints to those
agencies;
(c) Develop information and educational programs and materials to
foster public understanding and recognition of the purposes of this
section;
(d) Investigate and assist in the prosecution of identity theft and
other privacy-related crimes, and, as necessary, coordinate with local,
state, and federal law enforcement agencies in the investigation of
similar crimes; and
(e) Assist and coordinate in the training of local, state, and
federal law enforcement agencies regarding identity theft and other
privacy-related crimes, as appropriate.
(6) The director may adopt rules as necessary to implement
subsection (5)(b) through (e) of this section.
(7) The implementation of this section is subject to the
availability of funds appropriated specifically for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2007.

--- END ---