BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the use of
industrial clusters as a descriptive tool can provide a clear
understanding of the relationships between firms that drive the local
economy. An industry cluster is a group of complementary, competing,
and interdependent firms that represent the entire value chain of a
broadly defined industry from suppliers to end products, including
supporting services and specialized infrastructure. The legislature
further finds that (1) cluster-based economic analysis is a tool for
understanding industry dynamics; (2) the purpose of cluster analysis is
to identify those areas of the economy in which a region has or might
develop a comparative advantage and to develop short and long-term
strategies for growing the regional economy; and (3) using cluster
analysis in the development of economic development strategies
highlights opportunities for coordination and improvement in areas of
mutual concern to firms without threatening or distorting competition.
It is the intent of the legislature that the department of community,
trade, and economic development use a cluster-based economic analysis
in the development and delivery of economic development services in the
state.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.330.090 and 2003 c 153 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall work with private sector organizations,
industry and cluster associations, federal agencies, state agencies,
local governments, local associate development organizations, and
higher education and training institutions ((to assist)) in the
development of industry cluster-based strategies to diversify the
economy, facilitate technology transfer and diffusion, and increase
value-added production ((by focusing on targeted sectors)). The
initial industry clusters targeted ((sectors)) by the department may
include, but are not limited to, software, forest products,
biotechnology, environmental ((industries)) technology, recycling
markets and waste reduction, aerospace, photonics, food processing,
tourism, film and video, microelectronics, new materials, robotics, and
machine tools. The department shall, on a continuing basis, evaluate
the potential return to the state from devoting additional resources to
((a targeted sector's)) an industry cluster-based approach to economic
development and ((including)) identifying and assisting additional
((sectors in its efforts)) clusters. The department shall use
information gathered in each service delivery region in formulating its
((sectoral)) industry cluster-based strategies ((and in designating new
targeted sectors)).
(2) The department shall pursue a coordinated program to expand the
tourism industry throughout the state in cooperation with the public
and private tourism development organizations. The department, in
operating its tourism program, shall:
(a) Promote Washington as a tourism destination to national and
international markets to include nature-based and wildlife viewing
tourism;
(b) Provide information to businesses and local communities on
tourism opportunities that could expand local revenues;
(c) Assist local communities to strengthen their tourism
partnerships, including their relationships with state and local
agencies;
(d) Provide leadership training and assistance to local communities
to facilitate the development and implementation of local tourism
plans;
(e) Coordinate the development of a statewide tourism and marketing
plan. The department's tourism planning efforts shall be carried out
in conjunction with public and private tourism development
organizations including the department of fish and wildlife and other
appropriate agencies. The plan shall specifically address mechanisms
for: (i) Funding national and international marketing and nature-based
tourism efforts; (ii) interagency cooperation; and (iii) integrating
the state plan with local tourism plans.
(3) The department may, in carrying out its efforts to expand the
tourism industry in the state:
(a) Solicit and receive gifts, grants, funds, fees, and endowments,
in trust or otherwise, from tribal, local or other governmental
entities, as well as private sources, and may expend the same or any
income therefrom for tourism purposes. All revenue received for
tourism purposes shall be deposited into the tourism development and
promotion account created in RCW 43.330.094;
(b) Host conferences and strategic planning workshops relating to
the promotion of nature-based and wildlife viewing tourism;
(c) Conduct or contract for tourism-related studies;
(d) Contract with individuals, businesses, or public entities to
carry out its tourism-related activities under this section;
(e) Provide tourism-related organizations with marketing and other
technical assistance;
(f) Evaluate and make recommendations on proposed tourism-related
policies.
(4) The department shall promote, market, and encourage growth in
the production of films and videos, as well as television commercials
within the state; to this end the department is directed to assist in
the location of a film and video production studio within the state.
(5) In assisting in the development of ((a targeted sector)) its
industry cluster-based strategies, the department's activities may
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Conducting focus group discussions, facilitating meetings, and
conducting studies to identify ((members of the sector)) industry
clusters, appraise the current ((state of the sector)) information
linkages within a cluster, and identify issues of common concern within
((the sector)) a cluster;
(b) Supporting the formation of industry and cluster associations,
publications of association directories, and related efforts to create
or expand the activities ((or)) of industry and cluster associations;
(c) ((Assisting in the formation of flexible networks by providing
(i) agency employees or private sector consultants trained to act as
flexible network brokers and (ii) funding for potential flexible
network participants for the purpose of organizing or implementing a
flexible network;
(d))) Helping establish research consortia;
(((e))) (d) Facilitating joint training and education programs;
(((f))) (e) Promoting cooperative market development activities;
(((g))) (f) Analyzing the need, feasibility, and cost of
establishing product certification and testing facilities and services;
and
(((h))) (g) Providing for methods of electronic communication and
information dissemination among firms and groups of firms to facilitate
((network)) industry cluster activity.

--- END ---