BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that twenty-eight of
the state's thirty-nine currently operating county courthouses appear
to meet the state criteria as historic buildings. Washington's
historic county courthouses are an unsurpassed historical and
architectural collection reflecting civic pride, local heritage, and
master craftsmanship. These buildings are intensively used by the
public as the seats of county government and as judicial and criminal
justice centers. As anchors of the downtown commercial cores of their
communities, these courthouses strengthen local commerce, attract
tourism, and provide a sense of identity. Capital improvements to
these landmarks are needed to protect their safety and historic and
architectural integrity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 27.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The historic county courthouse grant program is established for
the protection and preservation of the state's historic county
courthouses.
(2) The historic county courthouse account is created in the state
treasury. Legislative appropriations for the purpose of the historic
county courthouse grant program shall be deposited to the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account shall be used exclusively to fund the
historic county courthouse grant program.
(3) The office of archaeology and historic preservation shall
administer the historic county courthouse grant program. No more than
one percent of the expenditures from the historic county courthouse
account may be used for the administrative purposes of the office. All
other expenditures from the account shall be for grants to be made to
counties for the protection and preservation of courthouses that meet
the eligibility requirements for listing on the Washington heritage
register established under RCW 27.34.220. Counties receiving grants
under this section shall provide an equal amount of matching funds from
public or private sources.
(4) By October 1, 2005, the office shall establish eligibility
criteria and a grant application process. Grants may be made for
courthouse protection and preservation, including character defining
architectural features, general repairs, system upgrades, payments for
renovations completed since January 1, 2003, and improvements to access
and accommodations for persons with disabilities. All rehabilitation
work shall comply with the federal department of the interior's
standards for rehabilitation. Grants shall not be used for
expenditures for courthouse maintenance. Only counties with historic
courthouses that continue to maintain county functions are eligible for
grants under this section.
(5) The office of archaeology and historic preservation shall
establish an historic courthouse advisory board that includes two
county elected officials appointed by the Washington state association
of counties, two county elected officials appointed by the Washington
association of county officials, a representative of a statewide
historic preservation organization, a representative from a county
heritage commission that is a certified local government, a member of
the senate appointed by the president of the senate, a member of the
house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, a member of the state advisory council on historic
preservation, and up to three at-large members with expertise in
architecture, architectural history, construction, construction
management, engineering, planning, or a related field.
(6) If available funds in the account exceed eligible courthouse
grant recipients, historic county-owned facilities such as libraries,
museums, and hospitals may apply for grants using the same criteria.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of twenty million dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2007, from the public works assistance account to the
historic county courthouse account for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---