BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.04.170 and 1 H.C. s 13 are each amended to read as
follows:
King county shall consist of the territory bounded as follows, to
wit: Beginning at the point of intersection of the center of East
Passage (also known as Admiralty Inlet) on Puget Sound and the
northerly line of the Puyallup Indian Reservation (projected
northwesterly); thence southeasterly in a straight line along said
northerly line of Puyallup Indian Reservation and same extended to a
point on the east line of section thirty-one, township twenty-one,
north, range four east, Willamette Meridian; thence south along said
east line of section thirty-one, township twenty-one, range four east,
Willamette Meridian, to the township line between township twenty north
and township twenty-one north (being the fifth standard parallel
north); thence east along said township line between township twenty
north and township twenty-one north to the middle of the main channel
of White river, near the northeast corner of section three, township
twenty north, range five east, Willamette Meridian; thence upstream
along the middle of the main channel of White river to the forks of
White river and Greenwater river; thence upstream along the middle of
the main channel of the Greenwater river to the forks of the Greenwater
river and Meadow creek; thence upstream along the middle of the main
channel of Meadow creek to the summit of the Cascade mountains, at a
point known as Naches Pass, said point lying in the southwest quarter
of section thirty-five, township nineteen north, range eleven east,
Willamette Meridian; thence northerly along the summit of the Cascade
mountains to a point on the township line between township twenty-six
north and township twenty-seven north, said point lying near the north
quarter-corner of section three, township twenty-six north, range
thirteen east, Willamette Meridian; thence west along said township
line between township twenty-six north and twenty-seven north to the
middle of the channel known as Admiralty Inlet on Puget Sound; thence
southerly along said middle of channel known as Admiralty Inlet through
Colvo's Passage (West Passage) on the west side of Vashon Island to a
point due north of Point Defiance; thence southeasterly along middle of
channel between Vashon Island and Point Defiance (Dalcos Passage) to a
point due south of Quartermaster Harbor; thence northeasterly along
middle of channel known as Admiralty Inlet to point of beginning. King
county is renamed in honor of the Reverend Doctor Martin Luther King,
Jr.

--- END ---