BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.050 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 24 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to any otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate
limitations, regular property taxes may be levied by or for a taxing
district in an amount exceeding the limitations provided for in this
chapter if such levy is authorized by a proposition approved by a
majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition
at a general election held within the district or at a special election
within the taxing district called by the district for the purpose of
submitting such proposition to the voters. Any election held pursuant
to this section shall be held not more than twelve months prior to the
date on which the proposed levy is to be made, except as provided in
subsection (((3)(b))) (2) of this section. The ballot title of the
proposition shall state the dollar rate proposed and shall clearly
state ((any)) the conditions, if any, which are applicable under
subsection (((3))) (4) of this section.
(2) Subject to statutory dollar limitations in RCW 84.52.043, a
proposition placed before the voters under this section may authorize
annual increases in levies for multiple consecutive years, up to six
consecutive years, during which period each year's authorized maximum
legal levy shall be used as the base upon which an increased levy limit
for the succeeding year is computed, but the ballot proposition must
state the dollar rate proposed only for the first year of the
consecutive years and must state the limit factor, or a specified index
to be used for determining a limit factor, such as the consumer price
index, which need not be the same for all years, by which the regular
tax levy for the district may be increased in each of the subsequent
consecutive years. Elections for this purpose must be held at a
primary or general election. The title of each ballot measure must
state the specific purposes for which the proposed levy increase shall
be used.
(3) After a levy authorized pursuant to this section is made, the
dollar amount of such levy shall be used for the purpose of computing
the limitations for subsequent levies provided for in this chapter,
except as provided in subsection((s (3) and (4))) (5) of this section.
(((3))) (4) A proposition placed before the voters under this
section may:
(a) Limit the period for which the increased levy is to be made;
(b) ((Subject to statutory dollar limitations in RCW 84.52.043,
authorize annual increases in levies for any county, city, or town for
multiple consecutive years, up to six consecutive years, during which
period each year's authorized maximum legal levy shall be used as the
base upon which an increased levy limit for the succeeding year is
computed, but the ballot proposition must state the dollar rate
proposed only for the first year of the consecutive years and must
state the limit factor, or a specified index to be used for determining
a limit factor, such as the consumer price index, which need not be the
same for all years, by which the regular tax levy for the district may
be increased in each of the subsequent consecutive years. Elections
for this purpose must be held at a primary or general election. The
title of each ballot measure must state the specific purposes for which
the proposed levy increase shall be used, and funds raised under this
levy shall not supplant existing funds used for these purposes;
(c))) Limit the purpose for which the increased levy is to be made,
but if the limited purpose includes making redemption payments on
bonds, the period for which the increased levies are made shall not
exceed nine years;
(((d))) (c) Set the levy at a rate less than the maximum rate
allowed for the district; or
(((e) Provide that the maximum allowable dollar amount of the final
annual levy of the period specified in the measure shall be used to
compute the limitations provided for in this chapter on levy increases
occurring after the expiration of the period; or
(f))) (d) Include any combination of the conditions in this
subsection.
(((4) Except as otherwise provided in an approved ballot measure
under this section,)) (5) After the expiration of a limited period
under subsection (4)(a) of this section or the satisfaction of a
limited purpose under subsection (4)(b) of this section, whichever
comes first, subsequent levies shall be computed as if:
(a) The limited proposition under subsection (((3))) (4) of this
section had not been approved; and
(b) The taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which
would otherwise have been allowed under this chapter during the years
levies were made under the limited proposition.

--- END ---