BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
1. Timber Land Revitalization Board
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that more than half of
the state's forty-two and one-half million acres are forest lands and
that the majority of these lands are available for harvest. However,
many of the state's forest lands are threatened by conversion to
nonforest uses, mostly from commercial and residential development. In
addition, worldwide fiber commodity prices, increased environmental
regulations, and changing patterns in corporate and individual
ownership of forest lands are also contributing to the declines in
forest lands in the state. Therefore, it is the intent of this act to
provide greater state financial assistance to revitalize and maintain
forest lands in the state, through creation of a funding board to make
grants on a competitive basis that support protection of the forest
land base and that assist in developing innovative strategies for
supporting economically and environmentally healthy forests and forest-dependent communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the timber land revitalization board created in
section 3 of this act.
(2) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(3) "Priority needs areas" means the geographic areas identified by
the department for priority lands to be addressed under the forest
legacy program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The timber land revitalization board is
created. The board is composed of five members, of whom four members
must be appointed by the governor. The commissioner of public lands
shall serve ex officio as a voting member of the board. In making
appointments, the governor shall provide for representation of the
interests of industrial forest landowners, nonindustrial forest
landowners, local governments, and nonprofit citizen organizations
involved with the revitalization of timber lands and protection of the
state's forest land base. The governor shall solicit and give
substantial consideration to nominations provided by organizations
representing these interests. Appointments to the board by the
governor are subject to senate confirmation.
(2) The governor shall select a chair from among the members of the
board.
(3) Board members serve four-year terms, except that the governor
shall designate two of the initial appointments to serve for a term of
two years. The terms commence January 1, 2006.
(4) Staff support to the board shall be provided by the department.
For administrative purposes, the board shall be located within the
department.
(5) Members of the board shall be compensated as provided by RCW
43.03.250, and reimbursed for travel expenses as provided by RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The board is responsible for making
grants and loans for the revitalization of timber lands consistent with
the procedures and criteria of section 5 of this act, from the amounts
appropriated to the board for this purpose. To accomplish this
purpose, the board may:
(a) Provide assistance to grant applicants regarding the procedures
and criteria for grant and loan awards;
(b) Make and execute all manner of contracts and agreements with
public and private parties as the board deems necessary, consistent
with the purposes of this chapter;
(c) Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or
financial or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms
that are not in conflict with this chapter;
(d) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter; and
(e) Do all acts necessary or convenient to carry out the powers
expressly granted or implied under this chapter.
(2) The department shall provide all necessary grant and loan
administration assistance to the board, and shall distribute and
account for funds appropriated or provided to the board for the
purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) During each fiscal biennium, the board's
total grants and loans are subject to the following limitations:
(a) Not less than thirty percent and not more than forty percent of
the total must be awarded for projects and activities that sustain the
forest land base and strengthen the connection between economic health
and conservation of forests in Washington. Such activities may include
but are not limited to:
(i) Programs or projects to support small timber landowners
including such strategies as group timber certification, group habitat
conservation plans, group cash flow pools, stewardship collaboration,
and technical support;
(ii) Programs or projects that test methods for recreation access
and cost-share programs;
(iii) Programs or projects that test methods to assist forest
landowners in providing carbon sequestration, water recharge, and other
natural resource services; and
(iv) Programs or projects that test methods to support forest
landowners' efforts at cost control, such as law enforcement, road
gates, and cleanup of illegal dumping.
(b) Not less than thirty percent and not more than forty percent of
the total must be awarded for projects and activities that preserve
forest lands over the long term for working forestry. Such activities
may include but are not limited to:
(i) The acquisition of interests in forest lands for the purpose of
protecting the lands for working forestry;
(ii) Developing and implementing cooperative agreements with forest
landowners for maintaining working forestry; and
(iii) Other activities using conservation techniques such as
clustering development rights, transfer of development rights, and land
exchanges.
(c) Not less than thirty percent and not more than forty percent of
the total must be awarded for planning, research, and policy
development related to revitalizing working forests in the state.
(2) The board shall adopt guidelines for the amount of nonstate
resources that must be committed for grants or loans from the
categories established by the board. The amount may not be less than
ten percent of the amount of the grant or loan from the board.
(3) The board shall also adopt guidelines that limit the amount of
a grant or loan that may be allocated to administrative or other
expenses of a grant or loan recipient that are not directly applied to
the working forestry revitalization activities of the grant or loan.
(4) The board shall accord additional weight to applications that
address forest lands within priority needs areas.
(5) During each fiscal year commencing July 1, 2006, and ending
June 30, 2015, the board shall establish a goal of disbursing a minimum
of twenty-five percent of the total funds awarded by the board in the
form of low-interest loans. However, if the board determines that
there are not sufficient applications for eligible projects to meet
this goal, the board may award a lesser amount as loans, or may hold
funds until the next funding cycle to encourage a greater number of
loan applications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The forestry revitalization account is
created in the state treasury. The account consists of moneys
deposited under RCW 84.33.081 and other funds deposited into the
account by the legislature. Moneys received by the state for
distribution by the board created in section 3 of this act shall be
deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used for
working forestry revitalization through the program authorized in
sections 1 through 5, 13, and 14 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The forestry revitalization revolving
account is created in the state treasury. The account shall consist of
all repayments of principle and interest on loans extended by the board
under this chapter, of federal funds that may be provided to capitalize
the account, and of appropriations to the account. All interest earned
on moneys deposited in the account, including repayments, shall remain
in the account and may be used for any eligible purpose. Money in the
account shall be used by the board to make loans under the procedures
and criteria of sections 4 and 5 of this act. Disbursements from the
account are subject to legislative appropriation, and shall be upon the
authorization of the board.

Sec. 8 RCW 84.33.041 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An excise tax is imposed on every person engaging in this state
in business as a harvester of timber on privately or publicly owned
land. The tax is equal to the stumpage value of timber harvested for
sale or for commercial or industrial use multiplied by the rate
provided in this chapter.
(2) A credit is allowed against the tax imposed under this section
for any tax paid under RCW 84.33.051.
(3) Moneys received as payment for the tax imposed under this
section and RCW 84.33.051 shall be deposited in the timber tax
distribution account ((hereby established in the state treasury)).

Sec. 9 RCW 84.33.051 and 2004 c 177 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any county may impose a tax upon every
person engaging in the county in business as a harvester effective
October 1, 1984. The tax shall be equal to the stumpage value of
timber harvested from privately owned land multiplied by a rate of 4
percent; and equal to the stumpage value of timber harvested from
publicly owned land multiplied by the following rates:
(a) For timber harvested January 1, 2005, through December 31,
2005, 1.2 percent;
(b) For timber harvested January 1, 2006, through December 31,
2006, 1.5 percent;
(c) For timber harvested January 1, 2007, through December 31,
2007, 1.8 percent;
(d) For timber harvested January 1, 2008, through December 31,
2008, 2.1 percent;
(e) For timber harvested January 1, 2009, through December 31,
2009, 2.4 percent;
(f) For timber harvested January 1, 2010, through December 31,
2010, 2.7 percent;
(g) For timber harvested January 1, 2011, through December 31,
2011, 3.1 percent;
(h) For timber harvested January 1, 2012, through December 31,
2012, 3.4 percent;
(i) For timber harvested January 1, 2013, through December 31,
2013, 3.7 percent;
(j) For timber harvested January 1, 2014, and thereafter, 4.0
percent.
(2) Before the effective date of any ordinance imposing a tax under
this section, the county shall contract with the department of revenue
for administration and collection of the tax. The tax collected by the
department of revenue under this section shall be deposited by the
department in the timber tax distribution account. ((Moneys in the
account may be spent only for distributions to counties under RCW
84.33.081 and, after appropriation by the legislature, for the
activities undertaken by the department of revenue relating to the
collection and administration of the taxes imposed under this section
and RCW 84.33.041. Appropriations are not required for distributions
to counties under RCW 84.33.081.))

Sec. 10 RCW 84.33.081 and 1985 c 184 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The timber tax distribution account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts identified in RCW 84.33.041 must be deposited
in the account. Moneys in the account may be used only for
distributions to counties and to the forestry revitalization account
under this section. Appropriations are not required for distributions
to counties under this section.
(2) On the last business day of the second month of each calendar
quarter, the state treasurer shall distribute from the timber tax
distribution account to each county the amount of tax collected on
behalf of each county under RCW 84.33.051, less each county's
proportionate share of appropriations for collection and administration
activities under RCW 84.33.051, and shall transfer to the ((state
general fund)) forestry revitalization account the amount of tax
collected on behalf of the state under RCW 84.33.041, less the state's
proportionate share of appropriations for collection and administration
activities under RCW 84.33.041. The county treasurer shall deposit
moneys received under this section in a county timber tax account which
shall be established by each county. Following receipt of moneys under
this section, the county treasurer shall make distributions from any
moneys available in the county timber tax account to taxing districts
in the county, except the state, under subsections (((2))) (3) through
(((4))) (5) of this section.
(((2))) (3) From moneys available, there first shall be a
distribution to each taxing district having debt service payments due
during the calendar year, based upon bonds issued under authority of a
vote of the people conducted pursuant to RCW 84.52.056 and based upon
excess levies for a capital project fund authorized pursuant to RCW
84.52.053, of an amount equal to the timber assessed value of the
district multiplied by the tax rate levied for payment of the debt
service and capital projects: PROVIDED, That in respect to levies for
a debt service or capital project fund authorized before July 1, 1984,
the amount allocated shall not be less than an amount equal to the same
percentage of such debt service or capital project fund represented by
timber tax allocations to such payments in calendar year 1984.
Distribution under this subsection (((2))) (3) shall be used only for
debt service and capital projects payments. The distribution under
this subsection shall be made as follows: One-half of such amount
shall be distributed in the first quarter of the year and one-half
shall be distributed in the third quarter of the year.
(((3))) (4) From the moneys remaining after the distributions under
subsection (((2))) (3) of this section, the county treasurer shall
distribute to each school district an amount equal to one-half of the
timber assessed value of the district or eighty percent of the timber
roll of such district in calendar year 1983 as determined under this
chapter, whichever is greater, multiplied by the tax rate, if any,
levied by the district under RCW 84.52.052 or 84.52.053 for purposes
other than debt service payments and capital projects supported under
subsection (((2))) (3) of this section. The distribution under this
subsection shall be made as follows: One-half of such amount shall be
distributed in the first quarter of the year and one-half shall be
distributed in the third quarter of the year.
(((4))) (5) After the distributions directed under subsections
(((2))) (3) and (((3))) (4) of this section, if any, each taxing
district shall receive an amount equal to the timber assessed value of
the district multiplied by the tax rate, if any, levied as a regular
levy of the district or as a special levy not included in subsection
(((2))) (3) or (((3))) (4) of this section.
(((5))) (6) If there are insufficient moneys in the county timber
tax account to make full distribution under subsection (((4))) (5) of
this section, the county treasurer shall multiply the amount to be
distributed to each taxing district under that subsection by a
fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the county timber tax
account balance before making the distribution under that subsection.
The denominator of the fraction is the account balance which would be
required to make full distribution under that subsection.
(((6))) (7) After making the distributions under subsections
(((2))) (3) through (((4))) (5) of this section in the full amount
indicated for the calendar year, the county treasurer shall place any
excess revenue up to twenty percent of the total distributions made for
the year under subsections (((2))) (3) through (((4))) (5) of this
section in a reserve status until the beginning of the next calendar
year. Any moneys remaining in the county timber tax account after this
amount is placed in reserve shall be distributed to each taxing
district in the county in the same proportions as the distributions
made under subsection (((4))) (5) of this section.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.84.092 and 2003 c 361 s 602, 2003 c 324 s 1, 2003
c 150 s 2, and 2003 c 48 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, the
emergency reserve fund, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the forestry
revitalization revolving account, the health services account, the
public health services account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health services account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.84.092 and 2004 c 242 s 60 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, the
emergency reserve fund, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the forestry
revitalization revolving account, the health services account, the
public health services account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health services account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

2. Cascade Foothills
NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The legislature finds that the western
slopes of the Cascade mountain range in Whatcom, Skagit, Snohomish,
King, Pierce, and Thurston counties are experiencing increasing demands
for a wide range of uses by the growing population in the Puget Sound
basin. These lands provide important economic, forest, fish and
wildlife, recreation, scenic, educational, and watershed protection
benefits to the entire region. The legislature further finds that it
is in the public's interest to assist Cascade foothills landowners and
communities in conserving responsible, working forestry in the lower
elevations of this area to sustain timber-dependent economies while
promoting ecological and environmental benefits from the forests.
Therefore, the legislature creates the Cascade foothills focus area
for the purpose of committing state policies and programs to the
assistance of landowners and communities in developing and implementing
innovative approaches to conserving traditional forestry and related
uses of these lands while at the same time accommodating new uses that
strengthen their economic and natural benefits. For the purposes of
this section and section 14 of this act, the Cascade foothills focus
area generally encompasses the nonurbanized lands within the Cascade
mountain range and drainages lying between three hundred and three
thousand feet above mean sea level, and located within the counties of
Whatcom, Skagit, Snohomish, King, Pierce, and Thurston counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 During fiscal years 2005 and 2006, the
board is authorized to provide grants to applicants that address
working forests in the Cascade foothills focus area, where the
activities meet one or more of the following criteria:
(1) The project encompasses a collaboration of diverse
stakeholders, such as forest landowners and other private entities,
grassroots constituencies, nonprofit organizations, tribal governments,
and government agencies;
(2) The project establishes measurable benchmarks for accomplishing
the following objectives:
(a) Demonstrably enhancing the economies of communities in the
Cascade foothills;
(b) Sustaining environmental functions with emphasis on significant
water quality and hydrological functions; and
(c) Involving and supporting communities lying within the Cascade
foothills;
(3) A project scope that has landscape scale influence;
(4) A strategy that both retains the region's connections with its
historical uses while protecting the region's options for additional
uses in the future; or
(5) A project that demonstrates innovative strategies for
accomplishing the project's objectives.

3. State Forest Lands
Sec. 15 RCW 79.17.200 and 1992 c 167 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "public agency" means any
agency, political subdivision, or unit of local government of this
state including, but not limited to, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, special purpose districts, and local service
districts; any agency of the state government; any agency of the United
States; and any Indian tribe recognized as such by the federal
government.
(2) With the approval of the board of natural resources, the
department of natural resources may directly transfer or dispose of
real property, without public auction, in the following circumstances:
(a) Transfers in lieu of condemnations;
(b) Transfers to public agencies; ((and))
(c) Transfers to resolve trespass and property ownership disputes;
and
(d) Transfers to a nonprofit land conservation organization where
the purposes and transaction structure are approved by the board of
natural resources.
(3) Real property to be transferred or disposed of under this
section shall be transferred or disposed of only after appraisal and
for at least fair market value, and only if such transaction is in the
best interest of the state or affected trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) The sum of seven million five hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the forestry revitalization account to the timber
land revitalization board for the biennium ending June 30, 2007, to
carry out the purposes of chapter 76.-- RCW (sections 1 through 7, 13,
and 14 of this act).
(2) The sum of two million five hundred thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the forestry
revitalization revolving account to the timber land revitalization
board for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, to carry out the
purposes of chapter 76.-- RCW (sections 1 through 7, 13, and 14 of this
act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 On or before June 30, 2006, the treasurer
shall transfer two million five hundred thousand dollars from the
forestry revitalization account to the forestry revitalization
revolving account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 7, 13, and 14 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 76 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Section 11 of this act expires July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Section 12 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

--- END ---