BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to avoid
unnecessary hardships on the citizens of a community by recognizing the
traditional appliance repair services that have been offered for many
years by any public utility district described in section 2 of this
act.
The legislature understands that some of these services improve the
energy efficiency of the appliance repaired, which helps citizens save
money and energy as well as extending the life of the appliance.
The legislature recognizes these historic services coexist with the
private sector without creating aggressive competition between public
and private enterprises.
It is the intent of the legislature to have these services be
financially self-supporting and not be subsidized by any other customer
rate structures.
Public utility districts affected by this act are encouraged to
continue to work collaboratively with the private sector in providing
these services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Any public utility district that has operated an electrical
appliance repair service for at least ten years prior to the effective
date of this act, may continue to operate an electrical appliance
repair service within its service territory.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW
to read as follows:
When a public utility district provides electrical appliance repair
services under section 2 of this act, the public utility district
shall:
(1) Charge customers the true and fair cost for the services;
(2) Keep records documenting the revenues and expenditures for the
services and make those records available to the public; and
(3) Develop measures or benchmarks to track and evaluate the
performance of the services.

--- END ---