BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that research
demonstrates that individuals with dyslexia process information in
different areas of their brains than do nondyslexics. Current studies
suggest that fifteen to twenty percent of the population has a reading
disability. Of those, eighty-five percent have dyslexia. The
legislature finds that with proper diagnosis, appropriate instruction,
hard work, and support from family, teachers, and the community,
individuals who are dyslexic can succeed in school and life. The
legislature further finds that early identification and treatment is
the key to helping dyslexics achieve.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The dyslexia reading instruction pilot program is created, and
shall be known as "The Lorraine Wojahn Dyslexia Pilot Reading Program."
The purpose of the program is to improve instructional methods for
students with dyslexia. The superintendent of public instruction shall
administer the program in up to five school districts, to the extent
funds are available. School districts shall be selected from various
regions of the state, including at a minimum northwest, southwest, and
eastern regions, to participate in the program based upon research-supported assessment and treatment. The program shall include
evaluation components. The program shall also focus on writing and
speaking skills. Each program shall also focus on early identification
of students with dyslexia.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall conduct an
evaluation of the pilot programs. Based upon the evaluation, the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide information to
educators throughout the state on effective practices in helping
students with dyslexia.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee, to the extent
funds are available, shall conduct a study on the effectiveness of the
identification of students with dyslexia and the effectiveness of the
educational services received by students with dyslexia.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---