BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to the value proceeding or accruing
to a manufacturer from the reproduction of an airplane of historical
significance capable of flight to be sold at retail or to the gross
proceeds of sales by the manufacturer of the reproduced airplane of
historical significance capable of flight.
(2) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Airplane" means an engine-driven fixed-wing aircraft that is
supported in flight by the dynamic reaction of air against its wings.
(b) "Airplane of historical significance" means an airplane which
is at least fifty years old of a type or model of which there are fewer
than ten in number known to exist worldwide.
(c) "Reproduction" means to make a copy of an existing object.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---