BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.85.200 and 2001 c 135 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A program for salmon and steelhead recovery is established in
Clark, Cowlitz, Lewis, Skamania, and Wahkiakum counties within the
habitat areas classified as the lower Columbia evolutionarily
significant ((unit 4)) units by the federal national marine fisheries
service. The management board created under subsection (2) of this
section is responsible for ((implementing the habitat portion of the
approved)) developing and overseeing the implementation of a salmon and
steelhead recovery ((initiative)) plan and is empowered to receive and
disburse funds for the ((approved)) salmon and steelhead recovery
initiatives. The management board created pursuant to this section
shall constitute the lead entity and the committee established under
RCW 77.85.050 responsible for fulfilling the requirements and
exercising powers under this chapter.
(2) A management board consisting of fifteen voting members is
created within the lower Columbia evolutionarily significant ((unit 4))
units. The members shall consist of one county commissioner or
designee from each of the five participating counties selected by each
county legislative authority; one member representing the cities
contained within the lower Columbia evolutionarily significant ((unit
4)) units as a voting member selected by the cities in the lower
Columbia evolutionarily significant ((unit 4)) units; a representative
of the Cowlitz Tribe appointed by the tribe; one state legislator
elected from one of the legislative districts contained within the
lower Columbia evolutionarily significant ((unit 4)) units selected by
that group of state legislators representing the area; five
representatives to include at least one member who represents private
property interests appointed by the five county commissioners or
designees; one hydro utility representative nominated by hydro
utilities and appointed by the five county commissioners or designees;
and one representative nominated from the environmental community who
resides in the lower Columbia evolutionarily significant ((unit 4))
units appointed by the five county commissioners or designees. The
board shall appoint and consult a technical advisory committee, which
shall include four representatives of state agencies one each appointed
by the directors of the departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, and
transportation, and the commissioner of public lands. The board may
also appoint additional persons to the technical advisory committee as
needed. The chair of the board shall be selected from among the
members of the management board by the five county commissioners or
designees and the legislator on the board. In making appointments
under this subsection, the county commissioners shall consider
recommendations of interested parties. Vacancies shall be filled in
the same manner as the original appointments were selected. No action
may be brought or maintained against any management board member, the
management board, or any of its agents, officers, or employees for any
noncontractual acts or omissions in carrying out the purposes of this
section.
(3)(a) The management board shall participate in the development of
a recovery plan to implement its responsibilities under (b) of this
subsection. The management board shall consider local watershed
efforts and activities as well as habitat conservation plans in the
development and implementation of the recovery plan. Any of the
participating counties may continue its own efforts for restoring
steelhead habitat. Nothing in this section limits the authority of
units of local government to enter into interlocal agreements under
chapter 39.34 RCW or any other provision of law.
(b) The management board is responsible for ((implementing the
habitat portions of the local government responsibilities of the lower
Columbia steelhead conservation initiative)) the development of a lower
Columbia salmon and steelhead recovery plan and for coordinating and
monitoring the implementation of the plan approved by the state and the
national marine fisheries service. In developing and implementing the
plan, the management board will work with appropriate federal and state
agencies, tribal governments, local governments, and the public. The
management board may work in cooperation with the state and the
national marine fisheries service to modify the ((initiative)) plan, or
to address habitat for other aquatic species that may be subsequently
listed under the federal endangered species act. The management board
may not exercise authority over land or water within the individual
counties or otherwise preempt the authority of any units of local
government.
(c) The management board shall prioritize as appropriate and
approve projects and programs related to the recovery of lower Columbia
river salmon and steelhead runs, including the funding of those
projects and programs, and coordinate local government efforts as
prescribed in the recovery plan. The management board shall establish
criteria for funding projects and programs based upon their likely
value in salmon and steelhead recovery. The management board may
consider local economic impact among the criteria, but jurisdictional
boundaries and factors related to jurisdictional population may not be
considered as part of the criteria.
(d) The management board shall assess the factors for decline along
each ((prioritized stream as listed)) tributary basin in the lower
Columbia ((steelhead conservation initiative)). The management board
is encouraged to take a stream-by-stream approach in conducting the
assessment which utilizes state and local expertise, including
volunteer groups, interest groups, and affected units of local
government.
(4) The management board has the authority to hire and fire staff,
including an executive director, enter into contracts, accept grants
and other moneys, disburse funds, make recommendations to cities and
counties about potential code changes and the development of programs
and incentives upon request, pay all necessary expenses, and may choose
a fiduciary agent. The management board shall report on its progress
on a ((quarterly)) biennial basis to the legislative bodies of the five
participating counties and the state natural resource-related agencies.
The management board shall prepare a final report at the conclusion of
the program describing its efforts and successes in developing and
implementing the ((habitat portion of the)) lower Columbia salmon and
steelhead ((conservation initiative)) recovery plan. The final report
shall be transmitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
the legislative bodies of the participating counties, and the state
natural resource-related agencies.
(5) The program terminates on July 1, ((2006)) 2010.
(6) For purposes of this section, "evolutionarily significant unit"
means the habitat area identified for an evolutionarily significant
unit of an aquatic species listed or proposed for listing as a
threatened or endangered species under the federal endangered species
act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.).

--- END ---