BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.105E
RCW to read as follows:
This chapter is not intended, nor may it be interpreted, to
adversely affect the transportation, manufacturing, storage, or use of
any hazardous substance or radioactive materials necessary for medical
research, medical treatment, or manufacturing or industrial processes.
Those substances and materials, shipped without the primary intention
of storage, management, processing, transferring, treatment, or
disposal, as hazardous waste or mixed radioactive and hazardous waste,
may be transported, manufactured, stored, or used without regard to any
provisions of this chapter.

--- END ---