BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.35.010 and 2002 c 310 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Assistive listening device or system" means an amplification
system that is specifically designed to improve the signal to noise
ratio for the listener, reduce interference from noise in the
background, and enhance hearing levels at a distance by picking up
sound from as close to source as possible and sending it directly to
the ear of the listener, excluding hearing instruments as defined in
this chapter.
(2) "Licensed audiologist" means a person who is licensed by the
department to engage in the practice of audiology and meets the
qualifications in this chapter.
(3) "Audiology" means the application of principles, methods, and
procedures related to hearing and the disorders of hearing and to
related language and speech disorders, whether of organic or nonorganic
origin, peripheral or central, that impede the normal process of human
communication including, but not limited to, disorders of auditory
sensitivity, acuity, function, processing, or vestibular function, the
application of aural habilitation, rehabilitation, and appropriate
devices including fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments, and
cerumen management to treat such disorders.
(4) "Board" means the board of hearing and speech.
(5) "Department" means the department of health.
(6) (("Direct supervision" means that the supervisor is physically
present and in the same room with the interim permit holder, observing
the nondiagnostic testing, fitting, and dispensing activities at all
times.
(7))) "Establishment" means any permanent site housing a person
engaging in the practice of fitting and dispensing of hearing
instruments by a hearing instrument fitter/dispenser or audiologist;
where the client can have personal contact and counsel during the
firm's business hours; where business is conducted; and the address of
which is given to the state for the purpose of bonding.
(((8))) (7) "Facility" means any permanent site housing a person
engaging in the practice of speech-language pathology and/or audiology,
excluding the sale, lease, or rental of hearing instruments.
(((9))) (8) "Fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments" means
the sale, lease, or rental or attempted sale, lease, or rental of
hearing instruments together with the selection and modification of
hearing instruments and the administration of nondiagnostic tests as
specified by RCW 18.35.110 and the use of procedures essential to the
performance of these functions; and includes recommending specific
hearing instrument systems, specific hearing instruments, or specific
hearing instrument characteristics, the taking of impressions for ear
molds for these purposes, the use of nondiagnostic procedures and
equipment to verify the appropriateness of the hearing instrument
fitting, and hearing instrument orientation. The fitting and
dispensing of hearing instruments as defined by this chapter may be
equally provided by a licensed hearing instrument fitter/dispenser or
licensed audiologist.
(((10))) (9) "Good standing" means a licensed hearing instrument
fitter/dispenser, licensed audiologist, or licensed speech-language
pathologist whose license has not been subject to sanctions pursuant to
chapter 18.130 RCW or sanctions by other states, territories, or the
District of Columbia in the last two years.
(((11))) (10) "Hearing instrument" means any wearable prosthetic
instrument or device designed for or represented as aiding, improving,
compensating for, or correcting defective human hearing and any parts,
attachments, or accessories of such an instrument or device, excluding
batteries and cords, ear molds, and assistive listening devices.
(((12))) (11) "Hearing instrument fitter/dispenser" means a person
who is licensed to engage in the practice of fitting and dispensing of
hearing instruments and meets the qualifications of this chapter.
(((13))) (12) "Interim permit holder" means a person who holds the
permit created under RCW 18.35.060 and who practices under the
((direct)) supervision of a licensed hearing instrument
fitter/dispenser, licensed speech-language pathologist, or licensed
audiologist.
(((14))) (13) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(((15))) (14) "Licensed speech-language pathologist" means a person
who is licensed by the department to engage in the practice of speech-language pathology and meets the qualifications of this chapter.
(((16))) (15) "Speech-language pathology" means the application of
principles, methods, and procedures related to the development and
disorders, whether of organic or nonorganic origin, that impede oral,
pharyngeal, or laryngeal sensorimotor competencies and the normal
process of human communication including, but not limited to, disorders
and related disorders of speech, articulation, fluency, voice, verbal
and written language, auditory comprehension, cognition/communication,
and the application of augmentative communication treatment and devices
for treatment of such disorders.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.35.020 and 2002 c 310 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person shall engage in the fitting and dispensing of hearing
instruments or imply or represent that he or she is engaged in the
fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments unless he or she is a
licensed hearing instrument fitter/dispenser or a licensed audiologist
or holds an interim permit issued by the department as provided in this
chapter and is an owner or employee of an establishment that is bonded
as provided by RCW 18.35.240. The owner or manager of an establishment
that dispenses hearing instruments is responsible under this chapter
for all transactions made in the establishment name or conducted on its
premises by agents or persons employed by the establishment engaged in
fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments. Every establishment
that fits and dispenses shall have in its employ at least one licensed
hearing instrument fitter/dispenser or licensed audiologist at all
times, and shall annually submit proof that all testing equipment at
that establishment that is required by the board to be calibrated has
been properly calibrated.
(2) Effective January 1, 2003, no person shall engage in the
practice of audiology or imply or represent that he or she is engaged
in the practice of audiology unless he or she is a licensed audiologist
or holds an audiology interim permit issued by the department as
provided in this chapter. Audiologists who are certified as
educational staff associates by the state board of education are
excluded unless they elect to become licensed under this chapter.
However, a person certified by the state board of education as an
educational staff associate who practices outside the school setting
must be a licensed audiologist.
(3) Effective January 1, 2003, no person shall engage in the
practice of speech-language pathology or imply or represent that he or
she is engaged in the practice of speech-language pathology unless he
or she is a licensed speech-language pathologist or holds a speech-language pathology interim permit issued by the department as provided
in this chapter. Speech-language pathologists who are certified as
educational staff associates by the state board of education are
excluded unless they elect to become licensed under this chapter.
However, a person certified by the state board of education as an
educational staff associate who practices outside the school setting
must be a licensed speech-language pathologist.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.35.060 and 2002 c 310 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department, upon approval by the board, shall issue an interim
permit authorizing an applicant for speech-language pathologist
licensure or audiologist licensure who, except for the postgraduate
professional experience and the examination requirements, meets the
academic and practicum requirements of RCW 18.35.040(2) to practice
under ((direct)) supervision. The interim permit is valid for a period
of one year from date of issuance. The board shall determine
conditions for the interim permit.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.35.195 and 2002 c 310 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter shall not apply to military or federal government
employees.
(2) This chapter does not prohibit or regulate:
(a) Fitting or dispensing by students enrolled in a board-approved
program who are directly supervised by a licensed hearing instrument
fitter/dispenser, a licensed audiologist under the provisions of this
chapter, or an instructor at a two-year hearing instrument
fitter/dispenser degree program that is approved by the board;
(b) Hearing instrument fitter/dispensers, speech-language
pathologists, or audiologists of other states, territories, or
countries, or the District of Columbia while appearing as clinicians of
bona fide educational seminars sponsored by speech-language pathology,
audiology, hearing instrument fitter/dispenser, medical, or other
healing art professional associations so long as such activities do not
go beyond the scope of practice defined by this chapter; and
(c) The practice of audiology or speech-language pathology by
persons certified by the state board of education as educational staff
associates, except for those persons electing to be licensed under this
chapter. However, a person certified by the state board of education
as an educational staff associate who practices outside the school
setting must be a licensed audiologist or licensed speech-language
pathologist.

--- END ---