BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that students
require a strong foundation of academic knowledge and skills to succeed
in college-level, credit-bearing courses. The intent of the current
educational reform is to provide all students of the state with those
foundational skills essential for success beyond high school.
Attainment of the certificate of academic achievement is evidence that
students have achieved these foundational, essential skills and, in
combination with a rigorous course of study throughout their high
school experience, should form that basis of knowledge and skills to
best ensure they are prepared for college-level coursework.
(2) The legislature also recognizes that students need a variety of
educational environments and options to perform to their potential.
The running start program provides just such an environment for a
segment of our high school students. The legislature intends to offer
options and opportunity to students to pursue postsecondary education.
In preparing all students for success beyond high school, our state's
schools have been asked to perform at levels previously not expected of
them. Particularly, these higher expectations of schools and students
were implemented after the running start program was created.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Within current budgets, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, with the assistance of the
state board for community and technical colleges and the higher
education coordinating board, shall conduct a study of public school
student performance on the high school Washington assessment of student
learning and subsequent performance at institutions of higher education
for students participating in the running start program. The study
shall include:
(a) Correlations between public school students' scores on the high
school Washington assessment of student learning and placement tests
used at the state community and technical colleges and the
baccalaureate institutions;
(b) Correlations between public school students' scores on the high
school Washington assessment of student learning, placement tests used
at the state community and technical colleges and the baccalaureate
institutions, and student performance in courses taken under the
running start program;
(c) Completion rates of courses taken by running start students at
institutions of higher education when students have met the proficiency
standard on the high school Washington assessment of student learning;
(d) Causes for public school students not completing courses under
the running start program; and
(e) The current running start funding formulas and any
recommendations for changes to the distribution of funds between school
districts and institutions of higher education.
(2) The study shall be completed by January 15, 2007, and the
results reported to the governor, the state board of education, and the
fiscal and education committees of the senate and the house of
representatives.

--- END ---