BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.44.170 and 2004 c 79 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person moving a mobile home as defined in RCW 46.04.302 or
a park model trailer as defined in RCW 46.04.622 upon public highways
of the state must obtain: (a) A special permit from the department of
transportation and local authorities pursuant to RCW 46.44.090 and
46.44.093 and shall pay the proper fee as prescribed by RCW 46.44.0941
and 46.44.096; and (b) for mobile homes constructed before June 15,
1976, and already situated in the state, a certification from the
department of labor and industries that the mobile home was inspected
for fire safety, or an affidavit in the form prescribed by the
department of community, trade, and economic development signed by the
owner stating that the mobile home is being moved by the owner for his
or her continued occupation or use.
(2) A special permit issued as provided in subsection (1) of this
section for the movement of any mobile home or a park model trailer
that is assessed for purposes of property taxes shall not be valid
until the county treasurer of the county in which the mobile home or
park model trailer is located shall endorse or attach his or her
certificate that all property taxes which are a lien or which are
delinquent, or both, upon the mobile home or park model trailer being
moved have been satisfied. Further, any mobile home or park model
trailer required to have a special movement permit under this section
shall display an easily recognizable decal. However, endorsement or
certification by the county treasurer and the display of the decal is
not required:
(a) When a mobile home or park model trailer is to enter the state
or is being moved from a manufacturer or distributor to a retail sales
outlet or directly to the purchaser's designated location or between
retail and sales outlets;
(b) When a signed affidavit of destruction is filed with the county
assessor and the mobile home or park model trailer is being moved to a
disposal site by a landlord as defined in RCW 59.20.030 after (i) the
mobile home or park model trailer has been abandoned as defined in RCW
59.20.030; or (ii) a final judgment for restitution of the premises
under RCW 59.18.410 has been executed in favor of the landlord with
regard to the mobile home or park model trailer. The mobile home or
park model trailer will be removed from the tax rolls and, upon
notification by the assessor, any outstanding taxes on the destroyed
mobile home or park model trailer will be removed by the county
treasurer; or
(c) When a signed affidavit of destruction is filed with the county
assessor by any mobile home or park model trailer owner or any property
owner with an abandoned mobile home or park model trailer, the same
shall be removed from the tax rolls and upon notification by the
assessor, any outstanding taxes on the destroyed mobile home or park
model trailer shall be removed by the county treasurer.
(3) If the landlord of a mobile home park takes ownership of a
mobile home or park model trailer with the intent to resell or rent the
same under RCW 59.20.030 after (a) the mobile home or park model
trailer has been abandoned as defined in RCW 59.20.030; or (b) a final
judgment for restitution of the premises under RCW 59.18.410 has been
executed in favor of the landlord with regard to the mobile home or
park model trailer, the outstanding taxes become the responsibility of
the landlord.
(4) It is the responsibility of the owner of the mobile home or
park model trailer subject to property taxes or the agent to obtain the
endorsement and decal from the county treasurer before a mobile home or
park model trailer is moved.
(5) This section does not prohibit the issuance of vehicle license
plates for a mobile home or park model trailer subject to property
taxes, but plates shall not be issued unless the mobile home or park
model trailer subject to property taxes for which plates are sought has
been listed for property tax purposes in the county in which it is
principally located and the appropriate fee for the license has been
paid.
(6) The department of transportation, the department of labor and
industries, and local authorities are authorized to adopt reasonable
rules for implementing the provisions of this section. The department
of transportation shall adopt rules specifying the design, reflective
characteristics, annual coloration, and for the uniform implementation
of the decal required by this section. By January 1, 2006, the
department of labor and industries shall also adopt procedures for
notifying destination local jurisdictions concerning the arrival of
mobile homes that failed safety inspections.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.22.340 and 2003 c 53 s 228 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall adopt specific rules for conversion vending
units and medical units. The rules for conversion vending units and
medical units shall be established to protect the occupants from fire;
to address other life safety issues; and to ensure that the design and
construction are capable of supporting any concentrated load of five
hundred pounds or more. Also, the director shall adopt specific rules
concerning safety standards as necessary to implement subsection (3) of
this section by January 1, 2006.
(2) The director of labor and industries shall adopt rules
governing safety of body and frame design, and the installation of
plumbing, heating, and electrical equipment in mobile homes, commercial
coaches, recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers: PROVIDED, That
the director shall not prescribe or enforce rules governing the body
and frame design of recreational vehicles and park trailers until after
the American National Standards Institute shall have published
standards and specifications upon this subject. The rules shall be
reasonably consistent with recognized and accepted principles of safety
for body and frame design and plumbing, heating, and electrical
installations, in order to protect the health and safety of the people
of this state from dangers inherent in the use of substandard and
unsafe body and frame design, construction, plumbing, heating,
electrical, and other equipment and shall correlate with and, so far as
practicable, conform to the then current standards and specifications
of the American National Standards Institute standards A119.1 for
mobile homes and commercial coaches, A119.2 for recreational vehicles,
and A119.5 for park trailers.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 43.22.436, it shall be unlawful for
any person to lease, sell or offer for sale, within this state, any
mobile homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending units, medical
units, recreational vehicles, and/or park trailers manufactured after
January 1, 1968, containing plumbing, heating, electrical, or other
equipment, and after July 1, 1970, body and frame design or
construction, unless such equipment, design, or construction meets the
requirements of the rules provided for in this section.
(4) Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Each day upon which a violation occurs shall constitute a separate
violation.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.22.432 and 2002 c 268 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may adopt all standards and regulations adopted
by the secretary under the national manufactured home construction and
safety standards act of 1974 (800 Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C. Secs. 5401-5426)
for manufactured home construction and safety standards. If any
deletions or amendments to the federal standards or regulations are
thereafter made and notice thereof is given to the department, the
standards or regulations shall be considered automatically adopted by
the state under this chapter after the expiration of thirty days from
publication in the federal register of a final order describing the
deletions or amendments unless within that thirty day period the
department objects to the deletion or amendment. In case of objection,
the department shall proceed under the rule making procedure of chapter
34.05 RCW.
(2) The department shall adopt rules with respect to manufactured
homes that require the prior written approval of the department before
changes or alterations may be made to a manufactured home that differ
from the construction standards provided for in this section.
(3) For purposes of implementing this section, by January 1, 2006,
the department shall adopt requirements for manufactured homes built
prior to 1976.
(4) Except as provided in RCW 43.22.436, it is unlawful for any
person to lease, sell, or offer for sale, within this state, a
manufactured home unless the home meets the requirements of the rules
provided for in this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.12.290 and 1993 c 154 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of chapter 46.12 RCW insofar as they are not
inconsistent with the provisions of chapter 231, Laws of 1971 ex. sess.
or chapter 65.20 RCW apply to mobile or manufactured homes: PROVIDED,
That RCW 46.12.080 and 46.12.250 through 46.12.270 shall not apply to
mobile or manufactured homes.
(2) In order to transfer ownership of a mobile home, all registered
owners of record must sign the title certificate releasing their
ownership. If the mobile home was manufactured prior to June 15, 1976,
the registered owner must sign an affidavit in the form prescribed by
the department of licensing that notice was provided to the purchaser
of the mobile home that failure of the mobile home to meet federal
housing and urban development standards or failure of the mobile home
to meet a fire and safety inspection by the department of labor and
industries may result in denial by a local jurisdiction of a permit to
site the mobile home.
(3) The director of licensing shall have the power to adopt such
rules as necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter relating
to mobile homes.

--- END ---