BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The production of potatoes within this
state is in the public interest. It is vital to the continued economic
well-being of the citizens of this state and their general welfare that
its potato industry be encouraged by enabling producers of potatoes to
help themselves in establishing orderly, fair, sound, efficient, and
unhampered marketing, trade, grading, and standardization of the
potatoes they produce.
(2) It is in the public interest that support for the potato
industry be clearly expressed, that adequate protection be given to the
industry, and that the industry's collective activities and operations
include:
(a) Enhancing the reputation and image of Washington state's
potatoes and potato producers;
(b) Working to eliminate or limit impediments affecting the sale
and use of Washington state's potatoes in local, domestic, and foreign
markets;
(c) Protecting the public by educating the public in reference to
the quality, care, and methods used in the production of Washington
state's potatoes;
(d) Increasing the public knowledge of nutritional value, health-giving qualities, and dietetic value of Washington state's potatoes and
products; and
(e) Supporting and engaging in programs or activities that benefit
the planting, production, harvesting, handling, processing,
transportation, trade, and use of potatoes produced in Washington
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affected area" or "area of production" are synonymous and mean
the state of Washington.
(2) "Affected handler" means any handler of potatoes who is subject
to this chapter.
(3) "Affected producer" means any producer who is subject to this
chapter.
(4) "Assessment" means the monetary amount established in this
chapter that is to be paid by each affected producer to the commission
in accordance with the schedule established in this chapter.
(5) "Commercial quantities" means and includes five hundredweight
or more.
(6) "Commission" means the potato commission established in this
chapter.
(7) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state
of Washington.
(8) "Director" means the director of agriculture of the state of
Washington or any qualified person or persons designated by the
director of agriculture to act for him or her concerning some matter
under this chapter.
(9) "District" means the geographical divisions of the area of
potato production established under this chapter.
(10) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning July 1st
of any year.
(11) "Handler" means any person who acts, either as principal,
agent, or otherwise, in the processing, packing, shipping, selling, or
distributing of potatoes that are not produced by the handler.
"Handler" does not include a common carrier used to transport an
agricultural commodity. "To handle" means to act as a handler.
(12) "Hosting" includes providing meals, refreshments, lodging,
transportation, gifts of nominal value, reasonable and customary
entertainment, and normal incidental expenses at meetings or
gatherings.
(13) "Hundredweight" or "affected unit" are synonymous and mean
each one hundred pound unit or any combination of packages making a one
hundred pound unit of potatoes.
(14) "Mail" or "send," for purposes of any notice relating to rule
making, referenda, or elections, means regular mail or electronic
distribution, as provided in RCW 34.05.260 for rule making. For the
purposes of this definition, "electronic distribution" or
"electronically" means distribution by electronic mail or facsimile
mail.
(15) "Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation, limited
liability company, trust, association, partnership, society, or any
other organization of individuals or any unit or agency of local or
state government.
(16) "Potatoes" means and includes all kinds and varieties of Irish
potatoes grown in the state of Washington and marketed, sold, or
intended for use for human consumption.
(17) "Producer" means any person who is engaged in the production
for market of potatoes in commercial quantities and who has a
proprietary interest in the potatoes grown in the state of Washington.
For purposes of this chapter, "producer" includes a landowner,
landlord, tenant, or other person who participates in the growing or
producing of potatoes. "To produce" means to act as a producer.
(18) "Referendum" means a vote by the affected parties or affected
producers that is conducted by secret ballot.
(19) "Sale" means a transaction wherein the property in or to
potatoes is transferred from the producer to a purchaser for
consideration. "Sale" includes an agreement to acquire such property
for a consideration.
(20) "Trade relations hosting" means the hosting of individuals and
groups of individuals at meetings, meals, and gatherings for the
purpose of cultivating trade relations for Washington state potatoes
and potato products.
(21) "Unfair trade practice" means any practice that is unlawful or
prohibited under the laws of the state of Washington including but not
limited to Titles 15, 16, and 69 RCW and chapters 9.16, 19.77, 19.80,
19.84, and 19.83 RCW, or any practice, whether concerning interstate or
intrastate commerce that is unlawful under the federal trade commission
act of 1914, as amended (38 Stat. 719; 15 U.S.C. Sec. 41 et seq.) or
the violation of or failure accurately to label as to grades and
standards in accordance with any lawfully established grades or
standards or labels.
(22) "Vacancy" means that a commission member leaves or is removed
from a position on the commission before the end of a term, or a
nomination process for the beginning of a term concludes with no
candidates for a position.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The potato commission is hereby
established to administer this chapter. Commission members must be
citizens and residents of Washington and at least eighteen years of
age. The commission shall be composed of fifteen members, nine of whom
shall be producers elected from districts as provided in subsections
(2) and (3) of this section, five who are appointed by the elected
producer members as provided in subsection (4) of this section, and one
member appointed by the director from the department to represent the
director as a voting member.
(2) For the purpose of nomination and selection of producer members
of the commission, the affected area of the state of Washington shall
be divided into three representative districts as provided in this
subsection.
(a) District 1 is the counties of Douglas, Chelan, Okanogan, Grant,
Adams, Lincoln, Ferry, Stevens, Pend Oreille, Spokane, and Whitman.
(b) District 2 is the counties of Kittitas, Yakima, Klickitat,
Benton, Franklin, Walla Walla, Columbia, Garfield, and Asotin.
(c) District 3 is the counties of Skagit, Whatcom, and all other
counties not named in (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(3) Producer members shall be elected from the districts as
follows:
(a) Positions 1, 2, 3, and 4 shall be elected from district 1;
(b) Positions 5, 6, 7, and 8 shall be elected from district 2; and
(c) Position 9 shall be elected from district 3.
(4)(a) Positions 10, 11, 12, 13, and 14 shall be appointed by the
elected producers as provided in subsections (1) and (5)(b) of this
section.
(b) Position 15 shall be appointed by the director as provided in
subsection (1) of this section.
(5)(a) Producer members of the commission shall be producers of
potatoes in the district in and for which they are nominated and
elected. The producer members shall be and have been actively engaged
in producing the potatoes in this state for a period of at least three
years, and shall derive a substantial proportion of their incomes from
the sale of potatoes. A producer member of a commission must have paid
an assessment on potatoes adopted by the commission or its predecessor
commission in each of the preceding three calendar years. The
qualifications of producer members of the commission must continue
during their term of office.
(b) Members appointed to positions 10, 11, 12, 13, and 14 by the
elected producers shall be either Washington potato producers,
handlers, or others active in matters directly relating to Washington
state potatoes and have a demonstrated record of service in the potato
industry in Washington state. The appointed members of the commission
shall be elected by a majority of the elected commissioners.
(6) The term of office of the commission members is three years
from the date of their election or appointment and until their
successors are elected and qualified.
(7) Nomination and election of commission members is as provided
for in this subsection (7).
(a) Not earlier than March 18th and not later than April 2nd of
each year, the director shall give notice by mail to all producers in
a district where a vacancy will occur, of such vacancy or such
vacancies and call for nominations. Nominating petitions shall be
signed by five persons qualified to vote for candidates. The notice
shall state the final date for filing petitions, which shall be not
earlier than April 7th and not later than April 12th of each year.
(b) The director shall mail ballots to all affected producers in
the district in which the vacancy will occur not earlier than April
17th and not later than May 2nd of each year. Ballots shall be
postmarked not later than June 1st of that year. The mailed ballot
shall be conducted in a manner so that it shall be a secret ballot in
accordance with rules adopted by the director. An affected producer is
entitled to one vote.
(8) The members of the commission not elected by the producers
shall be elected by a majority of the commission within ninety days
before the expiration of the member's term.
(9)(a) To fill a vacancy caused by the failure to qualify of a
person elected by the producers as a member of the commission, or in
the event of the death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of
any elected member, the director shall call for nominations and give
notice by mail to all producers in the district where the vacancy
occurred. A valid nominating petition must be signed by at least five
persons qualified to vote for the nominated candidate and must be
returned to the director. The notice shall state the final date for
filing a nomination petition. If more than one valid nomination is
submitted, the director shall conduct an election and mail ballots to
all producers in the district where the vacancy occurred.
(b) To fill vacancies caused by reasons other than the expiration
of an appointed term, the new commission members shall be elected by
the commission at its first or second meeting after the occurrence of
the vacancy.
(c) In the event that a nomination process for the beginning of a
term of an elected member concludes with no candidate, a new member
shall be appointed by the commission. The appointment shall be made at
the commission's first or second meeting after the expiration of the
previous term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The commission may:
(1) Administer, enforce, and implement this chapter;
(2) Elect a chair and such other officers as the commission may
deem advisable and select subcommittees of commission members;
(3) Employ and discharge at its discretion an executive director,
additional personnel, attorneys, consultants, research agencies, and
other persons and firms that it may deem appropriate, and compensate
its employees;
(4) Acquire personal property and lease office space and other
necessary real property and transfer and convey the same;
(5) Institute and maintain in its own name any and all legal
actions, including actions by injunction, mandatory injunction, or
civil recovery, or proceedings before administrative tribunals or other
governmental authorities necessary to implement this chapter;
(6) Keep accurate records of all its receipts and disbursements,
which records shall be open to inspection, and make annual reports
therefrom to the state auditor;
(7) Borrow money and incur indebtedness;
(8) Make necessary disbursements for routine operating expenses;
(9) Collect the assessments of producers as provided in this
chapter and expend the same in accordance with and to effectuate the
purposes of this chapter;
(10) To prepare a budget or budgets covering anticipated income and
expenses to be incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter
during each fiscal year;
(11) Accept and receive gifts and grants from private persons or
private and public agencies and expend the same to effectuate the
purposes of this chapter;
(12) Work cooperatively with other local, state, and federal
agencies; universities; and national organizations for the purposes of
this chapter;
(13) Enter into contracts or interagency agreements with any
private or public agency, whether federal, state, or local, to carry
out the purposes of this chapter; however, personal service contracts
must comply with chapter 39.29 RCW;
(14) Enter into contracts or agreements for research and education
in the production, irrigation, processing, transportation, use,
distribution, and trade barriers impacting potatoes and potato
products;
(15) Retain in emergent situations the services of private legal
counsel to conduct legal actions on behalf of the commission;
(16) Participate in international, federal, state, and local
hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production,
irrigation, manufacture, regulation, transportation, trade,
distribution, sale, or use of potatoes as requested by any elected
official or officer or employee of any agency and as authorized under
RCW 42.17.190, including the reporting of those activities to the
public disclosure commission;
(17) Assist and cooperate with the department or any other local,
state, or federal government agency in the investigation and control of
exotic pests and diseases that could damage or affect trade and export
of potatoes;
(18) Acquire or own intellectual property rights, licenses, or
patents and collect royalties resulting from commission-funded research
related to potatoes;
(19) Engage in appropriate fund-raising activities for the purpose
of supporting activities of the commission authorized by this chapter;
(20) Establish a foundation using commission funds as grant money
for the purposes established in this chapter;
(21) Maintain a list of the names and addresses of affected
producers that may be compiled from information used to collect
assessments under this chapter and data on the value of each producer's
production under this chapter. This list may be compiled from
information used to collect producer assessments for a three-year
period;
(22) Maintain a list of the names and addresses of persons who
handle potatoes within the affected area and data on the amount and
value of the potatoes handled by each person under this chapter for a
minimum three-year period;
(23) Check records of producers or handlers of potatoes during
normal business hours to determine whether the appropriate assessment
has been paid; and
(24) Exercise such other powers and perform such other duties as
are necessary and proper to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The commission shall by resolution
establish a headquarters, which shall continue as the headquarters
until changed by the commission, where the books, records, and minutes
of the commission meetings shall be kept.
(2) Any action taken by the commission requires the majority vote
of the members present, and a quorum must be present.
(3) A quorum of the commission consists of at least nine members.
(4)(a) Members of the commission shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.230. Members and employees of the commission shall
receive travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060
for each day spent in actual attendance at or traveling to and from
meetings of the commission or on special assignments for the
commission.
(b) Members and employees may be reimbursed for actual travel
expenses incurred in carrying out this chapter as provided by rules
adopted by the commission. In developing these rules, the commission
shall review the special allowances for foreign travel and other travel
involving higher than usual costs for subsistence and lodging adopted
by the office of financial management as provided in RCW 43.03.050(1).
(5) In addition to notice of meetings of the commission as required
by the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, notice of the
meetings shall also be published in the commission newsletter and sent
to appropriate general and agricultural media outlets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Obligations incurred by the commission and
any other liabilities or claims against the commission may be enforced
only against the assets of the commission in the same manner as if it
were a corporation. No liability for the debts or actions of the
commission exist against either the state of Washington or any
subdivision or instrumentality thereof or the assets thereof or against
any member officer, employee, or agent of the commission in his or her
individual capacity. The members of the commission, including
employees thereof, may not be held responsible individually in any way
whatsoever to any person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other
acts, either of commission or omission, as principal agent, person, or
employee, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime.
No such person or employee may be held responsible individually for any
act or omission of any other member of the commission. Liability of
the members of the commission is several and not joint and no member is
liable for the default of any other member.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The purpose of this chapter is to promote
the general welfare of the state and maintain and protect existing
markets, increase production efficiency, ensure a fair regulatory
environment, and increase use and consumption of potatoes produced in
Washington. The commission shall conduct the programs in this section
in accordance with this chapter.
(1) The commission may investigate and take necessary action to
prevent or eliminate unfair trade and regulatory barriers and practices
and correct, where possible, trade and regulatory barriers and
practices that hinder the sale, production, transport, and export of
Washington-produced potatoes or potato products. If the commission
finds as a result of the investigation that trade, regulatory, or
transportation barriers are restricting the free flow of potatoes
produced in this state, the commission may institute appropriate action
before any agency or body deemed necessary to correct the situation.
Information acquired in an investigation is confidential and may be
released only to the extent necessary to effectuate the purposes of
this chapter, including but not limited to information regarding:
(a) The prevention, modification, or elimination of trade and
regulatory barriers that restrict or inhibit the production, transport,
consumption, export, or sale of potatoes produced in this state;
(b) Presentation of technical information or facts to and
negotiations with state, federal, or foreign governmental agencies on
matters that affect the production, irrigation, transport, use,
consumption, export, or sale of potatoes grown in this state, including
cooperation with any agency or group in efforts to increase consumption
or use of potatoes, and such other activities and programs that are
consistent with the objectives of this chapter; and
(c) Investigating transportation rates and service costs.
(2)(a) The commission, subject to the provisions of this chapter,
may carry on or cause to be carried on any necessary and proper
production, irrigation, processing, transportation, export, handling,
or use of research or survey studies relating to potatoes and may
expend moneys for those purposes.
(b) The commission may engage in research and survey studies
including, but not limited to:
(i) Production problems, such as those associated with soil, seed,
and crop protection tools;
(ii) Developing and testing new potato cultivars with improved
disease-resistance, processing, nutritional, or horticultural
characteristics;
(iii) Improving techniques and methods of harvesting potatoes;
(iv) Developing and improving methods of processing potatoes and
potato by-products for the purpose of increasing and expanding their
use for food and industrial purposes;
(v) Improving packing and handling techniques that promote more
efficient operation in the transport, trade, and distribution of
potatoes;
(vi) Determining any special nutritive, nutraceutical, or
pharmaceutical qualities of potatoes produced in Washington; and
(vii) Conducting surveys and other research regarding production
practices, resource requirements and availability, and any other issues
or matters that may impact the continued production of potatoes in
Washington.
(c) The commission may, in addition to the activities in (b) of
this subsection, engage in any other proper and necessary research and
survey programs and activities consistent with and subject to the
limitations of this chapter. The research and survey studies may
include the collection of data and information relating to potatoes;
the analysis of the data and information; the dissemination of the
data, information, and analysis; and other investigation that falls
within the scope of the production, irrigation, use, processing,
transportation, or handling of potatoes.
(d) The commission, subject to this chapter, may coordinate the
state's potato crop protection chemical registrations and integrated
pest management implementation.
(3)(a) The commission may adopt rules, in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW, to define, establish, and provide labeling requirements for
improving standards and grades for potatoes and may expend moneys for
such purposes.
(b) The commission shall give reasonable written notice to all
producers, handlers, and persons directly affected by the labeling
requirements issued under this section, in accordance with rule-making
proceedings conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(c) The commission may cooperate with state and federal agencies or
departments responsible for revising and modernizing grades and
standards and labeling of potatoes.
(d) This section does not authorize the commission to set minimum
grades, sizes, or maturity of potatoes that a producer may sell, offer
for sale, or ship.
(4) The commission may conduct programs for the purpose of
providing factual and accurate information and education to the public
including:
(a) The economic, environmental, and nutritional value and benefits
of potatoes and the Washington potato industry;
(b) The quality, care, and methods used in the production of
Washington potatoes;
(c) The handling, preparation, and use of Washington potatoes and
potato products; and
(d) The effects of trade, transportation, and regulatory barriers
on the Washington potato industry.
(5) The commission may conduct programs for the purpose of
providing information and education to the Washington potato industry
including:
(a) Public opinion or awareness research information for producers
of potatoes;
(b) Industry-related education and training; and
(c) Information and services enabling producers to meet resource
conservation objectives and keep current with issues impacting their
business.
(6) The commission may, subject to this chapter, provide
information and communicate on matters pertaining to the production,
irrigation, processing, transportation, trade, or uses of potatoes
produced in Washington state, as requested by any elected official or
officer or employee of any agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) An assessment shall be levied and
collected by the commission of four cents per hundredweight upon all
potatoes sold, processed, delivered for sale or processing by a
producer, or stored or delivered for storage when storage or delivery
for storage is outside the state. The assessment may be decreased or
increased at any time subject to a referendum approved by affected
potato producers in accordance with this chapter. The assessment shall
be paid by the producer. No assessment may be collected on:
(a) Potatoes grown and sold for seed under an established seed
certification program;
(b) Potatoes sold for livestock feed, regardless of grade;
(c) Potatoes sold for nonfood products, such as industrial starch;
(d) Potatoes of a producer's own production used by the producer on
the producer's own premises for seed, feed, or personal consumption;
(e) Potatoes donated or shipped for relief or charitable purposes;
or
(f) Potatoes sold by a producer whose production is less than five
hundred pounds per year.
(2)(a) All assessments made and levied under this chapter apply to
the respective producer who is primarily liable therefor.
(i) Handlers receiving potatoes from the producer, including, but
not limited to, warehousemen, shippers, and processors that collect
assessments from producers whose production they handle, shall pay
assessments collected to the commission on or before the twentieth day
of the succeeding month for the previous month's collections. On a
monthly basis, each handler shall file with the commission a return
under oath on forms to be furnished by the commission, stating the
quantity of potatoes handled, processed, delivered, or shipped during
the period prescribed by the commission.
(ii) Any person, producer, or handler subject to the payment of
assessments shall give adequate assurance or security concerning the
payments to the commission.
(b) On or before the beginning of each fiscal year, the commission
shall give reasonable notice to all producers, handlers, and other
affected persons of the method or methods of collection to be used for
that fiscal year on field run or ungraded potatoes.
(c) No affected units of potatoes may be transported, carried,
shipped, sold, stored, or otherwise handled or disposed of until every
due and payable assessment under this chapter has been paid and the
receipt issued or stamp canceled. No liability under this chapter
attaches to common carriers in the regular course of their business.
When any potatoes for which an exemption as provided in subsection (1)
of this section is claimed are shipped either by railroad or truck, the
reasons for the exemption shall be plainly noted on the bill of lading,
shipping document, container, or invoice.
(d) Any producer or handler who fails to comply with this
subsection is guilty of violating this chapter and is subject to the
penalty, collection, and liability provisions of this chapter.
(3)(a) Moneys collected by the commission under this chapter as
assessments shall be used by the commission only for the purposes of
paying for the costs or expenses arising in connection with carrying
out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.
(b) At the end of each fiscal year the commission shall credit each
producer with any amount paid by the producer in excess of three
percent of the total market value of all potatoes sold, processed, or
delivered for sale or processing during that period. Refunds may be
made only upon satisfactory proof given by the producer, which may
include bills of lading, bills of sale, or receipts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Assessments shall be levied upon potatoes
sold on a field run or ungraded basis as provided in this section.
(1) If payment to the grower for the potatoes is based upon the
gross weight of potatoes sold and not upon the yield of any particular
grade of potatoes as determined by any type of sorting or inspection,
then the assessment is made on ninety percent of the gross
hundredweight of potatoes so sold.
(2) If payment to the grower for the potatoes is based upon the net
weight of potatoes intended for human consumption derived from the
potatoes so sold as determined by any type of sorting or inspection,
then the assessment is made on the total net weight of potatoes
intended for human consumption.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This section establishes the procedure for
reporting and paying assessments levied under this chapter.
Assessments shall be paid in accordance with one or more of the
following methods as prescribed by the commission, in its discretion,
for each affected producer or handler:
(1) By means of collection from producers by handlers, including
warehousemen, packers, and processors receiving potatoes from
producers, at the time the potatoes are first handled, and payment of
assessments by those handlers to the commission:
(a) The commission shall bill each handler at such intervals, at
least monthly, as the commission may from time to time determine, for
the assessments due upon potatoes handled in the preceding period for
which billing has not previously been made, and upon which assessments
have not been paid, computed on the basis of the quantity of potatoes
so handled as recorded on potato shipping pertaining to each handler
prepared by the department on behalf of the commission, and filed with
the commission, or with respect to handlers who are packers or
processors, on the basis of the quantity of potatoes so handled as
recorded on potato shipping records pertaining to such packer or
processor prepared by such processor and filed with the commission;
(b) As used in (a) of this subsection, "handler" is the person,
firm, or corporation designated as shipper on the potato shipping
record form;
(c) In the event potatoes subject to assessment are handled by
processors or other handlers under circumstances in which no potato
shipping record is filed with the commission, with respect to the
potatoes so handled the handler shall, at the time of submitting the
report required by (d) of this subsection, pay in full the assessment
on the potatoes so reported;
(d) Each handler shall file a monthly report, under oath, on forms
provided by the commission, showing the name and address of the handler
making the report, the quantity of potatoes handled during the
preceding calendar month, the name, address, handler's lot number, and
quantity of potatoes handled, for each respective producer, and the
representative district in which the potatoes were grown. The report
shall be filed with the commission not later than the twentieth day of
the month following that in which the potatoes were handled; or
(2) By means of payment in cash by the producer or handler, as
determined by the commission in each respective instance, before the
time the potatoes are shipped in either interstate or intrastate
commerce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Any due and payable assessment levied under
this chapter, and every sum due in a specified amount under this
chapter constitutes a personal debt of every person so assessed or who
otherwise owes the same, and the amount is due and payable to the
commission when payment is called for by the commission. In the event
that any assessment is not paid within ninety days after the date of
the billing by the commission, or within ninety days after the due date
of the report required by this chapter, a sum equal to ten percent of
the unpaid assessment or unpaid portion thereof shall be added to the
original amount and is due and owing to the commission. In the event
of failure of a person or persons to pay any such due and payable
assessment or other sum, the commission may bring a civil action
against the person or persons in a state court of competent
jurisdiction for the collection thereof, together with the additional
ten percent as provided in this section, and the action shall be tried
and judgment rendered as in any other cause of action for debt due and
payable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1)(a) Any handler handling potatoes for
fresh market who has not established a record of prompt payment of
assessments due on fresh market potatoes in accordance with this
chapter must prepay the assessments due the commission.
(b) The amount of prepayment shall be determined on the estimated
basis of the potatoes the handler will handle during the first thirty
days of the potato shipping season, or if the handler has shipped in
the immediately prior potato shipping season, the prepayment shall be
based on the highest thirty-day assessment due the commission during
that shipping season. Prepayment shall not exceed twenty-five percent
of the total estimated annual assessment payable by the handler.
(2) Any handler who has established a record of prompt payment
during the entire previous potato shipping season and continues to
maintain a record of prompt payment is not subject to the prepayment
requirements in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The commission shall notify the department
in writing of any handler who has not established a record of prompt
payment as set forth in this chapter, and that handler is subject to
this section. No affected units of potatoes shall be transported,
carried, shipped, sold, stored or otherwise handled or disposed of
until every due and payable assessment herein provided for has been
paid and the receipt issued, but no liability hereunder shall attach to
common carriers in the regular course of their business. When any
potatoes for which exemption as provided in this chapter is claimed are
shipped either by railroad or truck, there shall be plainly noted on
the bill of lading, shipping document, container or invoice, the
reasons for such exemptions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) Commission expenditures for
agricultural development or trade promotion and promotional hosting
shall be pursuant to specific budget items as approved by the
commission at annual public hearings on the commission budget.
(2) Individual commissioners and commission staff shall make
agricultural development or trade promotion and promotional hosting
expenditures, or seek reimbursements for those expenditures, only in
those instances where the expenditures have been approved by the
commission.
(3) All payments and reimbursements shall be as identified and
supported by vouchers to which receipts are attached. Voucher forms
will be supplied by the commission, and require the following
information:
(a) Name and position of each person hosted, however in the case of
a group of twenty-five or more persons, then only the name of the group
hosting shall be required;
(b) General purpose of the hosting;
(c) Date of hosting;
(d) To whom payment was or will be made; and
(e) Signature of person seeking payment or reimbursement;
(4) The chair of the commission, the executive director of the
commission, or assistant executive director of the commission may
approve direct payment or reimbursements submitted in accordance with
this section.
(5) The following persons may be hosted when it is reasonably
believed such hosting will promote trade for the Washington state
potato industry, as long as the hosting does not violate federal or
state conflict of interest laws:
(a) Individuals from private business and accompanying interpreter
or interpreters;
(b) Foreign government officials and accompanying interpreter or
interpreters;
(c) Federal, state, and local officials, however lodging, meals,
and transportation may not be provided when those officials may obtain
reimbursement for these expenses from their government employer;
(d) The general public, at meetings and gatherings open to the
general public;
(e) Commissioners and employees of the commission when their
attendance at meetings, meals, and gatherings at which the persons
described in (a) through (d) of this subsection are being hosted will
promote trade for the Washington state potato industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) It is a misdemeanor for:
(a) Any person willfully to violate any provision of this chapter;
(b) Any person willfully to render or furnish a false or fraudulent
report, statement of record required by the commission under this
chapter, or any rule of the commission or rule of the department
adopted under this chapter, or willfully to fail or refuse to furnish
or render any such report, statement, or record so required.
(2) In the event of violation or threatened violation of any
provision of this chapter or any rule of the commission or rule of the
department adopted under this chapter, the commission is entitled to an
injunction to prevent further violation and to a decree of specific
performance of such rules, and to a temporary restraining order and
injunction pending litigation upon filing a verified complaint and
sufficient bond.
(3) All persons subject to this chapter shall severally from time
to time, upon the request of the commission, furnish the commission
with such information necessary to effectuate the policies of this
chapter or to ascertain and determine the extent to which this chapter
has been carried out or has effectuated such policies and purposes, or
to determine whether or not there has been any abuse of the privilege
of exemptions from laws relating to trusts, monopolies, and restraints
of trade. Such information shall be furnished in accordance with forms
and reports to be prescribed by the commission. For the purpose of
ascertaining the correctness of any report made to the commission under
this section or for the purpose of obtaining the information required
in any such report where it has been requested and has not been
furnished, the commission is authorized to examine such books, papers,
records, copies of tax reports, accounts, correspondence, contracts,
documents, or memoranda as the commission deems relevant and that are
within the control of any such person from whom such report was
requested, or of any person having, either directly or indirectly,
actual or legal control of or over such person or such records, or of
any subsidiary of any such person. To carry out the purposes of this
section, the commission, upon giving due notice, may hold hearings,
take testimony, administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, and issue
subpoenas for the production of books, records, documents, or other
writings of any kind, and shall apply with respect to any such hearing,
together with such other rules consistent therewith as the commission
may from time to time prescribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Moneys collected by the commission under
this chapter from any assessment or as an advance deposit thereon shall
be used by the commission only for the purpose of paying for the costs
or expenses arising in connection with carrying out the purposes and
provisions of this chapter.
If the commission is ever terminated any and all moneys remaining
with the commission operating under this chapter and not required to
defray expenses or repay obligations incurred by that commission shall
be returned to the affected producers in proportion to the assessments
paid by each in the two-year period preceding the date of the
termination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If after complying with the procedures
outlined in this chapter and a referendum proposal to terminate the
commission is assented to, the commission shall:
(1) Document the details of all measures undertaken to terminate
the commission and identify and document all closing costs;
(2) Contact the office of the state auditor and arrange for a final
audit of the commission. Payment for the audit shall be from
commission funds and identified in the budget for closing costs;
(3) Provide for the reimbursement to affected producers of moneys
collected by assessment. Reimbursement shall be made to those
considered affected producers over the previous three-year time frame
on a pro rata basis and at a percent commensurate with their volume of
production over the previous three-year period. If the commission
finds that the amounts of moneys are so small as to make impractical
the computation and remitting of the pro rata refund, the moneys shall
be paid into the state treasury as unclaimed trust moneys; and
(4) Transfer all remaining files to the department for storage and
archiving, as appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Any due and payable assessment levied under
this chapter, and every sum due under this chapter in a specified
amount constitutes a personal debt of every person so assessed or who
otherwise owes the same, and the same shall be due and payable to the
commission when payment is called for by the commission. In the event
any person fails to pay the full amount of the assessment or such other
sum on or before the date due, the commission may add to the unpaid
assessment or sum an amount not exceeding ten percent of the same to
defray the cost of enforcing collection of it. In the event of failure
of such person or persons to pay any such due and payable assessment or
other such sum, the commission may bring a civil action against such
person or persons in a state court of competent jurisdiction for the
collection thereof, together with the above specified ten percent
thereon, and such action shall be tried and judgment rendered as in any
other cause of action for debt due and payable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 All moneys that are collected or otherwise
received under this chapter shall be used solely by and for the
commission and shall not be used for any other commission, nor the
department except as otherwise provided in this chapter. Such moneys
shall be deposited in a separate account or accounts in the name of the
commission in any bank that is a state depositary. All expenses and
disbursements incurred and made under the provisions of this chapter
shall be paid from moneys collected and received under this chapter
without the necessity of a specific legislative appropriation and all
moneys shall be paid from the account by check or voucher in such form
and in such manner and upon the signature of such person as may be
prescribed by the commission. The provisions of RCW 43.01.050 do not
apply to any such account or any moneys so received, collected, or
expended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1) Any funds of the commission may be
invested in savings or time deposits in a public depositary as defined
in RCW 39.58.010.
(2) This section applies to all funds that may be lawfully so
invested, that in the judgment of the commission are not required for
immediate expenditure. The authority granted by this section is not
exclusive and shall be construed to be cumulative and in addition to
other authority provided by law for the investment of such funds,
including, but not limited to, authority granted under chapters 39.58,
39.59, and 43.84 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Every administrator, employee, or other
person occupying a position of trust with the commission and every
member actually handling or drawing upon funds shall give a bond in
such penal amount as may be required by the commission, the premium for
which bond or bonds shall be paid by the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 (1) Pursuant to RCW 42.17.31907, certain
agricultural business records, commodity commission records, and
department of agriculture records relating to commodity commissions and
producers of agricultural commodities are exempt from public
disclosure.
(2) Financial and commercial information and records submitted to
either the department or the commission for the purpose of
administering this chapter may be shared between the department and the
commission. They may also be used, if required, in any suit or
administrative hearing involving any provision of this chapter.
(3) This chapter does not prohibit:
(a) The issuance of general statements based upon the reports of a
number of persons subject to this chapter as long as the statements do
not identify the information furnished by any person; or
(b) The publication by the commission of the name of any person
violating this chapter and a statement of the manner of the violation
by that person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 (1) The commission shall prepare a list of
all affected producers from any information available from the
department, producers, producer associations, organizations, or
handlers of potatoes. This list shall contain the names and addresses
of all affected persons who produce the potatoes and the amount, by
unit, of the potatoes produced during at least the past three years.
(2) The commission shall prepare a list of all persons who handle
potatoes and the amount of potatoes handled by each person during at
least the past three years.
(3) It is the responsibility of all affected parties to ensure that
their correct address is filed with the commission. It is also the
responsibility of affected parties to submit production data and
handling data to the commission as prescribed by the commission's rules
or policies.
(4) Any qualified person may, at any time, have his or her name
placed upon any list for which he or she qualifies by delivering or
mailing the information to the commission. The lists shall be
corrected and brought up-to-date in accordance with evidence and
information provided to the commission.
(5) The commission shall maintain a certified list of affected
producers or affected handlers from its records. The list shall
contain all information required to conduct a referendum or commission
member elections under this chapter.
(6) For all purposes of giving notice and holding referenda on
amendment or termination proposals, and for giving notice and electing
or selecting members of the commission, the applicable list corrected
up to the day preceding the date the list is certified by the
commission is deemed to be the list of all affected producers or
affected handlers, as applicable, entitled to notice or to vote.
Inadvertent failure to notify an affected producer or handler does not
invalidate a proceeding conducted under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Any member of a commission may also be a
member or officer of an association that has the same objectives for
which the commission was formed. The commission may also contract with
such association for services necessary to carry out any purposes
authorized under this chapter, if an appropriate contract has been
entered into.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Nothing in this chapter permits the fixing
of prices not otherwise permitted by law or any limitation on
production and no agreement or any rule thereunder may contain any such
provisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 (1) Upon completion of any vote,
referendum, or nomination and elections, the director shall tally the
results of the vote and provide the results to affected parties.
(2) If an affected party disputes the results of a vote, that
affected party, within sixty days from the announced results, shall
provide in writing a statement of why the vote is disputed and request
a recount.
(3) Once the vote is tallied and distributed, all disputes are
resolved, and all matters in a vote are finalized, the individual
ballots may be destroyed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 The members of the commission may, subject
to approval by two-thirds of the voting members of the commission,
suspend for a period not exceeding one crop-year at a time all or part
of the assessments on potatoes subject to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 The director may adopt rules necessary to
carry out the duties and responsibilities under this chapter including,
but not limited to:
(1) The issuance, amendment, suspension, or termination of rules
associated with this chapter;
(2) Procedural, technical, or administrative rules that may address
and include, but are not limited to:
(a) Nominations conducted under this chapter; and
(b) Elections of commission members or referenda conducted under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 (1) The substance of a petition received
under this chapter to amend or terminate commission programs or
assessments shall be set out in detail and designated as the proposal.
A copy of the proposal shall be mailed by the department to all
affected parties or producers based on the list provided for under this
chapter, as applicable, and shall be posted on the department's web
site.
(2) Notice of a public hearing to amend or terminate the commission
shall be published in the form of a legal notice for a period of two
days in a newspaper of general circulation within the affected areas,
as the director may prescribe. The notice must also be posted on the
department's web site. The department shall mail a copy of the public
hearing notice along with a copy of the proposal as provided in
subsection (1) of this section to all affected parties or affected
producers, as applicable, who may be directly affected by the proposal
and whose names and addresses appear on the list compiled under this
chapter. The mailing must include the department's web site address
along with a description of the process for the amendment or
termination of the commission, as applicable.
(3) At a public hearing, the director shall receive testimony
offered in support of, or opposition to, the proposed amendment to or
termination of the commission and concerning the terms, conditions,
scope, and area thereof. The hearing shall be public and all testimony
shall be received under oath. A full and complete record of all
proceedings at such hearings shall be made and maintained on file in
the office of the director, which file shall be open to public
inspection. The director shall base any findings upon the testimony
received at the hearing, together with any other relevant facts
available from official publications of institutions of recognized
standing. The director shall describe in the findings such official
publications upon which any finding is based.
(4) The director has the power to subpoena witnesses and to issue
subpoenas for the production of any books, records, or documents of any
kind.
(5) The superior court of the county in which any hearing or
proceeding may be had may compel the attendance of witnesses and the
production of records, papers, books, accounts, documents, and
testimony as required by such subpoena. The director, in case of the
refusal of any witness to attest or testify or produce any papers
required by the subpoena, shall report to the superior court of the
county in which the proceeding is pending by petition setting forth
that due notice has been given of the time and place of attendance of
the witness or the production of the papers and that the witness has
been summoned in the manner prescribed in this chapter and that he or
she has failed to attend or produce the papers required by the subpoena
at the hearing, cause, or proceeding specified in the subpoena, or has
refused to answer questions propounded to it in the course of such
hearing, cause, or proceeding, and shall ask an order of the court to
compel a witness to appear and testify before the director. The court,
upon such petition, shall enter an order directing the witness to
appear before the court at a time and place to be fixed in such order
and then and there to show cause why he or she has not responded to the
subpoena. A copy of the order shall be served upon the witness. If it
appears to the court that the subpoena was regularly issued, it shall
enter an order that the witness appear at the time and place fixed in
the order and testify or produce the required papers, and on failing to
obey the order, the witness shall be dealt with as for contempt of
court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 (1) The director shall make findings upon
material points controverted at the hearing and required by this
chapter and upon such other matters and things as the director may deem
fitting and proper. Based upon those findings, the director shall make
conclusions and develop and issue a recommended decision. The
findings, conclusions, and recommended decision, and the full text of
the proposal shall be posted on the department's web site.
(2) The recommended decision may deny or approve the proposal in
its entirety, or it may recommend a rule containing other or different
terms or conditions from those contained in the proposal, however any
such rule shall be of a kind or type substantially within the purview
of the notice of hearing and shall be supported by evidence taken at
the hearing or by documents of which the director is authorized to take
official notice. The director shall not approve the amendment or
termination unless he or she finds with respect thereto:
(a) That the proposed issuance, amendment, or termination thereof
is reasonably calculated to attain the objective sought in a rule;
(b) That the proposed issuance, amendment, or termination is in
conformity with this chapter and, within the applicable limitations and
restrictions in this chapter, will tend to effectuate its declared
purposes and policies; and
(c) That the interests of consumers of potatoes are protected in
that the powers of this chapter are being exercised only to the extent
necessary to attain such objectives.
(3) If the director's recommended decision does not make any
changes to the proposal, notification will be made by mail in the form
of a postcard reciting the recommended decision. The postcard must
also include the department's web site address where any person can
access the full text of the findings, conclusions, and recommended
decision.
(4) If the director's recommended decision makes changes to the
proposal or does not support the proposal, notification will be made by
mail in the form of a letter describing the changes made or explaining
the reason for not supporting the proposal and a referendum. The
letter must also include the department's web site address where any
person can access the full text of the findings, conclusions, and
recommended decision.
(5) After the director issues his or her findings, conclusions, and
recommended decision, all interested parties shall have a period of not
less than fifteen days from the date of the mailing of the postcard or
letter to file statements with the director in support of or in
opposition to the recommended decision. The director shall consider
the additional statements and shall issue his or her final decision.
The final decision may be the same as the recommended decision or may
be revised in light of the additional information received in response
to the recommended decision. The director shall notify affected
parties of his or her final decision by mail in the form of a postcard.
Notification shall include the department's web site address where any
person can access the full text of the findings, conclusions, and final
decision and the full text of the final proposal. If the final
decision denies the proposal in its entirety, no further action may be
taken by the director.
(6) Affected parties who do not have access to materials posted on
the department's web site may request notification by fax or mail.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 After the director issues his or her final
decision approving the amendment or termination, the director shall
determine by a referendum whether the affected parties or producers
assent to the proposed action or not. The director shall conduct the
referendum among the affected parties or producers based on the list as
provided for in this chapter, as applicable. The affected parties or
producers shall be deemed to have assented to the proposed issuance or
termination order if fifty-one percent or more by number reply to the
referendum within the time specified by the director, and if, of those
replying (a) sixty-five percent or more by number and fifty-one percent
or more by volume assent to the proposed order; or (b) sixty percent or
more by number and sixty percent or more by volume of those replying
assent to the proposed order. The determination by volume shall be
made on the basis of volume as determined in the list of affected
producers created under this chapter, subject to rules of the director
for such determination. Results of the referendum shall be mailed to
all affected parties in the form of a postcard. If the requisite
assent is given, the director shall adopt the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 (1) All rule-making proceedings conducted
under this chapter shall be in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) Rule-making proceedings conducted under this chapter are exempt
from compliance with RCW 34.05.310, chapter 19.85 RCW, the regulatory
fairness act, and RCW 43.135.055 when adoption of the rule is
determined by a referendum vote of the affected parties.
(3) The commission may adopt amendments to rules associated with
this chapter without conducting a referendum if the amendments are
adopted under the following criteria:
(a) The proposed amendments relate only to internal administration
of this chapter and are not subject to violation by a person;
(b) The proposed amendments adopt or incorporate by reference
without material change federal statutes or regulations, Washington
state statutes, or rules of other Washington state agencies, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same activities as are
authorized under this chapter;
(c) The proposed amendments only correct typographical errors, make
address or name changes, or clarify language of a rule in accordance
with this chapter;
(d) The content of the proposed amendments is explicitly and
specifically dictated by statute.

Sec. 33 RCW 15.66.270 and 1961 c 11 s 15.66.270 are each amended
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter contained shall apply to:
(1) Any order, rule, or regulation issued or issuable by the
Washington utilities and transportation commission or the interstate
commerce commission with respect to the operation of common carriers;
(2) Any provision of the statutes of the state of Washington
relating to the Washington apple ((advertising)) commission (chapter
15.24 RCW), to the soft tree fruits commission (chapter 15.28 RCW)
((or)), to the dairy products commission (chapter 15.44 RCW), or to the
potato commission established in chapter 15.-- RCW (sections 1 through
32 and 35 of this act). No marketing agreement or order shall be
issued with respect to apples, soft tree fruits ((or)), dairy products,
or potatoes for human consumption, for the purposes specified in RCW
15.66.030(1) or 15.66.030(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 (1) The potato commission established in
chapter 16-516 WAC is hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and
functions are hereby transferred to the potato commission created in
this act.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the potato commission
established in chapter 16-516 WAC shall be transferred to the custody
of the potato commission created by this act. All cabinets, furniture,
office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed
by the potato commission established in chapter 16-516 WAC shall be
made available to the potato commission created by this act. All
funds, credits, or other assets held by the potato commission
established in chapter 16-516 WAC shall be assigned to the potato
commission created by this act.
(b) Any appropriations made to the potato commission established in
chapter 16-516 WAC shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the potato commission created by this act.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the potato commission established in chapter
16-516 WAC are transferred to the jurisdiction of the potato commission
created by this act. All members of the potato commission established
in chapter 16-516 WAC shall continue as members of the potato
commission established in chapter 16-516 WAC until their terms expire.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the potato commission
established in chapter 16-516 WAC shall be continued and acted upon by
the potato commission created by this act. All existing contracts and
obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the
potato commission created by this act.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the potato commission established in chapter 16-516 WAC shall not
affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of
this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 Potatoes that are certified as organically
grown under chapter 15.86 RCW are exempt from assessments under this
chapter if a separate commodity commission is formed to include
organically grown potatoes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 Sections 1 through 32 and 35 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 If any section, subsection, sentence,
clause, or part of this chapter is for any reason held to be invalid or
unconstitutional, the judicial decision does not affect the remainder
of the chapter and its application to other persons or circumstances.
The legislature declares that each section, subsection, sentence,
clause, and part of this chapter was enacted with the intent that if
any portion of this chapter is severed, the remainder of the chapter is
capable of accomplishing its legislative purpose.

--- END ---