BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The economic development strategic reserve account is created
in the state treasury to be used only for the purposes of this section.
(2) Only the governor, in consultation with the director of the
department of community, trade, and economic development and the
economic development commission, may authorize expenditures from the
account, subject to appropriation by the legislature.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall be made in an amount
sufficient to fund a minimum of one full-time equivalent staff position
for the economic development commission and to cover any other
operational costs of the commission.
(4) Expenditures from the account may be made to prevent closure of
a business or facility, to prevent relocation of a business or facility
in the state to a location outside the state, or to recruit a business
or facility to the state. Expenditures may be authorized for:
(a) Work force development;
(b) Public infrastructure needed to support or sustain the
operations of the business or facility; and
(c) Other lawfully provided assistance, including, but not limited
to, technical assistance, environmental analysis, relocation
assistance, and planning assistance. Funding may be provided for such
assistance only when it is in the public interest and may be provided
under a contractual arrangement ensuring that the state will receive
appropriate consideration, such as an assurance of job creation or
retention.
(5) The funds shall not be expended from the account unless:
(a) The circumstances are such that time does not permit the
director of the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the business or facility to secure funding from other
state sources;
(b) The business or facility produces or will produce significant
long-term economic benefits to the state, a region of the state, or a
particular community in the state;
(c) The business or facility does not require a continuing state
subsidy;
(d) The expenditure will result in new jobs, job retention, or
higher incomes for citizens of the state;
(e) The expenditure will not supplant private investment; and
(f) The expenditure is accompanied by private investment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2005, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---