BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 57.24 RCW
to read as follows:
When a district acquires water and/or sewer facilities from a city,
and the district and the city within which the facilities are located
enter into an agreement stating that the district will seek to annex
certain city territory, the district may annex such territory under the
process in RCW 57.24.010 through 57.24.050, however, the ten percent
petition is not required and the district board of commissioners shall
initiate the annexation by adoption of a resolution calling for the
question of annexation to be submitted to the voters of the territory
proposed for annexation and setting forth the boundaries thereof. The
resolution shall be filed with the county legislative authority of each
county in which the territory proposed to be annexed is located. Upon
receipt of the resolution, the county legislative authority shall cause
the meeting in RCW 57.24.010 to be held and the remaining annexation
process to be accomplished. Qualified voters at the date of the
election residing in the territory proposed to be annexed shall be
permitted to vote at the election.

--- END ---