BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Cities shall, in the predesign phase of construction projects
involving the relocation of either water or sewer facilities, or both,
consult with public utilities operating either water or sewer systems,
or both, in order to coordinate design.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Counties shall, in the predesign phase of construction projects
involving the relocation of either water or sewer facilities, or both,
consult with public utilities operating either water or sewer systems,
or both, in order to coordinate design.

--- END ---