BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.19.1906 and 2002 c 332 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Insofar as practicable, all purchases and sales shall be based on
competitive bids, and a formal sealed, electronic, or web-based bid
procedure shall be used as standard procedure for all purchases and
contracts for purchases and sales executed by the state purchasing and
material control director and under the powers granted by RCW 43.19.190
through 43.19.1939. This requirement also applies to purchases and
contracts for purchases and sales executed by agencies, including
educational institutions, under delegated authority granted in
accordance with provisions of RCW 43.19.190 or under RCW 28B.10.029.
However, formal sealed, electronic, or web-based competitive bidding is
not necessary for:
(1) Emergency purchases made pursuant to RCW 43.19.200 if the
sealed bidding procedure would prevent or hinder the emergency from
being met appropriately;
(2) Purchases not exceeding thirty-five thousand dollars, or
subsequent limits as calculated by the office of financial management:
PROVIDED, That the state director of general administration shall
establish procedures to assure that purchases made by or on behalf of
the various state agencies shall not be made so as to avoid the thirty-five thousand dollar bid limitation, or subsequent bid limitations as
calculated by the office of financial management: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That the state purchasing and material control director is authorized
to reduce the formal sealed bid limits of thirty-five thousand dollars,
or subsequent limits as calculated by the office of financial
management, to a lower dollar amount for purchases by individual state
agencies if considered necessary to maintain full disclosure of
competitive procurement or otherwise to achieve overall state
efficiency and economy in purchasing and material control. Quotations
from three thousand dollars to thirty-five thousand dollars, or
subsequent limits as calculated by the office of financial management,
shall be secured from at least three vendors to assure establishment of
a competitive price and may be obtained by telephone or written
quotations, or both. The agency shall invite at least one quotation
each from a certified minority and a certified women-owned vendor who
shall otherwise qualify to perform such work. Immediately after the
award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be recorded and open
to public inspection and shall be available by telephone inquiry. A
record of competition for all such purchases from three thousand
dollars to thirty-five thousand dollars, or subsequent limits as
calculated by the office of financial management, shall be documented
for audit purposes. Purchases up to three thousand dollars may be made
without competitive bids based on buyer experience and knowledge of the
market in achieving maximum quality at minimum cost;
(3) Purchases which are clearly and legitimately limited to a
single source of supply and purchases involving special facilities,
services, or market conditions, in which instances the purchase price
may be best established by direct negotiation;
(4) Purchases of insurance and bonds by the risk management
division under RCW 43.41.310;
(5) Purchases and contracts for vocational rehabilitation clients
of the department of social and health services: PROVIDED, That this
exemption is effective only when the state purchasing and material
control director, after consultation with the director of the division
of vocational rehabilitation and appropriate department of social and
health services procurement personnel, declares that such purchases may
be best executed through direct negotiation with one or more suppliers
in order to expeditiously meet the special needs of the state's
vocational rehabilitation clients;
(6) Purchases by universities for hospital operation or biomedical
teaching or research purposes and by the state purchasing and material
control director, as the agent for state hospitals as defined in RCW
72.23.010, and for health care programs provided in state correctional
institutions as defined in RCW 72.65.010(3) and veterans' institutions
as defined in RCW 72.36.010 and 72.36.070, made by participating in
contracts for materials, supplies, and equipment entered into by
nonprofit cooperative hospital group purchasing organizations;
(7) Purchases for resale by institutions of higher education to
other than public agencies when such purchases are for the express
purpose of supporting instructional programs and may best be executed
through direct negotiation with one or more suppliers in order to meet
the special needs of the institution;
(8) Purchases by institutions of higher education not exceeding
thirty-five thousand dollars: PROVIDED, That for purchases between
three thousand dollars and thirty-five thousand dollars quotations
shall be secured from at least three vendors to assure establishment of
a competitive price and may be obtained by telephone or written
quotations, or both. For purchases between three thousand dollars and
thirty-five thousand dollars, each institution of higher education
shall invite at least one quotation each from a certified minority and
a certified women-owned vendor who shall otherwise qualify to perform
such work. A record of competition for all such purchases made from
three thousand to thirty-five thousand dollars shall be documented for
audit purposes; and
(9) Negotiation of a contract by the department of transportation,
valid until June 30, 2001, with registered tow truck operators to
provide roving service patrols in one or more Washington state patrol
tow zones whereby those registered tow truck operators wishing to
participate would cooperatively, with the department of transportation,
develop a demonstration project upon terms and conditions negotiated by
the parties.
Beginning on July 1, 1995, and on July 1 of each succeeding odd-numbered year, the dollar limits specified in this section shall be
adjusted as follows: The office of financial management shall
calculate such limits by adjusting the previous biennium's limits by
the appropriate federal inflationary index reflecting the rate of
inflation for the previous biennium. Such amounts shall be rounded to
the nearest one hundred dollars. However, the three thousand dollar
figure in subsections (2) and (8) of this section may not be adjusted
to exceed five thousand dollars.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.19.1908 and 1994 c 300 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Competitive bidding required by RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.1939
shall be solicited by public notice, and through the sending of notices
by mail, electronic transmission, or other means to bidders on the
appropriate list of bidders who shall have qualified by application to
the division of purchasing. Bids may be solicited by the purchasing
division from any source thought to be of advantage to the state. All
bids shall be in ((writing)) written or electronic form and conform to
rules of the division of purchasing.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.19.1911 and 2003 c 136 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Preservation of the integrity of the competitive bid system
dictates that after competitive bids have been opened, award must be
made to that responsible bidder who submitted the lowest responsive bid
pursuant to subsections (7) and (9) of this section, unless there is a
compelling reason to reject all bids and cancel the solicitation.
(2) Every effort shall be made to anticipate changes in a
requirement before the date of opening and to provide reasonable notice
to all prospective bidders of any resulting modification or
cancellation. If, in the opinion of the purchasing agency, division,
or department head, it is not possible to provide reasonable notice,
the published date for receipt of bids may be postponed and all known
bidders notified. This will permit bidders to change their bids and
prevent unnecessary exposure of bid prices. In addition, every effort
shall be made to include realistic, achievable requirements in a
solicitation.
(3) After the opening of bids, a solicitation may not be canceled
and resolicited solely because of an increase in requirements for the
items being acquired. Award may be made on the initial solicitation
and an increase in requirements may be treated as a new acquisition.
(4) A solicitation may be canceled and all bids rejected before
award but after bid opening only when, consistent with subsection (1)
of this section, the purchasing agency, division, or department head
determines in writing that:
(a) Unavailable, inadequate, ambiguous specifications, terms,
conditions, or requirements were cited in the solicitation;
(b) Specifications, terms, conditions, or requirements have been
revised;
(c) The supplies or services being contracted for are no longer
required;
(d) The solicitation did not provide for consideration of all
factors of cost to the agency;
(e) Bids received indicate that the needs of the agency can be
satisfied by a less expensive article differing from that for which the
bids were invited;
(f) All otherwise acceptable bids received are at unreasonable
prices or only one bid is received and the agency cannot determine the
reasonableness of the bid price;
(g) No responsive bid has been received from a responsible bidder;
or
(h) The bid process was not fair or equitable.
(5) The agency, division, or department head may not delegate his
or her authority under this section.
(6) After the opening of bids, an agency may not reject all bids
and enter into direct negotiations to complete the planned acquisition.
However, the agency can enter into negotiations exclusively with the
lowest responsible bidder in order to determine if the lowest
responsible bid may be improved. Until December 31, 2007, for
purchases requiring a formal bid process the agency shall also enter
into negotiations with and may consider for award the lowest
responsible bidder that is a vendor in good standing, as defined in RCW
43.19.525. An agency shall not use this negotiation opportunity to
permit a bidder to change a nonresponsive bid into a responsive bid.
(7) In determining the lowest responsible bidder, the agency shall
consider any preferences provided by law to Washington products and
vendors and to RCW 43.19.704, and further, may take into consideration
the quality of the articles proposed to be supplied, their conformity
with specifications, the purposes for which required, and the times of
delivery.
(8) Each bid with the name of the bidder shall be entered of record
and each record, with the successful bid indicated, shall, after
letting of the contract, be open to public inspection. However, bid
prices may be disclosed during electronic or web-based bidding.
(9) In determining "lowest responsible bidder", in addition to
price, the following elements shall be given consideration:
(a) The ability, capacity, and skill of the bidder to perform the
contract or provide the service required;
(b) The character, integrity, reputation, judgment, experience, and
efficiency of the bidder;
(c) Whether the bidder can perform the contract within the time
specified;
(d) The quality of performance of previous contracts or services;
(e) The previous and existing compliance by the bidder with laws
relating to the contract or services;
(f) Such other information as may be secured having a bearing on
the decision to award the contract: PROVIDED, That in considering bids
for purchase, manufacture, or lease, and in determining the "lowest
responsible bidder," whenever there is reason to believe that applying
the "life cycle costing" technique to bid evaluation would result in
lowest total cost to the state, first consideration shall be given by
state purchasing activities to the bid with the lowest life cycle cost
which complies with specifications. "Life cycle cost" means the total
cost of an item to the state over its estimated useful life, including
costs of selection, acquisition, operation, maintenance, and where
applicable, disposal, as far as these costs can reasonably be
determined, minus the salvage value at the end of its estimated useful
life. The "estimated useful life" of an item means the estimated time
from the date of acquisition to the date of replacement or disposal,
determined in any reasonable manner. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit any state agency, department, board, commission, committee, or
other state-level entity from allowing for preferential purchase of
products made from recycled materials or products that may be recycled
or reused.

--- END ---