BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may supervise nonfelony offenders transferred to
Washington pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for adult
offender supervision, and shall supervise these offenders according to
the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The department shall process applications for interstate
transfer of felony and nonfelony offenders pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745,
the interstate compact for adult offender supervision, and may charge
offenders a reasonable fee for processing the application.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.95.204 and 1996 c 298 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a superior court places a defendant convicted of a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor on probation and orders supervision
under RCW 9.92.060 or 9.95.210, the department of corrections has
initial responsibility for supervision of that defendant.
(2) A county legislative authority may assume responsibility for
the supervision of all defendants within its jurisdiction who have been
convicted of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor and sentenced to
probation by a superior court. The assumption of responsibility shall
be made by contract with the department of corrections on a biennial
basis.
(3) If a county assumes supervision responsibility, the county
shall supervise all superior court misdemeanant probationers within
that county for the duration of the biennium, as set forth in the
contract with the department of corrections.
(4) A contract between a county legislative authority and the
department of corrections for the transfer of supervision
responsibility must include, at a minimum, the following provisions:
(a) The county's agreement to supervise all misdemeanant
probationers who are sentenced by a superior court within that county
and who reside within that county;
(b) A reciprocal agreement regarding the supervision of superior
court misdemeanant probationers sentenced in one county but who reside
in another county;
(c) The county's agreement to comply with the minimum standards for
classification and supervision of offenders as required under RCW
9.95.206;
(d) The amount of funds available from the department of
corrections to the county for supervision of superior court
misdemeanant probationers, calculated according to a formula
established by the department of corrections;
(e) A method for the payment of funds by the department of
corrections to the county;
(f) The county's agreement that any funds received by the county
under the contract will be expended only to cover costs of supervision
of superior court misdemeanant probationers;
(g) The county's agreement to account to the department of
corrections for the expenditure of all funds received under the
contract and to submit to audits for compliance with the supervision
standards and financial requirements of this section;
(h) Provisions regarding rights and remedies in the event of a
possible breach of contract or default by either party; and
(i) Provisions allowing for voluntary termination of the contract
by either party, with good cause, after sixty days' written notice.
(5) If the contract between the county and the department of
corrections is terminated for any reason, the department of corrections
shall reassume responsibility for supervision of superior court
misdemeanant probationers within that county. In such an event, the
department of corrections retains any and all rights and remedies
available by law and under the contract.
(6) The state of Washington, the department of corrections and its
employees, community corrections officers, and volunteers who assist
community corrections officers are not liable for any harm caused by
the actions of a superior court misdemeanant probationer who is under
the supervision of a county. A county, its probation department and
employees, probation officers, and volunteers who assist probation
officers are not liable for any harm caused by the actions of a
superior court misdemeanant probationer who is under the supervision of
the department of corrections. This subsection applies regardless of
whether the supervising entity is in compliance with the standards of
supervision at the time of the misdemeanant probationer's actions.
(7) The state of Washington, the department of corrections and its
employees, community corrections officers, any county under contract
with the department of corrections pursuant to this section and its
employees, probation officers, and volunteers who assist community
corrections officers and probation officers in the superior court
misdemeanant probation program are not liable for civil damages
resulting from any act or omission in the rendering of superior court
misdemeanant probation activities unless the act or omission
constitutes gross negligence. For purposes of this section,
"volunteers" is defined according to RCW 51.12.035.
(8)(a) If a misdemeanant probationer requests permission to travel
or transfer to another state, the assigned probation officer employed
or contracted for by the county shall determine whether such request is
subject to RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for adult offender
supervision. If such request is subject to the compact, the probation
officer shall:
(i) Notify the department of corrections of the probationer's
request;
(ii) Provide the department of corrections with the supporting
documentation it requests for processing an application for transfer;
(iii) Notify the probationer of the fee due to the department of
corrections for processing an application under the compact;
(iv) Cease supervision of the probationer while another state
supervises the probationer pursuant to the compact;
(v) Resume supervision if the probationer returns to this state
before the term of probation expires.
(b) The probationer shall receive credit for time served while
being supervised by another state.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.95.214 and 1996 c 298 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever a defendant convicted of a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor is placed on probation under RCW 9.92.060 or 9.95.210, and
the defendant is supervised by the department of corrections or a
county probation department, the department or county probation
department may assess and collect from the defendant for the duration
of the term of supervision a monthly assessment not to exceed one
hundred dollars per month. This assessment shall be paid to the agency
supervising the defendant and shall be applied, along with funds
appropriated by the legislature, toward the payment or part payment of
the cost of supervising the defendant. The department or county
probation department shall suspend such assessment while the defendant
is being supervised by another state pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745, the
interstate compact for adult offender supervision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 3.66 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a person placed on probation for one year or more for a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor by a district court requests
permission to travel or transfer to another state, the assigned
probation officer shall determine whether such request is subject to
RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for adult offender supervision.
If such request is subject to the compact, the probation officer shall:
(a) Notify the department of corrections of the probationer's
request;
(b) Provide the department of corrections with the supporting
documentation it requests for processing an application for transfer;
(c) Notify the probationer of the fee due to the department of
corrections for processing an application under the compact;
(d) Cease supervision of the probationer while another state
supervises the probationer pursuant to the compact;
(e) Resume supervision if the probationer returns to this state
before the term of probation expires.
(2) The probationer shall receive credit for time served while
being supervised by another state.
(3) If the probationer is returned to the state at the request of
the receiving state under rules of the interstate compact for adult
offender supervision, the department of corrections is responsible for
the cost of returning the probationer.
(4) The state of Washington, the department of corrections and its
employees, and any county and its employees are not liable for civil
damages resulting from any act or omission authorized or required under
this section unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence.

Sec. 5 RCW 35.20.255 and 2001 c 94 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Judges of the municipal court, in their discretion, shall have
the power in all criminal proceedings within their jurisdiction
including violations of city ordinances, to defer imposition of any
sentence, suspend all or part of any sentence including installment
payment of fines, fix the terms of any such deferral or suspension, and
provide for such probation as in their opinion is reasonable and
necessary under the circumstances of the case, but in no case shall it
extend for more than five years from the date of conviction for a
defendant to be sentenced under RCW 46.61.5055 and two years from the
date of conviction for all other offenses. A defendant who has been
sentenced, or whose sentence has been deferred, and who then fails to
appear for any hearing to address the defendant's compliance with the
terms of probation when ordered to do so by the court, shall have the
term of probation tolled until such time as the defendant makes his or
her presence known to the court on the record. However, the
jurisdiction period in this section does not apply to the enforcement
of orders issued under RCW 46.20.720. Any time before entering an
order terminating probation, the court may modify or revoke its order
suspending or deferring the imposition or execution of the sentence.
(2)(a) If a defendant whose sentence has been deferred requests
permission to travel or transfer to another state, the director of
probation services or a designee thereof shall determine whether such
request is subject to RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for adult
offender supervision. If such request is subject to the compact, the
director or designee shall:
(i) Notify the department of corrections of the defendant's
request;
(ii) Provide the department of corrections with the supporting
documentation it requests for processing an application for transfer;
(iii) Notify the defendant of the fee due to the department of
corrections for processing an application under the compact;
(iv) Cease supervision of the defendant while another state
supervises the defendant pursuant to the compact;
(v) Resume supervision if the defendant returns to this state
before the period of deferral expires.
(b) The defendant shall receive credit for time served while being
supervised by another state.
(c) If the probationer is returned to the state at the request of
the receiving state under rules of the interstate compact for adult
offender supervision, the department of corrections is responsible for
the cost of returning the probationer.
(d) The state of Washington, the department of corrections and its
employees, and any city and its employees are not liable for civil
damages resulting from any act or omission authorized or required under
this section unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 3.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a person placed on probation for one year or more for a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor by a municipal court requests
permission to travel or transfer to another state, the assigned
probation officer shall determine whether such request is subject to
RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for adult offender supervision.
If such request is subject to the compact, the probation officer shall:
(a) Notify the department of corrections of the probationer's
request;
(b) Provide the department of corrections with the supporting
documentation it requests for processing an application for transfer;
(c) Notify the probationer of the fee due to the department of
corrections for processing an application under the compact;
(d) Cease supervision of the probationer while another state
supervises the probationer pursuant to the compact;
(e) Resume supervision if the probationer returns to this state
before the term of probation expires.
(2) The probationer shall receive credit for time served while
being supervised by another state.
(3) If the probationer is returned to the state at the request of
the receiving state under rules of the interstate compact for adult
offender supervision, the department of corrections is responsible for
the cost of returning the probationer.
(4) The state of Washington, the department of corrections and its
employees, and any city and its employees are not liable for civil
damages resulting from any act or omission authorized or required under
this section unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence.

Sec. 7 RCW 10.64.120 and 1996 c 298 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every judge of a court of limited jurisdiction shall have the
authority to levy upon a person a monthly assessment not to exceed one
hundred dollars for services provided whenever the person is referred
by the court to the misdemeanant probation department for evaluation or
supervision services. The assessment may also be made by a judge in
superior court when such misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor cases are
heard in the superior court.
(2) For the purposes of this section the office of the
administrator for the courts shall define a probation department and
adopt rules for the qualifications of probation officers based on
occupational and educational requirements developed by an oversight
committee. This oversight committee shall include a representative
from the district and municipal court judges association, the
misdemeanant corrections association, the office of the administrator
for the courts, and associations of cities and counties. The oversight
committee shall consider qualifications that provide the training and
education necessary to (a) conduct presentencing and postsentencing
background investigations, including sentencing recommendations to the
court regarding jail terms, alternatives to incarceration, and
conditions of release; and (b) provide ongoing supervision and
assessment of offenders' needs and the risk they pose to the community.
(3) It shall be the responsibility of the probation services office
to implement local procedures approved by the court of limited
jurisdiction to ensure collection and payment of such fees into the
general fund of the city or county treasury.
(4) Revenues raised under this section shall be used to fund
programs for probation services and shall be in addition to those funds
provided in RCW 3.62.050.
(5) Assessments and fees levied upon a probationer under this
section must be suspended while the probationer is being supervised by
another state under RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for adult
offender supervision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act applies to offenders sentenced
before, on, or after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---