BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.34.230 and 1995 c 318 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of acquiring conservation futures as well as other
rights and interests in real property pursuant to RCW 84.34.210 and
84.34.220, and for maintaining and operating any property acquired, a
county may levy an amount not to exceed ((six and one-quarter)) twelve
and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation against
the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the county. The
limitations in RCW 84.52.043 shall not apply to the tax levy authorized
in this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.34.240 and 1971 ex.s. c 243 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any board of county commissioners may establish by resolution
a special fund which may be termed a conservation futures fund to which
it may credit all taxes levied pursuant to RCW 84.34.230. Amounts
placed in this fund may be used ((solely)) for the purpose of acquiring
rights and interests in real property pursuant to the terms of RCW
84.34.210 and 84.34.220((.)), and for the maintenance and operation of
any property acquired. The amount of revenue used for maintenance and
operations of parks and recreational facilities may not exceed twenty-five percent of the total amount collected from the tax levied under
RCW 84.34.230 in the preceding calendar year. Revenues from this tax
may not be used to supplant existing sources of maintenance and
operation funding.
(2) Conservation futures are a useful tool for counties to preserve
lands of public interest for future generations. Counties are
encouraged to use some conservation futures as one tool for salmon
preservation purposes.
(3) In counties with a population greater than one hundred
thousand, the board of county commissioners or county legislative
authority shall develop a process to help ensure distribution of the
tax levied under RCW 84.34.230, over time, throughout the county.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting in any
manner methods and funds otherwise available to a county for financing
the acquisition of such rights and interests in real property.

--- END ---