BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public policies
and programs will be improved when informed by independent scientific
analysis and communication with state and local policymakers.
Throughout the state there are highly qualified persons in a wide range
of scientific disciplines who are willing to contribute their time and
expertise in such reviews, but that presently there is lacking an
organizational structure in which the entire scientific community may
most effectively respond to requests for assessments of complex public
policy questions. Therefore it is the purpose of this act to authorize
the creation of the Washington academy of sciences as a nonprofit
entity independent of government, whose principal mission will be the
provision of scientific analysis and recommendations on questions
referred to the academy by the governor or the governor's designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The Washington academy of sciences
authorized to be formed under section 3 of this act shall serve as a
principal source of scientific investigation, examination, and
reporting on scientific questions referred to the academy by the
governor or the legislature under the provisions of section 4 of this
act. Nothing in this section or this chapter supersedes or diminishes
the responsibilities performed by scientists employed by the state or
its political subdivisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The presidents of the University of
Washington and Washington State University shall jointly form and serve
as the cochairs of an organizing committee for the purpose of creating
the Washington academy of sciences as an independent entity to carry
out the purposes of this chapter. The committee should be
representative of appropriate disciplines from the academic, private,
governmental, and research sectors.
(2) Staff from the University of Washington and Washington State
University, and from other available entities, shall provide support to
the organizing committee under the direction of the cochairs.
(3)(a) The committee shall investigate organizational structures
that will ensure the participation or membership in the academy of
scientists and experts with distinction in their fields, and that will
ensure broad participation among the several disciplines that may be
called upon in the investigation, examination, and reporting upon
questions referred to the academy by the governor or the legislature.
(b) The organizational structure shall include a process by which
the academy responds to inquiries from the governor or the legislature,
including but not limited to the identification of research projects,
past or present, at Washington or other research institutions and the
findings of such research projects.
(4) The committee cochairs shall use their best efforts to form the
committee by January 1, 2006, and to complete the committee's review by
April 30, 2007. By April 30, 2007, the committee, or such individuals
as the committee selects, shall file articles of incorporation to
create the academy as a Washington independent organizational entity.
The articles shall expressly recognize the power and responsibility of
the academy to provide services as described in section 4 of this act
upon request of the governor or the governor's designee. The articles
shall also provide for a board of directors of the academy that
includes distinguished scientists from the range of disciplines that
may be called upon to provide such services to the state and its
political subdivisions, and provide a balance of representation from
the academic, private, governmental, and research sectors.
(5) The articles shall provide for all such powers as may be
appropriate or necessary to carry out the academy's purposes under this
chapter, to the full extent allowable under the proposed organizational
structure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The academy shall investigate, examine,
and report on any subject of science requested by the governor, the
governor's designee, or the legislature. The procedures for selecting
panels of experts to respond to such requests shall be set forth in the
bylaws or other appropriate operating guidelines. In forming review
panels, the academy shall endeavor to assure that the panel members
have no conflicts of interest and that proposed panelists first
disclose any advocacy positions or financial interest related to the
questions to be addressed by the panel that the candidate has held
within the past ten years.
(2) The governor shall provide funding to the academy for the
actual expense of such investigation, examination, and reports. Such
funding shall be in addition to state funding assistance to the academy
in its initial years of operation as described in section 6 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The academy may carry out functions or
provide services to its members and the public in addition to the
services provided under section 4 of this act, such as public education
programs, newsletters, web sites, science fairs, and research
assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The organizational committee shall recommend
procedures and funding requirements for receiving and disbursing
funding in support of the academy's programs and services in a report
to the governor and the appropriate committees of the senate and house
of representatives no later than April 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---