BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.315 and 2000 c 107 s 221 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the director determines that a severe problem exists in an area
of the state because ((deer and elk)) big game animals are being
pursued, harassed, attacked, or killed by dogs, the director may
declare by emergency rule that an emergency exists and specify the area
where it is lawful for fish and wildlife officers to take into custody
or destroy the dogs if necessary. Fish and wildlife officers who take
into custody or destroy a dog pursuant to this section are immune from
civil or criminal liability arising from their actions.

--- END ---