BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.042 and 2003 c 53 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(iii) shall not apply to any person under the age
of eighteen years who is:
(1) In attendance at a hunter's safety course or a firearms safety
course;
(2) Engaging in practice in the use of a firearm or target shooting
at an established range authorized by the governing body of the
jurisdiction in which such range is located or any other area where the
discharge of a firearm is not prohibited;
(3) Engaging in an organized competition involving the use of a
firearm, or participating in or practicing for a performance by an
organized group that uses firearms as a part of the performance;
(4) Hunting or trapping under a valid license issued to the person
under Title 77 RCW, and if the person is under fourteen years of age
the person must be under the immediate supervision of a parent,
guardian, or other adult approved for the purpose by the parent or
guardian. "Immediate supervision" means within unassisted hearing
distance;
(5) In an area where the discharge of a firearm is permitted, is
not trespassing, and the person either: (a) Is at least fourteen years
of age, has been issued a hunter safety certificate, and is using a
lawful firearm other than a pistol; or (b) is under the supervision of
a parent, guardian, or other adult approved for the purpose by the
parent or guardian;
(6) Traveling with any unloaded firearm in the person's possession
to or from any activity described in subsection (1), (2), (3), (4), or
(5) of this section;
(7) On real property under the control of his or her parent, other
relative, or legal guardian and who has the permission of the parent or
legal guardian to possess a firearm;
(8) At his or her residence and who, with the permission of his or
her parent or legal guardian, possesses a firearm for the purpose of
exercising the rights specified in RCW 9A.16.020(3); or
(9) Is a member of the armed forces of the United States, national
guard, or organized reserves, when on duty.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.32.155 and 1998 c 191 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
When purchasing any hunting license, persons under the age of
eighteen shall present certification of completion of a course of
instruction of at least ten hours in the safe handling of firearms,
safety, conservation, and sportsmanship. Beginning January 1, 1995,
all persons purchasing any hunting license for the first time, if born
after January 1, 1972, shall present such certification. The minimum
age to enroll in the hunter education training program is ten years
old.
The director may establish a program for training persons in the
safe handling of firearms, conservation, and sportsmanship and may
cooperate with the National Rifle Association, organized sportsmen's
groups, or other public or private organizations. There is no minimum
age to enroll in a firearm safety instruction course.
The director shall prescribe the type of instruction and the
qualifications of the instructors.
Upon successful completion of the course, a trainee shall receive
a hunter education certificate or firearm safety certificate signed by
an authorized instructor. The certificate is evidence of compliance
with this section.
The director may accept certificates from other states that persons
have successfully completed firearm safety, hunter education, or
similar courses as evidence of compliance with this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.32.450 and 2000 c 109 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A big game hunting license is required to hunt for big game.
A big game license allows the holder to hunt for forest grouse,
unclassified wildlife, and the individual species identified within a
specific big game combination license package. Each big game license
includes one transport tag for each species purchased in that package.
A hunter may not purchase more than one license for each big game
species except as authorized by rule of the commission. The fees for
annual big game combination packages are as follows:
(a) Big game number 1: Deer, elk, bear, and cougar. The fee for
this license is sixty-six dollars for residents, six hundred sixty
dollars for nonresidents, and thirty-three dollars for youth.
(b) Big game number 2: Deer and elk. The fee for this license is
fifty-six dollars for residents, five hundred sixty dollars for
nonresidents, and twenty-eight dollars for youth.
(c) Big game number 3: Deer or elk, bear, and cougar. At the time
of purchase, the holder must identify either deer or elk. The fee for
this license is forty-six dollars for residents, four hundred sixty
dollars for nonresidents, and twenty-three dollars for youth.
(d) Big game number 4: Deer or elk. At the time of purchase, the
holder must identify either deer or elk. The fee for this license is
thirty-six dollars for residents, three hundred sixty dollars for
nonresidents, and eighteen dollars for youth.
(e) Big game number 5: Bear and cougar. The fee for this license
is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred dollars for nonresidents,
and ten dollars for youth.
(2) In the event that the commission authorizes a two animal big
game limit, the fees for the second animal are as follows:
(a) Elk: The fee is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.
(b) Deer: The fee is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.
(c) Bear: The fee is ten dollars for residents, one hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.
(d) Cougar: The fee is ten dollars for residents, one hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.
(3) In the event that the commission authorizes a special permit
hunt for goat, sheep, or moose, the permit fees are as follows:
(a) Mountain goat: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents,
one thousand dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.
(b) Sheep: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents, one
thousand dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.
(c) Moose: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents, one
thousand dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.
Authorization to hunt the species set out under subsection (3)(a)
through (c) of this section is by special permit identified under RCW
77.32.370.
(4) The commission may adopt rules to reduce the price of a license
or eliminate the transportation tag requirements concerning bear or
cougar when necessary to meet harvest objectives.
(5) The minimum age to apply for a big game license is ten years
old.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.32.460 and 2000 c 109 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A small game hunting license is required to hunt for all
classified wild animals and wild birds, except big game. A small game
license also allows the holder to hunt for unclassified wildlife. The
small game license includes one transport tag for turkey.
(a) The fee for this license is thirty dollars for residents, one
hundred fifty dollars for nonresidents, and fifteen dollars for youth.
(b) The fee for this license if purchased in conjunction with a big
game combination license package is sixteen dollars for residents,
eighty dollars for nonresidents, and eight dollars for youth.
(c) The fee for a three-consecutive-day small game license is fifty
dollars for nonresidents.
(2) The fee for each additional turkey tag is eighteen dollars for
residents, sixty dollars for nonresidents, and nine dollars for youth.
(3) The minimum age to apply for a small game license is ten years
old.

--- END ---