BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The land, water, and other resources of Washington are being
severely impacted by the invasion of an increasing number of harmful
invasive plant and animal species.
(2) These impacts are resulting in damage to Washington's
environment and causing economic hardships.
(3) The multitude of public and private organizations with an
interest in controlling and preventing the spread of harmful invasive
species in Washington need a mechanism for cooperation, communication,
collaboration, and developing a statewide plan of action to meet these
threats.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) There is created the Washington invasive
species council to exist until December 31, 2011. Staff support to the
council shall be provided by the committee and from the agencies
represented on the council. For administrative purposes, the council
shall be located within the committee.
(2) The purpose of the council is to provide policy level
direction, planning, and coordination for combating harmful invasive
species throughout the state and preventing the introduction of others
that may be potentially harmful.
(3) The council is a joint effort between local, tribal, state, and
federal governments, as well as the private sector and nongovernmental
interests. The purpose of the council is to foster cooperation,
communication, and coordinated approaches that support local, state,
and regional initiatives for the prevention and control of invasive
species.
(4) For the purposes of this chapter, "invasive species" include
nonnative organisms that cause economic or environmental harm and are
capable of spreading to new areas of the state. "Invasive species"
does not include domestic livestock, intentionally planted agronomic
crops, or nonharmful exotic organisms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Membership in the council includes a
representative from the following state entities:
(a) The department of agriculture, represented by the director or
the director's designee;
(b) The department of fish and wildlife, represented by the
director or the director's designee;
(c) The department of ecology, represented by the director or the
director's designee;
(d) The department of natural resources, represented by the
commissioner or the commissioner's designee;
(e) The department of transportation, represented by the secretary
or the secretary's designee; and
(f) The Washington state noxious weed control board, appointed by
the board.
(2) The councilmembers may add members to the council as the
councilmembers deem appropriate to accomplish its goals.
(3) The council must invite one representative each from the United
States department of agriculture, the United States fish and wildlife
service, the United States environmental protection agency, and the
United States coast guard to participate on the council in a nonvoting,
ex officio capacity.
(4) A representative of the office of the governor must convene the
first meeting of the council and serve as chair until the council
selects a chair. At the first meeting of the council, the council
shall address issues including, but not limited to, voting methods,
meeting schedules, and the need for and use of advisory and technical
committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The council's goals are to:
(1) Minimize the effects of harmful invasive species on
Washington's citizens and ensure the economic and environmental well-being of the state;
(2) Serve as a forum for identifying and understanding invasive
species issues from all perspectives;
(3) Serve as a forum to facilitate the communication, cooperation,
and coordination of local, tribal, state, federal, private, and
nongovernmental entities for the prevention, control, and management of
nonnative invasive species;
(4) Serve as an avenue for public outreach and for raising public
awareness of invasive species issues;
(5) Develop and implement a statewide invasive species strategic
plan as described in this chapter;
(6) Review the current funding mechanisms and levels for state
agencies to manage noxious weeds on the lands under their authority;
(7) Make recommendations for legislation necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter;
(8) Establish criteria for the prioritization of invasive species
response actions and projects; and
(9) Utilizing the process described in subsection (8) of this
section, select at least one project per year from the strategic plan
for coordinated action by the Washington invasive species councilmember
entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The council shall develop and
periodically update a statewide strategic plan for addressing invasive
species. The strategic plan should incorporate the reports and
activities of the aquatic nuisance species committee, the biodiversity
council, the state noxious weed control board, and other appropriate
reports and activities.
(2) The strategic plan must, at a minimum, address:
(a) Statewide coordination and intergovernmental cooperation;
(b) Prevention of new biological invasions through deliberate or
unintentional introduction;
(c) Inventory and monitoring of invasive species;
(d) Early detection of and rapid response to new invasions;
(e) Control, management, and eradication of established populations
of invasive species;
(f) Projects that can be implemented during the period covered by
the strategic plan for the control, management, and eradication of new
or established populations of invasive species;
(g) Revegetation, reclamation, or restoration of native species
following control or eradication of invasive species;
(h) Research and public education;
(i) Funding and resources available for invasive species
prevention, control, and management; and
(j) Recommendations for legislation necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.
(3) The strategic plan must be updated at least once every three
years following its initial development. The strategic plan must be
submitted to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature
by September 15th of each applicable year. The council shall complete
the initial strategic plan within two years of the effective date of
this section.
(4) Each state department and agency named to the council shall,
consistent with state law, make best efforts to implement elements of
the completed plan that are applicable to the department or agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The council shall submit an annual
report of its activities to the governor and the relevant policy
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 15th
of each year. The annual report must include an evaluation of progress
made in the preceding year to implement or carry out the strategic plan
and an identification of projects from the strategic plan that will be
a focus for the following year.
(2) Prior to the start of the 2011 legislative session, the council
must prepare a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
that makes recommendations as to the extension or modification of the
council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The council may establish advisory and
technical committees that it considers necessary to aid and advise the
council in the performance of its functions. The committees may be
continuing or temporary committees. The council shall determine the
representation, membership, terms, and organization of the committees
and appoint their members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The invasive species council account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
appropriations, gifts, grants, and donations must be deposited into the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of the council. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW and the approval of the director of
the committee is required for expenditures. All expenditures must be
directed by the council.

Sec. 9 RCW 79A.25.010 and 1989 c 237 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Definitions: As used in this chapter:
(1) "Marine recreation land" means any land with or without
improvements which (a) provides access to, or in whole or in part
borders on, fresh or salt water suitable for recreational use by
watercraft, or (b) may be used to create, add to, or make more usable,
bodies of water, waterways, or land, for recreational use by
watercraft.
(2) "Public body" means any county, city, town, port district, park
and recreation district, metropolitan park district, or other municipal
corporation which is authorized to acquire or improve public outdoor
recreation land, and shall also mean Indian tribes now or hereafter
recognized as such by the federal government for participation in the
land and water conservation program.
(3) "Tax on marine fuel" means motor vehicle fuel tax which is (a)
tax on fuel used in, or sold or distributed for use in, any watercraft,
(b) refundable pursuant to chapter 82.36 RCW, and (c) paid to the
director of licensing with respect to taxable sales, distributions, or
uses occurring on or after December 3, 1964.
(4) "Watercraft" means any boat, vessel, or other craft used for
navigation on or through water.
(5) "Committee" means the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation.
(6) "Director" means the director of the interagency committee for
outdoor recreation.
(7) "Council" means the Washington invasive species council created
in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 8 of this act expires December 31,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 8 of this act are each
added to chapter 79A.25 RCW.

--- END ---