BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.80.130 and 2001 c 237 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Water conservancy)) (1) Board activities are subject to the open
public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW and to chapter 42.32 RCW. This
includes announcing meetings in advance.
(2) Boards shall annually provide to the department information
disclosing all payments or donations of moneys, services, and the
provision of donated facilities and equipment for the support of any of
the board's activities during the preceding year. Such disclosure does
not include the donation of services by a commissioner carrying out
board responsibilities, and does not include donations by a
commissioner of moneys or the provision of facilities or equipment
where the value of the donation does not exceed one thousand dollars.
The information shall identify the payor or donor, describe the amount
or type of payment or donation, and the activity or activities that it
supports. The department shall incorporate a summary of the
information in its biennial report required by RCW 90.80.150.

--- END ---