BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 17.15.010 and 1997 c 357 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Integrated pest management" means a coordinated decision-making and action process that uses the most appropriate pest control
((methods and strategy in an environmentally and economically sound
manner to meet agency programmatic pest management objectives)) science
and methods to produce long-term prevention or suppression of pest
problems in a cost-effective manner with minimum impact on human
health, the environment, and nontarget organisms, in order to avoid
unacceptable damage to agency programs and property and to the health
and welfare of the citizens of the state. The elements of integrated
pest management include:
(a) Preventing pest problems through sanitation, habitat
modification, cultural techniques, and other methods;
(b) Monitoring for the presence of pests and pest damage;
(c) Establishing the density of the pest population, that may be
set at zero, that can be tolerated or correlated with a damage level
sufficient to warrant treatment of the problem based on health, public
safety, economic, or aesthetic thresholds;
(d) Treating pest problems to reduce populations below those levels
established by damage thresholds ((using strategies that may include
biological, cultural, mechanical, and chemical control methods and that
must consider human health, ecological impact, feasibility, and cost-effectiveness)) with physical, mechanical, cultural, biological,
chemical, and educational methods to keep pest organisms numbers low
enough to prevent unacceptable damage. Chemicals and all other pest
suppression methods used within the framework of integrated pest
management must be carefully evaluated for their health, environmental,
and economic consequences, and for their effectiveness and reliability;
and
(e) Evaluating the effects and efficacy of pest treatments.
(2) "Pest" means, but is not limited to, any insect, rodent,
nematode, snail, slug, weed, and any form of plant or animal life or
virus, except virus, bacteria, or other microorganisms on or in a
living person or other animal or in or on processed food or beverages
or pharmaceuticals, which is normally considered to be a pest, or which
the director of the department of agriculture may declare to be a pest.

Sec. 2 RCW 17.15.030 and 1997 c 357 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A state agency or institution listed in RCW 17.15.020 shall
provide integrated pest management training for employees responsible
for pest management. The training programs shall be developed in
cooperation with the interagency integrated pest management
coordinating committee created under RCW 17.15.040.
(2) A state agency or institution listed in RCW 17.15.020 shall
designate an integrated pest management coordinator and the department
of labor and industries and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall each designate one representative to serve on the
committee established in RCW 17.15.040.
(3) The integrated pest management coordinator shall:
(a) Manage the integrated pest management program of the agency or
institution; and
(b) Report periodically to the interagency integrated pest
management coordinating committee about the implementation of the
agency or institution program. The report must:
(i) Identify pest problems within the purview or potential purview
of the program that have occurred since the last report from that
agency or institution;
(ii) Describe the integrated pest management program implemented to
address the problems;
(iii) Address the effectiveness of the integrated pest management
program used in dealing with each problem and any significant impacts
that may have occurred through action or lack of action by the agency
or institution involved; and
(iv) Identify additional pests that are anticipated to become a
problem and describe the integrated pest management program to be
considered in response to the problem.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 17.15 RCW
to read as follows:
When a state agency or institution named in RCW 17.15.020 conducts
or provides for conducting the application of pesticides to the
buildings, grounds, or lands under the agency's management, the agency
or institution shall ensure that prior to the application a marker is
placed at the usual points of entry by employees and the public to the
property. If the application is made to an isolated area that is not
a substantial portion of the property, the applicator is required to
place a marker only at the application site. The marker must be a
minimum of four inches by five inches. It must have the words: "THIS
AREA HAS BEEN TREATED BY" as the headline, the name of the pesticide
applied in the body of the text, and "FOR MORE INFORMATION PLEASE CALL"
as the footer. Larger size requirements for markers may be established
by the department of agriculture by rule for specific applications.
The agency or institution shall ensure that the marker remains in place
for such period as is recommended on the pesticide label for that type
of application or, if not specified on the label, for a period
sufficient to minimize any risks of exposure to sensitive individuals.

--- END ---