BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter or rules
or procedures adopted by the authority under this chapter, the
authority may make available a tricare supplemental insurance policy,
32 C.F.R. Sec. 199.17 (2004), to employees who are eligible. This
supplemental policy may be offered as one of the board's health
coverage options. Employee selection of this supplemental policy is
exclusive of selecting any other medical coverage offered through the
board. If offered by the board, this supplemental policy shall be made
available to employees, and retired or disabled employees, eligible for
coverage available under the authority, but not eligible for medicare
parts A and B.
(2) The administrator may adopt rules to carry out the purposes of
this section.

--- END ---