BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the intent of the legislature that
each county establish a veterans' assistance program to benefit
indigent veterans and their families. These programs must be funded,
at least in part, by veterans' assistance funds. The legislature
intends also for each county to establish a veterans' advisory board
responsible for advising the county legislative authority on needed and
appropriate assistance programs for local indigent veterans and their
families. Recognizing the valuable insight and perspectives that
veterans offer, it is the intent of the legislature that each board be
comprised entirely of veterans.
(2) The legislature recognizes that ongoing veterans' relief or
assistance programs in some areas of the state have provided meaningful
assistance to indigent veterans and family members. The legislature
further recognizes that veterans' service organizations have
traditionally been the initial point of contact for indigent veterans
and family members seeking assistance. In recognition of these
factors, the legislature intends to authorize, upon the satisfaction of
certain administrative requirements, existing veterans' relief or
assistance programs to continue providing needed and effective
assistance to indigent veterans and their families.
(3) The legislature recognizes that counties respond to the needs
of indigent veterans and family members in the manner most appropriate
to the needs and resources of the county. The legislature intends for
the provisions of this act to facilitate the effective use of
assistance funds through efficient model programs that benefit veterans
and family members experiencing financial hardships.
(4) It is the policy of the state of Washington that bias shall not
play a role in the distribution of the veterans' assistance fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 73.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Direct costs" includes those allowable costs that can be
readily assigned to the statutory objectives of this chapter,
consistent with the cost principles promulgated by the federal office
of management and budget in circular No. A-87, dated May 10, 2004.
(2) "Family" means the spouse, widow, widower, and dependent
children of a living or deceased veteran.
(3) "Indigent" means a person who is defined as such by the county
legislative authority using one or more of the following definitions:
(a) Receiving one of the following types of public assistance:
Temporary assistance for needy families, general assistance, poverty-related veterans' benefits, food stamps or food stamp benefits
transferred electronically, refugee resettlement benefits, medicaid, or
supplemental security income;
(b) Receiving an annual income, after taxes, of up to one hundred
fifty percent or less of the current federally established poverty
level, or receiving an annual income not exceeding a higher qualifying
income established by the county legislative authority; or
(c) Unable to pay reasonable costs for shelter, food, utilities,
and transportation because his or her available funds are insufficient.
(4) "Indirect costs" includes those allowable costs that are
generally associated with carrying out the statutory objectives of this
chapter, but the identification and tracking of those costs cannot be
readily assigned to a specific statutory objective without an
accounting effort that is disproportionate to the benefit received. A
county legislative authority may allocate allowable indirect costs to
its veterans' assistance fund if it is accomplished in a manner
consistent with the cost principles promulgated by the federal office
of management and budget in circular No. A-87, dated May 10, 2004.
(5) "Veteran" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 41.04.005 and
41.04.007.
(6) "Veterans' advisory board" means a board established by a
county legislative authority under the authority of section 4 of this
act.
(7) "Veterans' assistance fund" means an account in the custody of
the county auditor, or the chief financial officer in a county
operating under a charter, that is funded by taxes levied under the
authority of RCW 73.08.080.
(8) "Veterans' assistance program" means a program approved by the
county legislative authority under the authority of RCW 73.08.010 that
is fully or partially funded by the veterans' assistance fund
authorized by RCW 73.08.080.

Sec. 3 RCW 73.08.010 and 2002 c 292 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the relief of indigent ((and suffering)) veterans ((as
defined in RCW 41.04.007 and)), their families ((or)), and the families
of ((those)) deceased indigent veterans, ((who need assistance in any
city, town or precinct in this state,)) the legislative authority of
((the)) each county ((in which the city, town or precinct is situated
shall provide such sum or sums of money as may be necessary, to be
drawn upon by the commander and quartermaster, or commander and
adjutant or commander and service officer of any post, camp or chapter
of any national organization of veterans now, or which may hereafter
be, chartered by an act of congress in the city or town upon
recommendation of the relief committee of said post, camp or chapter:
PROVIDED, Said veteran or the families of those deceased are and have
been residents of the state for at least twelve months, and the orders
of said commander and quartermaster, or commander and adjutant or
commander and service officer shall be the proper voucher for the
expenditure of said sum or sums of money)) shall establish a veterans'
assistance program to address the needs of local indigent veterans and
their families. The county legislative authority shall consult with
and solicit recommendations from the veterans' advisory board
established under section 4 of this act to determine the appropriate
services needed for local indigent veterans. Veterans' assistance
programs shall be funded, at least in part, by the veterans' assistance
fund created under the authority of RCW 73.08.080.
(2) The county legislative authority may authorize other entities
to administer a veterans' assistance program or programs through
grants, contracts, or interlocal agreements. If the county legislative
authority authorizes another entity to administer a veterans'
assistance program or programs, the terms of the grant, contract, or
interlocal agreement must, for each program, specify:
(a) The details of the program;
(b) The responsibilities of all parties;
(c) The duration of the program;
(d) The costs and sources of funding;
(e) Any insurance or bond requirements;
(f) The format and frequency of progress and final reports; and
(g) Any other information deemed necessary or appropriate by either
party.
(3) If the county legislative authority authorizes another entity
to administer a veterans' assistance program or programs, the
authorized entity should, to the extent feasible and consistent with
this chapter, ensure that a local branch of a nationally recognized
veterans' service organization is the initial point of contact for a
veteran or family member seeking assistance.
(4) Nothing in this section shall prohibit or be construed as
prohibiting a county from authorizing the continued operation of a
veterans' relief or assistance program or programs existing on January
1, 2005, if the authorizing legislative authority:
(a) Solicits advice from the veterans' advisory board established
in section 4 of this act; and
(b) Satisfies the grant, contractual, or interlocal agreement
requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 73.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority for each county must establish a
veterans' advisory board. Upon its establishment, the board shall
advise the county legislative authority on the needs of local indigent
veterans, the resources available to local indigent veterans, and
programs that could benefit the needs of local indigent veterans and
their families.
(2) The county legislative authority must solicit representatives
from either local branches of nationally recognized veterans' service
organizations or the veterans' community at large, or both, to serve on
the board. No fewer than a majority of the board members shall be
members from nationally recognized veterans' service organizations and
only veterans are eligible to serve as board members.
(3) Service on the board is voluntary. The county legislative
authority may provide for reimbursement to board members for expenses
incurred.

Sec. 5 RCW 73.08.070 and 2002 c 292 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
((It shall be the duty of)) (1) The legislative authority ((in each
of the counties in this state to)) for each county must designate
((some)) a proper authority ((other than the one designated by law for
the care of paupers and the custody of criminals who shall cause to be
interred)) to be responsible, at the expense of the county ((the body
of any honorably discharged veterans as defined in RCW 41.04.007 and
the wives, husbands, minor children, widows or widowers of such
veterans, who shall hereafter die)), for the burial or cremation of any
deceased indigent veteran or deceased family member of an indigent
veteran who died without leaving means sufficient to defray funeral
expenses((; and when requested so to do by the commanding officer of
any post, camp or chapter of any national organization of veterans now,
or which may hereafter be, chartered by an act of congress or the
relief committee of any such posts, camps or chapters: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That such interment shall not cost more than)). The costs of
such a burial or cremation may not exceed the limit established by the
county legislative authority nor be less than three hundred dollars.
(2) If the deceased has relatives or friends who desire to conduct
the burial or cremation of such deceased person, then ((upon request of
said commander or relief committee)) a sum not to exceed the limit
established by the county legislative authority nor less than three
hundred dollars shall be paid to ((said)) the relatives or friends by
the county ((treasurer, upon)) auditor, or by the chief financial
officer in a county operating under a charter. Payment shall be made
to the relatives or friends upon presenting to the auditor or chief
financial officer due proof of the death ((and)), burial ((of any
person provided for by this section and proof of expenses incurred)) or
cremation, and expenses incurred.
(3) Expenses incurred for the burial or cremation of a deceased
indigent veteran or the deceased family member of an indigent veteran
as provided by this section shall be paid from the veterans' assistance
fund authorized by RCW 73.08.080.

Sec. 6 RCW 73.08.080 and 1985 c 181 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative ((authorities of the several counties in this
state)) authority in each county shall levy, in addition to the taxes
now levied by law, a tax in a sum equal to the amount which would be
raised by not less than one and one-eighth cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value, and not greater than twenty-seven cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value against the taxable property of their
respective counties, to be levied and collected as now prescribed by
law for the assessment and collection of taxes, for the purpose of
creating ((the veteran's)) a veterans' assistance fund ((for the relief
of honorably discharged veterans as defined in RCW 41.04.005 and the
indigent wives, husbands, widows, widowers and minor children of such
indigent or deceased veterans, to be disbursed for such relief by such
county legislative authority: PROVIDED, That if)). Expenditures from
the veterans' assistance fund, and interest earned on balances from the
fund, may be used only for:
(a) The veterans' assistance programs authorized by RCW 73.08.010;
(b) The burial or cremation of a deceased indigent veteran or
deceased family member of an indigent veteran as authorized by RCW
73.08.070; and
(c) The direct and indirect costs incurred in the administration of
the fund as authorized by subsection (2) of this section.
(2) If the funds on deposit((, less outstanding warrants,
residing)) in the ((veteran's)) veterans' assistance fund, less
outstanding warrants, on the first Tuesday in September exceed the
expected yield of one and one-eighth cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value against the taxable property of the county, the county
legislative authority may levy a lesser amount((: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That the)). The direct and indirect costs incurred in the
administration of ((said veteran's)) the veterans' assistance fund
shall be computed by the county ((treasurer)) auditor, or the chief
financial officer in a county operating under a charter, not less than
annually ((and such amount)). Following the computation of these
direct and indirect costs, an amount equal to these costs may then be
transferred from the ((veteran's)) veterans' assistance fund ((as
herein provided for)) to the county current expense fund.
(3) The amount of a levy allocated to the purposes specified in
this section may be reduced in the same proportion as the regular
property tax levy of the county is reduced by chapter 84.55 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.04.007 and 2002 c 292 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Veteran" includes every person, who at the time he or she seeks
the benefits of RCW 72.36.030, 41.04.010, 73.04.090, 73.04.110,
73.08.010, ((73.08.060,)) 73.08.070, or 73.08.080 has received an
honorable discharge or received a discharge for medical reasons with an
honorable record, where applicable, and who has served in at least one
of the following capacities:
(1) As a member in any branch of the armed forces of the United
States, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, and has
fulfilled his or her initial military service obligation;
(2) As a member of the women's air forces service pilots;
(3) As a member of the armed forces reserves, national guard, or
coast guard, and has been called into federal service by a presidential
select reserve call up for at least one hundred eighty cumulative days;
(4) As a civil service crewmember with service aboard a U.S. army
transport service or U.S. naval transportation service vessel in
oceangoing service from December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946; or
(5) As a member of the Philippine armed forces/scouts during the
period of armed conflict from December 7, 1941, through August 15,
1945.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 73.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of social and health services shall exempt payments
provided under sections 2 and 4 of this act and RCW 73.08.010,
73.08.070, and 73.08.080 when determining eligibility for public
assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 73.08.030 (Procedure where no veterans' organization in
precinct) and 1983 c 295 s 2, 1947 c 180 s 2, 1945 c 144 s 2, 1921 c 41
s 2, 1907 c 64 s 2, & 1888 p 208 s 2;
(2) RCW 73.08.040 (Notice of intention to furnish relief -- Annual
statement) and 1947 c 180 s 3, 1945 c 144 s 3, 1921 c 41 s 3, 1907 c 64
s 3, & 1888 p 209 s 3;
(3) RCW 73.08.050 (Performance bond may be required) and 1983 c 295
s 3, 1947 c 180 s 4, 1945 c 144 s 4, 1921 c 41 s 4, 1907 c 64 s 4, &
1888 p 209 s 4; and
(4) RCW 73.08.060 (Restrictions on sending veterans or families to
almshouses, etc.) and 2002 c 292 s 8, 1983 c 295 s 4, 1947 c 180 s 5,
1945 c 144 s 5, 1919 c 83 s 5, 1907 c 64 s 5, & 1888 p 209 s 5.

--- END ---