BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning on January 1, 2006, all electronic voting devices shall
produce an individual paper record, at the time of voting, that may be
reviewed by the voter before finalizing his or her vote. This record
may not be removed from the polling place and must be human readable
without an interface and machine readable for counting purposes. If
the device is programmed to display the ballot in multiple languages,
the paper record produced must be printed in the language used by each
voter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Paper records produced by poll-site based electronic voting devices
are subject to all of the requirements of this chapter and chapter
29A.60 RCW for ballot handling, preservation, reconciliation, transit
to the counting center, and storage. The paper records must be
preserved in the same manner and for the same period of time as
ballots.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 29A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
The electronic record produced and counted by poll-site electronic
voting devices is the official record of each vote for election
purposes. The paper record produced under section 1 of this act must
be stored and maintained for use only in the following circumstances:
(1) In the event of a mandatory manual recount of votes under RCW
29A.64.021;
(2) In the event of a requested recount under RCW 29A.64.011;
(3) By order of the county canvassing board;
(4) By order of a court of competent jurisdiction; or
(5) For use in the random audit of results described in section 6
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 29A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
A voter voting on a poll-site based electronic voting system may
not leave the device during the voting process, except to verify his or
her ballot or to request assistance from the precinct election
officers, until the voting process is completed.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.12.080 and 2003 c 111 s 308 are each amended to
read as follows:
No voting device shall be approved by the secretary of state unless
it:
(1) Secures to the voter secrecy in the act of voting;
(2) Permits the voter to vote for any person for any office and
upon any measure that he or she has the right to vote for;
(3) Permits the voter to vote for all the candidates of one party
or in part for the candidates of one or more other parties;
(4) Correctly registers all votes cast for any and all persons and
for or against any and all measures;
(5) Provides that a vote for more than one candidate cannot be cast
by one single operation of the voting device or vote tally system
except when voting for president and vice president of the United
States; ((and))
(6) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this state, has
been tested, certified, and used in at least one other state or
election jurisdiction; and
(7) Beginning on January 1, 2006, in the case of an electronic
voting system, produces a machine-countable paper record for each vote
that may be reviewed and accepted or rejected by the voter before
finalizing his or her vote, as a part of the voting process. Rejected
records must either be destroyed or marked in order to clearly identify
the record as rejected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 29A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
Before the close of business on the day after election day, the
county auditor shall conduct an audit of results of votes cast on the
poll-site based electronic voting devices used in the county. This
audit must be conducted by randomly selecting by lot, up to four
percent of the poll-site based electronic voting devices or one
electronic voting device, whichever is greater, and comparing the
results recorded by each device with those recorded on the paper
records created by that device. Three races or issues, randomly
selected by lot, must be audited on each device. Tabulation of paper
ballots for purposes of the audit required in this section must be
conducted as follows: On one-fourth of the machines selected for
audit, the paper records must be tabulated manually; on the remaining
machines, the paper records may be tabulated by a mechanical device
determined by the secretary of state to be capable of accurately
reading the votes cast and printed thereon and qualified for use in the
state under applicable state and federal laws. This audit procedure
must be subject to observation by political party representatives if
representatives have been appointed and are present at the time of the
audit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 29A.84 RCW
to read as follows:
Anyone who removes a paper record produced by a poll-site based
electronic voting system from a polling place without authorization is
guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

--- END ---