BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a
comprehensive cancer center to the extent the amounts are exempt from
federal income tax.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "comprehensive cancer center"
means a cancer center that has written confirmation that it is
recognized by the national cancer institute as a comprehensive cancer
center and that qualifies as an exempt organization under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 501(c)(3) as existing on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of
medical supplies, chemicals, or materials to a comprehensive cancer
center. The exemption in this section does not apply to the sale of
construction materials, office equipment, building equipment,
administrative supplies, or vehicles.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Comprehensive cancer center" has the meaning provided in
section 1 of this act.
(b) "Chemical" means any catalyst, solvent, water, acid, oil, or
other additive that physically or chemically interacts with blood,
bone, or tissue.
(c) "Materials" means any item of tangible personal property,
including, but not limited to, bags, packs, collecting sets, filtering
materials, testing reagents, antisera, and refrigerants used or
consumed in performing research on, procuring, testing, processing,
storing, packaging, distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue.
(d) "Research" means basic and applied research that has as its
objective the design, development, refinement, testing, marketing, or
commercialization of a product, service, or process.
(e) "Medical supplies" means any item of tangible personal
property, including any repair and replacement parts for such tangible
personal property, used by a comprehensive cancer center for the
purpose of performing research on, procuring, testing, processing,
storing, packaging, distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue. The
term includes tangible personal property used to:
(i) Provide preparatory treatment of blood, bone, or tissue;
(ii) Control, guide, measure, tune, verify, align, regulate, test,
or physically support blood, bone, or tissue; and
(iii) Protect the health and safety of employees or others present
during research on, procuring, testing, processing, storing, packaging,
distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of medical supplies, chemicals, or materials by a comprehensive
cancer center. The exemption in this section does not apply to the use
of construction materials, office equipment, building equipment,
administrative supplies, or vehicles.
(2) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

--- END ---