BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.44.210 and 2003 c 111 s 1120 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person desiring to vote at any primary or election must
show proof of voter registration.
(2) Any person desiring to vote at any primary or election is
required to sign his or her name on the appropriate precinct list of
registered voters. If the voter registered using a mark, or can no
longer sign his or her name, the election officers shall require the
voter to be identified by another registered voter.
(3) Any person desiring to vote at any primary or election must
show photo identification.
(4) The precinct election officers shall then record the voter's
name.

--- END ---