BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.94.015 and 1995 c 355 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section for the
initial registration of an instrument or device, no weighing or
measuring instrument or device may be used for commercial purposes in
the state unless its commercial use is registered annually. If its
commercial use is within a city that has a city sealer and a weights
and measures program as provided by RCW 19.94.280, the commercial use
of the instrument or device shall be registered with the city if the
city has adopted fees pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. If
its commercial use is outside of such a city, the commercial use of the
instrument or device shall be registered with the department.
(2) A city with such a sealer and program may establish an annual
fee for registering the commercial use of such a weighing or measuring
instrument or device with the city. The annual registration fees shall
((not exceed the fee established in RCW 19.94.175 for registering the
use of a similar instrument or device with the department)) be set so
that the total of those fees does not exceed the cost of enforcing and
administering the weights and measures program in the city. Fees upon
weighing or measuring instruments or devices within the jurisdiction of
the city that are collected under this subsection by city sealers shall
be deposited into the general fund, or other account, of the city as
directed by the governing body of the city.
(3) Registrations with the department are accomplished as part of
the master license system under chapter 19.02 RCW. Payment of the
registration fee for a weighing or measuring instrument or device under
the master license system constitutes the registration required by this
section.
(4) The fees established by or under RCW 19.94.175, or by a city,
for registering a weighing or measuring instrument or device shall be
paid to the department of licensing concurrently with an application
for a master license or with the annual renewal of a master license
under chapter 19.02 RCW. A weighing or measuring instrument or device
shall be initially registered with the state at the time the owner
applies for a master license for a new business or at the first renewal
of the license that occurs after the instrument or device is first
placed into commercial use. However, the use of an instrument or
device that is in commercial use on the effective date of this act
shall be initially registered at the time the first renewal of the
master license of the owner of the instrument or device is due
following the effective date of this act. The department of licensing
shall remit to the department of agriculture, or to each city charging
registration fees under this section, all fees collected under this
provision less reasonable collection expenses.
(5) Each city charging registration fees under this section shall
notify the department of agriculture at the time such fees are adopted
and whenever changes in the fees are adopted.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.94.175 and 1995 c 355 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 19.94.015, the following annual registration
fees shall be charged for each weighing or measuring instrument or
device used for commercial purposes in this state:

(a) Weighing devices:

(i) Small scales "zero to four
hundred pounds capacity" . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5.00

(ii) Intermediate scales "four
hundred one pounds to five
thousand pounds capacity" . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20.00

(iii) Large scales "over five
thousand pounds capacity" . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 52.00

(iv) Large scales with supplemental
devices . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 52.00

(v) Railroad track scales . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 800.00

(b) Liquid fuel metering devices:

(i) Motor fuel meters with flows of
less than twenty gallons per
minute . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5.00

(ii) Motor fuel meters with flows of
more than twenty but not more
than one hundred fifty gallons
per minute . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 16.00

(iii) Motor fuel meters with flows
over one hundred fifty gallons
per minute . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25.00

(c) Liquid petroleum gas meters:

(i) With one inch diameter or
smaller dispensers . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10.00

(ii) With greater than one inch
diameter dispensers . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 30.00

(d) Fabric meters . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5.00

(e) Cordage meters . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5.00

(f) Mass flow meters . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 14.00

(g) Taxi meters . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5.00

(2) With the exception of subsections (3) and (4) of this section,
no person shall be required to pay more than the established fee
adopted under this section for any weighing or measuring instrument or
device in any one year.
(3) A city with its own weights and measures program may charge
fees higher than those in subsection (1) of this section, but in no
case may the total of those fees exceed the cost of enforcing and
administering the weights and measures program in the city.
(4) The department or a city sealer may establish reasonable
inspection and testing fees for each type or class of weighing or
measuring instrument or device specially requested to be inspected or
tested by the device owner. These inspection and testing fees shall be
limited to those amounts necessary for the department or city sealer to
cover the direct costs associated with such inspection and testing.
The fees established under this subsection shall not be set so as to
compete with service agents normally engaged in such services.

--- END ---