BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.58.005 and 1991 c 3 s 342 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Registrant" means the person named on the vital record whom
the recorded event primarily concerns.
(3) "Vital records" means records of birth, death, fetal death,
marriage, dissolution, annulment, and legal separation, as maintained
under the supervision of the state registrar of vital statistics.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.58.082 and 1997 c 108 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person may prepare or issue any birth certificate that purports
to be an original, certified copy, or copy of a birth certificate
except as authorized in this chapter.
(1) The department shall adopt rules providing for the release of
paper or electronic copies of birth certificate records ((that)).
Except for birth certificates provided under subsection (4) of this
section, the rules shall include adequate means for determining the
proper identity of the person making the request for the release of the
record by requiring the presentation of either a valid photo
identification issued to the person by any federal, state, or local
government or two forms of nonphotographic identification issued to the
person both of which must include the person's signature, adequate
standards for maintaining the security and confidentiality((, assure))
of the records, adequate assurances that the proper record is
identified, and ((prevent fraudulent use of records)) adequate
safeguards for preventing the fraudulent use of the record by requiring
an applicant to state his or her purpose for requesting the record and
his or her relationship to the registrant. All certified copies of
birth certificates in the state must be on paper and in a format
provided and approved by the department and must include security
features to deter the alteration, counterfeiting, duplication, or
simulation without ready detection.
(2) Except for birth certificates provided under subsection (4) of
this section, the rules shall limit the release of paper or electronic
copies of birth certificate records to: (a) The registrant or a parent
or legal guardian of the registrant; (b) the registrant's spouse, adult
sibling, grandparent, or adult descendant; (c) an authorized
representative of an individual named in (a) or (b) of this subsection.
A representative may prove authorization by producing a letter of
permission with a notarized signature of an individual named in (a) or
(b) of this subsection; (d) an attorney representing the registrant;
(e) a member of a law enforcement agency who is conducting official
business; and (f) any person or agency empowered by statute or
appointed by a court to act on the registrant's behalf.
(3) Upon the registrant's death, birth certificate records in the
custody of the department become public records and any person may
obtain copies of such records, upon submission of the appropriate fee,
an application containing sufficient information to locate the record,
and proof of the registrant's death. The copies shall prominently
display the marking "DECEASED."
(4) Federal, state, and local governmental agencies may, upon
request and with submission of the appropriate fee, be furnished copies
of birth certificates if the birth certificate will be used for the
agencies' official duties. The department may enter into agreements
with offices of vital statistics outside the state for the transmission
of copies of birth certificates to those offices when the birth
certificates relate to residents of those jurisdictions and receipt of
copies of birth certificates from those offices. The agreement must
specify the statistical and administrative purposes for which the birth
certificates may be used and must provide instructions for the proper
retention and disposition of the copies. Copies of birth certificates
that are received by the department from other offices of vital
statistics outside the state must be handled as provided under the
agreements.
The department may disclose information that may identify any
person named in any birth certificate record for research purposes as
provided under chapter 42.48 RCW.

--- END ---