BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.96.041 and 1993 c 449 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever an action or proceeding for damages is brought against
any past or present officer, employee, or volunteer of a local
governmental entity of this state, arising from acts or omissions while
performing or in good faith purporting to perform his or her official
duties, such officer, employee, or volunteer may request the local
governmental entity to authorize the defense of the action or
proceeding at the expense of the local governmental entity.
(2)(a) If the legislative authority of the local governmental
entity, or the local governmental entity using a procedure created by
ordinance or resolution, finds that the acts or omissions of the
officer, employee, or volunteer were, or in good faith purported to be,
within the scope of his or her official duties, the request shall be
granted. If the request is granted, the necessary expenses of
defending the action or proceeding shall be paid by the local
governmental entity.
However, the legislative authority may revoke or rescind the
granting of the request, and decline to pay further expenses if it
finds, following the same procedure, that the acts or omissions of the
officer, employee, or volunteer were not, or in good faith did not
purport to be, within the scope of his or her official duties.
(b) Any monetary judgment against the officer, employee, or
volunteer shall be paid on approval of the legislative authority of the
local governmental entity or by a procedure for approval created by
ordinance or resolution.
(3) The necessary expenses of defending an elective officer of the
local governmental entity in a judicial hearing to determine the
sufficiency of a recall charge as provided in RCW ((29.82.023))
29A.56.140 shall be paid by the local governmental entity if the
officer requests such defense and approval is granted by both the
legislative authority of the local governmental entity and the attorney
representing the local governmental entity. The expenses paid by the
local governmental entity may include costs associated with an appeal
of the decision rendered by the superior court concerning the
sufficiency of the recall charge.
(4) When an officer, employee, or volunteer of the local
governmental entity has been represented at the expense of the local
governmental entity under subsection (1) of this section and the court
hearing the action has found that the officer, employee, or volunteer
was acting within the scope of his or her official duties, and a
judgment has been entered against the officer, employee, or volunteer
under chapter 4.96 RCW or 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1981 et seq., thereafter the
judgment creditor shall seek satisfaction for nonpunitive damages only
from the local governmental entity, and judgment for nonpunitive
damages shall not become a lien upon any property of such officer,
employee, or volunteer. The legislative authority of a local
governmental entity may, pursuant to a procedure created by ordinance
or resolution, agree to pay an award for punitive damages.
(5)(a) When a law enforcement officer makes a request for defense
under subsection (1) of this section, the determination under
subsection (2) of this section as to whether or not the acts or
omissions of the law enforcement officer were, or in good faith
purported to be, within the scope of his or her official duties shall
be made within one hundred twenty days. If the request is granted, the
necessary expenses of defending the action or proceeding shall be paid
by the local governmental entity. The proceedings conducted under
subsection (2) of this section may be conducted in executive session in
accordance with chapter 42.30 RCW and all meetings, proceedings, and
deliberations of the legislative authority of the local governmental
entity with regard to the request of the officer, law enforcement
officer, employee, or volunteer is confidential. However, the final
action of the legislative authority as to the acceptance or denial of
the request, or revocation or revision of a previous decision, must be
done in public session. The proceedings, reports, or written records
of the legislative authority, or of a member, employee, staff person,
or investigator of the legislative authority, are not subject to the
public disclosure act, chapter 42.17 RCW.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "law enforcement officer" has
the meaning provided in RCW 9.41.010.

--- END ---