BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.195 and 1993 c 492 s 222 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this ((title)) chapter or
rules or procedures adopted by the authority, the authority shall make
available to retired or disabled employees who are ((eligible for))
enrolled in parts A and B of medicare ((at least two)) one or more
medicare supplemental insurance policies that conform to the
requirements of chapter 48.66 RCW. ((One policy shall include coverage
for prescription drugs.)) The policies shall be chosen in consultation
with the public employees' benefits board. These policies shall be
made available to retired or disabled state employees((, or)); retired
or disabled school district employees; retired employees of county,
municipal, or other political subdivisions eligible for coverage
available under the authority; or surviving spouses of emergency
service personnel killed in the line of duty. ((All offerings shall be
made available not later than January 1, 1994.))

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.197 and 1993 c 492 s 223 are each amended to
read as follows:
((If a waiver of the medicare statute, Title XVIII of the federal
social security act, sufficient to meet the requirements of chapter
492, Laws of 1993 is not granted on or before January 1, 1995,)) The
medicare supplemental insurance policies authorized under RCW 41.05.195
shall be made available to any resident of the state ((eligible for
medicare benefits. Except for those retired state or school district
employees eligible to purchase medicare supplemental benefits through
the authority, persons)) who:
(1) Is enrolled in parts A and B of medicare; and
(2) Is not eligible to purchase coverage as a retired or disabled
employee under RCW 41.05.195. State residents purchasing a medicare
supplemental insurance policy under this section shall be required to
pay the full cost of any such policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 41.05.190 (Medicare supplemental
insurance plan) and 1998 c 245 s 37 & 1993 c 492 s 221 are each
repealed.

--- END ---