BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
The sponsor of a mailed political advertising must, within two
working days after the date of the mailing, file an example of the
mailed political advertising with the secretary of state for inclusion
with the state archives and records under chapter 40.14 RCW.

--- END ---