BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The governing documents may not prohibit the outdoor display of
political yard signs by an owner or resident on the owner's or
resident's property for a period of ninety days before any primary or
election. The governing documents may include reasonable rules and
regulations regarding the placement and manner of display of political
yard signs.
(2) For purposes of this section, "political yard sign" means any
outdoor sign with dimensions no greater than eight feet by four feet
that contains a message supporting or opposing a candidate or ballot
measure that will be on a primary or election ballot within ninety
days.
(3) This section applies retroactively to any governing documents
in effect on the effective date of this section. Any provision in a
governing document in effect on the effective date of this section that
is inconsistent with this section is void and unenforceable.

--- END ---