BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the University of
Washington Bothell, University of Washington Tacoma, Washington State
University Tri-Cities, and Washington State University Vancouver have
each conducted a thorough review of the campus mission and model of
educational services and made recommendations to the legislature for
the future evolution of the campus. The legislature further finds that
in setting the course for branch campus expansion, the needs of the
higher education system as a whole must be considered. The legislature
recognizes that there are regional differences in relation to capacity
gaps and programmatic needs of students that require a differential
approach to individual branch campus expansion and that similar
treatment of each campus may no longer be the most efficient way in
which to address the higher education needs of the state. The
legislature further believes that the original mission of branch
campuses to contribute to regional economic development requires
differential treatment of each campus based on the regional economic
and higher education needs. Therefore, it is the legislature's intent
to authorize each campus to expand its educational offerings to include
lower-division courses but the expansion shall be unique to each
campus, reflect the needs of the region the campus serves, and continue
to support collaboration with the entire higher education system. It
is further the intent of the legislature to make decisions relating to
enrollments and per-student funding for the higher education
institutions in the omnibus operating budget.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.45.014 and 2004 c 57 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The primary mission of the higher education branch campuses
created under this chapter remains to expand access to baccalaureate
and master's level graduate education in underserved urban areas of the
state, both in collaboration with community and technical colleges for
transfer students and, to the extent authorized by this chapter, by
offering lower-division courses or admitting freshman and sophomore
students.
(2) Branch campuses shall collaborate with the community and
technical colleges in their region to develop articulation agreements,
dual admissions policies, and other partnerships to ensure that branch
campuses serve as innovative models of a two plus two educational
system. Other possibilities for collaboration include but are not
limited to joint development of curricula and degree programs,
colocation of instruction, and arrangements to share faculty.
(3) In communities where a private postsecondary institution is
located, representatives of the private institution may be invited to
participate in the conversation about meeting the baccalaureate and
master's level graduate needs in underserved urban areas of the state.
(4) ((However, the legislature recognizes there are alternative
models for achieving this primary mission. Some campuses may have
additional missions in response to regional needs and demands. At
selected branch campuses, an innovative combination of instruction and
research targeted to support regional economic development may be
appropriate to meet the region's needs for both access and economic
viability. Other campuses should focus on becoming models of a two
plus two educational system through continuous improvement of
partnerships and agreements with community and technical colleges.
Still other campuses may be best suited to transition to a four-year
comprehensive university or be removed from designation as a branch
campus entirely.
(5))) It is the legislature's intent that each branch campus be
funded commensurate with its unique mission((,)) and the degree
programs offered, ((and the institutional combination of instruction
and research,)) but at a level less than a research university.
(((6))) (5) In consultation with the higher education coordinating
board, a branch campus may propose legislation to authorize practice-oriented or professional doctoral programs if: (a) Unique research
facilities and equipment are located near the campus; or (b) the campus
can clearly demonstrate student and employer demand in the region that
is linked to regional economic development.
(((7) It is not the legislature's intent to have each campus chart
its own future path without legislative guidance. Instead, the
legislature intends to consider carefully the mission and model of
education that best suits each campus and best meets the needs of
students, the community, and the region.))

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.45.020 and 1994 c 217 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A primary responsibility of the University of Washington is
((responsible for ensuring)) to provide for the expansion of upper-division and graduate educational programs in the central Puget Sound
area under rules or guidelines adopted by the higher education
coordinating board and in accordance with proportionality agreements
emphasizing access for transfer students developed with the state board
for community and technical colleges. The University of Washington
shall meet that responsibility through the operation of at least two
branch campuses. One branch campus shall be located in the Tacoma
area. Another branch campus shall be collocated with Cascadia
Community College in the Bothell-Woodinville area. In addition to
upper-division and graduate educational programs, the branch campuses
may offer lower-division coursework and enroll freshman and sophomore
students as established in this section. This additional authority
does not permit the branch campuses to restrict transfer capacity and
access, but rather is intended to authorize the campuses to create
additional lower-division capacity in accordance with regional needs.
(2) The University of Washington Tacoma may offer lower-division
coursework and enroll freshman and sophomore students who meet the
university's admission criteria, in accordance with the campus plan
submitted to the higher education coordinating board in 2004. The
University of Washington Tacoma shall continue to collaborate with
surrounding community and technical colleges.
(3) The University of Washington Bothell may offer lower-division
coursework only to the extent those courses are linked to specific
majors in fields that are not addressed by programs offered at Cascadia
community college. The University of Washington Bothell shall
establish coadmission or coenrollment agreements with, at a minimum,
Cascadia Community College by 2006 and may admit lower-division
students through such agreements.
Starting in 2006, the University of Washington Bothell may also
offer targeted programs for freshmen and sophomores that create
additional baccalaureate pathways for students who meet the
university's admission criteria. These programs shall supplement and
not duplicate existing two plus two programs with community colleges.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.45.030 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A primary responsibility of Washington State University is
((responsible for providing)) to provide for upper-division and
graduate level higher education programs to the citizens of the Tri-Cities area, under rules or guidelines adopted by the higher education
coordinating board and in accordance with proportionality agreements
emphasizing access for transfer students developed with the state board
for community and technical colleges. Washington State University
shall meet that responsibility through the operation of a branch campus
in the Tri-Cities area. The branch campus shall replace and supersede
the Tri-Cities university center. All land, facilities, equipment, and
personnel of the Tri-Cities university center shall be transferred from
the University of Washington to Washington State University.
(2) In addition to upper-division and graduate level higher
education programs, Washington State University Tri-Cities may offer
lower-division coursework only to the extent those courses are linked
to specific majors in fields that are not addressed by programs offered
at the local community and technical college serving the community in
which the program is offered. This additional authority does not
permit the branch campus to restrict transfer capacity and access, but
rather is intended to authorize the campus to create additional lower-division capacity in accordance with regional needs. Washington State
University Tri-Cities shall establish a coadmission or coenrollment
agreement with Columbia Basin College by 2006 and may admit lower-division students through such agreements.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.45.040 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A primary responsibility of Washington State University is
((responsible for providing)) to provide for upper-division and
graduate level higher education programs to the citizens of the
southwest Washington area, under rules or guidelines adopted by the
higher education coordinating board and in accordance with
proportionality agreements emphasizing access for transfer students
developed with the state board for community and technical colleges.
Washington State University shall meet that responsibility through the
operation of ((a)) the Vancouver branch campus ((in the southwest
Washington area)).
(2) In addition to upper-division and graduate level higher
education programs, Washington State University Vancouver may offer
lower-division coursework and enroll freshman and sophomore students
who meet the university's admission criteria. This additional
authority does not permit the branch campus to restrict transfer
capacity and access, but rather is intended to authorize the campus to
create additional lower-division capacity in accordance with regional
needs.

--- END ---