BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.72 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any provision within an initiative approved by the voters that
amends, repeals, or otherwise modifies a local tax imposed by any
county, city, town, or other municipal corporation shall take effect
only if a majority of the voters voting on the initiative who live
within the boundaries of the county, city, town, or municipal
corporation approve the initiative.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not invalidate other
provisions of an initiative if the remaining provisions are severable.
Provisions are severable if they are independent in purpose and express
written construction.

--- END ---