BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 31.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A licensee shall:
(a) When collecting any delinquent small loan, not garnish any
wages or salary paid for service in the armed forces;
(b) Defer for the duration of the posting all collection activity
against a military borrower who has been deployed to a combat or combat
support posting for the duration of the posting;
(c) Not contact the military chain of command of a military
borrower in an effort to collect a delinquent small loan;
(d) Honor the terms of any repayment agreement between the licensee
and any military borrower, including any repayment agreement negotiated
through military counselors or third party credit counselors; and
(e) Not make a loan to a person that the licensee knows is a
military borrower from a specific location that a military base
commander has notified the licensee in writing is designated off-limits
to military personnel.
(2) For purposes of this section, "military borrower" means any
active duty member of the armed forces of the United States, or any
member of the national guard or the reserves of the armed forces of the
United States who has been called to active duty.

--- END ---