BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A consumer may elect to place a security freeze on his or her
credit report by making a request in writing by certified mail to a
consumer credit reporting agency. "Security freeze" means a notice
placed in a consumer's credit report, at the request of the consumer
and subject to certain exceptions, that prohibits the consumer credit
reporting agency from releasing the consumer's credit report or any
information from it without the express authorization of the consumer.
If a security freeze is in place, information from a consumer's credit
report may not be released to a third party without prior express
authorization from the consumer. This subsection does not prevent a
consumer credit reporting agency from advising a third party that a
security freeze is in effect with respect to the consumer's credit
report.
(2) A consumer credit reporting agency shall place a security
freeze on a consumer's credit report no later than five business days
after receiving a written request from the consumer.
(3) The consumer credit reporting agency shall send a written
confirmation of the security freeze to the consumer within ten business
days and shall provide the consumer with a unique personal
identification number or password to be used by the consumer when
providing authorization for the release of his or her credit for a
specific party or period of time.
(4) If the consumer wishes to allow his or her credit report to be
accessed for a specific party or period of time while a freeze is in
place, he or she shall contact the consumer credit reporting agency,
request that the freeze be temporarily lifted, and provide the
following:
(a) Proper identification, which means that information generally
deemed sufficient to identify a person. Only if the consumer is unable
to reasonably identify himself or herself, may a consumer credit
reporting agency require additional information concerning the
consumer's employment and personal or family history in order to verify
his or her identity;
(b) The unique personal identification number or password provided
by the credit reporting agency under subsection (3) of this section;
and
(c) The proper information regarding the third party who is to
receive the credit report or the time period for which the report is
available to users of the credit report.
(5) A consumer credit reporting agency that receives a request from
a consumer to temporarily lift a freeze on a credit report under
subsection (4) of this section, shall comply with the request no later
than three business days after receiving the request.
(6) A consumer credit reporting agency may develop procedures
involving the use of telephone, fax, the internet, or other electronic
media to receive and process a request from a consumer to temporarily
lift a freeze on a credit report under subsection (4) of this section
in an expedited manner.
(7) A consumer credit reporting agency shall remove or temporarily
lift a freeze placed on a consumer's credit report only in the
following cases:
(a) Upon consumer request, under subsection (4) or (10) of this
section; and
(b) When the consumer's credit report was frozen due to a material
misrepresentation of fact by the consumer. When a consumer credit
reporting agency intends to remove a freeze upon a consumer's credit
report under this subsection, the consumer credit reporting agency
shall notify the consumer in writing prior to removing the freeze on
the consumer's credit report.
(8) When a third party requests access to a consumer credit report
on which a security freeze is in effect, and this request is in
connection with an application for credit or any other use, and the
consumer does not allow his or her credit report to be accessed for
that specific party or period of time, the third party may treat the
application as incomplete.
(9) When a consumer requests a security freeze, the consumer credit
reporting agency shall disclose the process of placing and temporarily
lifting a freeze, and the process for allowing access to information
from the consumer's credit report for a specific party or period of
time while the freeze is in place.
(10) A security freeze remains in place until the consumer requests
that the security freeze be removed. A consumer credit reporting
agency shall remove a security freeze within three business days of
receiving a request for removal from the consumer, who provides both of
the following:
(a) Proper identification, as defined in subsection (4)(a) of this
section; and
(b) The unique personal identification number or password provided
by the credit reporting agency under subsection (3) of this section.
(11) This section does not apply to the use of a consumer credit
report by any of the following:
(a) A person or entity, or a subsidiary, affiliate, or agent of
that person or entity, or an assignee of a financial obligation owing
by the consumer to that person or entity, or a prospective assignee of
a financial obligation owing by the consumer to that person or entity
in conjunction with the proposed purchase of the financial obligation,
with which the consumer has or had prior to assignment an account or
contract, including a demand deposit account, or to whom the consumer
issued a negotiable instrument, for the purposes of reviewing the
account or collecting the financial obligation owing for the account,
contract, or negotiable instrument. For purposes of this subsection,
"reviewing the account" includes activities related to account
maintenance, monitoring, credit line increases, and account upgrades
and enhancements;
(b) A subsidiary, affiliate, agent, assignee, or prospective
assignee of a person to whom access has been granted under subsection
(4) of this section for purposes of facilitating the extension of
credit or other permissible use;
(c) Any state or local agency, law enforcement agency, trial court,
or private collection agency acting under a court order, warrant, or
subpoena;
(d) A child support agency acting under Title IV-D of the social
security act (42 U.S.C. et seq.);
(e) The department of social and health services acting to fulfill
any of its statutory responsibilities;
(f) The internal revenue service acting to investigate or collect
delinquent taxes or unpaid court orders or to fulfill any of its other
statutory responsibilities;
(g) The use of credit information for the purposes of prescreening
as provided for by the federal fair credit reporting act;
(h) Any person or entity administering a credit file monitoring
subscription service to which the consumer has subscribed; and
(i) Any person or entity for the purpose of providing a consumer
with a copy of his or her credit report upon the consumer's request.
(12) This section and sections 2 through 6 of this act, do not
prevent a consumer credit reporting agency from charging a fee of no
more than ten dollars to a consumer for each freeze, removal of the
freeze, or temporary lift of the freeze for a period of time, or a fee
of no more than twelve dollars for a temporary lift of a freeze for a
specific party, regarding access to a consumer credit report, except
that a consumer credit reporting agency may not charge a fee to a
victim of identity theft, as defined in RCW 9.35.020, who has submitted
a valid police report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
If a security freeze is in place, a consumer credit reporting
agency may not change any of the following official information in a
consumer credit report without sending a written confirmation of the
change to the consumer within thirty days of the change being posted to
the consumer's file: Name, date of birth, social security number, and
address. Written confirmation is not required for technical
modifications of a consumer's official information, including name and
street abbreviations, complete spellings, or transposition of numbers
or letters. In the case of an address change, the written confirmation
shall be sent to both the new address and to the former address.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
Sections 1 and 2 of this act do not apply to a consumer credit
reporting agency that acts only as a reseller of credit information by
assembling and merging information contained in the data base of
another consumer credit reporting agency or multiple consumer credit
reporting agencies, and does not maintain a permanent data base of
credit information from which new consumer credit reports are produced.
However, a consumer credit reporting agency must honor any security
freeze placed on a consumer credit report by another consumer credit
reporting agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
The following entities are not required to place a security freeze
in a credit report under section 1 of this act:
(1) A check services or fraud prevention services company, which
issues reports on incidents of fraud or authorizations for the purpose
of approving or processing negotiable instruments, electronic funds
transfers, or similar methods of payments; and
(2) A deposit account information service company, which issues
reports regarding account closures due to fraud, substantial
overdrafts, ATM abuse, or similar negative information regarding a
consumer, to inquiring banks or other financial institutions for use
only in reviewing a consumer request for a deposit account at the
inquiring bank or financial institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
A consumer may elect that his or her name be removed from any list
that a consumer credit reporting agency furnishes for credit card
solicitations, by notifying the consumer credit reporting agency, by
telephone or in writing, under the notification system maintained by
the consumer credit reporting agency. The election is effective for a
minimum of two years, unless otherwise specified by the consumer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
A consumer credit reporting agency may furnish to a governmental
agency a consumer's name, address, former address, places of
employment, or former places of employment.

--- END ---