BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.290 and 2001 c 239 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When ((an)) a completed application complying with the
provisions of this chapter and with the rules of the department has
been filed, the ((same)) application shall be placed on record with the
department, and it shall be ((its)) the department's duty to
((investigate the application, and)) determine what water, if any, is
available for appropriation, and find and determine to what beneficial
use or uses it can be applied. The department shall investigate the
application. The applicant shall provide a completed application form.
In addition to providing the information requested on the form,
however, the applicant shall also provide such information as may be
required for the department's investigation, determinations, and
findings regarding the application and may provide additional
information. The information provided by the applicant must satisfy
the protocols, that is, study plans and criteria, established by the
department for obtaining and providing the information. If an
applicant provides the information and the protocols set by the
department for obtaining and providing it have been satisfied, the
department shall review the information and may take actions to verify
that the information is accurate.
(2) With regard to an application:
(a) If it is proposed to appropriate water for irrigation purposes,
the department shall investigate, determine, and find what lands are
capable of irrigation by means of water found available for
appropriation((.));
(b) If it is proposed to appropriate water for the purpose of power
development, the department shall investigate, determine and find
whether the proposed development is likely to prove detrimental to the
public interest, having in mind the highest feasible use of the waters
belonging to the public.
(((2))) (3)(a) If the application does not contain, and the
applicant does not promptly furnish sufficient information on which to
base such findings, the department may issue a preliminary permit, for
a period of not to exceed three years, requiring the applicant to make
such surveys, investigations, studies, and progress reports, as in the
opinion of the department may be necessary. If the applicant fails to
comply with the conditions of the preliminary permit, it and the
application or applications on which it is based shall be automatically
canceled and the applicant so notified. If the holder of a preliminary
permit shall, before its expiration, file with the department a
verified report of expenditures made and work done under the
preliminary permit, which, in the opinion of the department,
establishes the good faith, intent, and ability of the applicant to
carry on the proposed development, the preliminary permit may, with the
approval of the governor, be extended, but not to exceed a maximum
period of five years from the date of the issuance of the preliminary
permit.
(b) For any application for which a preliminary permit was issued
and for which the availability of water was directly affected by a
moratorium on further diversions from the Columbia river during the
years from 1990 to 1998, the preliminary permit is extended through
June 30, 2002. If such an application and preliminary permit were
canceled during the moratorium, the application and preliminary permit
shall be reinstated until June 30, 2002, if the application and permit:
(i) Are for providing regional water supplies in more than one urban
growth area designated under chapter 36.70A RCW and in one or more
areas near such urban growth areas, or the application and permit are
modified for providing such supplies, and (ii) provide or are modified
to provide such regional supplies through the use of existing intake or
diversion structures. The authority to modify such a canceled
application and permit to accomplish the objectives of (b)(i) and (ii)
of this subsection is hereby granted.
(((3))) (4) The department shall make and file as part of the
record in the matter, written findings of fact concerning all things
investigated((, and)). The department shall make a summary of the
record of examination, and the proposed permit if the department
proposes to issue the permit, available to the public and provide a
period of at least forty-five days for the public to submit comments
thereon. If ((it)) the department shall find that there is water
available for appropriation for a beneficial use, and the appropriation
thereof as proposed in the application will not impair existing rights
or be detrimental to the public welfare, it shall issue a permit
stating the amount of water to which the applicant shall be entitled
and the beneficial use or uses to which it may be applied: PROVIDED,
That where the water applied for is to be used for irrigation purposes,
it shall become appurtenant only to such land as may be reclaimed
thereby to the full extent of the soil for agricultural purposes. But
where there is no unappropriated water in the proposed source of
supply, or where the proposed use conflicts with existing rights, or
threatens to prove detrimental to the public interest, having due
regard to the highest feasible development of the use of the waters
belonging to the public, it shall be duty of the department to reject
such application and to refuse to issue the permit asked for.
(((4))) (5) If the permit is refused because of conflict with
existing rights and such applicant shall acquire same by purchase or
condemnation under RCW 90.03.040, the department may thereupon grant
such permit. Any application may be approved for a less amount of
water than that applied for, if there exists substantial reason
therefor, and in any event shall not be approved for more water than
can be applied to beneficial use for the purposes named in the
application. In determining whether or not a permit shall issue upon
any application, it shall be the duty of the department to investigate
all facts relevant and material to the application. After the
department approves said application in whole or in part and before any
permit shall be issued thereon to the applicant, such applicant shall
pay the fee provided in RCW 90.03.470: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the
event a permit is issued by the department upon any application, it
shall be its duty to notify the director of fish and wildlife and
interested federally recognized Indian tribes of such issuance.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.270 and 1987 c 109 s 85 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon receipt of ((an)) a completed water rights application form,
it shall be the duty of the department to ((make an endorsement thereon
of the)) date ((of its receipt,)) stamp and ((to)) keep a record of
((same)) it. If ((upon examination,)) an application form is filed
with the department but the information requested on the application
form is ((found to be defective, it)) not complete or the form is not
accompanied by the proper application fee, the form shall be returned
to the applicant ((for correction or completion,)) and the date and the
reasons for the return thereof shall be ((endorsed thereon and made a
record in his office. No application shall lose its priority of filing
on account of such defects, provided acceptable maps, drawings and such
data as is required by the department shall be filed with the
department within such reasonable time as it shall require)) noted in
the department's records and in a letter returning the form. The
department may not require an applicant to provide information in
support of an application for a water right permit that is not
necessary for the department's investigations, determinations, or
findings regarding that particular application.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.03.280 and 1994 c 264 s 83 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon receipt of a ((proper)) completed application, the department
shall instruct the applicant to publish notice ((thereof)) in a form
and within a time prescribed by the department in a newspaper of
general circulation published in the county or counties in which the
storage, diversion or withdrawal, and use is to be made, and in such
other newspapers as the department may direct, once a week for two
consecutive weeks. The notice shall include information pertinent to
the proposed appropriation, including the location, the source, the
purpose or purposes of use, and the annual or instantaneous quantity
proposed to be diverted or withdrawn. The notice shall state that
persons wishing to protest the proposed appropriation must do so in
writing to the department within thirty days of the last date of
publication of the notice. In order to be considered by the
department, a protest must be received by the department within thirty
days of the last date of publication of the notice. Upon receipt by
the department of an application it shall send notice thereof
containing pertinent information to the director of fish and wildlife.

--- END ---