BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that the "Washington Lighthouses"
license plate has been reviewed by the special license plate review
board under RCW 46.16.725, and found to fully comply with RCW 46.16.715
through 46.16.775.
(2) The department shall issue a special license plate displaying
a symbol or artwork, approved by the special license plate review board
and the legislature, recognizing an organization that supports selected
Washington state lighthouses and provides environmental education
programs. The special license plate may be used in lieu of regular or
personalized license plates for vehicles required to display one or two
vehicle license plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter
46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Washington Lighthouses license plates" means license plates issued
under section 1 of this act that display a symbol or artwork
recognizing the efforts of lighthouse environmental programs in
Washington state.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.313 and 2004 c 221 s 3, 2004 c 48 s 3, and 2004
c 35 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department may establish a fee of no more than forty
dollars for each type of special license plates issued under RCW
46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by section
5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the
cost of production of the special license plates and the administration
of this program. This fee is in addition to all other fees required to
register and license the vehicle for which the plates have been
requested. All such additional special license plate fees collected by
the department shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to
the motor vehicle fund.
(2) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars.
The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of
each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(3) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a collegiate
license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under
this subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by
it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the
state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The state
treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate collegiate license
plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.
(4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(5) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a special
baseball stadium license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be distributed
to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest
payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium,
as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(6) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of a
professional fire fighters and paramedics license plate shall pay an
initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount
not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW
46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the professional fire fighters
and paramedics license plates. Upon the determination by the
department that the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall
credit the proceeds to the Washington State Council of Fire Fighters
benevolent fund established under RCW 46.16.30902.
(7) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a professional fire
fighters and paramedics license plate shall, upon application, pay a
fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to
exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the professional fire fighters and paramedics
special license plate. Upon the determination by the department that
the state has been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds
to the Washington State Council of Fire Fighters benevolent fund
established under RCW 46.16.30902.
(8) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
November 1, 2004, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of a
"Helping Kids Speak" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "Helping Kids Speak" special license plate.
Upon the determination by the department that the state has been
reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the "Helping
Kids Speak" account established under RCW 46.16.30904.
(9) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on November
1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "Helping Kids Speak"
license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty dollars.
The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each
fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer shall credit
the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the department
determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost of
implementing the "Helping Kids Speak" special license plate. Upon the
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the "Helping Kids Speak" account
established under RCW 46.16.30904.
(10) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder of a "law
enforcement memorial" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the law enforcement memorial special license
plate. Upon the determination by the department that the state has
been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the law
enforcement memorial account established under RCW 46.16.30906.
(11) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "law enforcement
memorial" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the law enforcement memorial special license
plate. Upon the determination by the department that the state has
been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the law
enforcement memorial account established under RCW 46.16.30906.
(12)(a) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due
on or after January 1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required
to be paid upon application and registration of a vehicle, the holder
of a "Washington Lighthouses" license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the
cost of implementing the "Washington Lighthouses" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the lighthouse environmental
programs account established under section 4 of this act.
(b) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on or after
January 1, 2007, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon renewal of a vehicle registration, the holder of a "Washington
Lighthouses" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. Under RCW 46.16.755, the state treasurer
shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account until the
department determines that the state has been reimbursed for the cost
of implementing the "Washington Lighthouses" license plate. Upon
determination by the department that the state has been reimbursed, the
treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the lighthouse environmental
programs account established under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The lighthouse environmental programs account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Upon the department's determination
that the state had been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the
"Washington Lighthouses" special license plate, all receipts, except as
provided in RCW 46.16.313(12) (a) and (b), from "Washington
Lighthouses" license plates must be deposited into the account. Only
the director of the department of licensing or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.
(2) Funds in the account must be disbursed subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Under the requirements set out in RCW 46.16.765, the department
must contract with a qualified nonprofit organization to support
selected Washington state lighthouses that are accessible to the public
and staffed by volunteers; to provide environmental education programs;
and to provide grants for other Washington lighthouses to assist in
funding infrastructure preservation and restoration and to encourage
and support interpretive programs by lighthouse docents.
(b) For the purpose of this section, a "qualified nonprofit
organization" means a not-for-profit corporation incorporated and of
tax exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code. The organization must have been established for the
express purposes of supporting selected Washington state lighthouses
that are open to the public and staffed by volunteers; providing
environmental education programs; and encouraging and supporting
interpretive programs by lighthouse docents.
(c) The qualified nonprofit organization must meet all requirements
set out in RCW 46.16.765.

--- END ---