BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that, over the
next decade, large numbers of Washington students will graduate from
high school and seek access to higher education. Washington continues
to lag significantly behind other states in its production of students
with baccalaureate degrees and graduate degrees.
(2) The legislature also finds that a new public four-year
institution of higher education has not been created in the state of
Washington since 1967. The three comprehensive institutions of higher
education were created in the late 1890s when the state normal schools
were established and no new comprehensive institution of higher
education has been created since then.
(3) The legislature further finds that northern Snohomish county
and the surrounding region do not have reasonable access to a four-year
institution of higher education. The legislature further finds that
the creation of an additional four-year institution would complement
the existing structure and provide additional options for students.
(4) The legislature intends to create a four-year baccalaureate
degree granting institution in north Snohomish county.

PART I
NORTH SNOHOMISH STATE COLLEGE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 North Snohomish State College shall be in
north Snohomish county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 (1) The governance of North Snohomish
State College shall be vested in a board of trustees consisting of
eight members, one of whom shall be a student. The governor shall
select the student member from a list of candidates, of at least three
and not more than five, submitted by the student body. They shall be
appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate and, except
for the student member, shall hold their offices for a term of six
years from the first day of October and until their successors are
appointed and qualified. The student member shall hold his or her
office for a term of one year from the first day of June and until his
or her successor is appointed and qualified. The student member shall
be a full-time student in good standing at the college at the time of
appointment. Except for the student member, initial members shall be
appointed to staggered terms.
(2) Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In case of a vacancy, or when an appointment
is made after the date of expiration of the term, the governor shall
fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the trustee whose
office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 The board of North Snohomish State College
trustees shall elect one of its members chairperson, and it shall elect
a secretary, who may or may not be a member of the board. The board
may adopt bylaws for its government and for the government of the
school, which bylaws shall not be inconsistent with law, and may
prescribe the duties of its officers, committees, and employees. A
majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of all
business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 The board of North Snohomish State College
trustees shall hold at least two regular meetings each year, at such
times as may be provided by the board. Special meetings shall be held
as may be deemed necessary, whenever called by the chairperson or by a
majority of the board. Public notice of all meetings shall be given in
accordance with chapter 42.32 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 In addition to any other powers and duties
prescribed by law, the board of trustees of North Snohomish State
College:
(1) Shall have full control of the state college and its property
of various kinds, except as otherwise provided by law;
(2) Shall employ the president of the state college, the
president's assistants, members of the faculty, and other employees of
the institution, who, except as otherwise provided by law, shall hold
their positions, until discharged therefrom by the board for good and
lawful reason;
(3) With the assistance of the faculty of the state college, shall
prescribe the course of study in the various schools and departments
thereof and publish such catalogues thereof as the board deems
necessary, however the state board of education shall determine the
requisites for and give program approval of all courses leading to
teacher certification by such board;
(4) Establish such divisions, schools, or departments necessary to
carry out the purposes of the college and not otherwise proscribed by
law;
(5) Except as otherwise provided by law, may establish and erect
such new facilities as determined by the board to be necessary for the
college;
(6) May acquire real and other property as provided in RCW
28B.10.020;
(7) Except as otherwise provided by law, may purchase all supplies
and purchase or lease equipment and other personal property needed for
the operation or maintenance of the college;
(8) May establish, lease, operate, equip, and maintain self-supporting facilities in the manner provided in RCW 28B.10.300 through
28B.10.330;
(9) Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such
contracts as the trustees deem essential to college purposes;
(10) May receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and
bequests of real or personal property from whatsoever source, as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the college programs; sell,
lease, or exchange, invest or expend the same or the proceeds, rents,
profits, and income thereof except as limited by the terms and
conditions thereof; and adopt rules to govern the receipt and
expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof;
(11) Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating
board pursuant to RCW 28B.76.230, offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs, participate in consortia or centers, contract for off-campus educational programs, and purchase or lease major off-campus
facilities;
(12) May adopt such rules, and perform all other acts not forbidden
by law, as the board of trustees may in its discretion deem necessary
or appropriate to the administration of the college.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 (1) Subject to the provisions of RCW
35.21.779, the board of trustees of North Snohomish State College may:
(a) Contract for such fire protection services as may be necessary
for the protection and safety of the students, staff, and property of
the college;
(b) By agreement pursuant to the provisions of chapter 39.34 RCW,
join together with other agencies or political subdivisions of the
state or federal government and otherwise share in the accomplishment
of any of the purposes of (a) of this subsection.
(2) Neither the failure of the trustees to exercise any of its
powers under this section nor anything in this section detracts from
the lawful and existing powers and duties of political subdivisions of
the state to provide the necessary fire protection equipment and
services to persons and property within their jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 Each board of North Snohomish State
College trustees shall appoint a treasurer who shall be the financial
officer of the board and who shall hold office during the pleasure of
the board. Each treasurer shall render a true and faithful account of
all moneys received and paid out by him or her, and shall give bond for
the faithful performance of the duties of office in such amount as the
trustees require. North Snohomish State College shall pay the fees for
any such bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 The degree of bachelor of arts or the
degree of bachelor of science and/or the degree of bachelor of arts in
education may be granted to any student who has completed a four-year
course of study or the equivalent thereof at North Snohomish State
College.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 In addition to all other powers and duties
given to it by law, the board of trustees of North Snohomish State
College is hereby authorized to grant any degree through the master's
degree to any student who has completed a program of study and/or
research in those areas that are determined by the faculty and board of
trustees of the college to be appropriate for the granting of such
degree. Any degree authorized under this section is subject to the
review and approval of the higher education coordinating board.
The board of trustees, upon recommendation of the faculty, may also
confer honorary bachelor's or master's degrees upon persons other than
graduates of the institution, in recognition of their learning or
devotion to education, literature, art, or science. No degree may be
conferred in consideration of the payment of money or the donation of
any kind of property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 Every diploma issued by North Snohomish
State College shall be signed by the chairperson of the board of
trustees and by the president of the college, and sealed with the
appropriate seal. In addition, teaching certificates shall be
countersigned by the state superintendent of public instruction. Every
certificate shall specifically state what course of study the holder
has completed and for what length of time such certificate is valid in
the schools of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 A model school or schools or training
departments may be provided for North Snohomish State College, in which
students, before graduation, may have actual practice in teaching or
courses relative thereto under the supervision and observation of
critic teachers. All schools or departments involved shall organize
and direct their work being cognizant of public school needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 The board of trustees of North Snohomish
State College, if having a model school or training department as
authorized by section 111 of this act, shall, on or before the first
Monday of September of each year, file with the board of the school
district or districts in which such North Snohomish State College is
situated, a certified statement showing an estimate of the number of
public school pupils who will be required to make up such model school
and specifying the number required for each grade for which training
for students is required.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 It is the duty of the board of the school
district or districts with which a statement under section 112 of this
act has been filed, to apportion for attendance to the model school or
training department, a sufficient number of pupils from the public
schools under the supervision of the board as will furnish to North
Snohomish State College the number of pupils required in order to
maintain such facility. The president of North Snohomish State College
may refuse to accept any such pupil as in his or her judgment would
tend to reduce the efficiency of the model school or training
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 Annually, on or before the date for
reporting the school attendance of the school district in which the
model school or training department is situated, for the purpose of
taxation for the support of the common schools, the board of trustees
of North Snohomish State College, since having supervision over the
school, shall file with the board of the school district or districts
in which the model school or training department is situated, a report
showing the number of common school pupils at each such model school or
training department during the school year last passed, and the period
of their attendance, in the same form that reports of public schools
are made. Any superintendent of the school district so affected shall,
in reporting the attendance in the school district, segregate the
attendance at the model school or training department from the
attendance in the other schools of said district. Attendance shall be
credited, if credit is given therefor, to the school district in which
the pupil resides.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 Any student may be suspended or expelled
from North Snohomish State College who is found to be guilty of an
infraction of the rules of the institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 The president of North Snohomish State
College has general supervision of the college and must see that all
laws and rules of the board of trustees are observed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 North Snohomish State College is entitled
to receive and share in all the benefits and donations made and given
to similar institutions by the enabling act or other federal law to the
same extent as other state colleges are entitled to receive and share
in such benefits and donations.

PART II
GENERAL PROVISIONS
Sec. 201 RCW 28A.600.300 and 2002 c 80 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 28A.600.310 through 28A.600.400,
"participating institution of higher education" or "institution of
higher education" means:
(1) A community or technical college as defined in RCW 28B.50.030;
and
(2) Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University,
Washington State University, ((and)) The Evergreen State College, and
North Snohomish State College, if the institution's governing board
decides to participate in the program in RCW 28A.600.310 through
28A.600.400.

Sec. 202 RCW 28B.10.016 and 1992 c 231 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this title:
(1) "State universities" means the University of Washington and
Washington State University.
(2) "Regional universities" means Western Washington University at
Bellingham, Central Washington University at Ellensburg, and Eastern
Washington University at Cheney.
(3) "State colleges" means The Evergreen State College in Thurston
county and North Snohomish State College in north Snohomish county.
(4) "Institutions of higher education" or "postsecondary
institutions" means the state universities, the regional universities,
The Evergreen State College, North Snohomish State College, the
community colleges, and the technical colleges.
(5) "Governing board" means the board of regents or the board of
trustees of the institutions of higher education.

Sec. 203 RCW 28B.10.020 and 2004 c 275 s 47 are each amended to
read as follows:
The boards of regents of the University of Washington and
Washington State University, respectively, and the boards of trustees
of Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University,
Western Washington University, ((and)) The Evergreen State College, and
North Snohomish State College, respectively, shall have the power and
authority to acquire by exchange, gift, purchase, lease, or
condemnation in the manner provided by chapter 8.04 RCW for
condemnation of property for public use, such lands, real estate and
other property, and interests therein as they may deem necessary for
the use of said institutions respectively. However, the purchase or
lease of major off-campus facilities is subject to the approval of the
higher education coordinating board under RCW 28B.76.230.

Sec. 204 RCW 28B.10.022 and 2003 c 6 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The boards of regents of the state universities and the boards
of trustees of the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
and North Snohomish State College, and the state board for community
and technical colleges, are severally authorized to enter into
financing contracts as provided in chapter 39.94 RCW. Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, financing contracts shall
be subject to the approval of the state finance committee.
(2) The board of regents of a state university may enter into
financing contracts which are payable solely from and secured by all or
any component of the fees and revenues of the university derived from
its ownership and operation of its facilities not subject to
appropriation by the legislature and not constituting "general state
revenues," as defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state
Constitution, without the prior approval of the state finance
committee.
(3) Except for financing contracts for facilities or equipment
described under chapter 28B.140 RCW, the board of regents shall notify
the state finance committee at least sixty days prior to entering into
such contract and provide information relating to such contract as
requested by the state finance committee.

Sec. 205 RCW 28B.10.025 and 1990 c 33 s 557 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington state arts commission shall, in consultation with
the boards of regents of the University of Washington and Washington
State University and with the boards of trustees of the regional
universities, The Evergreen State College, North Snohomish State
College, and the community college districts, determine the amount to
be made available for the purchases of art under RCW 28B.10.027, and
payment therefor shall be made in accordance with law. The designation
of projects and sites, the selection, contracting, purchase,
commissioning, reviewing of design, execution and placement,
acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange, or disposition of works of
art shall be the responsibility of the Washington state arts commission
in consultation with the board of regents or trustees. However, the
costs to carry out the Washington state arts commission's
responsibility for maintenance shall not be funded from the moneys
referred to under this section, RCW 43.17.200, 43.19.455, or
28A.335.210, but shall be contingent upon adequate appropriations being
made for that purpose.

Sec. 206 RCW 28B.10.050 and 2004 c 275 s 48 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as the legislature shall otherwise specifically direct, the
boards of regents and the boards of trustees for the state
universities, the regional universities, ((and)) The Evergreen State
College, and North Snohomish State College may establish entrance
requirements for their respective institutions of higher education
which meet or exceed the minimum entrance requirements established
under RCW 28B.76.290(2).

Sec. 207 RCW 28B.10.140 and 2004 c 60 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The University of Washington, Washington State University, Central
Washington University, Eastern Washington University, Western
Washington University, ((and)) The Evergreen State College, and North
Snohomish State College are each authorized to train teachers and other
personnel for whom teaching certificates or special credentials
prescribed by the state board of education are required, for any grade,
level, department, or position of the public schools of the state.

Sec. 208 RCW 28B.10.265 and 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen
State College, North Snohomish State College, and the community
colleges may waive all or a portion of the tuition, operating, and
services and activities fees for children of any person who was a
Washington domiciliary and who within the past eleven years has been
determined by the federal government to be a prisoner of war or missing
in action in Southeast Asia, including Korea, or who shall become so
hereafter, if the children meet such other educational qualifications
as such institution of higher education shall deem reasonable and
necessary under the circumstances. Applicants for free or reduced
tuition shall provide institutional administrative personnel with
documentation of their rights under this section.

Sec. 209 RCW 28B.10.280 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
The boards of regents of the state universities and the boards of
trustees of regional universities, The Evergreen State College, North
Snohomish State College, and community college districts may each
create student loan funds, and qualify and participate in the National
Defense Education Act of 1958 and such other similar federal student
aid programs as are or may be enacted from time to time, and to that
end may comply with all of the laws of the United States, and all of
the rules, regulations and requirements promulgated pursuant thereto.

Sec. 210 RCW 28B.10.300 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
The boards of regents of the state universities and the boards of
trustees of the regional universities ((and)), The Evergreen State
College, and North Snohomish State College are severally authorized to:
(1) Enter into contracts with persons, firms, or corporations for
the construction, installation, equipping, repairing, renovating, and
betterment of buildings and facilities for the following:
(a) Dormitories;
(b) Hospitals;
(c) Infirmaries;
(d) Dining halls;
(e) Student activities;
(f) Services of every kind for students, including, but not limited
to, housing, employment, registration, financial aid, counseling,
testing, and offices of the dean of students;
(g) Vehicular parking; and
(h) Student, faculty, and employee housing and boarding;
(2) Purchase or lease lands and other appurtenances necessary for
the construction and installation of such buildings and facilities and
to purchase or lease lands with buildings and facilities constructed or
installed thereon suitable for the purposes aforesaid;
(3) Lease to any persons, firms, or corporations such portions of
the campus of their respective institutions as may be necessary for the
construction and installation of buildings and facilities for the
purposes aforesaid and the reasonable use thereof;
(4) Borrow money to pay the cost of the acquisition of such lands
and of the construction, installation, equipping, repairing,
renovating, and betterment of such buildings and facilities, including
interest during construction and other incidental costs, and to issue
revenue bonds or other evidence of indebtedness therefor, and to
refinance the same before or at maturity and to provide for the
amortization of such indebtedness from services and activities fees or
from the rentals, fees, charges, and other income derived through the
ownership, operation, and use of such lands, buildings, and facilities
and any other dormitory, hospital, infirmary, dining, student
activities, student services, vehicular parking, housing or boarding
building, or facility at the institution;
(5) Contract to pay as rental or otherwise the cost of the
acquisition of such lands and of the construction and installation of
such buildings and facilities on the amortization plan; the contract
not to run over forty years;
(6) Expend on the amortization plan services and activities fees
and/or any part of all of the fees, charges, rentals, and other income
derived from any or all revenue-producing lands, buildings, and
facilities of their respective institutions, heretofore or hereafter
acquired, constructed, or installed, including but not limited to
income from rooms, dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals, infirmaries,
housing or student activity buildings, vehicular parking facilities,
land or the appurtenances thereon, and to pledge such services and
activities fees and/or the net income derived through the ownership,
operation, and use of any lands, buildings, or facilities of the nature
described in subsection (1) ((hereof)) of this section for the payment
of part or all of the rental, acquisition, construction, and
installation, and the betterment, repair, and renovation or other
contract charges, bonds, or other evidence of indebtedness agreed to be
paid on account of the acquisition, construction, installation, or
rental of, or the betterment, repair, or renovation of, lands,
buildings, facilities, and equipment of the nature authorized by this
section.

Sec. 211 RCW 28B.10.350 and 2001 c 38 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When the cost to The Evergreen State College, North Snohomish
State College, any regional university, or state university, of any
building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition other
than maintenance or repairs will equal or exceed the sum of thirty-five
thousand dollars, complete plans and specifications for such work shall
be prepared and such work shall be put out for public bids and the
contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder if in
accordance with the bid specifications: PROVIDED, That when the
estimated cost of such building, construction, renovation, remodeling,
or demolition equals or exceeds the sum of twenty-five thousand
dollars, such project shall be deemed a public works and "the
prevailing rate of wage," under chapter 39.12 RCW shall be applicable
thereto: PROVIDED FURTHER, That when such building, construction,
renovation, remodeling, or demolition involves one trade or craft area
and the estimated cost exceeds fifteen thousand dollars, complete plans
and specifications for such work shall be prepared and such work shall
be put out for public bids, and the contract shall be awarded to the
lowest responsible bidder if in accordance with the bid specifications.
This subsection shall not apply when a contract is awarded by the small
works roster procedure authorized in RCW 39.04.155 or under any other
procedure authorized for an institution of higher education.
(2) The Evergreen State College, North Snohomish State College, any
regional university, or state university may require a project to be
put to public bid even when it is not required to do so under
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Where the estimated cost to The Evergreen State College, North
Snohomish State College, any regional university, or state university
of any building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition is
less than twenty-five thousand dollars or the contract is awarded by
the small works roster procedure authorized in RCW 39.04.155, the
publication requirements of RCW 39.04.020 shall be inapplicable.
(4) In the event of any emergency when the public interest or
property of The Evergreen State College, North Snohomish State College,
regional university, or state university would suffer material injury
or damage by delay, the president of such college or university may
declare the existence of such an emergency and reciting the facts
constituting the same may waive the requirements of this section with
reference to any contract in order to correct the condition causing the
emergency: PROVIDED, That an "emergency," for the purposes of this
section, means a condition likely to result in immediate physical
injury to persons or to property of such college or university in the
absence of prompt remedial action or a condition which immediately
impairs the institution's ability to perform its educational
obligations.

Sec. 212 RCW 28B.10.400 and 1979 ex.s. c 259 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of
trustees of the regional universities ((and of)), The Evergreen State
College, and North Snohomish State College, and the state board for
community and technical colleges ((education)) are authorized and
empowered:
(1) To assist the faculties and such other employees as any such
board may designate in the purchase of old age annuities or retirement
income plans under such rules ((and regulations)) as any such board may
prescribe. County agricultural agents, home demonstration agents, 4-H
club agents, and assistant county agricultural agents paid jointly by
the Washington State University and the several counties shall be
deemed to be full-time employees of the Washington State University for
((the)) these purposes ((hereof));
(2) To provide, under such rules ((and regulations)) as any such
board may prescribe for the faculty members or other employees under
its supervision, for the retirement of any such faculty member or other
employee on account of age or condition of health, retirement on
account of age to be not earlier than the sixty-fifth birthday:
PROVIDED, That such faculty member or such other employee may elect to
retire at the earliest age specified for retirement by federal social
security law: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any supplemental payment
authorized by subsection (3) of this section and paid as a result of
retirement earlier than age sixty-five shall be at an actuarially
reduced rate;
(3) To pay to any such retired person or to ((his)) the retiree's
designated beneficiary(s), each year after ((his)) retirement, a
supplemental amount which, when added to the amount of such annuity or
retirement income plan, or retirement income benefit pursuant to RCW
28B.10.415, received by ((him or his)) the retiree or the retiree's
designated beneficiary(s) in such year, will not exceed fifty percent
of the average annual salary paid to such retired person for his or her
highest two consecutive years of full-time service under an annuity or
retirement income plan established pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section at an institution of higher education: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That
if such retired person prior to ((his)) retirement elected a
supplemental payment survivors option, any such supplemental payments
to such retired person or his or her designated beneficiary(s) shall be
at actuarially reduced rates: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if a faculty
member or other employee of an institution of higher education who is
a participant in a retirement plan authorized by this section dies, or
has died before retirement but after becoming eligible for retirement
on account of age, the designated beneficiary(s) shall be entitled to
receive the supplemental payment authorized by this subsection (((3) of
this section)) to which such designated beneficiary(s) would have been
entitled had said deceased faculty member or other employee retired on
the date of death after electing a supplemental payment survivors
option: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for the purpose of this subsection, the
designated beneficiary(s) shall be (a) the surviving spouse of the
retiree; or, (b) with the written consent of such spouse, if any, such
other person or persons as shall have an insurable interest in the
retiree's life and shall have been nominated by written designation
duly executed and filed with the retiree's institution of higher
education.

Sec. 213 RCW 28B.10.401 and 1979 ex.s. c 259 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of
trustees of the state colleges, and the state board for community and
technical colleges ((education)), when establishing the amount of
supplemental payment under RCW 28B.10.400(3) ((as now or hereafter
amended)), shall apply the following assumptions:
(1) That the faculty member or such other employee at the time of
retirement elected a joint and two-thirds survivor option on their
annuity or retirement income plan using actual ages, but not exceeding
a five-year age difference if married, or an actuarial equivalent
option if single, which represents accumulations including all
dividends from all matching contributions and any benefit that such
faculty member is eligible to receive from any Washington state public
retirement plan while employed at an institution of higher education;
(2) That on and after July 1, 1974, matching contributions were
allocated equally between a fixed dollar and a variable dollar annuity;
(3) That for each year after age fifty, the maximum amount of
contributions pursuant to RCW 28B.10.410 ((as now or hereafter
amended)) be contributed toward the purchase of such annuity or
retirement income plan, otherwise three-fourths of the formula
described in RCW 28B.10.415((, as now or hereafter amended,)) shall be
applied.

Sec. 214 RCW 28B.10.405 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
Members of the faculties and such other employees as are designated
by the boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of
trustees of the regional universities ((and of)), The Evergreen State
College, and North Snohomish State College, or the state board for
community and technical colleges ((education)) shall be required to
contribute not less than five percent of their salaries during each
year of full-time service after the first two years of such service
toward the purchase of such annuity or retirement income plan; such
contributions may be in addition to federal social security tax
contributions, if any.

Sec. 215 RCW 28B.10.407 and 1987 c 448 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A faculty member or other employee designated by the boards of
regents of the state universities, the boards of trustees of the
regional universities ((and)), The Evergreen State College, and North
Snohomish State College, or the state board for community and technical
colleges ((education)) who is granted an authorized leave of absence
without pay may apply the period of time while on the leave in the
computation of benefits in any annuity and retirement plan authorized
under RCW 28B.10.400 through 28B.10.430 only to the extent provided in
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) An employee who is eligible under subsection (1) of this
section may receive a maximum of two years' credit during the
employee's entire working career for periods of authorized leave
without pay. Such credit may be obtained only if the employee pays
both the employer and employee contributions required under RCW
28B.10.405 and 28B.10.410 while on the authorized leave of absence and
if the employee returns to employment with the university or college
immediately following the leave of absence for a period of not less
than two years. The employee and employer contributions shall be based
on the average of the employee's compensation at the time the leave of
absence was authorized and the time the employee resumes employment.
Any benefit under RCW 28B.10.400(3) shall be based only on the
employee's compensation earned from employment with the university or
college.
An employee who is inducted into the armed forces of the United
States shall be deemed to be on an unpaid, authorized leave of absence.

Sec. 216 RCW 28B.10.410 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 17 are each
amended to read as follows:
The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of
trustees of the regional universities ((and of)), The Evergreen State
College, and North Snohomish State College, or the state board for
community and technical colleges ((education)) shall pay not more than
one-half of the annual premium of any annuity or retirement income plan
established under the provisions of RCW 28B.10.400 ((as now or
hereafter amended)). Such contribution shall not exceed ten percent of
the salary of the faculty member or other employee on whose behalf the
contribution is made. This contribution may be in addition to federal
social security tax contributions made by the boards, if any.

Sec. 217 RCW 28B.10.415 and 1979 ex.s. c 259 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of
trustees of the regional universities ((and of)), The Evergreen State
College, and North Snohomish State College, or the state board for
community and technical colleges ((education)) shall not pay any amount
to be added to the annuity or retirement income plan of any retired
person who has served for less than ten years in one or more of the
state institutions of higher education. In the case of persons who
have served more than ten years but less than twenty-five years no
amount shall be paid in excess of four percent of the amount authorized
in ((subdivision (3) of)) RCW 28B.10.400(3) ((as now or hereafter
amended)), multiplied by the number of years of full-time service
rendered by such person: PROVIDED, That credit for years of service at
an institution of higher education shall be limited to those years in
which contributions were made by a faculty member or other employee
designated pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400(1) and the institution or the
state as a result of which a benefit is being received by a retired
person from any Washington state public retirement plan: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That all such benefits that a retired person is eligible to
receive shall reduce any supplementation payments provided for in RCW
28B.10.400 ((as now or hereafter amended)).

Sec. 218 RCW 28B.10.417 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 19 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A faculty member or other employee designated by the board of
trustees of the applicable regional university ((or of)), The Evergreen
State College, or North Snohomish State College as being subject to an
annuity or retirement income plan and who, at the time of such
designation, is a member of the Washington state teachers' retirement
system, shall retain credit for such service in the Washington state
teachers' retirement system and except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, shall leave his or her accumulated contributions in the
teachers' retirement fund. Upon his or her attaining eligibility for
retirement under the Washington state teachers' retirement system, such
faculty member or other employee shall receive from the Washington
state teachers' retirement system a retirement allowance consisting of
an annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his or her
accumulated contributions at his or her age when becoming eligible for
such retirement and a pension for each year of creditable service
established and retained at the time of said designation as provided in
RCW 41.32.497 ((as now or hereafter amended)). Anyone who on July 1,
1967, was receiving pension payments from the teachers' retirement
system based on thirty-five years of creditable service shall
thereafter receive a pension based on the total years of creditable
service established with the retirement system: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That any such faculty member or other employee who, upon attainment of
eligibility for retirement under the Washington state teachers'
retirement system, is still engaged in public educational employment,
shall not be eligible to receive benefits under the Washington state
teachers' retirement system until he or she ceases such public
educational employment. Any retired faculty member or other employee
who enters service in any public educational institution shall cease to
receive pension payments while engaged in such service: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That such service may be rendered up to seventy-five days in
a school year without reduction of pension.
(2) A faculty member or other employee designated by the board of
trustees of the applicable regional university ((or of)), The Evergreen
State College, or North Snohomish State College as being subject to the
annuity and retirement income plan and who, at the time of such
designation, is a member of the Washington state teachers' retirement
system may, at his or her election and at any time, on and after
midnight June 10, 1959, terminate his or her membership in the
Washington state teachers' retirement system and withdraw his or her
accumulated contributions and interest in the teachers' retirement fund
upon written application to the board of trustees of the Washington
state teachers' retirement system. Faculty members or other employees
who withdraw their accumulated contributions, on and after the date of
withdrawal of contributions, shall no longer be members of the
Washington state teachers' retirement system and shall forfeit all
rights of membership, including pension benefits, theretofore acquired
under the Washington state teachers' retirement system.

Sec. 219 RCW 28B.10.420 and 1979 c 14 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in subsection (2) of this section,
faculty members or other employees designated by the boards of regents
of the state universities, the boards of trustees of the regional
universities ((or of)), The Evergreen State College, or North Snohomish
State College, or the state board for community and technical colleges
((education)) pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400 through 28B.10.420 ((as now or
hereafter amended)) shall be retired from their employment with their
institutions of higher education not later than the end of the academic
year next following their seventieth birthday.
(2) As provided in this subsection, the board of regents of a state
university, the board of trustees of a regional university ((or)), The
Evergreen State College, or North Snohomish State College, or the state
board for community and technical colleges ((education)) may reemploy
any person who is "retired" pursuant to subsection (1) of this section,
who applies for reemployment and who has reached seventy years of age
on or after July 1, 1970. The following provisions shall govern such
reemployment:
(a) Prior to the reemployment, the board of regents, board of
trustees, or state board shall have found that the person possesses
outstanding qualifications which in the judgment of the board would
permit the person to continue valuable service to the institution.
(b) The period of reemployment shall not be counted as service
under, or result in any eligibility for benefits or increased benefits
under, any state authorized or supported annuity or retirement income
plan. Reemployment shall not result in the reemployed person or
employer making any contributions to any such plan.
(c) No person may be reemployed on a full-time basis if such person
is receiving benefits under any state-authorized or supported annuity
or retirement income plan. The reemployment of any person on a full-
time basis shall be immediately terminated upon the person's obtaining
of any such benefits.
(d) A person may be reemployed on a part-time basis and receive or
continue to receive any benefits for which such person is eligible
under any state-authorized or supported annuity or retirement income
plan. Such part-time work, however, shall not exceed forty percent of
full-time employment during any year.
(e) A person reemployed pursuant to this section shall comply with
all conditions of reemployment and all rules providing for the
administration of this subsection which are prescribed or adopted by
the board of regents, or board of trustees, or by the state board for
community and technical colleges ((education)).

Sec. 220 RCW 28B.10.485 and 1979 c 130 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The boards of the state universities, regional universities, and
the state colleges are authorized to issue charitable gift annuities
paying a fixed dollar amount to individual annuitants for their
lifetimes in exchange for the gift of assets to the respective
institution in a single transaction. The boards shall invest one
hundred percent of the charitable gift annuity assets in a reserve for
the lifetimes of the respective annuitants to meet liabilities that
result from the gift program.

Sec. 221 RCW 28B.10.487 and 1979 c 130 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The obligation to make annuity payments to individuals under
charitable gift annuity agreements issued by the board of a state
university, regional university, or ((of the)) a state college pursuant
to RCW 28B.10.485 shall be secured by and limited to the assets given
in exchange for the annuity and reserves established by the board.
Such agreements shall not constitute:
(1) An obligation, either general or special, of the state; or
(2) A general obligation of a state university, regional
university, or ((of the)) a state college or ((of)) the board.

Sec. 222 RCW 28B.10.500 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 21 are each
amended to read as follows:
No regent of the state universities, or trustee of the regional
universities ((or of)), The Evergreen State College, or North Snohomish
State College shall be removed during the term of office for which
appointed, excepting only for misconduct or malfeasance in office, and
then only in the manner ((hereinafter)) provided in this section.
Before any regent or trustee may be removed for such misconduct or
malfeasance, a petition for removal, stating the nature of the
misconduct or malfeasance of such regent or trustee with reasonable
particularity, shall be signed and verified by the governor and served
upon such regent or trustee. Said petition, together with proof of
service of same upon such regent or trustee, shall forthwith be filed
with the clerk of the supreme court. The chief justice of the supreme
court shall thereupon designate a tribunal composed of three judges of
the superior court to hear and adjudicate the charges. Such tribunal
shall fix the time of hearing, which shall be public, and the procedure
for the hearing, and the decision of such tribunal shall be final and
not subject to review by the supreme court. Removal of any member of
the board by the tribunal shall disqualify such member for
reappointment.

Sec. 223 RCW 28B.10.550 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 24 are each
amended to read as follows:
The boards of regents of the state universities, and the boards of
trustees of the regional universities ((or of)), The Evergreen State
College, or North Snohomish State College, acting independently and
each on behalf of its own institution:
(1) May each establish a police force for its own institution,
which force shall function under such conditions and ((regulations))
rules as the board prescribes; and
(2) May supply appropriate badges and uniforms indicating the
positions and authority of the members of such police force.

Sec. 224 RCW 28B.10.560 and 1983 c 221 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The boards of regents of the state universities, and the boards
of trustees of the regional universities ((and of)), The Evergreen
State College, and North Snohomish State College, acting independently
and each on behalf of its own institution, may each:
(a) Establish and ((promulgate)) adopt rules ((and regulations))
governing pedestrian traffic and vehicular traffic and parking upon
lands and facilities of the university or college;
(b) Adjudicate matters involving parking infractions internally;
and
(c) Collect and retain any penalties so imposed.
(2) If the rules ((or regulations promulgated)) adopted under
subsection (1) of this section provide for internal adjudication of
parking infractions, a person charged with a parking infraction who
deems himself or herself aggrieved by the final decision in an internal
adjudication may, within ten days after written notice of the final
decision, appeal by filing a written notice thereof with the college or
university police force. Documents relating to the appeal shall
immediately be forwarded to the district court in the county in which
the offense was committed, which court shall have jurisdiction over
such offense and such appeal shall be heard de novo.

Sec. 225 RCW 28B.10.567 and 1987 c 185 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The boards of regents of the state universities and boards of
trustees of the regional universities ((and the board of trustees of)),
The Evergreen State College, and North Snohomish State College are
authorized and empowered, under such rules ((and regulations)) as any
such board may prescribe for the duly sworn police officers employed by
any such board as members of a police force established pursuant to RCW
28B.10.550, to provide for the payment of death or disability benefits
or medical expense reimbursement for death, disability, or injury of
any such duly sworn police officer who, in the line of duty, loses his
or her life or becomes disabled or is injured, and for the payment of
such benefits to be made to any such duly sworn police officer or his
or her surviving spouse or the legal guardian of his or her child or
children, as defined in RCW 41.26.030(7), or his or her estate:
PROVIDED, That the duty-related benefits authorized by this section
shall in no event be greater than the benefits authorized on June 25,
1976, for duty-related death, disability, or injury of a law
enforcement officer under chapter 41.26 RCW: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
the duty-related benefits authorized by this section shall be reduced
to the extent of any amounts received or eligible to be received on
account of the duty-related death, disability, or injury to any such
duly sworn police officer, his or her surviving spouse, the legal
guardian of his or her child or children, or his or her estate, under
workers' compensation, social security including the changes
incorporated under Public Law 89-97 as now or hereafter amended, or
disability income insurance and health care plans under chapter 41.05
RCW.

Sec. 226 RCW 28B.15.628 and 1999 c 82 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that military and naval veterans who have
served their country in wars on foreign soil have risked their own
lives to defend both the lives of all Americans and the freedoms that
define and distinguish our nation. It is the intent of the legislature
to honor Persian Gulf combat zone veterans for the public service they
have provided to their country. It is the further intent of the
legislature that, for eligible Persian Gulf combat zone veterans,
institutions of higher education waive tuition and fee increases that
have occurred after the 1990-91 academic year.
(2) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, North Snohomish State College, and the
community colleges may exempt veterans of the Persian Gulf combat zone
from all or a portion of increases in tuition and fees that occur after
the 1990-91 academic year, if the veteran could have qualified as a
Washington resident student under RCW 28B.15.012(2), had he or she been
enrolled as a student on August 1, 1990.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "a veteran of the Persian
Gulf combat zone" means a person who served on active duty in the armed
forces of the United States during any portion of the 1991 calendar
year in the Persian Gulf combat zone as designated by executive order
of the president of the United States.

Sec. 227 RCW 28B.15.725 and 1997 c 433 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, ((and)) The Evergreen State College, and North Snohomish
State College may establish home tuition programs by negotiating home
tuition agreements with an out-of-state institution or consortium of
institutions of higher education if no loss of tuition and fee revenue
occurs as a result of the agreements.
(2) Home tuition agreements allow students at Washington state
institutions of higher education to attend an out-of-state institution
of higher education as part of a student exchange. Students
participating in a home tuition program shall pay an amount equal to
their regular, full-time tuition and required fees to either the
Washington institution of higher education or the out-of-state
institution of higher education depending upon the provisions of the
particular agreement. Payment of course fees in excess of generally
applicable tuition and required fees must be addressed in each home
tuition agreement to ensure that the instructional programs of the
Washington institution of higher education do not incur additional
uncompensated costs as a result of the exchange.
(3) Student participation in a home tuition agreement authorized by
this section is limited to one academic year.
(4) Students enrolled under a home tuition agreement shall reside
in Washington state for the duration of the program, may not use the
year of enrollment under this program to establish Washington state
residency, and are not eligible for state financial aid.

Sec. 228 RCW 28B.15.730 and 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 27 are each amended
to read as follows:
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the state board for
community and technical colleges and the governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, the community colleges,
((and)) The Evergreen State College, and North Snohomish State College
may waive all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential
for residents of Oregon, upon completion of and to the extent permitted
by an agreement between the higher education coordinating board and
appropriate officials and agencies in Oregon granting similar waivers
for residents of the state of Washington.

Sec. 229 RCW 28B.15.740 and 1997 c 207 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, North Snohomish State College, and the
community colleges may waive all or a portion of tuition and fees for
needy students who are eligible for resident tuition and fee rates
pursuant to RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013. Subject to the limitations
of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the
regional universities, The Evergreen State College, North Snohomish
State College, and the community colleges may waive all or a portion of
tuition and fees for other students at the discretion of the governing
boards, except on the basis of participation in intercollegiate
athletic programs, not to exceed three-fourths of one percent of gross
authorized operating fees revenue under RCW 28B.15.910 for the
community colleges considered as a whole and not to exceed two percent
of gross authorized operating fees revenue for the other institutions
of higher education.
(2) In addition to the tuition and fee waivers provided in
subsection (1) of this section and subject to the provisions of RCW
28B.15.455, 28B.15.460, and 28B.15.910, a total dollar amount of
tuition and fee waivers awarded by any state university, regional
university, or state college under this chapter, not to exceed one
percent, as calculated in subsection (1) of this section, may be used
for the purpose of achieving or maintaining gender equity in
intercollegiate athletic programs. At any institution that has an
underrepresented gender class in intercollegiate athletics, any such
waivers shall be awarded:
(a) First, to members of the underrepresented gender class who
participate in intercollegiate athletics, where such waivers result in
saved or displaced money that can be used for athletic programs for the
underrepresented gender class. Such saved or displaced money shall be
used for programs for the underrepresented gender class; and
(b) Second, (i) to nonmembers of the underrepresented gender class
who participate in intercollegiate athletics, where such waivers result
in saved or displaced money that can be used for athletic programs for
members of the underrepresented gender class. Such saved or displaced
money shall be used for programs for the underrepresented gender class;
or (ii) to members of the underrepresented gender class who participate
in intercollegiate athletics, where such waivers do not result in any
saved or displaced money that can be used for athletic programs for
members of the underrepresented gender class.

Sec. 230 RCW 28B.15.750 and 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 29 are each amended
to read as follows:
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
of the state universities, the regional universities, ((and)) The
Evergreen State College, and North Snohomish State College and the
state board for community and technical colleges may waive all or a
portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential for residents of
Idaho, upon completion of and to the extent permitted by an agreement
between the higher education coordinating board and appropriate
officials and agencies in Idaho granting similar waivers for residents
of the state of Washington.

Sec. 231 RCW 28B.15.756 and 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 30 are each amended
to read as follows:
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
of the state universities, the regional universities, ((and)) The
Evergreen State College, and North Snohomish State College and the
state board for community and technical colleges may waive all or a
portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential for residents of
the Canadian province of British Columbia, upon completion of and to
the extent permitted by an agreement between the higher education
coordinating board and appropriate officials and agencies in the
Canadian province of British Columbia providing for enrollment
opportunities for residents of the state of Washington without payment
of tuition or fees in excess of those charged to residents of British
Columbia.

Sec. 232 RCW 28B.15.820 and 2004 c 275 s 66 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each institution of higher education, including technical
colleges, shall deposit a minimum of three and one-half percent of
revenues collected from tuition and services and activities fees in an
institutional financial aid fund that is hereby created and which shall
be held locally. Moneys in the fund shall be used only for the
following purposes: (a) To make guaranteed long-term loans to eligible
students as provided in subsections (3) through (8) of this section;
(b) to make short-term loans as provided in subsection (9) of this
section; or (c) to provide financial aid to needy students as provided
in subsection (10) of this section.
(2) An "eligible student" for the purposes of subsections (3)
through (8) and (10) of this section is a student registered for at
least six credit hours or the equivalent, who is eligible for resident
tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013, and
who is a "needy student" as defined in RCW 28B.92.030.
(3) The amount of the guaranteed long-term loans made under this
section shall not exceed the demonstrated financial need of the
student. Each institution shall establish loan terms and conditions
which shall be consistent with the terms of the guaranteed loan program
established by 20 U.S. Code Section 1071 et seq., as now or hereafter
amended. All loans made shall be guaranteed by the Washington student
loan guaranty association or its successor agency. Institutions are
hereby granted full authority to operate as an eligible lender under
the guaranteed loan program.
(4) Before approving a guaranteed long-term loan, each institution
shall analyze the ability of the student to repay the loan based on
factors which include, but are not limited to, the student's
accumulated total education loan burdens and the employment
opportunities and average starting salary characteristics of the
student's chosen fields of study. The institution shall counsel the
student on the advisability of acquiring additional debt, and on the
availability of other forms of financial aid.
(5) Each institution is responsible for collection of guaranteed
long-term loans made under this section and shall exercise due
diligence in such collection, maintaining all necessary records to
insure that maximum repayments are made. Institutions shall cooperate
with other lenders and the Washington student loan guaranty
association, or its successor agency, in the coordinated collection of
guaranteed loans, and shall assure that the guarantability of the loans
is not violated. Collection and servicing of guaranteed long-term
loans under this section shall be performed by entities approved for
such servicing by the Washington student loan guaranty association or
its successor agency: PROVIDED, That institutions be permitted to
perform such servicing if specifically recognized to do so by the
Washington student loan guaranty association or its successor agency.
Collection and servicing of guaranteed long-term loans made by
community colleges under subsection (1) of this section shall be
coordinated by the state board for community and technical colleges and
shall be conducted under procedures adopted by the state board.
(6) Receipts from payment of interest or principal or any other
subsidies to which institutions as lenders are entitled, that are paid
by or on behalf of borrowers of funds under subsections (3) through (8)
of this section, shall be deposited in each institution's financial aid
fund and shall be used to cover the costs of making the guaranteed
long-term loans under this section and maintaining necessary records
and making collections under subsection (5) of this section: PROVIDED,
That such costs shall not exceed five percent of aggregate outstanding
loan principal. Institutions shall maintain accurate records of such
costs, and all receipts beyond those necessary to pay such costs, shall
be deposited in the institution's financial aid fund.
(7) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, ((and)) The Evergreen State College, and North Snohomish
State College, and the state board for community and technical
colleges, on behalf of the community colleges and technical colleges,
shall each adopt necessary rules ((and regulations)) to implement this
section.
(8) First priority for any guaranteed long-term loans made under
this section shall be directed toward students who would not normally
have access to educational loans from private financial institutions in
Washington state, and maximum use shall be made of secondary markets in
the support of loan consolidation.
(9) Short-term loans, not to exceed one year, may be made from the
institutional financial aid fund to students enrolled in the
institution. No such loan shall be made to any student who is known by
the institution to be in default or delinquent in the payment of any
outstanding student loan. A short-term loan may be made only if the
institution has ample evidence that the student has the capability of
repaying the loan within the time frame specified by the institution
for repayment.
(10) Any moneys deposited in the institutional financial aid fund
that are not used in making long-term or short-term loans may be used
by the institution for locally-administered financial aid programs for
needy students, such as need-based institutional employment programs or
need-based tuition and fee scholarship or grant programs. These funds
shall be used in addition to and not to replace institutional funds
that would otherwise support these locally-administered financial aid
programs. First priority in the use of these funds shall be given to
needy students who have accumulated excessive educational loan burdens.
An excessive educational loan burden is a burden that will be difficult
to repay given employment opportunities and average starting salaries
in the student's chosen fields of study. Second priority in the use of
these funds shall be given to needy single parents, to assist these
students with their educational expenses, including expenses associated
with child care and transportation.

Sec. 233 RCW 28B.15.910 and 2004 c 275 s 51 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of providing state general fund support to
public institutions of higher education, except for revenue waived
under programs listed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and
unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus state appropriations
act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by a state university, a regional university, The Evergreen
State College, North Snohomish State College, or the community colleges
as a whole, shall not exceed the percentage of total gross authorized
operating fees revenue in this subsection. As used in this section,
"gross authorized operating fees revenue" means the estimated gross
operating fees revenue as estimated under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised
by the office of financial management, before granting any waivers.
This limitation applies to all tuition waiver programs established
before or after July 1, 1992.
(a) University of Washington 21 percent
(b) Washington State University 20 percent
(c) Eastern Washington University 11 percent
(d) Central Washington University 8 percent
(e) Western Washington University 10 percent
(f) The Evergreen State College 6 percent
(g) North Snohomish State College 6 percent
(h) Community colleges as a whole 35 percent
(2) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to
waivers, exemptions, or reductions in operating fees contained in the
following:
(a) RCW 28B.10.265;
(b) RCW 28B.15.014;
(c) RCW 28B.15.100;
(d) RCW 28B.15.225;
(e) RCW 28B.15.380;
(f) RCW 28B.15.520;
(g) RCW 28B.15.526;
(h) RCW 28B.15.527;
(i) RCW 28B.15.543;
(j) RCW 28B.15.545;
(k) RCW 28B.15.555;
(l) RCW 28B.15.556;
(m) RCW 28B.15.615;
(n) RCW 28B.15.620;
(o) RCW 28B.15.628;
(p) RCW 28B.15.730;
(q) RCW 28B.15.740;
(r) RCW 28B.15.750;
(s) RCW 28B.15.756;
(t) RCW 28B.50.259;
(u) RCW 28B.70.050; and
(v) During the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, the western interstate
commission for higher education undergraduate exchange program for
students attending Eastern Washington University.
(3) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply
to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees
contained in the following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.522;
(b) RCW 28B.15.540; and
(c) RCW 28B.15.558.
(4) The total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by institutions of higher education participating in the
western interstate commission for higher education western
undergraduate exchange program under RCW 28B.15.544 shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection.
(a) Washington State University 1 percent
(b) Eastern Washington University 3 percent
(c) Central Washington University 3 percent

Sec. 234 RCW 28B.15.915 and 2000 c 152 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW
28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the
regional universities, The Evergreen State College, North Snohomish
State College, and the community colleges, subject to state board
policy, may waive all or a portion of the operating fees for any
student. There shall be no state general fund support for waivers
granted under this section.
By January 31st of each odd-numbered year, the institutions of
higher education shall prepare a report of the costs and benefits of
waivers granted under chapter 152, Laws of 2000 and shall transmit
copies of their report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature.

Sec. 235 RCW 28B.35.370 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 49 are each amended
to read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof all
building fees of each regional university ((and)), The Evergreen State
College, and North Snohomish State College shall be paid into the state
treasury and these together with such normal school fund revenues as
provided in RCW 28B.35.751 as are received by the state treasury shall
be credited as follows:
(1) On or before June 30th of each year the board of trustees of
each regional university ((and)), The Evergreen State College, and
North Snohomish State College, if issuing bonds payable out of its
building fees and above described normal school fund revenues, shall
certify to the state treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing
twelve months to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and
interest on such bonds. The amounts so certified by each regional
university ((and)), The Evergreen State College, and North Snohomish
State College shall be a prior lien and charge against all building
fees and above described normal school fund revenues of such
institution. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts
so certified in the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the Western Washington University capital projects account, ((or)) The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, or the North
Snohomish State College capital projects account respectively, which
accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The amounts
deposited in the respective capital projects accounts shall be used
exclusively to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and
interest on the building bonds issued by such regional universities
((and)), The Evergreen State College, and North Snohomish State College
as authorized by law. If in any twelve month period it shall appear
that the amount certified by any such board of trustees is insufficient
to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the
outstanding building and above described normal school fund revenue
bonds of its institution, the state treasurer shall notify the board of
trustees and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all
requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal
of and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met
at all times.
(2) All normal school fund revenue pursuant to RCW 28B.35.751 shall
be deposited in the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the Western Washington University capital projects account, ((or)) The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, or the North
Snohomish State College capital projects account respectively, which
accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited
in the respective capital projects accounts shall be appropriated and
expended exclusively to pay and secure the payment of the principal of
and interest on bonds payable out of the building fees and normal
school revenue and for the construction, reconstruction, erection,
equipping, maintenance, demolition, and major alteration of buildings
and other capital assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way,
easements, improvements, or appurtenances in relation thereto except
for any sums transferred therefrom as authorized by law.

Sec. 236 RCW 28B.35.700 and 1985 c 390 s 48 are each amended to
read as follows:
The boards of trustees of the regional universities ((and of)), The
Evergreen State College, and North Snohomish State College are
empowered in accordance with the provisions of RCW 28B.35.700 through
28B.35.790, to provide for the construction, completion,
reconstruction, remodeling, rehabilitation, and improvement of
buildings and facilities authorized by the legislature for the use of
the ((aforementioned)) regional universities ((and)), The Evergreen
State College, and North Snohomish State College and to finance the
payment thereof by bonds payable out of special funds from revenues
hereafter derived from the payment of building fees, gifts, bequests,
or grants and such additional funds as the legislature may provide.

Sec. 237 RCW 28B.35.710 and 1985 c 390 s 49 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following terms, whenever used or referred to in RCW 28B.35.700
through 28B.35.790, shall have the following meaning, excepting in
those instances where the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) ((The word)) "Boards" means the boards of trustees of the
regional universities ((and)), The Evergreen State College, and North
Snohomish State College.
(2) ((The words)) "Building fees" means the building fees charged
students registering at each college, but shall not mean the special
tuition or other fees charged such students or fees, charges, rentals,
and other income derived from any or all revenue-producing lands,
buildings, and facilities of the respective colleges, heretofore or
hereafter acquired, constructed, or installed, including but not
limited to income from rooms, dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals,
infirmaries, housing or student activity buildings, vehicular parking
facilities, land, or the appurtenances thereon.
(3) ((The words)) "Bond retirement funds" ((shall)) means the
special funds created by law and known as the Eastern Washington
University bond retirement fund, Central Washington University bond
retirement fund, Western Washington University bond retirement fund,
((and)) The Evergreen State College bond retirement fund, the North
Snohomish State College bond retirement fund, all as referred to in RCW
28B.35.370.
(4) ((The word)) "Bonds" means the bonds payable out of the bond
retirement funds.
(5) ((The word)) "Projects" means the construction, completion,
reconstruction, remodeling, rehabilitation, or improvement of any
building or other facility of any of the aforementioned colleges
authorized by the legislature at any time and to be financed by the
issuance and sale of bonds.

Sec. 238 RCW 28B.35.790 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 91 are each
amended to read as follows:
RCW 28B.35.700 through 28B.35.790 ((as now or hereafter amended))
is concurrent with other legislation with reference to providing funds
for the construction of buildings at the regional universities ((or)),
The Evergreen State College, or North Snohomish State College and is
not to be construed as repealing or limiting any existing provision of
law with reference thereto.

Sec. 239 RCW 28B.40.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 64 are each
amended to read as follows:
((The only state college in Washington shall be)) The Evergreen
State College in Thurston county((, The Evergreen State College)) shall
be one of the state colleges in Washington.

Sec. 240 RCW 28B.65.030 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 72 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
A Washington state high-technology education and training program
is hereby established. The program shall be designed to:
(1) Develop the competence needed to make Washington state a leader
in high-technology fields, to increase the productivity of state
industries, and to improve the state's competitiveness in regional,
national, and international trade;
(2) Develop degree programs to enable students to be productive in
new and emerging high-technology fields by using the resources of the
state's two-year community colleges, regional universities, the
University of Washington, Washington State University, ((and)) The
Evergreen State College, and North Snohomish State College; and
(3) Provide industries in the state with a highly-skilled work
force capable of producing, operating, and servicing the advancing
technology needed to modernize the state's industries and to revitalize
the state's economy.

Sec. 241 RCW 28B.76.020 and 1985 c 370 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board; and
(2) "Four-year institutions" means the University of Washington,
Washington State University, Central Washington University, Eastern
Washington University, Western Washington University, ((and)) The
Evergreen State College, and North Snohomish State College.

Sec. 242 RCW 28B.76.100 and 2004 c 275 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall establish an advisory council consisting of:
The superintendent of public instruction; a representative of the state
board of education appointed by the state board of education; a
representative of the two-year system of the state board for community
and technical colleges appointed by the state board for community and
technical colleges; a representative of the work force training and
education coordinating board appointed by the work force training and
education coordinating board; one representative of the research
universities appointed by the president of the University of Washington
and the president of Washington State University; a representative of
the regional universities ((and)), The Evergreen State College, and
North Snohomish State College appointed through a process developed by
the council of presidents; a representative of the faculty for the
four-year institutions appointed by the council of faculty
representatives; a representative of the proprietary schools appointed
by the federation of private career schools and colleges; a
representative of the independent colleges appointed by the independent
colleges of Washington; and a faculty member in the community and
technical college system appointed by the state board for community and
technical colleges in consultation with the faculty unions.
(2) The members of the advisory council shall each serve a two-year
term except for the superintendent of public instruction, whose term is
concurrent with his or her term of office.
(3) The board shall meet with the advisory council at least
quarterly and shall seek advice from the council regarding the board's
discharge of its statutory responsibilities.

Sec. 243 RCW 28B.110.020 and 1989 c 341 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter, "institutions of higher education" or
"institutions" include the state universities, regional universities,
The Evergreen State College, North Snohomish State College, and the
community colleges.

Sec. 244 RCW 34.05.010 and 1997 c 126 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section shall apply throughout
this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adjudicative proceeding" means a proceeding before an agency
in which an opportunity for hearing before that agency is required by
statute or constitutional right before or after the entry of an order
by the agency. Adjudicative proceedings also include all cases of
licensing and rate making in which an application for a license or rate
change is denied except as limited by RCW 66.08.150, or a license is
revoked, suspended, or modified, or in which the granting of an
application is contested by a person having standing to contest under
the law.
(2) "Agency" means any state board, commission, department,
institution of higher education, or officer, authorized by law to make
rules or to conduct adjudicative proceedings, except those in the
legislative or judicial branches, the governor, or the attorney general
except to the extent otherwise required by law and any local
governmental entity that may request the appointment of an
administrative law judge under chapter 42.41 RCW.
(3) "Agency action" means licensing, the implementation or
enforcement of a statute, the adoption or application of an agency rule
or order, the imposition of sanctions, or the granting or withholding
of benefits.
Agency action does not include an agency decision regarding (a)
contracting or procurement of goods, services, public works, and the
purchase, lease, or acquisition by any other means, including eminent
domain, of real estate, as well as all activities necessarily related
to those functions, or (b) determinations as to the sufficiency of a
showing of interest filed in support of a representation petition, or
mediation or conciliation of labor disputes or arbitration of labor
disputes under a collective bargaining law or similar statute, or (c)
any sale, lease, contract, or other proprietary decision in the
management of public lands or real property interests, or (d) the
granting of a license, franchise, or permission for the use of
trademarks, symbols, and similar property owned or controlled by the
agency.
(4) "Agency head" means the individual or body of individuals in
whom the ultimate legal authority of the agency is vested by any
provision of law. If the agency head is a body of individuals, a
majority of those individuals constitutes the agency head.
(5) "Entry" of an order means the signing of the order by all
persons who are to sign the order, as an official act indicating that
the order is to be effective.
(6) "Filing" of a document that is required to be filed with an
agency means delivery of the document to a place designated by the
agency by rule for receipt of official documents, or in the absence of
such designation, at the office of the agency head.
(7) "Institutions of higher education" are the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, North Snohomish State College, the various
community colleges, and the governing boards of each of the ((above))
institutions, and the various colleges, divisions, departments, or
offices authorized by the governing board of the institution involved
to act for the institution, all of which are sometimes referred to in
this chapter as "institutions."
(8) "Interpretive statement" means a written expression of the
opinion of an agency, entitled an interpretive statement by the agency
head or its designee, as to the meaning of a statute or other provision
of law, of a court decision, or of an agency order.
(9)(a) "License" means a franchise, permit, certification,
approval, registration, charter, or similar form of authorization
required by law, but does not include (i) a license required solely for
revenue purposes, or (ii) a certification of an exclusive bargaining
representative, or similar status, under a collective bargaining law or
similar statute, or (iii) a license, franchise, or permission for use
of trademarks, symbols, and similar property owned or controlled by the
agency.
(b) "Licensing" includes the agency process respecting the
issuance, denial, revocation, suspension, or modification of a license.
(10) "Mail" or "send," for purposes of any notice relating to rule
making or policy or interpretive statements, means regular mail or
electronic distribution, as provided in RCW 34.05.260. "Electronic
distribution" or "electronically" means distribution by electronic mail
or facsimile mail.
(11)(a) "Order," without further qualification, means a written
statement of particular applicability that finally determines the legal
rights, duties, privileges, immunities, or other legal interests of a
specific person or persons.
(b) "Order of adoption" means the official written statement by
which an agency adopts, amends, or repeals a rule.
(12) "Party to agency proceedings," or "party" in a context so
indicating, means:
(a) A person to whom the agency action is specifically directed; or
(b) A person named as a party to the agency proceeding or allowed
to intervene or participate as a party in the agency proceeding.
(13) "Party to judicial review or civil enforcement proceedings,"
or "party" in a context so indicating, means:
(a) A person who files a petition for a judicial review or civil
enforcement proceeding; or
(b) A person named as a party in a judicial review or civil
enforcement proceeding, or allowed to participate as a party in a
judicial review or civil enforcement proceeding.
(14) "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation,
association, governmental subdivision or unit thereof, or public or
private organization or entity of any character, and includes another
agency.
(15) "Policy statement" means a written description of the current
approach of an agency, entitled a policy statement by the agency head
or its designee, to implementation of a statute or other provision of
law, of a court decision, or of an agency order, including where
appropriate the agency's current practice, procedure, or method of
action based upon that approach.
(16) "Rule" means any agency order, directive, or regulation of
general applicability (a) the violation of which subjects a person to
a penalty or administrative sanction; (b) which establishes, alters, or
revokes any procedure, practice, or requirement relating to agency
hearings; (c) which establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification
or requirement relating to the enjoyment of benefits or privileges
conferred by law; (d) which establishes, alters, or revokes any
qualifications or standards for the issuance, suspension, or revocation
of licenses to pursue any commercial activity, trade, or profession; or
(e) which establishes, alters, or revokes any mandatory standards for
any product or material which must be met before distribution or sale.
The term includes the amendment or repeal of a prior rule, but does not
include (i) statements concerning only the internal management of an
agency and not affecting private rights or procedures available to the
public, (ii) declaratory rulings issued pursuant to RCW 34.05.240,
(iii) traffic restrictions for motor vehicles, bicyclists, and
pedestrians established by the secretary of transportation or his or
her designee where notice of such restrictions is given by official
traffic control devices, or (iv) rules of institutions of higher
education involving standards of admission, academic advancement,
academic credit, graduation and the granting of degrees, employment
relationships, or fiscal processes.
(17) "Rules review committee" or "committee" means the joint
administrative rules review committee created pursuant to RCW 34.05.610
for the purpose of selectively reviewing existing and proposed rules of
state agencies.
(18) "Rule making" means the process for formulation and adoption
of a rule.
(19) "Service," except as otherwise provided in this chapter, means
posting in the United States mail, properly addressed, postage prepaid,
or personal service. Service by mail is complete upon deposit in the
United States mail. Agencies may, by rule, authorize service by
electronic telefacsimile transmission, where copies are mailed
simultaneously, or by commercial parcel delivery company.

Sec. 245 RCW 39.19.020 and 1996 c 69 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Advisory committee" means the advisory committee on minority
and women's business enterprises.
(2) "Broker" means a person that provides a bona fide service, such
as professional, technical, consultant, brokerage, or managerial
services and assistance in the procurement of essential personnel,
facilities, equipment, materials, or supplies required for performance
of a contract.
(3) "Director" means the director of the office of minority and
women's business enterprises.
(4) "Educational institutions" means the state universities, the
regional universities, The Evergreen State College, North Snohomish
State College, and the community colleges.
(5) "Goals" means annual overall agency goals, expressed as a
percentage of dollar volume, for participation by minority and women-owned and controlled businesses and shall not be construed as a minimum
goal for any particular contract or for any particular geographical
area. It is the intent of this chapter that such overall agency goals
shall be achievable and shall be met on a contract-by-contract or
class-of-contract basis.
(6) "Goods and/or services" includes professional services and all
other goods and services.
(7) "Office" means the office of minority and women's business
enterprises.
(8) "Person" includes one or more individuals, partnerships,
associations, organizations, corporations, cooperatives, legal
representatives, trustees and receivers, or any group of persons.
(9) "Procurement" means the purchase, lease, or rental of any goods
or services.
(10) "Public works" means all work, construction, highway and ferry
construction, alteration, repair, or improvement other than ordinary
maintenance, which a state agency or educational institution is
authorized or required by law to undertake.
(11) "State agency" includes the state of Washington and all
agencies, departments, offices, divisions, boards, commissions, and
correctional and other types of institutions.

Sec. 246 RCW 39.90.060 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 93 are each amended
to read as follows:
All debts, contracts and obligations heretofore made or incurred by
or in favor of the state, state agencies, The Evergreen State College,
North Snohomish State College, community colleges, and regional and
state universities, and the political subdivisions, municipal
corporations, and quasi municipal corporations of this state, are
hereby declared to be legal and valid and of full force and effect from
the date thereof, regardless of the interest rate borne by any such
debts, contracts, and obligations.

Sec. 247 RCW 40.04.040 and 1995 c 24 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Permanent session laws shall be distributed, sold, and exchanged by
the statute law committee as follows:
(1) Copies shall be given as follows: One to each requesting
United States senator and representative in congress from this state;
two to the Library of Congress; one to the United States supreme court
library; three to the library of the circuit court of appeals of the
ninth circuit; two to each United States district court room within
this state; two to each office and branch office of the United States
district attorneys in this state; one to each requesting state official
whose office is created by the Constitution; one each to the secretary
of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives and
such additional copies as they may request; fourteen copies to the code
reviser; two copies to the state library; two copies each to the law
libraries of any accredited law schools established in this state; one
copy to each state adult correctional institution; and one copy to each
state mental institution.
(2) Copies, for official use only, shall be distributed as follows:
Two copies to the governor; one each to the state historical society
and the state bar association; and one copy to each prosecuting
attorney.
Sufficient copies shall be furnished for the use of the supreme
court, the court of appeals, the superior courts, and the state law
library as from time to time are requested. One copy to the University
of Washington library; one copy to the library of each of the regional
universities ((and to)), The Evergreen State College, and North
Snohomish State College; and one copy to the Washington State
University library. Six copies shall be sent to the King county law
library, and one copy to each of the county law libraries organized
pursuant to law; one copy to each public library in cities of the first
class, and one copy to the municipal reference branch of the Seattle
public library.
(3) Surplus copies of the session laws shall be sold and delivered
by the statute law committee, in which case the price of the bound
volumes shall be sufficient to cover costs. All moneys received from
the sale of such bound volumes of session laws shall be paid into the
state treasury for the general fund.
(4) The statute law committee may exchange bound copies of the
session laws for similar laws or legal materials of other states,
territories, and governments, and make such other and further
distribution of the bound volumes as in its judgment seems proper.

Sec. 248 RCW 40.04.090 and 1995 c 24 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The house and senate journals shall be distributed and sold by the
chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the
senate as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, sets shall be
distributed as follows: One to each requesting official whose office
is created by the Constitution, and one to each requesting state
department director; two copies to the state library; ten copies to the
state law library; two copies to the University of Washington library;
one to the King county law library; one to the Washington State
University library; one to the library of each of the regional
universities ((and to)), The Evergreen State College, and North
Snohomish State College; one each to the law library of any accredited
law school in this state; and one to each free public library in the
state that requests it.
(2) House and senate journals of the preceding regular session
during an odd- or even-numbered year, and of any intervening special
session, shall be provided for use of legislators and legislative staff
in such numbers as directed by the chief clerk of the house of
representatives and secretary of the senate.
(3) Surplus sets of the house and senate journals shall be sold and
delivered by the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the
secretary of the senate at a price set by them after consulting with
the state printer to determine reasonable costs associated with the
production of the journals, and the proceeds therefrom shall be paid to
the state treasurer for the general fund.
(4) The chief clerk of the house of representatives and the
secretary of the senate may exchange copies of the house and senate
journals for similar journals of other states, territories, and
governments, or for other legal materials, and make such other and
further distribution of them as in their judgment seems proper.
(5) Periodically the chief clerk of the house of representatives
and the secretary of the senate may canvas those entitled to receive
copies under this section, and may reduce or eliminate the number of
copies distributed to anyone who so concurs.

Sec. 249 RCW 40.06.040 and 2002 c 342 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
To provide economical public access to state publications, the
center may enter into depository contracts with any free public
library, The Evergreen State College, North Snohomish State College,
regional university, or state university library, or, if needed, the
library of any privately incorporated college or university in this
state. The requirements for eligibility to contract as a depository
library shall be established by the secretary of state upon
recommendations of the state librarian. The standards shall include
and take into consideration the type of library, available housing and
space for the publications, the number and qualifications of personnel,
and availability for public use. The center may also contract with
public, out-of-state libraries for the exchange of state and other
publications on a reciprocal basis. Any state publication to be
distributed to the public and the legislature shall be mailed at the
lowest available postal rate.

Sec. 250 RCW 41.04.340 and 2002 c 354 s 227 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An attendance incentive program is established for all eligible
employees. As used in this section ((the term)), "eligible employee"
means any employee of the state, other than eligible employees of the
community and technical colleges and the state board for community and
technical colleges identified in RCW 28B.50.553, and teaching and
research faculty at the state and regional universities ((and)), The
Evergreen State College, and North Snohomish State College, entitled to
accumulate sick leave and for whom accurate sick leave records have
been maintained. No employee may receive compensation under this
section for any portion of sick leave accumulated at a rate in excess
of one day per month. The state and regional universities ((and)), The
Evergreen State College, and North Snohomish State College shall
maintain complete and accurate sick leave records for all teaching and
research faculty.
(2) In January of the year following any year in which a minimum of
sixty days of sick leave is accrued, and each January thereafter, any
eligible employee may receive remuneration for unused sick leave
accumulated in the previous year at a rate equal to one day's monetary
compensation of the employee for each four full days of accrued sick
leave in excess of sixty days. Sick leave for which compensation has
been received shall be deducted from accrued sick leave at the rate of
four days for every one day's monetary compensation.
(3) At the time of separation from state service due to retirement
or death, an eligible employee or the employee's estate may elect to
receive remuneration at a rate equal to one day's current monetary
compensation of the employee for each four full days of accrued sick
leave.
(4) Remuneration or benefits received under this section shall not
be included for the purpose of computing a retirement allowance under
any public retirement system in this state.
(5) Except as provided in subsections (7) through (9) of this
section for employees not covered by chapter 41.06 RCW, this section
shall be administered, and rules shall be adopted to carry out its
purposes, by the director of personnel for persons subject to chapter
41.06 RCW: PROVIDED, That determination of classes of eligible
employees shall be subject to approval by the office of financial
management.
(6) Should the legislature revoke any remuneration or benefits
granted under this section, no affected employee shall be entitled
thereafter to receive such benefits as a matter of contractual right.
(7) In lieu of remuneration for unused sick leave at retirement as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, an agency head or designee
may with equivalent funds, provide eligible employees with a benefit
plan that provides for reimbursement for medical expenses. This plan
shall be implemented only after consultation with affected groups of
employees. For eligible employees covered by chapter 41.06 RCW,
procedures for the implementation of these plans shall be adopted by
the director of personnel. For eligible employees exempt from chapter
41.06 RCW, and classified employees who have opted out of coverage of
chapter 41.06 RCW as provided in RCW 41.56.201, implementation
procedures shall be adopted by an agency head having jurisdiction over
the employees.
(8) Implementing procedures adopted by the director of personnel or
agency heads shall require that each medical expense plan authorized by
subsection (7) of this section apply to all eligible employees in any
one of the following groups: (a) Employees in an agency; (b) employees
in a major organizational subdivision of an agency; (c) employees at a
major operating location of an agency; (d) exempt employees under the
jurisdiction of an elected or appointed Washington state executive; (e)
employees of the Washington state senate; (f) employees of the
Washington state house of representatives; (g) classified employees in
a bargaining unit established by the director of personnel; or (h)
other group of employees defined by an agency head that is not designed
to provide an individual-employee choice regarding participation in a
medical expense plan. However, medical expense plans for eligible
employees in any of the groups under (a) through (h) of this subsection
who are covered by a collective bargaining agreement shall be
implemented only by written agreement with the bargaining unit's
exclusive representative and a separate medical expense plan may be
provided for unrepresented employees.
(9) Medical expense plans authorized by subsection (7) of this
section must require as a condition of participation in the plan that
employees in the group affected by the plan sign an agreement with the
employer. The agreement must include a provision to hold the employer
harmless should the United States government find that the employer or
the employee is in debt to the United States as a result of the
employee not paying income taxes due on the equivalent funds placed
into the plan, or as a result of the employer not withholding or
deducting a tax, assessment, or other payment on the funds as required
by federal law. The agreement must also include a provision that
requires an eligible employee to forfeit remuneration under subsection
(3) of this section if the employee belongs to a group that has been
designated to participate in the medical expense plan permitted under
this section and the employee refuses to execute the required
agreement.

Sec. 251 RCW 41.06.020 and 1993 c 281 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the words used in
this chapter have the meaning given in this section.
(1) "Agency" means an office, department, board, commission, or
other separate unit or division, however designated, of the state
government and all personnel thereof; it includes any unit of state
government established by law, the executive officer or members of
which are either elected or appointed, upon which the statutes confer
powers and impose duties in connection with operations of either a
governmental or proprietary nature.
(2) "Board" means the Washington personnel resources board
established under the provisions of RCW 41.06.110, except that this
definition does not apply to the words "board" or "boards" when used in
RCW 41.06.070.
(3) "Classified service" means all positions in the state service
subject to the provisions of this chapter.
(4) "Competitive service" means all positions in the classified
service for which a competitive examination is required as a condition
precedent to appointment.
(5) "Comparable worth" means the provision of similar salaries for
positions that require or impose similar responsibilities, judgments,
knowledge, skills, and working conditions.
(6) "Noncompetitive service" means all positions in the classified
service for which a competitive examination is not required.
(7) "Department" means an agency of government that has as its
governing officer a person, or combination of persons such as a
commission, board, or council, by law empowered to operate the agency
responsible either to (a) no other public officer or (b) the governor.
(8) "Career development" means the progressive development of
employee capabilities to facilitate productivity, job satisfaction, and
upward mobility through work assignments as well as education and
training that are both state-sponsored and are achieved by individual
employee efforts, all of which shall be consistent with the needs and
obligations of the state and its agencies.
(9) "Training" means activities designed to develop job-related
knowledge and skills of employees.
(10) "Director" means the director of personnel appointed under the
provisions of RCW 41.06.130.
(11) "Affirmative action" means a procedure by which racial
minorities, women, persons in the protected age category, persons with
disabilities, Vietnam-era veterans, and disabled veterans are provided
with increased employment opportunities. It shall not mean any sort of
quota system.
(12) "Institutions of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, North Snohomish State College, and the various
state community colleges.
(13) "Related boards" means the state board for community and
technical colleges; and such other boards, councils, and commissions
related to higher education as may be established.

Sec. 252 RCW 41.40.108 and 1991 c 35 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All classified employees employed by Washington State
University on and after April 24, 1973, and otherwise eligible shall
become members of the Washington public employees' retirement system to
the exclusion of any other retirement benefit system at the institution
unless otherwise provided by law.
(2) All classified employees employed by the University of
Washington ((or)), each of the regional universities ((or)), The
Evergreen State College, or North Snohomish State College, on and after
May 6, 1974, and otherwise eligible shall become members of the
Washington public employees' retirement system at the institution
unless otherwise provided by law: PROVIDED, That persons who,
immediately prior to the date of their hiring as classified employees,
have for at least two consecutive years held membership in a retirement
plan underwritten by the private insurer of the retirement plan of
their respective educational institution may irrevocably elect to
continue their membership in the retirement plan notwithstanding the
provisions of this chapter, if the election is made within thirty days
from the date of their hiring as classified employees. If these
persons elect to become members of the public employees' retirement
system, contributions by them and their employers shall be required
from their first day of employment.

Sec. 253 RCW 41.56.030 and 2004 c 3 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Public employer" means any officer, board, commission,
council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any public body
governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public body. For
the purposes of this section, the public employer of district court or
superior court employees for wage-related matters is the respective
county legislative authority, or person or body acting on behalf of the
legislative authority, and the public employer for nonwage-related
matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective district
court or superior court.
(2) "Public employee" means any employee of a public employer
except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to
office pursuant to statute, ordinance, or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy, administrative
assistant, or secretary necessarily imply a confidential relationship
to (i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining unit, or
(ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed
to office pursuant to statute, ordinance, or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner or a court
magistrate of superior court, district court, or a department of a
district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who is a
personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or
court commissioner, or (f) excluded from a bargaining unit under RCW
41.56.201(2)(a). For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more
than one assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from
a bargaining unit.
(3) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which
has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in
their employment relations with employers.
(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in
good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters,
including wages, hours, and working conditions, which may be peculiar
to an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that
by such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a
proposal or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided
in this chapter.
(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.
(7) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as
defined in RCW 41.26.030 employed by the governing body of any city or
town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more and law
enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any county with
a population of ten thousand or more; (b) correctional employees who
are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and noncommissioned
security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020(5),
by a county with a population of seventy thousand or more, and who are
trained for and charged with the responsibility of controlling and
maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and safeguarding inmates
from other inmates; (c) general authority Washington peace officers as
defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a port district in a county with
a population of one million or more; (d) security forces established
under RCW 43.52.520; (e) fire fighters as that term is defined in RCW
41.26.030; (f) employees of a port district in a county with a
population of one million or more whose duties include crash fire
rescue or other fire fighting duties; (g) employees of fire departments
of public employers who dispatch exclusively either fire or emergency
medical services, or both; or (h) employees in the several classes of
advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, who are
employed by a public employer.
(8) "Institution of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, North Snohomish State College, and the various
state community colleges.
(9) "Home care quality authority" means the authority under chapter
74.39A RCW.
(10) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240(4) who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, is a public employee as provided in RCW 74.39A.270.

Sec. 254 RCW 41.76.005 and 2002 c 356 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Faculty governance system" means the internal organization
that serves as the faculty advisory body and is charged with the
responsibility for recommending policies, regulations, and rules for
the college or university.
(2) "Grievance arbitration" means a method to resolve disputes
arising out of interpretations or application of the terms of an
agreement under which the parties to a controversy must accept the
decision of an impartial person or persons.
(3) "Collective bargaining" and "bargaining" mean the performance
of the mutual obligation of the representatives of the employer and the
exclusive bargaining representative to meet at reasonable times to
bargain in good faith in an effort to reach agreement with respect to
wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment. A written
contract incorporating any agreements reached must be executed if
requested by either party. The obligation to bargain does not compel
either party to agree to a proposal or to make a concession.
In the event of a dispute between an employer and an exclusive
bargaining representative over the matters that are terms and
conditions of employment, the commission shall decide which items are
mandatory subjects for bargaining, subject to RCW 41.76.010.
(4) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission
established pursuant to RCW 41.58.010.
(5) "Faculty" means employees who, at a public four-year
institution of higher education, are designated with faculty status or
who perform faculty duties as defined through policies established by
the faculty governance system, excluding casual or temporary employees,
administrators, confidential employees, graduate student employees,
postdoctoral and clinical employees, and employees subject to chapter
41.06 or 41.56 RCW.
(6) "Employee organization" means any organization that includes as
its members faculty of the employer and that has as one of its purposes
representation of faculty under this chapter. A faculty governance
system is not an employee organization as defined in this subsection.
(7) "Employer" means the board of regents or the board of trustees
of a public four-year institution of higher education.
(8) "Exclusive bargaining representative" means any employee
organization that has been determined by the commission to represent
all of the faculty members of the bargaining unit as required in RCW
41.76.015.
(9) "Administrator" means deans, associate and assistant deans,
vice-provosts, vice-presidents, the provost, chancellors, vice-chancellors, the president, and faculty members who exercise managerial
or supervisory authority over other faculty members.
(10) "Confidential employee" means (a) a person who participates
directly on behalf of an employer in the formulation of labor relations
policy, the preparation for or conduct of collective bargaining, or the
administration of a collective bargaining agreement, if the role of the
person is not merely routine or clerical in nature but calls for the
consistent exercise of independent judgment; and (b) a person who
assists and acts in a confidential capacity to a person in (a) of this
subsection.
(11) "Bargaining unit" includes all faculty members of all campuses
of each of the colleges and universities. Only one bargaining unit is
allowable for faculty of each employer, and that unit must contain all
faculty members from all schools, colleges, and campuses of the
employer.
(12) "Public four-year institutions of higher education" means the
University of Washington, Washington State University, Eastern
Washington University, Western Washington University, Central
Washington University, ((and)) The Evergreen State College, and North
Snohomish State College.

Sec. 255 RCW 41.80.005 and 2002 c 354 s 321 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agency" means any agency as defined in RCW 41.06.020 and
covered by chapter 41.06 RCW.
(2) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligation of the representatives of the employer and the exclusive
bargaining representative to meet at reasonable times and to bargain in
good faith in an effort to reach agreement with respect to the subjects
of bargaining specified under RCW 41.80.020. The obligation to bargain
does not compel either party to agree to a proposal or to make a
concession, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.
(3) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(4) "Confidential employee" means an employee who, in the regular
course of his or her duties, assists in a confidential capacity persons
who formulate, determine, and effectuate management policies with
regard to labor relations or who, in the regular course of his or her
duties, has authorized access to information relating to the
effectuation or review of the employer's collective bargaining
policies, or who assists or aids a manager. "Confidential employee"
also includes employees who assist assistant attorneys general who
advise and represent managers or confidential employees in personnel or
labor relations matters, or who advise or represent the state in tort
actions.
(5) "Director" means the director of the public employment
relations commission.
(6) "Employee" means any employee, including employees whose work
has ceased in connection with the pursuit of lawful activities
protected by this chapter, covered by chapter 41.06 RCW, except:
(a) Employees covered for collective bargaining by chapter 41.56
RCW;
(b) Confidential employees;
(c) Members of the Washington management service;
(d) Internal auditors in any agency; or
(e) Any employee of the commission, the office of financial
management, or the department of personnel.
(7) "Employee organization" means any organization, union, or
association in which employees participate and that exists for the
purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining with employers.
(8) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(9) "Exclusive bargaining representative" means any employee
organization that has been certified under this chapter as the
representative of the employees in an appropriate bargaining unit.
(10) "Institutions of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, North Snohomish State College, and the various
state community colleges.
(11) "Labor dispute" means any controversy concerning terms,
tenure, or conditions of employment, or concerning the association or
representation of persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining,
changing, or seeking to arrange terms or conditions of employment with
respect to the subjects of bargaining provided in this chapter,
regardless of whether the disputants stand in the proximate relation of
employer and employee.
(12) "Manager" means "manager" as defined in RCW 41.06.022.
(13) "Supervisor" means an employee who has authority, in the
interest of the employer, to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall,
promote, discharge, direct, reward, or discipline employees, or to
adjust employee grievances, or effectively to recommend such action, if
the exercise of the authority is not of a merely routine nature but
requires the consistent exercise of individual judgment. However, no
employee who is a member of the Washington management service may be
included in a collective bargaining unit established under this
section.
(14) "Unfair labor practice" means any unfair labor practice listed
in RCW 41.80.110.

Sec. 256 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2001 c 36 s 1 and 2001 c 9 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the director of
the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of
community, trade, and economic development, the secretary of
corrections, the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment
security, the chairman of the energy facility site evaluation council,
the secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial
management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary
of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling
commission, the director of general administration, the secretary of
health, the administrator of the Washington state health care
authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the
executive secretary of the human rights commission, the executive
secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of
the department of information services, the director of the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation, the executive director of the state
investment board, the director of labor and industries, the director of
licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the director of the
office of minority and women's business enterprises, the director of
parks and recreation, the director of personnel, the executive director
of the public disclosure commission, the director of retirement
systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health
services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive
secretary of the board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation,
the secretary of the utilities and transportation commission, the
director of veterans affairs, the president of each of the regional and
state universities and the president of The Evergreen State College,
each district and each campus president of each state community
college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, board of
trustees of each community college, each member of the state board for
community and technical colleges, state convention and trade center
board of directors, committee for deferred compensation, Eastern
Washington University board of trustees, Washington economic
development finance authority, The Evergreen State College board of
trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices appeals board,
forest practices board, gambling commission, Washington health care
facilities authority, each member of the Washington health services
commission, higher education coordinating board, higher education
facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance
commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review
board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information services
board, interagency committee for outdoor recreation, state investment
board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics board, liquor
control board, lottery commission, marine oversight board, North
Snohomish State College board of trustees, Pacific Northwest electric
power and conservation planning council, parks and recreation
commission, personnel appeals board, board of pilotage commissioners,
pollution control hearings board, public disclosure commission, public
pension commission, shorelines hearing board, public employees'
benefits board, salmon recovery funding board, board of tax appeals,
transportation commission, University of Washington board of regents,
utilities and transportation commission, Washington state maritime
commission, Washington personnel resources board, Washington public
power supply system executive board, Washington State University board
of regents, Western Washington University board of trustees, and fish
and wildlife commission.

Sec. 257 RCW 43.19.450 and 1994 c 264 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director of general administration shall appoint and deputize
an assistant director to be known as the supervisor of engineering and
architecture who shall have charge and supervision of the division of
engineering and architecture. With the approval of the director, the
supervisor may appoint and employ such assistants and personnel as may
be necessary to carry out the work of the division.
No person shall be eligible for appointment as supervisor of
engineering and architecture unless he or she is licensed to practice
the profession of engineering or the profession of architecture in the
state of Washington and for the last five years prior to his or her
appointment has been licensed to practice the profession of engineering
or the profession of architecture.
As used in this section, "state facilities" includes all state
buildings, related structures, and appurtenances constructed for any
elected state officials, institutions, departments, boards,
commissions, colleges, community colleges, except the state
universities, The Evergreen State College, North Snohomish State
College, and regional universities. "State facilities" does not
include facilities owned by or used for operational purposes and
constructed for the department of transportation, department of fish
and wildlife, department of natural resources, or state parks and
recreation commission.
The director of general administration, through the division of
engineering and architecture shall:
(1) Prepare cost estimates and technical information to accompany
the capital budget and prepare or contract for plans and specifications
for new construction and major repairs and alterations to state
facilities((.));
(2) Contract for professional architectural, engineering, and
related services for the design of new state facilities and major
repair or alterations to existing state facilities((.));
(3) Provide contract administration for new construction and the
repair and alteration of existing state facilities((.));
(4) In accordance with the public works laws, contract on behalf of
the state for the new construction and major repair or alteration of
state facilities.
The director may delegate any and all of the functions under
subsections (1) through (4) of this section to any agency upon such
terms and conditions as considered advisable.
The director may delegate the authority granted to the department
under RCW 39.04.150 to any agency upon such terms as considered
advisable.

Sec. 258 RCW 43.41.040 and 1993 c 500 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:
(1) "Office" means the office of financial management.
(2) "Director" means the director of financial management.
(3) "Agency" means and includes every state agency, office,
officer, board, commission, department, state institution, or state
institution of higher education, which includes all state universities,
regional universities, The Evergreen State College, North Snohomish
State College, and community and technical colleges.

Sec. 259 RCW 43.79.150 and 1993 c 411 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The one hundred thousand acres of land granted by the United States
government to the state for state normal schools in section 17 of the
enabling act are assigned to the support of the regional universities,
which were formerly the state colleges of education ((and)), to The
Evergreen State College, and to North Snohomish State College.

Sec. 260 RCW 43.84.092 and 2003 c 361 s 602, 2003 c 324 s 1, 2003
c 150 s 2, and 2003 c 48 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, the
emergency reserve fund, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, The North Snohomish State College
capital projects account, the oyster reserve land account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the regional transportation
investment district account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University
of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express
account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state
patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be
distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 261 RCW 43.84.092 and 2004 c 242 s 60 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, the
emergency reserve fund, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the North Snohomish State College
capital projects account, the oyster reserve land account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the regional transportation
investment district account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University
of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express
account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public
safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state
patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be
distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 262 RCW 43.88.195 and 1996 c 186 s 509 are each amended to
read as follows:
After August 11, 1969, no state agency, state institution, state
institution of higher education, which shall include all state
universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State College, North
Snohomish State College, and community colleges, shall establish any
new accounts or funds which are to be located outside of the state
treasury: PROVIDED, That the office of financial management shall be
authorized to grant permission for the establishment of such an account
or fund outside of the state treasury only when the requesting agency
presents compelling reasons of economy and efficiency which could not
be achieved by placing such funds in the state treasury. When the
director of financial management authorizes the creation of such fund
or account, the director shall forthwith give written notice of the
fact to the standing committees on ways and means of the house and
senate: PROVIDED FURTHER, That agencies authorized to create local
accounts will utilize the services of the state treasurer's office to
ensure that new or ongoing relationships with financial institutions
are in concert with statewide policies and procedures pursuant to RCW
43.88.160(1).

Sec. 263 RCW 46.63.040 and 2002 c 237 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All violations of state law, local law, ordinance, regulation,
or resolution designated as traffic infractions in RCW 46.63.020 may be
heard and determined by a district court, except as otherwise provided
in this section.
(2) Any municipal court has the authority to hear and determine
traffic infractions pursuant to this chapter.
(3) Any city or town with a municipal court may contract with the
county to have traffic infractions committed within the city or town
adjudicated by a district court.
(4) District court commissioners have the authority to hear and
determine traffic infractions pursuant to this chapter.
(5) Any district or municipal court may refer juveniles age sixteen
or seventeen who are enrolled in school to a youth court, as defined in
RCW 3.72.005 or 13.40.020, for traffic infractions.
(6) The boards of regents of the state universities, and the boards
of trustees of the regional universities ((and of)), The Evergreen
State College, and North Snohomish State College have the authority to
hear and determine traffic infractions under RCW 28B.10.560.

Sec. 264 RCW 82.12.0264 and 1980 c 37 s 63 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of motor vehicles, equipped with dual controls, which are loaned to
and used exclusively by a school in connection with its driver training
program: PROVIDED, That this exemption and the term "school" shall
apply only to (1) the University of Washington, Washington State
University, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
North Snohomish State College, and the state community colleges or (2)
any public, private, or parochial school accredited by either the state
board of education or by the University of Washington (the state
accrediting station) or (3) any public vocational school meeting the
standards, courses, and requirements established and prescribed or
approved in accordance with the Community College Act of 1967 (chapter
8, Laws of 1967 ((first extraordinary session)) 1st ex. sess.).

PART III
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 Sections 1 and 101 through 117 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 Section 261 of this act takes effect July
1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 Section 260 of this act expires July 1,
2006.

--- END ---