BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a need
to review current laws and rules that govern school attendance
requirements. The legislature is concerned about the attendance of
youth in the educational system and the impact truancy and students
dropping out of school have on schools and communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) To the extent funds are appropriated,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction in conjunction
with the administrative office of the courts, shall convene a work
group to evaluate the following:
(a) Review the implementation of the Becca bill and other school
attendance measures to determine their consistent application across
the state and their conformance with state law;
(b) The definition of excused and unexcused absences;
(c) Creating incentives for school districts to improve student
attendance; and
(d) Related data collection requirements on graduation, dropouts,
student transfer, and other issues related to student attendance.
(2) The work group shall include representatives of the following
groups, agencies, and organizations:
(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(b) The state board of education;
(c) Teachers;
(d) School administrators;
(e) School counselors;
(f) Truancy officers and truancy board members;
(g) The administrator for the courts;
(h) Court judges;
(i) Prosecuting attorneys;
(j) The office of attorney general;
(k) Institutions of higher education;
(l) Members of the legislature; and
(m) Other interested education organizations and personnel.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
report the findings of the work group to the governor, the state board
of education, and the legislature no later than January 10, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires January 31, 2006.

--- END ---