BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.490 and 1998 c 191 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
A combination fishing license shall, upon written application, be
issued at no charge to a resident seventy years old or older, and at
the reduced rate of five dollars to the following individuals:
(1) Residents who are honorably discharged veterans of the United
States armed forces with a thirty percent or more service-connected
disability;
(2) A person who is blind;
(3) A person with a developmental disability as defined in RCW
71A.10.020 with documentation of the disability certified by a
physician licensed to practice in this state; and
(4) A person who is physically disabled and confined to a
wheelchair.

--- END ---