BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.501 and 2003 c 379 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When the department performs a risk assessment pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.500, or to determine a person's conditions of supervision,
the risk assessment shall classify the offender into one of at least
four risk categories.
(b) For any offender under supervision by the department in the
community, the risk category determined as provided in (a) of this
subsection shall not be reduced without written justification by the
department that the department has reviewed the initial risk assessment
report and presentence reports, including any victim impact statements
and criminal history, arguments by the prosecutor, the defense counsel,
the offender, or an investigative law enforcement officer, and any
history of infractions, and any violations of conditions of supervision
in the community, and document, in the file, why the department
believes that the risk to the public will not be compromised and the
liability to the department will not be increased.
(2) The department shall supervise every offender sentenced to a
term of community custody, community placement, or community
supervision:
(a) Whose risk assessment places that offender in one of the two
highest risk categories; or
(b) Regardless of the offender's risk category if:
(i) The offender's current conviction is for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(ii) The offender has a prior conviction for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(iii) The conditions of the offender's community custody, community
placement, or community supervision include chemical dependency
treatment;
(iv) The offender was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650 or 9.94A.670;
or
(v) The offender is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW
9.94A.745.
(3) The department is not authorized to, and may not, supervise any
offender sentenced to a term of community custody, community placement,
or community supervision unless the offender is one for whom
supervision is required under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---