BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) On July 1, 2005, the state treasurer
shall transfer four million dollars from the accident fund to the
public safety and education account.
(2) On July 1, 2006, the state treasurer shall transfer four
million dollars from the accident fund to the public safety and
education account.
(3) The transfers in this section are provided for the use of the
crime victims' compensation program administered by the department of
labor and industries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---