BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.64.020 and 1989 c 367 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall consist of eleven members. One member shall
be a judge selected by and from the court of appeals judges; one member
shall be a judge selected by and from the superior court judges; one
member shall be a judge selected by and from the ((district)) limited
jurisdiction court judges; two members shall be selected by the state
bar association and be admitted to the practice of law in this state;
and six members shall be nonlawyers appointed by the governor. The
term of each member of the commission shall be four years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2006, if
the proposed amendment to Article IV, section 31 of the state
Constitution (Senate Joint Resolution No. . . ., changing the
membership of the commission on judicial conduct) is validly submitted
to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next general
election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this
act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---