BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The early years mark the most extraordinary period of growth
for young children. The state's role in providing access to early
learning opportunities has never been consistently defined;
(2) More than a quarter of a century has passed since the current
school finance system was first created, and the challenges facing our
schools and students have grown and changed dramatically during that
time. Policies have been established creating new expectations and
goals for students under education reform;
(3) Demographic pressures and work force needs will continue to
increase demand for access to postsecondary education and training.
Public two-year and four-year institutions of higher education are also
important avenues for programs such as adult basic education and
English as a second language that are the foundation for employment and
further education for an increasing number of people. Washington ranks
thirty-third in the nation in the number of bachelor's degrees earned
per one thousand residents ages twenty through twenty-nine years, and
will graduate the largest high school class in its history in 2008.
Washington citizens deserve access to baccalaureate degree
opportunities. Washington's public universities and colleges engage in
research that contributes to the economic and social well-being of the
state. Students have paid an increasing cost of their education with
tuition growing faster than personal income or inflation; and
(4) Through a comprehensive study, the legislature will have solid
information to determine how best to use its resources to create a
strong education system that will provide an educated citizenry and a
thriving economy in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The comprehensive education study
steering committee is created.
(2) Members of the steering committee shall include: The governor
who shall chair the steering committee; the director of the office of
financial management; two members from the house of representatives
with one appointed by each major caucus; two members from the senate
with one appointed by each major caucus; four citizens appointed by the
governor; and the chairs of each of the three advisory committees
created under subsection (3) of this section. The chair of the
advisory committee on K-12 shall be the superintendent of public
instruction. The chair of the advisory committee on early learning
shall be appointed by the governor from a list of names submitted by
groups representing early learning. The chair of the advisory
committee on higher education shall be selected by the governor from a
list of three or more names submitted by the state board for community
and technical colleges, the higher education coordinating board, and
the council of presidents.
(3) The steering committee shall appoint the members of the
advisory committee on early learning, the advisory committee on K-12,
and the advisory committee on higher education.
(4) The steering committee shall receive staff and logistical
support from the office of financial management.
(5) Nonlegislative members of the steering committee shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The steering committee:
(a) Shall direct and coordinate the studies created in this
section. In conducting the studies, consideration shall be given to
recently completed, related finance studies;
(b) May enter into contracts as needed to support the work of the
study;
(c) Shall develop recommendations based on the work of the studies
in this section; and
(d) Shall develop recommendations about how the state can best
provide stable funding for student learning for young children,
students in the public schools, and students in the public colleges and
universities.
(2) A comprehensive K-12 finance study shall include, but not be
limited to:
(a) The constitutional and legal requirements underlying the
current finance system and how those requirements are affected by the
goal under education reform to provide all students with the
opportunity to achieve the state standards;
(b) The strengths and weaknesses of the current state and local
finance formulas and how those formulas are used by local school
districts to meet state requirements and student learning goals;
(c) Information regarding remediation particularly in the subject
areas of mathematics, science, and language arts;
(d) Potential changes to the current finance system including the
methods of allocating funds, levels of funding, and how student
achievement is affected;
(e) Reviewing the funding systems in at least five other states;
(f) Specific issues facing schools: Assuring program
accountability; improving effectiveness in state-level governance;
identifying efficiencies in district spending practices; providing
programs that assist students in meeting standards; helping students
stay in school; impacts of the certification requirements for teachers;
and appropriate preparation requirements for paraeducators; and
(g) Local and regional funding challenges faced by individual
school districts throughout the state.
(3) A comprehensive study of early learning shall include, but not
be limited to:
(a) Defining the populations being served, those that could be
served, and program access;
(b) Determining the state's role in supporting quality early
learning opportunities;
(c) Determining the state's role in training persons providing
services; and
(d) Providing for smooth transitions to K-12 programs.
(4) A comprehensive study of higher education shall include, but
not be limited to:
(a) Options for creating a new funding system;
(b) The number and distribution of enrollments at two and four-year
institutions of higher education needed to meet demographic and work
force training needs;
(c) Methods for determining the cost of instruction in various
program areas;
(d) The appropriate share of the cost of instruction that should be
funded through tuition, general fund-state subsidies, and financial
aid;
(e) Providing for smooth transitions from high school to college,
including dual credit options and adequate preparation for
college-level coursework;
(f) Identifying strategies and associated costs to increase
opportunity for access to baccalaureate degrees at public institutions
of higher education;
(g) Identifying incentives to optimize research conducted by public
universities and colleges that has the potential to stimulate the
economy and address economic and social issues relevant to Washington
citizens;
(h) Options for using existing capacity in independent colleges and
universities;
(i) A review of higher education governance as it relates to fiscal
policy for higher education; and
(j) Options for coordinating capital and operating appropriations.
(5) The steering committee shall provide interim reports to the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the senate and the house of
representatives by November 15, 2005, and June 16, 2006. These interim
reports shall document ongoing work to-date, initial findings, and next
steps. The November 15, 2005, interim report may recommend possible
action items for consideration in the 2006 legislative session.
(6) The final report and recommendations of the steering committee
shall be submitted to the legislature by November 15, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires July 1, 2007.

--- END ---