BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The people of Washington state adopted the
cleanup priority act as Initiative 297 in November 2004. The
legislature finds that the intent of Initiative 297 is clearly stated
in the intent and policy sections of the cleanup priority act as passed
by the voters. The cleanup priority act makes the cleanup of
contamination the top priority at sites with hazardous or mixed waste
contamination. The cleanup priority act should be interpreted by the
courts consistent with the clear intent of the voters, and the findings
and clarifications in this act.
The legislature further finds that nothing in the cleanup priority
act is intended to, or has the effect of, preventing the movement of
waste from one facility or unit within a site to another as part of an
approved cleanup order, agreement, or plan, or pursuant to permits.
Because the term facility is used in different ways in different
statutes, rules, and regulations, the legislature finds that it is
desirable to clarify that the cleanup priority act does not prevent the
movement or transfer of waste within a site to accomplish cleanup of
the site. The legislature finds that the cleanup priority act does not
increase the universe of substances that are subject to regulation by
the state as hazardous or mixed wastes. The legislature finds that the
cleanup priority act does not regulate radioactive materials, medical
isotopes, other radioactive substances, or facilities exclusively
regulated by the United States pursuant to the federal atomic energy
act 42 U.S.C. Sec. 2011 et seq.
The legislature further finds that this chapter is not intended,
nor may it be interpreted, to adversely affect the transportation,
manufacturing, storage, or use of any hazardous substance or
radioactive materials necessary for medical research, medical
treatment, or manufacturing or industrial processes.
The legislature further finds that the cleanup priority act does
not regulate the materials or facilities used in the processing of
radioactive substances, including those with nonradioactive components,
to produce radioactive isotopes for beneficial use, such as
calibrations, research, and medical use. In accordance with this
finding, the cleanup priority act is not intended to, and shall not be
interpreted to, regulate those radioactive or otherwise hazardous
materials that may be imported to Washington state, or generated within
the state, to be processed for the production of beneficial products,
such as medical isotopes.
It is in the interest of the state to clarify as quickly as
possible that the cleanup priority act does not impact any business
operation, or federal or private facility, that was not intended to be
impacted by the cleanup priority act. Consistent with the intent of
the voters, the legislature finds that the universe of regulated
hazardous or dangerous wastes was not expanded by the passage of the
cleanup priority act. Because court action has prevented the normal
role of the department of ecology from issuing defining or interpretive
rules, the legislature finds that adoption of the amendments to the
cleanup priority act will ensure that the intent of the cleanup
priority act is understood and clarified for the courts as well as for
businesses or cleanup operations without delay.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.105E.030 and 2005 c 1 s 3 (Initiative Measure No.
297) are each amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Dangerous waste" has the same meaning as the term is defined
in RCW 70.105.010.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Dispose" or "disposal" have the same meanings as the terms are
defined in RCW 70.105.010.
(4) "Facility" has the same meaning as the term is defined in RCW
70.105.010.
(5) "Hanford" means the geographic area comprising the Hanford
nuclear reservation, owned and operated by the United States department
of energy, or any successor federal agency.
(6) "Hazardous substance" has the same meaning as the term is
defined in RCW 70.105D.020.
(7) "Hazardous waste" means and includes all dangerous and
extremely hazardous waste, as those terms are defined in RCW
70.105.010.
(8) "Local government" means a city, town, or county.
(9)(a) "Mixed waste" or "mixed radioactive and hazardous waste"
means:
(i) Any ((hazardous substance or)) dangerous or extremely hazardous
waste that contains both a nonradioactive hazardous component and a
radioactive component((, including)); or
(ii) Any ((such)) hazardous substances, as defined by RCW
70.105D.020 that contain both a nonradioactive and radioactive
hazardous component, that (A) have been released to the environment, or
(B) are discarded solid wastes found by the department to pose a threat
of future release, in a manner that may expose persons or the
environment to ((either the nonradioactive or radioactive hazardous
substances)) the release.
(b) Materials, useful products, or substances, including medical
isotopes and materials used to produce medical or industrial isotopes,
that are not otherwise regulated as hazardous or mixed waste under
chapter 70.105 RCW or the federal hazardous waste law (RCRA 42 U.S.C.
Sec. 6901, et seq.) are not hazardous, dangerous, or mixed waste under
this chapter. Mixed wastes or mixed waste facility does not include
radioactive materials or facilities regulated exclusively by the
federal government under the federal atomic energy act, 42 U.S.C. Sec.
2011 et seq.
(10) "Mixed waste surcharge" means an additional charge for the
purposes of local government and public participation in decisions
relating to mixed waste facilities((:)) to be added to the service
charge assessed under RCW 70.105.280 against those facilities that
store, treat, incinerate, or dispose of mixed wastes((;)), or against
facilities at which mixed wastes have been released((,)) or which are
undergoing closure pursuant to chapter 70.105 RCW or remedial action
pursuant to chapter 70.105D RCW.
(11) "Person" has the same meaning as the term is defined in RCW
70.105D.020.
(12) "Release" has the same meaning as the term is defined in RCW
70.105D.020.
(13) "Remedy or remedial action" have the same meanings as the
terms are defined in RCW 70.105D.020.
(14) "Site" means the contiguous geographic area under the same
ownership, lease, or operation where a facility is located, or where
there has been a release of hazardous substances. In the event of a
release of hazardous substances, "site" includes any area, or body of
surface or ground water, where a hazardous substance has been
deposited, stored, disposed of, placed, migrated to, or otherwise come
to be located.
(15) Unless otherwise defined, or the context indicates otherwise,
terms not defined in this section have the same meaning as defined in
chapter 70.105 RCW, when used in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.105E
RCW to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter prohibits mixed wastes generated on-site as
part of a remedial or corrective action from being transferred to,
stored, treated, recycled, or disposed of at a facility or unit within
the site subject to applicable permits, plans, agreements, consent
orders, or conditions of an approved remedy or corrective action under
the federal superfund law, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601 et seq., chapter 70.105D
RCW, chapter 70.105 RCW, or the federal resource conservation and
recovery act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6921 et seq.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---