BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds it is in the public
interest to regulate the practice of soil science in order to protect
life, property, health, and to promote public welfare; to define the
practice of soil science as a profession by establishing minimum
standards of ethical conduct and professional responsibility and by
establishing professional education and experience requirements; and to
prevent abuses in the practice of soil science by untrained or
unprincipled individuals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advisory committee" means a group of either certified
professional soil classifiers or certified professional soil scientists
or licensed soil scientists with broad knowledge and experience in
their profession, appointed under this chapter to offer recommendations
to the board and the director on the administration of the program
established under this chapter.
(2) "Board" means the geologist licensing board as defined in RCW
18.220.010.
(3) "Certified professional soil classifier" means a soil
classifier certified by, and under rules set by, the soil science
society of America.
(4) "Certified professional soil scientist" means a soil scientist
certified by, and under rules set by, the soil science society of
America.
(5) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(6) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.
(7) "Practice of soil science" means performance of soil science
service or work including but not limited to the collection of soil
science data, consultation, investigation, evaluation, interpretation,
planning, soil mapping, or inspection relating to a service or work
that applies to soil science, and the responsible supervision of that
service or work, the performance of which is related to public welfare
or the safeguarding of life, health, property, and the environment,
except as otherwise specifically provided by this chapter.
(8) "Practice of soil science for others" includes, but is not
limited to:
(a) The preparation of soil science reports, documents, or exhibits
by any commission, board, department, district, or division of the
state or any political subdivision or of any county, city, or other
public body, or by the employees or staff members of the commission,
board, department, district, or division of the state or any political
subdivision or of any county, city, or other public body when the
reports, documents, or exhibits are disseminated or made available to
the public in such a manner that the public may reasonably be expected
to rely upon or be affected by them; and
(b) The performance of soil science services by an individual,
firm, partnership, corporation, or other association or by their
employees or staff members, whether or not the principal business of
the organization is the practice of soil science, which the soil
science reports, documents, or exhibits constituting the practice of
soil science are disseminated or made available to the public or an
individual or organization in such a manner that the public or
individual or combination of individuals may reasonably be expected to
rely upon or be affected by them. However, soil science reports,
documents, or exhibits that are prepared by the employees or staff
members of an individual, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
association or commission, board, department, district, or division of
the state or political subdivision or a county, city, or other public
body that are for use solely within the organizations are considered
in-house reports, documents, or exhibits and are not the practice of
soil science for others unless or until the reports are disseminated or
made available as set forth in this subsection.
(9) "Responsible charge" means the exercise of fully independent
control and direction of soil science work or the supervision of such
work, and being fully responsible, answerable, accountable, or liable
for the results.
(10) "Soil" is the unconsolidated either mineral or organic, or
both, material on the immediate surface of the earth that serves as a
natural medium for the growth of plants, and that has been subjected to
and shows effects of genetic and environmental factors of climate,
including water and temperature effects, and macro and microorganisms
conditioned by relief (topography), acting on parent material over a
period of time.
(11) "Soil science" means the science that deals with the treatment
and study of soils as a natural resource on the surface of the earth
including but not limited to soil formation, classification,
conservation, and mapping as well as the study of soil physical,
chemical, and biological properties.
(12) "Soil scientist" means a person who, by reason of the person's
knowledge of soil science, mathematics, the environment, and the
supporting physical and life sciences, acquired by education and
practical experience, has met the qualifications established under this
chapter, and has been issued a license as a soil scientist by the
board.
(13) "Subordinate" means a person who assists in the practice of
soil science by a licensed soil scientist without assuming the
responsible charge of the work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) It is unlawful for a person to practice
or offer to practice soil science for others in this state, or to use
in connection with the person's name or otherwise assume or advertise
any title or description tending to convey the impression that the
person is a licensed soil scientist, unless the person has been
licensed under the provisions of this chapter.
(2) A person shall be construed to practice or offer to practice
soil science within the meaning and intent of this chapter, if the
person:
(a) Practices any branch of the profession of soil science;
(b) Represents by verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead,
card, or in any other way himself or herself to be a soil scientist;
(c) Implies through the use of some other title that he or she is
a soil scientist or that he or she is licensed under this chapter; or
(d) Holds himself or herself out as able to perform or does perform
any soil science services or work recognized by the board as the
practice of soil science for others.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) An advisory committee is created to
provide recommendations to the board and the director concerning the
administration of this chapter. The advisory committee consists of
five members who are conversant with and experienced in the soil
science profession, and who are otherwise eligible for licensure under
this chapter. Subsequent to the initial appointments, all members must
be licensed under this chapter. All advisory committee members must be
soil science society of America certified professional soil scientists
or certified professional soil classifiers. Each member of the
advisory committee must be a resident of the state.
(2) The director shall appoint to the advisory committee
individuals from across the state, utilizing geographic and
experiential diversity as much as possible. The terms of the members
of the advisory committee are a maximum of three years, except that the
initial appointees to the advisory committee serve the following terms:
Two members for two years and three members for three years. No member
of the advisory committee is eligible for reappointment to a third
consecutive term, but any member is eligible for reappointment after an
absence of at least one year from the advisory committee. Any member
who is reappointed following an absence of at least one year from the
advisory committee is eligible for reappointment to a second
consecutive term and is again eligible for reappointment after an
absence of at least one year from the advisory committee.
(3) Members of the advisory committee serve until replaced by a
subsequent appointment even if their appointment exceeds the length of
their term, but may resign prior to completing the term of appointment.
The director may for just cause remove an advisory committee member.
The director shall appoint a new member to fill any vacancy on the
advisory committee for the remainder of the unexpired term. Members of
the advisory committee may not be compensated, but shall be reimbursed
for expenses incurred in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
Three members constitute a quorum.
(4) At the request of the advisory committee, the director may
appoint additional temporary members to the advisory committee for
assistance with rule development, examination development, and
technical advice on complaints. Temporary members must meet the same
minimum qualifications as regular members of the advisory committee.
Temporary members have all the powers, duties, and immunities of
regular members of the advisory committee and shall be reimbursed for
expenses incurred in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The
director shall limit the term of temporary members to one year, but may
extend the original appointment up to one additional year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The advisory committee shall make
recommendations to the board regarding:
(1) Developing and adopting rules to administer this chapter
including, but not limited to, evaluating the experience, scope, and
standards of practice of soil science;
(2) Reviewing complaints and investigations pertaining to the
practice of soil science; and
(3) Performing other duties deemed necessary by the director or the
board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The director has the following authority in
administering this chapter:
(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind rules approved by the board as
deemed necessary to carry out this chapter;
(2) To adopt fees as provided in RCW 43.24.086;
(3) To administer licensing examinations approved by the board and
to adopt or recognize examinations prepared by other organizations as
approved by the board;
(4) To adopt standards of professional conduct and practice as
approved by the board; and
(5) To enter into an assurance of discontinuance in lieu of issuing
a statement of charges or conducting a hearing. The assurance must
consist of a statement of the law in question and an agreement to not
violate the stated provision. Violation of an assurance under this
subsection is grounds for disciplinary action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 In order to become a licensed soil
scientist, an applicant must meet the following requirements:
(1) An applicant who applies for soil scientist licensing before
July 1, 2006, is considered qualified for licensing, without further
written examination, if the applicant possesses the specific record of
being a current soil science society of America certified professional
soil scientist or certified professional soil classifier in good
standing.
(2) On or after July 1, 2006, in order to become a licensed soil
scientist, an applicant must:
(a) Be of good moral and ethical character as attested to by
letters of reference submitted by the applicant or as otherwise
determined by the board;
(b) Have graduated from a course of study in soil science
satisfactory to the board or satisfy educational equivalents determined
by the board;
(c) Have a documented record of a minimum of five years of
experience obtained after the completion of the academic requirements
specified in this section, in soil science work of a character
satisfactory to the board, demonstrating that the applicant is
qualified to assume responsible charge of such work upon licensing as
a soil scientist. The board requires that three years of the
experience be gained under the supervision of a soil scientist licensed
in this or any other state, or under the supervision of others who, in
the opinion of the board, are qualified to have responsible charge of
soil science work;
(d) Pass an examination covering the fundamentals and practice of
soil science prescribed or accepted by the board; and
(e) Meet other general or individual requirements established by
the board under its authority under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Experience in professional practice as
required under section 7(2)(c) of this act, of a character acceptable
to the board and acquired prior to July 1, 2006, is acceptable if the
experience: (a) Was acquired under the direct supervision of a soil
scientist who meets the educational and experience requirements for
licensing under this chapter, or who is licensed in another state that
has licensing requirements that are substantially similar to this
chapter; or (b) would constitute responsible charge of professional
soil science work, as determined by the board;
(2) Each year of full-time graduate study in soil science qualifies
as one year of professional experience, up to a maximum of two years.
The board may accept soil science research or teaching of soil science
at the college or university level as qualifying experience, provided
that such research or teaching, in the judgment of the board, is
comparable to experience obtained in the practice of soil science.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 An application for licensing shall be filed
with the director on a form provided by the director and must contain
statements made under oath demonstrating the applicant's education and
practical experience. The director may require any information and
documentation that reasonably relates to the need to determine whether
the applicant meets the criteria for licensing. The application fee
for initial licensing shall be determined by the director as provided
in RCW 43.24.086. The application, together with the fee, must be
submitted to the department prior to the application deadline
established by the director. Fees for initial licensing shall include
the examination and issuance of a certificate. If the director finds
an applicant ineligible for licensing, the fee is retained as an
application fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Examinations of applicants for licensing,
when required, shall be held at such times and places as determined by
the board with the director's approval. The scope of the examination
must be directed to an applicant's ability to practice soil science in
a manner that ensures the safety of life, health, and property. A
candidate failing an examination may apply for reexamination.
Subsequent examinations will be granted upon payment of a fee to be
determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The director shall issue a license to
any applicant who has satisfactorily met all of the requirements of
this chapter for licensing as a soil scientist. The license must show
the full name of the license holder, have a number, and be signed by
the director and an officer of the board. The issuance by the director
of a license to an individual is prima facie evidence that the person
is entitled to all the rights and privileges of a licensed soil
scientist while the license remains unrevoked or unexpired.
(2) Each license holder must obtain a seal of the design authorized
by the director, bearing the licensee's name, number, and the legend
"licensed soil scientist." Soil science reports, plans, and other
technical documents prepared by or under the responsible charge of the
license holder must be signed, dated, and stamped with the seal or
facsimile of the seal. Each signature and stamping constitutes a
certification by the license holder that the document was prepared by
or under the license holder's responsible charge and that to the
license holder's knowledge and belief the document was prepared in
accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The director may, upon application and
payment of a fee determined by the director as provided in RCW
43.24.086, issue a license without further examination as a soil
scientist to any person who holds a valid license or certificate of
qualification issued by the proper authority of any state, territory,
or possession of the United States, District of Columbia, or any
foreign country, if the applicant's qualifications, as evaluated by the
board, meet the requirements of this chapter and the rules adopted by
the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Licenses issued under this chapter shall be
renewed periodically on a date to be set by the director in conformance
with RCW 43.24.140. A license holder who fails to pay the prescribed
fee within ninety days shall have his or her license suspended until
the license holder pays a renewal fee equal to the current fee plus an
amount equal to one year's renewal fee. Any license that has been
expired or suspended for five years or more may be reinstated in
conformance with rules adopted by the director. Reinstatement
conditions may include demonstration of continued practice or
competency in the practice of soil science.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 All receipts from fees and fines collected
under this chapter must be deposited into the geologists' account
created in RCW 18.220.120. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including the
cost of administering this chapter. Only the director of licensing or
the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 In addition to the unprofessional conduct
described in RCW 18.235.130, the following conduct, acts, and
conditions constitute unprofessional conduct:
(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules
adopted under this chapter;
(2) Not meeting the qualifications for licensing set forth by this
chapter;
(3) Failing to comply with an assurance of discontinuance entered
into with the director; or
(4) Committing any other act, or failing to act, which act or
failure are customarily regarded as being contrary to the accepted
professional conduct or standard generally expected of those practicing
soil science.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) The procedures governing adjudicative
proceedings before agencies under chapter 34.05 RCW govern all hearings
before the director or the director's designee. Upon a finding that a
license holder or applicant has committed unprofessional conduct, the
director may issue an order providing for one or any combination of the
following:
(a) Revocation of the license;
(b) Suspension of the license for a fixed or indefinite term;
(c) Restriction or limitation of the practice;
(d) Issuance of a civil fine not to exceed five thousand dollars
for each violation;
(e) Requiring satisfactory completion of a specific program of
remedial education or treatment;
(f) Monitoring of the practice by a peer approved by the director;
(g) Reprimand or censure;
(h) Compliance with conditions of probation for a designated period
of time;
(i) Withholding of a license request;
(j) Refund of fees billed to and collected from the consumer; or
(k) Other corrective action.
(2) Any of the actions under this section may be totally or partly
stayed by the director. All costs associated with compliance with
orders issued under this section are the obligation of the license
holder or applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A person, including but not limited to
consumers, licensees, corporations, organizations, and state and local
governments or agencies, may submit a written complaint to the
department charging a license holder or applicant with unprofessional
conduct and specifying the grounds for the charge. If the director
determines that the complaint merits investigation, or if the director
has reason to believe, without a formal complaint, that a license
holder or applicant may have engaged in unprofessional conduct, the
director may investigate to determine if there has been unprofessional
conduct. A person who files a complaint under this section in good
faith is immune from suit in any civil action related to the filing or
contents of the complaint.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The board shall immediately suspend the
license of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320
by the department of social and health services as a person who is not
in compliance with a child support order. If the person has continued
to meet all other requirements for a license under this chapter during
the suspension, reissuance of the license shall be automatic upon the
board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and
health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the
child support order. The procedure in RCW 74.20A.320 is the exclusive
administrative remedy for contesting the establishment of noncompliance
with a child support order, and suspension of a license under this
subsection, and satisfies the requirements of RCW 34.05.422.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The following acts are prohibited and any
person committing any of the following acts is guilty of a class 1
civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW:
(1) The practice or offer to practice soil science without being
licensed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;
(2) Presenting or attempting to use as his or her own the
certificate of licensing or seal of another;
(3) Giving any false or forged evidence of any kind to the director
or his or her authorized representative in obtaining a license;
(4) Falsely impersonating any other licensee; or
(5) Attempting to use the expired or revoked certificate of
licensing.
All fees, fines, and penalties collected or assessed by a court
because of a violation of this section must be remitted to the
department to be deposited into the geologists' account created in RCW
18.220.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 The director is authorized to apply for
relief by injunction without bond, to restrain a person from the
commission of any act that is prohibited under this chapter. In such
proceedings, it is not necessary to allege or prove either that an
adequate remedy at law does not exist, or that substantial or
irreparable damage would result from continued violation. The
director, individuals acting on the director's behalf, and members of
the board are immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based
on disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in the
course of their duties in the administration and enforcement of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 The following activities do not require a
certificate of licensing under this chapter:
(1) Soil science work performed by an employee or a subordinate of
a soil scientist licensed under this chapter, provided that the work
does not include responsible charge of soil science work as covered by
this section, and is performed under the direct supervision of a soil
scientist licensed under this chapter, who shall be and remains
responsible for such work;
(2) Soil science work performed by officers and employees of the
United States practicing solely as such officers and employees;
(3) Soil science research conducted through academic institutions
by agencies of the federal or state governments, nonprofit research
institutions, or for-profit organizations, including submission of
reports of research to public agencies;
(4) Teaching soil science or related physical or natural sciences;
(5) The practice of engineering or other licensed professions: (a)
The acquisition of engineering data involving soil, rock, ground water,
and other earth materials; evaluation of the physical and chemical
properties of soil, rock, ground water, and other earth materials; and
the utilization of these data in analysis, design, and construction by
professional engineers appropriately registered or licensed in this
state; and (b) similar work performed by persons or organizations
licensed or registered in any other profession or occupation related to
soil science, provided that such work is permitted under the applicable
licensing or registration law, and is incidental to the practice or the
profession or occupation for which licensing or registration is
required. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the use
of the title soil scientist, or any other specialty as defined by the
director, by an engineer or other licensed professional except as
licensed under this chapter;
(6) General scientific work customarily performed by such physical
or natural scientists as chemists, archaeologists, geologists,
geographers, hydrologists, and oceanographers, providing such work does
not include the design and execution of soil science investigations,
being in responsible charge of soil science, or the drawing of soil
science conclusions and recommendations in a way that affects the
public health, safety, or welfare; or
(7) The giving of testimony or preparation and presentation of
exhibits or documents for the sole purpose of being placed in evidence
before any administrative or judicial tribunal or hearing, providing
such testimony, exhibits, or documents do not imply that the person is
licensed under the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The uniform regulation of business and
professions act, chapter 18.235 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the
issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of licensees under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 18.220
RCW to read as follows:
The board has the following authority in administering chapter
18.-- RCW (sections 1 through 22, 24, and 26 of this act):
(1) To establish rules, including committee organization and
assignment of terms, and meeting frequency and timing, for adoption by
the director;
(2) To establish the minimum qualifications for applicants for
licensure as provided by chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 1 through 22, 24,
and 26 of this act);
(3) To approve the method of administration for examinations
required by chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 1 through 22, 24, and 26 of
this act) or by rule as established by the director. To approve the
adoption or recognition of examinations prepared by other organizations
for adoption by the director. To set the time and place of
examinations with the approval of the director; and
(4) To establish and review standards of professional conduct and
practice for adoption by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Sections 1 through 22, 24, and 26 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---