BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the grizzly bear
is a federally listed threatened species throughout the lower forty-eight states and listed as state endangered by the state of Washington.
The north Cascades mountains in Washington are one of the regions which
until the 20th century supported a significant grizzly bear population.
While the current population estimate is that there are less than
twenty bears in this region of Washington state, there is a need to
provide education and information to communities in this region to
address public concerns and provide factual information about grizzly
bear ecology and behavior, sanitation, and safety in bear country. The
grizzly bear population in the north Cascades may become locally
extinct if recovery actions are not undertaken, and one of the most
critical actions needed is to promote positive human-bear coexistence
through education, outreach, and community involvement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of fish and wildlife shall
provide one or more grants for projects that provide community outreach
and public information regarding grizzly bears in the north Cascades
mountains. The projects funded must be designed to work closely with
communities in this region and have the objective of providing accurate
information about grizzly bear ecology, biology, and behavior, provide
education on how local residents can coexist safely with bears, and
provide opportunities for people who live in these areas to express
their ideas, opinions, and concerns.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of forty-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general
fund to the department of fish and wildlife for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2006, to carry out the purposes of this act.

--- END ---