BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.050 and 2004 c 174 s 3 and 2004 c 153 s 407 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible
personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:
(a) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(b) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(c) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(d) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; or
(e) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of tangible personal
property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the
performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail
sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as provided in
(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use. The
term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons
engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and
(7), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or
for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of coin-operated laundry facilities
when such facilities are situated in an apartment house, rooming house,
or mobile home park for the exclusive use of the tenants thereof, and
also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and shall also include the sale of services or charges
made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The charge for labor and services rendered in respect to
constructing, repairing, or improving any structure upon, above, or
under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by
title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such
construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such
construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then
reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original
owner;
(d) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to the cleaning, fumigating, razing or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but shall not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging and
all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel,
trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real
property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real
property, and it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real property
for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same.
For the purposes of this subsection, it shall be presumed that the sale
of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous
period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real
property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The sale of or charge made for tangible personal property,
labor and services to persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e),
and (f) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property,
labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by
such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at
retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services
may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection shall be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; ((and))
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services; and
(h) Cosmetic medical services.
(4)(a) The term shall also include:
(i) The renting or leasing of tangible personal property to
consumers; and
(ii) Providing tangible personal property along with an operator
for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this
is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to
perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (4)(a)(ii), an
operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible
personal property.
(b) The term shall not include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of
sublease or subrent.
(5) The term shall also include the providing of telephone service,
as defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6) The term shall also include the sale of prewritten computer
software other than a sale to a person who presents a resale
certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the method of delivery
to the end user, but shall not include custom software or the
customization of prewritten computer software.
(7) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(8) The term shall also not include sales of chemical sprays or
washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for
the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it include
sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or the Washington state department of
fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that
the farmer owns or leases.
(9) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and
nuclear research and development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The sales and use taxes collected under RCW 82.08.020 and 82.12.020
on cosmetic medical services, as defined in section 3 of this act,
shall be deposited into the health services account in RCW 43.72.900
and used solely for children's health care services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) "Cosmetic medical service" means any medical procedure
performed on an individual by a person licensed or regulated in a
health profession as described in RCW 18.120.020, and any services
directly related to the performance of the medical procedure, that is
directed at improving the individual's appearance and that is not
medically necessary to promote the proper function of the body or
prevent or treat physical illness or disease. "Cosmetic medical
service" includes, but is not limited to, cosmetic surgery, hair
transplants, cosmetic injections, cosmetic soft tissue fillers,
dermabrasion and chemical peel, laser hair removal, laser skin
resurfacing, laser treatment of leg veins, sclerotherapy, and cosmetic
dentistry. Any medical procedure performed on abnormal structures
caused by or related to congenital defects, developmental
abnormalities, trauma, infection, tumors, or disease, including
procedures to improve function or give a more normal appearance, is
medically necessary. Services covered by the individual's medical or
dental insurance or that are deductible by the individual as medical
expenses for purposes of federal income tax are presumed to be
medically necessary services.
(2) "Cosmetic surgery" means the surgical reshaping of normal
structures on the body to improve the body image, self-esteem, or
appearance of an individual.
(3) "Services directly related to the performance of the medical
procedure" include occupancy at medical facilities and services
provided by an anesthesiologist, surgeon, or other licensed or
regulated health professional described in RCW 18.120.020. Services
required for or directly related to cosmetic medical services do not
include evaluation and referral by a primary care physician or
consultation or treatment by a counselor, psychologist, or
psychiatrist.
(4) An individual claiming that a medical procedure, otherwise
meeting the definition of cosmetic medical service in this section, is
not a cosmetic medical service must complete and provide to the seller
an affidavit in a form and manner prescribed by the department
documenting that the procedure is medically necessary to promote the
proper function of the body or prevent or treat physical illness or
disease. The seller shall retain a copy of the affidavit for the
seller's files.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.12.020 and 2003 c 361 s 302 and 2003 c 168 s 214
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and there shall be collected from every
person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of using within
this state as a consumer: (a) Any article of tangible personal
property purchased at retail, or acquired by lease, gift, repossession,
or bailment, or extracted or produced or manufactured by the person so
using the same, or otherwise furnished to a person engaged in any
business taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) or (7); or (b) any prewritten
computer software, regardless of the method of delivery, but excluding
prewritten computer software that is either provided free of charge or
is provided for temporary use in viewing information, or both.
(2) This tax shall apply to the use of every service defined as a
retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) ((or)), (3)(a), or (3)(h) and the
use of every article of tangible personal property, including property
acquired at a casual or isolated sale, and including byproducts used by
the manufacturer thereof, except as hereinafter provided, irrespective
of whether the article or similar articles are manufactured or are
available for purchase within this state.
(3) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property or service taxable
under RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) ((or)), (3)(a), or (3)(h) purchased at
retail or acquired by lease, gift, or bailment if the sale to, or the
use by, the present user or his bailor or donor has already been
subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the
tax has been paid by the present user or by his bailor or donor.
(4) Except as provided in this section, payment by one purchaser or
user of tangible personal property or service of the tax imposed by
chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW shall not have the effect of exempting any
other purchaser or user of the same property or service from the taxes
imposed by such chapters. If the sale to, or the use by, the present
user or his or her bailor or donor has already been subjected to the
tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid
by the present user or by his or her bailor or donor; or in respect to
the use of property acquired by bailment and the tax has once been paid
based on reasonable rental as determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by
the value of the article at time of first use multiplied by the tax
rate imposed by chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter as of the time of
first use; or in respect to the use of any article of tangible personal
property acquired by bailment, if the property was acquired by a
previous bailee from the same bailor for use in the same general
activity and the original bailment was prior to June 9, 1961, the tax
imposed by this chapter does not apply.
(5) The tax shall be levied and collected in an amount equal to the
value of the article used or value of the service used by the taxpayer
multiplied by the rates in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW
82.08.020, except in the case of a seller required to collect use tax
from the purchaser, the tax shall be collected in an amount equal to
the purchase price multiplied by the rate in effect for the retail
sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.04.060 and 2002 c 367 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Sale at wholesale" or "wholesale sale" means: (1) Any sale of
tangible personal property, any sale of services defined as a retail
sale in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), any sale of amusement or recreation
services as defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), any sale of canned
software, any sale of cosmetic medical services defined as a retail
sale in RCW 82.04.050(3)(h), or any sale of telephone service as
defined in RCW 82.04.065, which is not a sale at retail; and (2) any
charge made for labor and services rendered for persons who are not
consumers, in respect to real or personal property, if such charge is
expressly defined as a retail sale by RCW 82.04.050 when rendered to or
for consumers: PROVIDED, That the term "real or personal property" as
used in this subsection shall not include any natural products named in
RCW 82.04.100.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.04.190 and 2004 c 174 s 4 and 2004 c 2 s 8 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
"Consumer" means the following:
(1) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any
article of tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the
person's business and including, among others, without limiting the
scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve,
construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers
other than for the purpose (a) of resale as tangible personal property
in the regular course of business or (b) of incorporating such property
as an ingredient or component of real or personal property when
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving,
constructing, or decorating such real or personal property of or for
consumers or (c) of consuming such property in producing for sale a new
article of tangible personal property or a new substance, of which such
property becomes an ingredient or component or as a chemical used in
processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a
chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new
article being produced for sale or (d) purchases for the purpose of
consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is
subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary
purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon;
(2)(a) Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.290 or 82.04.2908; (b) any person who purchases, acquires, or
uses any telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than for
resale in the regular course of business; (c) any person who purchases,
acquires, or uses any service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), any
service described in RCW 82.04.050(3)(h), or any amusement and
recreation service defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), other than for
resale in the regular course of business; and (d) any person who is an
end user of software;
(3) Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the
building, repairing or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington or by
the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or
vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind as
defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of
such publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right of
way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle by installing, placing or spreading the property in
or upon the right of way of such street, place, road, highway,
easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in or upon the site of such
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility;
(4) Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of
possession to or an easement in real property which is being
constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or otherwise altered by a
person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal corporations
or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and services
rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road
purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and
county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82
RCW in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property.
Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this definition
shall be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";
(5) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession to personal property which is being constructed, repaired,
improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered by a person engaged
in business;
(6) Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created
pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing land
and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality
thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to
chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person shall be a consumer within the
meaning of this subsection in respect to tangible personal property
incorporated into, installed in, or attached to such building or other
structure by such person, except that consumer does not include any
person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating,
or improving new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon,
or above real property of or for the United States, or any
instrumentality thereof, if the investment project would qualify for
sales and use tax deferral under chapter 82.63 RCW if undertaken by a
private entity;
(7) Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the
rental of which is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under
RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or charge made for
tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the
machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful
life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other
subsection of this section shall be construed to modify any other
definition of "consumer"; and
(8) Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other
byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and development.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.12.010 and 2003 c 168 s 102 and 2003 c 5 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Purchase price" means the same as sales price as defined in
RCW 82.08.010.
(2)(a) "Value of the article used" shall be the purchase price for
the article of tangible personal property, the use of which is taxable
under this chapter. The term also includes, in addition to the
purchase price, the amount of any tariff or duty paid with respect to
the importation of the article used. In case the article used is
acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted, produced, or manufactured
by the person using the same or is sold under conditions wherein the
purchase price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of
the article used shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.
(b) In case the articles used are acquired by bailment, the value
of the use of the articles so used shall be in an amount representing
a reasonable rental for the use of the articles so bailed, determined
as nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places
of use of similar products of like quality and character under such
rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such
articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the
construction, repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become
or are to become an ingredient or component of, new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or
for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city
housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing or attaching of any such articles therein or thereto,
whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by
virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such articles so
used shall be determined according to the retail selling price of such
articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of
similar products of like quality and character or, in the absence of
either of these selling price measures, such value may be determined
upon a cost basis, in any event under such rules as the department of
revenue may prescribe.
(c) In the case of articles owned by a user engaged in business
outside the state which are brought into the state for no more than one
hundred eighty days in any period of three hundred sixty-five
consecutive days and which are temporarily used for business purposes
by the person in this state, the value of the article used shall be an
amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the articles,
unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW
upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this
subsection.
(d) In the case of articles manufactured or produced by the user
and used in the manufacture or production of products sold or to be
sold to the department of defense of the United States, the value of
the articles used shall be determined according to the value of the
ingredients of such articles.
(e) In the case of an article manufactured or produced for purposes
of serving as a prototype for the development of a new or improved
product, the value of the article used shall be determined by: (i) The
retail selling price of such new or improved product when first offered
for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into the
prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered
for sale.
(f) In the case of an article purchased with a direct pay permit
under RCW 82.32.087, the value of the article used shall be determined
by the purchase price of such article if, but for the use of the direct
pay permit, the transaction would have been subject to sales tax;
(3) "Value of the service used" means the purchase price for the
service, the use of which is taxable under this chapter. If the
service is received by gift or under conditions wherein the purchase
price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of the
service used shall be determined as nearly as possible according to the
retail selling price at place of use of similar services of like
quality and character under rules the department may prescribe;
(4) "Use," "used," "using," or "put to use" shall have their
ordinary meaning, and shall mean:
(a) With respect to tangible personal property, the first act
within this state by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or
control over the article of tangible personal property (as a consumer),
and include installation, storage, withdrawal from storage,
distribution, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or
consumption within this state; ((and))
(b) With respect to a service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), the
first act within this state after the service has been performed by
which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the
article of tangible personal property upon which the service was
performed (as a consumer), and include installation, storage,
withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to
subsequent actual use or consumption of the article within this state;
and
(c) With respect to a service described in RCW 82.04.050(3)(h), the
first presence within this state by the taxpayer after the service has
been performed upon that taxpayer;
(5) "Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included within
the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word "consumer" as defined in
chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;
(6) "Retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and
every person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal
property at retail and every person required to collect from purchasers
the tax imposed under this chapter;
(7) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and
82.08 RCW, insofar as applicable, shall have full force and effect with
respect to taxes imposed under the provisions of this chapter.
"Consumer," in addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04
and 82.08 RCW insofar as applicable, shall also mean any person who
distributes or displays, or causes to be distributed or displayed, any
article of tangible personal property, except newspapers, the primary
purpose of which is to promote the sale of products or services. With
respect to property distributed to persons within this state by a
consumer as defined in this subsection (7), the use of the property
shall be deemed to be by such consumer.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.12.035 and 2002 c 367 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A credit shall be allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter
upon the use of tangible personal property((,)) or services taxable
under RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) ((or)), (3)(a), or (3)(h), in the state of
Washington in the amount that the present user thereof or his or her
bailor or donor has paid a retail sales or use tax with respect to such
property or service to any other state of the United States, any
political subdivision thereof, the District of Columbia, and any
foreign country or political subdivision thereof, prior to the use of
such property or service in Washington.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.12.0251 and 2003 c 5 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use:
(1) Of any article of tangible personal property, and services that
were rendered in respect to such property, brought into the state of
Washington by a nonresident thereof for his or her use or enjoyment
while temporarily within the state of Washington unless such property
is used in conducting a nontransitory business activity within the
state of Washington;
(2) By a nonresident of Washington of a motor vehicle or trailer
which is registered or licensed under the laws of the state of his or
her residence, and which is not required to be registered or licensed
under the laws of Washington, including motor vehicles or trailers
exempt pursuant to a declaration issued by the department of licensing
under RCW 46.85.060, and services rendered outside the state of
Washington in respect to such property;
(3) Of household goods, personal effects, and private motor
vehicles, and services rendered in respect to such property, by a bona
fide resident of Washington, or nonresident members of the armed forces
who are stationed in Washington pursuant to military orders, if such
articles and services were acquired and used by such person in another
state while a bona fide resident thereof and such acquisition and use
occurred more than ninety days prior to the time he or she entered
Washington. For purposes of this subsection, private motor vehicles
((does [do])) do not include motor homes;
(4) Of any service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(3)(h)
by a nonresident of Washington.
(((4))) For purposes of this section, "state" means a state of the
United States, any political subdivision thereof, the District of
Columbia, and any foreign country or political subdivision thereof, and
"services" means services defined as retail sales in RCW
82.04.050(2)(a).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act takes effect October 1, 2005.

--- END ---