BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.18.480 and 1957 c 193 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
((No)) An insurer shall not make or permit any unfair
discrimination between insureds or subjects of insurance having
substantially like insuring, risk, and exposure factors, and expense
elements, in the terms or conditions of any insurance contract, or in
the rate or amount of premium charged therefor, or in the benefits
payable or in any other rights or privileges accruing thereunder. This
((provision shall)) section does not prohibit fair discrimination by a
life insurer as between individuals having unequal expectation of life,
except that insurers may not require a person to undergo a genetic test
or provide the results of a previous genetic test as a condition of
offering or renewing insurance. If an insurer has information from a
genetic test, the insurer may only use that information if it
demonstrates the active presence of disease or illness. An insurer may
not use information from a genetic test if the information only
demonstrates a propensity for a condition or illness and not the active
presence of disease or illness.
(1) "Genetic information" means written or recorded information
about genes, gene products, or genetic characteristics derived from an
individual or a family member of the individual. "Gene product" is a
scientific term that means messenger RNA and translated protein. For
purposes of this chapter, "genetic information" shall not include
routine physical measurements: Chemical, blood, and urine analysis,
unless conducted purposely to diagnose a genetic characteristic; tests
for the abuse of drugs; tests for cholesterol; and tests for the
presence of HIV. Family histories do not constitute genetic
information.
(2) "Genetic test" means a test of human DNA, RNA, mitochondrial
DNA, chromosomes, or other material for the purpose of identifying
genes, inherited or acquired genetic abnormalities, or the presence or
absence of inherited or acquired characteristics in the genetic
material. For the purposes of this section, "genetic test" does not
include tests given for cholesterol or HIV.

--- END ---