BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that trial courts
are critical to maintaining the rule of law in a free society and that
they are essential to the protection of the rights and enforcement of
obligations for all. The legislature finds that the responsibility of
funding trial courts in Washington state should not rest primarily upon
local government. The legislature therefore finds that a more
equitable balance of funding responsibility between state and local
government must be achieved and that increased funding must be provided
for the trial courts. The legislature intends to increase state
funding responsibility and provide trial courts with additional
resources to provide justice equally to the citizens of Washington
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act shall be known and cited as the
trial court funding act of 2005.

PART I - PAYMENT OF DISTRICT AND MUNICIPAL COURT JUDGE SALARY
Sec. 101 RCW 2.14.010 and 1988 c 109 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The purpose of this chapter is to provide a supplemental
retirement benefit to judges who are elected or appointed under chapter
2.04, 2.06, or 2.08 RCW or who are elected and qualify for state
payment of one-half of their salary under chapter 3.46, 3.50, 3.58, or
35.20 RCW and who are members of the public employees' retirement
system for their service as a judge.
(2) This chapter may be known and cited as the judicial retirement
account act.

Sec. 102 RCW 2.14.030 and 1988 c 109 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The judicial retirement account plan is established for judges
appointed or elected under chapter 2.04, 2.06, or 2.08 RCW or who are
elected and qualify for state payment of one-half of their salary under
chapter 3.46, 3.50, 3.58, or 35.20 RCW, and who are members of the
public employees' retirement system for their service as a judge.

Sec. 103 RCW 3.58.030 and 1984 c 258 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) One-half of the salary of each district court judge shall be
paid by the state, and the other one-half by the county for which the
judge is elected. The county auditor of each county shall pay district
court judges in the same manner provided for other elected officials.
For the purpose of this section, "salary" means the compensation
established by the Washington citizens' commission on salaries for
elected officials pursuant to RCW 3.58.010.
(2) The compensation of ((judges,)) clerks, judges pro tempore,
deputy clerks, and court commissioners payable by the county shall be
paid monthly out of the county treasury from the same funds out of
which other salaried county officers are paid.

Sec. 104 RCW 3.34.025 and 1991 c 313 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any additional district judge positions created under RCW 3.34.020
shall be effective only if the legislative authority of the affected
county documents its approval of any additional positions and its
agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement
from the state other than for the state's share of judicial
compensation as specified under state law, the expenses of such
additional judicial positions as provided by statute. The additional
expenses include, but are not limited to, expenses incurred for court
facilities. The legislative authority of any such county may, at its
discretion, phase in any judicial positions over a period of time not
to exceed two years from the effective date of the additional district
judge positions.

Sec. 105 RCW 3.46.090 and 1984 c 258 s 78 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The salary of a full time municipal judge shall be paid wholly by
the city.)) (1) The ((salary)) one-half of a district court judge
salary for which the county is responsible of a district judge serving
a municipal department part time shall be paid jointly by the county
and the city in the same proportion as the time of the judge has been
allocated to each.
(2) The salary of a full-time municipal judge shall be paid in the
same manner as provided for in RCW 3.50.080.
(3) Salaries of court commissioners serving the municipal
department shall be paid by the city.

Sec. 106 RCW 3.50.080 and 1984 c 258 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Salaries of municipal court judges shall be fixed by ordinance.
(2) The salary of a municipal court judge shall be paid wholly by
the city except where a city qualifies for state payment of one-half of
the municipal court judge salary as provided for in subsection (3) of
this section.
(3) One-half of the salary of each municipal court judge up to one
hundred percent of a district court judge's salary shall be paid by the
state, and the remainder by the city or cities for which the judge is
elected if:
(a) The judge is serving in an elected position; and
(b) The city has established by ordinance that a full-time judge is
compensated at a rate equivalent to at least ninety-five percent, but
not more than one hundred percent, of a district court judge salary or
for a part-time judge on a pro-rate basis the same equivalent; and
(c) The city has certified to the office of the administrator for
the courts that the conditions in (a) and (b) of this subsection have
been met; and
(d) The city is responsible for all other compensation, benefits,
and expenses related to municipal court judges not specifically assumed
under this subsection.
(4) All other costs of operating the municipal court, including but
not limited to salaries of ((judges and)) court employees, dockets,
books of records, forms, furnishings, and supplies, shall be paid
wholly out of the funds of the city or town. The city shall provide a
suitable place for holding court and pay all expenses of maintaining
it.
(5) All employees of the municipal court shall, for all purposes,
be deemed employees of the city or town. They shall be appointed by
and serve at the pleasure of the court.

Sec. 107 RCW 3.58.010 and 1986 c 155 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The annual salary of each full time district court judge shall be
established by the Washington citizens' commission on salaries for
elected officials. A member of the legislature whose term of office is
partly coextensive with or extends beyond the present term of office of
any of the officials whose salary is increased by virtue of the
provisions of RCW 43.03.010, 2.04.092, 2.06.062, 2.08.092, and 3.58.010
shall be eligible to be appointed or elected to any of the offices the
salary of which is increased hereby but he or she shall not be entitled
to receive such increased salary until after the expiration of his or
her present term of office and his or her subsequent election or
reelection to the office to which he or she was appointed or elected
respectively during his or her term of office as legislator.

Sec. 108 RCW 35.20.160 and 1965 c 147 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The total of the salaries of each municipal judge under this
chapter shall be fixed by the legislative body of the city at not less
than nine thousand dollars per annum, to be paid in monthly or
semimonthly installments as for other officials of the city, and such
total salaries shall not be more than the salaries paid the superior
court judges in the county in which the court is located.
(2) The salary of a municipal court judge shall be paid wholly by
the city except where a city qualifies for state payment of one-half of
the municipal court judge salary as provided for in subsection (3) of
this section.
(3) One-half of the salary of each municipal court judge shall be
paid by the state, and the other one-half by the city or cities for
which the judge is elected if:
(a) The judge is serving in an elected position; and
(b) The city has established by ordinance that a full-time judge is
compensated at a rate equivalent to at least ninety-five percent, but
not more than one hundred percent, of a district court judge salary or
for a part-time judge on a pro-rate basis the same equivalent; and
(c) The city has certified to the office of the administrator for
the courts that the conditions in (a) and (b) of this subsection have
been met; and
(d) The city is responsible for all other compensation, benefits,
and expenses related to municipal court judges not specifically assumed
under this subsection.

PART II - TRIAL COURT IMPROVEMENT ACCOUNTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 3.46 RCW
to read as follows:
Any city operating a municipal department under this chapter for
which the state contributes one-half of district or municipal court
judge salaries under RCW 3.46.090(1) or 3.50.080(3) shall create a city
trial court improvement account. An amount equal to one-half of the
city's contribution for the payment of district or municipal judge
salaries under RCW 3.46.090(1) or 3.50.080(3) shall be deposited into
the account. Money in the account shall be used to fund improvements
to the municipal department's staffing, programs, facilities, or
services, as appropriated by the city legislative authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 3.50 RCW
to read as follows:
Any city or town operating a municipal court under this chapter
that qualifies for state payment of one-half of municipal court judge
salaries under RCW 3.50.080(3) shall create a city or town trial court
improvement account. An amount equal to one-half of the state's
contribution for the payment of municipal court judge salaries under
RCW 3.50.080(3) shall be deposited into the account. Money in the
account shall be used to fund improvements to the municipal court's
staffing, programs, facilities, or services, as appropriated by the
city or town legislative authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 3.58 RCW
to read as follows:
Any county with a district court created under this title shall
create a county trial court improvement account. An amount equal to
one-half of the state's contribution for the payment of district court
judge salaries under RCW 3.58.030(1) shall be deposited into the
account. Money in the account shall be used to fund improvements to
superior and district court staffing, programs, facilities, or
services, as appropriated by the county legislative authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 A new section is added to chapter 35.20
RCW to read as follows:
Any city operating a municipal court under this chapter that
qualifies for state payment of one-half of municipal court judge
salaries under RCW 35.20.160(3) shall create a city trial court
improvement account. An amount equal to the state's contribution for
the payment of municipal judge salaries under RCW 35.20.160(3) shall be
deposited into the account. Money in the account shall be used to fund
improvements to the municipal court's staffing, programs, facilities,
or services, as appropriated by the city legislative authority.

Sec. 205 RCW 3.62.050 and 1987 c 202 s 114 are each amended to
read as follows:
The total expenditures of the district courts, including the cost
of providing courtroom and office space, the cost of probation and
parole services and any personnel employment therefor, and the cost of
providing services necessary for the preparation and presentation of a
defense at public expense, except costs of defense to be paid by a city
pursuant to RCW 3.62.070 and the one-half of district court judge
salaries paid by the state pursuant to RCW 3.58.030, shall be paid from
the county current expense fund.

PART III - COURT FILING FEES
Sec. 301 RCW 3.62.060 and 2003 c 222 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
Clerks of the district courts shall collect the following fees for
their official services:
(1) In any civil action commenced before or transferred to a
district court, the plaintiff shall, at the time of such commencement
or transfer, pay to such court a filing fee of ((thirty-one)) forty-three dollars plus any surcharge authorized by RCW 7.75.035. Any party
filing a counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim in such action
shall pay to the court a filing fee of forty-three dollars plus any
surcharge authorized by RCW 7.75.035. No party shall be compelled to
pay to the court any other fees or charges up to and including the
rendition of judgment in the action other than those listed.
(2) For issuing a writ of garnishment or other writ, or for filing
an attorney issued writ of garnishment, a fee of ((six)) twelve
dollars.
(3) For filing a supplemental proceeding a fee of ((twelve)) twenty
dollars.
(4) For demanding a jury in a civil case a fee of ((fifty)) one
hundred twenty-five dollars to be paid by the person demanding a jury.
(5) For preparing a transcript of a judgment a fee of ((six))
twenty dollars.
(6) For certifying any document on file or of record in the clerk's
office a fee of five dollars.
(7) For preparing the record of a case for appeal to superior court
a fee of forty dollars including any costs of tape duplication as
governed by the rules of appeal for courts of limited jurisdiction
(RALJ).
(8) For duplication of part or all of the electronic ((tape or
tapes)) recording of a proceeding ten dollars per tape or other
electronic storage medium.
The fees or charges imposed under this section shall be allowed as
court costs whenever a judgment for costs is awarded.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 3.62 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon conviction or a plea of guilty in any court organized under
this title or Title 35 RCW, a defendant in a criminal case is liable
for a fee of forty-three dollars. This fee shall be subject to
division with the state under RCW 3.62.020(2) and 3.62.040(2).

Sec. 303 RCW 4.12.090 and 1969 ex.s. c 144 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) When an order is made transferring an action or proceeding for
trial, the clerk of the court must transmit the pleadings and papers
therein to the court to which it is transferred and charge a fee as
provided in RCW 36.18.016. The costs and fees thereof and of filing
the papers anew must be paid by the party at whose instance the order
was made, except in the cases mentioned in RCW 4.12.030(1), in which
case the plaintiff shall pay costs of transfer and, in addition
thereto, if the court finds that the plaintiff could have determined
the county of proper venue with reasonable diligence, it shall order
the plaintiff to pay the reasonable attorney's fee of the defendant for
the changing of venue to the proper county. The court to which an
action or proceeding is transferred has and exercises over the same the
like jurisdiction as if it had been originally commenced therein.
(2) In acting on any motion for dismissal without prejudice in a
case where a motion for change of venue under subsection (1) of this
section has been made, the court shall, if it determines the motion for
change of venue proper, determine the amount of attorney's fee properly
to be awarded to defendant and, if the action be dismissed, the
attorney's fee shall be a setoff against any claim subsequently brought
on the same cause of action.

Sec. 304 RCW 10.46.190 and 1977 ex.s. c 248 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every person convicted of a crime or held to bail to keep the peace
shall be liable to all the costs of the proceedings against him or her,
including, when tried by a jury in the superior court or before a
committing magistrate, a jury fee as provided for in civil actions((,
and when tried by a jury before a committing magistrate, twenty-five
dollars for jury fee,)) for which judgment shall be rendered and
((collection had as in cases of fines)) collected. The jury fee, when
collected for a case tried by the superior court, shall be paid to the
clerk((, to be by him)) and applied as the jury fee in civil cases is
applied.

Sec. 305 RCW 12.12.030 and 1981 c 260 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
After the appearance of the defendant, and before the ((justice))
judge shall proceed to enquire into the merits of the cause, either
party may demand a jury to try the action, which jury shall be composed
of six good and lawful persons having the qualifications of jurors in
the superior court of the same county, unless the parties shall agree
upon a lesser number: PROVIDED, That the party demanding the jury
shall first pay to the ((justice)) clerk of the court the sum of one
hundred twenty-five dollars, which shall be paid over by the
((justice)) clerk of the court to the county, and ((said)) such amount
shall be taxed as costs against the losing party.

Sec. 306 RCW 12.40.020 and 1990 c 172 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
A small claims action shall be commenced by the plaintiff filing a
claim, in the form prescribed by RCW 12.40.050, in the small claims
department. A filing fee of ((ten)) fourteen dollars plus any
surcharge authorized by RCW 7.75.035 shall be paid when the claim is
filed. Any party filing a counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party
claim in such action shall pay to the court a filing fee of fourteen
dollars plus any surcharge authorized by RCW 7.75.035.

Sec. 307 RCW 26.12.240 and 1993 c 435 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
A county may create a courthouse facilitator program to provide
basic services to pro se litigants in family law cases. The
legislative authority of any county may impose user fees or may impose
a surcharge of up to ((ten)) twenty dollars on only those superior
court cases filed under Title 26 RCW, or both, to pay for the expenses
of the courthouse facilitator program. Fees collected under this
section shall be collected and deposited in the same manner as other
county funds are collected and deposited, and shall be maintained in a
separate account to be used as provided in this section.

Sec. 308 RCW 27.24.070 and 1992 c 54 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
In each county pursuant to this chapter, the county treasurer shall
deposit in the county or regional law library fund a sum equal to
((twelve)) seventeen dollars for every new probate or civil filing fee,
including appeals and for every fee for filing a counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim in any civil action, collected by the clerk
of the superior court and ((six)) seven dollars for every fee collected
for the commencement of a civil action and for the filing of a
counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim in any civil action in
district court for the support of the law library in that county or the
regional law library to which the county belongs: PROVIDED, That upon
a showing of need the ((twelve)) seventeen dollar contribution may be
increased up to ((fifteen)) twenty dollars or in counties with multiple
library sites up to thirty dollars upon the request of the law library
board of trustees and with the approval of the county legislative body
or bodies.

Sec. 309 RCW 36.18.012 and 2001 c 146 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is subject to division
with the state for deposit in the public safety and education account
under RCW 36.18.025.
(2) The party filing a transcript or abstract of judgment or
verdict from a United States court held in this state, or from the
superior court of another county or from a district court in the county
of issuance, shall pay at the time of filing a fee of ((fifteen))
twenty dollars.
(3) The clerk shall collect a fee of twenty dollars for: Filing a
paper not related to or a part of a proceeding, civil or criminal, or
a probate matter, required or permitted to be filed in the clerk's
office for which no other charge is provided by law.
(4) If the defendant serves or files an answer to an unlawful
detainer complaint under chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW, the plaintiff
shall pay before proceeding with the unlawful detainer action
((eighty)) one hundred twelve dollars.
(5) For a restrictive covenant for filing a petition to strike
discriminatory provisions in real estate under RCW 49.60.227 a fee of
twenty dollars must be charged.
(6) A fee of twenty dollars must be charged for filing a will only,
when no probate of the will is contemplated.
(7) A fee of ((two)) twenty dollars must be charged for filing a
petition, written agreement, or written memorandum in a nonjudicial
probate dispute under RCW 11.96A.220, if it is filed within an existing
case in the same court.
(8) A fee of thirty-five dollars must be charged for filing a
petition regarding a common law lien under RCW 60.70.060.
(9) For certification of delinquent taxes by a county treasurer
under RCW 84.64.190, a fee of five dollars must be charged.
(10) For the filing of a tax warrant for unpaid taxes or
overpayment of benefits by any agency of the state of Washington, a fee
of five dollars on or after July 22, 2001, and for the filing of such
a tax warrant or overpayment of benefits on or after July 1, 2003, a
fee of twenty dollars, of which forty-six percent of the first five
dollars is directed to the public safety and education account
established under RCW 43.08.250.

Sec. 310 RCW 36.18.016 and 2002 c 338 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is not subject to division
under RCW 36.18.025 or 27.24.070.
(2) For the filing of a petition for modification of a decree of
dissolution or paternity, within the same case as the original action,
a fee of ((twenty)) thirty-six dollars must be paid.
(3)(a) The party making a demand for a jury of six in a civil
action shall pay, at the time, a fee of one hundred twenty-five
dollars; if the demand is for a jury of twelve, a fee of two hundred
fifty dollars. If, after the party demands a jury of six and pays the
required fee, any other party to the action requests a jury of twelve,
an additional one hundred twenty-five dollar fee will be required of
the party demanding the increased number of jurors.
(b) Upon conviction in criminal cases a jury demand charge of
((fifty)) one hundred twenty-five dollars for a jury of six, or ((one))
two hundred fifty dollars for a jury of twelve may be imposed as costs
under RCW 10.46.190.
(4) For preparing((, transcribing, or certifying)) a certified copy
of an instrument on file or of record in the clerk's office, ((with or
without seal,)) for the first page or portion of the first page, a fee
of ((two)) five dollars, and for each additional page or portion of a
page, a fee of one dollar must be charged. For authenticating or
exemplifying an instrument, a fee of ((one)) two dollars for each
additional seal affixed must be charged. For preparing a copy of an
instrument on file or of record in the clerk's office without a seal,
a fee of fifty cents per page must be charged. When copying a document
without a seal or file that is in an electronic format, a fee of
twenty-five cents per page must be charged. For copies made on a
compact disc, an additional fee of twenty dollars for each compact disc
must be charged.
(5) For executing a certificate, with or without a seal, a fee of
two dollars must be charged.
(6) For a garnishee defendant named in an affidavit for garnishment
and for a writ of attachment, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.
(7) For filing a supplemental proceeding, a fee of twenty dollars
must be charged.
(8) For approving a bond, including justification on the bond, in
other than civil actions and probate proceedings, a fee of two dollars
must be charged.
(((8))) (9) For the issuance of a certificate of qualification and
a certified copy of letters of administration, letters testamentary, or
letters of guardianship, there must be a fee of two dollars.
(((9))) (10) For the preparation of a passport application, the
clerk may collect an execution fee as authorized by the federal
government.
(((10))) (11) For clerk's services such as processing ex parte
orders, performing historical searches, compiling statistical reports,
and conducting exceptional record searches, the clerk may collect a fee
not to exceed twenty dollars per hour or portion of an hour.
(((11))) (12) For duplicated recordings of court's proceedings
there must be a fee of ten dollars for each audio tape and twenty-five
dollars for each video tape or other electronic storage medium.
(((12) For the filing of oaths and affirmations under chapter 5.28
RCW, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.))
(13) ((For filing a disclaimer of interest under RCW 11.86.031(4),
a fee of two dollars must be charged.
(14))) For registration of land titles, Torrens Act, under RCW
65.12.780, a fee of ((five)) twenty dollars must be charged.
(((15))) (14) For the issuance of extension of judgment under RCW
6.17.020 and chapter 9.94A RCW, a fee of ((one)) two hundred ((ten))
dollars must be charged.
(((16))) (15) A facilitator surcharge of ((ten)) up to twenty
dollars must be charged as authorized under RCW 26.12.240.
(((17))) (16) For filing a water rights statement under RCW
90.03.180, a fee of twenty-five dollars must be charged.
(((18))) (17) For filing a claim of frivolous lien under RCW
60.04.081, a fee of thirty-five dollars must be charged.
(18) For preparation of a change of venue, a fee of twenty dollars
must be charged by the originating court in addition to the per page
charges in subsection (4) of this section.
(19) A service fee of three dollars for the first page and one
dollar for each additional page must be charged for receiving faxed
documents, pursuant to Washington state rules of court, general rule
17.
(((19))) (20) For preparation of clerk's papers under RAP 9.7, a
fee of fifty cents per page must be charged.
(((20))) (21) For copies and reports produced at the local level as
permitted by RCW 2.68.020 and supreme court policy, a variable fee must
be charged.
(((21))) (22) Investment service charge and earnings under RCW
36.48.090 must be charged.
(((22))) (23) Costs for nonstatutory services rendered by clerk by
authority of local ordinance or policy must be charged.
(((23))) (24) For filing a request for mandatory arbitration, a
filing fee may be assessed against the party filing a statement of
arbitrability not to exceed two hundred twenty dollars as established
by authority of local ordinance. This charge shall be used solely to
offset the cost of the mandatory arbitration program.
(((24))) (25) For filing a request for trial de novo of an
arbitration award, a fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars as
established by authority of local ordinance must be charged.
(26) For the filing of a will or codicil under the provisions of
chapter 11.12 RCW, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.
The revenue to counties from the fees established in this section
shall be deemed to be complete reimbursement from the state for the
state's share of benefits paid to the superior court judges of the
state prior to the effective date of this section, and no claim shall
lie against the state for such benefits.

Sec. 311 RCW 36.18.020 and 2000 c 9 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is subject to division
with the state public safety and education account under RCW 36.18.025
and with the county or regional law library fund under RCW 27.24.070.
(2) Clerks of superior courts shall collect the following fees for
their official services:
(a) The party filing the first or initial paper in any civil
action, including, but not limited to an action for restitution,
adoption, or change of name, and any party filing a counterclaim,
cross-claim, or third-party claim in any such civil action, shall pay,
at the time the paper is filed, a fee of ((one)) two hundred ((ten))
dollars except, in an unlawful detainer action under chapter 59.18 or
59.20 RCW for which the plaintiff shall pay a case initiating filing
fee of ((thirty)) forty-five dollars, or in proceedings filed under RCW
28A.225.030 alleging a violation of the compulsory attendance laws
where the petitioner shall not pay a filing fee. The ((thirty))
forty-five dollar filing fee under this subsection for an unlawful
detainer action shall not include an order to show cause or any other
order or judgment except a default order or default judgment in an
unlawful detainer action.
(b) Any party, except a defendant in a criminal case, filing the
first or initial paper on an appeal from a court of limited
jurisdiction or any party on any civil appeal, shall pay, when the
paper is filed, a fee of one hundred ten dollars.
(c) For filing of a petition for judicial review as required under
RCW 34.05.514 a filing fee of ((one)) two hundred ((ten)) dollars.
(d) For filing of a petition for unlawful harassment under RCW
10.14.040 a filing fee of ((forty-one)) fifty-three dollars.
(e) For filing the notice of debt due for the compensation of a
crime victim under RCW 7.68.120(2)(a) a fee of ((one)) two hundred
((ten)) dollars.
(f) In probate proceedings, the party instituting such proceedings,
shall pay at the time of filing the first paper therein, a fee of one
hundred ten dollars.
(g) For filing any petition to contest a will admitted to probate
or a petition to admit a will which has been rejected, or a petition
objecting to a written agreement or memorandum as provided in RCW
11.96A.220, there shall be paid a fee of ((one)) two hundred ((ten))
dollars.
(h) Upon conviction or plea of guilty, upon failure to prosecute an
appeal from a court of limited jurisdiction as provided by law, or upon
affirmance of a conviction by a court of limited jurisdiction, a
defendant in a criminal case shall be liable for a fee of ((one)) two
hundred ((ten)) dollars.
(i) With the exception of demands for jury hereafter made and
garnishments hereafter issued, civil actions and probate proceedings
filed prior to midnight, July 1, 1972, shall be completed and governed
by the fee schedule in effect as of January 1, 1972: PROVIDED, That no
fee shall be assessed if an order of dismissal on the clerk's record be
filed as provided by rule of the supreme court.
(3) No fee shall be collected when a petition for relinquishment of
parental rights is filed pursuant to RCW 26.33.080 or for forms and
instructional brochures provided under RCW 26.50.030.

PART IV - MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 Part headings used in this act are not
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 Sections 101 through 108 and 201 through
205 of this act take effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---