BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.122.055 and 2001 c 238 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any person who fails to notify the one-number locator
service when required under this chapter, excavates within thirty-five
feet of a transmission pipeline, and causes damage to the transmission
pipeline is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(b) Any person who fails to notify the one-number locator service
when required under this chapter and excavates within thirty-five feet
of a transmission pipeline is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(c) Any person who fails to notify the one-number locator service
and causes damage to a hazardous liquid or gas pipeline is subject to
a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars for each
violation. The civil penalty may also be imposed on any person
violating (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(2) All fines and civil penalties recovered under this section
shall be deposited into the pipeline safety account created in RCW
81.88.050.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.122.070 and 1984 c 144 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter not
amounting to a violation of RCW 19.122.055, and which violation results
in damage to underground facilities, is subject to a civil penalty of
not more than one thousand dollars for each violation. All penalties
recovered in such actions shall be deposited in the general fund.
(2) Any excavator who willfully or maliciously damages a field-marked underground facility shall be liable for treble the costs
incurred in repairing or relocating the facility. In those cases in
which an excavator fails to notify known underground facility owners or
the one-number locator service, any damage to the underground facility
shall be deemed willful and malicious and shall be subject to treble
damages for costs incurred in repairing or relocating the facility.
(3) This chapter does not affect any civil remedies for personal
injury or for property damage, including that to underground
facilities, nor does this chapter create any new civil remedies for
such damage.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.122.020 and 2000 c 191 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Business day" means any day other than Saturday, Sunday, or a
legal local, state, or federal holiday.
(2) "Damage" includes the substantial weakening of structural or
lateral support of an underground facility, penetration, impairment, or
destruction of any underground protective coating, housing, or other
protective device, or the severance, partial or complete, of any
underground facility to the extent that the project owner or the
affected utility owner determines that repairs are required.
(3) "Emergency" means any condition constituting a clear and
present danger to life or property, or a customer service outage.
(4) "Excavation" means any operation in which earth, rock, or other
material on or below the ground is moved or otherwise displaced by any
means, except the tilling of soil less than twelve inches in depth for
agricultural purposes, or road and ditch maintenance that does not
change the original road grade or ditch flowline.
(5) "Excavator" means any person who engages directly in
excavation.
(6) "Gas" means natural gas, flammable gas, or toxic or corrosive
gas.
(7) "Hazardous liquid" means: (a) Petroleum, petroleum products,
or anhydrous ammonia as those terms are defined in 49 C.F.R. Part 195
as in effect on March 1, 1998; and (b) carbon dioxide. The utilities
and transportation commission may by rule incorporate by reference
other substances designated as hazardous by the secretary of
transportation.
(8) "Identified facility" means any underground facility which is
indicated in the project plans as being located within the area of
proposed excavation.
(9) "Identified but unlocatable underground facility" means an
underground facility which has been identified but cannot be located
with reasonable accuracy.
(10) "Locatable underground facility" means an underground facility
which can be field-marked with reasonable accuracy.
(11) "Marking" means the use of stakes, paint, or other clearly
identifiable materials to show the field location of underground
facilities, in accordance with the current color code standard of the
American public works association. Markings shall include
identification letters indicating the specific type of the underground
facility.
(12) "Person" means an individual, partnership, franchise holder,
association, corporation, a state, a city, a county, or any subdivision
or instrumentality of a state, and its employees, agents, or legal
representatives.
(13) "Pipeline" or "pipeline system" means all or parts of a
pipeline facility through which hazardous liquid or gas moves in
transportation, including, but not limited to, line pipe, valves, and
other appurtenances connected to line pipe, pumping units, fabricated
assemblies associated with pumping units, metering and delivery
stations and fabricated assemblies therein, and breakout tanks.
"Pipeline" or "pipeline system" does not include process or transfer
pipelines as defined in RCW 81.88.010.
(14) "Pipeline company" means a person or entity constructing,
owning, or operating a pipeline for transporting hazardous liquid or
gas. A pipeline company does not include: (a) Distribution systems
owned and operated under franchise for the sale, delivery, or
distribution of natural gas at retail; or (b) excavation contractors or
other contractors that contract with a pipeline company.
(15) "Reasonable accuracy" means location within twenty-four inches
of the outside dimensions of both sides of an underground facility.
(16) "Transmission pipeline" means a pipeline that transports
hazardous liquid or gas within a storage field, or transports hazardous
liquid or gas from an interstate pipeline or storage facility to a
distribution main or a large volume hazardous liquid or gas user, or
operates at a hoop stress of twenty percent or more of the specified
minimum yield strength.
(17) "Underground facility" means any item buried or placed below
ground for use in connection with the storage or conveyance of water,
sewage, electronic, telephonic or telegraphic communications,
cablevision, electric energy, petroleum products, gas, gaseous vapors,
hazardous liquids, or other substances and including but not limited to
pipes, sewers, conduits, cables, valves, lines, wires, manholes,
attachments, and those parts of poles or anchors below ground. This
definition does not include pipelines as defined in subsection (13) of
this section, but does include distribution systems owned and operated
under franchise for the sale, delivery, or distribution of natural gas
at retail.
(((17))) (18) "One-number locator service" means a service through
which a person can notify utilities and request field-marking of
underground facilities.

--- END ---