BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.22.170 and 1993 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A surcharge of ((two)) four dollars per instrument shall be charged
by the county auditor for each document recorded, which will be in
addition to any other charge authorized by law. One dollar of the
surcharge shall be deposited in the county general fund to be used at
the discretion of the county commissioners to promote historical
preservation or historical programs, which may include preservation of
historic documents. Fifty percent of the remaining revenue generated
through this surcharge shall be transmitted monthly to the state
treasurer who shall distribute such funds to each county treasurer
within the state in July of each year in accordance with the formula
described in RCW 36.22.190. The county treasurer shall place the funds
received in a special account titled the auditor's centennial document
preservation and modernization account to be used solely for ongoing
preservation of historical documents of all county offices and
departments and shall not be added to the county current expense fund.
The remaining fifty percent of the revenue generated by this surcharge
shall be retained by the county and deposited in the auditor's
operation and maintenance fund for ongoing preservation of historical
documents of all county offices and departments.
The centennial document preservation and modernization account is
hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer and shall be
classified as a treasury trust account. State distributions from the
centennial document preservation and modernization account shall be
made without appropriation.

--- END ---