BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.32A.040 and 2000 c 123 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Families who are in conflict or who are experiencing problems with
at-risk youth or a child who may be in need of services may request
family reconciliation services from the department. Certificated
employees as defined in RCW 28A.150.060 who believe a student may be an
at-risk youth or a child in need of services may refer the family to
the department for access to family reconciliation services. The
department may involve a local multidisciplinary team in its response
in determining the services to be provided and in providing those
services. Such services shall be provided to alleviate personal or
family situations which present a serious and imminent threat to the
health or stability of the child or family and to maintain families
intact wherever possible. Family reconciliation services shall be
designed to develop skills and supports within families to resolve
problems related to at-risk youth, children in need of services, or
family conflicts. These services may include but are not limited to
referral to services for suicide prevention, psychiatric or other
medical care, or psychological, mental health, drug or alcohol
treatment, welfare, legal, educational, or other social services, as
appropriate to the needs of the child and the family, and training in
parenting, conflict management, and dispute resolution skills.
Local school districts may provide a list of community resources
compiled by the department of social and health services, the office of
superintendent of public instruction, and the family policy council to
certificated employees for distribution to families.

--- END ---