BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Motor homes, travel trailers, and campers may exceed the maximum
width established under RCW 46.44.010 if the excess width is
attributable to appurtenances that do not extend beyond the body of the
vehicle by more than four inches, or if an awning, by more than six
inches. As used in this section, "appurtenance" means an appendage
that is installed by a factory or a vehicle dealer and is intended as
an integral part of the motor home, travel trailer, or camper.
"Appurtenance" does not include an item temporarily affixed or attached
to the exterior of a vehicle for the purpose of transporting the item
from one location to another. "Appurtenance" does not include an item
that obstructs the driver's rearward vision.

--- END ---