BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.52.111 and 2004 c 271 s 173 are each amended to
read as follows:
Candidates for the following offices shall be nominated at partisan
primaries held pursuant to the provisions of this chapter:
(1) Congressional offices;
(2) All state offices except (a) judicial offices and (b) the
office of superintendent of public instruction;
(3) All county offices except (a) judicial offices; (b) sheriff,
except in a county for which the position is declared to be a partisan
office by the county's home rule charter; and (((b))) (c) those offices
where a county home rule charter provides otherwise.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.52.210 and 2003 c 111 s 1305 are each amended to
read as follows:
All city and town primaries shall be nonpartisan. Primaries for
special purpose districts, except those districts that require
ownership of property within the district as a prerequisite to voting,
shall be nonpartisan. Primaries for the office of county sheriff shall
be nonpartisan except in a county for which the position is declared
to be a partisan office by the county's home rule charter. City, town,
county sheriff, and district primaries shall be held as provided in RCW
((29A.04.310)) 29A.04.311.
The purpose of this section is to establish the holding of a
primary, subject to the exemptions in RCW 29A.52.220, as a uniform
procedural requirement to the holding of city, town, county sheriff,
and district elections. These provisions supersede any and all other
statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
election requirements.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.52.220 and 2003 c 111 s 1306 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No primary may be held for any single position in any city,
town, district, ((or)) district court, or for the nonpartisan position
of county sheriff, as required by RCW 29A.52.210, if, after the last
day allowed for candidates to withdraw, there are no more than two
candidates filed for the position. The county auditor shall, as soon
as possible, notify all the candidates so affected that the office for
which they filed will not appear on the primary ballot.
(2) No primary may be held for the office of commissioner of a park
and recreation district or for the office of cemetery district
commissioner.
(3) Names of candidates for offices that do not appear on the
primary ballot shall be printed upon the general election ballot in the
manner specified by RCW ((29A.36.130)) 29A.36.131.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.52.231 and 2004 c 271 s 174 are each amended to
read as follows:
The offices of superintendent of public instruction, justice of the
supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of the superior
court, and judge of the district court shall be nonpartisan and the
candidates therefor shall be nominated and elected as such. Except in
a county for which the position of sheriff is declared to be a partisan
office by the county's home rule charter, the office of county sheriff
shall be nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be nominated and
elected as such.
All city, town, and special purpose district elective offices shall
be nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be nominated and
elected as such.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 36.28 RCW
to read as follows:
A vacancy in the office of sheriff shall be filled by appointment
of the board of county commissioners.

--- END ---