BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.08.178 and 1988 c 161 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this title, the monthly wages the worker
was receiving from all employment at the time of injury shall be the
basis upon which compensation is computed unless otherwise provided
specifically in the statute concerned. In cases where the worker's
wages are not fixed by the month, they shall be determined by
multiplying the daily wage the worker was receiving at the time of the
injury:
(a) By five, if the worker was normally employed one day a week;
(b) By nine, if the worker was normally employed two days a week;
(c) By thirteen, if the worker was normally employed three days a
week;
(d) By eighteen, if the worker was normally employed four days a
week;
(e) By twenty-two, if the worker was normally employed five days a
week;
(f) By twenty-six, if the worker was normally employed six days a
week;
(g) By thirty, if the worker was normally employed seven days a
week.
The term "wages" shall include the reasonable value of board,
housing, fuel, or other consideration of like nature received from the
employer as part of the contract of hire, but shall not include
overtime pay except in cases under subsection (2) of this section.
However, tips shall also be considered wages only to the extent such
tips are reported to the employer for federal income tax purposes. The
daily wage shall be the hourly wage multiplied by the number of hours
the worker is normally employed. The number of hours the worker is
normally employed shall be determined by the department in a fair and
reasonable manner, which may include averaging the number of hours
normally worked per day, week, or month.
The determination of a worker's wages shall not include wages for
hours worked in excess of forty hours for any week unless the worker
demonstrates a pattern of work in excess of forty hours per week for
the same employer in the three months immediately preceding the injury.
(2) In cases where (a) the worker's employment is exclusively
seasonal in nature or (b) the worker's current employment or his or her
relation to his or her employment is essentially part-time or
intermittent, the monthly wage shall be determined by dividing by
twelve the total wages earned, including overtime, from all employment
in any twelve successive calendar months preceding the injury which
fairly represent the claimant's employment pattern.
(3) If, within the twelve months immediately preceding the injury,
the worker has received from the employer at the time of injury a bonus
as part of the contract of hire, the average monthly value of such
bonus shall be included in determining the worker's monthly wages.
(4) In cases where a wage has not been fixed or cannot be
reasonably and fairly determined, the monthly wage shall be computed on
the basis of the usual wage paid other employees engaged in like or
similar occupations where the wages are fixed.

--- END ---