BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.30.020 and 2003 c 221 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No person may operate a motor vehicle subject to
registration under chapter 46.16 RCW in this state unless the person is
insured under a motor vehicle liability policy with liability limits of
at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090, is self-insured as
provided in RCW 46.29.630, is covered by a certificate of deposit in
conformance with RCW 46.29.550, or is covered by a liability bond of at
least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090. Written proof of
financial responsibility for motor vehicle operation must be provided
on the request of a law enforcement officer in the format specified
under RCW 46.30.030.
(b) A person who drives a motor vehicle that is required to be
registered in another state that requires drivers and owners of
vehicles in that state to maintain insurance or financial
responsibility shall, when requested by a law enforcement officer,
provide evidence of financial responsibility or insurance as is
required by the laws of the state in which the vehicle is registered.
(c) When asked to do so by a law enforcement officer, failure to
display an insurance identification card as specified under RCW
46.30.030 creates a presumption that the person does not have motor
vehicle insurance.
(d) Failure to provide proof of motor vehicle insurance is a
traffic infraction and is subject to penalties as set by the supreme
court under RCW 46.63.110 or community restitution.
(2) If a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this
section appears in person before the court or a violations bureau and
provides written evidence that at the time the person was cited, he or
she was in compliance with the financial responsibility requirements of
subsection (1) of this section, the citation shall be dismissed and the
court or violations bureau may assess court administrative costs of
twenty-five dollars at the time of dismissal. In lieu of personal
appearance, a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this
section may, before the date scheduled for the person's appearance
before the court or violations bureau, submit by mail to the court or
violations bureau written evidence that at the time the person was
cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, in which case the
citation shall be dismissed without cost, except that the court or
violations bureau may assess court administrative costs of twenty-five
dollars at the time of dismissal.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not govern((:
(a))) the operation of a motor vehicle registered under RCW
46.16.305(1), governed by RCW 46.16.020, or registered with the
Washington utilities and transportation commission as common or
contract carriers((; or
(b) The operation of a motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330, a
motor-driven cycle as defined in RCW 46.04.332, or a moped as defined
in RCW 46.04.304)).
(4) RCW 46.29.490 shall not be deemed to govern all motor vehicle
liability policies required by this chapter but only those certified
for the purposes stated in chapter 46.29 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.04.382 and 1963 c 154 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Passenger car" means every motor vehicle ((except motorcycles and
motor-driven cycles,)) designed for carrying ten passengers or less and
used for the transportation of persons.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.22.005 and 2003 c 115 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Automobile" means a passenger car as defined in RCW 46.04.382
registered or principally garaged in this state other than:
(a) A farm-type tractor or other self-propelled equipment designed
for use principally off public roads;
(b) A vehicle operated on rails or crawler-treads;
(c) A vehicle located for use as a residence; or
(d) A motor home as defined in RCW 46.04.305((; or
(e) A moped as defined in RCW 46.04.304)).
(2) "Bodily injury" means bodily injury, sickness, or disease,
including death at any time resulting from the injury, sickness, or
disease.
(3) "Income continuation benefits" means payments for the insured's
loss of income from work, because of bodily injury sustained by the
insured in an automobile accident, less income earned during the
benefit payment period. The combined weekly payment an insured may
receive under personal injury protection coverage, worker's
compensation, disability insurance, or other income continuation
benefits may not exceed eighty-five percent of the insured's weekly
income from work. The benefit payment period begins fourteen days
after the date of the automobile accident and ends at the earliest of
the following:
(a) The date on which the insured is reasonably able to perform the
duties of his or her usual occupation;
(b) Fifty-four weeks from the date of the automobile accident; or
(c) The date of the insured's death.
(4) "Insured automobile" means an automobile described on the
declarations page of the policy.
(5) "Insured" means:
(a) The named insured or a person who is a resident of the named
insured's household and is either related to the named insured by
blood, marriage, or adoption, or is the named insured's ward, foster
child, or stepchild; or
(b) A person who sustains bodily injury caused by accident while:
(i) Occupying or using the insured automobile with the permission of
the named insured; or (ii) a pedestrian accidentally struck by the
insured automobile.
(6) "Loss of services benefits" means reimbursement for payment to
others, not members of the insured's household, for expenses reasonably
incurred for services in lieu of those the insured would usually have
performed for his or her household without compensation, provided the
services are actually rendered. The maximum benefit is forty dollars
per day. Reimbursement for loss of services ends the earliest of the
following:
(a) The date on which the insured person is reasonably able to
perform those services;
(b) Fifty-two weeks from the date of the automobile accident; or
(c) The date of the insured's death.
(7) "Medical and hospital benefits" means payments for all
reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by or on behalf of the
insured for injuries sustained as a result of an automobile accident
for health care services provided by persons licensed under Title 18
RCW, including pharmaceuticals, prosthetic devices and eye glasses, and
necessary ambulance, hospital, and professional nursing service.
Medical and hospital benefits are payable for expenses incurred within
three years from the date of the automobile accident.
(8) "Automobile liability insurance policy" means a policy insuring
against loss resulting from liability imposed by law for bodily injury,
death, or property damage suffered by any person and arising out of the
ownership, maintenance, or use of an insured automobile. An automobile
liability policy does not include:
(a) Vendors single interest or collateral protection coverage;
(b) General liability insurance; or
(c) Excess liability insurance, commonly known as an umbrella
policy, where coverage applies only as excess to an underlying
automobile policy.
(9) "Named insured" means the individual named in the declarations
of the policy and includes his or her spouse if a resident of the same
household.
(10) "Occupying" means in or upon or entering into or alighting
from.
(11) "Pedestrian" means a natural person not occupying a motor
vehicle as defined in RCW 46.04.320.
(12) "Personal injury protection" means the benefits described in
this section and RCW 48.22.085 through 48.22.100. Payments made under
personal injury protection coverage are limited to the actual amount of
loss or expense incurred.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.22.030 and 2004 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Underinsured motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle with respect
to the ownership, maintenance, or use of which either no bodily injury
or property damage liability bond or insurance policy applies at the
time of an accident, or with respect to which the sum of the limits of
liability under all bodily injury or property damage liability bonds
and insurance policies applicable to a covered person after an accident
is less than the applicable damages which the covered person is legally
entitled to recover.
(2) No new policy or renewal of an existing policy insuring against
loss resulting from liability imposed by law for bodily injury, death,
or property damage, suffered by any person arising out of the
ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle shall be issued with
respect to any motor vehicle registered or principally garaged in this
state unless coverage is provided therein or supplemental thereto for
the protection of persons insured thereunder who are legally entitled
to recover damages from owners or operators of underinsured motor
vehicles, hit-and-run motor vehicles, and phantom vehicles because of
bodily injury, death, or property damage, resulting therefrom, ((except
while operating or occupying a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, and))
except while operating or occupying a motor vehicle owned or available
for the regular use by the named insured or any family member, and
which is not insured under the liability coverage of the policy. The
coverage required to be offered under this chapter is not applicable to
general liability policies, commonly known as umbrella policies, or
other policies which apply only as excess to the insurance directly
applicable to the vehicle insured.
(3) Except as to property damage, coverage required under
subsection (2) of this section shall be in the same amount as the
insured's third party liability coverage unless the insured rejects all
or part of the coverage as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
Coverage for property damage need only be issued in conjunction with
coverage for bodily injury or death. Property damage coverage required
under subsection (2) of this section shall mean physical damage to the
insured motor vehicle unless the policy specifically provides coverage
for the contents thereof or other forms of property damage.
(4) A named insured or spouse may reject, in writing, underinsured
coverage for bodily injury or death, or property damage, and the
requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not
apply. If a named insured or spouse has rejected underinsured
coverage, such coverage shall not be included in any supplemental or
renewal policy unless a named insured or spouse subsequently requests
such coverage in writing. The requirement of a written rejection under
this subsection shall apply only to the original issuance of policies
issued after July 24, 1983, and not to any renewal or replacement
policy.
(5) The limit of liability under the policy coverage may be defined
as the maximum limits of liability for all damages resulting from any
one accident regardless of the number of covered persons, claims made,
or vehicles or premiums shown on the policy, or premiums paid, or
vehicles involved in an accident.
(6) The policy may provide that if an injured person has other
similar insurance available to him under other policies, the total
limits of liability of all coverages shall not exceed the higher of the
applicable limits of the respective coverages.
(7)(a) The policy may provide for a deductible of not more than
three hundred dollars for payment for property damage when the damage
is caused by a hit-and-run driver or a phantom vehicle.
(b) In all other cases of underinsured property damage coverage,
the policy may provide for a deductible of not more than one hundred
dollars.
(8) For the purposes of this chapter, a "phantom vehicle" shall
mean a motor vehicle which causes bodily injury, death, or property
damage to an insured and has no physical contact with the insured or
the vehicle which the insured is occupying at the time of the accident
if:
(a) The facts of the accident can be corroborated by competent
evidence other than the testimony of the insured or any person having
an underinsured motorist claim resulting from the accident; and
(b) The accident has been reported to the appropriate law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours of the accident.
(((9) An insurer who elects to write motorcycle or motor-driven
cycle insurance in this state must provide information to prospective
insureds about the coverage.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Any insurer licensed within the state of Washington that provides
motor vehicle liability policies, as provided under chapter 46.30 RCW
or motor vehicle casualty insurance policies, as provided in RCW
48.22.030, must offer such insurance coverage to all automobiles, as
defined in RCW 48.22.005, including, but not limited to motorcycles,
motor-driven cycles, and mopeds. For the purpose of this section
motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, and moped are defined as provided in
chapter 46.04 RCW.

--- END ---