BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act shall be known as the saving,
earning, and enabling dreams (SEED) act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that economic well-being encompasses not only
income, spending, and consumption, but also savings, investment, and
asset-building. The building of assets, in particular, can improve
individuals' economic independence and stability. The legislature
further finds that it is appropriate for the state to institute an
asset-based strategy to assist low-income families. It is the purpose
of this act to promote job training, home ownership, and business
development among low-income individuals and to provide assistance in
meeting the financial goals of low-income individuals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 2 through
7 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(3) "Foster youth" means a person who is fifteen years of age or
older who is a dependent of the department of social and health
services; or a person who is at least fifteen years of age, but not
more than twenty-three years of age, who was a dependent of the
department of social and health services for at least twenty-four
months after attaining thirteen years of age.
(4) "Individual development account" or "account" means an account
established by contract between a low-income individual and a
sponsoring organization for the benefit of the low-income individual
and funded through periodic contributions by the low-income individual
which are matched with contributions by or through the sponsoring
organization.
(5) "Low-income individual" means a person whose household income
is equal to or less than either:
(a) Eighty percent of the median family income, adjusted for
household size, for the county or metropolitan statistical area where
the person resides; or
(b) Two hundred percent of the federal poverty guidelines updated
periodically in the federal register by the United States department of
health and human services under the authority of 42 U.S.C. 9902(2).
(6) "Program" means the individual development account program
established pursuant to sections 2 through 7 of this act.
(7) "Sponsoring organization" means: (a) A nonprofit, fund-raising
organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code as amended and in effect on January 1, 2005;
(b) a housing authority established under RCW 35.82.030; or (c) a
federally recognized Indian tribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
An individual development account program is hereby established
within the department for the purpose of facilitating the creation by
sponsoring organizations of individual development accounts for low-income individuals.
(1) The department shall select sponsoring organizations to
establish and monitor individual development accounts using the
following criteria:
(a) The ability of the sponsoring organization to implement and
administer an individual development account program, including the
ability to verify a low-income individual's eligibility, certify that
matching deposits are used only for approved purposes, and exercise
general fiscal accountability;
(b) The capacity of the sponsoring organization to provide or raise
funds to match the contributions made by low-income individuals to
their individual development accounts;
(c) The capacity of the sponsoring organization to provide or
arrange for the provision of financial counseling and other related
services to low-income individuals;
(d) The links the sponsoring organization has to other activities
and programs related to the purpose of this act; and
(e) Such other criteria as the department determines are consistent
with the purpose of this act and ease of administration.
(2) An individual development account may be established by or on
behalf of an eligible low-income individual to enable the individual to
accumulate funds for the following purposes:
(a) The acquisition of postsecondary education or job training;
(b) The purchase of a primary residence, including any usual or
reasonable settlement, financing, or other closing costs;
(c) The capitalization of a small business. Account moneys may be
used for capital, land, plant, equipment, and inventory expenses or for
working capital pursuant to a business plan. The business plan must
have been developed with a business counselor, trainer, or financial
institution approved by the sponsoring organization. The business plan
shall include a description of the services or goods to be sold, a
marketing strategy, and projected financial statements;
(d) The purchase of a computer, an automobile, or home
improvements; or
(e) The purchase of assistive technologies that will allow a person
with a disability to participate in work-related activities.
(3) An eligible low-income individual must contribute to an
individual development account. The contribution may be derived from
earned income or other income, as provided by the department. Other
income shall include child support payments, supplemental security
income, and disability benefits.
(4) A sponsoring organization may authorize a low-income individual
for whom an individual development account has been established to
withdraw all or part of the individual's deposits for the following
emergencies:
(a) Necessary medical expenses;
(b) To avoid eviction of the individual from the individual's
residence;
(c) Necessary living expenses following loss of employment; or
(d) Such other circumstances as the sponsoring organization
determines merit emergency withdrawal.
The low-income individual making an emergency withdrawal shall
reimburse the account for the amount withdrawn within twelve months of
the date of withdrawal or the individual development account shall be
closed.
(5) Funds held in an individual development account established
under sections 2 through 7 of this act shall not be used in the
determination of eligibility for, or the amount of, assistance in any
state or federal means-tested program.
(6) The department shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this
act, including rules regulating the use of individual development
accounts by eligible low-income individuals. The department's rules
shall require that funds held in an individual development account are
to be withdrawn only for the purposes specified in subsection (2) of
this section or withdrawn as permitted for emergencies under subsection
(4) of this section.
(7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create an
entitlement to matching moneys.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A foster youth individual development account program is hereby
established within the individual development account program
established pursuant to section 4 of this act for the purpose of
facilitating the creation by sponsoring organizations of individual
development accounts for foster youth.
(2) The department shall select sponsoring organizations to
establish and monitor individual development accounts for foster youth
from those entities with whom the department of social and health
services contracts for independent living services for youth who are or
have been dependents of the department of social and health services.
(3) An individual development account may be established by or on
behalf of a foster youth to enable the individual to accumulate funds
for the following purposes:
(a) The acquisition of postsecondary education or job training;
(b) Housing needs, including rent, security deposit, and utilities
costs;
(c) The purchase of a computer if necessary for postsecondary
education or job training;
(d) The purchase of a car if necessary for employment; and
(e) Payment of health insurance premiums.
(4) A foster youth must contribute to an individual development
account. The contribution may be derived from earned income or other
income, as provided by the department. Other income shall include
financial incentives for educational achievement provided by entities
contracted with the department of social and health services for
independent living services for youth who are or have been dependents
of the department of social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An account is created in the custody of the state treasurer to
be known as the individual development account program account. The
account shall consist of all moneys appropriated to the account by the
legislature and any other federal, state, or private funds,
appropriated or nonappropriated, as the department receives for the
purpose of matching low-income individuals' contributions to their
individual development accounts. Expenditures from the account may be
used only for the following:
(a) Grants to sponsoring organizations selected by the department
to participate in the individual development account program to assist
sponsoring organizations in providing or arranging for the provision of
financial counseling and other related services to low-income
individuals participating in the program and for program administration
purposes;
(b) A match to be determined by the department of up to four
dollars for every dollar deposited by an individual into the
individual's individual development account, except that the maximum
amount provided as a match for each individual development account
shall be four thousand dollars; and
(c) The department's administrative expenses in carrying out the
purposes of this act.
(2) Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account.
(3) The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
Sponsoring organizations may seek additional funds to increase the
match rate and the maximum annual match amount established pursuant to
section 5 of this act. Such funds may also be used for purposes in
addition to those provided in section 4(2) of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2004 c 246 s 8 and 2004 c 58 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future
teachers conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative
account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion
account, the produce railcar pool account, the rural rehabilitation
account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic
facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse
racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the
Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the
individual development account program account, and the Washington
horse racing commission operating account (earnings from the Washington
horse racing commission operating account must be credited to the
Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account).
However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall annually report to the legislature and the
governor on the individual development account program established
pursuant to sections 2 through 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The sum of three million dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund
to the individual development account program account for the biennium
ending June 30, 2007, to carry out the purposes of this act.

--- END ---