BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that as consumers'
prescription drug costs continue to rise, people across the state of
Washington are seeking opportunities to purchase lower cost
prescription drugs from Canada, the United Kingdom, Ireland, and other
countries for their personal use. The state has a strong interest in
promoting the safe use of prescription drugs by consumers in Washington
state. To address this interest, the legislature intends to seek
authorization from the federal government to license Canadian, United
Kingdom, Irish, and other nondomestic prescription drug wholesalers,
thereby providing licensed retail pharmacies the opportunity to
purchase prescription drugs from approved wholesalers and pass those
savings on to consumers, and providing consumers the opportunity to
purchase prescription drugs from a trusted community pharmacist who is
aware of all of their prescription drug needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2005, the board shall, in consultation with the
department and the health care authority, submit a waiver request to
the federal food and drug administration that will authorize the state
of Washington to license Canadian, United Kingdom, Irish, and other
nondomestic prescription drug wholesalers under RCW 18.64.046, thereby
providing retail pharmacies licensed in Washington state the
opportunity to purchase prescription drugs from approved wholesalers
and pass those savings on to consumers. The waiver shall provide that:
(a) Canadian, United Kingdom, Irish, and other nondomestic
prescription drug wholesalers meet the requirements of RCW 18.64.046
and any rules adopted by the board to implement those requirements;
(b) The board must ensure the integrity of the prescription drug
products being distributed by:
(i) Requiring that prescription drugs purchased from Canadian,
United Kingdom, Irish, and other nondomestic wholesalers originate only
from approved manufacturing locations;
(ii) Routinely testing prescription drugs purchased from Canadian,
United Kingdom, Irish, and other nondomestic wholesalers for safety;
(iii) Establishing safe labeling, tracking, and shipping procedures
for prescription drugs purchased from Canadian, United Kingdom, Irish,
and other nondomestic wholesalers; and
(iv) Closely monitoring compliance with RCW 18.64.046 and any rules
adopted to implement the waiver;
(c) The prescription drugs purchased from Canadian, United Kingdom,
Irish, and other nondomestic wholesalers must be limited to those for
which potential savings to consumers can be demonstrated and those
available through purchase by individuals only at licensed retail
pharmacies;
(d) To ensure that the program benefits those consumers without
insurance coverage for prescription drugs who are most in need of price
relief, prescription drug purchases from pharmacies under the waiver
will be limited to those not eligible for reimbursement by third party
insurance coverage, whether public or private, for the particular drug
being purchased; and
(e) Savings associated with purchasing prescription drugs from
Canadian, United Kingdom, Irish, and other nondomestic wholesalers will
be passed on to consumers.
(2) By December 1, 2005, the board, in consultation with the
department and the health care authority, shall submit a detailed
implementation plan to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature that details the mechanisms that the board will use to
implement each component of the waiver under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) The board shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---