BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that many
employers want to provide comprehensive health benefits to their
employees. However, employers, particularly small employers,
consistently report that cost is a significant barrier to their
offering health insurance coverage to their workers. The high cost of
health insurance coverage for small employers is due in part to the
costs associated with marketing and administering health benefit plans
for small groups. Some of these costs could be avoided by
participation in a large purchasing group.
(2) The legislature intends to expand health benefit plan options
available to employers by offering them the opportunity to enroll in
programs administered by the health care authority. This option
provides employers with the opportunity to benefit from participation
in a large purchasing pool that is able to negotiate favorable premium
rates and improvements in the quality of health care services provided
to enrollees.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.011 and 2001 c 165 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.
(2) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical
and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state
health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the
department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and
local school districts.
(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(4) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01
RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW,
or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.
(5) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows
employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the
amount of employee contributions from among a range of choices offered
by the authority.
(6) "Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees
of the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and
appointed officials of the executive branch of government, including
full-time members of boards, commissions, or committees; and includes
any or all part-time and temporary employees under the terms and
conditions established under this chapter by the authority; justices of
the supreme court and judges of the court of appeals and the superior
courts; and members of the state legislature or of the legislative
authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to office after
February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a) Employees of a
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state if
the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of
the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with
the authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee
organizations representing state civil service employees, at the option
of each such employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995,
employees of employee organizations currently pooled with employees of
school districts for the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at
the option of each such employee organization; and (c) employees of a
school district if the authority agrees to provide any of the school
districts' insurance programs by contract with the authority as
provided in RCW 28A.400.350. For the purposes of section 3 of this
act, "employee" means a person employed by a private employer who seeks
and receives the approval of the authority to provide health coverage
through its insurance programs.
(7) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established
under RCW 41.05.055.
(8) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or
educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district on or after October 1, 1993, and
immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;
(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district due to a total and permanent disability,
and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.
(9) "Benefits contribution plan" means a premium only contribution
plan, a medical flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan
whereby state and public employees may agree to a contribution to
benefit costs which will allow the employee to participate in benefits
offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the
internal revenue code.
(10) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.
(11) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility
and enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.
(12) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.
(13) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:
(a) RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1, 1996; or
(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or
(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(40), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan
3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.
(14) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means
law enforcement officers and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
and reserve officers and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.24.010 who
die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of employment as
determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and
industries.
(15) "Private employer" includes a person, firm, corporation,
partnership, association, sole proprietor, or self-employed individual
that is actively engaged in business that, on at least fifty percent of
its working days during the preceding calendar quarter, employed at
least two employees, with a normal work week of thirty or more hours,
the majority of whom were employed and resided within this state, and
is not formed primarily for purposes of buying health insurance and in
which a bona fide employer-employee relationship exists.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The administrator shall:
(a) Establish an opportunity for private employers to provide
health coverage to themselves and their dependents, and their employees
and their employees' dependents, as offered under this chapter;
(b) Require private employers to submit an application to
participate as provided under this chapter; and
(c) Review and approve or deny applications from private employers
to provide health coverage for themselves and their dependents, and
their employees and their employees' dependents.
(2) Amounts paid by a private employer for coverage under this
chapter shall include an amount determined by the administrator to pay
such administrative expenses of the authority as are necessary to
administer plans for covered persons under this section.
(3) Private employer groups whose applications for coverage are
accepted by the authority shall be included in the single community-rated risk pool established under RCW 41.05.022.
(4) If the administrator at any time determines that the
participation of a private employer covered under this chapter
adversely impacts insurance rates for state employees, the
administrator shall implement limitations on the participation of
additional private employers.
(5) The administrator may design, establish rates for, and
implement additional benefit plans exclusively for private employers
who enroll under this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.05.021 and 2002 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state health care authority is created within
the executive branch. The authority shall have an administrator
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. The
administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The
administrator may employ up to seven staff members, who shall be exempt
from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are
necessary to administer this chapter. The administrator may delegate
any power or duty vested in him or her by this chapter, including
authority to make final decisions and enter final orders in hearings
conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The primary duties of the authority
shall be to: Administer state employees' insurance benefits and
retired or disabled school employees' insurance benefits; administer
the basic health plan pursuant to chapter 70.47 RCW; study state-purchased health care programs in order to maximize cost containment in
these programs while ensuring access to quality health care; and
implement state initiatives, joint purchasing strategies, and
techniques for efficient administration that have potential application
to all state-purchased health services. The authority's duties
include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To administer health care benefit programs for employees and
retired or disabled school employees as specifically authorized in RCW
41.05.065 and in accordance with the methods described in RCW
41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other provisions of this chapter;
(b) To administer health care benefits programs for private
employers as specifically authorized in section 3 of this act in
accordance with the methods described in RCW 41.05.075, 41.05.140, and
other provisions of this chapter;
(c) To analyze state-purchased health care programs and to explore
options for cost containment and delivery alternatives for those
programs that are consistent with the purposes of those programs,
including, but not limited to:
(i) Creation of economic incentives for the persons for whom the
state purchases health care to appropriately utilize and purchase
health care services, including the development of flexible benefit
plans to offset increases in individual financial responsibility;
(ii) Utilization of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems,
utilization review, and prospective payment methods, and that ensure
access to quality care, including assuring reasonable access to local
providers, especially for employees residing in rural areas;
(iii) Coordination of state agency efforts to purchase drugs
effectively as provided in RCW 70.14.050;
(iv) Development of recommendations and methods for purchasing
medical equipment and supporting services on a volume discount basis;
and
(v) Development of data systems to obtain utilization data from
state-purchased health care programs in order to identify cost centers,
utilization patterns, provider and hospital practice patterns, and
procedure costs, utilizing the information obtained pursuant to RCW
41.05.031;
(((c))) (d) To analyze areas of public and private health care
interaction;
(((d))) (e) To provide information and technical and administrative
assistance to the board;
(((e))) (f) To review and approve or deny applications from
counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state
to provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to
their employees in accordance with the provisions of RCW 41.04.205,
setting the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined in RCW
41.05.050;
(((f))) (g) To appoint a health care policy technical advisory
committee as required by RCW 41.05.150;
(((g))) (h) To establish billing procedures and collect funds from
school districts and educational service districts under RCW
28A.400.400 in a way that minimizes the administrative burden on
districts;
(((h))) (i) To publish and distribute to nonparticipating school
districts and educational service districts by October 1st of each year
a description of health care benefit plans available through the
authority and the estimated cost if school districts and educational
service district employees were enrolled; and
(((i))) (j) To promulgate and adopt rules consistent with this
chapter as described in RCW 41.05.160.
(2) On and after January 1, 1996, the public employees' benefits
board may implement strategies to promote managed competition among
employee health benefit plans. Strategies may include but are not
limited to:
(a) Standardizing the benefit package;
(b) Soliciting competitive bids for the benefit package;
(c) Limiting the state's contribution to a percent of the lowest
priced qualified plan within a geographical area;
(d) Monitoring the impact of the approach under this subsection
with regards to: Efficiencies in health service delivery, cost shifts
to subscribers, access to and choice of managed care plans statewide,
and quality of health services. The health care authority shall also
advise on the value of administering a benchmark employer-managed plan
to promote competition among managed care plans.

--- END ---