BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.41.190 and 1989 c 121 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Neither the participation by members, the establishment of rates,
forms, or procedures for coverages issued by the pool, nor any other
joint or collective action required by this chapter or the state of
Washington shall be the basis of any legal action, civil or criminal
liability or penalty against the pool, any member of the board of
directors, or members of the pool either jointly or separately.)) The
pool, members of the pool, board directors of the pool, officers of the
pool, employees of the pool, the commissioner, the commissioner's
representatives, and the commissioner's employees shall not be civilly
or criminally liable and shall not have any penalty or cause of action
of any nature arise against them for any action taken or not taken,
including any discretionary decision or failure to make a discretionary
decision, when the action or inaction is done in good faith and in the
performance of the powers and duties under this chapter: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That nothing in this section shall prohibit legal actions
against the pool to enforce the pool's statutory or contractual duties
or obligations.

--- END ---