BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
restore the ability to impose an aggravated sentence lost by the
superior court as a result of the decision of the United States supreme
court in Blakely v. State of Washington, 542 U.S. ... (2004). The
legislature finds that as the seriousness level of the crime and the
criminal history of the offender increase, the need for an
individualized and informed assessment of the circumstances of the
crime, the offender, and the victim, by the judiciary, is necessary for
justice to be obtained. The legislature further finds that the
exercise of the judiciary's sentencing discretion over a broader range
based upon the assessment of these circumstances is consistent with the
policies supporting Washington's sentencing reform act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For offenders convicted of a violent offense, the upper limit
of the standard sentencing range shall be advisory only.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the maximum sentence that
a court may impose for a violent offense is the maximum sentence for
the current offense under chapter 9A.20 RCW, or twice the upper limit
of the standard sentencing range, whichever is less. This provision
shall not apply to any offender sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712.
(2) In making its determination of the sentence length to be
imposed, the court shall consider the risk assessment prepared by the
department of corrections, the presentence report and other materials
provided by the offender, and any information provided by the victim or
victims of the crime.
(3) A sentence imposed under this section shall be a determinate
sentence unless it is imposed on an offender sentenced under RCW
9.94A.712. The sentence may be appealed by the offender or the state
as set forth in RCW 9.94A.585 (2) through (6).

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.480 and 2002 c 290 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A current, newly created or reworked judgment and sentence
document for each felony sentencing shall record any and all
recommended sentencing agreements or plea agreements and the sentences
for any and all felony crimes kept as public records under RCW
9.94A.475 shall contain the clearly printed name and legal signature of
the sentencing judge. The judgment and sentence document as defined in
this section shall also provide additional space for the sentencing
judge's reasons, if any, for going either above or below the
presumptive or advisory sentence range for any and all felony crimes
covered as public records under RCW 9.94A.475. Both the sentencing
judge and the prosecuting attorney's office shall each retain or
receive a completed copy of each sentencing document as defined in this
section for their own records.
(2) The sentencing guidelines commission shall be sent a completed
copy of the judgment and sentence document upon conviction for each
felony sentencing under subsection (1) of this section and shall
compile a yearly and cumulative judicial record of each sentencing
judge in regards to his or her sentencing practices for any and all
felony crimes involving:
(a) Any violent offense as defined in this chapter;
(b) Any most serious offense as defined in this chapter;
(c) Any felony with any deadly weapon special verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(d) Any felony with any deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both; and/or
(e) The felony crimes of possession of a machine gun, possessing a
stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful
possession of a firearm in the first or second degree, and/or use of a
machine gun in a felony.
(3) The sentencing guidelines commission shall compare each
individual judge's sentencing practices to the standard ((or)),
presumptive, or advisory sentence range for any and all felony crimes
listed in subsection (2) of this section for the appropriate offense
level as defined in RCW 9.94A.515 or 9.94A.518, offender score as
defined in RCW 9.94A.525, and any applicable deadly weapon enhancements
as defined in RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both. These comparative
records shall be retained and made available to the public for review
in a current, newly created or reworked official published document by
the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) Any and all felony sentences which are either above or below
the standard ((or)), presumptive, or advisory sentence range in
subsection (3) of this section shall also mark whether the prosecuting
attorney in the case also recommended a similar sentence, if any, which
was either above or below the standard, presumptive, or advisory
sentence range and shall also indicate if the sentence was in
conjunction with an approved alternative sentencing option including a
first-time offender waiver, sex offender sentencing alternative, or
other prescribed sentencing option.
(5) If any completed judgment and sentence document as defined in
subsection (1) of this section is not sent to the sentencing guidelines
commission as required in subsection (2) of this section, the
sentencing guidelines commission shall have the authority and shall
undertake reasonable and necessary steps to assure that all past,
current, and future sentencing documents as defined in subsection (1)
of this section are received by the sentencing guidelines commission.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.505 and 2002 c 290 s 17, 2002 c 289 s 6, and
2002 c 175 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose
punishment as provided in this chapter.
(2)(a) The court shall impose a sentence as provided in the
following sections and as applicable in the case:
(i) Unless another term of confinement applies, the court shall
impose a sentence within the standard sentence range established in RCW
9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517;
(ii) RCW 9.94A.700 and 9.94A.705, relating to community placement;
(iii) RCW 9.94A.710 and 9.94A.715, relating to community custody;
(iv) RCW 9.94A.545, relating to community custody for offenders
whose term of confinement is one year or less;
(v) RCW 9.94A.570, relating to persistent offenders;
(vi) RCW 9.94A.540, relating to mandatory minimum terms;
(vii) RCW 9.94A.650, relating to the first-time offender waiver;
(viii) RCW 9.94A.660, relating to the drug offender sentencing
alternative;
(ix) RCW 9.94A.670, relating to the special sex offender sentencing
alternative;
(x) RCW 9.94A.712, relating to certain sex offenses;
(xi) RCW 9.94A.535, relating to exceptional sentences;
(xii) RCW 9.94A.589, relating to consecutive and concurrent
sentences;
(xiii) Section 2 of this act relating to violent offenses.
(b) If a standard sentence range has not been established for the
offender's crime, the court shall impose a determinate sentence which
may include not more than one year of confinement; community
restitution work; until July 1, 2000, a term of community supervision
not to exceed one year and on and after July 1, 2000, a term of
community custody not to exceed one year, subject to conditions and
sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.710 (2) and (3); and/or other
legal financial obligations. The court may impose a sentence which
provides more than one year of confinement if the court finds reasons
justifying an exceptional sentence as provided in RCW 9.94A.535.
(3) If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty
days or less, the court may, in its discretion, specify that the
sentence be served on consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence
requiring more than thirty days of confinement shall be served on
consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule court-ordered
intermittent sentences as space permits.
(4) If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial
obligation, it shall be imposed as provided in RCW 9.94A.750,
9.94A.753, 9.94A.760, and 43.43.7541.
(5) Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.750(4) and 9.94A.753(4), a
court may not impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or
community supervision, community placement, or community custody which
exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as provided in chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(6) The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all
confinement time served before the sentencing if that confinement was
solely in regard to the offense for which the offender is being
sentenced.
(7) The court shall order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.750
and 9.94A.753.
(8) As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce
crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions as provided in
this chapter.
(9) The court may order an offender whose sentence includes
community placement or community supervision to undergo a mental status
evaluation and to participate in available outpatient mental health
treatment, if the court finds that reasonable grounds exist to believe
that the offender is a mentally ill person as defined in RCW 71.24.025,
and that this condition is likely to have influenced the offense. An
order requiring mental status evaluation or treatment must be based on
a presentence report and, if applicable, mental status evaluations that
have been filed with the court to determine the offender's competency
or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may order
additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.
(10) In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may require
the offender to serve the partial confinement in work release, in a
program of home detention, on work crew, or in a combined program of
work crew and home detention.
(11) In sentencing an offender convicted of a crime of domestic
violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, if the offender has a minor
child, or if the victim of the offense for which the offender was
convicted has a minor child, the court may, as part of any term of
community supervision, community placement, or community custody, order
the offender to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator program
approved under RCW 26.50.150.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---