BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.12.070 and 1927 c 123 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The plaintiff in his or her complaint, which shall be in writing,
must set forth the facts on which he or she seeks to recover, and
describe the premises with reasonable certainty, and may set forth
therein any circumstances of fraud, force or violence, which may have
accompanied the ((said)) forcible entry or forcible or unlawful
detainer, and claim damages therefor, or compensation for the
occupation of the premises, or both; in case the unlawful detainer
charged be after default in the payment of rent, the complaint must
state the amount of such rent. A summons must be issued as in other
cases, returnable at a day designated therein, which shall not be less
than ((six)) seven nor more than ((twelve)) thirty days from the date
of service, except in cases where the publication of summons is
necessary, in which case the court or judge thereof may order that the
summons be made returnable at such time as may be deemed proper, and
the summons shall specify the return day so fixed.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.18.370 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 207 s 38 are each
amended to read as follows:
The plaintiff, at the time of commencing an action of forcible
entry or detainer or unlawful detainer, or at any time afterwards, upon
filing the complaint, may apply to the superior court in which the
action is pending for an order directing the defendant to appear and
show cause, if any he or she has, why a writ of restitution should not
issue restoring to the plaintiff possession of the property in the
complaint described, and the judge shall by order fix a time and place
for a hearing of ((said)) the motion, which shall not be less than
((six)) seven nor more than ((twelve)) thirty days from the date of
service of ((said)) the order upon defendant. A copy of ((said)) the
order, together with a copy of the summons and complaint if not
previously served upon the defendant, shall be served upon the
defendant. ((Said)) The order shall notify the defendant that if he or
she fails to appear and show cause at the time and place specified by
the order the court may order the sheriff to restore possession of the
property to the plaintiff and may grant such other relief as may be
prayed for in the complaint and provided by this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 59.18.365 and 1989 c 342 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The summons must contain the names of the parties to the
proceeding, the attorney or attorneys if any, the court in which the
same is brought, the nature of the action, in concise terms, and the
relief sought, and also the return day; and must notify the defendant
to appear and answer within the time designated or that the relief
sought will be taken against him or her. The summons must contain a
street address for service of the notice of appearance or answer and,
if available, a facsimile number for the plaintiff or the plaintiff's
attorney, if represented. The summons must be served and returned in
the same manner as a summons in other actions is served and returned.
(2) A defendant may serve a copy of an answer or notice of
appearance, and if required by the summons, the sworn statement
regarding nonpayment of rent described in RCW 59.18.375, by any of the
following methods:
(a) By delivering a copy of the answer or notice of appearance to
the person who signed the summons at the street address listed on the
summons;
(b) By mailing a copy of the answer or notice of appearance
addressed to the person who signed the summons to the street address
listed on the summons;
(c) By facsimile to the facsimile number listed on the summons.
Service by facsimile is complete upon successful transmission to the
facsimile number listed upon the summons;
(d) As otherwise authorized by the superior court civil rules.
(3) The summons for unlawful detainer actions for tenancies covered
by this chapter shall be substantially in the following form. In
unlawful detainer actions based on nonpayment of rent, the summons may
contain the provisions authorized by RCW 59.18.375.

IN THE SUPERIOR COURT OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON IN AND FOR . . . . . . COUNTY

THIS IS NOTICE OF A LAWSUIT TO EVICT YOU. PLEASE READ IT CAREFULLY. THE DEADLINE FOR YOUR WRITTEN RESPONSE IS: 5:00 p.m., on . . . . . . . . .

TO: . . . . . . . . . . . . (Name)
. . . . . . . . . . . . (Address)

This is notice of a lawsuit to evict you from the property which
you are renting. Your landlord is asking the court to terminate your
tenancy, direct the sheriff to remove you and your belongings from the
property, enter a money judgment against you for unpaid rent and/or
damages for your use of the property, and for court costs and
attorneys' fees.
If you want to defend yourself in this lawsuit, you must respond to
the eviction complaint in writing on or before the deadline stated
above. You must respond in writing even if no case number has been
assigned by the court yet.
You can respond to the complaint in writing by delivering a copy of
a notice of appearance or answer, and if required by this summons, a
sworn statement regarding nonpayment of rent, to your landlord's
attorney (or your landlord if there is no attorney) ((to be received no
later than the deadline stated above)) by personal delivery, mailing,
or facsimile to the address or facsimile number stated below TO BE
RECEIVED NO LATER THAN THE DEADLINE STATED ABOVE. Service by facsimile
is complete upon successful transmission to the facsimile number, if
any, listed in the summons.
The notice of appearance or answer must include the name of this
case (plaintiff(s) and defendant(s)), your name, the street address
where further legal papers may be sent, your telephone number (if any),
and your signature.
If there is a number on the upper right side of the eviction
summons and complaint, you must also file your original notice of
appearance or answer with the court clerk by the deadline for your
written response.
You may demand that the plaintiff file this lawsuit with the court.
If you do so, the demand must be in writing and must be served upon the
person signing the summons. Within fourteen days after you serve the
demand, the plaintiff must file this lawsuit with the court, or the
service on you of this summons and complaint will be void.
If you wish to seek the advice of an attorney in this matter, you
should do so promptly so that your written response, if any, may be
served on time.
You may also be instructed in a separate order to appear for a
court hearing on your eviction. If you receive an order to show cause
you must personally appear at the hearing on the date indicated in the
order to show cause ((in addition)) IN ADDITION to delivering and
filing your notice of appearance or answer by the deadline stated
above.

IF YOU DO NOT RESPOND TO THE COMPLAINT IN WRITING BY THE
DEADLINE STATED ABOVE YOU WILL LOSE BY DEFAULT. YOUR LANDLORD
MAY PROCEED WITH THE LAWSUIT, EVEN IF YOU HAVE MOVED OUT OF THE
PROPERTY.

The notice of appearance or answer must be delivered to:

--- END ---