BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.17.243 and 2003 c 14 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The district manager for district two as defined in WAC 16-458-075
is authorized to transfer two hundred thousand dollars from the fruit
and vegetable district fund to the plant pest account within the
agricultural local fund. The amount transferred is to be derived from
fees collected for state inspections of tree fruits and is to be used
solely for activities related to the control of Rhagoletis pomonella in
district two. The transfer of funds shall occur by June 1, 1997. On
June 30, ((2005)) 2009, any unexpended portion of the two hundred
thousand dollars shall be transferred to the fruit and vegetable
inspection account and deposited in the district account for the
district that includes Yakima county.

--- END ---