BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 2" to read as follows:
(1) An active member who has completed a minimum of five years of
creditable service in the teachers' retirement system may, upon written
application to the department, make a one-time purchase of up to seven
years of service credit for public education experience outside the
Washington state retirement system, subject to the following
limitations:
(a) The public education experience being claimed must have been
performed as a teacher in a public school in another state or with the
federal government;
(b) The public education experience being claimed must have been
covered by a retirement or pension plan provided by a state or
political subdivision of a state, or by the federal government;
(c) The member is not currently receiving a benefit or currently
eligible to receive an unreduced retirement benefit from a retirement
or pension plan of a state or political subdivision of a state or the
federal government that includes the service credit to be purchased;
(d) The member has less than ten years of creditable service in the
retirement system; and
(e) The purchase will not result in the purchase of service credit
years that exceed the member's total years of creditable service in the
retirement system at the time of purchase.
(2) The service credit purchased shall be membership service, and
may be used to qualify the member for retirement.
(3) The member shall pay the product of the sum of the employer and
employee contribution rates multiplied by the member's annualized
salary at the time of purchase and further multiplied by the total
number of years of service credit to be purchased, plus compounded
interest for the period for which the service credit is purchased at a
rate equal to the investment rate of return assumption set forth in
chapter 41.45 RCW. Compounded interest shall be applied to each year
of service credit purchased as follows: No interest for the first
year, one years' interest for the second year, two years' interest for
the third year, three years' interest for the fourth year, four years'
interest for the fifth year, five years' interest for the sixth year,
and six years' interest for the seventh year. The applicable employer
and employee contribution rates shall be based on the member's age at
entry into the retirement system and calculated under the entry age
normal cost method.
(4) The member may pay all or part of the cost of the service
credit to be purchased with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.
(5) The employer may pay all or a portion of the member's cost of
the service credit purchased under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as follows:
(1) An active member who has completed a minimum of five years of
creditable service in the teachers' retirement system may, upon written
application to the department, make a one-time purchase of up to seven
years of service credit for public education experience outside the
Washington state retirement system, subject to the following
limitations:
(a) The public education experience being claimed must have been
performed as a teacher in a public school in another state or with the
federal government;
(b) The public education experience being claimed must have been
covered by a retirement or pension plan provided by a state or
political subdivision of a state, or by the federal government;
(c) The member is not currently receiving a benefit or currently
eligible to receive an unreduced retirement benefit from a retirement
or pension plan of a state or political subdivision of a state or the
federal government that includes the service credit to be purchased;
(d) The member has less than ten years of creditable service in the
retirement system; and
(e) The purchase will not result in the purchase of service credit
years that exceed the member's total years of creditable service in the
retirement system at the time of purchase.
(2) The service credit purchased shall be membership service, and
may be used to qualify the member for retirement.
(3) The member shall pay the product of the employer contribution
rate multiplied by the member's annualized salary at the time of
purchase and further multiplied by the total number of years of service
credit to be purchased, plus compounded interest for the period for
which the service credit is purchased at a rate equal to the investment
rate of return assumption set forth in chapter 41.45 RCW. Compounded
interest shall be applied to each year of service credit purchased as
follows: No interest for the first year, one years' interest for the
second year, two years' interest for the third year, three years'
interest for the fourth year, four years' interest for the fifth year,
five years' interest for the sixth year, and six years' interest for
the seventh year. The total amount paid by the member shall be deemed
a contribution on behalf of the employer for the purpose of RCW
41.32.867, and shall not be refundable. The applicable employer
contribution rate shall be based on the member's age at entry into the
retirement system and calculated under the entry age normal cost
method.
(4) The member may pay all or part of the cost of the service
credit to be purchased with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.
(5) The employer may pay all or a portion of the member's cost of
the service credit purchased under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2006.

--- END ---