BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.83.040 and 1999 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When notified of positive screening tests, the state department of
health shall offer the use of its services and facilities, designed to
prevent mental retardation or physical defects in such children, to the
attending physician, or the parents of the newborn child if no
attending physician can be identified.
The services and facilities of the department, and other state and
local agencies cooperating with the department in carrying out programs
of detection and prevention of mental retardation and physical defects
shall be made available to the family and physician to the extent
required in order to carry out the intent of this chapter and within
the availability of funds. The department has the authority to collect
a reasonable fee, from the parents or other responsible party of each
infant screened to fund specialty clinics that provide treatment
services for hemoglobin diseases, phenylketonuria, congenital adrenal
hyperplasia, ((and)) congenital hypothyroidism, biotinidase deficiency,
galactosemia, homocystinuria, maple syrup urine disease, and medium
chain acyl co-A dehydrogenase deficiency. The fee may be collected
through the facility where the screening specimen is obtained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of health shall conduct a
study of the funding mechanisms that support the treatment of disorders
defined by the board of health under RCW 70.83.020 and rules adopted
under RCW 70.83.050. The study shall include: An evaluation of the
current specialty clinic fee funding and collection method;
identification of funding gaps; identification and evaluation of
alternative funding and collection methods; and an assessment of the
availability of additional federal, state, or grant funding.
In conducting the study, the department shall convene an advisory
group which shall include one representative from the: Department of
health, University of Washington medical center, state board of health,
march of dimes, medical assistance administration, Washington health
plan association, and Washington state hospital association. The
findings of the study shall be presented to the appropriate committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2005. No changes to the fee may be
made until April 1, 2006.

--- END ---