BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.41.210 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 743 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The chief administrator or executive officer of a hospital
shall report to the ((medical quality assurance commission when a
physician's clinical privileges are terminated or are restricted based
on a determination, in accordance with an institution's bylaws, that a
physician has either committed an act or acts which may constitute
unprofessional conduct. The officer shall also report if a physician
accepts voluntary termination in order to foreclose or terminate actual
or possible hospital action to suspend, restrict, or terminate a
physician's clinical privileges)) department when the practice of a
health care practitioner as defined in subsection (2) of this section
is restricted, suspended, limited, or terminated based upon a
conviction, determination, or finding by the hospital that the health
care practitioner has committed an action defined as unprofessional
conduct under RCW 18.130.180. The chief administrator or executive
officer shall also report any voluntary restriction or termination of
the practice of a health care practitioner as defined in subsection (2)
of this section while the practitioner is under investigation or the
subject of a proceeding by the hospital regarding unprofessional
conduct, or in return for the hospital not conducting such an
investigation or proceeding or not taking action. The department will
forward the report to the appropriate disciplining authority.
(2) The reporting requirements apply to the following health care
practitioners: Pharmacists as defined in chapter 18.64 RCW; advanced
registered nurse practitioners as defined in chapter 18.79 RCW;
dentists as defined in chapter 18.32 RCW; naturopathic physicians as
defined in chapter 18.36A RCW; optometrists as defined in chapter 18.53
RCW; osteopathic physicians and surgeons as defined in chapter 18.57
RCW; osteopathic physician assistants as defined in chapter 18.57A RCW;
physicians as defined in chapter 18.71 RCW; physician assistants as
defined in chapter 18.71A RCW; podiatric physicians and surgeons as
defined in chapter 18.22 RCW; and psychologists as defined in chapter
18.83 RCW.
((Such a)) (3) Reports made under subsection (1) of this section
shall be made within ((sixty)) fifteen days of the date ((action was
taken by the hospital's peer review committee or the physician's
acceptance of voluntary termination or restriction of privileges)):
(a) A conviction, determination, or finding is made by the hospital
that the health care practitioner has committed an action defined as
unprofessional conduct under RCW 18.130.180; or (b) the voluntary
restriction or termination of the practice of a health care
practitioner, including his or her voluntary resignation, while under
investigation or the subject of proceedings regarding unprofessional
conduct under RCW 18.130.180 is accepted by the hospital.
(4) Failure of a hospital to comply with this section is punishable
by a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars.
(5) A hospital, its chief administrator, or its executive officer
who files a report under this section is immune from suit, whether
direct or derivative, in any civil action related to the filing or
contents of the report.
(6) The department shall forward reports made under subsection (1)
of this section to the appropriate disciplining authority designated
under Title 18 RCW within fifteen days of the date the report is
received by the department. The department shall notify a hospital
that has made a report under subsection (1) of this section of the
results of the disciplining authority's case disposition decision
within fifteen days after the case disposition. Case disposition is
the decision whether to issue a statement of charges, take informal
action, or close the complaint without action against a practitioner.
In its biennial report to the legislature under RCW 18.130.310, the
department shall specifically identify the case dispositions of reports
made by hospitals under subsection (1) of this section.
(7) The department shall not increase hospital license fees to
carry out this section before July 1, 2007.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.130.070 and 1998 c 132 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The disciplining authority may adopt rules requiring any
person, including, but not limited to, licensees, corporations,
organizations, health care facilities, impaired practitioner programs,
or voluntary substance abuse monitoring programs approved by the
disciplining authority and state or local governmental agencies, to
report to the disciplining authority any conviction, determination, or
finding that a license holder has committed an act which constitutes
unprofessional conduct, or to report information to the disciplining
authority, an impaired practitioner program, or voluntary substance
abuse monitoring program approved by the disciplining authority, which
indicates that the license holder may not be able to practice his or
her profession with reasonable skill and safety to consumers as a
result of a mental or physical condition. If a report has been made by
a hospital to the department pursuant to RCW 70.41.210, a report to the
disciplining authority is not required. To facilitate meeting the
intent of this section, the cooperation of agencies of the federal
government is requested by reporting any conviction, determination, or
finding that a federal employee or contractor regulated by the
((disciplinary)) disciplining authorities enumerated in this chapter
has committed an act which constituted unprofessional conduct and
reporting any information which indicates that a federal employee or
contractor regulated by the ((disciplinary)) disciplining authorities
enumerated in this chapter may not be able to practice his or her
profession with reasonable skill and safety as a result of a mental or
physical condition.
(2) If a person fails to furnish a required report, the
disciplining authority may petition the superior court of the county in
which the person resides or is found, and the court shall issue to the
person an order to furnish the required report. A failure to obey the
order is a contempt of court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW.
(3) A person is immune from civil liability, whether direct or
derivative, for providing information to the disciplining authority
pursuant to the rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The holder of a license subject to the jurisdiction of this
chapter shall report to the disciplining authority any conviction,
determination, or finding that the licensee has committed
unprofessional conduct or is unable to practice with reasonable skill
or safety. Failure to report within thirty days of notice of the
conviction, determination, or finding constitutes grounds for
disciplinary action.

--- END ---