BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.008 and 2004 c 271 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this title:
(1) "Ballot" means, as the context implies, either:
(a) The issues and offices to be voted upon in a jurisdiction or
portion of a jurisdiction at a particular primary, general election, or
special election;
(b) A facsimile of the contents of a particular ballot whether
printed on a paper ballot or ballot card or as part of a voting machine
or voting device;
(c) A physical or electronic record of the choices of an individual
voter in a particular primary, general election, or special election;
or
(d) The physical document on which the voter's choices are to be
recorded;
(2) "Paper ballot" means a piece of paper on which the ballot for
a particular election or primary has been printed, on which a voter may
record his or her choices for any candidate or for or against any
measure, and that is to be tabulated manually;
(3) "Ballot card" means any type of card or piece of paper of any
size on which a voter may record his or her choices for any candidate
and for or against any measure and that is to be tabulated on a vote
tallying system;
(4) "Sample ballot" means a printed facsimile of all the issues and
offices on the ballot in a jurisdiction and is intended to give voters
notice of the issues, offices, and candidates that are to be voted on
at a particular primary, general election, or special election;
(5) "Provisional ballot" means a ballot issued to a voter at the
polling place on election day by the precinct election board, for
((one)) any of the following reasons:
(a) The voter's name does not appear in the poll book;
(b) There is an indication in the poll book that the voter has
requested an absentee ballot, but the voter wishes to vote at the
polling place;
(c) There is a question on the part of the voter concerning the
issues or candidates on which the voter is qualified to vote;
(d) Other circumstances as determined by the precinct election
board;
(e) Any other reason allowed by law;
(6) "Party ballot" means a primary election ballot specific to a
particular major political party that lists all partisan offices to be
voted on at that primary, and the candidates for those offices who
affiliate with that same major political party;
(7) "Nonpartisan ballot" means a primary election ballot that lists
all nonpartisan races and ballot measures to be voted on at that
primary.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.04.530 and 2003 c 111 s 151 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall:
(1) Establish and operate, or provide by contract, training and
certification programs for state and county elections administration
officials and personnel, including training on the various types of
election law violations and discrimination, and training programs for
political party observers which conform to the rules for such programs
established under RCW 29A.04.630;
(2) Establish guidelines, in consultation with state and local law
enforcement, for signature verification processes. All election
personnel assigned to verify signatures must receive training on the
guidelines;
(3) Administer tests for state and county officials and personnel
who have received such training and issue certificates to those who
have successfully completed the training and passed such tests;
(((3))) (4) Maintain a record of those individuals who have
received such training and certificates; and
(((4))) (5) Provide the staffing and support services required by
the board created under RCW 29A.04.510.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.04.570 and 2003 c 111 s 155 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The election review staff of the office of the secretary of
state shall conduct a review of election-related policies, procedures,
and practices in an affected county or counties:
(i) If the unofficial returns of a primary or general election for
a position in the state legislature indicate that a mandatory recount
is likely for that position; or
(ii) If unofficial returns indicate a mandatory recount is likely
in a statewide election or an election for federal office.
Reviews conducted under (ii) of this subsection shall be performed
in as many selected counties as time and staffing permit. Reviews
conducted as a result of mandatory recounts shall be performed between
the time the unofficial returns are complete and the time the recount
is to take place, if possible.
(b) In addition to conducting reviews under (a) of this subsection,
the election review staff shall also conduct such a review in a county
((periodically)) at least once in each three-year period, in
conjunction with a county primary or special or general election, at
the direction of the secretary of state or at the request of the county
auditor. If staffing or budget levels do not permit a three-year
election cycle for reviews, then reviews must be done as often as
possible. If any resident of this state believes that an aspect of a
primary or election has been conducted inappropriately in a county, the
resident may file a complaint with the secretary of state. The
secretary shall consider such complaints in scheduling periodic reviews
under this section.
(c) Before an election review is conducted in a county, the
secretary of state shall provide the county auditor of the affected
county and the chair of the state central committee of each major
political party with notice that the review is to be conducted. When
a periodic review is to be conducted in a county at the direction of
the secretary of state under (b) of this subsection, the secretary
shall provide the affected county auditor not less than thirty days'
notice.
(2) Reviews shall be conducted in conformance with rules adopted
under RCW 29A.04.630. In performing a review in a county under this
chapter, the election review staff shall evaluate the policies and
procedures established for conducting the primary or election in the
county and the practices of those conducting it. As part of the
review, the election review staff shall issue to the county auditor and
the members of the county canvassing board a report of its findings and
recommendations regarding such policies, procedures, and practices. A
review conducted under this chapter shall not include any evaluation,
finding, or recommendation regarding the validity of the outcome of a
primary or election or the validity of any canvass of returns nor does
the election review staff have any jurisdiction to make such an
evaluation, finding, or recommendation under this title.
(3) The county auditor or the county canvassing board shall respond
to the review report in writing, listing the steps that will be taken
to correct any problems listed in the report. The secretary of state
shall visit the county before the next state primary or general
election to verify that the county has taken the steps they listed to
correct the problems noted in the report.
(4) The county auditor of the county in which a review is conducted
under this section or a member of the canvassing board of the county
may appeal the findings or recommendations of the election review staff
regarding the review by filing an appeal with the board created under
RCW 29A.04.510.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.04.611 and 2004 c 271 s 151 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state as chief election officer shall make
reasonable rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW not inconsistent
with the federal and state election laws to effectuate any provision of
this title and to facilitate the execution of its provisions in an
orderly, timely, and uniform manner relating to any federal, state,
county, city, town, and district elections. To that end the secretary
shall assist local election officers by devising uniform forms and
procedures.
In addition to the rule-making authority granted otherwise by this
section, the secretary of state shall make rules governing the
following provisions:
(1) The maintenance of voter registration records;
(2) The preparation, maintenance, distribution, review, and filing
of precinct maps;
(3) Standards for the design, layout, and production of ballots,
including standards that require provisional ballots to be
distinguishable from the other ballots and incapable of being tabulated
by the poll-site ballot counting device;
(4) The examination and testing of voting systems for
certification;
(5) The source and scope of independent evaluations of voting
systems that may be relied upon in certifying voting systems for use in
this state;
(6) Standards and procedures for the acceptance testing of voting
systems by counties;
(7) Standards and procedures for testing the programming of vote
tallying software for specific primaries and elections;
(8) Standards and procedures for the preparation and use of each
type of certified voting system including procedures for the operation
of counting centers where vote tallying systems are used;
(9) Standards and procedures to ensure the accurate tabulation and
canvassing of ballots;
(10) Consistency among the counties of the state in the preparation
of ballots, the operation of vote tallying systems, and the canvassing
of primaries and elections;
(11) Procedures to ensure the secrecy of a voter's ballot when a
small number of ballots are counted at the polls or at a counting
center;
(12) The use of substitute devices or means of voting when a voting
device at the polling place is found to be defective, the counting of
votes cast on the defective device, the counting of votes cast on the
substitute device, and the documentation that must be submitted to the
county auditor regarding such circumstances;
(13) Procedures for the transportation of sealed containers of
voted ballots or sealed voting devices;
(14) The acceptance and filing of documents via electronic
facsimile;
(15) Voter registration applications and records;
(16) The use of voter registration information in the conduct of
elections;
(17) The coordination, delivery, and processing of voter
registration records accepted by driver licensing agents or the
department of licensing;
(18) The coordination, delivery, and processing of voter
registration records accepted by agencies designated by the governor to
provide voter registration services;
(19) Procedures to receive and distribute voter registration
applications by mail;
(20) Procedures for a voter to change his or her voter registration
address within a county by telephone;
(21) Procedures for a voter to change the name under which he or
she is registered to vote;
(22) Procedures for canceling dual voter registration records and
for maintaining records of persons whose voter registrations have been
canceled;
(23) Procedures for the electronic transfer of voter registration
records between county auditors and the office of the secretary of
state;
(24) Procedures and forms for declarations of candidacy;
(25) Procedures and requirements for the acceptance and filing of
declarations of candidacy by electronic means;
(26) Procedures for the circumstance in which two or more
candidates have a name similar in sound or spelling so as to cause
confusion for the voter;
(27) Filing for office;
(28) The order of positions and offices on a ballot;
(29) Sample ballots;
(30) Independent evaluations of voting systems;
(31) The testing, approval, and certification of voting systems;
(32) The testing of vote tallying software programming;
(33) Standards and procedures to prevent fraud and to facilitate
the accurate processing and canvassing of absentee ballots and mail
ballots;
(34) Standards and procedures to guarantee the secrecy of absentee
ballots and mail ballots;
(35) Uniformity among the counties of the state in the conduct of
absentee voting and mail ballot elections;
(36) Standards and procedures to accommodate out-of-state voters,
overseas voters, and service voters;
(37) The tabulation of paper ballots before the close of the polls;
(38) The accessibility of polling places and registration
facilities that are accessible to elderly and disabled persons;
(39) The aggregation of precinct results if reporting the results
of a single precinct could jeopardize the secrecy of a person's ballot;
(40) Procedures for conducting a statutory recount;
(41) Procedures for filling vacancies in congressional offices if
the general statutory time requirements for availability of absentee
ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures cannot be
met;
(42) Procedures for the statistical sampling of signatures for
purposes of verifying and canvassing signatures on initiative,
referendum, and recall election petitions;
(43) Standards and deadlines for submitting material to the office
of the secretary of state for the voters' pamphlet;
(44) Deadlines for the filing of ballot titles for referendum bills
and constitutional amendments if none have been provided by the
legislature;
(45) Procedures for the publication of a state voters' pamphlet;
(46) Procedures for conducting special elections regarding nuclear
waste sites if the general statutory time requirements for availability
of absentee ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures
cannot be met;
(47) Procedures for conducting partisan primary elections;
(48) Standards and procedures for the proper conduct of voting
during the early voting period to provide accessability for the blind
or visually impaired;
(49) Standards for voting technology and systems used by the state
or any political subdivision to be accessible for individuals with
disabilities, including nonvisual accessibility for the blind and
visually impaired, in a manner that provides the same opportunity for
access and participation, including privacy and independence, as other
voters;
(50) All data formats for transferring voter registration data on
electronic or machine-readable media for the purpose of administering
the statewide voter registration list required by the Help America Vote
Act (P.L. 107-252);
(51) Defining the interaction of electronic voter registration
election management systems employed by each county auditor to maintain
a local copy of each county's portion of the official state list of
registered voters;
(52) Provisions and procedures to implement the state-based
administrative complaint procedure as required by the Help America Vote
Act (P.L. 107-252); and
(53) Facilitating the payment of local government grants to local
government election officers or vendors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 29A.36 RCW
to read as follows:
All provisional ballots must be visually distinguishable from the
other ballots and must be either:
(1) Printed on colored paper; or
(2) Imprinted with a bar code for the purpose of identifying the
ballot as a provisional ballot. The bar code must not identify the
voter.
Provisional ballots must be incapable of being tabulated by
poll-site counting devices.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.08.125 and 2003 c 111 s 209 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each county auditor shall maintain a computer file containing
the records of all registered voters within the county. The auditor
may provide for the establishment and maintenance of such files by
private contract or through interlocal agreement as provided by chapter
39.34 RCW. The computer file must include, but not be limited to, each
voter's last name, first name, middle initial, date of birth, residence
address, gender, date of registration, applicable taxing district and
precinct codes, and the last date on which the individual voted.
(2) County election officials shall randomly investigate the record
of all registered voters within the county contained on the official
statewide voter registration list for that county to make corrections
in the record regarding persons who are deceased or whose residence
differs from that on the official statewide voter registration list.
(3) The county auditor shall subsequently record each consecutive
date upon which the individual has voted and retain at least the last
five such consecutive dates. If the voter has not voted at least five
times since establishing his or her current registration record, only
the available dates will be included.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.08.125 and 2004 c 267 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each county auditor shall maintain a computer file containing
a copy of each record of all registered voters within the county
contained on the official statewide voter registration list for that
county.
(2) County election officials shall randomly investigate the record
of all registered voters within the county contained on the official
statewide voter registration list for that county to make corrections
in the record regarding persons who are deceased or whose residence
differs from that on the official statewide voter registration list.
(3) The computer file must include, but not be limited to, each
voter's last name, first name, middle initial, date of birth, residence
address, gender, date of registration, applicable taxing district and
precinct codes, and the last date on which the individual voted.
(4) The county auditor shall subsequently record each consecutive
date upon which the individual has voted and retain all such
consecutive dates.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.08.605 and 2003 c 111 s 236 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the case-by-case maintenance required under RCW
29A.08.620 and 29A.08.630 ((and)), the canceling of registrations under
RCW 29A.08.510, and the random investigation required under RCW
29A.08.125, the county auditor shall establish a general program of
voter registration list maintenance. This program must be a thorough
review that is applied uniformly throughout the county and must be
nondiscriminatory in its application. Any program established must be
completed at least once every two years and not later than ninety days
before the date of a primary or general election for federal office.
The county may fulfill its obligations under this section in one of the
following ways:
(1) The county auditor may enter into one or more contracts with
the United States postal service, or its licensee, which permit the
auditor to use postal service change-of-address information. If the
auditor receives change of address information from the United States
postal service that indicates that a voter has changed his or her
residence address within the county, the auditor shall transfer the
registration of that voter and send a confirmation notice informing the
voter of the transfer to the new address. If the auditor receives
postal change of address information indicating that the voter has
moved out of the county, the auditor shall send a confirmation notice
to the voter and advise the voter of the need to reregister in the new
county. The auditor shall place the voter's registration on inactive
status;
(2) A direct, nonforwardable, nonprofit or first-class mailing to
every registered voter within the county bearing the postal endorsement
"Return Service Requested." If address correction information for a
voter is received by the county auditor after this mailing, the auditor
shall place that voter on inactive status and shall send to the voter
a confirmation notice;
(3) Any other method approved by the secretary of state.

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.08.605 and 2004 c 267 s 128 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the case-by-case maintenance required under RCW
29A.08.620 and 29A.08.630 ((and)), the canceling of registrations under
RCW 29A.08.510, and the random investigation required under RCW
29A.08.125, the secretary of state and the county auditor shall
cooperatively establish a general program of voter registration list
maintenance. This program must be a thorough review that is applied
uniformly throughout the county and must be nondiscriminatory in its
application. Any program established must be completed at least once
every two years and not later than ninety days before the date of a
primary or general election for federal office. This obligation may be
fulfilled in one of the following ways:
(1) The secretary of state may enter into one or more contracts
with the United States postal service, or its licensee, which permit
the use of postal service change-of-address information. If the change
of address information is received from the United States postal
service that indicates that a voter has changed his or her residence
address within the state, the auditor shall transfer the registration
of that voter and send a confirmation notice informing the voter of the
transfer to the new address;
(2) A direct, nonforwardable, nonprofit or first-class mailing to
every registered voter bearing the postal endorsement "Return Service
Requested." If address correction information for a voter is received
by the county auditor after this mailing, the auditor shall place that
voter on inactive status and shall send to the voter a confirmation
notice;
(3) Any other method approved by the secretary of state.

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.08.651 and 2004 c 267 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the secretary of state shall create and maintain
a statewide voter registration data base. This data base must be a
single, uniform, official, centralized, interactive computerized
statewide voter registration list defined, maintained, and administered
at the state level that contains the name and registration information
of every legally registered voter in the state and assigns a unique
identifier to each legally registered voter in the state.
(2) The computerized list must serve as the single system for
storing and maintaining the official list of registered voters
throughout the state.
(3) The computerized list must contain the name and registration
information of every legally registered voter in the state.
(4) Under the computerized list, a unique identifier is assigned to
each legally registered voter in the state.
(5) The computerized list must be coordinated with other agency
data bases within the state, including but not limited to the
department of corrections, the department of licensing, and the
department of health.
(6) Any election officer in the state, including any local election
officer, may obtain immediate electronic access to the information
contained in the computerized list.
(7) All voter registration information obtained by any local
election officer in the state must be electronically entered into the
computerized list on an expedited basis at the time the information is
provided to the local officer.
(8) The chief state election officer shall provide support, as may
be required, so that local election officers are able to enter
information as described in subsection (3) of this section.
(9) The computerized list serves as the official voter registration
list for the conduct of all elections.
(10) The secretary of state has data authority on all voter
registration data.
(11) The voter registration data base must be designed to
accomplish at a minimum, the following:
(a) Comply with the Help America Vote Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-252);
(b) Identify duplicate voter registrations;
(c) Identify suspected duplicate voters;
(d) Screen against the department of corrections data base to aid
in the cancellation of voter registration of felons;
(e) Provide up-to-date signatures of voters for the purposes of
initiative signature checking;
(f) Provide current and accurate voter registration information
using information obtained under RCW 29A.08.125;
(g) Provide for a comparison between the voter registration data
base and the department of licensing change of address data base;
(((g))) (h) Provide online access for county auditors with the goal
of real time duplicate checking and update capabilities; and
(((h))) (i) Provide for the cancellation of voter registration for
persons who have moved to other states and surrendered their Washington
state drivers' licenses.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.24.050 and 2003 c 111 s 605 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except where otherwise provided by this title, declarations of
candidacy for the following offices shall be filed during regular
business hours with the filing officer no earlier than the fourth
Monday in ((July)) June and no later than the following Friday in the
year in which the office is scheduled to be voted upon:
(1) Offices that are scheduled to be voted upon for full terms or
both full terms and short terms at, or in conjunction with, a state
general election; and
(2) Offices where a vacancy, other than a short term, exists that
has not been filled by election and for which an election to fill the
vacancy is required in conjunction with the next state general
election.
This section supersedes all other statutes that provide for a
different filing period for these offices.

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.40.091 and 2004 c 271 s 135 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot, a
security envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger
envelope in which to return the security envelope, and instructions on
how to mark the ballot and how to return it to the county auditor. The
instructions that accompany an absentee ballot for a partisan primary
must include instructions for voting the applicable ballot style, as
provided in chapter 29A.36 RCW. The absentee voter's name and address
must be printed on the larger return envelope, which must also contain
a declaration by the absentee voter reciting his or her qualifications
and stating that he or she has not voted in any other jurisdiction at
this election, together with a summary of the penalties for any
violation of any of the provisions of this chapter. The declaration
must clearly inform the voter that it is illegal to vote if he or she
is not a United States citizen; it is illegal to vote if he or she has
been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her voting rights
restored; and, except as otherwise provided by law, it is illegal to
cast a ballot or sign an absentee envelope on behalf of another voter.
The return envelope must provide space for the voter to indicate the
date on which the ballot was voted and for the voter to sign the oath.
A summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this chapter must be
printed on the return envelope immediately adjacent to the space for
the voter's signature. The signature of the voter on the return
envelope must affirm and attest to the statements regarding the
qualifications of that voter and to the validity of the ballot. The
return envelope must also have a secrecy flap that the voter may seal
that will cover the voter's signature and return address. For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters, the signed
declaration on the return envelope constitutes the equivalent of a
voter registration for the election or primary for which the ballot has
been issued. The voter must be instructed to either return the ballot
to the county auditor by whom it was issued or attach sufficient first
class postage, if applicable, and mail the ballot to the appropriate
county auditor no later than the day of the election or primary for
which the ballot was issued.
If the county auditor chooses to forward absentee ballots, he or
she must include with the ballot a clear explanation of the
qualifications necessary to vote in that election and must also advise
a voter with questions about his or her eligibility to contact the
county auditor. This explanation may be provided on the ballot
envelope, on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on the ballot
itself. If the information is not included, the envelope must clearly
indicate that the ballot is not to be forwarded and that return postage
is guaranteed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 29A.40
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The county auditor shall accept and count absentee ballots for
persons serving in the United States armed forces stationed outside the
United States in accordance with this section and RCW 29A.40.110. For
a member of the armed forces stationed outside the United States who
receives an absentee ballot on or after the date of the election, in
order to have his or her ballot counted, he or she must attach an
affidavit signed by the person and his or her commanding officer,
stating the date on which the ballot was received.
(2) All absentee ballots received from persons under subsection (1)
of this section at any time whether before or after certification of
the election, until any and all recounts have concluded and been
certified, shall be counted.

Sec. 14 RCW 29A.40.110 and 2003 c 111 s 1011 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The opening and subsequent processing of return envelopes for
any primary or election may begin ((on or after the tenth day before
the primary or election)) upon receipt. The tabulation of absentee
ballots must not commence until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of the
primary or election.
(2) All received absentee return envelopes must be placed in secure
locations from the time of delivery to the county auditor until their
subsequent opening. After opening the return envelopes, the county
canvassing board shall place all of the ballots in secure storage until
after 8:00 p.m. of the day of the primary or election. Absentee
ballots that are to be tabulated on an electronic vote tallying system
may be taken from the inner envelopes and all the normal procedural
steps may be performed to prepare these ballots for tabulation.
(3) Before opening a returned absentee ballot, the canvassing
board, or its designated representatives, shall examine the postmark,
statement, and signature on the return envelope that contains the
security envelope and absentee ballot. They shall verify that the
voter's signature on the return envelope is the same as the signature
of that voter in the registration files of the county. For registered
voters casting absentee ballots, the date on the return envelope to
which the voter has attested determines the validity, as to the time of
voting for that absentee ballot if the postmark is missing or is
illegible. For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service
voters stationed in the United States, the date on the return envelope
to which the voter has attested determines the validity as to the time
of voting for that absentee ballot. For service voters stationed
outside the United States, the date on the return envelope to which the
voter has attested determines the validity as to the time of voting for
that absentee ballot unless there is an affidavit included with the
ballot in accordance with section 13 of this act, in which case section
13 of this act determines validity with regard to the time of voting.
For any absentee ballot, a variation between the signature of the voter
on the return envelope and the signature of that voter in the
registration files due to the substitution of initials or the use of
common nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and handwriting
are clearly the same.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 29A.40
RCW to read as follows:
If the canvassing board, or its designated representatives,
determines that the signature on the absentee or provisional ballot
return envelope does not match the signature as it appears on the
voter's original registration record, the county auditor shall notify
the voter no later than three days after discovery of the mismatched
signature by telephone or in writing, that the ballot cannot be
processed because the signature on the return envelope does not match
the signature as it appears on the voter's registration card. The
county auditor shall also send the voter a new voter registration form
and advise the voter that, in order for the ballot to be processed, the
voter must update his or her signature by either filling out a new
registration form and mailing it back to the auditor's office so that
it arrives not later than the day before the certification of the
primary or election; or appearing in person at the auditor's office not
later than the day before certification of the primary or election and
filling out a new registration form.
If the voter neglects to sign the affidavit on the absentee or
provisional return envelope, the auditor shall notify the voter, no
later than three days after discovery of the unsigned envelope either
by telephone or in writing, that the ballot will not be processed
unless the voter appears in person and signs the affidavit on the
return envelope not later than the day before certification of the
primary or election. As an alternative to personal appearance, the
auditor may provide the voter with a copy of the return envelope
affidavit and require the voter to sign the copy of the affidavit and
mail it back to the auditor so that it arrives no later than the day
before certification of the primary or election.
A voter may not cure a missing or mismatched signature for purposes
of counting the ballot in a recount.
A record must be kept of all ballots with mismatched signatures,
and must include the date on which the voter was contacted or the
notice was mailed, as well as the date on which the voter signed the
envelope, a copy of the envelope, or a new registration form. These
records are public records under chapter 42.17 RCW once the election
has been certified by the county canvassing board under RCW 29A.60.190.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 29A.44
RCW to read as follows:
Provisional ballots must be issued, along with a provisional ballot
outer envelope and a security envelope, to voters as appropriate under
RCW 29A.04.008. The provisional ballot outer envelope must include a
place for the voter's name; registered address, both present and former
if applicable; date of birth; reason for the provisional ballot; the
precinct number and the precinct polling location at which the voter
has voted; and a space for the county auditor to list the disposition
of the provisional ballot. The provisional ballot outer envelope must
also contain a declaration as required for absentee ballot outer
envelopes under RCW 29A.40.091; a place for the voter to sign the oath;
and a summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this chapter.
The voter shall vote the provisional ballot in secrecy and, when done,
place the provisional ballot in the security envelope, then place the
security envelope into the outer envelope, and return it to the
precinct election official. The election official shall ensure that
the required information is completed on the outer envelope, have the
voter sign it in the appropriate space, and place the envelope in a
secure container. The official shall then give the voter written
information advising the voter how to ascertain whether the vote was
counted and, if applicable, the reason why the vote was not counted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 29A.44
RCW to read as follows:
Any person desiring to vote at the polls at any primary or election
is required to provide identification to the election officer before
signing the poll book. The identification required in this section can
be satisfied by providing a voter's registration card, or any current
and valid government-issued photo identification, including but not
limited to a driver's license, state identification card, passport,
tribal identification card, or military identification card. Any
individual who desires to vote in person but cannot provide
identification as required in this section shall be issued a
provisional ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 29A.60
RCW to read as follows:
Before certification of the primary or election, the county auditor
must examine and investigate all received provisional ballots to
determine whether the ballot can be counted. The auditor shall provide
the disposition of the provisional ballot and, if the ballot was not
counted, the reason why it was not counted, on a free access system
such as a toll-free telephone number, web site, mail, or other means.
A provisional ballot cannot be further investigated if the voter did
not sign the provisional ballot envelope or if the signature on the
envelope does not match the signature as it appears on the voter's
registration card until the voter signs or updates his or her signature
affidavit. The auditor must notify the voter in accordance with
section 15 of this act when the envelope is unsigned or when the
signatures do not match.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 29A.60
RCW to read as follows:
If inspection of the ballot reveals a physically damaged ballot or
ballot that may be otherwise unreadable or uncountable by the
tabulating system, the county auditor may refer the ballot to the
county canvassing board or duplicate the ballot if so authorized by the
county canvassing board. A ballot may be duplicated only if the intent
of the voter's marks on the ballot is clear and the electronic voting
equipment might not otherwise properly tally the ballot to reflect the
intent of the voter. Ballots must be duplicated by teams of two or
more people working together. When duplicating ballots, the county
auditor shall take the following steps to create and maintain an audit
trail of the action taken:
(1) Each original ballot and duplicate ballot must be assigned the
same unique control number, with the number being marked upon the face
of each ballot, to ensure that each duplicate ballot may be tied back
to the original ballot;
(2) A log must be kept of the ballots duplicated, which must at
least include:
(a) The control number of each original ballot and the
corresponding duplicate ballot;
(b) The initials of at least two people who participated in the
duplication of each ballot; and
(c) The total number of ballots duplicated.
Original and duplicate ballots must be sealed in secure storage at
all times, except during duplication, inspection by the canvassing
board, or tabulation.

Sec. 20 RCW 29A.60.021 and 2004 c 271 s 147 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For any office at any election or primary, any voter may write
in on the ballot the name of any person for an office who has filed as
a write-in candidate for the office in the manner provided by RCW
29A.24.311 and such vote shall be counted the same as if the name had
been printed on the ballot and marked by the voter. ((For a partisan
primary in a jurisdiction using the physically separate ballot format,
a voter may write in on a party ballot only the names of write-in
candidates who affiliate with that major political party.)) No write-in vote made for any person who has not filed a declaration of
candidacy pursuant to RCW 29A.24.311 is valid if that person filed for
the same office, either as a regular candidate or a write-in candidate,
at the preceding primary. Any abbreviation used to designate
office((,)) or position((, or political party shall)) will be accepted
if the canvassing board can determine, to ((their)) its satisfaction,
the voter's intent.
(2) The number of write-in votes cast for each office must be
recorded and reported with the canvass for the election.
(3) A write-in vote for an individual candidate for an office whose
name appears on the ballot for that same office is a valid vote for
that candidate as long as the candidate's name is clearly discernible,
even if other requirements of RCW 29A.24.311 are not satisfied and even
if the voter also marked a vote for that candidate such as to register
an over vote. These votes need not be tabulated unless: (a) The
difference between the number of votes cast for the candidate
apparently qualified to appear on the general election ballot or
elected and the candidate receiving the next highest number of votes is
less than the sum of the total number of write-in votes cast for the
office plus the over votes and under votes recorded by the vote
tabulating system; or (b) a manual recount is conducted for that
office.
(4) Write-in votes cast for an individual candidate for an office
whose name does not appear on the ballot need not be tallied ((if))
unless the total number of write-in votes and under votes recorded by
the vote tabulation system for the office is ((not)) greater than the
number of votes cast for the candidate apparently ((nominated))
qualified to appear on the general election ballot or elected((, and
the write-in votes could not have altered the outcome of the primary or
election. In the case of write-in votes for statewide office or for
any office whose jurisdiction encompasses more than one county, write-in votes for an individual candidate must be tallied whenever the
county auditor is notified by either the office of the secretary of
state or another auditor in a multicounty jurisdiction that it appears
that the write-in votes could alter the outcome of the primary or
election)).
(((4))) (5) In the case of write-in votes for a statewide
office((s)) or any office whose jurisdiction((s that)) encompasses more
than one county, ((if the total number of write-in votes and under
votes recorded by the vote tabulation system for an office within a
county is greater than the number of votes cast for a candidate
apparently nominated or elected in a primary or election, the auditor
shall tally all write-in votes for individual candidates for that
office and notify the office of the secretary of state and the auditors
of the other counties within the jurisdiction, that the write-in votes
for individual candidates should be tallied)) write-in votes for an
individual candidate must be tallied when the county auditor is
notified by either the secretary of state or another county auditor in
the multicounty jurisdiction that it appears that the write-in votes
must be tabulated under the terms of this section. In all other cases,
the county auditor determines when write-in votes must be tabulated.
Any abstract of votes must be modified to reflect the tabulation and
certified by the canvassing board. Tabulation of write-in votes may be
performed simultaneously with a recount.

Sec. 21 RCW 29A.60.050 and 2003 c 111 s 1505 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the precinct election officers or the counting center
personnel have a question about the validity of a ballot or the votes
for an office or issue that they are unable to resolve, they shall
prepare and sign a concise record of the facts in question or dispute.
These ballots shall be delivered to the canvassing board for
processing. A ballot is not considered rejected until the canvassing
board has rejected the ballot individually, or the ballot was included
in a batch or on a report of ballots that was rejected in its entirety
by the canvassing board. All ballots shall be preserved in the same
manner as valid ballots for that primary or election.

Sec. 22 RCW 29A.60.070 and 2003 c 111 s 1507 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor shall produce cumulative and precinct returns
for each primary and election and deliver them to the canvassing board
for verification and certification. The precinct and cumulative
returns of any primary or election are public records under chapter
42.17 RCW.
Cumulative returns for state offices, judicial offices, the United
States senate, and congress must be electronically transmitted to the
secretary of state immediately.

Sec. 23 RCW 29A.60.180 and 2003 c 111 s 1518 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each registered voter casting an absentee ballot will be credited
with voting on his or her voter registration record only if the ballot
was counted. Absentee ballots must be retained for the same length of
time and in the same manner as ballots cast at the precinct polling
places.

Sec. 24 RCW 29A.60.190 and 2004 c 266 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On the tenth day after a special election or primary and on the
((fifteenth)) twentieth day after a general election, the county
canvassing board shall complete the canvass and certify the results.
The secretary of state may adopt rules to provide that Thanksgiving
day, and the day after Thanksgiving day, are not counted in
establishing the twenty-day certification deadline. Each absentee
ballot that was returned before the closing of the polls on the date of
the primary or election for which it was issued, and each absentee
ballot with a postmark on or before the date of the primary or election
for which it was issued and received on or before the date on which the
primary or election is certified, must be included in the canvass
report.
(2) At the request of a caucus of the state legislature, the county
auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state and
legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house of representatives.

Sec. 25 RCW 29A.60.210 and 2003 c 111 s 1521 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the canvassing board finds during the initial counting
process, or during any subsequent recount thereof, that there is an
apparent discrepancy or an inconsistency in the returns of a primary or
election, or that election staff has made an error regarding the
treatment or disposition of a ballot, the board may recanvass the
ballots or voting devices in any precincts of the county. The
canvassing board shall conduct any necessary recanvass activity on or
before the last day to certify or recertify the results of the primary
((or)), election, or subsequent recount and correct any error and
document the correction of any error that it finds.

Sec. 26 RCW 29A.60.250 and 2003 c 111 s 1525 are each amended to
read as follows:
As soon as the returns have been received from all the counties of
the state, but not later than the thirtieth day after the election, the
secretary of state shall ((make a)) canvass ((of such of the returns as
are not required to be canvassed by the legislature and make out a
statement thereof, file it in his or her office, and transmit a
certified copy to the governor)) and certify the returns of the general
election as to candidates for state offices, the United States senate,
congress, and all other candidates whose districts extend beyond the
limits of a single county. The secretary of state shall transmit a
copy of the certification to the governor, president of the senate, and
speaker of the house of representatives.

Sec. 27 RCW 29A.64.021 and 2004 c 271 s 178 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the official canvass of all of the returns for any office at
any primary or election reveals that the difference in the number of
votes cast for a candidate apparently nominated or elected to any
office and the number of votes cast for the closest apparently defeated
opponent is less than two thousand votes and also less than one-half of
one percent of the total number of votes cast for both candidates, the
county canvassing board shall conduct a recount of all votes cast on
that position.
(a) Whenever such a difference occurs in the number of votes cast
for candidates for a position the declaration of candidacy for which
was filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall,
within three business days of the day that the returns of the primary
or election are first certified by the canvassing boards of those
counties, direct those boards to recount all votes cast on the
position.
(b)(i) For statewide elections, if the difference in the number of
votes cast for the apparent winner and the closest apparently defeated
opponent is less than one ((hundred fifty)) thousand votes and also
less than one-fourth of one percent of the total number of votes cast
for both candidates, the votes shall be recounted manually or as
provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(ii) For elections not included in (b)(i) of this subsection, if
the difference in the number of votes cast for the apparent winner and
the closest apparently defeated opponent is less than one hundred fifty
votes and also less than one-fourth of one percent of the total number
of votes cast for both candidates, the votes shall be recounted
manually or as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) A mandatory recount shall be conducted in the manner provided
by RCW 29A.64.030, 29A.64.041, and 29A.64.061. No cost of a mandatory
recount may be charged to any candidate.
(3) The apparent winner and closest apparently defeated opponent
for an office for which a manual recount is required under subsection
(1)(b) of this section may select an alternative method of conducting
the recount. To select such an alternative, the two candidates shall
agree to the alternative in a signed, written statement filed with the
election official for the office. The recount shall be conducted using
the alternative method if: It is suited to the balloting system that
was used for casting the votes for the office; it involves the use of
a vote tallying system that is approved for use in this state by the
secretary of state; and the vote tallying system is readily available
in each county required to conduct the recount. If more than one
balloting system was used in casting votes for the office, an
alternative to a manual recount may be selected for each system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 A new section is added to chapter 29A.60
RCW to read as follows:
No later than thirty days after final certification, the county
auditor shall prepare and make publicly available at the auditor's
office or on the auditor's web site, an election reconciliation report
that discloses, at a minimum, the following information: The number of
ballots counted; the number of voters credited with voting; the number
of provisional ballots issued; the number of provisional ballots
counted; the number of provisional ballots rejected; the number of
absentee ballots issued; the number of absentee ballots counted; the
number of absentee ballots rejected; the number of federal write-in
ballots counted; the number of ballots sent to overseas voters and the
number of such ballots that were counted; and any other information the
auditor determines to be necessary to the process of reconciling the
number of votes counted with the number of voters credited with voting.

Sec. 29 RCW 29A.64.030 and 2003 c 111 s 1603 are each amended to
read as follows:
An application for a recount shall state the office for which a
recount is requested and whether the request is for all or only a
portion of the votes cast in that jurisdiction of that office. The
person filing an application for a manual recount shall, at the same
time, deposit with the county canvassing board or secretary of state,
in cash or by certified check, a sum equal to twenty-five cents for
each ballot cast in the jurisdiction or portion of the jurisdiction for
which the recount is requested as security for the payment of any costs
of conducting the recount. If the application is for a machine
recount, the deposit must be equal to fifteen cents for each ballot.
These charges shall be determined by the county canvassing board or
boards under RCW ((29A.64.080)) 29A.64.081.
The county canvassing board shall determine ((a)) the date, time,
and ((a)) place or places at which the recount will be conducted.
((This time shall be less than three business days after the day upon
which: The application was filed with the board; the request for a
recount or directive ordering a recount was received by the board from
the secretary of state; or the returns are certified which indicate
that a recount is required under RCW 29A.64.020 for an issue or office
voted upon only within the county.)) Not less than two days before the
date of the recount, the county auditor shall mail a notice of the time
and place of the recount to the applicant or affected parties and, if
the recount involves an office, to any person for whom votes were cast
for that office. The county auditor shall also notify the affected
parties by either telephone, fax, e-mail, or other electronic means at
the time of mailing. At least three attempts must be made over a two-day period to notify the affected parties or until the affected parties
have received the notification. Each attempt to notify affected
parties must request a return response indicating that the notice has
been received. Each person entitled to receive notice of the recount
may attend, witness the recount, and be accompanied by counsel.
Proceedings of the canvassing board are public under chapter 42.30
RCW. Subject to reasonable and equitable guidelines adopted by the
canvassing board, all interested persons may attend and witness a
recount.

Sec. 30 RCW 29A.64.061 and 2004 c 271 s 180 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon completion of the canvass of a recount, the canvassing board
shall prepare and certify an amended abstract showing the votes cast in
each precinct for which the recount was conducted. Copies of the
amended abstracts must be transmitted to the same officers who received
the abstract on which the recount was based.
If the nomination, election, or issue for which the recount was
conducted was submitted only to the voters of a county, the canvassing
board shall file the amended abstract with the original results of that
election or primary.
If the nomination, election, or issue for which a recount was
conducted was submitted to the voters of more than one county, the
secretary of state shall canvass the amended abstracts and shall file
an amended abstract with the original results of that election. The
secretary of state may require that the amended abstracts be certified
by each canvassing board on a uniform date. An amended abstract
certified under this section supersedes any prior abstract of the
results for the same offices or issues at the same primary or election.

Sec. 31 RCW 29A.68.011 and 2004 c 271 s 182 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, or
judge of the superior court in the proper county shall, by order,
require any person charged with error, wrongful act, or neglect to
forthwith correct the error, desist from the wrongful act, or perform
the duty and to do as the court orders or to show cause forthwith why
the error should not be corrected, the wrongful act desisted from, or
the duty or order not performed, whenever it is made to appear to such
justice or judge by affidavit of an elector that:
(1) An error or omission has occurred or is about to occur in
printing the name of any candidate on official ballots; or
(2) An error other than as provided in subsections (1) and (3) of
this section has been committed or is about to be committed in printing
the ballots; or
(3) The name of any person has been or is about to be wrongfully
placed upon the ballots; or
(4) A wrongful act other than as provided for in subsections (1)
and (3) of this section has been performed or is about to be performed
by any election officer; or
(5) Any neglect of duty on the part of an election officer other
than as provided for in subsections (1) and (3) of this section has
occurred or is about to occur; or
(6) An error or omission has occurred or is about to occur in the
issuance of a certificate of election.
An affidavit of an elector under subsections (1) and (3) ((above))
of this section when relating to a primary election must be filed with
the appropriate court no later than the second Friday following the
closing of the filing period for nominations for such office and shall
be heard and finally disposed of by the court not later than five days
after the filing thereof. An affidavit of an elector under subsections
(1) and (3) of this section when relating to a general election must be
filed with the appropriate court no later than three days following the
official certification of the primary election returns and shall be
heard and finally disposed of by the court not later than five days
after the filing thereof. An affidavit of an elector under subsection
(6) of this section shall be filed with the appropriate court no later
than ten days following the ((issuance of a certificate of election))
official certification of the election as provided in RCW 29A.60.190,
29A.60.240, or 29A.60.250 or, in the case of a recount, ten days after
the official certification of the amended abstract as provided in RCW
29A.64.061.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 A new section is added to chapter 29A.84
RCW to read as follows:
A person who knowingly destroys, alters, defaces, conceals, or
discards a completed voter registration form or signed absentee or
provisional ballot signature affidavit is guilty of a class C felony
punishable under RCW 9A.20.021. This section does not apply to (1) the
voter who completed the voter registration form, or (2) a county
auditor or registration assistant who acts as authorized by voter
registration law.

Sec. 33 RCW 29A.84.650 and 2003 c 111 s 2131 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person who intentionally or knowingly votes or attempts to
vote more than once ((at any)) in this state in the same primary or
general or special election, or who is registered to vote in another
state and who votes or attempts to vote in this state, is guilty of a
((gross misdemeanor)) class C felony, punishable ((to the same extent
as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable)) under RCW 9A.20.021.
(2) Any person who recklessly or negligently violates this section
has committed a class 1 civil infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120.
The county prosecuting attorney is authorized to enforce this
subsection.

Sec. 34 RCW 46.20.155 and 2004 c 249 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before issuing an original license or identicard or renewing a
license or identicard under this chapter, the licensing agent shall
determine if the applicant wants to register to vote or transfer his or
her voter registration by asking the following question:

"Do you want to register to vote or transfer your voter
registration?"

If the applicant chooses to register or transfer a registration,
the agent shall ((state)) ask and confirm the following:

(("I would like to remind you that you must be a United States
citizen and at least eighteen years of age in order to vote."))

(a) "Are you a United States citizen?"
(b) "Are you at least eighteen years of age?"

If the applicant answers in the affirmative to both questions, the
agent shall then provide the applicant with a voter registration form
and instructions and shall record that the applicant has requested to
register to vote or transfer a voter registration.
If the applicant answers in the negative to either question, the
agent shall not provide the applicant with a voter registration form
and instructions.
(2) The department shall establish a procedure that substantially
meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section when
permitting an applicant to renew a license or identicard by mail or by
electronic commerce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 Sections 6 and 8 of this act expire January
1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 Sections 7, 9, and 10 of this act take
effect January 1, 2006.

--- END ---