BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.40.060 and 1997 c 338 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All actions under this chapter shall be commenced and tried in
the county where any element of the offense was committed except as
otherwise specially provided by statute. In cases in which diversion
is provided by statute, venue is in the county in which the juvenile
resides or in the county in which any element of the offense was
committed.
(2) If the court orders a transfer of a case, the case and copies
of all legal and social documents pertaining thereto may in the
discretion of the court be transferred to the county in which the
juvenile resides, without regard to whether or not his or her custodial
parent resides there, for supervision and enforcement of the
disposition order. If any restitution is yet to be determined, the
originating court shall transfer the case to the new county with the
exception of the restitution. Authority shall be retained by the
originating court for purposes of establishing a restitution order.
Once restitution is determined, the originating county shall then
transfer restitution to the new county. The court of the receiving
county ((has jurisdiction to)) may modify and enforce the disposition
order, including restitution. The clerk of the originating county
shall maintain the account receivable in the judicial information
system and all payments shall be made to the clerk of the originating
county. Any collection of the offender legal financial obligation
shall be managed by the juvenile probation department of the new county
while the offender is under juvenile probation supervision, or by the
clerk of the original county at the conclusion of supervision by
juvenile probation. The probation department of the new county shall
notify the clerk of the originating county when they end supervision of
the offender. In cases where a civil judgment has already been
established, the case may not be transferred to another county.
(3) The court upon motion of any party or upon its own motion may,
at any time, transfer a proceeding to another juvenile court when there
is reason to believe that an impartial proceeding cannot be held in the
county in which the proceeding was begun.

--- END ---