BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.44.120 and 2003 c 53 s 278 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, corporation or the
state of Washington, its political subdivisions or municipal
corporations to require, directly or indirectly, that any employee or
prospective employee take or be subjected to any lie detector or
similar tests as a condition of employment or continued employment:
PROVIDED, That this section shall not apply to persons making initial
application for employment with any law enforcement agency or with the
juvenile court services agency of any county: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
this section shall not apply to either the initial application for
employment or continued employment of persons who manufacture,
distribute, or dispense controlled substances as defined in chapter
69.50 RCW, or to persons in sensitive positions directly involving
national security.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the use
of psychological tests as defined in RCW 18.83.010.
(3) Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(4) As used in this section, "person" includes any individual,
firm, corporation, or agency or political subdivision of the state.
(5) Nothing in this section may be construed as limiting any
statutory or common law rights of any person illegally denied
employment or continued employment under this section for purposes of
any civil action or injunctive relief.

--- END ---