BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The western portion of Washington state is characterized by
high annual rainfall, including locally exceptional precipitation
causing high flood peaks;
(b) Such events can cause enormous property damage and devastating
personal injury, and can also present high costs to the state for
emergency services, disaster assistance, and the repair and replacement
of roads, bridges, utilities, and other public works;
(c) Many urban land uses decrease the ability of upstream lands to
store storm waters, thus increasing runoff and making densely populated
urban areas particularly susceptible to flooding; and
(d) Many storm water control facilities have been placed in natural
watercourses that are used for storm water conveyance. If such systems
are not properly designed and maintained, and if storm water planning
and control is not adequate, the capacity of the watercourse may be
exceeded, contributing to the magnitude of flood events and attendant
downstream damages.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to:
(a) Encourage storm water management and flood prevention; and
(b) Establish a minimum standard of care for the design,
development and maintenance of adequate storm water control facilities
in natural watercourses within urban growth areas of high population
density.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies only to cities situated within counties
described in RCW 36.70A.215(7).
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Natural watercourse" means a channel with a defined bed and
banks or a depression or swale that in its natural condition acts to
drain water flowing perennially or intermittently.
(b) "Storm water control facility" means any facility, improvement,
development, property, or interest therein, that is made, constructed,
or acquired, for the purpose of controlling, or protecting life or
property from, any storm, waste, flood, or surplus waters.
(3) Within urban growth areas designated under RCW 36.70A.110, and
where drainage to a natural watercourse has been increased
significantly beyond the capacity of the watercourse in its natural
condition:
(a) A city must make diligent efforts to develop, maintain, and
enhance the capacity of storm water control facilities to protect life
and property from flooding and attendant damages; and
(b) A city is liable in an action for damages to a person whose
property is damaged by flooding if the damages would have been avoided
by the city's exercise of reasonable care in developing, maintaining,
and enhancing the capacity of storm water control facilities.

--- END ---