BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that public
buildings can be built and renovated using high-performance methods
that save money, improve school performance, and make workers more
productive. High-performance public buildings are proven to increase
student test scores, reduce worker absenteeism, and cut energy and
utility costs.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that state-owned buildings
and schools be improved by adopting recognized standards for high-performance public buildings and allowing flexible methods and choices
in how to achieve those standards. The legislature also intends that
public agencies and public school districts shall document costs and
savings to monitor this program and ensure that economic, community,
and environmental goals are achieved each year, and that an independent
performance review be conducted to evaluate this program and determine
the extent to which the results intended by this chapter are being met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of general administration.
(2) "High-performance public buildings" means high-performance
public buildings designed, constructed, and certified to a standard as
identified in this chapter.
(3) "Institutions of higher education" means the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
the community colleges, and the technical colleges.
(4) "LEED silver standard" means the United States green building
council leadership in energy and environmental design green building
rating standard, referred to as silver standard.
(5) "Major capital construction project" means a new construction
project or major renovation project over five million dollars as
defined in RCW 43.88.110.
(6)(a) "Major facility project" means: (i) A construction project
that does not meet the definition of a major capital construction
project and that is larger than twenty-five thousand gross square feet
of occupied or conditioned space as defined in the Washington state
energy code; or (ii) a building renovation project that does not meet
the definition of a major capital construction project when the cost is
greater than fifty percent of the assessed value and the project is
larger than twenty-five thousand gross square feet of occupied or
conditioned space as defined in the Washington state energy code.
(b) "Major facility project" does not include: (i) Projects for
which the department, public school district, the office of financial
management, or other applicable agency and the design team determine
the LEED silver standard or the Washington sustainable school design
protocol to be not practicable; or (ii) transmitter buildings, pumping
stations, hospitals, research facilities primarily used for sponsored
laboratory experimentation, laboratory research, or laboratory training
in research methods, or other similar building types as determined by
the department or the office of financial management. When the LEED
silver standard is determined to be not practicable for a project, then
it must be determined if any LEED standard is practicable for the
project. If LEED standards or the Washington sustainable school design
protocol are not followed for the project, the public school district
or public agency shall report these reasons to the department.
(7) "Public agency" means every state office, officer, board,
commission, committee, bureau, department, and public higher education
institution.
(8) "Public school district" means a school district eligible to
receive state basic education moneys pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250 and
28A.150.260.
(9) "Washington sustainable school design protocol" means the
school design protocol and related information developed by the state
board of education and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, in conjunction with school districts and the school
facilities advisory board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All major capital construction projects
and all major facility projects of public agencies receiving any
funding in a state capital budget, or projects financed through a
financing contract as defined in RCW 39.94.020, must be designed,
constructed, and certified to at least the LEED silver standard. This
subsection applies to major facility projects that have not entered the
design phase prior to the effective date of this section and to the
extent appropriate LEED silver standards exist for that type of
building or facility.
(2) All major facility projects of any entity other than a public
agency or public school district receiving any funding in a state
capital budget must be designed, constructed, and certified to at least
the LEED silver standard. This subsection applies to major facility
projects that have not entered the grant application process prior to
the effective date of this section and to the extent appropriate LEED
silver standards exist for that type of building or facility.
(3)(a) Public agencies, under this section, shall monitor and
document ongoing operating savings resulting from major facility
projects designed, constructed, and certified as required under this
section.
(b) Public agencies, under this section, shall report annually to
the department on major facility projects and operating savings.
(4) The department shall consolidate the reports required in
subsection (3) of this section into one report and report to the
governor and legislature by September 1st of each even-numbered year
beginning in 2006 and ending in 2016. In its report, the department
shall also report on the implementation of this chapter, including
reasons why the LEED standard was not used as required by section
2(6)(b) of this act. The department shall make recommendations
regarding the ongoing implementation of this chapter, including a
discussion of incentives and disincentives related to implementing this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) All major facility projects of public
school districts receiving any funding in a state capital budget must
be designed and constructed to at least the LEED silver standard or the
Washington sustainable school design protocol. To the extent
appropriate LEED silver or Washington sustainable school design
protocol standards exist for the type of building or facility, this
subsection applies to major facility projects that have not received
project approval from the superintendent of public instruction prior
to: (a) July 1, 2006, for volunteering school districts; (b) July 1,
2007, for class one school districts; and (c) July 1, 2008, for class
two school districts.
(2) Public school districts under this section shall: (a) Monitor
and document appropriate operating benefits and savings resulting from
major facility projects designed and constructed as required under this
section for a minimum of five years following local board acceptance of
a project receiving state funding; and (b) report annually to the
superintendent of public instruction. The form and content of each
report must be mutually developed by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction in consultation with school districts.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall consolidate the
reports required in subsection (2) of this section into one report and
report to the governor and legislature by September 1st of each even-numbered year beginning in 2006 and ending in 2016. In its report, the
superintendent of public instruction shall also report on the
implementation of this chapter, including reasons why the LEED standard
or Washington sustainable school design protocol was not used as
required by section 2(6)(b) of this act. The superintendent of public
instruction shall make recommendations regarding the ongoing
implementation of this chapter, including a discussion of incentives
and disincentives related to implementing this chapter.
(4) The state board of education, in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction, shall develop and issue
guidelines for administering this chapter for public school districts.
The purpose of the guidelines is to define a procedure and method for
employing and verifying compliance with the LEED silver standard or the
Washington sustainable school design protocol.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall utilize the
school facilities advisory board as a high-performance buildings
advisory committee comprised of affected public schools, the state
board of education, the superintendent of public instruction, the
department, and others at the superintendent of public instruction's
discretion to provide advice on implementing this chapter. Among other
duties, the advisory committee shall make recommendations regarding an
education and training process and an ongoing evaluation or feedback
process to help the superintendent of public instruction and the state
board of education implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 On or before January 1, 2009, the department
and the superintendent of public instruction shall summarize the
reports submitted under sections 3(4) and 4(3) of this act and submit
the individual reports to the legislative committees on capital budget
and ways and means for review of the program's performance and
consideration of any changes that may be needed to adapt the program to
any new or modified standards for high-performance buildings that meet
the intent of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1)(a) The department, in consultation with
affected public agencies and the office of financial management, shall
develop and issue guidelines for administering this chapter for public
agencies. The purpose of the guidelines is to define a procedure and
method for employing and verifying activities necessary for
certification to at least the LEED silver standard for major facility
projects.
(b) The department and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall amend their fee schedules for architectural and
engineering services to accommodate the requirements in the design of
major facility projects under this chapter.
(c) The department and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall procure architecture and engineering services
consistent with chapter 39.80 RCW.
(d) Major capital construction projects and all major facility
projects designed to meet standards identified in this chapter must
include building commissioning as a critical cost-saving part of the
construction process. This process includes input from the project
design and construction teams and the project ownership
representatives.
(e) As provided in the request for proposals for construction
services, the operating agency shall hold a preproposal conference for
prospective bidders to discuss compliance with and achievement of
standards identified in this chapter for prospective respondents.
(2) The department shall create a high-performance buildings
advisory committee comprised of representatives from the design and
construction industry involved in public works contracting, personnel
from the affected public agencies responsible for overseeing public
works projects, the state board of education, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, and others at the department's
discretion to provide advice on implementing this chapter. Among other
duties, the advisory committee shall make recommendations regarding an
education and training process and an ongoing evaluation or feedback
process to help the department implement this chapter.
(3) The department and the state board of education shall adopt
rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In adopting implementation rules, the state board of education,
in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and the
department of general administration, shall review and modify the
current requirement for an energy conservation report review by the
department of general administration as provided in WAC 180-27-075.
(2) In adopting implementation rules, the state board of education,
in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Review and modify the current requirements for value
engineering, constructability review, and building commissioning as
provided in WAC 180-27-080;
(b) Review private and public utility providers' capacity and
financial/technical assistance programs for affected public school
districts to monitor and report utility consumption for purposes of
reporting to the superintendent of public instruction as provided in
section 4 of this act;
(c) Coordinate with the department of general administration, the
state board of health, the department of ecology, federal agencies, and
other affected agencies as appropriate in their consideration of rules
to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
Institutions of higher education must comply with high-performance
public building requirements under sections 1 through 3 and 6 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
Public school districts must comply with high-performance public
building requirements under sections 1, 2, 4, 6, and 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A member of the design or construction
teams may not be held liable for the failure of a major facility
project to meet the LEED silver standard or other LEED standard
established for the project as long as a good faith attempt was made to
achieve the LEED standard set for the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of determining compliance with chapter 39.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 6, 10, and 12 through 14 of this act), the
department of general administration shall credit the project for using
wood products with a credible third party sustainable forest
certification or from forests regulated under chapter 76.09 RCW, the
Washington forest practices act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Except as provided in this section,
affordable housing projects funded out of the state capital budget are
exempt from the provisions of this chapter. On or before July 1, 2008,
the department of community, trade, and economic development shall
identify, implement, and apply a sustainable building program for
affordable housing projects that receive housing trust fund (under
chapter 43.185 RCW) funding in a state capital budget. The department
of community, trade, and economic development shall not develop its own
sustainable building standard, but shall work with stakeholders to
adopt an existing sustainable building standard or criteria appropriate
for affordable housing. Any application of the program to affordable
housing, including any monitoring to track the performance of either
sustainable features or energy standards or both, is the responsibility
of the department of community, trade, and economic development.
Beginning in 2009 and ending in 2016, the department of community,
trade, and economic development shall report to the department as
required under section 3(3)(b) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 It is the intent and an established goal of
the LEED program as authored by the United States green building
council to increase demand for building materials and products that are
extracted and manufactured locally, thereby reducing the environmental
impacts and to support the local economy. Therefore, it is the intent
of the legislature to emphasize this defined goal and establish a
priority to use Washington state based resources, building materials,
products, industries, manufacturers, and other businesses to provide
economic development to Washington state and to meet the objectives of
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The joint legislative audit and review
committee, or its successor legislative agency, shall conduct a
performance review of the high-performance buildings program
established under this chapter.
(1) The performance audit shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) The identification of the costs of implementation of high-performance building standards in the design and construction of major
facility projects subject to this chapter;
(b) The identification of operating savings attributable to the
implementation of high-performance building standards, including but
not limited to savings in energy, utility, and maintenance costs;
(c) The identification of any impacts of high-performance buildings
standards on worker productivity and student performance; and
(d) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the high-performance
building standards established under this chapter, and recommendations
for any changes in those standards that may be supported by the
committee's findings.
(2) The committee shall make a preliminary report of its findings
and recommendations on or before December 1, 2010, and a final report
on or before July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 6, 10, and 12 through 14
of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

--- END ---