BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.80.070 and 2002 c 354 s 308 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A bargaining unit of employees covered by this chapter existing
on June 13, 2002, shall be considered an appropriate unit, unless the
unit does not meet the requirements of (a) and (b) of this subsection.
The commission, after hearing upon reasonable notice to all interested
parties, shall decide, in each application for certification as an
exclusive bargaining representative, the unit appropriate for
certification. In determining the new units or modifications of
existing units, the commission shall consider: The duties, skills, and
working conditions of the employees; the history of collective
bargaining; the extent of organization among the employees; the desires
of the employees; and the avoidance of excessive fragmentation.
However, a unit is not appropriate if it includes:
(a) Both supervisors and nonsupervisory employees. A unit that
includes only supervisors may be considered appropriate if a majority
of the supervisory employees indicates by vote that they desire to be
included in such a unit; or
(b) More than one institution of higher education. For the
purposes of this section, any branch or regional campus of an
institution of higher education is part of that institution of higher
education.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section, at
an institution of higher education, members of supervisory classes may
be combined in the same bargaining unit, regardless of whether the
individual members of the bargaining unit may be actually serving as a
supervisor at any given point in time, subject to established community
of interest standards as applied by the public employment relations
commission, and upon the condition that no member of the bargaining
unit supervises another member of the unit. The consolidation of
employees as authorized by this subsection will be performed by the
public employment relations commission under established unit
determination procedures. For the purposes of this subsection, a
supervisory class is one in which employees holding the classification
may be assigned as a supervisor at the employer's discretion without a
classification change.
(3) The exclusive bargaining representatives certified to represent
the bargaining units existing on June 13, 2002, shall continue as the
exclusive bargaining representative without the necessity of an
election.
(((3))) (4) If a single employee organization is the exclusive
bargaining representative for two or more units, upon petition by the
employee organization, the units may be consolidated into a single
larger unit if the commission considers the larger unit to be
appropriate. If consolidation is appropriate, the commission shall
certify the employee organization as the exclusive bargaining
representative of the new unit.

--- END ---