BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.210 and 2003 c 39 s 2 and 2003 c 16 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) ((or (4)))
through (5) of this section, any public or private landowners or others
in lawful possession and control of any lands whether designated
resource, rural, or urban, or water areas or channels and lands
adjacent to such areas or channels, who allow members of the public to
use them for the purposes of outdoor recreation, which term includes,
but is not limited to, the cutting, gathering, and removing of firewood
by private persons for their personal use without purchasing the
firewood from the landowner, hunting, fishing, camping, picnicking,
swimming, hiking, bicycling, skateboarding or other nonmotorized wheel-based activities, hanggliding, paragliding, rock climbing, the riding
of horses or other animals, clam digging, pleasure driving of off-road
vehicles, snowmobiles, and other vehicles, boating, nature study,
winter or water sports, viewing or enjoying historical, archaeological,
scenic, or scientific sites, without charging a fee of any kind
therefor, shall not be liable for unintentional injuries to such users.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) ((or (4)))
through (5) of this section, any public or private landowner or others
in lawful possession and control of any lands whether rural or urban,
or water areas or channels and lands adjacent to such areas or
channels, who offer or allow such land to be used for purposes of a
fish or wildlife cooperative project, or allow access to such land for
cleanup of litter or other solid waste, shall not be liable for
unintentional injuries to any volunteer group or to any other users.
(3) Any public or private landowner, or others in lawful possession
and control of the land, may charge an administrative fee of up to
twenty-five dollars for the cutting, gathering, and removing of
firewood from the land.
(4) A public or private nonprofit owner or operator of a skate park
may charge a nominal fee of no more than five dollars per day for the
use of a skate park where the fees are devoted solely to providing
supervision of the use and maintenance of the skate park facility. For
purposes of this section, "skate park" means an indoor or outdoor ramp,
course, or area specifically designated for the exclusive recreational
or sporting use of skateboards, bicycles, scooters, or roller skates.
(5) Nothing in this section shall prevent the liability of a
landowner or others in lawful possession and control for injuries
sustained to users by reason of a known dangerous artificial latent
condition for which warning signs have not been conspicuously posted.
A fixed anchor used in rock climbing and put in place by someone other
than a landowner is not a known dangerous artificial latent condition
and a landowner under subsection (1) of this section shall not be
liable for unintentional injuries resulting from the condition or use
of such an anchor. Nothing in RCW 4.24.200 and ((4.24.210)) this
section limits or expands in any way the doctrine of attractive
nuisance. Usage by members of the public, volunteer groups, or other
users is permissive and does not support any claim of adverse
possession.
(((5))) (6) For purposes of this section, a license or permit
issued for statewide use under authority of chapter 79A.05 RCW or Title
77 RCW is not a fee.

--- END ---