BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the
interest of the state to restructure the roles and responsibilities of
the state's transportation agencies in order to improve efficiency and
accountability. The legislature also finds that continued citizen
oversight of the state's transportation system remains an important
priority. To achieve these purposes, the legislature intends to
provide direct accountability of the department of transportation to
the governor, in his or her role as chief executive officer of state
government, by making the secretary of transportation a cabinet-level
official. Additionally, it is essential to clearly delineate between
the separate and distinct roles and responsibilities of the
transportation commission and the department of transportation.
Finally, consolidating the research and audit functions of the state's
transportation agencies under a single citizen-governed entity, the
transportation commission, will better serve the state.

Departmental Governance
Sec. 2 RCW 43.17.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the
director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the
director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the
secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the
director of general administration, (9) the director of community,
trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans affairs,
(11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems,
(13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14) the secretary of
health, and (15) the director of financial institutions.
Such officers, except the ((secretary of transportation and the))
director of fish and wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with
the consent of the senate, and hold office at the pleasure of the
governor. ((The secretary of transportation shall be appointed by the
transportation commission as prescribed by RCW 47.01.041.)) The
director of fish and wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and
wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.01.041 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 53 s 28 are each
amended to read as follows:
The executive head of the department of transportation shall be the
secretary of transportation, who shall be appointed by the
((transportation commission)) governor with the consent of the senate,
and shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance
with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040. The secretary shall be an ex
officio member of the transportation commission without a vote. ((The
secretary shall be the chief executive officer of the commission and be
responsible to it, and shall be guided by policies established by it.))
The secretary shall serve ((until removed by the commission, but only
for incapacity, incompetence, neglect of duty, malfeasance in office,
or failure to carry out the commission's policies. Before a motion for
dismissal shall be acted on by the commission, the secretary shall be
granted a hearing on formal written charges before the full commission.
An action by the commission to remove the secretary shall be final)) at
the pleasure of the governor.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.01.061 and 1987 c 364 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall meet at such times as it deems advisable
but at least once every month. It may adopt its own rules and
regulations and may establish its own procedure. It shall act
collectively in harmony with recorded resolutions or motions adopted by
majority vote of at least four members. The commission may appoint an
administrative secretary, and shall elect one of its members chairman
for a term of one year. The chairman shall be able to vote on all
matters before the commission. The commission may from time to time
retain planners, consultants, and other technical personnel to advise
it in the performance of its duties.
(2) The commission shall submit to each regular session of the
legislature held in an odd-numbered year its own budget proposal
necessary for the commission's operations separate from that proposed
for the department.
(3) Each member of the commission shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall be reimbursed for actual
necessary traveling and other expenses in going to, attending, and
returning from meetings of the commission, and actual and necessary
traveling and other expenses incurred in the discharge of such duties
as may be requested by a majority vote of the commission or by the
secretary of transportation, but in no event shall a commissioner be
compensated in any year for more than one hundred twenty days, except
the chairman of the commission who may be paid compensation for not
more than one hundred fifty days. Service on the commission shall not
be considered as service credit for the purposes of any public
retirement system.
(4) Each member of the commission shall disclose any actual or
potential conflict of interest, if applicable under the circumstance,
regarding any commission business.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.01.071 and 1981 c 59 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The transportation commission shall have the following functions,
powers, and duties:
(1) To propose policies to be adopted by the governor and the
legislature designed to assure the development and maintenance of a
comprehensive and balanced statewide transportation system which will
meet the needs of the people of this state for safe and efficient
transportation services. Wherever appropriate the policies shall
provide for the use of integrated, intermodal transportation systems to
implement the social, economic, and environmental policies, goals, and
objectives of the people of the state, and especially to conserve
nonrenewable natural resources including land and energy. To this end
the commission shall:
(a) Develop transportation policies which are based on the
policies, goals, and objectives expressed and inherent in existing
state laws;
(b) Inventory the adopted policies, goals, and objectives of the
local and area-wide governmental bodies of the state and define the
role of the state, regional, and local governments in determining
transportation policies, in transportation planning, and in
implementing the state transportation plan;
(c) Propose a transportation policy for the state((, and after
notice and public hearings, submit the proposal to the legislative
transportation committee and the senate and house transportation
committees by January 1, 1978, for consideration in the next
legislative session));
(d) Establish a procedure for review and revision of the state
transportation policy and for submission of proposed changes to the
governor and the legislature;
(e) To integrate the statewide transportation plan with the needs
of the elderly and handicapped, and to coordinate federal and state
programs directed at assisting local governments to answer such needs;
(2) ((To establish the policy of the department to be followed by
the secretary on each of the following items:
(a))) To provide for the effective coordination of state
transportation planning with national transportation policy, state and
local land use policies, and local and regional transportation plans
and programs;
(((b))) (3) In conjunction with the provisions under section 6 of
this act, to provide for public involvement in transportation designed
to elicit the public's views both with respect to adequate
transportation services and appropriate means of minimizing adverse
social, economic, environmental, and energy impact of transportation
programs;
(((c) To provide for the administration of grants in aid and other
financial assistance to counties and municipal corporations for
transportation purposes;
(d) To provide for the management, sale, and lease of property or
property rights owned by the department which are not required for
transportation purposes;
(3))) (4) To ((direct the secretary to)) prepare ((and submit to
the commission)) a comprehensive and balanced statewide transportation
plan which shall be based on the transportation policy adopted by the
governor and the legislature and applicable state and federal laws.
((After public notice and hearings, the commission shall adopt the plan
and submit it to the legislative transportation committee and to the
house and senate standing committees on transportation before January
1, 1980, for consideration in the 1980 regular legislative session.))
The plan shall be reviewed and revised, and submitted to the governor
and the house of representatives and senate standing committees on
transportation, prior to each regular session of the legislature during
an even-numbered year thereafter. ((A preliminary plan shall be
submitted to such committees by January 1, 1979.))
The plan shall take into account federal law and regulations
relating to the planning, construction, and operation of transportation
facilities;
(((4))) (5) To propose to the governor and the legislature prior to
the convening of each regular session held in an odd-numbered year a
recommended budget for the operations of the commission as required by
RCW 47.01.061;
(((5) To approve and propose to the governor and to the legislature
prior to the convening of each regular session during an odd-numbered
year a recommended budget for the operation of the department and for
carrying out the program of the department for the ensuing biennium.
The proposed budget shall separately state the appropriations to be
made from the motor vehicle fund for highway purposes in accordance
with constitutional limitations and appropriations and expenditures to
be made from the general fund, or accounts thereof, and other available
sources for other operations and programs of the department;
(6) To review and authorize all departmental requests for
legislation;
(7))) (6) To approve the issuance and sale of all bonds authorized
by the legislature for capital construction of state highways, toll
facilities, Columbia Basin county roads (for which reimbursement to the
motor vehicle fund has been provided), urban arterial projects, and
aviation facilities;
(((8))) (7) To adopt such rules, regulations, and policy directives
as may be necessary to carry out reasonably and properly those
functions expressly vested in the commission by statute;
(((9) To delegate any of its powers to the secretary of
transportation whenever it deems it desirable for the efficient
administration of the department and consistent with the purposes of
this title;
(10))) (8) To contract with the office of financial management or
other appropriate state agencies for administrative support, accounting
services, computer services, and other support services necessary to
carry out its other statutory duties;
(9) To exercise such other specific powers and duties as may be
vested in the transportation commission by this or any other provision
of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The transportation commission shall provide a forum for the
development of transportation policy in Washington state. It may
recommend to the secretary of transportation, the governor, and the
legislature means for obtaining appropriate citizen and professional
involvement in all transportation policy formulation and other matters
related to the powers and duties of the department. It may further
hold hearings and explore ways to improve the mobility of the
citizenry. At least every five years, the commission shall convene
regional forums to gather citizen input on transportation issues.
(2) Every two years, in coordination with the development of the
state biennial budget, the commission shall prepare the statewide
multimodal transportation progress report that outlines the
transportation priorities of the ensuing biennium. The report must:
(a) Consider the citizen input gathered at the forums;
(b) Be developed with the assistance of state transportation-related agencies and organizations;
(c) Be developed with the input from state, local, and regional
jurisdictions, transportation service providers, and key transportation
stakeholders;
(d) Be considered by the secretary of transportation and other
state transportation-related agencies in preparing proposed agency
budgets and executive request legislation;
(e) Be submitted by the commission to the governor by October 1st
of each even-numbered year for consideration by the governor.
(3) In fulfilling its responsibilities under this section, the
commission may create ad hoc committees or other such committees of
limited duration as necessary.
(4) In order to promote a better transportation system, the
commission shall offer policy guidance and make recommendations to the
governor and the legislature in key issue areas, including but not
limited to:
(a) Transportation finance;
(b) Preserving, maintaining, and operating the statewide
transportation system;
(c) Transportation infrastructure needs;
(d) Promoting best practices for adoption and use by
transportation-related agencies and programs;
(e) Transportation efficiencies that will improve service delivery
and/or coordination;
(f) Improved planning and coordination among transportation
agencies and providers; and
(g) Use of intelligent transportation systems and other
technology-based solutions.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.01.101 and 1987 c 505 s 48 and 1987 c 179 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The secretary shall have the authority and it shall be his or her
duty((, subject to policy guidance from the commission)):
(1) To serve as chief executive officer of the department with full
administrative authority to direct all its activities;
(2) To organize the department as he or she may deem necessary to
carry out the work and responsibilities of the department effectively;
(3) To designate and establish such transportation district or
branch offices as may be necessary or convenient, and to appoint
assistants and delegate any powers, duties, and functions to them or
any officer or employee of the department as deemed necessary to
administer the department efficiently;
(4) To direct and coordinate the programs of the various divisions
of the department to assure that they achieve the greatest possible
mutual benefit, produce a balanced overall effort, and eliminate
unnecessary duplication of activity;
(5) To adopt all department rules that are subject to the adoption
procedures contained in the state administrative procedure act, except
rules subject to adoption by the commission pursuant to statute;
(6) To maintain and safeguard the official records of the
department, including the commission's recorded resolutions and orders;
(7) To provide, under contract or interagency agreement, full staff
support to the commission to assist it in carrying out its functions,
powers, and duties ((and to execute the policy established by the
commission pursuant to its legislative authority));
(8) To execute and implement the biennial operating budget for the
operation of the department in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW and
with legislative appropriation ((and, in such manner as prescribed
therein, to make and report to the commission and the chairs of the
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives,
including one copy to the staff of each of the committees, deviations
from the planned biennial category A and H highway construction
programs necessary to adjust to unexpected delays or other
unanticipated circumstances.));
(9) To advise the governor and the legislature with respect to
matters under the jurisdiction of the department; and
(10) To exercise all other powers and perform all other duties as
are now or hereafter provided by law.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.05.021 and 2002 c 56 s 301 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((transportation commission is hereby directed to))
department shall conduct periodic analyses of the entire state highway
system, report ((thereon)) to the commission and the chairs of the
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives,
((including one copy to the staff of each of the committees, biennially
and based thereon,)) any subsequent recommendations to subdivide,
classify, and subclassify ((according to their function and
importance)) all designated state highways ((and those added from time
to time and periodically review and revise the classifications)) into
the following three functional classes:
(a) The "principal arterial system" shall consist of a connected
network of rural arterial routes with appropriate extensions into and
through urban areas, including all routes designated as part of the
interstate system, which serve corridor movements having travel
characteristics indicative of substantial statewide and interstate
travel;
(b) The "minor arterial system" shall, in conjunction with the
principal arterial system, form a rural network of arterial routes
linking cities and other activity centers which generate long distance
travel, and, with appropriate extensions into and through urban areas,
form an integrated network providing interstate and interregional
service; and
(c) The "collector system" shall consist of routes which primarily
serve the more important intercounty, intracounty, and intraurban
travel corridors, collect traffic from the system of local access roads
and convey it to the arterial system, and on which, regardless of
traffic volume, the predominant travel distances are shorter than on
arterial routes.
(2) ((In making the functional classification)) The transportation
commission shall adopt ((and)) a functional classification of highways.
The commission shall consider the recommendations of the department and
testimony from the public and local municipalities. The commission
shall give consideration to criteria consistent with this section and
federal regulations relating to the functional classification of
highways, including but not limited to the following:
(a) Urban population centers within and without the state
stratified and ranked according to size;
(b) Important traffic generating economic activities, including but
not limited to recreation, agriculture, government, business, and
industry;
(c) Feasibility of the route, including availability of alternate
routes within and without the state;
(d) Directness of travel and distance between points of economic
importance;
(e) Length of trips;
(f) Character and volume of traffic;
(g) Preferential consideration for multiple service which shall
include public transportation;
(h) Reasonable spacing depending upon population density; and
(i) System continuity.
(3) The transportation commission or the legislature shall
designate state highways of statewide significance under RCW 47.06.140.
If the commission designates a state highway of statewide significance,
it shall submit a list of such facilities for adoption by the
legislature. This statewide system shall include at a minimum
interstate highways and other statewide principal arterials that are
needed to connect major communities across the state and support the
state's economy.
(4) The transportation commission shall designate a freight and
goods transportation system. This statewide system shall include state
highways, county roads, and city streets. The commission, in
cooperation with cities and counties, shall review and make
recommendations to the legislature regarding policies governing weight
restrictions and road closures which affect the transportation of
freight and goods.

Sec. 9 RCW 47.05.030 and 2002 c 5 s 402 are each amended to read
as follows:
The transportation commission shall adopt a comprehensive ((six-year)) ten-year investment program specifying program objectives and
performance measures for the preservation and improvement programs
defined in this section. In the specification of investment program
objectives and performance measures, the transportation commission, in
consultation with the Washington state department of transportation,
shall define and adopt standards for effective programming and
prioritization practices including a needs analysis process. The
analysis process must ensure the identification of problems and
deficiencies, the evaluation of alternative solutions and trade-offs,
and estimations of the costs and benefits of prospective projects. The
investment program must be revised ((biennially, effective on July 1st
of odd-numbered years)) based on directions by the office of financial
management. The investment program must be based upon the needs
identified in the state-owned highway component of the statewide
transportation plan as defined in RCW 47.01.071(3).
(1) The preservation program consists of those investments
necessary to preserve the existing state highway system and to restore
existing safety features, giving consideration to lowest life cycle
costing. The preservation program must require use of the most cost-effective pavement surfaces, considering:
(a) Life-cycle cost analysis;
(b) Traffic volume;
(c) Subgrade soil conditions;
(d) Environmental and weather conditions;
(e) Materials available; and
(f) Construction factors.
The comprehensive ((six-year)) ten-year investment program for
preservation must identify projects for two years and an investment
plan for the remaining ((four)) eight years.
(2) The improvement program consists of investments needed to
address identified deficiencies on the state highway system to increase
mobility, address congestion, and improve safety, support for the
economy, and protection of the environment. The ((six-year)) ten-year
investment program for improvements must identify projects for two
years and major deficiencies proposed to be addressed in the ((six-year)) ten-year period giving consideration to relative benefits and
life cycle costing. The transportation commission shall give higher
priority for correcting identified deficiencies on those facilities
classified as facilities of statewide significance as defined in RCW
47.06.140. Project prioritization must be based primarily upon cost-benefit analysis, where appropriate.
The transportation commission shall approve and present the
comprehensive ((six-year)) ten-year investment program to the governor
and the legislature ((in support of the biennial budget request under
RCW 44.40.070 and 44.40.080)) as directed by the office of financial
management.

Sec. 10 RCW 47.05.035 and 2002 c 5 s 403 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department ((and the commission)) shall use the
transportation demand modeling tools developed under subsection (2) of
this section to evaluate investments based on the best mode or
improvement, or mix of modes and improvements, to meet current and
future long-term demand within a corridor or system for the lowest
cost. The end result of these demand modeling tools is to provide a
cost-benefit analysis by which the department ((and the commission))
can determine the relative mobility improvement and congestion relief
each mode or improvement under consideration will provide and the
relative investment each mode or improvement under consideration will
need to achieve that relief.
(2) The department will participate in the refinement, enhancement,
and application of existing transportation demand modeling tools to be
used to evaluate investments. This participation and use of
transportation demand modeling tools will be phased in.
(3) In developing program objectives and performance measures, the
((transportation commission)) department shall evaluate investment
trade-offs between the preservation and improvement programs. In
making these investment trade-offs, the ((commission)) department shall
evaluate, using cost-benefit techniques, roadway and bridge maintenance
activities as compared to roadway and bridge preservation program
activities and adjust those programs accordingly.
(4) The ((commission)) department shall allocate the estimated
revenue between preservation and improvement programs giving primary
consideration to the following factors:
(a) The relative needs in each of the programs and the system
performance levels that can be achieved by meeting these needs;
(b) The need to provide adequate funding for preservation to
protect the state's investment in its existing highway system;
(c) The continuity of future transportation development with those
improvements previously programmed; and
(d) The availability of dedicated funds for a specific type of
work.
(5) The commission shall review the results of the department's
findings and shall consider those findings in the development of the
ten-year program.

Sec. 11 RCW 47.05.051 and 2002 c 189 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The comprehensive ((six-year)) ten-year investment program
shall be based upon the needs identified in the state-owned highway
component of the statewide multimodal transportation plan as defined in
RCW 47.01.071(3) and priority selection systems that incorporate the
following criteria:
(a) Priority programming for the preservation program shall take
into account the following, not necessarily in order of importance:
(i) Extending the service life of the existing highway system,
including using the most cost-effective pavement surfaces, considering:
(A) Life-cycle cost analysis;
(B) Traffic volume;
(C) Subgrade soil conditions;
(D) Environmental and weather conditions;
(E) Materials available; and
(F) Construction factors;
(ii) Ensuring the structural ability to carry loads imposed upon
highways and bridges; and
(iii) Minimizing life cycle costs. The transportation commission
in carrying out the provisions of this section may delegate to the
department of transportation the authority to select preservation
projects to be included in the ((six-year)) ten-year program.
(b) Priority programming for the improvement program must be based
primarily upon the following, not necessarily in order of importance:
(i) Traffic congestion, delay, and accidents;
(ii) Location within a heavily traveled transportation corridor;
(iii) Except for projects in cities having a population of less
than five thousand persons, synchronization with other potential
transportation projects, including transit and multimodal projects,
within the heavily traveled corridor; and
(iv) Use of benefit/cost analysis wherever feasible to determine
the value of the proposed project.
(c) Priority programming for the improvement program may also take
into account:
(i) Support for the state's economy, including job creation and job
preservation;
(ii) The cost-effective movement of people and goods;
(iii) Accident and accident risk reduction;
(iv) Protection of the state's natural environment;
(v) Continuity and systematic development of the highway
transportation network;
(vi) Consistency with local comprehensive plans developed under
chapter 36.70A RCW including the following if they have been included
in the comprehensive plan:
(A) Support for development in and revitalization of existing
downtowns;
(B) Extent that development implements local comprehensive plans
for rural and urban residential and nonresidential densities;
(C) Extent of compact, transit-oriented development for rural and
urban residential and nonresidential densities;
(D) Opportunities for multimodal transportation; and
(E) Extent to which the project accommodates planned growth and
economic development;
(vii) Consistency with regional transportation plans developed
under chapter 47.80 RCW;
(viii) Public views concerning proposed improvements;
(ix) The conservation of energy resources;
(x) Feasibility of financing the full proposed improvement;
(xi) Commitments established in previous legislative sessions;
(xii) Relative costs and benefits of candidate programs.
(d) Major projects addressing capacity deficiencies which
prioritize allowing for preliminary engineering shall be reprioritized
during the succeeding biennium, based upon updated project data.
Reprioritized projects may be delayed or canceled by the transportation
commission if higher priority projects are awaiting funding.
(e) Major project approvals which significantly increase a
project's scope or cost from original prioritization estimates shall
include a review of the project's estimated revised priority rank and
the level of funding provided. Projects may be delayed or canceled by
the transportation commission if higher priority projects are awaiting
funding.
(2) The commission may depart from the priority programming
established under subsection (1) of this section: (a) To the extent
that otherwise funds cannot be utilized feasibly within the program;
(b) as may be required by a court judgment, legally binding agreement,
or state and federal laws and regulations; (c) as may be required to
coordinate with federal, local, or other state agency construction
projects; (d) to take advantage of some substantial financial benefit
that may be available; (e) for continuity of route development; or (f)
because of changed financial or physical conditions of an unforeseen or
emergent nature. The commission or secretary of transportation shall
maintain in its files information sufficient to show the extent to
which the commission has departed from the established priority.
(3) The commission shall identify those projects that yield freight
mobility benefits or that alleviate the impacts of freight mobility
upon affected communities.

Transportation Policy Institute
NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The transportation policy institute is established within the
transportation commission. The institute shall conduct research,
prepare studies, and periodically submit recommendations to the
legislature, governor, and transportation commission regarding
transportation policy issues of statewide significance.
To this end, the purposes of the institute include:
(a) To conduct research on transportation policy and programs for
the governor, the legislature, the transportation commission, and the
transportation performance audit board;
(b) To educate and promote the dissemination of transportation
research to the public, and to state and local government policymakers
including legislators and associated staff; and
(c) To serve as a repository of federal, state, local, and private
transportation research on financing and programming.
(2) The institute is governed by a board of directors composed of
(a) the chairs and ranking minority members of the transportation
committees of the legislature, or their designees, (b) the chair and
vicechair of the transportation commission, and (c) the secretary of
transportation. The executive director of the Washington state
transportation center shall serve on the board as an ex officio
nonvoting member. The staff coordinators of the transportation
committees of the house and senate shall serve on the board as ex
officio nonvoting members. The board of directors shall establish the
research priorities of the institute. The board shall meet
periodically and may schedule regular meetings during the legislative
interim. The board may adopt rules and procedures necessary for its
orderly operation. To the extent funds are appropriated, the
transportation commission shall provide staff support to the institute,
and the transportation commission administrator shall also serve as
administrator for the institute. The administrator, subject to the
approval of the commission, may contract with and consult with private
independent professional and technical experts to conduct studies
directed by the institute.
(3) The institute may establish working groups to conduct specific
research in order to report back to the institute regarding
recommendations as appropriate. The institute may appoint to a working
group any member of the transportation committees of the legislature,
or any nonlegislators, as deemed appropriate.
(4) Legislative members of the institute and its working groups
will receive allowances while attending meetings of the institute,
including working group meetings, and while engaged in other authorized
business of the institute, as provided in RCW 44.04.120.
Nonlegislative members of the institute and its working groups will
receive allowances as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Transportation Performance Audits
Sec. 13 RCW 44.75.020 and 2003 c 362 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Economy and efficiency audit" has the meaning contained in
chapter 44.28 RCW.
(2) (("Joint legislative audit and review committee" means the
agency created in chapter 44.28 RCW, or its statutory successor.
(3))) "Legislative auditor" has the meaning contained in chapter
44.28 RCW.
(((4) "Legislative transportation committee" means the agency
created in chapter 44.40 RCW, or its statutory successor.
(5))) (3) "Performance audit" has the meaning contained in chapter
44.28 RCW.
(((6))) (4) "Performance review" means an outside evaluation of how
a state agency uses its performance measures to assess the outcomes of
its legislatively authorized activities.
(((7))) (5) "Program audit" has the meaning contained in chapter
44.28 RCW.
(((8))) (6) "Transportation performance audit board" or "board"
means the board created in RCW 44.75.030.
(((9))) (7) "Transportation-related agencies" or "agency" means any
state or local agency, board, special purpose district, or commission
that receives or generates funding primarily for transportation-related
purposes. At a minimum, the department of transportation, the
Washington state patrol, the department of licensing, the
transportation improvement board or its successor entity, the county
road administration board or its successor entity, and the traffic
safety commission are considered transportation-related agencies.
Counties, cities, and port districts are not transportation-related
agencies under this subsection.

Sec. 14 RCW 44.75.030 and 2003 c 362 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The transportation performance audit board is created.
(2) The board will consist of four legislative members, five
citizen members with transportation-related expertise, one member of
the transportation commission, one ex officio nonvoting member, and one
at large member with no specific transportation-related expertise but
who has private sector experience with performance measures or
performance audits. The legislative auditor is the ex officio
nonvoting member. The majority and minority leaders of the house and
senate transportation committees, or their designees, are the
legislative members. The governor shall appoint the at large member to
serve for a term of four years. The citizen members must be
((nominated by professional associations chosen by the board's
legislative members and)) appointed by the governor for terms of four
years, except that at least half the initial appointments will be for
terms of two years. The citizen members may not be currently, or
within one year, employed by the Washington state department of
transportation. The ((citizen members will consist of)) governor, when
appointing the citizen members, may consult with appropriate
professional associations and shall consider the following
transportation-related experiences:
(a) ((One member with expertise in)) Construction project planning,
including permitting and assuring regulatory compliance;
(b) ((One member with expertise in)) Construction means and methods
and construction management, crafting and implementing environmental
mitigation plans, and administration;
(c) ((One member with expertise in)) Construction engineering
services, including construction management, materials testing,
materials documentation, contractor payments, inspection, surveying,
and project oversight;
(d) ((One member with expertise in)) Project management, including
design estimating, contract packaging, and procurement; and
(e) ((One member with expertise in)) Transportation planning and
congestion management.
(3) The governor may not remove members from the board before the
expiration of their terms unless for cause based upon a determination
of incapacity, incompetence, neglect of duty, of malfeasance in office
by the Thurston county superior court, upon petition and show cause
proceedings brought for that purpose in that court and directed to the
board member in question.
(4) No member may be appointed for more than three consecutive
terms.

Sec. 15 RCW 44.75.040 and 2003 c 362 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall meet periodically. It may adopt its own rules
and may establish its own procedures. It shall act collectively in
harmony with recorded resolutions or motions adopted by a majority vote
of the members.
(2) Each member of the transportation performance audit board will
be compensated from the general appropriation for the ((legislative))
transportation ((committee)) commission in accordance with RCW
43.03.250 and reimbursed for actual necessary traveling and other
expenses in going to, attending, and returning from meetings of the
board or that are incurred in the discharge of duties requested by the
chair. However, in no event may a board member be compensated in any
year for more than one hundred twenty days, except the chair may be
compensated for not more than one hundred fifty days. Service on the
board does not qualify as a service credit for the purposes of a public
retirement system.
(3) The transportation performance audit board shall keep proper
records and is subject to audit by the state auditor or other auditing
entities.
(4) Staff support to the transportation performance audit board
must be provided by the ((legislative)) transportation ((committee))
commission, which shall provide professional support for the duties,
functions, responsibilities, and activities of the board, including but
not limited to information technology systems; data collection,
processing, analysis, and reporting; project management; and office
space, equipment, and secretarial support. ((The legislative
evaluation and accountability program will provide data and information
technology support consistent with the support currently supplied to
existing legislative committees.)) Additionally, the commission shall
designate, subject to board approval, a staff person to serve as the
board administrator. The board administrator serves as an exempt
employee and at the pleasure of the board.
(5) Each member of the transportation performance audit board shall
disclose any actual or potential conflict of interest, if applicable
under the circumstance, regarding all performance reviews and
performance audits conducted under this chapter.

Sec. 16 RCW 44.75.050 and 2003 c 362 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The transportation performance audit board may review the
performance and outcome measures of transportation-related agencies.
The purpose of these reviews is to ensure that the legislature has the
means to adequately and accurately assess the performance and outcomes
of those agencies and departments. Where two or more agencies have
shared responsibility for functions or priorities of government, these
reviews can also determine whether effective interagency cooperation
and collaboration occurs in areas such as program coordination,
administrative structures, information systems, and administration of
grants and loans.
(2) The board shall, as soon as practicable, conduct a review of
the comprehensive ten-year investment program process, including the
required criteria, under RCW 47.05.030 and 47.05.051.
(3) In conducting these reviews, the transportation performance
audit board may work in consultation with the ((legislative
transportation committee, the)) joint legislative audit and review
committee, the office of financial management, and other state
agencies.

Sec. 17 RCW 44.75.080 and 2003 c 362 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
After reviewing the performance or outcome measures and benchmarks
of an agency or department, or at any time it so determines, the
transportation performance audit board shall ((recommend to the
executive committee of the legislative transportation committee
whether)) direct a full performance or functional audit of the agency
or department, or a specific program within the agency or department((,
is appropriate. Upon the request of the legislative transportation
committee or its executive committee, the joint legislative audit and
review committee shall add the full performance or functional audit to
its biennial performance audit work plan. If the request duplicates or
overlaps audits already in the work plan, or was performed under the
previous biennial work plan, the executive committees of the
legislative transportation committee and the joint legislative audit
and review committee shall meet to discuss and resolve the duplication
or overlap)).

Sec. 18 RCW 44.75.090 and 2003 c 362 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) To the greatest extent possible, ((or when requested by the
executive committee of the legislative transportation committee)) and
to the extent funds are appropriated, the ((legislative auditor)) board
administrator shall, subject to board approval, contract with and
consult with private independent professional and technical experts to
optimize the independence of the reviews and performance audits. In
determining the need to contract with private experts, the
((legislative auditor)) board administrator shall consider the degree
of difficulty of the review or audit, the relative cost of contracting
for expertise, and the need to maintain auditor independence from the
subject agency or program. The board administrator may, subject to
board approval, contract with the legislative auditor to serve as the
contract manager of the reviews and performance audits.
(((2) After consultation with the executive committee of the
legislative transportation committee on the appropriateness of costs,
the legislative transportation committee shall reimburse the joint
legislative audit and review committee or the legislative auditor for
the costs of carrying out any requested performance audits, including
the cost of contracts and consultant services.
(3) The executive committee of the legislative transportation
committee must review and approve the methodology for performance
audits recommended by the transportation performance audit board.))

Sec. 19 RCW 44.75.100 and 2003 c 362 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before releasing the results of a performance audit originally
directed by the transportation performance audit board to the
legislature or the public, the board administrator shall submit the
preliminary performance audit report to the transportation performance
audit board for review and comments solely on the management of the
audit. Any comments by the transportation performance audit board must
be included as a separate addendum to the final performance audit
report. However, the board administrator is not required to submit the
preliminary performance audit report if the legislative auditor submits
it under RCW 44.28.088.
(2) Completed performance audits must be presented to the
transportation performance audit board ((and the legislative
transportation committee)). Published performance audits must be made
available to the public through the ((legislative transportation
committee and the joint legislative audit and review committee's))
board's web site and through customary public communications. Final
reports must also be transmitted to the affected agency, the director
of financial management, and the appropriate policy and fiscal standing
committees of the legislature.

Sec. 20 RCW 44.75.110 and 2003 c 362 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((legislative auditor)) board administrator, or the legislative
auditor if contracted under RCW 44.75.090, shall determine in writing
the scope of any performance audit ((requested)) directed by the
((legislative transportation committee or its executive committee))
transportation performance audit board, subject to the review and
approval of the final scope of the audit by the transportation
performance audit board((, and the legislative transportation committee
or its executive committee)). In doing so, the ((legislative
auditor,)) board administrator, or legislative auditor if contracted
under RCW 44.75.090, and the transportation performance audit board((,
and the legislative transportation committee or its executive
committee)) shall consider inclusion of the following elements in the
scope of the audit:
(1) Identification of potential cost savings in the agency, its
programs, and its services;
(2) Identification and recognition of best practices;
(3) Identification of funding to the agency, to programs, and to
services that can be eliminated or reduced;
(4) Identification of programs and services that can be eliminated,
reduced, or transferred to the private sector;
(5) Analysis of gaps and overlaps in programs and services and
recommendations for improving, dropping, blending, or separating
functions to correct gaps or overlaps;
(6) Analysis and recommendations for pooling information technology
systems;
(7) Analysis of the roles and functions of the agency, its
programs, and its services and their compliance with statutory
authority and recommendations for eliminating or changing those roles
and functions and ensuring compliance with statutory authority;
(8) Recommendations for eliminating or changing statutes, rules,
and policy directives as may be necessary to ensure that the agency
carry out reasonably and properly those functions expressly vested in
the department by statute; and
(9) Verification of the reliability and validity of department
performance data, self-assessments, and performance measurement systems
as required under RCW 43.88.090.

Sec. 21 RCW 44.75.120 and 2003 c 362 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
When conducting a full performance audit of an agency or
department, or a specific program within an agency or department, or
multiple agencies, in accordance with RCW 44.75.110, the ((legislative
auditor)) board administrator shall solicit input from appropriate
industry representatives or experts. The audit report must make
recommendations regarding the continuation, abolition, consolidation,
or reorganization of each affected agency, department, or program. The
audit report must identify opportunities to develop government
partnerships, and eliminate program redundancies that will result in
increased quality, effectiveness, and efficiency of state agencies.

Sec. 22 RCW 44.28.161 and 2003 c 362 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other audits developed or included in the audit
work plan under this chapter, the legislative auditor shall manage
transportation-related performance audits ((directed by the executive
committee of the legislative transportation committee under RCW
44.75.080. If directed to perform or contract for audit services under
RCW 44.75.080, the legislative auditor or joint legislative audit and
review committee will receive from the legislative transportation
committee an interagency reimbursement equal to the cost of the
contract or audit services)) if contracted to do so under RCW
44.75.090.

Transfer
NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 (1)(a) All reports, documents, surveys,
books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of
the legislative transportation committee shall be delivered to the
custody of the transportation commission for the exclusive support of
the transportation policy institute. All cabinets, furniture, office
equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the
legislative transportation committee shall be made available to the
transportation commission for the exclusive support of the
transportation policy institute. All funds, credits, or other assets
held by the legislative transportation committee shall be assigned to
the transportation commission for the exclusive support of the
transportation policy institute.
(b) Any appropriations made to the legislative transportation
committee shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred
and credited to the transportation commission for the exclusive support
of the transportation policy institute.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(2) All employees of the legislative transportation committee are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the transportation commission for
the exclusive support of the transportation policy institute. However,
the commission may, if staffing needs warrant, assign the employees to
other commission functions.
(3) All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full
force and shall be performed by the transportation commission.
(4) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

References to LTC
Sec. 101 RCW 35.58.2796 and 1989 c 396 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of transportation shall develop an annual report
summarizing the status of public transportation systems in the state.
By September 1st of each year, copies of the report shall be submitted
to the ((legislative transportation committee)) transportation
committees of the legislature and to each municipality, as defined in
RCW 35.58.272, and to individual members of the municipality's
legislative authority. ((The department shall prepare and submit a
preliminary report by December 1, 1989.))
To assist the department with preparation of the report, each
municipality shall file a system report by April 1st of each year with
the state department of transportation identifying its public
transportation services for the previous calendar year and its
objectives for improving the efficiency and effectiveness of those
services. The system report shall address those items required for
each public transportation system in the department's report.
The department report shall describe individual public
transportation systems, including contracted transportation services
and dial-a-ride services, and include a statewide summary of public
transportation issues and data. The descriptions shall include the
following elements and such other elements as the department deems
appropriate after consultation with the municipalities and the
((legislative transportation committee)) transportation committees of
the legislature:
(1) Equipment and facilities, including vehicle replacement
standards;
(2) Services and service standards;
(3) Revenues, expenses, and ending balances, by fund source;
(4) Policy issues and system improvement objectives, including
community participation in development of those objectives and how
those objectives address statewide transportation priorities;
(5) Operating indicators applied to public transportation services,
revenues, and expenses. Operating indicators shall include operating
cost per passenger trip, operating cost per revenue vehicle service
hour, passenger trips per revenue service hour, passenger trips per
vehicle service mile, vehicle service hours per employee, and farebox
revenue as a percent of operating costs.

Sec. 102 RCW 36.78.070 and 1999 c 269 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county road administration board shall:
(1) Establish by rule, standards of good practice for the
administration of county roads and the efficient movement of people and
goods over county roads;
(2) Establish reporting requirements for counties with respect to
the standards of good practice adopted by the board;
(3) Receive and review reports from counties and reports from its
executive director to determine compliance with legislative directives
and the standards of good practice adopted by the board;
(4) Advise counties on issues relating to county roads and the safe
and efficient movement of people and goods over county roads and assist
counties in developing uniform and efficient transportation-related
information technology resources;
(5) Report annually before the fifteenth day of January, and
throughout the year as appropriate, to the state department of
transportation and to the chairs of the ((legislative transportation
committee and the)) house and senate transportation committees, and to
other entities as appropriate on the status of county road
administration in each county, including one copy to the staff of each
of the committees. The annual report shall contain recommendations for
improving administration of the county road programs;
(6) Administer the rural arterial program established by chapter
36.79 RCW and the program funded by the county arterial preservation
account established by RCW 46.68.090, as well as any other programs
provided for in law.

Sec. 103 RCW 41.40.037 and 2004 c 242 s 63 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a retiree from
plan 1 who enters employment with an employer at least one calendar
month after his or her accrual date may continue to receive pension
payments while engaged in such service for up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours of service in a calendar year without a reduction of
pension.
(b) A retiree from plan 1 who enters employment with an employer at
least three calendar months after his or her accrual date and:
(i) Is hired into a position for which the employer has documented
a justifiable need to hire a retiree into the position;
(ii) Is hired through the established process for the position with
the approval of: A school board for a school district; the chief
executive officer of a state agency employer; the secretary of the
senate for the senate; the chief clerk of the house of representatives
for the house of representatives; the secretary of the senate and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives jointly for the joint
legislative audit and review committee, ((the legislative
transportation committee,)) the joint committee on pension policy, the
legislative evaluation and accountability program, the legislative
systems committee, and the statute law committee; or according to rules
adopted for the rehiring of retired plan 1 members for a local
government employer;
(iii) The employer retains records of the procedures followed and
decisions made in hiring the retiree, and provides those records in the
event of an audit; and
(iv) The employee has not already rendered a cumulative total of
more than one thousand nine hundred hours of service while in receipt
of pension payments beyond an annual threshold of eight hundred sixty-seven hours;
shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in that service
after the retiree has rendered service for more than one thousand five
hundred hours in a calendar year. The one thousand nine hundred hour
cumulative total under this subsection applies prospectively to those
retiring after July 27, 2003, and retroactively to those who retired
prior to July 27, 2003, and shall be calculated from the date of
retirement.
(c) When a plan 1 member renders service beyond eight hundred
sixty-seven hours, the department shall collect from the employer the
applicable employer retirement contributions for the entire duration of
the member's employment during that calendar year.
(d) A retiree from plan 2 or plan 3 who has satisfied the break in
employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section may work up to
eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a calendar year in an eligible
position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or
41.40.010, or as a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her benefit.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the
period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and
receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again
retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However, if the
right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous
retirement shall be reinstated.
(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the select
committee on pension policy.
(5) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to be employed for more than five months in a calendar year
without a reduction of his or her pension.

Sec. 104 RCW 43.10.101 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 527 are each
amended to read as follows:
The attorney general shall prepare annually a report to the
((legislative transportation committee)) transportation committees of
the legislature, the transportation commission, and the transportation
performance audit board comprising a comprehensive summary of all cases
involving tort claims against the department of transportation
involving highways which were concluded and closed in the previous
calendar year. The report shall include for each case closed:
(1) A summary of the factual background of the case;
(2) Identification of the attorneys representing the state and the
opposing parties;
(3) A synopsis of the legal theories asserted and the defenses
presented;
(4) Whether the case was tried, settled, or dismissed, and in whose
favor;
(5) The approximate number of attorney hours expended by the state
on the case, together with the corresponding dollar amount billed
therefore; and
(6) Such other matters relating to the case as the attorney general
deems relevant or appropriate, especially including any comments or
recommendations for changes in statute law or agency practice that
might effectively reduce the exposure of the state to such tort claims.

Sec. 105 RCW 43.79.270 and 1998 c 177 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever any money, from the federal government, or from other
sources, which was not anticipated in the budget approved by the
legislature has actually been received and is designated to be spent
for a specific purpose, the head of any department, agency, board, or
commission through which such expenditure shall be made is to submit to
the governor a statement which may be in the form of a request for an
allotment amendment setting forth the facts constituting the need for
such expenditure and the estimated amount to be expended: PROVIDED,
That no expenditure shall be made in excess of the actual amount
received, and no money shall be expended for any purpose except the
specific purpose for which it was received. A copy of any proposal
submitted to the governor to expend money from an appropriated fund or
account in excess of appropriations provided by law which is based on
the receipt of unanticipated revenues shall be submitted to the joint
legislative audit and review committee and also to the standing
committees on ways and means of the house and senate if the legislature
is in session at the same time as it is transmitted to the governor.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, whenever money
from any source that was not anticipated in the transportation budget
approved by the legislature has actually been received and is
designated to be spent for a specific purpose, the head of a
department, agency, board, or commission through which the expenditure
must be made shall submit to the governor a statement, which may be in
the form of a request for an allotment amendment, setting forth the
facts constituting the need for the expenditure and the estimated
amount to be expended. However, no expenditure may be made in excess
of the actual amount received, and no money may be expended for any
purpose except the specific purpose for which it was received. A copy
of any proposal submitted to the governor to expend money from an
appropriated transportation fund or account in excess of appropriations
provided by law that is based on the receipt of unanticipated revenues
must be submitted, at a minimum, to the standing committees on
transportation of the house and senate((, if the legislature is in
session,)) at the same time as it is transmitted to the governor.
((During the legislative interim, any such proposal must be submitted
to the legislative transportation committee.))

Sec. 106 RCW 43.79.280 and 1998 c 177 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the governor approves such estimate in whole or part, he
shall endorse on each copy of the statement his approval, together with
a statement of the amount approved in the form of an allotment
amendment, and transmit one copy to the head of the department, agency,
board, or commission authorizing the expenditure. An identical copy of
the governor's statement of approval and a statement of the amount
approved for expenditure shall be transmitted simultaneously to the
joint legislative audit and review committee and also to the standing
committee on ways and means of the house and senate of all executive
approvals of proposals to expend money in excess of appropriations
provided by law.
(2) If the governor approves an estimate with transportation
funding implications, in whole or part, he shall endorse on each copy
of the statement his approval, together with a statement of the amount
approved in the form of an allotment amendment, and transmit one copy
to the head of the department, agency, board, or commission authorizing
the expenditure. An identical copy of the governor's statement of
approval of a proposal to expend transportation money in excess of
appropriations provided by law and a statement of the amount approved
for expenditure must be transmitted simultaneously to the standing
committees on transportation of the house and senate. ((During the
legislative interim, all estimate approvals endorsed by the governor
along with a statement of the amount approved in the form of an
allotment amendment must be transmitted simultaneously to the
legislative transportation committee.))

Sec. 107 RCW 43.88.020 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) "Budget" means a proposed plan of expenditures for a given
period or purpose and the proposed means for financing these
expenditures.
(2) "Budget document" means a formal statement, either written or
provided on any electronic media or both, offered by the governor to
the legislature, as provided in RCW 43.88.030.
(3) "Director of financial management" means the official appointed
by the governor to serve at the governor's pleasure and to whom the
governor may delegate necessary authority to carry out the governor's
duties as provided in this chapter. The director of financial
management shall be head of the office of financial management which
shall be in the office of the governor.
(4) "Agency" means and includes every state office, officer, each
institution, whether educational, correctional, or other, and every
department, division, board, and commission, except as otherwise
provided in this chapter.
(5) "Public funds", for purposes of this chapter, means all moneys,
including cash, checks, bills, notes, drafts, stocks, and bonds,
whether held in trust, for operating purposes, or for capital purposes,
and collected or disbursed under law, whether or not such funds are
otherwise subject to legislative appropriation, including funds
maintained outside the state treasury.
(6) "Regulations" means the policies, standards, and requirements,
stated in writing, designed to carry out the purposes of this chapter,
as issued by the governor or the governor's designated agent, and which
shall have the force and effect of law.
(7) "Ensuing biennium" means the fiscal biennium beginning on July
1st of the same year in which a regular session of the legislature is
held during an odd-numbered year pursuant to Article II, section 12 of
the Constitution and which biennium next succeeds the current biennium.
(8) "Dedicated fund" means a fund in the state treasury, or a
separate account or fund in the general fund in the state treasury,
that by law is dedicated, appropriated, or set aside for a limited
object or purpose; but "dedicated fund" does not include a revolving
fund or a trust fund.
(9) "Revolving fund" means a fund in the state treasury,
established by law, from which is paid the cost of goods or services
furnished to or by a state agency, and which is replenished through
charges made for such goods or services or through transfers from other
accounts or funds.
(10) "Trust fund" means a fund in the state treasury in which
designated persons or classes of persons have a vested beneficial
interest or equitable ownership, or which was created or established by
a gift, grant, contribution, devise, or bequest that limits the use of
the fund to designated objects or purposes.
(11) "Administrative expenses" means expenditures for: (a)
Salaries, wages, and related costs of personnel and (b) operations and
maintenance including but not limited to costs of supplies, materials,
services, and equipment.
(12) "Fiscal year" means the year beginning July 1st and ending the
following June 30th.
(13) "Lapse" means the termination of authority to expend an
appropriation.
(14) "Legislative fiscal committees" means the joint legislative
audit and review committee, the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee, and the ways and means and
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives((,
and, where appropriate, the legislative transportation committee)).
(15) "Fiscal period" means the period for which an appropriation is
made as specified within the act making the appropriation.
(16) "Primary budget driver" means the primary determinant of a
budget level, other than a price variable, which causes or is
associated with the major expenditure of an agency or budget unit
within an agency, such as a caseload, enrollment, workload, or
population statistic.
(17) "State tax revenue limit" means the limitation created by
chapter 43.135 RCW.
(18) "General state revenues" means the revenues defined by Article
VIII, section 1(c) of the state Constitution.
(19) "Annual growth rate in real personal income" means the
estimated percentage growth in personal income for the state during the
current fiscal year, expressed in constant value dollars, as published
by the office of financial management or its successor agency.
(20) "Estimated revenues" means estimates of revenue in the most
recent official economic and revenue forecast prepared under RCW
82.33.020, and prepared by the office of financial management for those
funds, accounts, and sources for which the office of the economic and
revenue forecast council does not prepare an official forecast
((including estimates of revenues to support financial plans under RCW
44.40.070)), that are prepared by the office of financial management in
consultation with the transportation revenue forecast council.
(21) "Estimated receipts" means the estimated receipt of cash in
the most recent official economic and revenue forecast prepared under
RCW 82.33.020, and prepared by the office of financial management for
those funds, accounts, and sources for which the office of the economic
and revenue forecast council does not prepare an official forecast.
(22) "State budgeting, accounting, and reporting system" means a
system that gathers, maintains, and communicates fiscal information.
The system links fiscal information beginning with development of
agency budget requests through adoption of legislative appropriations
to tracking actual receipts and expenditures against approved plans.
(23) "Allotment of appropriation" means the agency's statement of
proposed expenditures, the director of financial management's review of
that statement, and the placement of the approved statement into the
state budgeting, accounting, and reporting system.
(24) "Statement of proposed expenditures" means a plan prepared by
each agency that breaks each appropriation out into monthly detail
representing the best estimate of how the appropriation will be
expended.
(25) "Undesignated fund balance (or deficit)" means unreserved and
undesignated current assets or other resources available for
expenditure over and above any current liabilities which are expected
to be incurred by the close of the fiscal period.
(26) "Internal audit" means an independent appraisal activity
within an agency for the review of operations as a service to
management, including a systematic examination of accounting and fiscal
controls to assure that human and material resources are guarded
against waste, loss, or misuse; and that reliable data are gathered,
maintained, and fairly disclosed in a written report of the audit
findings.
(27) "Performance verification" means an analysis that (a) verifies
the accuracy of data used by state agencies in quantifying intended
results and measuring performance toward those results, and (b)
verifies whether or not the reported results were achieved.
(28) "Performance audit" has the same meaning as it is defined in
RCW 44.28.005.

Sec. 108 RCW 43.88.030 and 2004 c 276 s 908 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director of financial management shall provide all agencies
with a complete set of instructions for submitting biennial budget
requests to the director at least three months before agency budget
documents are due into the office of financial management. ((The
director shall provide agencies and committees that are required under
RCW 44.40.070 to develop comprehensive six-year program and financial
plans with a complete set of instructions for submitting these program
and financial plans at the same time that instructions for submitting
other budget requests are provided.)) The budget document or documents
shall consist of the governor's budget message which shall be
explanatory of the budget and shall contain an outline of the proposed
financial policies of the state for the ensuing fiscal period, as well
as an outline of the proposed six-year financial policies where
applicable, and shall describe in connection therewith the important
features of the budget. The message shall set forth the reasons for
salient changes from the previous fiscal period in expenditure and
revenue items and shall explain any major changes in financial policy.
Attached to the budget message shall be such supporting schedules,
exhibits and other explanatory material in respect to both current
operations and capital improvements as the governor shall deem to be
useful to the legislature. The budget document or documents shall set
forth a proposal for expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period, or six-year period where applicable, based upon the estimated revenues and
caseloads as approved by the economic and revenue forecast council and
caseload forecast council or upon the estimated revenues and caseloads
of the office of financial management for those funds, accounts,
sources, and programs for which the forecast councils do not prepare an
official forecast((, including those revenues anticipated to support
the six-year programs and financial plans under RCW 44.40.070. In
estimating revenues to support financial plans under RCW 44.40.070, the
office of financial management shall rely on information and advice
from the transportation revenue forecast council)). Revenues shall be
estimated for such fiscal period from the source and at the rates
existing by law at the time of submission of the budget document,
including the supplemental budgets submitted in the even-numbered years
of a biennium. However, the estimated revenues and caseloads for use
in the governor's budget document may be adjusted to reflect budgetary
revenue transfers and revenue and caseload estimates dependent upon
budgetary assumptions of enrollments, workloads, and caseloads. All
adjustments to the approved estimated revenues and caseloads must be
set forth in the budget document. The governor may additionally
submit, as an appendix to each supplemental, biennial, or six-year
agency budget or to the budget document or documents, a proposal for
expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period from revenue sources derived
from proposed changes in existing statutes.
Supplemental and biennial documents shall reflect a six-year
expenditure plan consistent with estimated revenues from existing
sources ((and at existing rates for those agencies required to submit
six-year program and financial plans under RCW 44.40.070)). Any
additional revenue resulting from proposed changes to existing statutes
shall be separately identified within the document as well as related
expenditures for the six-year period.
The budget document or documents shall also contain:
(a) Revenues classified by fund and source for the immediately past
fiscal period, those received or anticipated for the current fiscal
period, and those anticipated for the ensuing biennium((, and those
anticipated for the ensuing six-year period to support the six-year
programs and financial plans required under RCW 44.40.070));
(b) The undesignated fund balance or deficit, by fund;
(c) Such additional information dealing with expenditures,
revenues, workload, performance, and personnel as the legislature may
direct by law or concurrent resolution;
(d) Such additional information dealing with revenues and
expenditures as the governor shall deem pertinent and useful to the
legislature;
(e) Tabulations showing expenditures classified by fund, function,
activity, and agency. However, documents submitted for the 2005-07
biennial budget request need not show expenditures by activity;
(f) A delineation of each agency's activities, including those
activities funded from nonbudgeted, nonappropriated sources, including
funds maintained outside the state treasury;
(g) Identification of all proposed direct expenditures to implement
the Puget Sound water quality plan under chapter 90.71 RCW, shown by
agency and in total; and
(h) Tabulations showing each postretirement adjustment by
retirement system established after fiscal year 1991, to include, but
not be limited to, estimated total payments made to the end of the
previous biennial period, estimated payments for the present biennium,
and estimated payments for the ensuing biennium.
(2) The budget document or documents shall include detailed
estimates of all anticipated revenues applicable to proposed operating
or capital expenditures and shall also include all proposed operating
or capital expenditures. The total of beginning undesignated fund
balance and estimated revenues less working capital and other reserves
shall equal or exceed the total of proposed applicable expenditures.
The budget document or documents shall further include:
(a) Interest, amortization and redemption charges on the state
debt;
(b) Payments of all reliefs, judgments, and claims;
(c) Other statutory expenditures;
(d) Expenditures incident to the operation for each agency;
(e) Revenues derived from agency operations;
(f) Expenditures and revenues shall be given in comparative form
showing those incurred or received for the immediately past fiscal
period and those anticipated for the current biennium and next ensuing
biennium((, as well as those required to support the six-year programs
and financial plans required under RCW 44.40.070));
(g) A showing and explanation of amounts of general fund and other
funds obligations for debt service and any transfers of moneys that
otherwise would have been available for appropriation;
(h) Common school expenditures on a fiscal-year basis;
(i) A showing, by agency, of the value and purpose of financing
contracts for the lease/purchase or acquisition of personal or real
property for the current and ensuing fiscal periods; and
(j) A showing and explanation of anticipated amounts of general
fund and other funds required to amortize the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability of the retirement system specified under chapter
41.45 RCW, and the contributions to meet such amortization, stated in
total dollars and as a level percentage of total compensation.
(3) A separate capital budget document or schedule shall be
submitted that will contain the following:
(a) A statement setting forth a long-range facilities plan for the
state that identifies and includes the highest priority needs within
affordable spending levels;
(b) A capital program consisting of proposed capital projects for
the next biennium and the two biennia succeeding the next biennium
consistent with the long-range facilities plan. Insomuch as is
practical, and recognizing emergent needs, the capital program shall
reflect the priorities, projects, and spending levels proposed in
previously submitted capital budget documents in order to provide a
reliable long-range planning tool for the legislature and state
agencies;
(c) A capital plan consisting of proposed capital spending for at
least four biennia succeeding the next biennium;
(d) A strategic plan for reducing backlogs of maintenance and
repair projects. The plan shall include a prioritized list of specific
facility deficiencies and capital projects to address the deficiencies
for each agency, cost estimates for each project, a schedule for
completing projects over a reasonable period of time, and
identification of normal maintenance activities to reduce future
backlogs;
(e) A statement of the reason or purpose for a project;
(f) Verification that a project is consistent with the provisions
set forth in chapter 36.70A RCW;
(g) A statement about the proposed site, size, and estimated life
of the project, if applicable;
(h) Estimated total project cost;
(i) For major projects valued over five million dollars, estimated
costs for the following project components: Acquisition, consultant
services, construction, equipment, project management, and other costs
included as part of the project. Project component costs shall be
displayed in a standard format defined by the office of financial
management to allow comparisons between projects;
(j) Estimated total project cost for each phase of the project as
defined by the office of financial management;
(k) Estimated ensuing biennium costs;
(l) Estimated costs beyond the ensuing biennium;
(m) Estimated construction start and completion dates;
(n) Source and type of funds proposed;
(o) Estimated ongoing operating budget costs or savings resulting
from the project, including staffing and maintenance costs;
(p) For any capital appropriation requested for a state agency for
the acquisition of land or the capital improvement of land in which the
primary purpose of the acquisition or improvement is recreation or
wildlife habitat conservation, the capital budget document, or an
omnibus list of recreation and habitat acquisitions provided with the
governor's budget document, shall identify the projected costs of
operation and maintenance for at least the two biennia succeeding the
next biennium. Omnibus lists of habitat and recreation land
acquisitions shall include individual project cost estimates for
operation and maintenance as well as a total for all state projects
included in the list. The document shall identify the source of funds
from which the operation and maintenance costs are proposed to be
funded;
(q) Such other information bearing upon capital projects as the
governor deems to be useful;
(r) Standard terms, including a standard and uniform definition of
normal maintenance, for all capital projects;
(s) Such other information as the legislature may direct by law or
concurrent resolution.
For purposes of this subsection (3), the term "capital project"
shall be defined subsequent to the analysis, findings, and
recommendations of a joint committee comprised of representatives from
the house capital appropriations committee, senate ways and means
committee, ((legislative transportation committee,)) legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee, and office of
financial management.
(4) No change affecting the comparability of agency or program
information relating to expenditures, revenues, workload, performance
and personnel shall be made in the format of any budget document or
report presented to the legislature under this section or RCW
43.88.160(1) relative to the format of the budget document or report
which was presented to the previous regular session of the legislature
during an odd-numbered year without prior legislative concurrence.
Prior legislative concurrence shall consist of (a) a favorable majority
vote on the proposal by the standing committees on ways and means of
both houses if the legislature is in session or (b) a favorable
majority vote on the proposal by members of the legislative evaluation
and accountability program committee if the legislature is not in
session.

Sec. 109 RCW 43.88.230 and 1996 c 288 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, the statute law committee, the
joint legislative audit and review committee, ((the legislative
transportation committee,)) the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee, the office of state actuary, and all
legislative standing committees of both houses shall be deemed a part
of the legislative branch of state government.

Sec. 110 RCW 43.105.160 and 1999 c 80 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall prepare a state strategic information
technology plan which shall establish a statewide mission, goals, and
objectives for the use of information technology, including goals for
electronic access to government records, information, and services.
The plan shall be developed in accordance with the standards and
policies established by the board and shall be submitted to the board
for review, modification as necessary, and approval. The department
shall seek the advice of the board in the development of this plan.
The plan approved under this section shall be updated as necessary
and submitted to the governor((,)) and the chairs and ranking minority
members of the appropriations committees of the senate and the house of
representatives((, and, during the legislative session, to the chairs
and ranking minority members of the transportation committees of the
senate and the house of representatives. During the legislative
interim, the approved plan must be submitted to the legislative
transportation committee, instead of the standing transportation
committees)).
(2) The department shall prepare a biennial state performance
report on information technology based on agency performance reports
required under RCW 43.105.170 and other information deemed appropriate
by the department. The report shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) An analysis, based upon agency portfolios, of the state's
information technology infrastructure, including its value, condition,
and capacity;
(b) An evaluation of performance relating to information
technology;
(c) An assessment of progress made toward implementing the state
strategic information technology plan, including progress toward
electronic access to public information and enabling citizens to have
two-way access to public records, information, and services;
(d) An analysis of the success or failure, feasibility, progress,
costs, and timeliness of implementation of major information technology
projects under RCW 43.105.190;
(e) Identification of benefits, cost avoidance, and cost savings
generated by major information technology projects developed under RCW
43.105.190; and
(f) An inventory of state information services, equipment, and
proprietary software.
Copies of the report shall be distributed biennially to the
governor((,)) and the chairs and ranking minority members of the
appropriations committees of the senate and the house of
representatives((, and, during the legislative session, the chairs and
ranking minority members of the transportation committees of the senate
and the house of representatives. During the legislative interim, the
report must be submitted to the legislative transportation committee,
instead of the standing transportation committees)).

Sec. 111 RCW 43.105.190 and 1999 c 80 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, with the approval of the board, shall establish
standards and policies governing the planning, implementation, and
evaluation of major information technology projects, including those
proposed by the superintendent of public instruction, in conjunction
with educational service districts, or statewide or regional providers
of K-12 education information technology services. The standards and
policies shall:
(a) Establish criteria to identify projects which are subject to
this section. Such criteria shall include, but not be limited to,
significant anticipated cost, complexity, or statewide significance of
the project; and
(b) Establish a model process and procedures which agencies shall
follow in developing and implementing projects within their information
technology portfolios. Agencies may propose, for approval by the
department, a process and procedures unique to the agency. The
department may accept or require modification of such agency proposals
or the department may reject such agency proposals and require use of
the model process and procedures established under this subsection.
Any process and procedures developed under this subsection shall
require (i) distinct and identifiable phases upon which funding may be
based, (ii) user validation of products through system demonstrations
and testing of prototypes and deliverables, and (iii) other elements
identified by the board.
The director may terminate a major project if the director
determines that the project is not meeting or is not expected to meet
anticipated performance standards.
(2) The office of financial management shall establish policies and
standards consistent with portfolio-based information technology
management to govern the funding of projects developed under this
section. The policies and standards shall provide for:
(a) Funding of a project under terms and conditions mutually agreed
to by the director, the director of financial management, and the head
of the agency proposing the project. However, the office of financial
management may require incremental funding of a project on a phase-by-phase basis whereby funds for a given phase of a project may be
released only when the office of financial management determines, with
the advice of the department, that the previous phase is satisfactorily
completed;
(b) Acceptance testing of products to assure that products perform
satisfactorily before they are accepted and final payment is made; and
(c) Other elements deemed necessary by the office of financial
management.
(3) The department shall evaluate projects based on the
demonstrated business needs and benefits; cost; technology scope and
feasibility; impact on the agency's information technology portfolio
and on the statewide infrastructure; and final project implementation
plan based upon available funding.
Copies of project evaluations conducted under this subsection shall
be submitted to the office of financial management and the chairs,
ranking minority members, and staff coordinators of the appropriations
committees of the senate and house of representatives.
If there are projects that receive funding from a transportation
fund or account, copies of those projects' evaluations conducted under
this subsection must be submitted((, during the legislative session,))
to the chairs and ranking minority members of the transportation
committees of the senate and the house of representatives. ((During
the legislative interim, the project evaluations must be submitted to
the legislative transportation committee.))

Sec. 112 RCW 44.04.260 and 2003 c 295 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The joint legislative audit and review committee, ((the legislative
transportation committee,)) the select committee on pension policy, the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, and the
joint legislative systems committee are subject to such operational
policies, procedures, and oversight as are deemed necessary by the
facilities and operations committee of the senate and the executive
rules committee of the house of representatives to ensure operational
adequacy of the agencies of the legislative branch. As used in this
section, "operational policies, procedures, and oversight" includes the
development process of biennial budgets, contracting procedures,
personnel policies, and compensation plans, selection of a chief
administrator, facilities, and expenditures. This section does not
grant oversight authority to the facilities and operations committee of
the senate over any standing committee of the house of representatives
or oversight authority to the executive rules committee of the house of
representatives over any standing committee of the senate.

Sec. 113 RCW 44.28.088 and 2003 c 362 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When the legislative auditor has completed a performance audit
authorized in the performance audit work plan, the legislative auditor
shall transmit the preliminary performance audit report to the affected
state agency or local government and the office of financial management
for comment. The agency or local government and the office of
financial management shall provide any response to the legislative
auditor within thirty days after receipt of the preliminary performance
audit report unless a different time period is approved by the joint
committee. The legislative auditor shall incorporate the response of
the agency or local government and the office of financial management
into the final performance audit report.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, before
releasing the results of a performance audit to the legislature or the
public, the legislative auditor shall submit the preliminary
performance audit report to the joint committee for its review,
comments, and final recommendations. Any comments by the joint
committee must be included as a separate addendum to the final
performance audit report. Upon consideration and incorporation of the
review, comments, and recommendations of the joint committee, the
legislative auditor shall transmit the final performance audit report
to the affected agency or local government, the director of financial
management, the leadership of the senate and the house of
representatives, and the appropriate standing committees of the house
of representatives and the senate and shall publish the results and
make the report available to the public. For purposes of this section,
"leadership of the senate and the house of representatives" means the
speaker of the house, the majority leaders of the senate and the house
of representatives, the minority leaders of the senate and the house of
representatives, the caucus chairs of both major political parties of
the senate and the house of representatives, and the floor leaders of
both major political parties of the senate and the house of
representatives.
(3) If contracted to manage a transportation-related performance
audit under RCW 44.75.090, before releasing the results of a
performance audit originally ((requested)) directed by the ((executive
committee of the legislative transportation committee)) transportation
performance audit board to the legislature or the public, the
legislative auditor shall submit the preliminary performance audit
report to the ((executive committee of the joint committee and the
executive committee of the legislative transportation committee))
transportation performance audit board for review and comments solely
on the management of the audit. Any comments by the ((executive
committee of the joint committee and executive committee of the
legislative transportation committee)) transportation performance audit
board must be included as a separate addendum to the final performance
audit report. Upon consideration and incorporation of the review and
comments of the ((executive committee of the joint committee and
executive committee of the legislative transportation committee))
transportation performance audit board, the legislative auditor shall
transmit the final performance audit report to the affected agency or
local government, the director of financial management, the leadership
of the senate and the house of representatives, and the appropriate
standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate and
shall publish the results and make the report available to the public.

Sec. 114 RCW 44.40.025 and 1996 c 288 s 49 are each amended to
read as follows:
((In addition to the powers and duties authorized in RCW 44.40.020,
the committee and)) The standing committees on transportation of the
house and senate shall, in coordination with the joint legislative
audit and review committee, the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee, and the ways and means committees of
the senate and house of representatives, ascertain, study, ((and/or))
and analyze all available facts and matters relating or pertaining to
sources of revenue, appropriations, expenditures, and financial
condition of the motor vehicle fund and accounts thereof, the highway
safety fund, and all other funds or accounts related to transportation
programs of the state.
The joint legislative audit and review committee, the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee, and the ways and means
committees of the senate and house of representatives shall coordinate
their activities with the ((legislative)) transportation committees of
the legislature in carrying out the committees' powers and duties under
chapter 43.88 RCW in matters relating to the transportation programs of
the state.

Sec. 115 RCW 46.01.320 and 1996 c 315 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The title and registration advisory committee is created within the
department. The committee consists of the director or a designee, who
shall serve as chair, the assistant director for vehicle services, the
administrator of title and registration services, two members from each
of the house and senate transportation committees, two county auditors
nominated by the Washington association of county officials, and two
representatives of subagents nominated by an association of vehicle
subagents. The committee shall meet at least twice a year, and may
meet as often as is necessary.
The committee's purpose is to foster communication between the
legislature, the department, county auditors, and subagents. The
committee shall make recommendations ((when requested by the
legislative transportation committee, or on its own initiative,)) about
revisions to fee structures, implications of fee revisions on cost
sharing, and the development of standard contracts provided for in RCW
46.01.140(3).

Sec. 116 RCW 46.01.325 and 1996 c 315 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall prepare, with the advice of the title and
registration advisory committee, an annual comprehensive analysis and
evaluation of agent and subagent fees. The director shall make
recommendations for agent and subagent fee revisions approved by the
title and registration advisory committee to the ((legislative)) senate
and house transportation committees by January 1st of every third year
starting with 1996. Fee revision recommendations may be made more
frequently when justified by the annual analysis and evaluation, and
requested by the title and registration advisory committee.
(2) The annual comprehensive analysis and evaluation must consider,
but is not limited to:
(a) Unique and significant financial, legislative, or other
relevant developments that may impact fees;
(b) Current funding for ongoing operating and maintenance
automation project costs affecting revenue collection and service
delivery;
(c) Future system requirements including an appropriate sharing of
costs between the department, agents, and subagents;
(d) Beneficial mix of customer service delivery options based on a
fee structure commensurate with quality performance standards;
(e) Appropriate indices projecting state and national growth in
business and economic conditions prepared by the United States
department of commerce, the department of revenue, and the revenue
forecast council for the state of Washington.

Sec. 117 RCW 46.16.705 and 2003 c 196 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The special license plate review board is created.
(2) The board will consist of seven members: One member appointed
by the governor and who will serve as chair of the board; four members
of the legislature, one from each caucus of the house of
representatives and the senate; a department of licensing
representative appointed by the director; and a Washington state patrol
representative appointed by the chief.
(3) Members shall serve terms of four years, except that four of
the members initially appointed will be appointed for terms of two
years. No member may be appointed for more than three consecutive
terms.
(4) The ((legislative transportation committee)) respective
appointing authority may remove members from the board before the
expiration of their terms only for cause based upon a determination of
incapacity, incompetence, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office as
ordered by the Thurston county superior court, upon petition and show
cause proceedings brought for that purpose in that court and directed
to the board member in question.

Sec. 118 RCW 46.16.715 and 2003 c 196 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall meet periodically at the call of the chair, but
must meet at least one time each year within ninety days before an
upcoming regular session of the legislature. The board may adopt its
own rules and may establish its own procedures. It shall act
collectively in harmony with recorded resolutions or motions adopted by
a majority vote of the members, and it must have a quorum present to
take a vote on a special license plate application.
(2) The board will be compensated from the general appropriation
for the ((legislative transportation committee)) department of
licensing in accordance with RCW 43.03.250. Each board member will be
compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and reimbursed for actual
necessary traveling and other expenses in going to, attending, and
returning from meetings of the board or that are incurred in the
discharge of duties requested by the chair. However, in no event may
a board member be compensated in any year for more than one hundred
twenty days, except the chair may be compensated for not more than one
hundred fifty days. Service on the board does not qualify as a service
credit for the purposes of a public retirement system.
(3) The board shall keep proper records and is subject to audit by
the state auditor or other auditing entities.
(4) The department of licensing shall provide administrative
support to the board, which must include at least the following:
(a) Provide general staffing to meet the administrative needs of
the board;
(b) Report to the board on the reimbursement status of any new
special license plate series for which the state had to pay the start-up costs;
(c) Process special license plate applications and confirm that the
sponsoring organization has submitted all required documentation. If
an incomplete application is received, the department must return it to
the sponsoring organization;
(d) Compile the annual financial reports submitted by sponsoring
organizations with active special license plate series and present
those reports to the board for review and approval.
(((5) The legislative transportation committee shall provide
general oversight of the board, which must include at least the
following:
(a) Process and approve board member compensation requests;
(b) Review the annual financial reports submitted to the board by
sponsoring organizations;
(c) Review annually the list of the board's approved and rejected
special license plate proposals submitted by sponsoring
organizations.))

Sec. 119 RCW 46.16.725 and 2003 c 196 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The creation of the board does not in any way preclude the
authority of the legislature to independently propose and enact special
license plate legislation.
(2) The board must review and either approve or reject special
license plate applications submitted by sponsoring organizations.
(3) Duties of the board include but are not limited to the
following:
(a) Review and approve the annual financial reports submitted by
sponsoring organizations with active special license plate series and
present those annual financial reports to the ((legislative)) senate
and house transportation committees;
(b) Report annually to the ((legislative)) senate and house
transportation committees on the special license plate applications
that were considered by the board;
(c) Issue approval and rejection notification letters to sponsoring
organizations, the department, the chairs of the senate and house of
representatives transportation committees, and the legislative sponsors
identified in each application. The letters must be issued within
seven days of making a determination on the status of an application;
(d) Review annually the number of plates sold for each special
license plate series created after January 1, 2003. The board may
submit a recommendation to discontinue a special plate series to the
chairs of the senate and house of representatives transportation
committees.

Sec. 120 RCW 46.73.010 and 1985 c 333 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington state patrol may adopt rules establishing standards
for qualifications and hours of service of drivers for private carriers
as defined by RCW 81.80.010(6). Such standards shall correlate with
and, as far as reasonable, conform to the regulations contained in
Title 49 C.F.R., Chapter 3, Subchapter B, Parts 391 and 395, on July
28, 1985. ((At least thirty days before filing notice of the proposed
rules with the code reviser, the state patrol shall submit them to the
legislative transportation committee for review.))

Sec. 121 RCW 47.01.280 and 1999 c 94 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon receiving an application for improvements to an existing
state highway or highways pursuant to RCW 43.160.074 from the community
economic revitalization board, the transportation commission shall, in
a timely manner, determine whether or not the proposed state highway
improvements:
(a) Meet the safety and design criteria of the department of
transportation;
(b) Will impair the operational integrity of the existing highway
system;
(c) Will affect any other improvements planned by the department;
and
(d) Will be consistent with its policies developed pursuant to RCW
47.01.071.
(2) Upon completion of its determination of the factors contained
in subsection (1) of this section and any other factors it deems
pertinent, the transportation commission shall forward its approval, as
submitted or amended or disapproval of the proposed improvements to the
board, along with any recommendation it may wish to make concerning the
desirability and feasibility of the proposed development. If the
transportation commission disapproves any proposed improvements, it
shall specify its reasons for disapproval.
(3) Upon notification from the board of an application's approval
pursuant to RCW 43.160.074, the transportation commission shall direct
the department of transportation to carry out the improvements in
coordination with the applicant.
(((4) The transportation commission shall notify the legislative
transportation committee of all state highway improvements to be
carried out pursuant to RCW 43.160.074 and this section.))

Sec. 122 RCW 47.04.210 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 601 are each
amended to read as follows:
Federal funds that are administered by the department of
transportation and are passed through to municipal corporations or
political subdivisions of the state and moneys that are received as
total reimbursement for goods, services, or projects constructed by the
department of transportation are removed from the transportation
budget. To process and account for these expenditures a new treasury
trust account is created to be used for all department of
transportation one hundred percent federal and local reimbursable
transportation expenditures. This new account is nonbudgeted and
nonappropriated. At the same time, federal and private local
appropriations and full-time equivalents in subprograms R2, R3, T6, Y6,
and Z2 processed through this new account are removed from the
department of transportation's 1997-99 budget.
The department of transportation may make expenditures from the
account before receiving federal and local reimbursements. However, at
the end of each biennium, the account must maintain a zero or positive
cash balance. In the twenty-fourth month of each biennium the
department of transportation shall calculate and transfer sufficient
cash from either the motor vehicle fund or the multimodal
transportation account to cover any negative cash balances. The amount
transferred is calculated based on expenditures from each fund. In
addition, any interest charges accruing to the new account must be
distributed to the motor vehicle fund and the multimodal transportation
account.
The department of transportation shall provide an annual report to
the ((legislative)) senate and house transportation committees and the
office of financial management on expenditures and full-time
equivalents processed through the new account. The report must also
include recommendations for process changes, if needed.

Sec. 123 RCW 47.04.220 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 602 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The miscellaneous transportation programs account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer.
(2) Moneys from the account may be used only for the costs of:
(a) Miscellaneous transportation services provided by the
department that are reimbursed by other public and private entities;
(b) Local transportation projects for which the department is a
conduit for federal reimbursement to a municipal corporation or
political subdivision; or
(c) Other reimbursable activities as recommended by the
((legislative)) senate and house transportation committees and approved
by the office of financial management.
(3) Moneys received as reimbursement for expenditures under
subsection (2) of this section must be deposited into the account.
(4) No appropriation is required for expenditures from this
account. This fund is not subject to allotment procedures provided
under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(5) Only the secretary of transportation or the secretary's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature that this account maintain
a zero or positive cash balance at the end of each biennium. Toward
this purpose the department may make expenditures from the account
before receiving reimbursements under subsection (2) of this section.
Before the end of the biennium, the department shall transfer
sufficient cash to cover any negative cash balances from the motor
vehicle fund and the multimodal transportation account to the
miscellaneous transportation programs account for unrecovered
reimbursements. The department shall calculate the distribution of
this transfer based on expenditures. In the ensuing biennium the
department shall transfer the reimbursements received in the
miscellaneous transportation programs account back to the motor vehicle
fund and the multimodal transportation account to the extent of the
cash transferred at biennium end. The department shall also distribute
any interest charges accruing to the miscellaneous transportation
programs account to the motor vehicle fund and the multimodal
transportation account. Adjustments for any indirect cost recoveries
may also be made at this time.
(7) The department shall provide an annual report to the
((legislative)) senate and house transportation committees and the
office of financial management on the expenditures and full-time
equivalents processed through the miscellaneous transportation programs
account. The report must also include recommendations for changes to
the process, if needed.

Sec. 124 RCW 47.06.110 and 1996 c 186 s 512 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state-interest component of the statewide multimodal
transportation plan shall include a state public transportation plan
that:
(1) Articulates the state vision of an interest in public
transportation and provides quantifiable objectives, including benefits
indicators;
(2) Identifies the goals for public transit and the roles of
federal, state, regional, and local entities in achieving those goals;
(3) Recommends mechanisms for coordinating state, regional, and
local planning for public transportation;
(4) Recommends mechanisms for coordinating public transportation
with other transportation services and modes;
(5) Recommends criteria, consistent with the goals identified in
subsection (2) of this section and with RCW 82.44.180 (2) and (3), for
existing federal authorizations administered by the department to
transit agencies; and
(6) Recommends a statewide public transportation facilities and
equipment management system as required by federal law.
In developing the state public transportation plan, the department
shall involve local jurisdictions, public and private providers of
transportation services, nonmotorized interests, and state agencies
with an interest in public transportation, including but not limited to
the departments of community, trade, and economic development, social
and health services, and ecology, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, the office of the governor, and the office of
financial management.
The department shall submit ((an initial report)) to the
((legislative)) senate and house transportation committees by December
((1, 1993, and shall provide annual)) 1st of each year, reports
summarizing the plan's progress ((each year thereafter)).

Sec. 125 RCW 47.06A.020 and 1999 c 216 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall:
(a) Adopt rules and procedures necessary to implement the freight
mobility strategic investment program;
(b) Solicit from public entities proposed projects that meet
eligibility criteria established in accordance with subsection (4) of
this section; and
(c) Review and evaluate project applications based on criteria
established under this section, and prioritize and select projects
comprising a portfolio to be funded in part with grants from state
funds appropriated for the freight mobility strategic investment
program. In determining the appropriate level of state funding for a
project, the board shall ensure that state funds are allocated to
leverage the greatest amount of partnership funding possible. After
selecting projects comprising the portfolio, the board shall submit
them as part of its budget request to the office of financial
management and the legislature. The board shall ensure that projects
submitted as part of the portfolio are not more appropriately funded
with other federal, state, or local government funding mechanisms or
programs. The board shall reject those projects that appear to improve
overall general mobility with limited enhancement for freight mobility.
The board shall provide periodic progress reports on its activities
to the office of financial management and the ((legislative)) senate
and house transportation committees.
(2) The board may:
(a) Accept from any state or federal agency, loans or grants for
the financing of any transportation project and enter into agreements
with any such agency concerning the loans or grants;
(b) Provide technical assistance to project applicants;
(c) Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or
financial, or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms
and conditions which are not in conflict with this chapter;
(d) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter; and
(e) Do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers
expressly granted or implied under this chapter.
(3) The board shall designate strategic freight corridors within
the state. The board shall update the list of designated strategic
corridors not less than every two years, and shall establish a method
of collecting and verifying data, including information on city and
county-owned roadways.
(4) ((From June 11, 1998, through the biennium ending June 30,
2001,)) The board shall utilize threshold project eligibility criteria
that, at a minimum, includes the following:
(a) The project must be on a strategic freight corridor;
(b) The project must meet one of the following conditions:
(i) It is primarily aimed at reducing identified barriers to
freight movement with only incidental benefits to general or personal
mobility; or
(ii) It is primarily aimed at increasing capacity for the movement
of freight with only incidental benefits to general or personal
mobility; or
(iii) It is primarily aimed at mitigating the impact on communities
of increasing freight movement, including roadway/railway conflicts;
and
(c) The project must have a total public benefit/total public cost
ratio of equal to or greater than one.
(5) From June 11, 1998, through the biennium ending June 30, 2001,
the board shall use the multicriteria analysis and scoring framework
for evaluating and ranking eligible freight mobility and freight
mitigation projects developed by the freight mobility project
prioritization committee and contained in the January 16, 1998, report
entitled "Project Eligibility, Priority and Selection Process for a
Strategic Freight Investment Program." The prioritization process
shall measure the degree to which projects address important program
objectives and shall generate a project score that reflects a project's
priority compared to other projects. The board shall assign scoring
points to each criterion that indicate the relative importance of the
criterion in the overall determination of project priority. After June
30, 2001, the board may supplement and refine the initial project
priority criteria and scoring framework developed by the freight
mobility project prioritization committee as expertise and experience
is gained in administering the freight mobility program.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature that each freight mobility
project contained in the project portfolio submitted by the board
utilize the greatest amount of nonstate funding possible. The board
shall adopt rules that give preference to projects that contain the
greatest levels of financial participation from nonprogram fund
sources. The board shall consider twenty percent as the minimum
partnership contribution, but shall also ensure that there are
provisions allowing exceptions for projects that are located in areas
where minimal local funding capacity exists or where the magnitude of
the project makes the adopted partnership contribution financially
unfeasible.
(7) The board shall develop and recommend policies that address
operational improvements that primarily benefit and enhance freight
movement, including, but not limited to, policies that reduce
congestion in truck lanes at border crossings and weigh stations and
provide for access to ports during nonpeak hours.

Sec. 126 RCW 47.10.790 and 1985 c 406 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to provide funds for the location, design, right of
way, and construction of selected interstate highway improvements,
there shall be issued and sold upon the request of the Washington state
transportation commission, a total of one hundred million dollars of
general obligation bonds of the state of Washington to pay the state's
share of costs for completion of state route 90 (state route 5 to state
route 405) and other related state highway projects eligible for
regular federal interstate funding and until December 31, 1989, to
temporarily pay the regular federal share of construction of completion
projects on state route 90 (state route 5 to state route 405) and other
related state highway projects eligible for regular interstate funding
in advance of federal-aid apportionments under the provisions of 23
U.S.C. Secs. 115 or 122: PROVIDED, That the total amount of bonds
issued to temporarily pay the regular federal share of construction of
federal-aid interstate highways in advance of federal-aid
apportionments as authorized by this section and RCW 47.10.801 shall
not exceed one hundred twenty million dollars: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
the transportation commission shall ((consult with the legislative
transportation committee prior to the adoption of)) adopt plans for the
obligation of federal-aid apportionments received in federal fiscal
year 1985 and subsequent years to pay the regular federal share of
federal-aid interstate highway construction projects or to convert such
apportionments under the provisions of 23 U.S.C. Secs. 115 or 122.
(2) The transportation commission((, in consultation with the
legislative transportation committee,)) may at any time find and
determine that any amount of the bonds authorized in subsection (1) of
this section, and not then sold, are no longer required to be issued
and sold for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Any bonds authorized by subsection (1) of this section that the
transportation commission determines are no longer required for the
purpose of paying the cost of the designated interstate highway
improvements described therein shall be issued and sold, upon the
request of the Washington state transportation commission, to provide
funds for the location, design, right of way, and construction of major
transportation improvements throughout the state ((that are identified
as category C improvements in RCW 47.05.030)).

Sec. 127 RCW 47.10.801 and 1999 c 94 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to provide funds necessary for the location, design,
right of way, and construction of selected interstate and other state
highway improvements, there shall be issued and sold, subject to
subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, upon the request of the
Washington state transportation commission a total of four hundred
sixty million dollars of general obligation bonds of the state of
Washington for the following purposes and specified sums:
(a) Not to exceed two hundred twenty-five million dollars to pay
the state's share of costs for federal-aid interstate highway
improvements and until December 31, 1989, to temporarily pay the
regular federal share of construction of federal-aid interstate highway
improvements to complete state routes 82, 90, 182, and 705 in advance
of federal-aid apportionments under the provisions of 23 U.S.C. Secs.
115 or 122: PROVIDED, That the total amount of bonds issued to
temporarily pay the regular federal share of construction of federal-
aid interstate highways in advance of federal-aid apportionments as
authorized by this section and RCW 47.10.790 shall not exceed one
hundred twenty million dollars: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
transportation commission shall ((consult with the legislative
transportation committee prior to the adoption of)) adopt plans for the
obligation of federal-aid apportionments received in federal fiscal
year 1985 and subsequent years to pay the regular federal share of
federal-aid interstate highway construction projects or to convert such
apportionments under the provisions of 23 U.S.C. Secs. 115 or 122;
(b) Two hundred twenty-five million dollars for major
transportation improvements throughout the state that are identified as
category C improvements and for selected major non-interstate
construction and reconstruction projects that are included as Category
A Improvements ((in RCW 47.05.030));
(c) Ten million dollars for state highway improvements necessitated
by planned economic development, as determined through the procedures
set forth in RCW 43.160.074 and 47.01.280.
(2) The amount of bonds authorized in subsection (1)(a) of this
section shall be reduced if the transportation commission((, in
consultation with the legislative transportation committee,))
determines that any of the bonds that have not been sold are no longer
required.
(3) The amount of bonds authorized in subsection (1)(b) of this
section shall be increased by an amount not to exceed, and concurrent
with, any reduction of bonds authorized under subsection (1)(a) of this
section in the manner prescribed in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The transportation commission may decrease the amount of bonds
authorized in subsection (1)(c) of this section and increase the amount
of bonds authorized in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section, or
both by an amount equal to the decrease in subsection (1)(c) of this
section. The transportation commission may decrease the amount of
bonds authorized in subsection (1)(c) of this section only if the
legislature appropriates an equal amount of funds from the motor
vehicle fund - basic account for the purposes enumerated in subsection
(1)(c) of this section.

Sec. 128 RCW 47.10.802 and 1986 c 290 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon request being made by the transportation commission, the state
finance committee shall supervise and provide for the issuance, sale,
and retirement of the bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.801 in accordance
with chapter 39.42 RCW. The amount of such bonds issued and sold under
RCW 47.10.801 through 47.10.809 in any biennium may not exceed the
amount of a specific appropriation therefor. Such bonds may be sold
from time to time in such amounts as may be necessary for the orderly
progress of the state highway improvements specified in RCW 47.10.801.
The amount of bonds issued and sold under RCW 47.10.801(1)(a) in any
biennium shall not, except as provided in that section, exceed the
amount required to match federal-aid interstate funds available to the
state of Washington. ((The transportation commission shall give notice
of its intent to sell bonds to the legislative transportation committee
before requesting the state finance committee to issue and sell bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.801(1)(a).)) The bonds shall be sold in such
manner, at such time or times, in such amounts, and at such price or
prices as the state finance committee shall determine. The state
finance committee may obtain insurance, letters of credit, or other
credit facility devices with respect to the bonds and may authorize the
execution and delivery of agreements, promissory notes, and other
obligations for the purpose of insuring the payment or enhancing the
marketability of the bonds. Promissory notes or other obligations
issued under this section shall not constitute a debt or the
contracting of indebtedness under any constitutional or statutory
indebtedness limitation if their payment is conditioned upon the
failure of the state to pay the principal of or interest on the bonds
with respect to which the promissory notes or other obligations relate.
The state finance committee may authorize the issuance of short-term
obligations in lieu of long-term obligations for the purposes of more
favorable interest rates, lower total interest costs, and increased
marketability and for the purposes of retiring the bonds during the
life of the project for which they were issued.

Sec. 129 RCW 47.17.850 and 1984 c 7 s 139 are each amended to
read as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 906 is
established as follows:
Beginning at a junction with state route number 90 at the West
Summit interchange of Snoqualmie Pass, thence along the alignment of
the state route number 90 as it existed on May 11, 1967, in a
southeasterly direction to a junction with state route number 90 at the
Hyak interchange.
((The legislative transportation committee, the house and senate
transportation committees, and the department shall undertake
appropriate studies to evaluate state route number 906 to determine
whether or not it should permanently remain on the state system.))

Sec. 130 RCW 47.26.167 and 1991 c 342 s 62 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature recognizes the need for a multijurisdictional body
to review future requests for jurisdictional transfers. The board is
hereby directed, beginning September 1, 1991, to receive petitions from
cities, counties, or the state requesting any addition or deletion from
the state highway system. The board is required to utilize the
criteria established in RCW 47.17.001 in evaluating petitions and to
adopt rules for implementation of this process. The board shall
forward to the ((legislative)) senate and house transportation
committees by November 15 each year any recommended jurisdictional
transfers.

Sec. 131 RCW 47.26.170 and 1994 c 179 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each county having within its boundaries an urban area and cities
and towns shall prepare and submit to the transportation improvement
board arterial inventory data required to determine the long-range
arterial construction needs. The counties, cities, and towns shall
revise the arterial inventory data every four years to show the current
arterial construction needs through the advanced planning period, and
as revised shall submit them to the transportation improvement board
during the first week of January every four years beginning in 1996.
The inventory data shall be prepared pursuant to guidelines established
by the transportation improvement board. As information is updated, it
shall be made available to the commission ((and the legislative
transportation committee)).

Sec. 132 RCW 47.46.030 and 2002 c 114 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary or a designee shall solicit proposals from, and
negotiate and enter into agreements with, private entities to undertake
as appropriate, together with the department and other public entities,
all or a portion of the study, planning, design, construction,
operation, and maintenance of transportation systems and facilities,
using in whole or in part public or private sources of financing.
The public-private initiatives program may develop up to six
demonstration projects. Each proposal shall be weighed on its own
merits, and each of the six agreements shall be negotiated
individually, and as a stand-alone project.
(2) If project proposals selected prior to September 1, 1994, are
terminated by the public or private sectors, the department shall not
select any new projects, including project proposals submitted to the
department prior to September 1, 1994, and designated by the
transportation commission as placeholder projects, after June 16, 1995,
until June 30, 1997.
The department, in consultation with the legislative transportation
committee, shall conduct a program and fiscal audit of the public-private initiatives program for the biennium ending June 30, 1997. The
department shall submit a progress report to the legislative
transportation committee on the program and fiscal audit by June 30,
1996, with preliminary and final audit reports due December 1, 1996,
and June 30, 1997, respectively.
The department shall develop and submit a proposed public
involvement plan to the 1997 legislature to identify the process for
selecting new potential projects and the associated costs of
implementing the plan. The legislature must adopt the public
involvement plan before the department may proceed with any activity
related to project identification and selection. Following legislative
adoption of the public involvement plan, the department is authorized
to implement the plan and to identify potential new projects.
The public involvement plan for projects selected after June 30,
1997, shall, at a minimum, identify projects that: (a) Have the
potential of achieving overall public support among users of the
projects, residents of communities in the vicinity of the projects, and
residents of communities impacted by the projects; (b) meet a state
transportation need; (c) provide a significant state benefit; and (d)
provide competition among proposers and maximum cost benefits to users.
Prospective projects may include projects identified by the department
or submitted by the private sector.
Projects that meet the minimum criteria established under this
section and the requirements of the public involvement plan developed
by the department and approved by the legislature shall be submitted to
the Washington state transportation commission for its review. ((The
commission, in turn, shall submit a list of eligible projects to the
legislative transportation committee for its consideration.)) Forty-five days after the submission to the ((legislative transportation
committee)) commission of the list of eligible projects, the secretary
is authorized to solicit proposals for the eligible project.
(3) Prior to entering into agreements with private entities under
the requirements of RCW 47.46.040 for any project proposal selected
before September 1, 1994, or after June 30, 1997, except as provided
for in subsections (((12))) (11) and (((13))) (12) of this section, the
department shall require an advisory vote as provided under subsections
(5) through (((10))) (9) of this section.
(4) The advisory vote shall apply to project proposals selected
prior to September 1, 1994, or after June 30, 1997, that receive public
opposition as demonstrated by the submission to the department of
original petitions bearing at least five thousand signatures of
individuals opposing the project collected and submitted in accordance
with the dates established in subsections (((12))) (11) and (((13)))
(12) of this section. The advisory vote shall be on the preferred
alternative identified under the requirements of chapter 43.21C RCW
and, if applicable, the national environmental policy act, 42 U.S.C.
4321 et seq. The execution by the department of the advisory vote
process established in this section is subject to the prior
appropriation of funds by the legislature for the purpose of conducting
environmental impact studies, a public involvement program, local
involvement committee activities, traffic and economic impact analyses,
engineering and technical studies, and the advisory vote.
(5) In preparing for the advisory vote, the department shall
conduct a comprehensive analysis of traffic patterns and economic
impact to define the geographical boundary of the project area that is
affected by the imposition of tolls or user fees authorized under this
chapter. The area so defined is referred to in this section as the
affected project area. In defining the affected project area, the
department shall, at a minimum, undertake: (a) A comparison of the
estimated percentage of residents of communities in the vicinity of the
project and in other communities impacted by the project who could be
subject to tolls or user fees and the estimated percentage of other
users and transient traffic that could be subject to tolls or user
fees; (b) an analysis of the anticipated traffic diversion patterns;
(c) an analysis of the potential economic impact resulting from
proposed toll rates or user fee rates imposed on residents, commercial
traffic, and commercial entities in communities in the vicinity of and
impacted by the project; (d) an analysis of the economic impact of
tolls or user fees on the price of goods and services generally; and
(e) an analysis of the relationship of the project to state
transportation needs and benefits.
(6)(a) After determining the definition of the affected project
area, the department shall establish a committee comprised of
individuals who represent cities and counties in the affected project
area; organizations formed to support or oppose the project; and users
of the project. The committee shall be named the public-private local
involvement committee, and be known as the local involvement committee.
(b) The members of the local involvement committee shall be: (i)
An elected official from each city within the affected project area;
(ii) an elected official from each county within the affected project
area; (iii) two persons from each county within the affected project
area who represent an organization formed in support of the project, if
the organization exists; (iv) two persons from each county within the
affected project area who represent an organization formed to oppose
the project, if the organization exists; and (v) four public members
active in a statewide transportation organization. If the committee
makeup results in an even number of committee members, there shall be
an additional appointment of an elected official from the county in
which all, or the greatest portion of the project is located.
(c) City and county elected officials shall be appointed by a
majority of the members of the city or county legislative authorities
of each city or county within the affected project area, respectively.
The county legislative authority of each county within the affected
project area shall identify and validate organizations officially
formed in support of or in opposition to the project and shall make the
appointments required under this section from a list submitted by the
chair of the organizations. Public members shall be appointed by the
governor. All appointments to the local involvement committee shall be
made and submitted to the department of transportation no later than
January 1, 1996, for projects selected prior to September 1, 1994, and
no later than thirty days after the affected project area is defined
for projects selected after June 30, 1997. Vacancies in the membership
of the local involvement committee shall be filled by the appointing
authority under (b)(i) through (v) of this subsection for each position
on the committee.
(d) The local involvement committee shall serve in an advisory
capacity to the department on all matters related to the execution of
the advisory vote.
(e) Members of the local involvement committee serve without
compensation and may not receive subsistence, lodging expenses, or
travel expenses.
(7) The department shall conduct a minimum thirty-day public
comment period on the definition of the geographical boundary of the
project area. The department, in consultation with the local
involvement committee, shall make adjustments, if required, to the
definition of the geographical boundary of the affected project area,
based on comments received from the public. Within fourteen calendar
days after the public comment period, the department shall set the
boundaries of the affected project area in units no smaller than a
precinct as defined in RCW ((29.01.120)) 29A.04.121.
(8) The department, in consultation with the local involvement
committee, shall develop a description for selected project proposals.
After developing the description of the project proposal, the
department shall publish the project proposal description in newspapers
of general circulation for seven calendar days in the affected project
area. Within fourteen calendar days after the last day of the
publication of the project proposal description, the department shall
transmit a copy of the map depicting the affected project area and the
description of the project proposal to the county auditor of the county
in which any portion of the affected project area is located.
(9) ((The department shall provide the legislative transportation
committee with progress reports on the status of the definition of the
affected project area and the description of the project proposal.
(10))) Upon receipt of the map and the description of the project
proposal, the county auditor shall, within thirty days, verify the
precincts that are located within the affected project area. The
county auditor shall prepare the text identifying and describing the
affected project area and the project proposal using the definition of
the geographical boundary of the affected project area and the project
description submitted by the department and shall set an election date
for the submission of a ballot proposition authorizing the imposition
of tolls or user fees to implement the proposed project within the
affected project area, which date may be the next succeeding general
election to be held in the state, or at a special election, if
requested by the department. The text of the project proposal must
appear in a voter's pamphlet for the affected project area. The
department shall pay the costs of publication and distribution. The
special election date must be the next date for a special election
provided under RCW ((29.13.020)) 29A.04.330 that is at least sixty days
but, if authorized under RCW ((29.13.020)) 29A.04.330, no more than
ninety days after the receipt of the final map and project description
by the auditor. The department shall pay the cost of an election held
under this section.
(((11))) (10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
department may contract with a private developer of a selected project
proposal to conduct environmental impact studies, a public involvement
program, and engineering and technical studies funded by the
legislature. For projects subject to this subsection, the department
shall not enter into an agreement under RCW 47.46.040 prior to the
advisory vote on the preferred alternative.
(((12))) (11) Subsections (5) through (((10))) (9) of this section
shall not apply to project proposals selected prior to September 1,
1994, that have no organized public opposition as demonstrated by the
submission to the department of original petitions bearing at least
five thousand signatures of individuals opposing the project, collected
and submitted after September 1, 1994, and by thirty calendar days
after June 16, 1995.
(((13))) (12) Subsections (5) through (((10))) (9) of this section
shall not apply to project proposals selected after June 30, 1997, that
have no organized public opposition as demonstrated by the submission
to the department of original petitions bearing at least five thousand
signatures of individuals opposing the project, collected and submitted
by ninety calendar days after project selection.

Sec. 133 RCW 47.46.040 and 2002 c 114 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary or a designee shall consult with legal,
financial, and other experts within and outside state government in the
negotiation and development of the agreements.
(2) Agreements may provide for private ownership of the projects
during the construction period. After completion and final acceptance
of each project or discrete segment thereof, the agreement may provide
for state ownership of the transportation systems and facilities and
lease to the private entity unless the state elects to provide for
ownership of the facility by the private entity during the term of the
agreement.
The state may lease each of the demonstration projects, or
applicable project segments, to the private entities for operating
purposes for up to fifty years.
(3) The department may exercise any power possessed by it to
facilitate the development, construction, financing operation, and
maintenance of transportation projects under this section. Agreements
for maintenance services entered into under this section shall provide
for full reimbursement for services rendered by the department or other
state agencies. Agreements for police services for projects, involving
state highway routes, developed under agreements shall be entered into
with the Washington state patrol. The agreement for police services
shall provide that the state patrol will be reimbursed for costs on a
comparable basis with the costs incurred for comparable service on
other state highway routes. The department may provide services for
which it is reimbursed, including but not limited to preliminary
planning, environmental certification, and preliminary design of the
demonstration projects.
(4) The plans and specifications for each project constructed under
this section shall comply with the department's standards for state
projects. A facility constructed by and leased to a private entity is
deemed to be a part of the state highway system for purposes of
identification, maintenance, and enforcement of traffic laws and for
the purposes of applicable sections of this title. Upon reversion of
the facility to the state, the project must meet all applicable state
standards. Agreements shall address responsibility for reconstruction
or renovations that are required in order for a facility to meet all
applicable state standards upon reversion of the facility to the state.
(5) For the purpose of facilitating these projects and to assist
the private entity in the financing, development, construction, and
operation of the transportation systems and facilities, the agreements
may include provisions for the department to exercise its authority,
including the lease of facilities, rights of way, and airspace,
exercise of the power of eminent domain, granting of development rights
and opportunities, granting of necessary easements and rights of
access, issuance of permits and other authorizations, protection from
competition, remedies in the event of default of either of the parties,
granting of contractual and real property rights, liability during
construction and the term of the lease, authority to negotiate
acquisition of rights of way in excess of appraised value, and any
other provision deemed necessary by the secretary.
(6) The agreements entered into under this section may include
provisions authorizing the state to grant necessary easements and lease
to a private entity existing rights of way or rights of way
subsequently acquired with public or private financing. The agreements
may also include provisions to lease to the entity airspace above or
below the right of way associated or to be associated with the private
entity's transportation facility. In consideration for the reversion
rights in these privately constructed facilities, the department may
negotiate a charge for the lease of airspace rights during the term of
the agreement for a period not to exceed fifty years. If, after the
expiration of this period, the department continues to lease these
airspace rights to the private entity, it shall do so only at fair
market value. The agreement may also provide the private entity the
right of first refusal to undertake projects utilizing airspace owned
by the state in the vicinity of the public-private project.
(7) Agreements under this section may include any contractual
provision that is necessary to protect the project revenues required to
repay the costs incurred to study, plan, design, finance, acquire,
build, install, operate, enforce laws, and maintain toll highways,
bridges, and tunnels and which will not unreasonably inhibit or
prohibit the development of additional public transportation systems
and facilities. Agreements under this section must secure and maintain
liability insurance coverage in amounts appropriate to protect the
project's viability and may address state indemnification of the
private entity for design and construction liability where the state
has approved relevant design and construction plans.
(8) Agreements entered into under this section shall include a
process that provides for public involvement in decision making with
respect to the development of the projects.
(9)(a) In carrying out the public involvement process required in
subsection (8) of this section, the private entity shall proactively
seek public participation through a process appropriate to the
characteristics of the project that assesses and demonstrates public
support among: Users of the project, residents of communities in the
vicinity of the project, and residents of communities impacted by the
project.
(b) The private entity shall conduct a comprehensive public
involvement process that provides, periodically throughout the
development and implementation of the project, users and residents of
communities in the affected project area an opportunity to comment upon
key issues regarding the project including, but not limited to: (i)
Alternative sizes and scopes; (ii) design; (iii) environmental
assessment; (iv) right of way and access plans; (v) traffic impacts;
(vi) tolling or user fee strategies and tolling or user fee ranges;
(vii) project cost; (viii) construction impacts; (ix) facility
operation; and (x) any other salient characteristics.
(c) If the affected project area has not been defined, the private
entity shall define the affected project area by conducting, at a
minimum: (i) A comparison of the estimated percentage of residents of
communities in the vicinity of the project and in other communities
impacted by the project who could be subject to tolls or user fees and
the estimated percentage of other users and transient traffic that
could be subject to tolls or user fees; (ii) an analysis of the
anticipated traffic diversion patterns; (iii) an analysis of the
potential economic impact resulting from proposed toll rates or user
fee rates imposed on residents, commercial traffic, and commercial
entities in communities in the vicinity of and impacted by the project;
(iv) an analysis of the economic impact of tolls or user fees on the
price of goods and services generally; and (v) an analysis of the
relationship of the project to state transportation needs and benefits.
The agreement may require an advisory vote by users of and
residents in the affected project area.
(d) In seeking public participation, the private entity shall
establish a local involvement committee or committees comprised of
residents of the affected project area, individuals who represent
cities and counties in the affected project area, organizations formed
to support or oppose the project, if such organizations exist, and
users of the project. The private entity shall, at a minimum,
establish a committee as required under the specifications of RCW
47.46.030(6)(b) (ii) and (iii) and appointments to such committee shall
be made no later than thirty days after the project area is defined.
(e) Local involvement committees shall act in an advisory capacity
to the department and the private entity on all issues related to the
development and implementation of the public involvement process
established under this section.
(f) The department and the private entity shall provide the
((legislative transportation committee and)) local involvement
committees with progress reports on the status of the public
involvement process including the results of an advisory vote, if any
occurs.
(10) Nothing in this chapter limits the right of the secretary and
his or her agents to render such advice and to make such
recommendations as they deem to be in the best interests of the state
and the public.

Sec. 134 RCW 79A.05.125 and 1999 c 301 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of transportation shall negotiate a franchise
with a rail carrier to establish and maintain a rail line over portions
of the Milwaukee Road corridor owned by the state between Ellensburg
and Lind. The department of transportation may negotiate such a
franchise with any qualified rail carrier. Criteria for negotiating
the franchise and establishing the right of way include:
(a) Assurances that resources from the franchise will be sufficient
to compensate the state for use of the property, including completion
of a cross-state trail between Easton and the Idaho border;
(b) Types of payment for use of the franchise, including payment
for the use of federally granted trust lands in the transportation
corridor;
(c) Standards for maintenance of the line;
(d) Provisions ensuring that both the conventional and intermodal
rail service needs of local shippers are met. Such accommodations may
comprise agreements with the franchisee to offer or maintain adequate
service or to provide service by other carriers at commercially
reasonable rates;
(e) Provisions requiring the franchisee, upon reasonable request of
any other rail operator, to provide rail service and interchange
freight over what is commonly known as the Stampede Pass rail line from
Cle Elum to Auburn at commercially reasonable rates;
(f) If any part of the franchise agreement is invalidated by
actions or rulings of the federal surface transportation board or a
court of competent jurisdiction, the remaining portions of the
franchise agreement are not affected;
(g) Compliance with environmental standards; and
(h) Provisions for insurance and the coverage of liability.
(2) The franchise may provide for periodic review of financial
arrangements under the franchise.
(3) The department of transportation, in consultation with the
parks and recreation commission and the ((legislative)) senate and
house transportation committees, shall negotiate the terms of the
franchise, and shall present the agreement to the parks and recreation
commission for approval of as to terms and provisions affecting the
cross-state trail or affecting the commission.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2006, if the department of
transportation does not enter into a franchise agreement for a rail
line over portions of the Milwaukee Road corridor by July 1, 2006.

Sec. 135 RCW 81.80.395 and 1988 c 138 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington utilities and transportation commission may enter
into an agreement or arrangement with a duly authorized representative
of the state of Idaho, for the purpose of granting to operators of
commercial vehicles that are properly registered in the state of Idaho,
the privilege of operating their vehicles in this state within a
designated area near the border of their state without the need for
registration as required by chapter 81.80 RCW if the state of Idaho
grants a similar privilege to operators of commercial vehicles from
this state. The initial designated area shall be limited to state
route 195 from the Idaho border to Lewiston, and SR 12 from Lewiston to
Clarkston. ((The utilities and transportation commission shall submit
other proposed reciprocal agreements in designated border areas to the
legislative transportation committee for approval.))

Sec. 136 RCW 81.104.110 and 1998 c 245 s 165 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature recognizes that the planning processes described in
RCW 81.104.100 provide a recognized framework for guiding high capacity
transportation studies. However, the process cannot guarantee
appropriate decisions unless key study assumptions are reasonable.
To assure appropriate system plan assumptions and to provide for
review of system plan results, an expert review panel shall be
appointed to provide independent technical review for development of
any system plan which is to be funded in whole or in part by the
imposition of any voter-approved local option funding sources
enumerated in RCW 81.104.140.
(1) The expert review panel shall consist of five to ten members
who are recognized experts in relevant fields, such as transit
operations, planning, emerging transportation technologies,
engineering, finance, law, the environment, geography, economics, and
political science.
(2) The expert review panel shall be selected cooperatively by the
chairs of the ((legislative)) senate and house transportation
committees, the secretary of the department of transportation, and the
governor to assure a balance of disciplines. In the case of counties
adjoining another state or Canadian province the expert review panel
membership shall be selected cooperatively with representatives of the
adjoining state or Canadian province.
(3) The chair of the expert review panel shall be designated by the
appointing authorities.
(4) The expert review panel shall serve without compensation but
shall be reimbursed for expenses according to ((chapter 43.03)) RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Reimbursement shall be paid from within the
existing resources of the local authority planning under this chapter.
(5) The panel shall carry out the duties set forth in subsections
(6) and (7) of this section until the date on which an election is held
to consider the high capacity transportation system and financing
plans. ((Funds appropriated for expenses of the expert panel shall be
administered by the department of transportation.))
(6) The expert panel shall review all reports required in RCW
81.104.100(2) and shall concentrate on service modes and concepts,
costs, patronage and financing evaluations.
(7) The expert panel shall provide timely reviews and comments on
individual reports and study conclusions to the department of
transportation, the regional transportation planning organization, the
joint regional policy committee, and the submitting lead transit
agency. In the case of counties adjoining another state or Canadian
province, the expert review panel shall provide its reviews, comments,
and conclusions to the representatives of the adjoining state or
Canadian province.
(8) The ((legislative transportation committee)) local authority
planning under this chapter shall contract for consulting services for
expert review panels. The amount of consultant support shall be
negotiated with each expert review panel by the ((legislative
transportation committee)) local authority and shall be paid from
((appropriations for that purpose from the high capacity transportation
account)) within the local authority's existing resources.

Sec. 137 RCW 82.33.020 and 1992 c 231 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Four times each year the supervisor shall prepare, subject to
the approval of the economic and revenue forecast council under RCW
82.33.010:
(a) An official state economic and revenue forecast;
(b) An unofficial state economic and revenue forecast based on
optimistic economic and revenue projections; and
(c) An unofficial state economic and revenue forecast based on
pessimistic economic and revenue projections.
(2) The supervisor shall submit forecasts prepared under this
section, along with any unofficial forecasts provided under RCW
82.33.010, to the governor and the members of the committees on ways
and means and the chairs of the committees on transportation of the
senate and house of representatives ((and the chair of the legislative
transportation committee)), including one copy to the staff of each of
the committees, on or before November 20th, February 20th in the even-numbered years, March 20th in the odd-numbered years, June 20th, and
September 20th. All forecasts shall include both estimated receipts
and estimated revenues in conformance with generally accepted
accounting principles as provided by RCW 43.88.037.
(3) All agencies of state government shall provide to the
supervisor immediate access to all information relating to economic and
revenue forecasts. Revenue collection information shall be available
to the supervisor the first business day following the conclusion of
each collection period.
(4) The economic and revenue forecast supervisor and staff shall
co-locate and share information, data, and files with the tax research
section of the department of revenue but shall not duplicate the duties
and functions of one another.
(5) As part of its forecasts under subsection (1) of this section,
the supervisor shall provide estimated revenue from tuition fees as
defined in RCW 28B.15.020.

Sec. 138 RCW 82.70.060 and 2003 c 364 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commute trip reduction task force shall determine the
effectiveness of the tax credit under RCW 82.70.020, the grant program
in RCW 70.94.996, and the relative effectiveness of the tax credit and
the grant program as part of its ongoing evaluation of the commute trip
reduction law and report to the ((legislative)) senate and house
transportation committees and to the fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and the senate. The report must include information on
the amount of tax credits claimed to date and recommendations on future
funding between the tax credit program and the grant program. The
report must be incorporated into the recommendations required in RCW
70.94.537(5).

Sec. 139 RCW 82.80.070 and 2002 c 56 s 413 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The proceeds collected pursuant to the exercise of the local
option authority of RCW 82.80.010, ((82.80.020,)) 82.80.030, and
82.80.050 (hereafter called "local option transportation revenues")
shall be used for transportation purposes only, including but not
limited to the following: The operation and preservation of roads,
streets, and other transportation improvements; new construction,
reconstruction, and expansion of city streets, county roads, and state
highways and other transportation improvements; development and
implementation of public transportation and high-capacity transit
improvements and programs; and planning, design, and acquisition of
right of way and sites for such transportation purposes. The proceeds
collected from excise taxes on the sale, distribution, or use of motor
vehicle fuel and special fuel under RCW 82.80.010 shall be used
exclusively for "highway purposes" as that term is construed in Article
II, section 40 of the state Constitution.
(2) The local option transportation revenues shall be expended for
transportation uses consistent with the adopted transportation and land
use plans of the jurisdiction expending the funds and consistent with
any applicable and adopted regional transportation plan for
metropolitan planning areas.
(3) Each local government with a population greater than eight
thousand that levies or expends local option transportation funds, is
also required to develop and adopt a specific transportation program
that contains the following elements:
(a) The program shall identify the geographic boundaries of the
entire area or areas within which local option transportation revenues
will be levied and expended.
(b) The program shall be based on an adopted transportation plan
for the geographic areas covered and shall identify the proposed
operation and construction of transportation improvements and services
in the designated plan area intended to be funded in whole or in part
by local option transportation revenues and shall identify the annual
costs applicable to the program.
(c) The program shall indicate how the local transportation plan is
coordinated with applicable transportation plans for the region and for
adjacent jurisdictions.
(d) The program shall include at least a six-year funding plan,
updated annually, identifying the specific public and private sources
and amounts of revenue necessary to fund the program. The program
shall include a proposed schedule for construction of projects and
expenditure of revenues. The funding plan shall consider the
additional local tax revenue estimated to be generated by new
development within the plan area if all or a portion of the additional
revenue is proposed to be earmarked as future appropriations for
transportation improvements in the program.
(4) Local governments with a population greater than eight thousand
exercising the authority for local option transportation funds shall
periodically review and update their transportation program to ensure
that it is consistent with applicable local and regional transportation
and land use plans and within the means of estimated public and private
revenue available.
(5) In the case of expenditure for new or expanded transportation
facilities, improvements, and services, priorities in the use of local
option transportation revenues shall be identified in the
transportation program and expenditures shall be made based upon the
following criteria, which are stated in descending order of weight to
be attributed:
(a) First, the project serves a multijurisdictional function;
(b) Second, it is necessitated by existing or reasonably
foreseeable congestion;
(c) Third, it has the greatest person-carrying capacity;
(d) Fourth, it is partially funded by other government funds, such
as from the state transportation improvement board, or by private
sector contributions, such as those from the local transportation act,
chapter 39.92 RCW; and
(e) Fifth, it meets such other criteria as the local government
determines is appropriate.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature that as a condition of
levying, receiving, and expending local option transportation revenues,
no local government agency use the revenues to replace, divert, or loan
any revenues currently being used for transportation purposes to
nontransportation purposes. ((The association of Washington cities and
the Washington state association of counties, in consultation with the
legislative transportation committee, shall study the issue of
nondiversion and make recommendations to the legislative transportation
committee for language implementing the intent of this section by
December 1, 1990.))
(7) Local governments are encouraged to enter into interlocal
agreements to jointly develop and adopt with other local governments
the transportation programs required by this section for the purpose of
accomplishing regional transportation planning and development.
(8) Local governments may use all or a part of the local option
transportation revenues for the amortization of local government
general obligation and revenue bonds issued for transportation purposes
consistent with the requirements of this section.
(9) Subsections (1) through (8) of this section do not apply to a
regional transportation investment district imposing a tax or fee under
the local option authority of this chapter. Proceeds collected under
the exercise of local option authority under this chapter by a district
must be used in accordance with chapter 36.120 RCW.

Sec. 140 RCW 90.03.525 and 1996 c 285 s 1 and 1996 c 230 s 1617
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The rate charged by a local government utility to the
department of transportation with respect to state highway right of way
or any section of state highway right of way for the construction,
operation, and maintenance of storm water control facilities under
chapters 35.67, 35.92, 36.89, 36.94, 57.08, and 86.15 RCW, shall be
thirty percent of the rate for comparable real property, except as
otherwise provided in this section. The rate charged to the department
with respect to state highway right of way or any section of state
highway right of way within a local government utility's jurisdiction
shall not, however, exceed the rate charged for comparable city street
or county road right of way within the same jurisdiction. The
legislature finds that the aforesaid rates are presumptively fair and
equitable because of the traditional and continuing expenditures of the
department of transportation for the construction, operation, and
maintenance of storm water control facilities designed to control
surface water or storm water runoff from state highway rights of way.
(2) Charges paid under subsection (1) of this section by the
department of transportation must be used solely for storm water
control facilities that directly reduce state highway runoff impacts or
implementation of best management practices that will reduce the need
for such facilities. By January 1st of each year, beginning with
calendar year 1997, the local government utility, in coordination with
the department, shall develop a plan for the expenditure of the charges
for that calendar year. The plan must be consistent with the
objectives identified in RCW 90.78.010. In addition, beginning with
the submittal for 1998, the utility shall provide a progress report on
the use of charges assessed for the prior year. No charges may be paid
until the plan and report have been submitted to the department.
(3) The utility imposing the charge and the department of
transportation may, however, agree to either higher or lower rates with
respect to the construction, operation, or maintenance of any specific
storm water control facilities based upon the annual plan prescribed in
subsection (2) of this section. ((If a different rate is agreed to, a
report so stating shall be submitted to the legislative transportation
committee.)) If, after mediation, the local government utility and the
department of transportation cannot agree upon the proper rate, ((and
after a report has been submitted to the legislative transportation
committee and after ninety days from submission of such report,))
either may commence an action in the superior court for the county in
which the state highway right of way is located to establish the proper
rate. The court in establishing the proper rate shall take into
account the extent and adequacy of storm water control facilities
constructed by the department and the actual benefits to the sections
of state highway rights of way from storm water control facilities
constructed, operated, and maintained by the local government utility.
Control of surface water runoff and storm water runoff from state
highway rights of way shall be deemed an actual benefit to the state
highway rights of way. The rate for sections of state highway right of
way as determined by the court shall be set forth in terms of the
percentage of the rate for comparable real property, but shall in no
event exceed the rate charged for comparable city street or county road
right of way within the same jurisdiction.
(4) The legislature finds that the federal clean water act
(national ((pollution [pollutant])) pollutant discharge elimination
system, 40 C.F.R. parts 122-124), the state water pollution control
act, chapter 90.48 RCW, and the highway runoff program under chapter
((90.70)) 90.71 RCW, mandate the treatment and control of storm water
runoff from state highway rights of way owned by the department of
transportation. Appropriations made by the legislature to the
department of transportation for the construction, operation, and
maintenance of storm water control facilities are intended to address
applicable federal and state mandates related to storm water control
and treatment. This section is not intended to limit opportunities for
sharing the costs of storm water improvements between cities, counties,
and the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 141 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 44.40.010 (Creation -- Composition -- Appointments--Vacancies--Rules) and 1999 sp.s. c 1 s 616, 1980 c 87 s 39, 1971 ex.s.
c 195 s 1, 1967 ex.s. c 145 s 68, 1965 ex.s. c 170 s 64, & 1963 ex.s.
c 3 s 35;
(2) RCW 44.40.013 (Administration) and 2001 c 259 s 5;
(3) RCW 44.40.015 (Executive committee--Selection--Duties) and 2001
c 259 s 6 & 1999 sp.s. c 1 s 617;
(4) RCW 44.40.030 (Participation in activities of other
organizations) and 1982 c 227 s 17, 1977 ex.s. c 235 s 7, 1971 ex.s. c
195 s 3, & 1963 ex.s. c 3 s 38;
(5) RCW 44.40.040 (Members' allowances -- Procedure for payment of
committee's expenses) and 2001 c 259 s 7, 1979 c 151 s 157, 1977 ex.s.
c 235 s 8, 1975 1st ex.s. c 268 s 3, 1971 ex.s. c 195 s 4, & 1963 ex.s.
c 3 s 39;
(6) RCW 44.40.090 (Delegation of powers and duties to senate and
house transportation committees) and 2001 c 259 s 8, 1977 ex.s. c 235
s 10, & 1973 1st ex.s. c 210 s 2;
(7) RCW 44.40.140 (Review of policy on fees imposed on nonpolluting
fuels -- Report) and 1983 c 212 s 2;
(8) RCW 44.40.150 (Study -- Recommendations for consideration--Staffing) and 1998 c 245 s 88 & 1989 1st ex.s. c 6 s 14;
(9) RCW 44.40.161 (Audit review of transportation-related agencies)
and 2003 c 362 s 16;
(10) RCW 53.08.350 (Moratorium on runway construction or extension,
or initiation of new service -- Certain counties affected) and 1992 c 190
s 2;
(11) RCW 44.40.020 (Powers, duties, and studies) and 1996 c 129 s
9, 1977 ex.s. c 235 s 5, 1975 1st ex.s. c 268 s 1, & 1963 ex.s. c 3 s
36;
(12) RCW 44.40.070 (State transportation agencies -- Comprehensive
programs and financial plans) and 1998 c 245 s 87, 1988 c 167 s 10,
1979 ex.s. c 192 s 3, 1979 c 158 s 112, 1977 ex.s. c 235 s 9, & 1973
1st ex.s. c 201 s 1;
(13) RCW 44.40.080 (State transportation agencies -- Recommended
budget -- Preparation and presentation -- Contents) and 1973 1st ex.s. c
201 s 2;
(14) RCW 44.40.100 (Contracts and programs authorized) and 2001 c
259 s 9, 1977 ex.s. c 235 s 11, 1975 1st ex.s. c 268 s 7, & 1973 1st
ex.s. c 210 s 3;
(15) RCW 46.23.040 (Review of agreement by legislative
transportation committee) and 1982 c 212 s 4;
(16) RCW 47.01.145 (Study reports available to legislators upon
request) and 1984 c 7 s 76, 1971 ex.s. c 195 s 6, & 1967 ex.s. c 145 s
78;
(17) RCW 47.05.090 (Application of 1993 c 490 -- Deviations) and 1993
c 490 s 6;
(18) RCW 47.12.360 (Advanced environmental mitigation -- Reports) and
1997 c 140 s 5;
(19) RCW 47.76.340 (Evaluating program performance) and 1993 c 224
s 13 & 1990 c 43 s 8;
(20) RCW 47.74.010 (Multistate Highway Transportation Agreement
enacted, terms) and 1983 c 82 s 1; and
(21) RCW 47.74.020 (Appointment of delegates to represent state)
and 1983 c 82 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 142 Part headings used in this act are no part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143 (1) RCW 44.40.120 is recodified as a
section in chapter 44.04 RCW.
(2) RCW 44.40.025 is recodified as a section in chapter 43.88 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005, except for section 103 of this act which takes effect
July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 145 Section 138 of this act expires July 1,
2013.

--- END ---