BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.26.164 and 2002 c 158 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No later than July 1, ((2003)) 2005, the department shall adopt
rules to allow a member who meets the criteria set forth in subsection
(2) of this section to choose an actuarially equivalent benefit that
pays the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such
portion of the member's reduced retirement allowance as the department
by rule designates shall be continued throughout the life of a spouse
ineligible for survivor benefits under RCW 41.26.160 or 41.26.161.
(2) To choose an actuarially equivalent benefit according to
subsection (1) of this section, a member shall:
(a) Have a portion of the retirement allowance payable to the
retiree that is not subject to periodic payments pursuant to a property
division obligation as provided for in RCW 41.50.670; and
(b) ((Have no qualified ex spouse under RCW 41.26.162(1); and
(c))) Choose an actuarially reduced benefit equivalent to that
portion not subject to periodic payments under (a) of this subsection
during a one-year period beginning one year after the date of marriage
to the survivor benefit-ineligible spouse.
(3) A member who married a spouse ineligible for survivor benefits
under RCW 41.26.160 or 41.26.161 prior to the effective date of the
rules adopted under this section and satisfies ((the conditions of))
subsection (2)(a) ((and (b))) of this section has one year to designate
their spouse as a survivor beneficiary following the adoption of the
rules.
(4) No benefit provided to a child survivor beneficiary under RCW
41.26.160 or 41.26.161 is affected or reduced by the member's selection
of the actuarially reduced spousal survivor benefit provided by this
section.
(5)(a) Any member who chose to receive a reduced retirement
allowance under subsection (1) of this section is entitled to receive
a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of this
subsection if:
(i) The retiree's survivor spouse designated in subsection (1) of
this section predeceases the retiree; and
(ii) The retiree provides to the department proper proof of the
designated beneficiary's death.
(b) The retirement allowance payable to the retiree from the
beginning of the month following the date of the ((beneficiaries
[beneficiary's])) beneficiary's death shall be increased by the
following:
(i) One hundred percent multiplied by the result of (b)(ii) of this
subsection converted to a percent;
(ii) Subtract one from the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and
survivor option factor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---