BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Brominated flame retardant" means any chemical containing the
element bromine that may be added to a plastic, foam, or textile to
inhibit flame formation. Brominated flame retardant includes, but is
not limited to, a chemical or group of chemicals known as
polybrominated biphenyls, polybrominated diphenyl ethers,
tetrabromobisphenol-A, and hexabromocyclododecane.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Manufacturer" includes any person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint
venture that produces a product containing polybrominated diphenyl
ethers or an importer or domestic distributor of a noncomestible
product containing polybrominated diphenyl ethers.
(4) "Polybrominated diphenyl ethers" means chemical forms that
consist of diphenyl ethers bound with bromine atoms. Polybrominated
diphenyl ethers include, but are not limited to, the three primary
forms of the commercial mixtures known as pentabromodiphenylether
(penta-bde), octabromodiphenylether (octa-bde), and
decabromodiphenylether (deca-bde).
(5) "Commercial decabromodiphenylether" means the chemical mixture
of decabromodiphenylether, including associated polybrominated diphenyl
ether impurities not intentionally added. No single polybrominated
diphenyl ether impurity shall exceed one percent by mass of the mixture
and the combination of all polybrominated diphenyl ether impurities
shall not exceed four percent by mass of the mixture.
(6) "Transportation vehicle" means any mechanized vehicle that is
used to transport goods or people including, but not limited to,
airplanes, automobiles, motorcycles, trucks, buses, trains, boats,
ships, streetcars, or monorail cars.
(7) "Used product" means any product that has been previously
owned, purchased, or sold in commerce. "Used product" does not include
any product manufactured after July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Except as provided in subsections (3)
through (6) of this section, after July 1, 2007, no person may
manufacture or knowingly sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale
or distribute for use in this state noncomestible products containing
polybrominated diphenyl ethers.
(2) A manufacturer of products containing a polybrominated diphenyl
ether that has been restricted under this section must, once the
restriction takes effect, notify persons that sell the manufacturer's
products about the provisions of this section.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to:
(a) The manufacture, sale, repair, distribution, maintenance,
refurbishment, or modification of any raw material or component part
used in a transportation vehicle or any new transportation vehicle with
component parts, including original parts and spare parts, containing
commercial decabromodiphenylether;
(b) The sale or distribution of any used transportation vehicle
with component parts containing polybrominated diphenyl ethers;
(c) The sale of any used transportation vehicle parts, or new
transportation vehicle parts manufactured prior to July 1, 2007, that
contain polybrominated diphenyl ethers;
(d) The use of commercial decabromodiphenylether in the
maintenance, refurbishment, or modification of transportation
equipment;
(e) The manufacture, sale, repair, distribution, maintenance,
refurbishment, or modification of equipment containing polybrominated
diphenyl ethers and used primarily for military or federally funded
space program applications. This exemption does not cover consumer-based goods with broad applicability;
(f) The sale or distribution by a business, charity, or private
party of any used product containing polybrominated diphenyl ethers; or
(g) The manufacture, sale, or distribution of any new product or
product component consisting of recycled or used materials containing
commercial decabromodiphenylether. Products containing any new
polybrominated diphenyl ethers do not qualify for this exemption.
(4) In addition to the specific exemptions authorized in this
section, a manufacturer or user of a commercial decabromodiphenylether
product may apply for an exemption for a specific use of commercial
decabromodiphenylether by filing a written petition with the
department. An exemption may be granted for a term not to exceed three
years and may be renewed upon written application if the department
finds that the specific use of commercial decabromodiphenylether
continues to meet the criteria of this section and the manufacturer or
other persons comply with the conditions of its original approval. The
department may grant an exemption for a specified use of commercial
decabromodiphenylether with or without conditions upon finding that the
petitioner has demonstrated that:
(a) A technically feasible alternative to the use of commercial
decabromodiphenylether is not available at reasonable cost; or
(b) The potential harm to public health and the environment
directly posed by a technically feasible and available alternative is
greater than the potential harm posed by commercial
decabromodiphenylether.
(5) A manufacturer or user of safety systems required by the
federal aviation administration may apply for an exemption for a
specific use of penta-bde or octa-bde by filing a written petition with
the department. The exemption may be granted for a term not to exceed
eighteen months and may be renewed upon written application if the
department finds that the specific use of penta-bde or octa-bde
continues to meet the criteria of this section and the manufacturer or
other persons comply with the conditions of its original approval. The
department may grant an exemption for a specified use of penta-bde or
octa-bde with or without conditions upon finding that the petitioner
has demonstrated that:
(a) A technically feasible alternative to the use of penta-bde or
octa-bde is not available at reasonable cost; or
(b) The potential harm to public health and the environment
directly posed by a technically feasible and available alternative is
greater than the potential harm posed by penta-bde or octa-bde.
(6) The governor may, by executive order, allow for the
manufacture, sale, and distribution of products containing commercial
decabromodiphenylether between July 1, 2007, and July 1, 2008, if the
governor finds that a technically feasible alternative to the use of
commercial decabromodiphenylether is not available at reasonable cost
or that the potential harm to public health and the environment
directly posed by a technically feasible and available alternative is
greater than the potential harm posed by commercial
decabromodiphenylether.
(7) For the purposes of this section, a "technically feasible
alternative that is available at a reasonable cost" means an
alternative that is available at a cost and in sufficient quantity to
permit the manufacturer or user to maintain an economically viable
product.
(8) Nothing in this section restricts the ability of a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor from transporting products
containing polybrominated diphenyl ethers through the state, or storing
such products in the state for later distribution outside the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Subject to available funding, the
department and the department of health shall conduct two separate
stakeholder processes to develop a proposal for a ban or restrictions
on the use of commercial decabromodiphenylether in transportation
vehicles and to develop a proposal for the ban or management of used
and recycled products containing polybrominated diphenyl ethers. These
stakeholder processes shall include:
(a) Establishing a timeline for a ban or restrictions on the use of
commercial decabromodiphenylether in transportation vehicles based on
an evaluation of the availability of safer alternatives;
(b) An examination of problems related to the reuse and recycling
of products containing polybrominated diphenyl ethers and methods of
management or disposal that will result in the lowest potential for
polybrominated diphenyl ethers entering the environment, the food
chain, or a person's body; and
(c) An examination of approaches to education under this chapter
that would assist retailers in identifying products containing
polybrominated diphenyl ethers in their inventory.
(2) The department and the department of health shall report the
findings and recommendations of the stakeholder process regarding the
ban or restrictions on the use of commercial decabromodiphenylether and
the education and assistance for retailers to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 15, 2005. The department and
the department of health shall report the findings and recommendations
of the stakeholder process regarding the ban or management of used and
recycled products to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
June 30, 2006. The preparation of the reports required in this
subsection is subject to available funding.
(3) The department and the department of health shall conduct a
review of the issues and the potential timeline for a requirement to
label brominated flame retardants sold in Washington. The review shall
include the type of information required on the label, including
guidance on proper waste management of the product in accordance with
state and federal law. The department and the department of health
shall report the findings and recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 15, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) By January 1, 2006, the department of
general administration shall:
(a) Give priority and preference to the purchase of equipment,
supplies, and other products that do not contain polybrominated
diphenyl ethers; and
(b) Make available for purchase and use by all state agencies only
equipment, supplies, and other products that do not contain
polybrominated diphenyl ethers.
(2) The department of general administration shall, by January 1,
2006, revise its rules, policies, and guidelines to implement the
purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A manufacturer of products containing
polybrominated diphenyl ethers in violation of this chapter is
punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars for
each violation in the case of a first offense. Manufacturers who are
repeat violators are liable for a civil penalty not to exceed five
thousand dollars for each repeat offense. Penalties collected under
this section must be deposited in the state toxics control account
created in RCW 70.105D.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---