BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.01.140 and 2003 c 370 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county auditor, if appointed by the director of licensing
shall carry out the provisions of this title relating to the licensing
of vehicles and the issuance of vehicle license number plates under the
direction and supervision of the director and may with the approval of
the director appoint assistants as special deputies and recommend
subagents to accept applications and collect fees for vehicle licenses
and transfers and to deliver vehicle license number plates.
(2) A county auditor appointed by the director may request that the
director appoint subagencies within the county.
(a) Upon authorization of the director, the auditor shall use an
open competitive process including, but not limited to, a written
business proposal and oral interview to determine the qualifications of
all interested applicants.
(b) A subagent may recommend a successor who is either the
subagent's sibling, spouse, or child, or a subagency employee, as long
as the recommended successor participates in the open, competitive
process used to select an applicant. In making successor
recommendation and appointment determinations, the following provisions
apply:
(i) If a subagency is held by a partnership or corporate entity,
the nomination must be submitted on behalf of, and agreed to by, all
partners or corporate officers.
(ii) No subagent may receive any direct or indirect compensation or
remuneration from any party or entity in recognition of a successor
nomination. A subagent may not receive any financial benefit from the
transfer or termination of an appointment.
(iii) (a) and (b) of this subsection are intended to assist in the
efficient transfer of appointments in order to minimize public
inconvenience. They do not create a proprietary or property interest
in the appointment.
(c) The auditor shall submit all proposals to the director, and
shall recommend the appointment of one or more subagents who have
applied through the open competitive process. The auditor shall
include in his or her recommendation to the director, not only the name
of the successor who is a relative or employee, if applicable and if
otherwise qualified, but also the name of one other applicant who is
qualified and was chosen through the open competitive process. The
director has final appointment authority.
(d)(i) Notwithstanding (a) through (c) of this subsection, if a
subagent's recommendation of a successor is:
(A) The subagent's sibling, spouse, child, or subagency employee;
(B) In the case of a subagent that is an entity, the sibling,
spouse, child, or subagency employee of an individual having a
controlling interest in the subagent; or
(C) An entity controlled by a person described in either (d)(i)(A)
or (B) of this subsection;
and the subagent's recommendation of a successor is accompanied by a
statement in writing by the subagent that the recommendation is made
for the purpose of enabling the individual making the recommendation to
retire, and if the subagent's recommendation is accompanied by an
application for appointment as successor subagent signed by the person
recommended, in such form as the director may specify, then the auditor
shall submit the subagent's recommendation together with the
application to the director, who shall proceed to appoint the person
submitting the application as successor subagent if the person
submitting the application is otherwise qualified to act as a subagent.
If the director determines that the person making the application is
not qualified to act as successor subagent and declines to accept the
application, the existing subagent's appointment and subagency contract
shall not be affected, but shall remain in full force and effect.
(ii) Notwithstanding (a) through (c) of this subsection or any
provisions of a subagency contract to the contrary, if:
(A) The death of an individual subagent, or, if the subagent is an
entity, the death of an individual having a controlling interest in a
subagent causes a subagent's appointment and subagency contract to
terminate;
(B) Such individual prior to his or her death has designated by
written notice to the county auditor and the director a sibling,
spouse, child, or subagent employee of that individual to whom the
individual recommends as successor subagent in the event of the
individual's death; and
(C) Within thirty days following the death of such individual, the
person so recommended, or an entity controlled by the recommended
person, submits to the county auditor a signed application for
appointment as successor subagent, in such form as the director may
specify;
then the county auditor shall submit the application to the director,
who shall proceed to appoint the person or entity submitting the
application as successor subagent if that person or entity is otherwise
qualified to act as a subagent.
(iii) Nothing in this subsection (2)(d) creates any proprietary or
property interest in a person's appointment as a subagent.
(3)(a) A county auditor who is appointed as an agent by the
department shall enter into a standard contract provided by the
director, developed with the advice of the title and registration
advisory committee.
(b) A subagent appointed under subsection (2) of this section shall
enter into a standard contract with the county auditor, developed with
the advice of the title and registration advisory committee. The
director shall provide the standard contract to county auditors.
(c) The contracts provided for in (a) and (b) of this subsection
must contain at a minimum provisions that:
(i) Describe the responsibilities, and where applicable, the
liability, of each party relating to the service expectations and
levels, equipment to be supplied by the department, and equipment
maintenance;
(ii) Require the specific type of insurance or bonds so that the
state is protected against any loss of collected motor vehicle tax
revenues or loss of equipment;
(iii) Specify the amount of training that will be provided by the
state, the county auditor, or subagents;
(iv) Describe allowable costs that may be charged to vehicle
licensing activities as provided for in (d) of this subsection;
(v) Describe the causes and procedures for termination of the
contract, which may include mediation and binding arbitration.
(d) The department shall develop procedures that will standardize
and prescribe allowable costs that may be assigned to vehicle licensing
and vessel registration and title activities performed by county
auditors.
(e) The contracts may include any provision that the director deems
necessary to ensure acceptable service and the full collection of
vehicle and vessel tax revenues.
(f) The director may waive any provisions of the contract deemed
necessary in order to ensure that readily accessible service is
provided to the citizens of the state.
(4)(a) At any time any application is made to the director, the
county auditor, or other agent pursuant to any law dealing with
licenses, registration, or the right to operate any vehicle or vessel
upon the public highways or waters of this state, excluding applicants
already paying such fee under RCW 46.16.070 or 46.16.085, the applicant
shall pay to the director, county auditor, or other agent a fee of
three dollars for each application in addition to any other fees
required by law.
(b) Counties that do not cover the expenses of vehicle licensing
and vessel registration and title activities may submit to the
department a request for cost-coverage moneys. The request must be
submitted on a form developed by the department. The department shall
develop procedures to verify whether a request is reasonable. Payment
shall be made on requests found to be allowable from the licensing
services account.
(c) Applicants for certificates of ownership, including applicants
paying fees under RCW 46.16.070 or 46.16.085, shall pay to the
director, county auditor, or other agent a fee of four dollars in
addition to any other fees required by law.
(d) The fees under (a) and (c) of this subsection, if paid to the
county auditor as agent of the director, or if paid to a subagent of
the county auditor, shall be paid to the county treasurer in the same
manner as other fees collected by the county auditor and credited to
the county current expense fund. If the fee is paid to another agent
of the director, the fee shall be used by the agent to defray his or
her expenses in handling the application.
(e) Applicants required to pay the three-dollar fee established
under (a) of this subsection, must pay an additional seventy-five
cents, which must be collected and remitted to the state treasurer and
distributed as follows:
(i) Fifty cents must be deposited into the department of licensing
services account of the motor vehicle fund and must be used for agent
and subagent support, which is to include but not be limited to the
replacement of department-owned equipment in the possession of agents
and subagents.
(ii) Twenty-five cents must be deposited into the license plate
technology account created under RCW 46.16.685.
(5) A subagent shall collect a service fee of (a) eight dollars and
fifty cents for changes in a certificate of ownership, with or without
registration renewal, or verification of record and preparation of an
affidavit of lost title other than at the time of the title application
or transfer and (b) three dollars and fifty cents for registration
renewal only, issuing a transit permit, or any other service under this
section.
(6) If the fee is collected by the state patrol as agent for the
director, the fee so collected shall be certified to the state
treasurer and deposited to the credit of the state patrol highway
account. If the fee is collected by the department of transportation
as agent for the director, the fee shall be certified to the state
treasurer and deposited to the credit of the motor vehicle fund. All
such fees collected by the director or branches of his office shall be
certified to the state treasurer and deposited to the credit of the
highway safety fund.
(7) Any county revenues that exceed the cost of providing vehicle
licensing and vessel registration and title activities in a county,
calculated in accordance with the procedures in subsection (3)(d) of
this section, shall be expended as determined by the county legislative
authority during the process established by law for adoption of county
budgets.
(8) The director may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---