BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.810 and 1996 c 61 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a
member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided
for under the provisions of RCW 41.32.755 through 41.32.825.
(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an
authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor
organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor
organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period
of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence.
This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the
member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of
leave. The earnable compensation reported for a member who establishes
service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary
paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) Except as specified in subsection (6) of this section, a member
shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit
during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member
is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such
credit may be obtained only if the member makes both the employer and
member contributions plus interest as determined by the department for
the period of the authorized leave of absence within five years of
resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner.
(4) If a member fails to meet the time limitations of subsection
(3) of this section, the member may receive a maximum of two years of
service credit during a member's working career for those periods when
a member is on unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. This
may be done by paying the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior
to retirement.
(5) For the purpose of subsection (3) of this section, ((the
contribution shall not include the contribution for the unfunded
supplemental present value as required by RCW 41.32.775.)) the
contributions required shall be based on the average of the member's
earnable compensation at both the time the authorized leave of absence
was granted and the time the member resumed employment.
(6) ((A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
armed forces of the United States shall be entitled to retirement
system service credit for up to five years of military service. This
subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent with the
requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and
reemployment rights act.
(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection
if:
(i) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the
United States armed forces, the member applies for reemployment with
the employer who employed the member immediately prior to the member
entering the United States armed forces; and
(ii) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW
41.32.775 within five years of resumption of service or prior to
retirement, whichever comes sooner; or
(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the
member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the
member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii) of this
subsection, the department shall establish the member's service credit
and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW
41.32.775 for the period of military service, plus interest as
determined by the department.
(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii) of this subsection
shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if not
on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the
compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the
member went on military leave.)) A member who has served or shall serve
on active federal service in the military or naval forces of the United
States and who left or shall leave an employer to enter such service
shall be deemed to be on military leave of absence if he or she has
resumed or shall resume employment as an employee within one year from
termination.
(7) If he or she has applied or shall apply for reinstatement of
employment, within one year from termination of the military service,
and is refused employment for reasons beyond his or her control, he or
she shall, upon resumption of service within ten years have such
service credited to him or her.
(8) In any event, after completing twenty-five years of creditable
service, any member may have service in the armed forces credited to
him or her as a member whether or not he or she left the employ of an
employer to enter the armed service: PROVIDED, That in no instance,
described in this section, shall military service in excess of five
years be credited: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each instance the
member must restore all withdrawn accumulated contributions, which
restoration must be completed within five years of membership service
following the first resumption of employment or complete twenty-five
years of creditable service: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section
will not apply to any individual, not a veteran within the meaning of
RCW 41.04.005: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in no instance, described in
this section, shall military service be credited to any member who is
receiving full military retirement benefits pursuant to Title 10 United
States Code.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.35.470 and 1998 c 341 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a
member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided
for under the provisions of RCW 41.35.400 through 41.35.599.
(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an
authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor
organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor
organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period
of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence.
This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the
member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of
leave. The compensation earnable reported for a member who establishes
service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary
paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member
shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit
during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member
is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such
credit may be obtained only if:
(a) The member makes both the plan 2 employer and member
contributions plus interest as determined by the department for the
period of the authorized leave of absence within five years of
resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner; or
(b) If not within five years of resumption of service but prior to
retirement, pay the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be
based on the average of the member's compensation earnable at both the
time the authorized leave of absence was granted and the time the
member resumed employment.
(4) ((A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
armed forces of the United States shall be entitled to retirement
system service credit for up to five years of military service. This
subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent with the
requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and
reemployment rights act.
(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection
if:
(i) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the
United States armed forces, the member applies for reemployment with
the employer who employed the member immediately prior to the member
entering the United States armed forces; and
(ii) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW
41.35.430 within five years of resumption of service or prior to
retirement, whichever comes sooner; or
(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the
member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the
member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii) of this
subsection, the department shall establish the member's service credit
and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW
41.35.430 for the period of military service, plus interest as
determined by the department.
(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii) of this subsection
shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if not
on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the
compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the
member went on military leave.)) A member who has served or shall serve
on active federal service in the military or naval forces of the United
States and who left or shall leave an employer to enter such service
shall be deemed to be on military leave of absence if he or she has
resumed or shall resume employment as an employee within one year from
termination.
(5) If he or she has applied or shall apply for reinstatement of
employment, within one year from termination of the military service,
and is refused employment for reasons beyond his or her control, he or
she shall, upon resumption of service within ten years have such
service credited to him or her.
(6) In any event, after completing twenty-five years of creditable
service, any member may have service in the armed forces credited to
him or her as a member whether or not he or she left the employ of an
employer to enter the armed service: PROVIDED, That in no instance,
described in this section, shall military service in excess of five
years be credited: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each instance the
member must restore all withdrawn accumulated contributions, which
restoration must be completed within five years of membership service
following the first resumption of employment or complete twenty-five
years of creditable service: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section
will not apply to any individual, not a veteran within the meaning of
RCW 41.04.005: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in no instance, described in
this section, shall military service be credited to any member who is
receiving full military retirement benefits pursuant to Title 10 United
States Code.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.40.710 and 2000 c 247 s 1106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a
member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided
for under the provisions of RCW 41.40.610 through 41.40.740.
(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an
authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor
organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor
organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period
of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence.
This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the
member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of
leave. The compensation earnable reported for a member who establishes
service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary
paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member
shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit
during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member
is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such
credit may be obtained only if:
(a) The member makes both the plan 2 employer and member
contributions plus interest as determined by the department for the
period of the authorized leave of absence within five years of
resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner; or
(b) If not within five years of resumption of service but prior to
retirement, pay the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be
based on the average of the member's compensation earnable at both the
time the authorized leave of absence was granted and the time the
member resumed employment.
(4) ((A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
armed forces of the United States shall be entitled to retirement
system service credit for up to five years of military service. This
subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent with the
requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and
reemployment rights act.
(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection
if:
(i) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the
United States armed forces, the member applies for reemployment with
the employer who employed the member immediately prior to the member
entering the United States armed forces; and
(ii) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW
41.45.061 and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or
prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or
(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the
member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the
member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii) of this
subsection, the department shall establish the member's service credit
and shall bill the employer for its contribution required under RCW
41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 for the period of military service,
plus interest as determined by the department.
(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii) of this subsection
shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if not
on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the
compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the
member went on military leave.)) A member who has served or shall serve
on active federal service in the military or naval forces of the United
States and who left or shall leave an employer to enter such service
shall be deemed to be on military leave of absence if he or she has
resumed or shall resume employment as an employee within one year from
termination.
(5) If he or she has applied or shall apply for reinstatement of
employment, within one year from termination of the military service,
and is refused employment for reasons beyond his or her control, he or
she shall, upon resumption of service within ten years have such
service credited to him or her.
(6) In any event, after completing twenty-five years of creditable
service, any member may have service in the armed forces credited to
him or her as a member whether or not he or she left the employ of an
employer to enter the armed service: PROVIDED, That in no instance,
described in this section, shall military service in excess of five
years be credited: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each instance the
member must restore all withdrawn accumulated contributions, which
restoration must be completed within five years of membership service
following the first resumption of employment or complete twenty-five
years of creditable service: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section
will not apply to any individual, not a veteran within the meaning of
RCW 41.04.005: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in no instance, described in
this section, shall military service be credited to any member who is
receiving full military retirement benefits pursuant to Title 10 United
States Code.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.04.005 and 2002 c 292 s 1 and 2002 c 27 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in RCW 41.04.005, 41.16.220, 41.20.050, 41.40.170, and
28B.15.380 "veteran" includes every person, who at the time he or she
seeks the benefits of RCW 41.04.005, 41.16.220, 41.20.050, 41.40.170,
or 28B.15.380 has received an honorable discharge or received a
discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record and who meets
at least one of the following criteria:
(a) The person has served between World War I and World War II or
during any period of war, as defined in subsection (2) of this section,
as either:
(i) A member in any branch of the armed forces of the United
States;
(ii) A member of the women's air forces service pilots;
(iii) A U.S. documented merchant mariner with service aboard an
oceangoing vessel operated by the war shipping administration, the
office of defense transportation, or their agents, from December 7,
1941, through December 31, 1946; or
(iv) A civil service crewmember with service aboard a U.S. army
transport service or U.S. naval transportation service vessel in
oceangoing service from December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946; or
(b) The person has received the armed forces expeditionary medal,
or marine corps and navy expeditionary medal, for opposed action on
foreign soil, for service:
(i) In any branch of the armed forces of the United States; or
(ii) As a member of the women's air forces service pilots.
(2) A "period of war" includes:
(a) World War I;
(b) World War II;
(c) The Korean conflict;
(d) The Vietnam era(([, which])), which means:
(i) The period beginning on February 28, 1961, and ending on May 7,
1975, in the case of a veteran who served in the Republic of Vietnam
during that period;
(ii) The period beginning August 5, 1964, and ending on May 7,
1975;
(e) The Persian Gulf War, which was the period beginning August 2,
1990, and ending on the date prescribed by presidential proclamation or
law;
(f) The period beginning on the date of any future declaration of
war by the congress and ending on the date prescribed by presidential
proclamation or concurrent resolution of the congress; and
(g) The following armed conflicts, if the participant was awarded
the respective campaign badge or medal: The crisis in Lebanon; the
invasion of Grenada; Panama, Operation Just Cause; Somalia, Operation
Restore Hope; Haiti, Operation Uphold Democracy; ((and)) Bosnia,
Operation Joint Endeavor; Afghanistan, Operation Enduring Freedom; and
Iraq, Operation Iraqi Freedom.

--- END ---