BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable to plan 1, plan 2,
and plan 3" to read as follows:
(1) A member who is injured while acting in the course of
employment, is unable to work in an eligible position, and is receiving
a benefit under Title 51 RCW may purchase lost service credit under
this section.
(2) A member under subsection (1) of this section is entitled to
retirement system service credit for up to two years.
(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection
if:
(i) Within ninety days of when the member is able to return to work
and benefits under Title 51 RCW have ceased, the member applies for
reemployment with the employer who employed the member immediately
prior to the member incurring injury; and
(ii) The member makes the required employee contributions within
five years of resumption of service in any eligible position or prior
to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or
(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the date
under (a)(i) of this subsection or five years of resumption of service
the member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii) of this
subsection, the department shall establish the member's service credit
and shall bill the employer at the time of the injury for its
contribution for the period of lost service credit, plus interest as
determined by the department.
(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii) of this subsection
shall be based on the compensation the member would have earned if not
injured, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the
compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when the
injury occurred.

--- END ---