BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.36 RCW
to read as follows:
All provisional ballots and related materials, including the inner
security envelope and the outer return envelope, must be printed on
colored paper distinctive from regular ballots, absentee ballots, and
their related materials.

--- END ---