BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.470 and 1993 c 495 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Except as otherwise provided in subsection (15) of this
section,)) The following fees shall be collected by the department in
advance:
(1) For the examination of an application for permit to appropriate
water or on application to change point of diversion, withdrawal,
purpose or place of use, a minimum of ten dollars, to be paid with the
application. For each second foot between one and five hundred second
feet, two dollars per second foot; for each second foot between five
hundred and two thousand second feet, fifty cents per second foot; and
for each second foot in excess thereof, twenty cents per second foot.
For each acre foot of storage up to and including one hundred thousand
acre feet, one cent per acre foot, and for each acre foot in excess
thereof, one-fifth cent per acre foot. The ten dollar fee payable with
the application shall be a credit to that amount whenever the fee for
direct diversion or storage totals more than ten dollars under the
above schedule and in such case the further fee due shall be the total
computed amount less ten dollars.
Within five days from receipt of an application the department
shall notify the applicant by registered mail of any additional fees
due under the above schedule and any additional fees shall be paid to
and received by the department within thirty days from the date of
filing the application, or the application shall be rejected.
(2) For filing and recording a permit to appropriate water for
irrigation purposes, forty cents per acre for each acre to be irrigated
up to and including one hundred acres, and twenty cents per acre for
each acre in excess of one hundred acres up to and including one
thousand acres, and ten cents for each acre in excess of one thousand
acres; and also twenty cents for each theoretical horsepower up to and
including one thousand horsepower, and four cents for each theoretical
horsepower in excess of one thousand horsepower, but in no instance
shall the minimum fee for filing and recording a permit to appropriate
water be less than five dollars. For all other beneficial purposes the
fee shall be twice the amount of the examination fee except that for
individual household and domestic use, which may include water for
irrigation of a family garden, the fee shall be five dollars.
(3) For filing and recording any other water right instrument, four
dollars for the first hundred words and forty cents for each additional
hundred words or fraction thereof.
(4) For making a copy of any document recorded or filed in his
office, forty cents for each hundred words or fraction thereof, but
when the amount exceeds twenty dollars, only the actual cost in excess
of that amount shall be charged.
(5) For certifying to copies, documents, records or maps, two
dollars for each certification.
(6) For blueprint copies of a map or drawing, or, for such other
work of a similar nature as may be required of the department, at
actual cost of the work.
(7) For granting each extension of time for beginning construction
work under a permit to appropriate water, an amount equal to one-half
of the filing and recording fee, except that the minimum fee shall be
not less than five dollars for each year that an extension is granted,
and for granting an extension of time for completion of construction
work or for completing application of water to a beneficial use, five
dollars for each year that an extension is granted.
(8) For the inspection of any hydraulic works to insure safety to
life and property, the actual cost of the inspection, including the
expense incident thereto, except as follows: (a) For any hydraulic
works less than ten years old, that the department examined and
approved the construction plans and specifications as to its safety
when required under RCW 90.03.350, there shall be no fee charged; or
(b) for any hydraulic works more than ten years old, but less than
twenty years old, that the department examined and approved the
construction plans and specifications as to its safety when required
under RCW 90.03.350, the fee charged shall not exceed the fee for a
significant hazard dam.
(9) For the examination of plans and specifications as to safety of
controlling works for storage of ten acre feet or more of water, a
minimum fee of ten dollars, or the actual cost.
(10) For recording an assignment either of a permit to appropriate
water or of an application for such a permit, a fee of five dollars.
(11) For preparing and issuing all water right certificates, five
dollars.
(12) For filing and recording a protest against granting any
application, two dollars.
(13) The department shall provide timely notification by certified
mail with return receipt requested to applicants that fees are due. No
action may be taken until the fee is paid in full. Failure to remit
fees within sixty days of the department's notification shall be
grounds for rejecting the application or canceling the permit. Cash
shall not be accepted. Fees must be paid by check or money order and
are nonrefundable.
(14) For purposes of calculating fees for ground water filings, one
cubic foot per second shall be regarded as equivalent to four hundred
fifty gallons per minute.
(((15) For the period beginning July 1, 1993, and ending June 30,
1994, there is imposed and the department shall collect a one hundred
dollar surcharge on all water rights applications or changes filed
under this section, and upon all water rights applications or changes
pending as of July 1, 1993. This charge shall be in addition to any
other fees imposed under this section.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act applies retroactively
to September 4, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---