BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.41.160 and 1987 c 431 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A pool policy offered under this chapter shall contain
provisions under which the pool is obligated to renew the policy until
the day on which the individual in whose name the policy is issued
first becomes eligible for medicare coverage. At that time, coverage
of dependents shall terminate if such dependents are eligible for
coverage under a different health plan. Dependents who become eligible
for medicare prior to the individual in whose name the policy is
issued, shall receive benefits in accordance with RCW 48.41.150.
(2) The pool may not change the rates for pool policies except on
a class basis, with a clear disclosure in the policy of the pool's
right to do so.
(3) A pool policy offered under this chapter shall provide that,
upon the death or felony conviction of the individual in whose name the
policy is issued, every other individual then covered under the policy
may elect, within a period specified in the policy, to continue
coverage under the same or a different policy.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.44.220 and 1983 c 154 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
No health care service contractor shall deny coverage to any person
solely on account of race, religion, national origin, felony
conviction, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
handicap. Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting a
health care service contractor's authority to deny or otherwise limit
coverage to a person when the person because of a medical condition
does not meet the essential eligibility requirements established by the
health care service contractor for purposes of determining coverage for
any person.
No health care service contractor shall refuse to provide
reimbursement or indemnity to any person for covered health care
services for reasons that the health care services were provided by a
holder of a license under chapter 18.22 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.44.360 and 1984 c 190 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every health care service contractor that issues group
contracts providing group coverage for hospital or medical expense
shall offer the contract holder an option to include a contract
provision granting a person who becomes ineligible for coverage under
the group contract, including a person who becomes ineligible as a
consequence of a felony conviction, the right to continue the group
benefits for a period of time and at a rate agreed upon. The contract
provision shall provide that when such coverage terminates, the covered
person may convert to a contract as provided in RCW 48.44.370.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies to the dependents of a
covered person who loses group coverage eligibility due to a felony
conviction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
Each health maintenance agreement issued, amended, or renewed after
the effective date of this section must provide for the continuation of
coverage for a convicted felon and that felon's dependents upon payment
of the premium for the coverage.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.46.380 and 1993 c 492 s 291 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every authorized health maintenance organization, upon canceling,
denying, or refusing to renew any individual health maintenance
agreement, shall, upon written request, directly notify in writing the
applicant or enrolled participant as appropriate, of the reasons for
the action by the health maintenance organization. Any benefits,
terms, rates, or conditions of such agreement which are restricted,
excluded, modified, increased, or reduced shall, upon written request,
be set forth in writing and supplied to the individual. The written
communications required by this section shall be phrased in simple
language which is readily understandable to a person of average
intelligence, education, and reading ability. The written
communication must include a statement of the right of a convicted
felon, and the felon's dependents, to continue coverage upon payment of
the premium for the coverage.

--- END ---