BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No life insurer may deny or refuse to accept an application for
insurance, or refuse to insure, refuse to renew, cancel, restrict, or
otherwise terminate a policy of insurance, or charge a different rate
for the same coverage, based upon the applicant or insured person's
past or future lawful travel destinations.
(2) This section does not prohibit any action described in
subsection (1) of this section when the insurer bases the action on
sound actuarial principles.

--- END ---