BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that financial
institution employers are becoming increasingly discouraged from
disclosing job reference information. The legislature finds that full
disclosure of such information will increase productivity, enhance the
safety of the workplace, and provide greater opportunities to
disadvantaged groups who may not have the educational background or
resumes of other workers. The legislature further finds that because
financial institution employees are exposed to nonpublic consumer
information, allowing financial institutions to disclose certain
performance and loss-related information will reduce instances of fraud
and identity theft in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) An employer who discloses information about a former or
current employee's job performance to a prospective financial
institution employer, at the specific request of that individual
employer, is presumed to be acting in good faith and is immune from
civil liability for such a disclosure or its consequences.
For purposes of this section, the presumption of good faith may
only be rebutted upon a showing by clear and convincing evidence that
the information disclosed by the employer was knowingly false or
deliberately misleading.
(b) The employer must retain a written record of the substance of
any information disclosed under this section for a minimum of two years
from the date of the disclosure. The written record shall become part
of the employee's personnel file, subject to the provisions of chapter
49.12 RCW. Failure to maintain a written record of the disclosure
waives the immunity provided under (a) of this subsection, and civil
liability for such disclosure shall be evaluated under common law
standards without regard to this section.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Financial institution employer" means a person or persons
working for a financial institution as defined by RCW 30.22.041 or an
employment agency as defined by RCW 49.60.040 when engaged on behalf of
a financial institution.
(b) "Job performance" means the manner in which the employee
performs the duties of a position of employment and includes an
analysis of the employee's attendance at work; conduct, attitude,
effort, knowledge, behavior, and skills that are work related;
adherence to applicable statutes, regulations, and the employer's
lawful employment policies; whether, and under what circumstances a
bond claim has been filed relating to the employee; and adherence to
safety and health laws subject to the limitation of RCW 51.48.025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Any written record made under section 2 of this act shall become
part of an employee's personnel file.

--- END ---