BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.95A.050 and 2002 c 248 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every authority has the following powers:
(1) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to
lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate,
and regulate the use of public monorail transportation facilities,
including passenger terminal and parking facilities and properties, and
other facilities and properties as may be necessary for passenger and
vehicular access to and from public monorail transportation facilities,
together with all lands, rights of way, and property within or outside
the authority area, and together with equipment and accessories
necessary or appropriate for these facilities, except that property,
including but not limited to other types of public transportation
facilities, that is owned by the state or any city, county, county
transportation authority, public transportation benefit area,
metropolitan municipal corporation, or regional transit authority may
be acquired or used by an authority only with the consent of the public
entity owning the property. The entities are authorized to convey or
lease property to an authority or to contract for their joint use on
terms fixed by agreement between the entity and the authority. The
right of eminent domain must be exercised by the authority under a
resolution to the same extent, in the same manner, and by the same
procedure as is or may be provided by law for cities of the first
class, except insofar as those laws may be inconsistent with this
chapter. However, the authority may acquire by eminent domain only
such title or interest in the condemned property as is necessary to
accomplish all acts needed to build and operate a public monorail
transportation system;
(2) To fix rates, tolls, fares, and charges for the use of
facilities and to establish various routes and classes of service.
Rates, tolls, fares, or charges may be adjusted or eliminated for any
distinguishable class of users including, but not limited to, senior
citizens and ((handicapped)) persons with disabilities;
(3) To contract with the United States or any of its agencies, any
state or any of its agencies, any metropolitan municipal corporation,
and other ((country)) county, city, other political subdivision or
governmental instrumentality, or governmental agency, or any private
person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of receiving any gifts or
grants or securing loans or advances for preliminary planning and
feasibility studies((, or));
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, and
in addition to any other authority provided by law, to contract with
parties including but not limited to the United States or any of its
agencies, any state or any of its agencies, any metropolitan municipal
corporation, any other county, city, other political subdivision or
governmental instrumentality, or governmental agency, or any private
person, firm, or corporation for the design, construction, operation,
or maintenance of public monorail transportation facilities as follows:
(a) ((Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary,
and in addition to any other authority provided by law,)) The governing
body of a city transportation authority may contract with one or more
((vendors)) parties for the design, construction, operation, or
maintenance, or other service related to the development of a monorail
public transportation system including, but not limited to, monorail
trains, operating systems and control equipment, guideways, and pylons,
together with the necessary passenger stations, terminals, parking
facilities, and other related facilities necessary and appropriate for
passenger and vehicular access to and from the monorail train.
(b) If the governing body of the city transportation authority
decides to proceed with the consideration of qualifications or
proposals for services from qualified ((vendors)) parties, the
authority must publish notice of its requirements and request
submission of qualifications statements or proposals. The notice must
be published in the official newspaper of the city creating the
authority at least once a week for two weeks, not less than sixty days
before the final date for the submission of qualifications statements
or proposals. The notice must state in summary form: (i) The general
scope and nature of the design, construction, operation, maintenance,
or other services being sought related to the development of the
proposed monorail, tram, or trolley public transportation system; (ii)
the name and address of a representative of the city transportation
authority who can provide further details; (iii) the final date for the
submission of qualifications statements or proposals; (iv) an estimated
schedule for the consideration of qualifications statements or
proposals((, the)) and selection ((of vendors)) among them, and the
negotiation of a contract or contracts for services; (v) the location
of which a copy of any requests for qualifications statements or
requests for proposals will be made available; and (vi) the selection
criteria established by the governing body of the authority ((to select
a vendor or vendors)), which may include, but is not limited to, ((the
vendor's)) prior experience, including design, construction, operation,
or maintenance of other similar public transportation facilities,
((respondent's)) management capabilities, proposed project schedule,
availability and financial resources, costs of the services to be
provided, nature of facility design proposed ((by the vendors)), system
reliability, performance standards required for the facilities,
compatibility with existing public transportation facilities operated
by the authority or any other public body or other providers of similar
services to the public, project performance guarantees, penalties, and
other enforcement provisions, environmental protection measures to be
used ((by the vendor)), consistency with the applicable regional
transportation plans, and the proposed allocation of project risks.
(c) If the governing body of the city transportation authority
decides to proceed with the consideration of qualifications statements
or proposals submitted ((by vendors)), it may designate a
representative or representatives to evaluate the ((vendors)) parties
who submitted qualifications statements or proposals, request
clarifications, and conduct interviews and discussions regarding
qualifications or proposals with one or more ((vendors)) parties. The
governing body or its representative may request submission of
qualifications statements and may later request more detailed proposals
from one or more ((vendors)) parties who have submitted qualifications
statements, or may request detailed proposals without having first
received and evaluated qualifications statements. The governing body
or its representative will evaluate the qualifications or proposals, as
applicable. If two or more ((vendors)) parties submit qualifications
or proposals that meet the criteria established by the governing body
of the authority, ((discussions and)) interviews must be held with at
least two ((vendors)) parties. Any revisions to a request for
qualifications or request for proposals must be made available to all
((vendors)) parties then under consideration by the governing body of
the authority and must be made available to any other person who has
requested receipt of that information.
(d) Based on the criteria established by the governing body of the
authority, the representative will recommend to the governing body a
((vendor or vendors)) party or parties that are initially determined to
be the best qualified to provide one or more of the design,
construction, operation, or maintenance, or other service related to
the development of the proposed monorail public transportation system.
(e) The governing body of the authority or its representative may
attempt to negotiate a contract with the ((vendor or vendors)) party or
parties selected for one or more of the design, construction,
operation, or maintenance, or other service related to the development
of the proposed monorail public transportation system on terms that the
governing body of the authority determines to be fair and reasonable
and in the best interest of the authority. If the governing body, or
its representative, is unable to negotiate a contract with any one or
more of the ((vendors)) parties, first selected on terms that it
determines to be fair and reasonable and in the best interest of the
authority, negotiations with any one or more of the ((vendors))
parties, must be terminated or suspended and another qualified ((vendor
or vendors)) party or parties may be selected in accordance with the
procedures set forth in this section. If the governing body decides to
continue the process of selection, negotiations will continue with a
qualified ((vendor or vendors)) party or parties in accordance with
this section at the sole discretion of the governing body of the
authority until an agreement is reached with one or more qualified
((vendors)) parties, or the process is terminated by the governing
body. The process may be repeated until an agreement is reached.
(f) Prior to entering into a contract ((with a vendor)) under this
subsection (4), the governing body of the authority must make written
findings, after holding a public hearing on the proposal, that it is in
the public interest to enter into the contract, that the contract is
financially sound, and that it is advantageous for the governing body
of the authority to use this method for awarding contracts for one or
more of the design, construction, ((or)) operation, or maintenance of
the proposed monorail public transportation system as compared to all
other methods of awarding such contracts.
(g) Each contract under this subsection (4) must include a project
performance bond or bonds or other security by the vendor.
(h) The provisions of chapters 39.12 and 39.19 RCW apply to a
contract entered into under this ((section as if the public
transportation systems and facilities were owned by a public body))
subsection (4).
(i) The ((vendor)) selection process permitted by this ((section))
subsection (4) is ((supplemental)) alternative to and is not construed
as a repeal of or limitation on any other authority granted by
law((.));
(((j))) (5) To contract((s)) for the construction of facilities,
other than contracts ((for facilities to be provided by the selected
vendor,)) procured under subsection (4) of this section and contracts
with an estimated cost ((greater)) less than two hundred thousand
dollars ((must be awarded after)), through a competitive bid process
consistent with chapter 39.04 RCW or ((awarded)) through an alternative
public works contracting procedure consistent with chapter 39.10 RCW;
(((4))) (6) To contract with the United States or any of its
agencies, any state or any of its agencies, any metropolitan municipal
corporation, any other county, city, other political subdivision or
governmental instrumentality, any governmental agency, or any private
person, firm, or corporation for the use by either contracting party of
all or any part of the facilities, structures, lands, interests in
lands, air rights over lands, and rights of way of all kinds which are
owned, leased, or held by the other party and for the purpose of
planning, designing, constructing, operating any public transportation
facility, or performing any service related to transportation which the
authority is authorized to operate or perform, on terms as may be
agreed upon by the contracting parties;
(((5))) (7) To acquire any existing public transportation facility
by conveyance, sale, or lease. In any acquisition from a county, city,
or other political subdivision of the state, the authority will receive
credit from the county or city or other political subdivision for any
federal assistance and state matching assistance used by the county or
city or other political subdivision in acquiring any portion of the
public transportation facility. Upon acquisition, the authority must
assume and observe all existing labor contracts relating to the public
transportation facility and, to the extent necessary for operation of
the public transportation facility, all of the employees of the public
transportation facility whose duties are necessary to efficiently
operate the public transportation facility must be appointed to
comparable positions to those which they held at the time of the
transfer, and no employee or retired or pensioned employee of the
public transportation facility will be placed in any worse position
with respect to pension seniority, wages, sick leave, vacation, or
other benefits than he or she enjoyed as an employee of the public
transportation facility prior to the acquisition. Furthermore, the
authority must engage in collective bargaining with the duly appointed
representatives of any employee labor organization having existing
contracts with the acquired facility and may enter into labor contracts
with the employee labor organization;
(((6))) (8) To contract for, participate in, and support research,
demonstration, testing, and development of public monorail
transportation facilities, equipment, and use incentives, and have all
powers necessary to comply with any criteria, standards, and
regulations which may be adopted under state and federal law, and to
take all actions necessary to meet the requirements of those laws. The
authority has, in addition to these powers, the authority to prepare,
adopt, and carry out a comprehensive public monorail plan and to make
other plans and studies and to perform programs as the authority deems
necessary to implement and comply with those laws;
(((7))) (9) To establish local improvement districts within the
authority area to finance public monorail transportation facilities, to
levy special assessments on property specially benefited by those
facilities, and to issue local improvement bonds to be repaid by the
collection of local improvement assessments. The method of
establishment, levying, collection, enforcement, and all other matters
relating to the local improvement districts, assessments, collection,
and bonds are as provided in the statutes governing local improvement
districts of cities and towns. The duties devolving upon the city
treasurer in those statutes are imposed on the treasurer of the
authority;
(((8))) (10) To exercise all other powers necessary and appropriate
to carry out its responsibilities, including without limitation the
power to sue and be sued, to own, construct, purchase, lease, add to,
and maintain any real and personal property or property rights
necessary for the conduct of the affairs of the authority, to enter
into contracts, and to employ the persons as the authority deems
appropriate. An authority may also sell, lease, convey, or otherwise
dispose of any real or personal property no longer necessary for the
conduct of the affairs of the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.95A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An authority may establish, by resolution, a schedule of fines
and penalties for civil infractions established in section 3 of this
act. Fines established by a city transportation authority may not
exceed those imposed for class 1 civil infractions under RCW 7.80.120.
(2)(a) In order to monitor fare payment, an authority may designate
persons authorized to exercise all the powers of an enforcement
officer, defined in RCW 7.80.040. An authority may either employ
personnel to monitor fare payment, or contract for those services, or
both.
(b) In addition to the specific powers granted to enforcement
officers under RCW 7.80.050 and 7.80.060, persons designated to monitor
fare payment may also take the following actions:
(i) Request proof of payment from passengers;
(ii) Request personal identification from a passenger who does not
produce proof of payment when requested;
(iii) Issue a citation conforming to RCW 7.80.070; and
(iv) Request that a passenger leave the monorail train or station
when the passenger has not produced proof of payment after being asked
to do so by a person designated to monitor fare payment.
(3) City transportation authorities shall keep, or cause to be
kept, records of citations as prescribed by RCW 7.80.150. All civil
infractions under section 3 of this act must be heard and determined by
a district court for the county in which the infraction occurred as
provided in RCW 7.80.010 (1) and (4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.95A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Persons traveling on monorail trains operated by an authority
shall pay the fare established by the authority. They shall produce
proof of payment when requested by a person designated to monitor fare
payment.
(2) The following are civil infractions punishable according to the
schedule of fines and penalties established by the authority under
section 2 of this act:
(a) Failure to pay or attempting to evade payment of the required
fare;
(b) Failure to display proof of payment when requested to do so by
a person designated to monitor fare payment; and
(c) Failure to leave the monorail train or station when requested
to do so by a person designated to monitor fare payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35.95A RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in section 2 or 3 of this act prevents law enforcement
authorities from prosecuting for theft, trespass, or other criminal
charge a person who:
(1) Fails to pay or attempts to evade payment of the required fare
on more than one occasion within a twelve-month period;
(2) Fails to sign a notice of civil infraction;
(3) Fails to leave the monorail train or station when requested to
do so by a person designated to monitor fare payment; or
(4) Acts or fails to act in violation of law.

Sec. 5 RCW 35.95A.110 and 2002 c 248 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
All taxes and fees levied and collected by an authority must be
used solely for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of
acquiring, designing, constructing, equipping, maintaining, or
operating public monorail transportation facilities or contracting for
the services thereof((,)); or to perform or pay or secure the
performance or payment of any obligation under any contract authorized
in this chapter; or to pay or secure the payment of all or part of the
principal of or interest on any general obligation bonds or revenue
bonds issued for authority purposes. Until expended, money accumulated
in the funds and accounts of an authority may be invested in the manner
authorized by the governing body of the authority, consistent with
state law.
If any of the revenue from any tax or fee authorized to be levied
by an authority has been pledged by the authority to secure the payment
of any bonds as ((herein)) authorized in this chapter, or if an
authority has entered into any contract authorized in this chapter
whose obligations directly or indirectly require the use of any of the
revenue from any tax or fee authorized to be levied by that authority,
then as long as that pledge or contract is in effect ((the legislature
will not withdraw from the authority)), the authorization to levy and
collect the tax or fee will not be withdrawn from the authority, and if
the authority has agreed in any such contract to continue to levy and
collect any taxes or assessments to the extent necessary to fund its
obligations under that contract, then notwithstanding a negative vote
under RCW 35.95A.120, an authority shall continue to exist for the
purpose of continuing to levy and collect those taxes or assessments to
that extent.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.46.040 and 1983 c 167 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A local government authorized to issue bonds shall determine for
the bond issue its amount, date or dates, terms not in excess of
((the)) forty years or any shorter maximum term otherwise provided in
law, conditions, bond denominations, interest rate or rates, which may
be fixed or variable, interest payment dates, maturity or maturities,
redemption rights, registration privileges, manner of execution, price,
manner of sale, covenants, and form, including registration as to
principal and interest, registration as to principal only, or bearer.
Registration may be as provided in RCW 39.46.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to obtain or renew a vehicle license, an applicant
must satisfy all special motor vehicle excise tax obligations with
respect to any taxing district in which the applicant primarily
resides. In the case of a business, the taxing district in which the
applicant primarily resides means the principal place in Washington
from which the trade or business of the registered owner is directed,
managed, or conducted. If the department or its agents and subagents
have information indicating that a vehicle registered at an address
outside any taxing district may be owned by a person whose primary
residence address is in that taxing district, then the renewal
application may be processed by the department or its agents only if
the applicant:
(a) Presents evidence reasonably satisfactory to the department or
its agents and subagents that the applicant's primary residence is not
in the taxing district;
(b) Tenders payment of the applicable special motor vehicle excise
tax for the registration year and files a change of address; or
(c) Establishes an exemption from providing the primary residence
address.
(2) If the department has information indicating that a vehicle
registered at an address outside the boundaries of any taxing district
may be owned by a person whose primary residence or business address is
in that taxing district, the department shall send to the person, with
or before the renewal notice, a statement to the vehicle owner that the
primary residence or business address must be verified to renew the
vehicle license. The notice must describe the acceptable documentation
and procedures to verify the primary residence or business address.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 35.95A RCW
to read as follows:
To assure appropriate monorail transportation system plan and
financial plan assumptions and to provide for review of monorail
transportation system plan results, an expert review panel shall be
appointed to provide independent technical review regarding development
of any proposed monorail transportation system plan which is to be
funded in whole or in part by the imposition of any voter-approved
local option funding sources enumerated in this chapter.
(1) The expert review panel shall consist of five to ten members
who are recognized experts in relevant fields, such as transit
operations, planning, emerging transportation technologies,
engineering, finance, law, the environment, geography, economics, and
political science.
(2) The expert review panel shall be selected cooperatively by the
chairs of the senate and house of representatives transportation
committees, the secretary of the department of transportation, and the
executive of the city in which a city transportation authority is
located.
(3) The chair of the expert review panel shall be designated by the
appointing authorities.
(4) The expert review panel shall serve without compensation, but
shall be reimbursed for expenses according to RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. Reimbursement must be paid from within the existing
resources of a city transportation authority.
(5) The expert review panel shall carry out the duties set forth in
subsections (6) and (7) of this section until the date on which an
election is held to consider a monorail transportation system and
financing plan.
(6) The expert review panel shall review all reports and plans and
shall concentrate on costs, patronage, and financing evaluations.
(7) The expert review panel shall provide timely reviews and
comments on individual reports and study conclusions to the chairs of
the senate and house of representatives transportation committees, the
department of transportation, the executive of the city in which the
city transportation authority is located, and the city transportation
authority.
(8) The city transportation authority shall contract for consulting
services for expert review panels, within existing resources.

Sec. 9 RCW 35.95A.030 and 2002 c 248 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city that undertakes to propose creation of an authority must
propose the authority by ordinance of the city legislative body. The
ordinance must:
(a) Propose the authority area and the size and method of selection
of the governing body of the authority, which governing body may be
appointed or elected, provided that officers or employees of any single
city government body may not compose a majority of the members of the
authority's governing body;
(b) Propose whether all or a specified portion of the public
monorail transportation function will be exercised by the authority;
(c) Propose an initial array of taxes to be voted upon by the
electors within the proposed authority area; and
(d) Provide for an interim governing body of the authority which
will govern the authority upon voter approval of formation of the
authority, until a permanent governing body is selected, but in no
event longer than fourteen months.
(2) An authority may also be proposed to be created by a petition
setting forth the matters described in subsection (1) of this section,
and signed by one percent of the qualified electors of the proposed
authority area.
(3) Upon approval by the qualified electors of the formation of the
city transportation authority and any proposed taxes, either by
ordinance or by petition as provided in this chapter, the governing
body of an authority, or interim governing body, as applicable, will
adopt bylaws determining, among other things, the authority's officers
and the method of their selection, and other matters the governing body
deems appropriate.
(4) Before an authority may issue bonds, the governing body of the
authority shall be composed entirely of members appointed by the
legislative body of the city in which the authority is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---