BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.53.010 and 2003 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The practice of optometry is defined as the examination of the
human eye, the examination and ascertaining any defects of the human
vision system and the analysis of the process of vision. The practice
of optometry may include, but not necessarily be limited to, the
following:
(a) The employment of any objective or subjective means or method,
including the use of drugs, for diagnostic and therapeutic purposes by
those licensed under this chapter and who meet the requirements of
subsections (2) and (3) of this section, and the use of any diagnostic
instruments or devices for the examination or analysis of the human
vision system, the measurement of the powers or range of human vision,
or the determination of the refractive powers of the human eye or its
functions in general; and
(b) The prescription and fitting of lenses, prisms, therapeutic or
refractive contact lenses and the adaption or adjustment of frames and
lenses used in connection therewith; and
(c) The prescription and provision of visual therapy, therapeutic
aids, and other optical devices; and
(d) The ascertainment of the perceptive, neural, muscular, or
pathological condition of the visual system; and
(e) The adaptation of prosthetic eyes.
(2)(a) Those persons using topical drugs for diagnostic purposes in
the practice of optometry shall have a minimum of sixty hours of
didactic and clinical instruction in general and ocular pharmacology as
applied to optometry, as established by the board, and certification
from an institution of higher learning, accredited by those agencies
recognized by the United States office of education or the council on
postsecondary accreditation to qualify for certification by the
optometry board of Washington to use drugs for diagnostic purposes.
(b) Those persons using or prescribing topical drugs for
therapeutic purposes in the practice of optometry must be certified
under (a) of this subsection, and must have an additional minimum of
seventy-five hours of didactic and clinical instruction as established
by the board, and certification from an institution of higher learning,
accredited by those agencies recognized by the United States office of
education or the council on postsecondary accreditation to qualify for
certification by the optometry board of Washington to use drugs for
therapeutic purposes.
(c) Those persons using or prescribing drugs administered orally
for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes in the practice of optometry
shall be certified under (b) of this subsection, and shall have an
additional minimum of sixteen hours of didactic and eight hours of
supervised clinical instruction as established by the board, and
certification from an institution of higher learning, accredited by
those agencies recognized by the United States office of education or
the council on postsecondary accreditation to qualify for certification
by the optometry board of Washington to administer, dispense, or
prescribe oral drugs for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes.
(d) Those persons administering epinephrine by injection for
treatment of anaphylactic shock in the practice of optometry must be
certified under (b) of this subsection and must have an additional
minimum of four hours of didactic and supervised clinical instruction,
as established by the board, and certification from an institution of
higher learning, accredited by those agencies recognized by the United
States office of education or the council on postsecondary
accreditation to qualify for certification by the optometry board to
administer epinephrine by injection.
(e) Such course or courses shall be the fiscal responsibility of
the participating and attending optometrist.
(f)(i) All persons receiving their initial license under this
chapter on or after January 1, 2007, must be certified under (a), (b),
(c), and (d) of this subsection.
(ii) All persons licensed under this chapter on or after January 1,
2009, must be certified under (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(iii) All persons licensed under this chapter on or after January
1, 2011, must be certified under (a), (b), (c), and (d) of this
subsection.
(3) The board shall establish a list of topical drugs for
diagnostic and treatment purposes limited to the practice of optometry,
and no person licensed pursuant to this chapter shall prescribe,
dispense, purchase, possess, or administer drugs except as authorized
and to the extent permitted by the board.
(4) The board must establish a list of oral Schedule III through V
controlled substances and any oral legend drugs, with the approval of
and after consultation with the board of pharmacy. No person licensed
under this chapter may use, prescribe, dispense, purchase, possess, or
administer these drugs except as authorized and to the extent permitted
by the board. No optometrist may use, prescribe, dispense, or
administer oral corticosteroids.
(a) The board, with the approval of and in consultation with the
board of pharmacy, must establish, by rule, specific guidelines for the
prescription and administration of drugs by optometrists, so that
licensed optometrists and persons filling their prescriptions have a
clear understanding of which drugs and which dosages or forms are
included in the authority granted by this section.
(b) An optometrist may not:
(i) Prescribe, dispense, or administer a controlled substance for
more than seven days in treating a particular patient for a single
trauma, episode, or condition or for pain associated with or related to
the trauma, episode, or condition; or
(ii) Prescribe an oral drug within ninety days following ophthalmic
surgery unless the optometrist consults with the treating
ophthalmologist.
(c) If treatment exceeding the limitation in (b)(i) of this
subsection is indicated, the patient must be referred to a physician
licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW.
(d) The prescription or administration of drugs as authorized in
this section is specifically limited to those drugs appropriate to
treatment of diseases or conditions of the human eye and the adnexa
that are within the scope of practice of optometry. The prescription
or administration of drugs for any other purpose is not authorized by
this section.
(5) The board shall develop a means of identification and
verification of optometrists certified to use therapeutic drugs for the
purpose of issuing prescriptions as authorized by this section.
(6) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to authorize the use,
prescription, dispensing, purchase, possession, or administration of
any Schedule I or II controlled substance. The provisions of this
subsection must be strictly construed.
(7) With the exception of the administration of epinephrine by
injection for the treatment of anaphylactic shock, no injections or
infusions may be administered by an optometrist.
(8) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to authorize
optometrists to perform ophthalmic surgery. Ophthalmic surgery is
defined as any invasive procedure in which human tissue is cut,
ablated, or otherwise penetrated by incision, injection, laser,
ultrasound, or other means, in order to: Treat human eye diseases;
alter or correct refractive error; or alter or enhance cosmetic
appearance. Nothing in this chapter limits an optometrist's ability to
use diagnostic instruments utilizing laser or ultrasound technology.
Ophthalmic surgery, as defined in this subsection, does not include
removal of superficial ocular foreign bodies, epilation of misaligned
eyelashes, placement of punctal or lacrimal plugs, diagnostic dilation
and irrigation of the lacrimal system, orthokeratology, prescription
and fitting of contact lenses with the purpose of altering refractive
error, or other similar procedures within the scope of practice of
optometry.

--- END ---