BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct a study of the basic health plan. Part 1 of
the study shall examine the extent to which basic health plan policies
and procedures promote or discourage the provision of appropriate,
high-quality, cost-effective care to basic health plan enrollees.
Issues to be addressed include, but are not limited to, whether: (a)
Enrollees are encouraged to engage in wellness activities and receive
preventive services; (b) evidence-based treatment strategies are
identified and promoted; (c) enrollees are encouraged to use high-quality providers; (d) enrollees with chronic or other high-cost
conditions are identified and provided with appropriate interventions;
and (e) innovative health care service delivery methods are encouraged.
Part 1 of the study report must be completed by December 15, 2005.
(2) Part 2 of the study must examine the characteristics of
individuals enrolled in the basic health plan, and their utilization of
health care services, including but not limited to: (a) Enrollee
longevity on the basic health plan; (b) circumstances that led to basic
health plan enrollment; (c) how enrollees obtained health care prior to
basic health plan enrollment; (d) health care coverage of other
household members; (e) service utilization patterns; and (f) employment
status and by whom basic health plan enrollees are employed. A part 2
interim report must be completed by December 15, 2005, and the final
report completed by July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general
fund to the joint legislative audit and review committee for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2006, to carry out the purposes of this act.

--- END ---