BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state's
management of its federally granted lands and its financial strategies
for assisting with the costs of education, corrections, mental health
treatment, and other activities supported by revenues from granted
lands have changed greatly since statehood. At statehood Washington
received title to approximately three million acres of federal lands
for the support of common schools and other governmental functions,
similar to grants to other states entering the United States that as
territories were predominantly in federal land ownership and thus
lacking an adequate taxable land base to support state and local
governmental functions through property taxes. Like most Western
states, Washington initially derived most of its funding through the
sale of these lands, although the Washington state Constitution placed
limits on the pace at which such granted lands could be sold.
Early in the twentieth century there was a growing recognition of
the importance of forest lands in maintaining a continuous supply of
wood products, flood water mitigation, drinking water supplies, storage
of snowpack for late season irrigation supplies, hunting and fishing
and other recreational opportunities, and providing many other benefits
to adjacent communities and to the entire state. During this period
many federal forest lands were reserved from public land disposition
and state forest lands were reforested and managed for long-term public
benefits. Today Washington retains one of the greatest percentages of
its original federal granted lands, currently owning about two million
two hundred thousand acres. About one million five hundred thousand
acres of these lands are forest lands.
Since the 1920s the state's policy has been to retain granted lands
in state ownership and to manage the lands to maximize revenues from
the lands for the trust beneficiaries. However, by the late twentieth
century revenues derived from these lands were not keeping pace with
the demands for funding for education and other trusts' purposes. For
example, within the past twenty years, revenues derived from common
school trust lands have declined from about two-thirds to about one-quarter of the state support for school construction. Similarly, the
portion of the higher education construction budget supported by these
lands has dropped from twelve percent in the late 1980s to seven
percent in the current biennium. As a portion of the overall state
support for education, trust land revenues provide less than two
percent.
At the same time as the relative value of the granted lands in
financial returns has been diminishing for the trust beneficiaries,
there is growing recognition by all citizens of the value of these
lands in providing multiple public benefits. The highest value from
these lands in serving the entire state will be achieved if a policy of
multiple use and multiple compatible benefits is pursued. Therefore,
it is the intent of this chapter to provide full compensation to the
trust beneficiaries for the net present value of a long-term leasehold
interest in these granted lands, and during the term of this lease to
manage these lands for multiple uses and benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(2) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(3) "Granted lands" means state lands managed by the department for
the benefit of educational, correctional, social services, and capitol
buildings construction in the following designated trusts:
(a) Common school, indemnity, and escheat;
(b) Agricultural school;
(c) Scientific school;
(d) University;
(e) Normal school;
(f) Charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions;
and
(g) State capitol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department shall calculate full fair
market compensation for a leasehold interest of a term of at least
seventy-five years using simplified appraisal processes that minimize
the administrative costs of calculating full fair market compensation
while ensuring that the beneficiaries are appropriately compensated.
The department shall place a priority upon calculating leasehold values
for those parcels proposed for inclusion upon the priority lists
required by section 4 of this act. The leasehold interest includes all
rights to manage the lands consistent with the standards under section
7 of this act, including the sale of valuable materials and allowance
of uses that derive monetary returns from the lands.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that because the
beneficiaries are largely supported by state funds not derived from
these granted lands, the added costs of detailed, parcel-specific
appraisals, may not justify the added precision of such appraisals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The state granted lands lease program is
created. The program must include state granted lands for which a
leasehold is executed under the provisions of this chapter to provide
compensation for the support of the beneficiaries in the following
designated trusts:
(a) Common school, indemnity, and escheat;
(b) Agricultural school;
(c) Scientific school;
(d) University;
(e) Normal school;
(f) Charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions;
and
(g) State capitol.
(2) By December 31, 2006, the department shall develop a
prioritized list of parcels suitable for inclusion in the state granted
lands lease program. A prioritized list must be prepared for each
category of designated trusts specified in subsection (1) of this
section. Each list must include sufficient parcels so that the
aggregated acreage of parcels exceed the following acreage:
(a) Common school, indemnity, and escheat, five hundred thousand
acres;
(b) Washington State University, forty thousand acres;
(c) Agricultural school, twenty thousand acres;
(d) Scientific school, twenty thousand acres;
(e) Normal school, twenty thousand acres;
(f) Charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory, twenty
thousand acres; and
(g) State capitol, twenty-five thousand acres.
(3) The department shall prioritize parcels for each category of
designated trust by considering the parcels most suitable for
management for maximizing multiple benefits from uses of the lands,
without placing as the highest priority the monetized economic returns
that may be obtained in the near term from the lands. In selecting
parcels for inclusion on the list and in establishing a priority order,
the department should consider the opportunities for managing for such
benefits as: Fish and wildlife habitat and production; improving
forest health conditions; satisfying diverse recreational demands in
the region; protecting drinking water supplies of nearby communities;
mitigating storm water flows; and protecting forest stands with special
biological diversity or geological or scenic values.
(4) In considering candidates and selecting parcels for listing,
the department shall provide the public, including representatives of
trust beneficiary interests, an opportunity to provide comments to the
department and to participate in the department's deliberations. This
must include at least three public meetings in different regions of the
state at which draft lists are provided to the public in advance for
comment.
(5) Prior to final adoption of the list the department shall
receive the approval of the board of natural resources.
(6) In developing the initial prioritized lists proposed for
funding in the 2007-2009 biennial capital budget, the department shall
consider lands suitable for management consistent with the standards in
section 7 of this act and which would further the following objectives:
(a) In eastern Washington, meaning east of the crest of the Cascade
mountain range, a contiguous forest stand of no less than ten thousand
acres to be managed primarily for the improvement of forest health
conditions, with contractors for implementing forest health treatment
activities to be sought in communities in the vicinity of the forest;
and
(b) In western Washington, a forest stand near urbanizing areas in
which there is increasing demand for recreational uses of the forest
and for which the department may derive significant revenues from
recreational uses.
(7) The department shall remove from the lists those parcels for
which leases are executed under section 6 of this act. By December 31,
2008, the department shall make additions of parcels to each list such
that the total parcels on each list exceed in aggregate amount by at
least fifty percent the lease values appropriated in the current
biennial capital budget for each designated trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department shall include a prioritized
list of parcels proposed for leasing and inclusion in the state granted
lands lease program in the capital budget request submitted to the
governor. No lease under the state granted lands lease program
authorized by this chapter may be executed without prior approval and
funding by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Beginning July 1, 2007, the department shall
execute leases for a term of at least seventy-five years for trust
lands on the priority lists developed under section 4 of this act. The
lease agreement must include the right for automatic renewal. The
calculation of full fair market compensation for renewed leases must
ensure that the value of the resources on the land that were used to
compensate beneficiaries in the initial lease not become a part of the
calculation for compensation for the renewed lease.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The granted lands placed in the state
granted lands lease program must be managed by the department under
existing management statutes, policies, and agreements to the extent
not inconsistent with the management criteria of this section. The
valuable materials on the granted lands may be sold in the same manner
and for the same purposes as is authorized for state lands, and charges
may be made for recreational or other uses of the lands, provided that
the value of the lands at the expiration of the lease will not be
significantly diminished thereby.
(2) The multiple use lands in the granted lands lease program must
be managed with all the various renewable resources in mind so that
they are utilized in the combination that will best meet the needs of
all of the state's citizens. The department should manage the multiple
use forests with the entire land base in mind so that some resources or
services may be emphasized on parts of the lands and some land may be
used for less than all of the resources or services. The department
should seek a harmonious and coordinated management of the various
resources of the lands, each with the other, without impairment of the
productivity of the land, with consideration being given the relative
values of the various resources, and not necessarily the combination of
uses that will give the greatest dollar return or the greatest unit
output. Among the values and uses that should be considered by the
department in managing the multiple use lands are the economic and
environmental aspects of various systems of renewable resource
management, including: Silviculture and protection of forest
resources; providing for outdoor recreation, range, timber, watershed,
wildlife, and fish; providing for a diversity of plant and animal
communities; and providing for protection of streams, streambanks,
shorelines, lakes, wetlands, and other bodies of water from detrimental
changes in chemical, biological, or hydrological characteristics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The state granted lands lease program
account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from revenues
derived from lands in the program and other moneys appropriated to the
account or received by the state for the benefit of such lands must be
deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used for all
purposes related to management of lands included in the state granted
lands lease program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The granted lands review commission is
established. The commission membership shall be jointly formed by
appointments by the governor and the commissioner of public lands. The
purpose of the commission is to review the history and contemporary
management and disposition of lands granted to the state by the federal
government at statehood for the support of education and other
governmental activities, and to analyze alternative methods by which
the state could ensure equivalent or greater financial support for
these governmental activities while at the same time allowing
management of these lands for multiple benefits to all citizens of the
state. The commission shall involve the active participation of the
interests representing the beneficiaries of state financial assistance
derived from revenues from these lands, as well as the interests of
others who derive income from or use of these state lands.
(2) The granted lands review commission shall submit a report with
its recommendations to the appropriate committees of the senate and
house of representatives by December 31, 2007.
(3) The granted lands review commission and its powers and duties
terminate June 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 79 RCW.

--- END ---