BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.215.110 and 1999 c 350 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 28A.215.100 through 28A.215.200 and
28A.215.900 through 28A.215.908.
(1) (("Advisory committee" means the advisory committee under RCW
28A.215.140.
(2))) "Department" means the ((department of community, trade, and
economic development)) office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(((3))) (2) "Eligible child" means a child not eligible for
kindergarten whose family income is at or below one hundred ten percent
of the federal poverty level, as published annually by the federal
department of health and human services, and includes a child whose
family is eligible for public assistance, and who is not a participant
in a federal or state program providing comprehensive services and may
include children who are eligible under rules adopted by the department
if the number of such children equals not more than ten percent of the
total enrollment in the early childhood program. Priority for
enrollment shall be given to children from families with the lowest
income or to eligible children from families with multiple needs.
(((4))) (3) "Approved programs" means those state-supported
education and special assistance programs which are recognized by the
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) as meeting
the minimum program rules adopted by the department to qualify under
RCW 28A.215.100 through 28A.215.200 and 28A.215.900 through 28A.215.908
and are designated as eligible for funding by the department under RCW
28A.215.160 and 28A.215.180.
(((5))) (4) "Comprehensive" means an assistance program that
focuses on the needs of the child and includes education, health, and
family support services.
(((6))) (5) "Family support services" means providing opportunities
for parents to:
(a) Actively participate in their child's early childhood program;
(b) Increase their knowledge of child development and parenting
skills;
(c) Further their education and training;
(d) Increase their ability to use needed services in the community;
(e) Increase their self-reliance.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.215.120 and 1994 c 166 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department ((of community, trade, and economic development))
shall administer a state-supported early childhood education and
assistance program to assist eligible children with educational,
social, health, nutritional, and cultural development to enhance their
opportunity for success in the common school system. Eligible children
shall be admitted to approved early childhood programs to the extent
that the legislature provides funds, and additional eligible children
may be admitted to the extent that grants and contributions from
community sources provide sufficient funds for a program equivalent to
that supported by state funds. Administration and funding of this
program shall be shifted to the department no later than December 1,
2005. All existing contracts with program providers entered into for
the 2005-06 school year with the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall remain in full force and effect and shall be
the responsibility of the department. All funds designated for this
program remaining at the department of community, trade, and economic
development after December 1, 2005, shall be transferred to the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.215
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A nine-member steering committee is created, which committee
shall advise the department on the ongoing promotion and operation of
the early childhood education and assistance program. This advice
shall include:
(a) Program standards, which shall be guided by appropriate
research;
(b) Development of partnerships among providers of early learning
programs;
(c) Development of opportunities for professional development; and
(d) Identifying opportunities to build upon existing programs and
resources by increasing program quality, connecting related services,
and simplifying program administration.
(2) The steering committee authorized in subsection (1) of this
section shall be composed of and appointed in accordance with this
subsection.
(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall appoint two
agency employees responsible for policies relating to early learning
and assistance to children, one representative of an early childhood
education and assistance program provider or contractor and one parent
with a child participating in the program. The superintendent of
public instruction shall also designate the chair of the steering
committee.
(b) The secretary of the department of social and health services
shall appoint two representatives of that office who are knowledgeable
about early learning and assistance to children and one representative
of an early childhood education and assistance program provider or
contractor.
(c) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall appoint one representative.
(d) The secretary of the department of health shall appoint one
member who is knowledgeable about early learning and pediatric public
health issues.
(3) Except for state official and state employee members, each
member of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in
carrying out the duties of the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.215.150 and 1994 c 166 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the
administration of the early childhood program. Approved early
childhood programs shall conduct needs assessments of their service
area, identify any targeted groups of children, to include but not be
limited to children of seasonal and migrant farmworkers and native
American populations living either on or off reservation, and provide
to the department a service delivery plan, to the extent practicable,
that addresses these targeted populations.
The department in developing rules for the early childhood program
shall consult with the ((advisory)) steering committee, and shall
consider such factors as coordination with existing head start and
other early childhood programs, the preparation necessary for
instructors, qualifications of instructors, adequate space and
equipment, and special transportation needs. The rules shall
specifically require the early childhood programs to provide for
parental involvement in participation with their child's program, in
local program policy decisions, in development and revision of service
delivery systems, and in parent education and training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.215
RCW to read as follows:
(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of
community, trade, and economic development pertaining to the early
childhood education and assistance program are transferred to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction. All references to
the director or the department of community, trade, and economic
development in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to
mean the superintendent of public instruction or the office of the
superintendent of public instruction when referring to the functions
transferred in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
community, trade, and economic development pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction. All cabinets,
furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the department of community, trade, and economic
development in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be made available to the office of the superintendent
of public instruction. All funds, credits, or other assets held in
connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
assigned to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of community, trade,
and economic development for carrying out the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of community, trade, and
economic development engaged in performing the powers, functions, and
duties transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the office of
the superintendent of public instruction. All employees classified
under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to
the office of the superintendent of public instruction to perform their
usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in
accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
community, trade, and economic development pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction. All existing
contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be
performed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of community, trade, and economic development shall not
affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of
this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.215.140 (Advisory committee -- Composition) and 1988 c
174 s 5 & 1985 c 418 s 5; and
(2) RCW 28A.215.190 (Expenses of advisory committee -- Reimbursement)
and 1985 c 418 s 10.

--- END ---