BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many Washington
citizens are veterans of armed forces conflicts that have important
skills that may be employed in projects that help to protect and
restore Washington's rivers, streams, lakes, marine waters, and open
lands. The legislature further finds that such work has demonstrated
benefits for many veterans who are coping with posttraumatic stress
disorder or have other mental health or substance abuse disorders
related to their service in the armed forces. Therefore, it is the
purpose of this chapter to create a program that provides state funding
assistance for projects that restore Washington's waters, forests, and
habitat through the primary participation of such veterans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall create a list of veterans with posttraumatic
stress disorder and related conditions who are interested in working on
projects that restore Washington's natural habitat. The list shall be
referred to as the veterans conservation corps. The department shall
promote the opportunity to volunteer for the veterans conservation
corps through its local counselors and representative. Only veterans
who grant their approval may be included on the list. The department
shall consult with the salmon recovery board, the interagency committee
for outdoor recreation, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the state parks and recreation
commission to determine the most effective ways to market the veterans
conservation corps to agencies and local sponsors of habitat
restoration projects.
The department shall submit a report to the appropriate committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2009, on the use of veterans
conservation corps members by state agencies and local sponsors of
habitat restoration projects.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.85.130 and 2000 c 107 s 102 and 2000 c 15 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The salmon recovery funding board shall develop procedures and
criteria for allocation of funds for salmon habitat projects and salmon
recovery activities on a statewide basis to address the highest
priorities for salmon habitat protection and restoration. To the
extent practicable the board shall adopt an annual allocation of
funding. The allocation should address both protection and restoration
of habitat, and should recognize the varying needs in each area of the
state on an equitable basis. The board has the discretion to partially
fund, or to fund in phases, salmon habitat projects. The board may
annually establish a maximum amount of funding available for any
individual project, subject to available funding. No projects required
solely as a mitigation or a condition of permitting are eligible for
funding.
(2)(a) In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and
activities the board shall give preference to projects that:
(i) Are based upon the limiting factors analysis identified under
RCW 77.85.060;
(ii) Provide a greater benefit to salmon recovery based upon the
stock status information contained in the department of fish and
wildlife salmonid stock inventory (SASSI), the salmon and steelhead
habitat inventory and assessment project (SSHIAP), and any comparable
science-based assessment when available;
(iii) Will benefit listed species and other fish species; and
(iv) Will preserve high quality salmonid habitat.
(b) In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and
activities the board shall also give consideration to projects that:
(i) Are the most cost-effective;
(ii) Have the greatest matched or in-kind funding; ((and))
(iii) Will be implemented by a sponsor with a successful record of
project implementation; and
(iv) Involve members of the veterans conservation corps established
in section 2 of this act.
(3) The board may reject, but not add, projects from a habitat
project list submitted by a lead entity for funding.
(4) For fiscal year 2000, the board may authorize the interagency
review team to evaluate, rank, and make funding decisions for
categories of projects or activities or from funding sources provided
for categories of projects or activities. In delegating such authority
the board shall consider the review team's staff resources, procedures,
and technical capacity to meet the purposes and objectives of this
chapter. The board shall maintain general oversight of the team's
exercise of such authority.
(5) The board shall seek the guidance of the technical review team
to ensure that scientific principles and information are incorporated
into the allocation standards and into proposed projects and
activities. If the technical review team determines that a habitat
project list complies with the critical pathways methodology under RCW
77.85.060, it shall provide substantial weight to the list's project
priorities when making determinations among applications for funding of
projects within the area covered by the list.
(6) The board shall establish criteria for determining when block
grants may be made to a lead entity or other recognized regional
recovery entity consistent with one or more habitat project lists
developed for that region. Where a lead entity has been established
pursuant to RCW 77.85.050, the board may provide grants to the lead
entity to assist in carrying out lead entity functions under this
chapter, subject to available funding. The board shall determine an
equitable minimum amount of funds for each region, and shall distribute
the remainder of funds on a competitive basis.
(7) The board may waive or modify portions of the allocation
procedures and standards adopted under this section in the award of
grants or loans to conform to legislative appropriations directing an
alternative award procedure or when the funds to be awarded are from
federal or other sources requiring other allocation procedures or
standards as a condition of the board's receipt of the funds. The
board shall develop an integrated process to manage the allocation of
funding from federal and state sources to minimize delays in the award
of funding while recognizing the differences in state and legislative
appropriation timing.
(8) The board may award a grant or loan for a salmon recovery
project on private or public land when the landowner has a legal
obligation under local, state, or federal law to perform the project,
when expedited action provides a clear benefit to salmon recovery, and
there will be harm to salmon recovery if the project is delayed. For
purposes of this subsection, a legal obligation does not include a
project required solely as a mitigation or a condition of permitting.
(9) The board may condition a grant or loan to include the
requirement that property may only be transferred to a federal agency
if the agency that will acquire the property agrees to comply with all
terms of the grant or loan to which the project sponsor was obligated.
Property acquired or improved by a project sponsor may be conveyed to
a federal agency, but only if the agency agrees to comply with all
terms of the grant or loan to which the project sponsor was obligated.

--- END ---