BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.82.020 and 2001 c 222 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who knowingly makes an extortionate extension of
credit is guilty of a class B felony.
(2) In a prosecution under this section, if it is shown that all of
the ((following)) factors in either (a) or (b) of this subsection are
present in connection with the extension of credit, there is prima
facie evidence that the extension of credit was extortionate:
(a)(i) The repayment of the extension of credit, or the performance
of any promise given in consideration thereof, would be unenforceable
at the time the extension of credit was made through civil judicial
processes against the debtor in the county in which the debtor, if a
natural person, resided or in every county in which the debtor, if
other than a natural person, was incorporated or qualified to do
business((.));
(((b))) (ii) The extension of credit was made at a rate of interest
in excess of an annual rate of forty-five percent calculated according
to the actuarial method of allocating payments made on a debt between
principal and interest, pursuant to which a payment is applied first to
the accumulated interest and the balance is applied to the unpaid
principal((.));
(((c))) (iii) The creditor intended the debtor to believe that
failure to comply with the terms of the extension of credit would be
enforced by extortionate means((.)); and
(((d))) (iv) Upon the making of the extension of credit, the total
of the extensions of credit by the creditor to the debtor then
outstanding, including any unpaid interest or similar charges, exceeded
one hundred dollars; or
(b) The extension of credit was made by a licensee under chapter
31.45 RCW or an unlicensed person required to be licensed by chapter
31.45 RCW, when the following factors are present:
(i) The extension of credit violated the military best practices
set forth in RCW 31.45.--- (section 1, chapter ... (Senate Bill No.
5415), Laws of 2005; and
(ii) The extension of credit was an act in a pattern of violations
of the statutory requirements of chapter 31.45 RCW. "A pattern of
violations" means ten or more of the same type of violation within one
year or any violations of chapter 31.45 RCW victimizing or affecting
ten or more borrowers within one year.

--- END ---