BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the governing
documents of the association, if the following conditions are met, a
majority of the owners in the association may vote in person or by
proxy at an annual or special meeting of the association held pursuant
to RCW 64.38.035 to dissolve the association. Provision shall be made
for disposition of assets and liabilities of the association:
(1) Written notice served upon the board of directors by any owner
in the association of facts that, if true, would more probably than not
substantiate the allegation that the board failed to comply with this
chapter;
(2) Expiration of thirty calendar days from the date of service
required in subsection (1) of this section to afford the board
opportunity to correct the alleged failure; and
(3) Written notice served upon the board of directors by any owner
in the association that the failure alleged in subsection (1) of this
section has not been corrected and as part of this written notice, the
demand that the notice of meeting and the business to be placed on the
agenda required by RCW 64.38.035 shall include the following
proposition stated in substantially the following manner:
Shall the association be BOTH dissolved AND disposition of the
assets and liabilities be referred to a disinterested third party?
Upon receipt of the demand substantially complying with the
requirements under this subsection, the board of directors shall cause
the notice of meeting to contain the agenda item as stated.

--- END ---