BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that conservation and
efficient use of water benefits all water users by providing water to
satisfy current and future needs in a cost-effective manner. The
legislature further finds that while current water law principles call
for efficiently using water to meet beneficial needs, many water right
holders will not be inclined to make investments in conservation
measures if all of the resulting water savings are returned to public
water status for use by others or for other purposes.
Therefore it is the intent of this act to strongly promote
conservation by providing for a fair allocation of conserved water
between the water right holder implementing conservation measures and
the public by administering a portion of the conserved water in the
trust water program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
As used in sections 2 through 7 of this act:
(1) "Conservation" means the reduction of the amount of water
diverted or withdrawn to satisfy an existing beneficial use achieved
either by improving the technology or method for diverting,
withdrawing, transporting, applying, or recovering the water or by
implementing other approved conservation measures.
(2) "Conserved water" means the amount of water that results from
conservation measures, measured as the difference between:
(a) The smaller of the amount stated on the water right permit or
certificate, or the maximum of water that can be diverted using the
existing facilities; and
(b) The amount of water needed after implementation of conservation
measures to meet the beneficial use under the water right certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any water right holder may apply to the department for approval
of an allocation of conserved water from a conservation measure that
the holder intends to implement or that has been implemented within the
five years prior to making the application.
(2) The application shall include:
(a) A description of the proposed measures or implemented measures;
(b) A description of the existing diversion facilities and an
estimate of the amount of water that can be diverted at the facilities,
and for implemented measures, a description of the diversion facilities
before the conservation measure was implemented and the amount of water
that was diverted at the facilities before the conservation measure was
implemented;
(c) The amount of water needed or that will be needed to supply
existing rights after implementation of the conservation measures;
(d) The amount of conserved water expected to be conserved or that
has been conserved by implementation of the conservation measures;
(e) The proposed allocation and use of the conserved water if
different from the allocation specified in section 4 of this act;
(f) The intended use of any conserved water allocated to the
applicant;
(g) The applicant's choice of priority date for the conserved
water; and
(h) Any other information the department considers necessary to
evaluate the effectiveness of the proposal.
(3) If a person proposes conservation measures within the
boundaries of an irrigation district, the person also must submit
evidence that the board of directors of the district approves the
conservation application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of an application for allocation of conserved
water:
(a) Notice of the application shall be published as provided in RCW
90.03.280; and
(b) The provisions of RCW 90.14.160 through 90.14.180 do not apply
to the conserved water covered by the application.
(2) The department shall allocate fifty percent of the conserved
water to the applicant and the remaining fifty percent to the state to
be managed as a trust water right under chapter 90.42 RCW, except that
the allocation shall be adjusted if the criteria of section 7 of this
act apply. The department may not allocate conserved water under the
provisions of this section if the application is filed more than five
years after the conservation measure was implemented.
(3) The department shall notify the applicant and any other person
requesting notice of the proposed action by the department on the
application.
(4) After the department completes the allocation of conserved
water, the department shall issue a superseding provisional certificate
reflecting the change in the original water right. Once the
conservation project is completed, separate new certificates shall be
issued as follows:
(a) A certificate reflecting the change in the original water
right;
(b) A certificate for the use of conserved water allocated to the
applicant that reflects the quantity of the right, and the place and
purpose of use of the conserved water; and
(c) A certificate reflecting a trust water right held by the state,
with a priority date as determined in section 6 of this act.
(5) Once approved by the department, a water right to conserved
water allocated under this section shall be a water right with all
rights and responsibilities as is accorded to any other water right
recognized, permitted, or certificated under this chapter or chapter
90.44 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall adopt rules to implement sections 2 through 7
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The priority date of any right to the use of conserved water,
including uses under a trust water right, shall be either the same as
the priority date of the water right from which the conserved water was
allocated or one minute after such priority date, at the election of
the applicant for allocation of the conserved water.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The applicant and the department may agree upon an allocation of
conserved water that is different from the presumptive allocation under
section 4 of this act if the applicant and department determine that
another allocation is consistent with the public interest in
encouraging water conservation, in ensuring that necessary streamflows
are maintained and achieved, and in managing public water resources to
meet new water use demands. Where public funds are provided for the
conservation measures, the percentage of conserved water allocated to
the state as a trust water right shall not be less than the percentage
that the public funds bear to the total funds provided to install or
implement the conservation measures.

--- END ---