BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Initiative 688,
passed by the people in 1998, provides for a minimum wage and automatic
increases in the minimum wage based on increases in the consumer price
index. Increases in the minimum wage have occurred annually since
adoption of the initiative.
The legislature further finds that the level of Washington's
minimum wage and the increases provided by the initiative are subjects
of debate and controversy. Employers and employees dispute the
positive and negative effects of the minimum wage, the role that the
minimum wage plays in the creation or loss of jobs, and the effect of
the minimum wage on Washington's economy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The Washington state institute of public
policy, in consultation with the employment security department, shall
conduct a study to address the issues impacted by the minimum wage and
its annual increases in Washington state. The study should address:
(1) The impact of the minimum wage on job creation and job loss,
from 1990 to the present;
(2) The role of the minimum wage in maintaining the purchasing
power of low-income workers, as well as its effect on the federal
poverty level rates of low-income workers in this state, in comparison
to other workers;
(3) Wage compression resulting from increases in the minimum wage;
(4) Demographic analysis of persons earning eight dollars and
thirty-five cents per hour or less, including race, ethnicity, gender,
marital status, age, and the average amount of time persons earn the
minimum wage, as well as the rate of taxpayer provided services used by
these persons;
(5) The extent to which the minimum wage is paid in various
industries and occupations in Washington, including the number of total
jobs available in those industries over the past seven years and an
analysis of any causal relation between increases in the minimum wage
and fluctuations in those job numbers;
(6) Differences in economic activity attributed to the minimum wage
increases in comparison with similar activity in Oregon, Idaho, and
other states similar in economic size and industrial base to
Washington;
(7) Economic activity and wage progression in industries with large
numbers of low-wage workers compared to wages paid in manufacturing,
high tech, and other moderate and high-income fields in Washington;
(8) The impact of the minimum wage on state unemployment, including
a comparison of state and federal unemployment rates from 1970 to the
present, as well as the effect the increasing minimum wage has on the
mechanization and elimination of jobs in the state;
(9) A summary of the actions taken by other states regarding their
minimum wage laws over the last five years; and
(10) The impact on workers and businesses of a minimum tipped wage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The Washington state institute for public
policy shall collect information for the study from both the public and
private sector. The Washington state institute of public policy must
report its findings to the legislature by December 1, 2006.

--- END ---