BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the technology
used for criminal history record information background checks for
employment purposes are rapidly increasing in Washington. Gathering
fingerprints electronically not only reduces the number of rejected
fingerprints by improving the accuracy and quality of prints, but it
also reduces the turnaround time for gathering criminal background
checks for prospective employees.
The legislature has learned that electronic fingerprinting
technology is currently limited in the state for noncriminal justice
purposes. There are no public or private sector fingerprinting service
centers to accommodate individuals applying for noncriminal justice
employment or licensing. The legislature further finds that creating
a pilot program, by strategically placing several electronic
fingerprinting devices in government offices throughout the state, will
help employers and prospective employees to more easily gather and
transmit data for noncriminal justice purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.310
RCW to read as follows:
After the results of a background check for noncriminal justice
purposes have been obtained and transmitted to the requesting party,
the electronic files of the fingerprint images shall be destroyed. The
electronic files containing the fingerprint images that are gathered
and transmitted pursuant to this section shall not be retained by the
Washington state patrol, the educational service district, or any state
or local agency or by any private party hired to gather or transmit the
electronic fingerprints.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The amount of two hundred seventy thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from
the state general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2006, to the
superintendent of public instruction. The amount in this section is
provided solely to purchase an electronic fingerprinting device for
each educational service district, to be used for noncriminal justice
purposes.

--- END ---