BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that at statehood the
federal government granted three million acres of land to the state for
the support of education, corrections, social services, and other
governmental functions. While large portions of these lands were sold
and the proceeds together with interest on these proceeds were used to
fund these functions, the state currently owns about two million two
hundred thousand acres of these lands, of which about one million five
hundred thousand acres are forest lands.
The legislature further finds that the substantial increase in
state population, increased costs of performing these functions, the
substantial portions of forest granted lands that are in stages of
regeneration, and the declines in prices for fiber, have combined to
steadily increase the gap between the state's financial contributions
for carrying out these functions and the portion derived from revenues
from granted lands.
The legislature further finds that there is increasing public
demand for management of these lands for multiple benefits for which
revenues derived from commodity extraction are but one of the benefits
provided by these lands. In many cases, such management is consistent
with the demands from education, corrections, and social services
beneficiaries of the revenues, but in other cases a multiple benefit
management approach may not be consistent with the overriding trust
obligation to these beneficiaries that court decisions have held the
state must meet in managing these lands. This has been the source of
the increasing demands by these beneficiaries that the trust corpus be
shifted to assets, other than these lands, which may provide a higher
rate of financial returns.
For these reasons, it is the purpose of this chapter to establish
a program that over a substantial period of time may fully compensate
the trusts for their interest in these lands, and to direct that the
lands transferred from granted lands trust status be managed on a
multiple benefit basis. It is further the intent of this chapter to
declare that these lands are to be held in trust for the benefit of all
citizens of the state, and that these lands must be retained in public
ownership for all time. Finally, it is the intent of this chapter to
initiate a review of the statutory and, if necessary, constitutional,
revisions necessary to allow the funds provided for purchase of the
trusts' interests in these lands to be invested in such a manner that
will allow higher rates of return than has been the recent experience
with the permanent funds of these trusts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The state granted lands purchase program is
created. The program consists of the identification, appraisal, and
purchase of the trust interests pursuant to sections 3 through 5 of
this act, the management of purchased lands under the provisions of
sections 6 and 8 of this act, the declaration of a trust for these
lands under section 7 of this act to the benefit of all the people of
the state, and a review under section 9 of this act regarding methods
to achieve greater financial rates of return to benefit the trusts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Beginning no later than December 31,
2012, and by December 31st of each successive even-numbered year
through 2012, the department of natural resources shall complete an
appraisal of the fair market value of at least twenty-five percent of
the acreage of state lands held for the benefit of the following:
(a) Common school, indemnity and escheat;
(b) Agricultural school;
(c) Scientific school;
(d) University;
(e) Normal school;
(f) Charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions;
and
(g) State capitol buildings.
(2) By December 31, 2006, the department shall develop a
prioritized list of parcels suitable for purchase and inclusion in the
state granted lands purchase program. A prioritized list must be
prepared for each category of designated trust lands specified in
subsection (1) of this section. The lists must be revised to delete
parcels purchased and include additional parcels sufficient so that the
aggregate value of parcels on the list is at least twice that of the
projected purchases in the next succeeding biennium directed under
sections 4 and 5 of this act. The department shall prioritize parcels
for each category of designated trust by considering the parcels most
suitable for management for maximizing multiple benefits from uses of
the lands without placing as the highest priority the monetized
economic returns that may be obtained in the near term from the lands.
In selecting parcels for inclusion on the list and in establishing a
priority order the department should consider the opportunities for
managing for such benefits as: Fish and wildlife habitat and
production; improving forest health conditions; satisfying diverse
recreational demands in the region; protecting drinking water supplies
of nearby communities; mitigating storm water flows; and protecting
forest stands with special biological diversity, geological value, or
scenic value.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Beginning July 1, 2007, from
appropriations authorized for this specific purpose in the omnibus
appropriations act, the department shall execute purchase agreements
for parcels on the list of common school trust parcels authorized in
section 3(2) of this act that in aggregate value total the amounts
appropriated for such purchases. It is the intent of this chapter that
future biennial appropriations be made in substantially similar amounts
through successive biennia and in such amounts that all lands held in
common school trust status may be purchased by June 30, 2057.
(2) The purchase funds shall be deposited in the common school
construction account, or as directed in the omnibus appropriations act.
No deduction shall be made for the resource management cost account
under RCW 79.64.040. The department may recover reasonable costs to
implement the purchase transactions from the amounts appropriated for
the purchase program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Beginning July 1, 2007, from
appropriations authorized for this specific purpose in the omnibus
appropriations act, the department shall execute purchase agreements
for parcels on the lists for the following designated trusts:
(a) Agricultural school;
(b) Scientific school;
(c) University;
(d) Normal school;
(e) Charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions;
and
(f) State capitol buildings.
(2) The purchase agreements executed shall in the aggregate value
total the amounts appropriated for purchase of parcels from each
designated trust. It is the intent of this chapter that future
biennial appropriations be made in substantially similar amounts
through successive biennia and in such amounts that the trust interest
in all lands held in each of the specified trusts may be purchased by
June 30, 2027.
(3) The purchase funds shall be deposited in the permanents fund
for each trust created in chapter 43.79 RCW, or as directed in the
omnibus appropriations act. No deduction shall be made for the
resource management cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The department
may recover reasonable costs to implement the purchase transactions
from the amounts appropriated for the purchase program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The lands included in the state granted
lands purchase program must be managed by the department of natural
resources under existing management statutes, policies, and agreements
to the extent not inconsistent with the management criteria of this
section. The valuable materials thereon may be sold in the same manner
and for the same purposes as is authorized for state lands, and charges
may be made for recreational or other uses of the lands.
(2) The lands must be managed with all the various renewable
resources in mind so that they are utilized in the combination that
will best meet the needs of all of the state's citizens. The
department shall manage these lands with the entire land base in mind
so that some resources or services may be emphasized on parts of the
lands and some land may be used for less than all of the resources or
services. The department should seek a harmonious and coordinated
management of the various resources of the lands, each with the other,
without impairment of the productivity of the land, with consideration
being given to the relative values of the various resources, and not
necessarily the combination of uses that will give the greatest dollar
return or the greatest unit output. Among the values and uses that
should be considered by the department in managing the multiple use
lands are: The economic and environmental aspects of various systems
of renewable resource management, including silviculture and protection
of forest resources; providing for outdoor recreation, range, timber,
watershed, wildlife, and fish; providing for a diversity of plant and
animal communities; and providing for protection of streams,
streambanks, shorelines, lakes, wetlands, and other bodies of water
from detrimental changes in chemical, biological, or hydrological
characteristics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The legislature declares that state lands in
the state granted lands purchase program are held in trust for all the
people of the state for all time. These lands shall not be conveyed
from state ownership except as specifically authorized by an act of the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The state granted lands purchase program
management account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from
revenues derived from lands in the program and other moneys
appropriated to the account or received by the state for the benefit of
the lands must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may
be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may
be used for all purposes related to management of lands included in the
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The future of the statehood trusts
review commission is established. The governor shall chair the
commission and shall appoint members that reflect the interests of the
beneficiaries of the trusts. The commission also includes the
following as members:
(a) The state treasurer;
(b) The chair of the state investment board;
(c) Two members of the senate, one from each major caucus, selected
by the president of the senate;
(d) Two members of the house of representatives, one from each
major caucus, selected by the speaker of the house of representatives;
and
(e) The commissioner of public lands.
(2) The commission shall review the history of financial management
of the permanent funds created for the support of the designated trusts
listed in section 3 of this act, and the investment objectives and
policies of these funds as well as other public funds managed by the
state. The commission shall determine if modifications in the
investment objectives and policies of these permanent funds, including
changes in the assets held in the funds, may provide for greater rates
of return while protecting the principal of the funds. Where
alternative investment approaches are identified, the commission shall
analyze necessary administrative, statutory, and constitutional
revisions that may be required to implement the alternative approaches.
(3) The commission shall include its analyses and recommendations
in a report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
senate and house of representatives by December 31, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 79 RCW.

--- END ---