BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Federal poverty level" means the official poverty level based
on family size established and adjusted under Section 673(2) of the
omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1981 (P.L. 97-35; 42 U.S.C. Sec.
9902(2), as amended).
(b) "Foundation" means the prescription drug assistance foundation
established in this section, a nonprofit corporation organized under
the laws of this state to provide assistance in accessing prescription
drugs to qualified uninsured individuals.
(c) "Health insurance coverage including prescription drugs" means
prescription drug coverage under a private insurance plan, the medicaid
program, the state children's health insurance program ("SCHIP"), the
medicare program, the basic health plan, or any employer-sponsored
health plan that includes a prescription drug benefit.
(d) "Qualified uninsured individual" means an uninsured person who
is a resident of this state and has an income below three hundred
percent of the federal poverty level.
(e) "Uninsured" means an individual who lacks health insurance
coverage including prescription drugs.
(2)(a) The administrator shall establish the foundation as a
nonprofit corporation, organized under the laws of this state. The
foundation shall assist qualified uninsured individuals in obtaining
prescription drugs at little or no cost.
(b) The foundation shall be administered in a manner that:
(i) Begins providing assistance to qualified uninsured individuals
by January 1, 2006;
(ii) Defines the population that may receive assistance in
accordance with this section; and
(iii) Complies with the eligibility requirements necessary to
obtain and maintain tax-exempt status under federal law.
(c) The board of directors of the foundation consists of five
members appointed by the governor to staggered terms of three years.
The governor shall select as members of the board individuals who (i)
will represent the interests of persons who lack prescription drug
coverage; and (ii) have demonstrated expertise in business management
and in the administration of a not-for-profit organization.
(d) The foundation shall apply for and comply with all federal
requirements necessary to obtain and maintain tax-exempt status with
respect to the federal tax obligations of the foundation's donors.
(e) The foundation is authorized, subject to the direction and
ratification of the board, to receive, solicit, contract for, collect,
and hold in trust for the purposes of this section, donations, gifts,
grants, and bequests in the form of money paid or promised, services,
materials, equipment, or other things tangible or intangible that may
be useful for helping the foundation to achieve its purpose. The
foundation may use all sources of public and private financing to
support foundation activities.
(f) No liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any
nature, shall arise against any member of the board of directors of the
foundation or against an employee or agent of the foundation for any
lawful action taken by them in the performance of their administrative
powers and duties under this section.

--- END ---