BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If in order to amend a declaration of covenants, conditions,
and restrictions, the declaration requires owners having more than
fifty percent of the votes in the association, in a single class voting
structure, or owners having more than fifty percent of the votes in
more than one class in a voting structure with more than one class, to
vote in favor of the amendment, the association, or any owner of a
separate interest, may petition the superior court of the county in
which the homeowners' association is located for an order reducing the
percentage of the affirmative votes necessary to approve such an
amendment. The petition shall describe the effort that has been made
to solicit approval of the association members in the manner provided
in the declaration, the number of affirmative and negative votes
actually received, the number or percentage of affirmative votes
required to approve the amendment in accordance with the existing
declaration, and other matters the petitioner considers relevant to the
court's determination. The petition shall also contain, as exhibits
thereto, copies of all of the following:
(a) The governing documents;
(b) A complete text of the amendment;
(c) Copies of any notice and solicitation materials utilized in the
solicitation of owner approvals;
(d) A short explanation of the reason for the amendment, such as
the amendment is necessary to update or amend an outdated or obsolete
provision in the declaration;
(e) Any other documentation relevant to the court's determination.
(2) Upon filing the petition, the court shall set the matter for
hearing and issue an ex parte order setting forth the manner in which
notice shall be given.
(3) The court may, but is not required to, grant the petition if it
finds all of the following:
(a) The petitioner has given not less than sixty days' written
notice of the court hearing to all members of the association, or to
any mortgagee of a mortgage or beneficiary of a deed of trust who is
entitled to notice under the terms of the declaration, and to the city,
county, or city and county in which the homeowners' association is
located that is entitled to notice under the terms of the declaration.
(b) Balloting on the proposed amendment was conducted in accordance
with all applicable provisions of the governing documents.
(c) A diligent effort was made to permit all eligible members to
vote on the proposed amendment.
(d) Owners having at least two-thirds of the votes, in a single
class voting structure, voted in favor of the amendment, provided that
a quorum was present when voting. In a voting structure with more than
one class, where the declaration requires a majority of more than one
class to vote in favor of the amendment, owners having at least two-thirds of the votes in each class required by the declaration to vote
in favor of the amendment voted in favor of the amendment, provided
that a quorum was present when voting.
(e) The amendment is consistent with the general plan of the
development.
(f) Granting the petition is not improper for any reason stated in
subsection (5) of this section.
(4) If the court makes the findings required by subsection (3) of
this section, any order issued pursuant to this section may confirm the
amendment as being validly approved on the basis of the affirmative
votes actually received during the balloting period or the order may
dispense with any requirement relating to the number or percentage of
votes needed for approval of the amendment that would otherwise exist
under the governing documents.
(5) The court may not approve any amendment to the declaration
that:
(a) Changes provisions in the declaration requiring the approval of
owners having more than fifty percent of the votes in more than one
class to vote in favor of the amendment, unless owners having more than
fifty percent of the votes in each affected class approved the
amendment.
(b) Eliminates any special rights, preferences, or privileges
designated in the declaration as belonging to the declarant, without
the consent of the declarant.
(c) Impairs the security interest of a mortgagee of a mortgage or
the beneficiary of a deed of trust without the approval of the
percentage of the mortgagees and beneficiaries specified in the
declaration, if the declaration requires the approval of a specified
percentage of the mortgagees and beneficiaries.
(6) An amendment is not effective pursuant to this section until
the court order and amendment have been recorded in every county in
which a portion of the homeowners' association is located. The
amendment may be acknowledged by, and the court order and amendment may
be recorded by, any person designated in the declaration or by the
association for that purpose, or if no one is designated for that
purpose, by the president of the association. Upon recording of the
amendment and court order, the declaration, as amended in accordance
with this section, has the same force and effect as if the amendment
were adopted in compliance with every requirement imposed by the
governing documents.
(7) Within a reasonable time after the amendment is recorded, the
association shall mail a copy of the amendment to each member of the
association, together with a statement that the amendment has been
recorded.

--- END ---