BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.38.045 and 1995 c 283 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The association or its managing agent shall keep financial and
other records sufficiently detailed to enable the association to fully
declare to each owner the true statement of its financial status. All
financial and other records of the association, including but not
limited to checks, bank records, and invoices, in whatever form they
are kept, are the property of the association. Each association
managing agent shall turn over all original books and records to the
association immediately upon termination of the management relationship
with the association, or upon such other demand as is made by the board
of directors. An association managing agent is entitled to keep copies
of association records. All records which the managing agent has
turned over to the association shall be made reasonably available for
the examination and copying by the managing agent.
(2) All records of the association, including the names and
addresses of owners and other occupants of the lots, shall be available
for examination by all owners, holders of mortgages on the lots, and
their respective authorized agents on reasonable advance notice during
normal working hours at the offices of the association or its managing
agent. The association shall not release the unlisted telephone number
of any owner. The association shall not release the electronic mail
address of any owner unless authorized to do so by the owner. The
association may impose and collect a reasonable charge for copies and
any reasonable costs incurred by the association in providing access to
records.
(3) At least annually, the association shall prepare, or cause to
be prepared, a financial statement of the association. The financial
statements of associations with annual assessments of fifty thousand
dollars or more shall be audited at least annually by an independent
certified public accountant, but the audit may be waived if sixty-seven
percent of the votes cast by owners, in person or by proxy, at a
meeting of the association at which a quorum is present, vote each year
to waive the audit.
(4) The funds of the association shall be kept in accounts in the
name of the association and shall not be commingled with the funds of
any other association, nor with the funds of any manager of the
association or any other person responsible for the custody of such
funds.

--- END ---