BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
A homeowners' association or an owner may use alternative dispute
resolution services to resolve any controversy arising under the
provisions of this chapter.

--- END ---