BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the women of the
greatest generation made essential contributions, in many different
ways, to our nation's success in World War II. During the war, more
than four hundred fifty thousand women served their country in the
armed forces of the United States. Another group of women provided
nursing and support services to the troops. These women were joined by
more than two million women back home who, like Rosie the Riveter,
worked in industries that supported service men and women abroad.
Other women held the nation together by raising families, educating
children, and taking care of the ill and elderly. These women held our
families, businesses, and communities together, living with rationed
goods and services so that the service men and women fighting in the
war would have the materials they needed to be successful. The
legislature finds that women in all these roles made sacrifices
necessary for the success of our nation's defense and contributions
essential to the well-being of the people back home. The legislature
further finds that to have a clearer reflection of women's sacrifices
on behalf of freedom and democracy, it is necessary to include in the
World War II oral history project the memories of women who contributed
to the war effort through either military service or other important
contributions to our nation, state, or communities.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.300.370 and 2000 c 112 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The World War II oral history project is established for the
purpose of providing oral history presentations, documentation, and
other materials to assist the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and educators in the development of a curriculum for use in
kindergarten through twelfth grade.
(2) To the extent funds are appropriated or donated, the project
shall be administered by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. The office shall convene an advisory committee to assist
in the design and implementation of the project. The committee shall
be composed of members of the World War II memorial educational
foundation, the department of veterans affairs, the secretary of
state's office, and legislators involved with and interested in the
development of the oral history project. The committee may select its
own chair and may expand its membership to include the services of
other individuals, agencies, or organizations on the basis of need.
The office shall provide staffing and administrative support to the
advisory committee.
(3) The project will preserve for the education of Washington's
school children the memories and history of our state's citizens who
served their state and country as members of the armed forces or
through national or community contributions during World War II. The
project is intended to preserve these memories and history through
audiotapes, videotapes, films, stories, printed transcripts, digitally,
and through other appropriate methods.
(4) Any funding provided to the program through the omnibus
appropriations act for the 2005-2007 biennium shall be used to record
the memories of women who meet the requirements of subsection (3) of
this section.
(5) As part of the project, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall identify the requirements regarding
instructional guides to help educators use the preserved material in
age and grade appropriate ways.
(((5))) (6) In its administration of the project, the office may
carry out its responsibilities through contracts with filming and
taping specialists, mini-grants to schools, contracts with the World
War II memorial educational foundation, and through other means
recommended by the foundation.
(((6))) (7) By December 1, 2000, and every second year thereafter
in which the project has received funding, the office shall report on
the results of the project to the governor and the house of
representatives and senate committees on education. The December 2000
report shall include, but need not be limited to, identification of the
project's implementation strategies and resource requirements, and any
curriculum standards developed through the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2005.

--- END ---