BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary of state shall prepare a manual that explains all
election laws and rules in easy-to-understand, plain language for use
during the vote counting, recounting, tabulation, and canvassing
process. The secretary of state shall print and distribute sufficient
copies of the manual so that it is available for use in all vote-counting centers throughout the state. The secretary of state may also
make the manual available in electronic form.

--- END ---