BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.40.150 and 2003 c 111 s 1015 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall produce and furnish envelopes and
instructions for out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service
voters to the county auditors. The information on the outer return
envelopes must include, but is not limited to, statements that:
(1) Return postage is free;
(2) The date written by the voter on the return envelope is
considered the date of mailing;
(3) The envelope must be signed by election day;
(4) The signed declaration on the envelope is the equivalent of
voter registration;
(5) Faxed voted ballots are allowed if the voter agrees to waive
secrecy;
(6) Faxed documents must be accompanied by an original signed
ballot by the day of election certification, which is fifteen days
after the election;
(7) E-mail is available under the federal Uniformed and Overseas
Citizens Absentee Voting Act, which is administered at the county
level, and allows for a ballot to be e-mailed to a voter, which the
voter may print out, vote, and return by mail.

--- END ---