BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are youth
and family-focused intervention services that have been proven through
rigorous evaluation in the state of Washington and elsewhere to
significantly reduce violence and crime and save more public safety
dollars than they cost. Under current state laws, no local government
acting alone has the financial incentive to invest in these cost-effective services because the savings accrue to multiple levels of
government with the largest savings going to the state. It is the
intent of the legislature to create incentives for local government
investments in cost-effective intervention services that reduce crime
by reimbursing local governments with a portion of the cost savings
that accrue to the state as the result of local investments in such
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.190 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall establish a reinvesting in youth program that awards grants to
counties for implementing research-based early intervention services
that target juvenile justice-involved youth and reduce crime, subject
to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose.
(2) Effective July 1, 2005, and continuing through June 30, 2007,
a reinvesting in youth pilot program shall be established. The pilot
program will test methods for reinvestment of state savings that result
from local investments in evidenced-based services for juvenile
justice-involved youth. Participation in the pilot program shall be
limited to three counties or groups of counties including at least one
charter county with a population of over five hundred thousand
residents and at least one county or group of counties with a combined
population of three hundred thousand residents or less. Effective July
1, 2007, all counties shall become eligible to apply for participation
in the program.
(3) At a minimum, intervention service models must meet the
following criteria in order to be funded in the reinvesting in youth
program:
(a) There must be scientific evidence from at least one rigorous
evaluation study of the specific service model that measures recidivism
reduction;
(b) There must be evidence that the specific service model's
results can be replicated outside of an academic research environment;
(c) The evaluation or evaluations of the service model must permit
dollar cost estimates of both benefits and costs so that the benefit-cost ratio of the model can be calculated;
(d) The public taxpayer benefits to all levels of state and local
government must exceed the service model costs;
(e) For the pilot program established during the 2005-2007
biennium, only the following intervention service models shall be
considered eligible for reimbursement: (i) Functional family therapy,
(ii) multisystemic therapy, and (iii) aggression replacement training.
Every two years beginning in 2006 for use in FY 2008, the
Washington state institute for public policy shall update the list of
service models that are eligible for reimbursement. The institute
shall use a technical working group comprised of representatives from
the house of representatives, the senate, the governor's office of
financial management, the department of social and health services, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the family
policy council, the juvenile court administrator's association, and the
Washington association of counties to review and provide comments on
its preliminary findings.
(4) For the pilot program established in subsection (2) of this
section, calculation of state and local savings shall be based on
recidivism reduction and cost savings calculations contained in the
most recent study by the Washington state institute for public policy;
provided, that if a jurisdiction is able to demonstrate results based
on an institute-approved evaluation, the results of that evaluation
will be used.
(5) Every four years beginning in 2006 for use in FY 2008, the
Washington state institute for public policy shall use methodologies
similar to those used in previous studies to update the calculation of
savings accruing to the state and to local governments based on
estimated reductions in caseloads and avoided costs reasonably
attributable to selected research-based programs. The institute shall
use the technical working group described in subsection (3) of this
section to review and provide comments on its preliminary findings.
Reimbursements to counties for state cost savings shall be based on
the following:
(a)(i) For the purposes of calculating state and local government
savings, the following categories of expenditures shall be included:
Superior courts, county prosecutors, local juvenile detention, juvenile
rehabilitation administration detention, juvenile court probation,
juvenile rehabilitation parole, adult jail-local and prison, state
community supervision-local sentence, and corrections-postprison
supervision.
(ii) Capital costs and crime victim costs shall be excluded from
the calculation of state and local government savings.
(b) For charter counties with a population of over five hundred
thousand that are included in the pilot program established in
subsection (2) of this section, state payments to a county in a
particular year shall be based on the number of youth engaged by the
selected program during the previous five years and the estimated state
cost avoidance in the payment year attributable to the recidivism
reduction estimated for those youth. The state shall pay no more than
the percentage of current year service model costs (including the costs
for staff, administration, training, fees, and quality assurance) that
is equal to the state's estimated percentage share of total state and
local government current year cost avoidance resulting from service
model interventions during the previous five years.
(c) For counties with a population of five hundred thousand or less
that are included in the pilot program established in subsection (2) of
this section, state payments to a county in a particular year shall be
based on the number of youth engaged by the selected service model
during the year times the average service model cost per youth
(including the costs for staff, administration, staff training, fees,
and quality assurance) multiplied by a percentage which is equal to the
state's estimated percentage share of state and local government cost
avoidance attributable to those youth during the next five years.
(d) Every four years beginning in 2006 for use in FY 2008, the
department of community, trade, and economic development shall update
the factors addressed by this subsection that set the relationship
between the amount of reimbursement and the quantity and quality of
service provided. The department shall use a technical working group
consisting of representatives from the house of representatives, the
senate, the governor's office of financial management, the department
of social and health services, the family policy council, the
Washington state institute for public policy, the juvenile court
administrator's association, and the Washington association of counties
to review and provide comments on its preliminary findings.
(6) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall review county applications for funding through the reinvesting in
youth program and shall select the counties that will be awarded grants
with funds appropriated to implement this section. The department, in
consultation with the Washington state institute for public policy,
shall develop guidelines to determine which counties will be awarded
funding in accordance with the reinvesting in youth program. At a
minimum, counties must meet the following criteria in order to
participate in the reinvesting in youth program:
(a) Counties must demonstrate contributions from nonstate sources
to selected research-based services at least proportional to the local
government share of state and local government cost avoidance;
(b) Counties must demonstrate that state funds allocated pursuant
to this section are used only for the selected research-based services;
(c) Counties must participate fully in the state quality assurance
program established in section 5 of this act to ensure fidelity of
program implementation. If no state quality assurance program is in
effect for a particular selected research-based service, the county
must submit a quality assurance plan for state approval with its grant
application. Failure to demonstrate continuing compliance with quality
assurance plans shall be grounds for termination of state funding; and
(d) Counties that submit joint applications must submit for
approval by the department of community, trade, and economic
development multicounty plans for efficient program delivery.
(7) Nothing in this section creates an entitlement for a county or
group of counties to receive funding under this program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.190 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The reinvesting in youth account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account shall be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used to reimburse
local governments for the implementation of the reinvesting in youth
program established in accordance with section 2 of this act.
(2) Revenues to the reinvesting in youth account consist of
revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.
(3) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall review and monitor the expenditures made by any county or group
of counties that is funded, in whole or in part, with funds provided
through the reinvesting in youth account. Counties shall repay any
funds that are not spent in accordance with this act.
(4) For the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2005, the state
treasurer shall transfer nine hundred ninety-seven thousand dollars
from the general fund into the reinvesting in youth account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
RCW 43.135.035(4) does not apply to the transfers established in
section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.190 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of community, trade, and economic development shall
contract with the department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration for the establishment of a state quality
assurance program. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall
monitor the implementation of intervention programs reimbursed pursuant
to this act and shall evaluate adherence to program design. The
juvenile rehabilitation administration shall report any failures to
comply with its quality assurance standards to the department of
community, trade, and economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The Washington state institute for public
policy shall estimate the costs and benefits resulting from the
implementation of the reinvesting in youth program and provide a report
to the appropriate committees of the legislature, the governor, and to
the department of community, trade, and economic development on
December 1, 2007, and every four years thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---