BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.303 and 2001 c 296 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
School districts, educational service districts, the state school
for the deaf, the state school for the blind, and their contractors
hiring employees who will have regularly scheduled unsupervised access
to children shall require a record check through the Washington state
patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.830 through
43.43.834, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050 and through the federal bureau of
investigation before hiring an employee. The record check shall
include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal
identification fingerprint card. The requesting entity shall provide
a copy of the record report to the applicant. When necessary,
applicants may be employed on a conditional basis pending completion of
the investigation. If the applicant has had a record check within the
previous two years, the district, the state school for the deaf, the
state school for the blind, or contractor may waive the requirement.
The district, pursuant to chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW, the state school
for the deaf, the state school for the blind, or contractor hiring the
employee shall determine who shall pay costs associated with the
initial record check. The state shall pay costs associated with
subsequent record checks for certificated employees for whom the
subsequent record check is required due to a lapsed certificate or a
return to the profession before the certificate has lapsed.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.410.010 and 2001 c 263 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state board of education shall establish, publish, and enforce
rules ((and regulations)) determining eligibility for and certification
of personnel employed in the common schools of this state, including
certification for emergency or temporary, substitute or provisional
duty and under such certificates or permits as the board shall deem
proper or as otherwise prescribed by law. The rules shall require that
the initial application for certification shall require a record check
of the applicant through the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system and through the federal bureau of investigation
at the applicant's expense. The state shall pay costs associated with
subsequent record checks for certificated employees for whom the
subsequent record check is required due to a lapsed certificate or a
return to the profession before the certificate has lapsed. The record
check shall include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington
state criminal identification fingerprint card. The superintendent of
public instruction may waive the record check for any applicant who has
had a record check within the two years before application. The rules
shall permit a holder of a lapsed certificate but not a revoked or
suspended certificate to be employed on a conditional basis by a school
district with the requirement that the holder must complete any
certificate renewal requirements established by the state board of
education within two years of initial reemployment.
In establishing rules pertaining to the qualifications of
instructors of American sign language the state board shall consult
with the national association of the deaf, "sign instructors guidance
network" (s.i.g.n.), and the Washington state association of the deaf
for evaluation and certification of sign language instructors.
The superintendent of public instruction shall act as the
administrator of any such rules ((and regulations)) and have the power
to issue any certificates or permits and revoke the same in accordance
with board rules ((and regulations)).

--- END ---