BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The projectile stun gun study committee
is established to review the sale and use of projectile stun guns
within Washington state. The committee shall be composed of:
(a) Two senators, one from each caucus in the senate;
(b) Two representatives, one from each caucus in the house of
representatives;
(c) One police chief appointed by the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs;
(d) One elected sheriff appointed by the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs;
(e) One representative appointed by the association of Washington
cities;
(f) One representative appointed by the Washington state
association of counties; and
(g) One representative appointed by the department of health.
(2) The committee shall evaluate public safety issues created by
projectile stun guns and make recommendations regarding whether they
should be regulated and, if so, how. Specifically, the committee shall
review:
(a) Public safety issues related to projectile stun guns when used
by the general public;
(b) Ownership limitations, such as age and criminal record
restrictions;
(c) The practicality of requiring criminal background checks prior
to allowing the purchase of a projectile stun gun and who would perform
such criminal background checks;
(d) Manufacturing requirements, such as voltage limits and whether
to require that projectile stun guns disperse traceable coded
materials;
(e) What use and possession limitations should be placed on
projectile stun guns;
(f) Whether mandatory training should be required to purchase a
projectile stun gun;
(g) What penalties shall be assessed to individuals that unlawfully
sell, possess, or use projectile stun guns;
(h) The feelings of the general public about the use of projectile
stun guns as an alternative to traditional firearms as means of
self-protection; and
(i) Any other issue the committee finds relevant to the regulation
of projectile stun guns in Washington.
(3) Staff support shall be provided by senate committee services
and the office of program research.
(4) Legislative members of the study committee shall be reimbursed
for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) A committee report, containing findings and proposed
legislation, if any, shall be delivered to the full legislature, not
later than December 31, 2005.

--- END ---