BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 63.29.010 and 2004 c 168 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Department" means the department of revenue established under
RCW 82.01.050.
(2) "Apparent owner" means the person whose name appears on the
records of the holder as the person entitled to property held, issued,
or owing by the holder.
(3) "Attorney general" means the chief legal officer of this state
referred to in chapter 43.10 RCW.
(4) "Banking organization" means a bank, trust company, savings
bank, land bank, safe deposit company, private banker, or any
organization defined by other law as a bank or banking organization.
(5) "Business association" means a nonpublic corporation, joint
stock company, investment company, business trust, partnership, or
association for business purposes of two or more individuals, whether
or not for profit, including a banking organization, financial
organization, insurance company, or utility.
(6) "Domicile" means the state of incorporation of a corporation
and the state of the principal place of business of an unincorporated
person.
(7) "Fare card" means any pass or instrument, and value contained
therein, purchased to utilize public transportation facilities or
services. "Fare card" does not include "gift card" or "gift
certificate" as those terms are defined in RCW 19.240.010.
(8) "Financial organization" means a savings and loan association,
cooperative bank, building and loan association, or credit union.
(((8))) (9) "Gift certificate" has the same meaning as in RCW
19.240.010.
(((9))) (10) "Holder" means a person, wherever organized or
domiciled, who is:
(a) In possession of property belonging to another,
(b) A trustee, or
(c) Indebted to another on an obligation.
(((10))) (11) "Insurance company" means an association,
corporation, fraternal or mutual benefit organization, whether or not
for profit, which is engaged in providing insurance coverage, including
accident, burial, casualty, credit life, contract performance, dental,
fidelity, fire, health, hospitalization, illness, life (including
endowments and annuities), malpractice, marine, mortgage, surety, and
wage protection insurance.
(((11))) (12) "Intangible property" does not include contract
claims which are unliquidated but does include:
(a) Moneys, checks, drafts, deposits, interest, dividends, and
income;
(b) Credit balances, customer overpayments, gift certificates,
security deposits, refunds, credit memos, unpaid wages, unused airline
tickets, and unidentified remittances, but does not include discounts
which represent credit balances for which no consideration was given;
(c) Stocks, and other intangible ownership interests in business
associations;
(d) Moneys deposited to redeem stocks, bonds, coupons, and other
securities, or to make distributions;
(e) Liquidated amounts due and payable under the terms of insurance
policies; and
(f) Amounts distributable from a trust or custodial fund
established under a plan to provide health, welfare, pension, vacation,
severance, retirement, death, stock purchase, profit sharing, employee
savings, supplemental unemployment insurance, or similar benefits.
(((12))) (13) "Last known address" means a description of the
location of the apparent owner sufficient for the purpose of the
delivery of mail.
(((13))) (14) "Owner" means a depositor in the case of a deposit,
a beneficiary in case of a trust other than a deposit in trust, a
creditor, claimant, or payee in the case of other intangible property,
or a person having a legal or equitable interest in property subject to
this chapter or his legal representative.
(((14))) (15) "Person" means an individual, business association,
state or other government, governmental subdivision or agency, public
corporation, public authority, estate, trust, two or more persons
having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial
entity.
(((15))) (16) "State" means any state, district, commonwealth,
territory, insular possession, or any other area subject to the
legislative authority of the United States.
(((16))) (17) "Third party bank check" means any instrument drawn
against a customer's account with a banking organization or financial
organization on which the banking organization or financial
organization is only secondarily liable.
(((17))) (18) "Utility" means a person who owns or operates for
public use any plant, equipment, property, franchise, or license for
the transmission of communications or the production, storage,
transmission, sale, delivery, or furnishing of electricity, water,
steam, or gas.

Sec. 2 RCW 63.29.020 and 2004 c 168 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, all intangible
property, including any income or increment derived therefrom, less any
lawful charges, that is held, issued, or owing in the ordinary course
of the holder's business and has remained unclaimed by the owner for
more than three years after it became payable or distributable is
presumed abandoned.
(2) Property, with the exception of unredeemed Washington state
lottery tickets and unpresented winning parimutuel tickets, is payable
and distributable for the purpose of this chapter notwithstanding the
owner's failure to make demand or to present any instrument or document
required to receive payment.
(3) This chapter does not apply to claims drafts issued by
insurance companies representing offers to settle claims unliquidated
in amount or settled by subsequent drafts or other means.
(4) This chapter does not apply to property covered by chapter
63.26 RCW.
(5) This chapter does not apply to used clothing, umbrellas, bags,
luggage, or other used personal effects if such property is disposed of
by the holder as follows:
(a) In the case of personal effects of negligible value, the
property is destroyed; or
(b) The property is donated to a bona fide charity.
(6) This chapter does not apply to a gift certificate subject to
the prohibition against expiration dates under RCW 19.240.020 or to a
gift certificate subject to RCW 19.240.030 through 19.240.060.
However, this chapter applies to gift certificates presumed abandoned
under RCW 63.29.110.
(7) This chapter does not apply to fare cards.

--- END ---