BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The people of the state of Washington
deserve decent, safe, and sanitary housing. Certain tenants in the
state of Washington have remained in rental housing that does not meet
the state's minimum standards for health and safety because they cannot
afford to pay the costs of relocation in advance of occupying new,
safe, and habitable housing. In egregious cases, authorities have been
forced to condemn property when landlords have failed to remedy
building code or health code violations after repeated notice, and, as
a result, families with limited financial resources have been displaced
and left with nowhere to go.
The purpose of this act is to establish a process by which
displaced tenants would receive funds for relocation from landlords who
fail to provide safe and sanitary housing after due notice of building
code or health code violations. It is also the purpose of this act to
provide enforcement mechanisms to cities, towns, counties, or municipal
corporations including the ability to advance relocation funds to
tenants who are displaced as a result of a landlord's failure to remedy
building code or health code violations and later to collect the full
amounts of these relocation funds, along with interest and penalties,
from landlords.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.18.085 and 1989 c 342 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a governmental agency responsible for the enforcement of a
building, housing, or other appropriate code has notified the landlord
that a dwelling is condemned or unlawful to occupy due to the existence
of conditions that violate applicable codes, statutes, ordinances, or
regulations, a landlord shall not enter into a rental agreement for the
dwelling unit until the conditions are corrected.
(2) If a landlord knowingly violates subsection (1) of this
section, the tenant shall recover either three months' periodic rent or
up to treble the actual damages sustained as a result of the violation,
whichever is greater, costs of suit, or arbitration and reasonable
attorneys' fees. If the tenant elects to terminate the tenancy as a
result of the conditions leading to the posting, or if the appropriate
governmental agency requires that the tenant vacate the premises, the
tenant also shall recover:
(a) The entire amount of any deposit prepaid by the tenant; and
(b) All prepaid rent.
(3)(a) If a governmental agency responsible for the enforcement of
a building, housing, or other appropriate code has notified the
landlord that a dwelling will be condemned or will be unlawful to
occupy due to the existence of conditions that violate applicable
codes, statutes, ordinances, or regulations, a landlord shall be
required to pay relocation assistance to the displaced tenants except
that:
(i) A landlord shall not be required to pay relocation assistance
to any displaced tenant in a case in which the condemnation or no
occupancy order affects one or more dwelling units and directly results
from conditions caused by a tenant's or any third party's illegal
conduct without the landlord's prior knowledge; and
(ii) A landlord shall not be required to pay relocation assistance
to any displaced tenant in a case in which the condemnation or no
occupancy order affects one or more dwelling units and results from
conditions arising from a natural disaster such as, but not
exclusively, an earthquake, tsunami, wind storm, or hurricane.
(b) Relocation assistance provided to displaced tenants under this
subsection shall be the greater amount of two thousand dollars per
dwelling unit or three times the monthly rent. The amount of
relocation assistance shall be adjusted annually by the percentage
change in the housing component of the consumer price index as
published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor
statistics. In addition to relocation assistance, the landlord shall
be required to pay to the displaced tenants the entire amount of any
deposit prepaid by the tenant and all prepaid rent.
(c) The landlord shall pay relocation assistance and any prepaid
deposit and prepaid rent to displaced tenants within seven days of the
governmental agency sending notice of the condemnation, eviction, or
displacement order to the landlord. The landlord shall pay relocation
assistance and any prepaid deposit and prepaid rent either by making
individual payments by certified check to displaced tenants or by
providing a certified check to the governmental agency ordering
condemnation, eviction, or displacement, for distribution to the
displaced tenants. If the landlord fails to complete payment of
relocation assistance within the period required under this subsection,
the city, town, county, or municipal corporation may advance the cost
of the relocation assistance payments to the displaced tenants.
(d) During the period from the date that a governmental agency
responsible for the enforcement of a building, housing, or other
appropriate code first notifies the landlord of conditions that violate
applicable codes, statutes, ordinances, or regulations to the time that
relocation assistance payments are paid to eligible tenants, or the
conditions leading to the notification are corrected, the landlord may
not:
(i) Evict, harass, or intimidate tenants into vacating their units
for the purpose of avoiding or diminishing application of this section;
(ii) Reduce services to any tenant; or
(iii) Materially increase or change the obligations of any tenant,
including but not limited to any rent increase.
(e) Displaced tenants shall be entitled to recover any relocation
assistance, prepaid deposits, and prepaid rent required by (b) of this
subsection. In addition, displaced tenants shall be entitled to
recover any actual damages sustained by them as a result of the
condemnation, eviction, or displacement that exceed the amount of
relocation assistance that is payable. In any action brought by
displaced tenants to recover any payments or damages required or
authorized by this subsection (3)(e) or (c) of this subsection that are
not paid by the landlord or advanced by the city, town, county, or
municipal corporation, the displaced tenants shall also be entitled to
recover their costs of suit or arbitration and reasonable attorneys'
fees.
(f) If, after thirty days from the date that the city, town,
county, or municipal corporation first advanced relocation assistance
funds to the displaced tenants, a landlord has failed to repay the
amount of relocation assistance advanced by the city, town, county, or
municipal corporation under (c) of this subsection, then the city,
town, county, or municipal corporation shall assess civil penalties in
the amount of fifty dollars per day for each tenant to whom the city,
town, county, or municipal corporation has advanced a relocation
assistance payment.
(g) In addition to the penalties set forth in (f) of this
subsection, interest will accrue on the amount of relocation assistance
paid by the city, town, county, or municipal corporation for which the
property owner has not reimbursed the city, town, county, or municipal
corporation. The rate of interest shall be the maximum legal rate of
interest permitted under RCW 19.52.020, commencing thirty days after
the date that the city first advanced relocation assistance funds to
the displaced tenants.
(h) If the city, town, county, or municipal corporation must
initiate legal action in order to recover the amount of relocation
assistance payments that it has advanced to low-income tenants,
including any interest and penalties under (f) and (g) of this
subsection, the city, town, county, or municipal corporation shall be
entitled to attorneys' fees and costs arising from its legal action.
(4) The government agency that has notified the landlord that a
dwelling will be condemned or will be unlawful to occupy shall notify
the displaced tenants that they may be entitled to relocation
assistance under this section.
(5) No payment received by a displaced tenant under this section
may be considered as income for the purpose of determining the
eligibility or extent of eligibility of any person for assistance under
any state law or for the purposes of any tax imposed under Title 82
RCW, and the payments shall not be deducted from any amount to which
any recipient would otherwise be entitled under Title 74 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.80.030 and 1989 c 133 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the local governing body of a municipality finds that
one or more conditions of the character described in RCW 35.80.010
exist within its territorial limits, ((said)) that governing body may
adopt ordinances relating to such dwellings, buildings, structures, or
premises. Such ordinances may provide for the following:
(a) That an "improvement board" or officer be designated or
appointed to exercise the powers assigned to such board or officer by
the ordinance as specified ((herein. Said)) in this section. The
board or officer may be an existing municipal board or officer in the
municipality, or may be a separate board or officer appointed solely
for the purpose of exercising the powers assigned by ((said)) the
ordinance.
If a board is created, the ordinance shall specify the terms,
method of appointment, and type of membership of ((said)) the board,
which may be limited, if the local governing body chooses, to public
officers ((as herein defined)) under this section.
(b) That if a board is created, a public officer, other than a
member of the improvement board, may be designated to work with the
board and carry out the duties and exercise the powers assigned to
((said)) the public officer by the ordinance.
(c) That if, after a preliminary investigation of any dwelling,
building, structure, or premises, the board or officer finds that it is
unfit for human habitation or other use, he or she shall cause to be
served either personally or by certified mail, with return receipt
requested, upon all persons having any interest therein, as shown upon
the records of the auditor's office of the county in which such
property is located, and shall post in a conspicuous place on such
property, a complaint stating in what respects such dwelling, building,
structure, or premises is unfit for human habitation or other use. If
the whereabouts of any of such persons is unknown and the same cannot
be ascertained by the board or officer in the exercise of reasonable
diligence, and the board or officer makes an affidavit to that effect,
then the serving of such complaint or order upon such persons may be
made either by personal service or by mailing a copy of the complaint
and order by certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested,
to each such person at the address of the building involved in the
proceedings, and mailing a copy of the complaint and order by first
class mail to any address of each such person in the records of the
county assessor or the county auditor for the county where the property
is located. Such complaint shall contain a notice that a hearing will
be held before the board or officer, at a place therein fixed, not less
than ten days nor more than thirty days after the serving of ((said))
the complaint; and that all parties in interest shall be given the
right to file an answer to the complaint, to appear in person, or
otherwise, and to give testimony at the time and place in the
complaint. The rules of evidence prevailing in courts of law or equity
shall not be controlling in hearings before the board or officer. A
copy of such complaint shall also be filed with the auditor of the
county in which the dwelling, building, structure, or ((premise
[premises])) premises is located, and such filing of the complaint or
order shall have the same force and effect as other lis pendens notices
provided by law.
(d) That the board or officer may determine that a dwelling,
building, structure, or premises is unfit for human habitation or other
use if it finds that conditions exist in such dwelling, building,
structure, or premises which are dangerous or injurious to the health
or safety of the occupants of such dwelling, building, structure, or
premises, the occupants of neighboring dwellings, or other residents of
such municipality. Such conditions may include the following, without
limitations: Defects therein increasing the hazards of fire or
accident; inadequate ventilation, light, or sanitary facilities,
dilapidation, disrepair, structural defects, uncleanliness,
overcrowding, or inadequate drainage. The ordinance shall state
reasonable and minimum standards covering such conditions, including
those contained in ordinances adopted in accordance with
((subdivision)) subsection (7)(a) ((herein)) of this section, to guide
the board or the public officer and the agents and employees of either,
in determining the fitness of a dwelling for human habitation, or
building, structure, or premises for other use.
(e) That the determination of whether a dwelling, building,
structure, or premises should be repaired or demolished, shall be based
on specific stated standards on (i) the degree of structural
deterioration of the dwelling, building, structure, or premises, or
(ii) the relationship that the estimated cost of repair bears to the
value of the dwelling, building, structure, or premises, with the
method of determining this value to be specified in the ordinance.
(f) That if, after the required hearing, the board or officer
determines that the dwelling is unfit for human habitation, or building
or structure or premises is unfit for other use, it shall state in
writing its findings of fact in support of such determination, and
shall issue and cause to be served upon the owner or party in interest
thereof, as is provided in ((subdivision (1))) (c) of this subsection,
and shall post in a conspicuous place on ((said)) the property, an
order ((which)) that (i) requires the owner or party in interest,
within the time specified in the order, to repair, alter, or improve
such dwelling, building, structure, or premises to render it fit for
human habitation, or for other use, or to vacate and close the
dwelling, building, structure, or premises, if such course of action is
deemed proper on the basis of the standards set forth as required in
((subdivision (1))) (e) of this subsection; or (ii) requires the owner
or party in interest, within the time specified in the order, to remove
or demolish such dwelling, building, structure, or premises, if this
course of action is deemed proper on the basis of ((said)) those
standards. If no appeal is filed, a copy of such order shall be filed
with the auditor of the county in which the dwelling, building,
structure, or premises is located.
(g) That the owner or any party in interest, within thirty days
from the date of service upon the owner and posting of an order issued
by the board under ((the provisions of subdivision)) (c) of this
subsection, may file an appeal with the appeals commission.
The local governing body of the municipality shall designate or
establish a municipal agency to serve as the appeals commission. The
local governing body shall also establish rules of procedure adequate
to assure a prompt and thorough review of matters submitted to the
appeals commission, and such rules of procedure shall include the
following, without being limited thereto: (i) All matters submitted to
the appeals commission must be resolved by the commission within sixty
days from the date of filing therewith and (ii) a transcript of the
findings of fact of the appeals commission shall be made available to
the owner or other party in interest upon demand.
The findings and orders of the appeals commission shall be reported
in the same manner and shall bear the same legal consequences as if
issued by the board, and shall be subject to review only in the manner
and to the extent provided in ((subdivision)) subsection (2) of this
section.
If the owner or party in interest, following exhaustion of his or
her rights to appeal, fails to comply with the final order to repair,
alter, improve, vacate, close, remove, or demolish the dwelling,
building, structure, or premises, the board or officer may direct or
cause such dwelling, building, structure, or premises to be repaired,
altered, improved, vacated, and closed, removed, or demolished.
(h) That the amount of the cost of such repairs, alterations or
improvements; or vacating and closing; or removal or demolition by the
board or officer, shall be assessed against the real property upon
which such cost was incurred unless such amount is previously paid.
For purposes of this subsection, the cost of vacating and closing shall
include (i) the amount of relocation assistance payments that a
property owner has not repaid to a municipality or other local
government entity that has advanced relocation assistance payments to
tenants under RCW 59.18.085 and (ii) all penalties and interest that
accrue as a result of the failure of the property owner to timely repay
the amount of these relocation assistance payments under RCW 59.18.085.
Upon certification to him or her by the treasurer of the municipality
in cases arising out of the city or town or by the county improvement
board or officer, in cases arising out of the county, of the assessment
amount being due and owing, the county treasurer shall enter the amount
of such assessment upon the tax rolls against the property for the
current year and the same shall become a part of the general taxes for
that year to be collected at the same time and with interest at such
rates and in such manner as provided for in RCW 84.56.020((, as now or
hereafter amended,)) for delinquent taxes, and when collected to be
deposited to the credit of the general fund of the municipality. If
the dwelling, building, structure, or premises is removed or demolished
by the board or officer, the board or officer shall, if possible, sell
the materials of such dwelling, building, structure, (([or])) or
premises in accordance with procedures set forth in ((said)) the
ordinance, and shall credit the proceeds of such sale against the cost
of the removal or demolition and if there be any balance remaining, it
shall be paid to the parties entitled thereto, as determined by the
board or officer, after deducting the costs incident thereto.
The assessment shall constitute a lien against the property which
shall be of equal rank with state, county and municipal taxes.
(2) Any person affected by an order issued by the appeals
commission pursuant to ((subdivision (1)(f) hereof)) subsection (1)(g)
of this section may, within thirty days after the posting and service
of the order, petition to the superior court for an injunction
restraining the public officer or members of the board from carrying
out the provisions of the order. In all such proceedings the court is
authorized to affirm, reverse, or modify the order and such trial shall
be heard de novo.
(3) An ordinance adopted by the local governing body of the
municipality may authorize the board or officer to exercise such powers
as may be necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the
purposes and provisions of this section. These powers shall include
the following in addition to others ((herein)) granted in this section:
(a)(i) To determine which dwellings within the municipality are unfit
for human habitation; (ii) to determine which buildings, structures, or
premises are unfit for other use; (b) to administer oaths and
affirmations, examine witnesses, and receive evidence; and (c) to
investigate the dwelling and other property conditions in the
municipality or county and to enter upon premises for the purpose of
making examinations when the board or officer has reasonable ground for
believing they are unfit for human habitation, or for other use:
PROVIDED, That such entries shall be made in such manner as to cause
the least possible inconvenience to the persons in possession, and to
obtain an order for this purpose after submitting evidence in support
of an application which is adequate to justify such an order from a
court of competent jurisdiction in the event entry is denied or
resisted.
(4) The local governing body of any municipality adopting an
ordinance pursuant to this chapter may appropriate the necessary funds
to administer such ordinance.
(5) ((Nothing in)) This section ((shall be construed to)) does not
abrogate or impair the powers of the courts or of any department of any
municipality to enforce any provisions of its charter or its ordinances
or regulations, nor to prevent or punish violations thereof; and the
powers conferred by this section shall be in addition and supplemental
to the powers conferred by any other law.
(6) ((Nothing in)) This section ((shall be construed to)) does not
impair or limit in any way the power of the municipality to define and
declare nuisances and to cause their removal or abatement, by summary
proceedings or otherwise.
(7) Any municipality may ((())by ordinance adopted by its governing
body(())) (a) prescribe minimum standards for the use and occupancy of
dwellings throughout the municipality((,)) or county, (b) prescribe
minimum standards for the use or occupancy of any building, structure,
or premises used for any other purpose, (c) prevent the use or
occupancy of any dwelling, building, structure, or premises, ((which))
that is injurious to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare, and
(d) prescribe punishment for the violation of any provision of such
ordinance.

--- END ---