BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08A.250 and 2000 c 10 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this
chapter, "work activity" means:
(1) Unsubsidized paid employment in the private or public sector;
(2) Subsidized paid employment in the private or public sector,
including employment through the state or federal work-study program
for a period not to exceed twenty-four months;
(3) Work experience, including:
(a) An internship or practicum, that is paid or unpaid and is
required to complete a course of vocational training or to obtain a
license or certificate in a high demand field, as determined by the
employment security department. No internship or practicum shall
exceed twelve months; or
(b) Work associated with the refurbishing of publicly assisted
housing, if sufficient paid employment is not available;
(4) On-the-job training;
(5) Job search and job readiness assistance;
(6) Community service programs;
(7) Vocational educational training, not to exceed ((twelve))
twenty-four months with respect to any individual;
(8) Job skills training directly related to employment;
(9) Education directly related to employment, in the case of a
recipient who has not received a high school diploma or a GED;
(10) Satisfactory attendance at secondary school or in a course of
study leading to a GED, in the case of a recipient who has not
completed secondary school or received such a certificate;
(11) The provision of child care services to an individual who is
participating in a community service program;
(12) Internships, that shall be paid or unpaid work experience
performed by an intern in a business, industry, or government or
nongovernmental agency setting;
(13) Practicums, which include any educational program in which a
student is working under the close supervision of a professional in an
agency, clinic, or other professional practice setting for purposes of
advancing their skills and knowledge; and
(14) Services required by the recipient under RCW 74.08.025(3) and
74.08A.010(3) to become employable.

--- END ---