BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.581 and 1998 c 294 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A parking space or stall for a ((disabled)) person with a
disability shall be indicated by a vertical sign, between thirty-six
and eighty-four inches off the ground, with the international symbol of
access, whose colors are white on a blue background, described under
RCW 70.92.120 ((and the notice "State disabled parking permit
required.")). The sign may include additional language such as, but
not limited to, an indication of the amount of the monetary penalty
defined in RCW 46.16.381 for parking in the space without a valid
permit.
Failure of the person owning or controlling the property where
required parking spaces are located to erect and maintain the sign is
a class 2 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW for each parking
space that should be so designated. The person owning or controlling
the property where the required parking spaces are located shall ensure
that the parking spaces are not blocked or made inaccessible, and
failure to do so is a class 2 civil infraction.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.381 and 2004 c 222 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall grant special parking privileges to any
person who has a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk
and meets one of the following criteria, as determined by a licensed
physician or an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW:
(a) Cannot walk two hundred feet without stopping to rest;
(b) Is severely limited in ability to walk due to arthritic,
neurological, or orthopedic condition;
(c) Is so severely disabled, that the person cannot walk without
the use of or assistance from a brace, cane, another person, prosthetic
device, wheelchair, or other assistive device;
(d) Uses portable oxygen;
(e) Is restricted by lung disease to such an extent that forced
expiratory respiratory volume, when measured by spirometry is less than
one liter per second or the arterial oxygen tension is less than sixty
mm/hg on room air at rest;
(f) Impairment by cardiovascular disease or cardiac condition to
the extent that the person's functional limitations are classified as
class III or IV under standards accepted by the American Heart
Association; or
(g) Has a disability resulting from an acute sensitivity to
automobile emissions which limits or impairs the ability to walk. The
personal physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner of the
applicant shall document that the disability is comparable in severity
to the others listed in this subsection.
(2) The applications for ((disabled)) parking permits for persons
with disabilities and ((temporary disabled)) parking permits for
persons with temporary disabilities are official state documents.
Knowingly providing false information in conjunction with the
application is a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
The following statement must appear on each application form
immediately below the physician's or advanced registered nurse
practitioner's signature and immediately below the applicant's
signature: "A ((disabled)) parking permit for a person with
disabilities may be issued only for a medical necessity that severely
affects mobility (RCW 46.16.381). Knowingly providing false
information on this application is a gross misdemeanor. The penalty is
up to one year in jail and a fine of up to $5,000 or both."
(3) Persons who qualify for special parking privileges are entitled
to receive from the department of licensing a removable windshield
placard bearing the international symbol of access and an individual
serial number, along with a special identification card bearing the
name and date of birth of the person to whom the placard is issued, and
the placard's serial number. The special identification card shall be
issued no later than January 1, 2000, to all persons who are issued
parking placards, including those issued for temporary disabilities,
and special ((disabled)) parking license plates for persons with
disabilities. The department shall design the placard to be displayed
when the vehicle is parked by suspending it from the rearview mirror,
or in the absence of a rearview mirror the card may be displayed on the
dashboard of any vehicle used to transport the ((disabled)) person with
disabilities. Instead of regular motor vehicle license plates,
((disabled)) persons with disabilities are entitled to receive special
license plates under this section or RCW 46.16.385 bearing the
international symbol of access for one vehicle registered in the
((disabled person's)) name of the person with disabilities.
((Disabled)) Persons with disabilities who are not issued the special
license plates are entitled to receive a second special placard upon
submitting a written request to the department. Persons who have been
issued the parking privileges and who are using a vehicle or are riding
in a vehicle displaying the placard or special license plates issued
under this section or RCW 46.16.385 may park in places reserved for
((mobility disabled)) persons with physical disabilities. The director
shall adopt rules providing for the issuance of special placards and
license plates to public transportation authorities, nursing homes
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, boarding homes licensed under chapter
18.20 RCW, senior citizen centers, private nonprofit agencies as
defined in chapter 24.03 RCW, and vehicles registered with the
department as cabulances that regularly transport ((disabled)) persons
with disabilities who have been determined eligible for special parking
privileges provided under this section. The director may issue special
license plates for a vehicle registered in the name of the public
transportation authority, nursing home, boarding home((s)), senior
citizen center, private nonprofit agency, or cabulance service if the
vehicle is primarily used to transport persons with disabilities
described in this section. Public transportation authorities, nursing
homes, boarding homes, senior citizen centers, private nonprofit
agencies, and cabulance services are responsible for insuring that the
special placards and license plates are not used improperly and are
responsible for all fines and penalties for improper use.
(4) Whenever the ((disabled)) person with disabilities transfers or
assigns his or her interest in the vehicle, the special license plates
shall be removed from the motor vehicle. If another vehicle is
acquired by the ((disabled)) person with disabilities and the vehicle
owner qualifies for a special plate, the plate shall be attached to the
vehicle, and the director shall be immediately notified of the transfer
of the plate. If another vehicle is not acquired by the ((disabled))
person with disabilities, the removed plate shall be immediately
surrendered to the director.
(5) The special license plate shall be renewed in the same manner
and at the time required for the renewal of regular motor vehicle
license plates under this chapter. No special license plate may be
issued to a person who is temporarily disabled. A person who has a
condition expected to improve within six months may be issued a
temporary placard for a period not to exceed six months. If the
condition exists after six months a new temporary placard shall be
issued upon receipt of a new certification from the ((disabled))
person's physician. The permanent parking placard and identification
card of a ((disabled)) person with disabilities shall be renewed at
least every five years, as required by the director, by satisfactory
proof of the right to continued use of the privileges. In the event of
the permit holder's death, the parking placard and identification card
must be immediately surrendered to the department. The department
shall match and purge its ((disabled permit)) data base of parking
permits issued to persons with disabilities with available death record
information at least every twelve months.
(6) Each person with disabilities who has been issued a permanent
((disabled)) parking permit on or before July 1, 1998, must renew the
permit no later than July 1, 2003, subject to a schedule to be set by
the department, or the permit will expire.
(7) Additional fees shall not be charged for the issuance of the
special placards or the identification cards. No additional fee may be
charged for the issuance of the special license plates except the
regular motor vehicle registration fee and any other fees and taxes
required to be paid upon registration of a motor vehicle.
(8) Any unauthorized use of the special placard, special license
plate issued under this section or RCW 46.16.385, or identification
card is a traffic infraction with a monetary penalty of two hundred
fifty dollars.
(9) It is a parking infraction, with a monetary penalty of two
hundred fifty dollars for a person to make inaccessible the access
aisle located next to a space reserved for ((physically disabled))
persons with physical disabilities. The clerk of the court shall
report all violations related to this subsection to the department.
(10) It is a parking infraction, with a monetary penalty of two
hundred fifty dollars for any person to park a vehicle in a parking
place provided on private property without charge or on public property
reserved for ((physically disabled)) persons with physical disabilities
without a placard or special license plate issued under this section or
RCW 46.16.385. If a person is charged with a violation, the person
shall not be determined to have committed an infraction if the person
produces in court or before the court appearance the placard or special
license plate issued under this section or RCW 46.16.385 required under
this section. A local jurisdiction providing nonmetered, on-street
parking places reserved for ((physically disabled)) persons with
physical disabilities may impose by ordinance time restrictions of no
less than four hours on the use of these parking places. A local
jurisdiction may impose by ordinance time restrictions of no less than
four hours on the use of nonreserved, on-street parking spaces by
vehicles displaying the special parking placards or special license
plates issued under this section or RCW 46.16.385. All time
restrictions must be clearly posted.
(11) The penalties imposed under subsections (9) and (10) of this
section shall be used by that local jurisdiction exclusively for law
enforcement. The court may also impose an additional penalty
sufficient to reimburse the local jurisdiction for any costs it may
have incurred in removal and storage of the improperly parked vehicle.
(12) Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, it is a
traffic infraction with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars
for any person willfully to obtain a special license plate issued under
this section or RCW 46.16.385, placard, or identification card in a
manner other than that established under this section.
(13)(a) A law enforcement agency authorized to enforce parking laws
may appoint volunteers, with a limited commission, to issue notices of
infractions for violations of this section or RCW 46.61.581.
Volunteers must be at least twenty-one years of age. The law
enforcement agency appointing volunteers may establish any other
qualifications the agency deems desirable.
(b) An agency appointing volunteers under this section must provide
training to the volunteers before authorizing them to issue notices of
infractions.
(c) A notice of infraction issued by a volunteer appointed under
this subsection has the same force and effect as a notice of infraction
issued by a police officer for the same offense.
(d) A police officer or a volunteer may request a person to show
the person's identification card or special parking placard when
investigating the possibility of a violation of this section. If the
request is refused, the person in charge of the vehicle may be issued
a notice of infraction for a violation of this section.
(14) For second or subsequent violations of this section, in
addition to a monetary fine, the violator must complete a minimum of
forty hours of:
(a) Community restitution for a nonprofit organization that serves
((the disabled community or)) persons having disabilities or disabling
diseases; or
(b) Any other community restitution that may sensitize the violator
to the needs and obstacles faced by persons who have disabilities.
(15) The court may not suspend more than one-half of any fine
imposed under subsection (8), (9), (10), or (12) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.385 and 2004 c 222 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall design and issue ((disabled parking
emblem)) versions of special license plates including the international
symbol of access described in RCW 70.92.120 for plates issued under (a)
RCW 46.16.301; (b) RCW 46.16.305, except those plates issued under RCW
46.16.305 (1) and (2); (c) RCW 46.16.324; (d) RCW 46.16.745; (e) RCW
73.04.110; (f) RCW 73.04.115; or (g) RCW 46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c),
as it existed before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997.
The ((disabled parking emblem)) version of the special plate ((must
display)) including the ((universal)) international symbol of access
((that)) may be used in lieu of the parking placard issued to persons
who qualify for special parking privileges under RCW 46.16.381. The
department may not charge an additional fee for the issuance of the
special ((disabled parking emblem)) license plate including the
international symbol of access, except the regular motor vehicle
registration fee, the fee associated with the particular special plate,
and any other fees and taxes required to be paid upon registration of
a motor vehicle. The ((emblem)) international symbol of access must be
incorporated into the design of the special license plate in a manner
to be determined by the department, and under existing vehicular
licensing procedures and existing laws.
(2) Persons who qualify for special parking privileges under RCW
46.16.381, and who have applied and paid the appropriate fee for any of
the special license plates listed in subsection (1) of this section,
are entitled to receive from the department a special ((disabled
parking emblem)) license plate including the international symbol of
access. The special ((disabled parking emblem)) license plate
including the international symbol of access may be used for one
vehicle registered in the ((disabled person's)) name of the person with
the disability. Persons who have been issued the parking privileges or
who are using a vehicle displaying the special ((disabled parking
emblem)) license plate including the international symbol of access may
park in places reserved for ((mobility disabled)) persons with physical
disabilities.
(3) ((The)) Special ((disabled parking emblem)) license plates
including the international symbol of access must be administered in
the same manner as ((the)) plates issued under RCW 46.16.381.
(4) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16.390 and 1991 c 339 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
A special license plate or card issued by another state or country
that indicates an occupant of the vehicle ((is disabled)) has
disabilities, entitles the vehicle on or in which it is displayed and
being used to transport the ((disabled)) person with disabilities to
lawfully park in a parking place reserved for ((physically disabled))
persons with physical disabilities pursuant to chapter 70.92 RCW or
authority implemental thereof.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.55.113 and 2003 c 178 s 1 and 2003 c 177 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the driver of a vehicle is arrested for a violation of
RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.20.342, or 46.20.345, the vehicle is
subject to summary impoundment, pursuant to the terms and conditions of
an applicable local ordinance or state agency rule at the direction of
a law enforcement officer.
(2) In addition, a police officer may take custody of a vehicle, at
his or her discretion, and provide for its prompt removal to a place of
safety under any of the following circumstances:
(a) Whenever a police officer finds a vehicle standing upon the
roadway in violation of any of the provisions of RCW 46.61.560, the
officer may provide for the removal of the vehicle or require the
driver or other person in charge of the vehicle to move the vehicle to
a position off the roadway;
(b) Whenever a police officer finds a vehicle unattended upon a
highway where the vehicle constitutes an obstruction to traffic or
jeopardizes public safety;
(c) Whenever a police officer finds an unattended vehicle at the
scene of an accident or when the driver of a vehicle involved in an
accident is physically or mentally incapable of deciding upon steps to
be taken to protect his or her property;
(d) Whenever the driver of a vehicle is arrested and taken into
custody by a police officer;
(e) Whenever a police officer discovers a vehicle that the officer
determines to be a stolen vehicle;
(f) Whenever a vehicle without a special license plate, ((card))
placard, or decal indicating that the vehicle is being used to
transport a ((disabled)) person with disabilities under RCW 46.16.381
is parked in a stall or space clearly and conspicuously marked under
RCW 46.61.581 which space is provided on private property without
charge or on public property;
(g) Upon determining that a person is operating a motor vehicle
without a valid driver's license in violation of RCW 46.20.005 or with
a license that has been expired for ninety days or more;
(h) When a vehicle is illegally occupying a truck, commercial
loading zone, restricted parking zone, bus, loading, hooded-meter,
taxi, street construction or maintenance, or other similar zone where,
by order of the director of transportation or chiefs of police or fire
or their designees, parking is limited to designated classes of
vehicles or is prohibited during certain hours, on designated days or
at all times, if the zone has been established with signage for at
least twenty-four hours and where the vehicle is interfering with the
proper and intended use of the zone. Signage must give notice to the
public that a vehicle will be removed if illegally parked in the zone.
(3) When an arrest is made for a violation of RCW 46.20.342, if the
vehicle is a commercial vehicle and the driver of the vehicle is not
the owner of the vehicle, before the summary impoundment directed under
subsection (1) of this section, the police officer shall attempt in a
reasonable and timely manner to contact the owner of the vehicle and
may release the vehicle to the owner if the owner is reasonably
available, as long as the owner was not in the vehicle at the time of
the stop and arrest and the owner has not received a prior release
under this subsection or RCW 46.55.120(1)(a)(ii).
(4) Nothing in this section may derogate from the powers of police
officers under the common law. For the purposes of this section, a
place of safety may include the business location of a registered tow
truck operator.

Sec. 6 RCW 73.04.110 and 2004 c 223 s 6 and 2004 c 125 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Any person who is a veteran as defined in RCW 41.04.007 who submits
to the department of licensing satisfactory proof of a service-connected disability rating from the veterans administration or the
military service from which the veteran was discharged and:
(1) Has lost the use of both hands or one foot;
(2) Was captured and incarcerated for more than twenty-nine days by
an enemy of the United States during a period of war with the United
States;
(3) Has become blind in both eyes as the result of military
service; or
(4) Is rated by the veterans administration or the military service
from which the veteran was discharged and is receiving service-connected compensation at the one hundred percent rate that is expected
to exist for more than one year;
is entitled to regular or special license plates issued by the
department of licensing. The special license plates shall bear
distinguishing marks, letters, or numerals indicating that the motor
vehicle is owned by a ((disabled)) veteran with disabilities or former
prisoner of war. This license shall be issued annually for one
personal use vehicle without payment of any license fees or excise tax
thereon. Whenever any person who has been issued license plates under
the provisions of this section applies to the department for transfer
of the plates to a subsequently acquired motor vehicle, a transfer fee
of ten dollars shall be charged in addition to all other appropriate
fees. The department may periodically verify the one hundred percent
rate as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
Any person who has been issued free motor vehicle license plates
under this section prior to July 1, 1983, shall continue to be eligible
for the annual free license plates.
For the purposes of this section, "blind" means the definition of
"blind" used by the state of Washington in determining eligibility for
financial assistance to the blind under Title 74 RCW.
Any unauthorized use of a special plate is a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---