BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the decisions in
In re Young, 120 Wn. App. 753, review denied, Wn.2d (2004) and
In re Ward, Wn. App. (2005) illustrate an unintended
consequence of language in chapter 71.09 RCW.
The Young and Ward decisions are contrary to the legislature's
intent set forth in RCW 71.09.010 that civil commitment pursuant to
chapter 71.09 RCW address the "very long-term" needs of the sexually
violent predator population for treatment and the equally long-term
needs of the community for protection from these offenders. The
legislature finds that the mental abnormalities and personality
disorders that make a person subject to commitment under chapter 71.09
RCW are severe and chronic and do not remit due solely to advancing age
or changes in other demographic factors.
The legislature finds, although severe medical conditions like
stroke, paralysis, and some types of dementia can leave a person unable
to commit further sexually violent acts, that a mere advance in age or
a change in gender or some other demographic factor after the time of
commitment does not merit a new trial proceeding under RCW 71.09.090.
To the contrary, the legislature finds that a new trial ordered under
the circumstances set forth in Young and Ward subverts the statutory
focus on treatment and reduces community safety by removing all
incentive for successful treatment participation in favor of passive
aging and distracting committed persons from fully engaging in sex
offender treatment.
The Young and Ward decisions are contrary to the legislature's
intent that the risk posed by persons committed under chapter 71.09 RCW
will generally require prolonged treatment in a secure facility
followed by intensive community supervision in the cases where positive
treatment gains are sufficient for community safety. The legislature
has, under the guidance of the federal court, provided avenues through
which committed persons who successfully progress in treatment will be
supported by the state in a conditional release to a less restrictive
alternative that is in the best interest of the committed person and
provides adequate safeguards to the community and is the appropriate
next step in the person's treatment.
The legislature also finds that, in some cases, a committed person
may appropriately challenge whether he or she continues to meet the
criteria for commitment. Because of this, the legislature enacted RCW
71.09.070 and 71.09.090, requiring a regular review of a committed
person's status and permitting the person the opportunity to present
evidence of a relevant change in condition from the time of the last
commitment trial proceeding. These provisions are intended only to
provide a method of revisiting the indefinite commitment due to a
relevant change in the person's condition, not an alternate method of
collaterally attacking a person's indefinite commitment for reasons
unrelated to a change in condition. Where necessary, other existing
statutes and court rules provide ample opportunity to resolve any
concerns about prior commitment trials. Therefore, the legislature
intends to clarify the "so changed" standard.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.09.090 and 2001 c 286 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the secretary determines that ((either: (a))) the person's
condition has so changed that either: (a) The person no longer meets
the definition of a sexually violent predator; or (b) conditional
release to a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of
the person and conditions can be imposed that adequately protect the
community, the secretary shall authorize the person to petition the
court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or
unconditional discharge. The petition shall be filed with the court
and served upon the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial
commitment. The court, upon receipt of the petition for conditional
release to a less restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge,
shall within forty-five days order a hearing.
(2)(a) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the person
from otherwise petitioning the court for conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge without the
secretary's approval. The secretary shall provide the committed person
with an annual written notice of the person's right to petition the
court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or
unconditional discharge over the secretary's objection. The notice
shall contain a waiver of rights. The secretary shall file the notice
and waiver form and the annual report with the court. If the person
does not affirmatively waive the right to petition, the court shall set
a show cause hearing to determine whether probable cause exists to
warrant a hearing on whether((: (i))) the person's condition has so
changed that: (i) He or she no longer meets the definition of a
sexually violent predator; or (ii) conditional release to a proposed
less restrictive alternative would be in the best interest of the
person and conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the
community.
(b) The committed person shall have a right to have an attorney
represent him or her at the show cause hearing, which may be conducted
solely on the basis of affidavits or declarations, but the person is
not entitled to be present at the show cause hearing. At the show
cause hearing, the prosecuting attorney or attorney general shall
present prima facie evidence establishing that the committed person
continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator and
that a less restrictive alternative is not in the best interest of the
person and conditions cannot be imposed that adequately protect the
community. In making this showing, the state may rely exclusively upon
the annual report prepared pursuant to RCW 71.09.070. The committed
person may present responsive affidavits or declarations to which the
state may reply.
(c) If the court at the show cause hearing determines that either:
(i) The state has failed to present prima facie evidence that the
committed person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent
predator and that no proposed less restrictive alternative is in the
best interest of the person and conditions cannot be imposed that would
adequately protect the community; or (ii) probable cause exists to
believe that the person's condition has so changed that: (A) The
person no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator;
or (B) release to a proposed less restrictive alternative would be in
the best interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that
would adequately protect the community, then the court shall set a
hearing on either or both issues.
(d) If the court has not previously considered the issue of release
to a less restrictive alternative, either through a trial on the merits
or through the procedures set forth in RCW 71.09.094(1), the court
shall consider whether release to a less restrictive alternative would
be in the best interests of the person and conditions can be imposed
that would adequately protect the community, without considering
whether the person's condition has changed.
(3)(a) At the hearing resulting from subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, the committed person shall be entitled to be present and to
the benefit of all constitutional protections that were afforded to the
person at the initial commitment proceeding. The prosecuting agency or
the attorney general if requested by the county shall represent the
state and shall have a right to a jury trial and to have the committed
person evaluated by experts chosen by the state. The committed person
shall also have the right to a jury trial and the right to have experts
evaluate him or her on his or her behalf and the court shall appoint an
expert if the person is indigent and requests an appointment.
(b) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be
unconditionally discharged, the burden of proof shall be upon the state
to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the committed person's
condition remains such that the person continues to meet the definition
of a sexually violent predator. Evidence of the prior commitment trial
and disposition is admissible.
(c) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be
conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative, the burden of
proof at the hearing shall be upon the state to prove beyond a
reasonable doubt that conditional release to any proposed less
restrictive alternative either: (i) Is not in the best interest of the
committed person; or (ii) does not include conditions that would
adequately protect the community. Evidence of the prior commitment
trial and disposition is admissible.
(4)(a) Probable cause exists to believe that a person's condition
has "so changed," under subsection (2) of this section, only when
evidence exists, since the person's last commitment trial proceeding,
of a substantial change in the person's physical or mental condition
such that the person either no longer meets the definition of a
sexually violent predator or that a conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative is in the person's best interest and conditions
can be imposed to adequately protect the community.
(b) A new trial proceeding under subsection (3) of this section may
be ordered, or held, only when there is current evidence from a
licensed professional of one of the following and the evidence presents
a change in condition since the person's last commitment trial
proceeding:
(i) An identified physiological change to the person, such as
paralysis, stroke, or dementia, that renders the committed person
unable to commit a sexually violent act and this change is permanent;
or
(ii) A change in the person's mental condition brought about
through positive response to continuing participation in treatment
which indicates that the person meets the standard for conditional
release to a less restrictive alternative or that the person would be
safe to be at large if unconditionally released from commitment.
(c) For purposes of this section, a change in a single demographic
factor, without more, does not establish probable cause for a new trial
proceeding under subsection (3) of this section. As used in this
section, a single demographic factor includes, but is not limited to,
a change in the chronological age, marital status, or gender of the
committed person.
(5) The jurisdiction of the court over a person civilly committed
pursuant to this chapter continues until such time as the person is
unconditionally discharged.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---