BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall develop a curriculum designed to train the
staff of the department's children's administration who assess or
provide services to adolescents on how to screen and respond to
referrals to child protective services when those referrals may involve
victims of abuse or neglect between the ages of eleven and eighteen.
At a minimum, the curriculum developed pursuant to this section shall
include:
(a) Review of relevant laws and regulations, including the
requirement that the department investigate complaints if a parent's or
caretaker's actions result in serious physical or emotional harm or
present an imminent risk of serious harm to any person under eighteen;
(b) Review of policies of the department's children's
administration that require assessment and screening of abuse and
neglect referrals on the basis of risk and not age;
(c) Explanation of safety assessment and risk assessment models;
(d) Case studies of situations in which the department has received
reports of alleged abuse or neglect of older children and adolescents;
(e) Discussion of best practices in screening and responding to
referrals involving older children and adolescents; and
(f) Discussion of how abuse and neglect referrals related to
adolescents are investigated and when law enforcement must be notified.
(2) As it develops its curriculum pursuant to this section, the
department shall request that the office of the family and children's
ombudsman review and comment on its proposed training materials. The
department shall consider the comments and recommendations of the
office of the family and children's ombudsman as it develops the
curriculum required by this section.
(3) The department shall complete the curriculum materials required
by this section no later than December 31, 2005.
(4) The department shall train the child protective services
workers who screen intake calls on how to screen and respond to
referrals that may involve victims of abuse or neglect between the ages
of eleven and eighteen. The training shall be based substantially on
the curriculum developed pursuant to this act and shall be completed by
December 31, 2005.
(5) The department shall use the curriculum to train all children's
administration staff responsible for assessing or providing services to
older children and adolescents by April 30, 2006.
(6) The department shall include the curriculum in its training of
all new employees of children's administration.
(7) The department shall keep a record of all of the employees who
have attended the training required by this section.
(8) The department shall review a sampling of not less than thirty
percent of the screening decisions by child protective services related
to children between the ages of eleven and eighteen on a quarterly
basis through June 30, 2007. The department shall use the results of
the quarterly reviews required by this section to improve practice and
to improve the curriculum required by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---