BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 14.08.120 and 1990 c 215 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the general powers conferred in this chapter, and
without limitation thereof, a municipality that has established or may
hereafter establish airports, restricted landing areas, or other air
navigation facilities, or that has acquired or set apart or may
hereafter acquire or set apart real property for that purpose or
purposes is authorized:
(1) To vest authority for the construction, enlargement,
improvement, maintenance, equipment, operation, and regulation thereof
in an officer, a board, or body of the municipality by ordinance or
resolution that prescribes the powers and duties of the officer, board,
or body; and the municipality may also vest authority for industrial
and commercial development in a municipal airport commission consisting
of at least five resident taxpayers of the municipality to be appointed
by the governing board of the municipality by an ordinance or
resolution that includes (a) the terms of office, which may not exceed
six years and which shall be staggered so that not more than three
terms will expire in the same year, (b) the method of appointment and
filling vacancies, (c) a provision that there shall be no compensation
but may provide for a per diem of not to exceed twenty-five dollars per
day plus travel expenses for time spent on commission business, (d) the
powers and duties of the commission, and (e) any other matters
necessary to the exercise of the powers relating to industrial and
commercial development. The expense of the construction, enlargement,
improvement, maintenance, equipment, industrial and commercial
development, operation, and regulation are the responsibility of the
municipality.
(2) To adopt and amend all needed rules, regulations, and
ordinances for the management, government, and use of any properties
under its control, whether within or outside the territorial limits of
the municipality; to provide fire protection for the airport, including
the acquisition and operation of fire protection equipment and
facilities, and the right to contract with any private body or
political subdivision of the state for the furnishing of such fire
protection; to appoint airport guards or police, with full police
powers; to fix by ordinance or resolution, as may be appropriate,
penalties for the violation of the rules, regulations, and ordinances,
and enforce those penalties in the same manner in which penalties
prescribed by other rules, regulations, and ordinances of the
municipality are enforced. For the purposes of such management and
government and direction of public use, that part of all highways,
roads, streets, avenues, boulevards, and territory that adjoins the
limits of any airport or restricted landing area acquired or maintained
under the provisions of this chapter is under like control and
management of the municipality. It may also adopt and enact rules,
regulations, and ordinances designed to safeguard the public upon or
beyond the limits of private airports or landing strips within the
municipality or its police jurisdiction against the perils and hazards
of instrumentalities used in aerial navigation. Rules, regulations,
and ordinances shall be published as provided by general law or the
charter of the municipality for the publication of similar rules,
regulations, and ordinances. They shall conform to and be consistent
with the laws of this state and the rules of the state department of
transportation and shall be kept in conformity, as nearly as may be,
with the then current federal legislation governing aeronautics and the
regulations duly promulgated thereunder and the rules and standards
issued from time to time pursuant thereto.
(3) To create a special airport fund, and provide that all receipts
from the operation of the airport be deposited in the fund, which fund
shall remain intact from year to year and may be pledged to the payment
of aviation bonds, or kept for future maintenance, construction, or
operation of airports or airport facilities.
(4) To lease airports or other air navigation facilities, or real
property acquired or set apart for airport purposes, to private
parties, any municipal or state government or the national government,
or any department thereof, for operation; to lease or assign to private
parties, any municipal or state government or the national government,
or any department thereof, for operation or use consistent with the
purposes of this chapter, space, area, improvements, or equipment of
such airports; to authorize its lessees to construct, alter, repair, or
improve the leased premises at the cost of the lessee and to reimburse
its lessees for such cost, provided the cost is paid solely out of
funds fully collected from the airport's tenants; to sell any part of
such airports, other air navigation facilities or real property to any
municipal or state government, or to the United States or any
department or instrumentality thereof, for aeronautical purposes or
purposes incidental thereto, and to confer the privileges of
concessions of supplying upon its airports goods, commodities, things,
services, and facilities: PROVIDED, That in each case in so doing the
public is not deprived of its rightful, equal, and uniform use thereof.
(5) Acting through its governing body, to sell or lease any
property, real or personal, acquired for airport purposes and belonging
to the municipality, which, in the judgment of its governing body, may
not be required for aircraft landings, aircraft takeoffs or related
aeronautic purposes, in accordance with the laws of this state, or the
provisions of the charter of the municipality, governing the sale or
leasing of similar municipally owned property. The municipal airport
commission, if one has been organized and appointed under subsection
(1) of this section, may lease any airport property for aircraft
landings, aircraft takeoffs, or related aeronautic purposes. If there
is a finding by the governing body of the municipality that any airport
property, real or personal, is not required for aircraft landings,
aircraft takeoffs, or related aeronautic purposes, then the municipal
airport commission may lease such space, land, area, or improvements,
or construct improvements, or take leases back for financing purposes,
grant concessions on such space, land, area, or improvements, all for
industrial or commercial purposes, by private negotiation and under
such terms and conditions that seem just and proper to the municipal
airport commission. Any such lease of real property for aircraft
manufacturing or aircraft industrial purposes or to any manufacturer of
aircraft or aircraft parts or for any other business, manufacturing, or
industrial purpose or operation relating to, identified with, or in any
way dependent upon the use, operation, or maintenance of the airport,
or for any commercial or industrial purpose may be made for any period
not to exceed seventy-five years, but any such lease of real property
made for a longer period than ten years shall contain provisions
requiring the municipality and the lessee to permit the rentals for
each five-year period thereafter, to be readjusted at the commencement
of each such period if written request for readjustment is given by
either party to the other at least thirty days before the commencement
of the five-year period for which the readjustment is requested. If
the parties cannot agree upon the rentals for the five-year period,
they shall submit to have the disputed rentals for the period adjusted
by arbitration. The lessee shall pick one arbitrator, and the
governing body of the municipality shall pick one, and the two so
chosen shall select a third. After a review of all pertinent facts the
board of arbitrators may increase or decrease such rentals or continue
the previous rate thereof.
The proceeds of the sale of any property the purchase price of
which was obtained by the sale of bonds shall be deposited in the bond
sinking fund. If all the proceeds of the sale are not needed to pay
the principal of bonds remaining unpaid, the remainder shall be paid
into the airport fund of the municipality. The proceeds of sales of
property the purchase price of which was paid from appropriations of
tax funds shall be paid into the airport fund of the municipality.
(6) To determine the charges or rental for the use of any
properties under its control and the charges for any services or
accommodations, and the terms and conditions under which such
properties may be used: PROVIDED, That in all cases the public is not
deprived of its rightful, equal, and uniform use of the property.
Charges shall be reasonable and uniform for the same class of service
and established with due regard to the property and improvements used
and the expense of operation to the municipality. The municipality
shall have and may enforce liens, as provided by law for liens and
enforcement thereof, for repairs to or improvement or storage or care
of any personal property, to enforce the payment of any such charges.
(7) To impose a customer facility charge upon customers of rental
car companies accessing the airport for the purposes of financing,
designing, constructing, operating, and maintaining consolidated rental
car facilities and common use transportation equipment and facilities
which are used to transport the customer between the consolidated car
rental facilities and other airport facilities. The airport operator
may require the rental car companies to collect the facility charges,
and any facility charges so collected shall be deposited in a trust
account for the benefit of the airport operator and remitted at the
direction of the airport operator, but no more often than once per
month. The charge shall be calculated on a per-day basis. Facility
charges may not exceed the reasonable costs of financing, designing,
constructing, operating, and maintaining the consolidated car rental
facilities and common use transportation equipment and facilities and
may not be used for any other purpose.
(8) To exercise all powers necessarily incidental to the exercise
of the general and special powers granted in this section.

--- END ---