BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that commercial
waterway districts were created for the purpose of constructing
waterways for industrial and commercial development. Subsequently, the
property and functions of waterway districts were transferred to port
districts, the districts were dissolved, and their governing statutes
were repealed. The legislature further finds that private use of
former waterway district lands without administrative oversight
authority by the public owner is not in the best interest of the public
or of taxpayers. Management under port district authority of former
commercial waterway district property must be conducted in a manner
that maintains the area's economic vitality, protects the environment,
and responsibly preserves the public interest in public property.
By December 1, 2005, a port district to which the property of a
former commercial waterway district was transferred shall report to the
chairs of the legislative committees with jurisdiction regarding port
property formerly owned by the waterway district. The report shall, to
the extent practicable, include the following information: (1)
Existing uses of the port property by those using former waterway
district property; (2) a general outline of potential future uses of
the public property owned by the port district; (3) the status of the
environmental mitigation and cleanup of the waterway that is required
by federal and state law; (4) the status of the port district's
communication to, and work with, those using former waterway district
property as of January 1, 2005; and (5) general terms and conditions of
leases the port believes are necessary to give the port adequate
control over its property and the general terms and conditions that the
port believes will give the current users of the public property
continued access to the waterway.
This section expires December 31, 2005.

--- END ---