BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.75.010 and 1984 c 7 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this title with relation to roads and bridges, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Alley," a highway not designed for general travel and
primarily used as a means of access to the rear of residences and
business establishments;
(2) "Board," the board of county commissioners or the county
legislative authority, however organized;
(3) "Center line," the line, marked or unmarked, parallel to and
equidistant from the sides of a two-way traffic roadway of a highway
except where otherwise indicated by painted lines or markers;
(4) "City street," every highway or part thereof, located within
the limits of incorporated cities and towns, except alleys;
(5) "County engineer" ((includes)) means the county road engineer,
county engineer, and engineer, and shall refer to the statutorily
required position of county engineer appointed under RCW 36.80.010; and
may include the county director of public works when the person in that
position also meets the requirements of a licensed professional
engineer and is duly appointed by the county legislative authority
under RCW 36.80.010;
(6) "County road," every highway or part thereof, outside the
limits of incorporated cities and towns and which has not been
designated as a state highway;
(7) "Department," the state department of transportation;
(8) "Director" or "secretary," the state secretary of
transportation or his or her duly authorized assistant;
(9) "Pedestrian," any person afoot;
(10) "Private road or driveway," every way or place in private
ownership and used for travel of vehicles by the owner or those having
express or implied permission from the owner, but not by other persons;
(11) "Highway," every way, lane, road, street, boulevard, and every
way or place in the state of Washington open as a matter of right to
public vehicular travel both inside and outside the limits of
incorporated cities and towns;
(12) "Railroad," a carrier of persons or property upon vehicles,
other than streetcars, operated upon stationary rails, the route of
which is principally outside incorporated cities and towns;
(13) "Roadway," the paved, improved, or proper driving portion of
a highway designed or ordinarily used for vehicular travel;
(14) "Sidewalk," property between the curb lines or the lateral
lines of a roadway, and the adjacent property, set aside and intended
for the use of pedestrians or such portion of private property parallel
and in proximity to a highway and dedicated to use by pedestrians;
(15) "State highway," includes every highway as herein defined, or
part thereof, that has been designated as a state highway, or branch
thereof, by legislative enactment.

--- END ---