BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35A.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Proceedings for excluding agricultural land from the boundaries of
a charter code city or noncharter code city may be commenced by the
filing of a petition which is sufficient as determined by RCW
35A.01.040 by property owners of the agricultural land proposed to be
excluded, in the following manner which is alternative to other methods
provided in this chapter:
(1) A petition for exclusion of agricultural land from the
incorporated area of a code city shall be filed with the legislative
body of the municipality. The petition for exclusion must be signed by
the owners of not less than one hundred percent of the agricultural
land for which exclusion is sought and, if residents exist within the
area proposed for exclusion, a majority of the registered voters
residing in the area for which exclusion is petitioned.
(2) The petition shall set forth a legal description of the
territory proposed to be excluded and shall be accompanied by a drawing
that outlines the boundaries of the territory sought to be excluded.
(3) When a petition for exclusion that meets the requirements of
this section and RCW 35A.01.040 is filed with the legislative body of
the code city, the legislative body shall set a date, not later than
sixty days after the filing of the request, for a public hearing
thereon and cause notice of the hearing to be published in one or more
issues of a newspaper of general circulation in the city. The notice
shall also be posted in three public places within the territory
proposed for exclusion, and shall specify the time and place of hearing
and invite interested persons to appear and voice approval or
disapproval of the exclusion.
(4) Following the hearing, if the legislative body determines to
effect the exclusion from city boundaries, they shall do so by
ordinance. The ordinance may exclude all or any portion of the
proposed territory but may not include in the exclusion any territory
not described in the petition. The ordinance shall contain a legal
description of the territory and declare it no longer a part of the
code city.

--- END ---