BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.285 and 1973 2nd ex.s. c 41 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter constitutes the exclusive legislative authority
for the licensing and regulation of any gambling activity and the state
preempts such licensing and regulatory functions, except as to the
powers and duties of any city, town, city-county, or county which are
specifically set forth in this chapter. Any ordinance, resolution, or
other legislative act by any city, town, city-county, or county
relating to gambling in existence on September 27, 1973 shall be as of
that date null and void and of no effect. Any such city, town, city-county, or county may thereafter enact only such local law as is
consistent with the powers and duties expressly granted to and imposed
upon it by chapter 9.46 RCW and which is not in conflict with that
chapter or with the rules of the commission.
(2) An ordinance, resolution, or other legislative act by any city,
town, city-county, or county conflicts with this chapter if the act:
(a) Changes, or purports to change, any provision within the scope
of a license issued under this chapter; or
(b)(i) Is not an ordinance enacted or enforced in conformance with
section 3 or 4 of this act; and (ii) applies or is enforced differently
upon an entity required to possess a gambling license issued under this
chapter than it would be applied or enforced if the entity were not
required to possess a gambling license issued under this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.46.295 and 1974 ex.s. c 155 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any license to engage in any of the gambling activities authorized
by this chapter as now exists or as hereafter amended, and issued under
the authority thereof shall be legal authority to engage in the
gambling activities for which issued throughout the incorporated and
unincorporated area of any county, except that a city located therein
with respect to that city, or a county with respect to all areas within
that county except for such cities, may absolutely prohibit((, but may
not change the scope of license,)):
(1) Any or all of the gambling activities for which the license was
issued; or
(2) Only as provided in section 3 or 4 of this act, any or all
gambling activities from being located or operating within less than
all of the city or county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city or county that has, pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW,
adopted a comprehensive plan containing a statement identifying the
jurisdiction's policy regarding the extent to which licensed gambling
activity is to be prohibited within the jurisdiction, and within areas
that may be annexed into the jurisdiction, may enact, amend, and
enforce an ordinance, resolution, or other legislative act prohibiting
any or all licensed gambling activities from being located within less
than all of the city or county if the ordinance, resolution, or other
legislative act: (a) Is consistent with the policy statement in the
comprehensive plan required by this section; and (b) applies absolutely
throughout all substantially similar land use zones within the
jurisdiction.
(2) If an ordinance, resolution, or other legislative act enacted
or amended pursuant to this section or section 4 of this act creates or
alters an area within the jurisdiction where commercial gambling
activity is allowed, the ordinance, resolution, or other legislative
act conflicts with this chapter if:
(a) The area in which commercial gambling activity is allowed is
less than one-third of the area within the jurisdiction in which an
eating and drinking establishment licensed by the liquor control board
is allowed to locate as a matter of right; and
(b) A lawsuit is commenced by any resident of, or owner of a
business located in, the jurisdiction which makes a prima facie
challenge that the ordinance, resolution, or other legislative act has
a disproportional and adverse effect on the jurisdiction's minority or
low-income residents, and the jurisdiction fails to rebut the challenge
by clear and convincing evidence.
(3)(a) The land use petition act, chapter 36.70C RCW, governs
challenges regarding the adoption or enforcement of an ordinance,
resolution, or other legislative act adopted under this section or
section 4 of this act.
(b) The commission is immune from any action challenging the
adoption or enforcement of an ordinance enacted or amended under this
section or section 4 of this act.
(4)(a) An ordinance, resolution, or other legislative act enacted
or amended under this section or section 4 of this act may not be
amended or repealed within three years of the effective date of initial
enactment or most recent amendment of the ordinance, resolution, or
other legislative act.
(b) No jurisdiction shall enact an ordinance, resolution, or other
legislative act under this section if: (i) The act authorizes
commercial gambling activity in any zone within the jurisdiction where
the activity was prohibited on January 1, 2005; and (ii) any zone in
which commercial gambling activity is newly authorized was created or
reduced in size within the three years prior to the date the ordinance,
resolution, or other legislative act authorizing the activity was
enacted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A local jurisdiction that has, under chapter 36.70A RCW,
adopted a comprehensive plan containing a statement identifying the
jurisdiction's policy regarding the extent to which licensed gambling
activity is to be prohibited within the jurisdiction, may enact, amend,
and enforce an ordinance, resolution, or other legislative act
absolutely prohibiting one or more licensed gambling activities from
locating within five hundred feet of any of the uses identified in
subsection (2) of this section, if: (a) The use existed on the initial
application date of the license; and (b) the ordinance, resolution, or
other legislative act is consistent with the policy statement in the
comprehensive plan required by this section.
(2) Subject to subsection (1) of this section, a local jurisdiction
may absolutely prohibit any and all gambling activities within five
hundred feet of any or all of the following uses:
(a) A building used exclusively for religious worship, religious
schooling, or other activity in connection therewith;
(b) A residence located in a zone composed predominantly of single-family or multifamily residences;
(c) A tax-supported public elementary or secondary school or
private school meeting the requirements for private schools under Title
28A RCW; or
(d) Publicly owned or leased buildings designated within the
jurisdiction's comprehensive plan for the purposes of this section and
used exclusively by the jurisdiction as a place of business for its
employees, elected officials, or for public meetings, including but not
limited to any library, court house, jail, police station, or fire
station.
(3) Any distances to be established for the purposes of this
section shall be measured in a straight line from the perimeter
property line of the grounds of the use identified under this section
to the nearest property line of the property within which an applicant
has applied to locate a facility requiring a license issued under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of sections 3 and 4 of this act:
(1) "Commercial gambling activity" means any social card game,
punch board, or pull-tab, as authorized under RCW 9.46.0325, other than
as conducted by a bona fide charitable or nonprofit corporation
pursuant to RCW 9.46.0351.
(2) "Land use zone" means any discretely defined area that: (a)
Appears on the jurisdiction's land use zoning map; (b) is situated
within a single, continuous boundary perimeter; and (c) is subject to
a defined set of zoning regulations, definitions, or standards that are
not in conflict with this chapter.
(3)(a) A gambling activity is "absolutely prohibited" and a
legislative act prohibiting a licensed gambling activity applies
"absolutely throughout" a jurisdiction or any applicable land use zone
within the jurisdiction when:
(i) All prohibited licensed gambling activity not in existence on
the effective date of the ordinance prohibiting gambling activities are
completely and uniformly prohibited within the applicable area; and
(ii) No prohibited licensed gambling activity is allowed through
the granting of a variance, nonconforming use, or other exception
process.
(b) Unless the voters of the jurisdiction decided otherwise by a
sixty-percent affirmative vote on a measure placed on the ballot by
initiative or by an action of the jurisdiction's legislative body, a
licensee legally conducting a licensed gambling activity within a zone
on the effective date of an ordinance prohibiting such activity shall
be allowed to continue to operate, but only as allowed by the scope of
the preexisting license, which may be renewed without alteration by the
gambling commission.

--- END ---