BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.010 and 2001 c 300 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Firearm" means a weapon or device from which a projectile or
projectiles may be fired by an explosive such as gunpowder.
(2) "Pistol" means any firearm with a barrel less than sixteen
inches in length, or is designed to be held and fired by the use of a
single hand.
(3) "Rifle" means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or remade,
and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned,
made or remade, and intended to use the energy of the explosive in a
fixed metallic cartridge to fire only a single projectile through a
rifled bore for each single pull of the trigger.
(4) "Short-barreled rifle" means a rifle having one or more barrels
less than sixteen inches in length and any weapon made from a rifle by
any means of modification if such modified weapon has an overall length
of less than twenty-six inches.
(5) "Shotgun" means a weapon with one or more barrels, designed or
redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder
and designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to use the
energy of the explosive in a fixed shotgun shell to fire through a
smooth bore either a number of ball shot or a single projectile for
each single pull of the trigger.
(6) "Short-barreled shotgun" means a shotgun having one or more
barrels less than eighteen inches in length and any weapon made from a
shotgun by any means of modification if such modified weapon has an
overall length of less than twenty-six inches.
(7) "Machine gun" means any firearm known as a machine gun,
mechanical rifle, submachine gun, or any other mechanism or instrument
not requiring that the trigger be pressed for each shot and having a
reservoir clip, disc, drum, belt, or other separable mechanical device
for storing, carrying, or supplying ammunition which can be loaded into
the firearm, mechanism, or instrument, and fired therefrom at the rate
of five or more shots per second.
(8) "Antique firearm" means a firearm or replica of a firearm not
designed or redesigned for using rim fire or conventional center fire
ignition with fixed ammunition and manufactured in or before 1898,
including any matchlock, flintlock, percussion cap, or similar type of
ignition system and also any firearm using fixed ammunition
manufactured in or before 1898, for which ammunition is no longer
manufactured in the United States and is not readily available in the
ordinary channels of commercial trade.
(9) "Loaded" means:
(a) There is a cartridge in the chamber of the firearm;
(b) Cartridges are in a clip that is locked in place in the
firearm;
(c) There is a cartridge in the cylinder of the firearm, if the
firearm is a revolver;
(d) There is a cartridge in the tube or magazine that is inserted
in the action; or
(e) There is a ball in the barrel and the firearm is capped or
primed if the firearm is a muzzle loader.
(10) "Dealer" means a person engaged in the business of selling
firearms at wholesale or retail who has, or is required to have, a
federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a). A person who
does not have, and is not required to have, a federal firearms license
under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a), is not a dealer if that person makes only
occasional sales, exchanges, or purchases of firearms for the
enhancement of a personal collection or for a hobby, or sells all or
part of his or her personal collection of firearms.
(11) "Crime of violence" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter
amended: Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony, criminal solicitation of or
criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony, manslaughter in the
first degree, manslaughter in the second degree, indecent liberties if
committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in the second degree,
arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a
child in the second degree, extortion in the first degree, burglary in
the second degree, residential burglary, and robbery in the second
degree;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to June 6, 1996, which is comparable to a felony classified as a crime
of violence in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence under (a) or
(b) of this subsection.
(12) "Serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a
felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies, as now existing
or hereafter amended:
(a) Any crime of violence;
(b) Any felony violation of the uniform controlled substances act,
chapter 69.50 RCW, that is classified as a class B felony or that has
a maximum term of imprisonment of at least ten years;
(c) Child molestation in the second degree;
(d) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(e) Indecent liberties;
(f) Leading organized crime;
(g) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(h) Rape in the third degree;
(i) Drive-by shooting;
(j) Sexual exploitation;
(k) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(l) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(m) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation, as "sexual motivation" is defined under RCW 9.94A.030;
(n) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.602; or
(o) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996,
that is comparable to a serious offense, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a
felony classified as a serious offense.
(13) "Law enforcement officer" includes a general authority
Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020, or a specially
commissioned Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020.
"Law enforcement officer" also includes a limited authority Washington
peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 if such officer is duly
authorized by his or her employer to carry a concealed pistol.
(14) "Felony" means any felony offense under the laws of this state
or any federal or out-of-state offense comparable to a felony offense
under the laws of this state.
(15) "Sell" refers to the actual approval of the delivery of a
firearm in consideration of payment or promise of payment of a certain
price in money.
(16) "Barrel length" means the distance from the bolt face of a
closed action down the length of the axis of the bore to the crown of
the muzzle, or in the case of a barrel with attachments to the end of
any legal device permanently attached to the end of the muzzle.
(17) "Family or household member" means "family" or "household
member" as used in RCW 10.99.020.
(18) ".50 BMG rifle" means a center fire rifle that can fire a .50
BMG cartridge.
(19) ".50 BMG cartridge" means a cartridge that is designed and
intended to be fired from a center fire rifle and that has:
(a) An overall length of 5.54 inches from the base to the tip of
the bullet;
(b) A bullet diameter from .510 to and including .511 inch;
(c) A case base diameter for the cartridge from .800 inch to and
including .804 inch; and
(d) A cartridge case length of 3.91 inches.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person in this state shall manufacture, possess, purchase,
sell, or otherwise transfer any .50 BMG rifle, except as authorized by
subsection (2) of this section. Any .50 BMG rifle the manufacture,
possession, purchase, sale, or other transfer of which is prohibited
under this section is a public nuisance.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to any of the
following:
(a) The possession of an unloaded .50 BMG rifle for the purpose of
permanently relinquishing it to a law enforcement agency in this state.
Any .50 BMG rifle relinquished pursuant to this subsection shall be
destroyed;
(b) The transfer of any .50 BMG rifle by a licensed manufacturer or
dealer to a law enforcement agency in this state for use by that agency
or its employees for law enforcement purposes;
(c) The possession of a .50 BMG rifle that was legally possessed on
the effective date of this section, but only if the person legally
possessing the .50 BMG rifle has complied with all of the requirements
of subsection (3) of this section;
(d) The possession of a .50 BMG rifle that has been permanently
disabled so that it is incapable of discharging a projectile.
(3) In order to continue to possess a .50 BMG rifle that was
legally possessed on the effective date of this section, the person
possessing the .50 BMG rifle shall do all of the following:
(a) Within ninety days following the effective date of this
section, submit to a background check identical to the background check
conducted in connection with the purchase of a firearm from a licensed
gun dealer;
(b) Unless the person is prohibited by law from possessing a
firearm, immediately register the .50 BMG rifle with the chief of
police of a municipality or sheriff of a county;
(c) Safely and securely store the .50 BMG rifle. The chief of
police of a municipality or sheriff of a county may, no more than once
per year, conduct an inspection to ensure compliance with this
subsection;
(d) Annually renew both the registration and the background check;
(e) Possess the .50 BMG rifle only on property owned or immediately
controlled by the person, or while engaged in the legal use of the .50
BMG rifle at a duly licensed firing range, or while traveling to or
from either of these locations for the purpose of engaging in the legal
use of the .50 BMG rifle, provided that the .50 BMG rifle is stored
unloaded and in a separate locked container during transport.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any person
in this state who, after the effective date of this section, acquires
title to a .50 BMG rifle by inheritance, bequest, or succession, shall,
within thirty days of acquiring title, do one of the following:
(a) Comply with all of the requirements of subsection (3) of this
section;
(b) Dispose of the .50 BMG rifle pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of
this section; or
(c) Permanently disable the .50 BMG rifle so that it is incapable
of discharging a projectile.
(5) The chief of police of a municipality or sheriff of a county
may charge a fee for each registration and for each registration
renewal pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. However, such fee
may not exceed the costs incurred in administering the registration
program established under subsection (3) of this section.
(6)(a) Any person convicted of violating subsection (1) of this
section is guilty of a class C felony.
(b) Any person convicted of violating subsection (3) of this
section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(7) Any violation of this section shall also result in the
immediate revocation of the registration of every .50 BMG rifle
registered to such person.
(8) This section does not apply to:
(a) Marshals, sheriffs, prison or jail wardens or their deputies,
or other law enforcement officers of this or another state while acting
within the scope of their duties;
(b) Members of the armed forces of the United States or of the
national guard or organized services, when on duty;
(c) Officers or employees of the United States duly authorized to
possess .50 BMG rifles; or
(d) Any person engaged in the business of manufacturing, repairing,
or dealing in .50 BMG rifles, or the representative or agent of the
person who is properly licensed under federal or state laws to do so
and who is acting within the usual and ordinary course of the business.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2004 c 94 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit
conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW
9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of dependent person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW
9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting
Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW 48.17.063(3))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Abandonment of dependent person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture, Possess, Purchase, Sell,
Transfer of .50 BMG rifle (section
2(1) of this act)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2004 c 176 s 2 and 2004 c 94 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit
conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW
9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of dependent person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW
9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting
Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW 48.17.063(3))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Abandonment of dependent person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture, Possess, Purchase, Sell,
Transfer of .50 BMG rifle (section
2(1) of this act)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for section 4 of this act which takes effect July
1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2005.

--- END ---