BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds:
(a) The right to vote for president of the United States is a
fundamental right and each person's vote is entitled to equal dignity
and should count equally; and
(b) The will of the Washington electorate would be best reflected
by the popular proportional allocation of electoral college
representatives, based on the number of ballots cast for the respective
presidential tickets in Washington.
(2) The total number of electoral votes to which Washington is
entitled shall be divided among the presidential tickets on the general
election ballot, based upon the popular proportional share of the total
statewide ballots cast for each presidential ticket, subject to
subsections (3) and (4) of this section. Each presidential elector
shall vote for the presidential candidate and, by separate ballot,
vice-presidential candidate on the presidential ticket of the political
party or political organization that nominated that presidential
elector.
(3) The allocation of a presidential ticket's popular proportion of
this state's electoral votes shall be in whole numbers and shall be
made in the following manner:
(a) The total number of ballots cast in this state for each
presidential ticket at a general election shall be divided by the total
number of ballots cast for all presidential tickets that receive votes
at that general election; and
(b) The proportion of a presidential ticket's popular vote, as
determined in (a) of this subsection, shall be multiplied by the number
of electoral votes to which Washington is entitled.
(4) The number of electoral votes that is attributable to the
ballots cast for any presidential ticket, as determined in subsection
(3) of this section, shall be rounded to the nearest whole number,
subject to the following limitations:
(a) No presidential ticket may receive any electoral votes from
Washington if its proportion of the total ballots cast for all
presidential tickets would reflect less than a full electoral vote
after rounding to the nearest whole number;
(b) If the sum of electoral votes allocated under (a) of this
subsection is greater than the number of electoral votes to which
Washington is entitled:
(i) The allocation of electoral votes to the presidential ticket
receiving at least one electoral vote and the fewest number of ballots
cast shall be reduced by whole electoral votes until only that number
of electoral votes to which Washington is entitled have been allocated;
and
(ii) The process in (b)(i) of this subsection shall be repeated if,
after the reduction of electoral votes in (b)(i) of this subsection,
the total number of electoral votes allocated to all presidential
tickets remains greater than the total number of electoral votes to
which Washington is entitled, and this process shall be applied to the
presidential ticket receiving at least one electoral vote and the next
fewest number of ballots cast until the total number of electoral votes
allocated to all presidential tickets is equal to the number of
electoral votes to which Washington is entitled;
(c) If the sum of all electoral votes allocated would be less than
the number of electoral votes to which Washington is entitled, the
presidential ticket receiving the greatest number of ballots cast shall
receive any unallocated electoral votes until all of the electoral
votes to which Washington is entitled have been allocated.
(5) The secretary of state shall adopt rules to apportion the votes
of the presidential electors under this section.

--- END ---