BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The farmers market nutrition programs promote health, alleviate
hunger, prevent obesity, and encourage the development of good eating
habits by enabling low-income women to purchase locally grown fresh
fruit and vegetables for themselves and their young children and low-income and homebound seniors to purchase locally grown fresh fruit and
vegetables for themselves through farmers markets, congregate meals
sites, and senior housing. Women and children in twenty-three counties
and seniors in thirty-five counties of the state are presently able to
participate in the program.
(2) The farmers market nutrition programs support small farmers and
rural economies through the promotion of Washington state agriculture.
Farmers market nutrition programs increase sales of Washington grown
fruits and vegetables, increase marketing opportunities for local
farms, strengthen local economies and communities, preserve farmlands,
reduce energy usage and pollutants, and promote collaboration among
agriculture, health, and social service and food assistance programs.
(3) Low-income women and children, low-income seniors, farmers
markets, and agencies administering the farmers market nutrition
programs will be denied the opportunity to participate in coming years
because of cuts at the federal level and lack of sufficient state funds
to continue current program levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) To qualify as a farmers market for
purposes of this act, an entity must sponsor a regular assembly of
vendors at a defined location for the purpose of promoting the sale of
agricultural products grown or produced in this state directly to the
consumer under conditions that meet the following minimum requirements:
(a) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(b) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(c) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(d) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(e) The vendor may not be a franchisee unless the vendor is locally
owned and operated. The vendor must be directly involved, on a regular
basis, in the production of the product being sold in the market.
Additionally, the vendor may not have an area development agreement or
master franchise license for the franchise.
(2) In addition to qualifying as a farmers market under subsection
(1) of this section, the department of health may, by rule, develop
criteria that allow additional farmers markets to participate in the
program in this act.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(b) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(c) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 During the 2005-2007 biennium, an additional
four hundred thousand dollars from the general fund--state are
appropriated to the department of health to maintain 2004 participation
levels for the farmers market nutrition program for women, infants, and
children. During the 2005-2007 biennium, seven hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the general fund--state are appropriated to the department
of social and health services to maintain 2004 participation levels for
the senior farmers market nutrition program.

--- END ---