BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Washington state is experiencing a critical
shortage of registered nurses. To safeguard and promote patient safety
and quality of care, the legislature finds that a central resource
center for the nursing work force is critical and essential in
addressing the nursing shortage and ensuring that the public continue
to receive safe, quality care.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.70.110 and 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 918 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining
a license. After June 30, 1995, municipal corporations providing
emergency medical care and transportation services pursuant to chapter
18.73 RCW shall be exempt from such fees, provided that such other
emergency services shall only be charged for their pro rata share of
the cost of licensure and inspection, if appropriate. The secretary
may waive the fees when, in the discretion of the secretary, the fees
would not be in the best interest of public health and safety, or when
the fees would be to the financial disadvantage of the state.
(2) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, fees charged shall
be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the department for the
licensure of the activity or class of activities and may include costs
of necessary inspection.
(3) Department of health advisory committees may review fees
established by the secretary for licenses and comment upon the
appropriateness of the level of such fees.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.70.250 and 1996 c 191 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of
each professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. The
secretary shall from time to time establish the amount of all
application fees, license fees, registration fees, examination fees,
permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee associated with licensing
or regulation of professions, occupations, or businesses administered
by the department. In fixing said fees, the secretary shall set the
fees for each program at a sufficient level to defray the costs of
administering that program, except as provided in section 4 of this
act. All such fees shall be fixed by rule adopted by the secretary in
accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the licensing fee for registered nurses and
licensed practical nurses licensed under this chapter, the department
shall impose an additional surcharge of five dollars per year on all
initial licenses and renewal licenses for registered nurses and
licensed practical nurses issued under this chapter. Advanced
registered nurse practitioners are only required to pay the surcharge
on their registered nurse licenses.
(2) The department, in consultation with the commission and the
work force training and education coordinating board, shall use the
proceeds from the surcharge imposed under subsection (1) of this
section to provide grants to a central nursing resource center. The
grants may be awarded only to a not-for-profit central nursing resource
center that is comprised of and led by nurses. The central nursing
resource center will demonstrate coordination with relevant nursing
constituents including professional nursing organizations, groups
representing nursing educators, staff nurses, nurse managers or
executives, and labor organizations representing nurses. The central
nursing resource center shall have as its mission to contribute to the
health and wellness of Washington state residents by ensuring that
there is an adequate nursing work force to meet the current and future
health care needs of the citizens of the state of Washington. The
grants may be used to fund the following activities of the central
nursing resource center:
(a) Maintain information on the current and projected supply and
demand of nurses through the collection and analysis of data regarding
the nursing work force, including but not limited to education level,
race and ethnicity, employment settings, nursing positions, reasons for
leaving the nursing profession, and those leaving Washington state to
practice elsewhere. This data collection and analysis must complement
other state activities to produce data on the nursing work force and
the central nursing resource center shall work collaboratively with
other entities in the data collection to ensure coordination and avoid
duplication of efforts;
(b) Monitor and validate trends in the applicant pool for programs
in nursing. The central nursing resource center must work with nursing
leaders to identify approaches to address issues arising related to the
trends identified, and collect information on other states' approaches
to addressing these issues;
(c) Facilitate partnerships between the nursing community and other
health care providers, licensing authority, business and industry,
consumers, legislators, and educators to achieve policy consensus,
promote diversity within the profession, and enhance nursing career
mobility and nursing leadership development;
(d) Evaluate the effectiveness of nursing education and
articulation among programs to increase access to nursing education and
enhance career mobility, especially for populations that are
underrepresented in the nursing profession;
(e) Provide consultation, technical assistance, data, and
information related to Washington state and national nursing resources;
(f) Promote initiatives to enhance patient safety and quality
patient care including encouraging a safe and healthy workplace
environment for nurses;
(g) Educate the public including students in K-12 about
opportunities and careers in nursing;
(h) Other activities as defined by the department and mutually
agreed upon with the central nursing resource center.
(3) The nursing resource center account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from the surcharge in subsection
(1) of this section must be deposited in the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for grants to an organization to
conduct the specific activities listed in subsection (2) of this
section and to compensate the department for the reasonable costs
associated with the collection and distribution of the surcharge and
the administration of the grant provided for in subsection (2) of this
section. No money from this account may be used by the recipient
towards administrative costs of the central nursing resource center not
associated with the specific activities listed in subsection (2) of
this section or lobbying. Only the secretary or the secretary's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures. Grants will be awarded
on an annual basis and funds will be distributed quarterly. The first
distribution after awarding the first grant shall be made no later than
six months after the effective date of this section. The central
nursing resource center shall report to the department on meeting the
grant objectives annually.
(4) The central nursing resource center shall submit a report of
all progress, collaboration with other organizations and government
entities, and activities conducted by the center to the relevant
committees of the legislature by November 30, 2008.
(5) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
act.

--- END ---