BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that breastfeeding
provides a range of benefits for the infant's growth, immunity, and
development. Breastfeeding improves maternal health and contributes
economic benefits to the family, health care system, and workplace.
Employers benefit when their employees breastfeed. Breastfed infants
are sick less often; therefore maternal absenteeism from work is lower
in companies with established lactation programs. Additionally,
employee medical costs are lower and employee productivity is higher.
Nine other states, California, Connecticut, Georgia, Hawaii, Illinois,
Minnesota, Rhode Island, Tennessee, and Texas, have laws relating to
breastfeeding in the workplace. Whether employers should be required
to accommodate breastfeeding mothers is a matter of debate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A study shall be conducted by a joint task
force comprised of the following: Two senators to be appointed by the
majority leader of the senate; two senators to be appointed by the
minority leader of the senate; two representatives to be appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives; and two representatives to
be appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives.
The task force shall be governed by cochairs, one to be selected by the
majority leader of the senate, and the other to be selected by the
speaker of the house of representatives. The joint task force shall
consult with an advisory committee consisting of specialists from: The
department of health; the department of labor and industries; the
employment security department; and such private sector and labor
representatives as the task force shall select.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The joint task force shall study the
prevalence of breastfeeding women in the workplace. The study should
address:
(1) The number of breastfeeding women currently in the workplace;
(2) How the employers accommodate these women's needs to breastfeed
or express breastmilk;
(3) The number of employers that have lactation policies and what
the policies consist of;
(4) The types of facilities provided by employers who accommodate
lactating women;
(5) The cost of accommodating lactating women in the workplace; and
(6) The employer benefits, if any, that the accommodation of
lactating women yielded.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The joint task force is to report its
findings to the legislature by December 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act expire
January 1, 2006.

--- END ---