BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.52.010 and 2004 c 129 s 21 and 2004 c 80 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and
purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on
any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW
84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either of
these sections, the assessor shall recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(1) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
road district, and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax
rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law;
however any state levy shall take precedence over all other levies and
shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 84.52.135,
36.54.130, 84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and
84.52.105, the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation exceeds one percent of the true
and fair value of any property, then these levies shall be reduced as
follows:
(a) The levy imposed by a county under RCW 84.52.135 must be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;
(b) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry
district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or must be eliminated;
(c) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(d) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; and
(e) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or eliminated.
(2) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be
reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of
taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(a) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(b) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(c) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire
protection service authorities, library districts, the first fifty cent
per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park
districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for public hospital districts, shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;
(d) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(e) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to
regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b)
and (c) and fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160
shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; ((and))
(f) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for
regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a)
except authorities that share a common area with a public hospital
district for the levy of taxes, fire protection districts under RCW
52.16.130 except districts that share a common area with a public
hospital district for the levy of taxes, library districts,
metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and
public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated; and
(g) Seventh, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rate authorized for
regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a)
that share a common area with a public hospital district for the levy
of taxes and fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.130 that share
a common area with a public hospital district for the levy of taxes,
shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2006 and thereafter.

--- END ---