BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Until July 1, 2007, in computing the tax imposed under this
chapter, a taxpayer may claim a credit for fifty percent of the taxes
imposed under RCW 82.64.020 and paid to a wholesaler or to the
department.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2007, in computing the tax imposed under this
chapter, a taxpayer may claim a credit for all taxes imposed under RCW
82.64.020 and paid to a wholesaler or to the department.
(2) Credits shall not exceed the amount of tax paid by the taxpayer
under this chapter during the reporting period. Credits in excess of
tax paid under this chapter in a reporting period may be carried
forward to future reporting periods for a maximum of one year.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "taxpayer" does not include
a wholesaler with respect to tax collected by the wholesaler and paid
to the department under RCW 82.64.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---