BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that condemnation of
property for essential public facilities concerns the public health,
safety, and welfare in the jurisdiction in which the proposed facility
is to be located. When the state grants local governments and special
districts the power of eminent domain outside their jurisdictional
boundaries, therefore, the state must also assure that exercise of this
power includes meaningful measures to consider and protect the public
health, safety, and welfare in the jurisdiction in which the property
that is proposed to be condemned for an essential public facility is
located. The legislature finds that the process for identifying and
siting essential public facilities adopted by the jurisdiction in which
the property is located provides such meaningful measures, when the
power of eminent domain is exercised across jurisdictional boundaries.
By this act, the legislature intends to uphold and promote the
principle of representative government in all jurisdictions of the
state.
The legislature intends that this act apply prospectively only and
not retrospectively. It applies only to eminent domain proceedings
commenced on or after the effective date of this act. Nothing in this
act shall be construed to affect the validity of eminent domain
proceedings commenced or completed before the effective date of this
act.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.58.320 and 1993 c 240 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A metropolitan municipal corporation shall have power to
acquire by purchase and condemnation all lands and property rights,
both within and without ((the metropolitan area, which are necessary
for its purposes)) its component county boundaries which are necessary
for its purposes, subject to the provisions under subsection (2) of
this section. Such right of eminent domain shall be exercised by the
metropolitan council in the same manner and by the same procedure as is
or may be provided by law for cities, except insofar as such laws may
be inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.
(2) A metropolitan municipal corporation shall not condemn lands
for an essential public facility, provided for in RCW 36.70A.200, at a
location outside its component county boundaries without first
completing the city or county siting process for an essential public
facility where the proposed facility is to be located, consistent with
RCW 36.70A.200.

--- END ---