BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.910 and 2005 c 249 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of providing state general fund support to
public institutions of higher education, except for revenue waived
under programs listed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and
unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus state appropriations
act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by a state university, a regional university, The Evergreen
State College, or the community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees
revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated
under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial
management, before granting any waivers. This limitation applies to
all tuition waiver programs established before or after July 1, 1992.
(a) University of Washington 21 percent
(b) Washington State University 20 percent
(c) Eastern Washington University 11 percent
(d) Central Washington University ((8)) 11 percent
(e) Western Washington University 10 percent
(f) The Evergreen State College 6 percent
(g) Community colleges as a whole 35 percent
(2) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to
waivers, exemptions, or reductions in operating fees contained in the
following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.014;
(b) RCW 28B.15.100;
(c) RCW 28B.15.225;
(d) RCW 28B.15.380;
(e) RCW 28B.15.520;
(f) RCW 28B.15.526;
(g) RCW 28B.15.527;
(h) RCW 28B.15.543;
(i) RCW 28B.15.545;
(j) RCW 28B.15.555;
(k) RCW 28B.15.556;
(l) RCW 28B.15.615;
(m) RCW 28B.15.730;
(n) RCW 28B.15.740;
(o) RCW 28B.15.750;
(p) RCW 28B.15.756;
(q) RCW 28B.50.259;
(r) RCW 28B.70.050; and
(s) RCW 28B.15.621(2).
(3) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply
to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees
contained in the following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.522;
(b) RCW 28B.15.540; and
(c) RCW 28B.15.558.
(4) The total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by institutions of higher education participating in the
western interstate commission for higher education western
undergraduate exchange program under RCW 28B.15.544 shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection.
(a) Washington State University 1 percent
(b) Eastern Washington University 3 percent
(c) Central Washington University 3 percent

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2007.

--- END ---