BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.85.005 and 1999 sp.s. c 13 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that repeated attempts to improve salmonid
fish runs throughout the state of Washington have failed to avert
listings of salmon and steelhead runs as threatened or endangered under
the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.).
These listings threaten the sport, commercial, and tribal fishing
industries as well as the economic well-being and vitality of vast
areas of the state. It is the intent of the legislature to begin
activities required for the recovery of salmon stocks as soon as
possible, although the legislature understands that successful recovery
efforts may not be realized for many years because of the life cycle of
salmon and the complex array of natural and human-caused problems they
face.
The legislature finds that it is in the interest of the citizens of
the state of Washington for the state to retain primary responsibility
for managing the natural resources of the state, rather than abdicate
those responsibilities to the federal government, and that the state
may best accomplish this objective by integrating local and regional
recovery activities into a statewide ((plan)) strategy that can make
the most effective use of provisions of federal laws allowing for a
state lead in salmon recovery, delivered through implementation
activities consistent with regional and watershed recovery plans. The
legislature also finds that a statewide salmon recovery ((plan))
strategy must be developed and implemented through an active public
involvement process in order to ensure public participation in, and
support for, salmon recovery. The legislature also finds that there is
a substantial link between the provisions of the federal endangered
species act and the federal clean water act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et
seq.). The legislature further finds that habitat restoration is a
vital component of salmon recovery efforts. Therefore, it is the
intent of the legislature to specifically address salmon habitat
restoration in a coordinated manner and to develop a structure that
allows for the coordinated delivery of federal, state, and local
assistance to communities for habitat projects that will assist in the
recovery and enhancement of salmon stocks. A strong watershed-based
locally implemented plan is essential for local, regional, and
statewide salmon recovery.
The legislature also finds that credible scientific review and
oversight is essential for any salmon recovery effort to be successful.
The legislature further finds that it is important to monitor the
overall health of the salmon resource to determine if recovery efforts
are providing expected returns. It is important to monitor salmon
habitat projects and salmon recovery activities to determine their
effectiveness in order to secure federal acceptance of the state's
approach to salmon recovery. Adaptive management cannot exist without
monitoring. For these reasons, the legislature believes that a
coordinated and integrated monitoring ((process)) system should be
developed and implemented.
The legislature therefore finds that a coordinated framework for
responding to the salmon crisis is needed immediately. To that end,
the salmon recovery office should be created within the governor's
office to provide overall coordination of the state's response; an
independent science panel is needed to provide scientific review and
oversight; a coordinated state funding process should be established
through a salmon recovery funding board; the appropriate local or
tribal government should provide local leadership in identifying and
sequencing habitat projects to be funded by state agencies; habitat
projects should be implemented without delay; and a strong locally
based effort to restore salmon habitat should be established by
providing a framework to allow citizen volunteers to work effectively.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.85.010 and 2002 c 210 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adaptive management" means reliance on scientific methods to
test the results of actions taken so that the management and related
policy can be changed promptly and appropriately.
(2) "Critical pathways methodology" means a project scheduling and
management process for examining interactions between habitat projects
and salmonid species, prioritizing habitat projects, and assuring
positive benefits from habitat projects.
(3) "Habitat project list" is the list of projects resulting from
the critical pathways methodology under RCW 77.85.060(2). Each project
on the list must have a written agreement from the landowner on whose
land the project will be implemented. Projects include habitat
restoration projects, habitat protection projects, habitat projects
that improve water quality, habitat projects that protect water
quality, habitat-related mitigation projects, and habitat project
maintenance and monitoring activities.
(4) "Habitat work schedule" means those projects from the habitat
project list that will be implemented during the current funding cycle.
The schedule shall also include a list of the entities and individuals
implementing projects, the start date, duration, estimated date of
completion, estimated cost, and funding sources for the projects.
(5) "Limiting factors" means conditions that limit the ability of
habitat to fully sustain populations of salmon. These factors are
primarily fish passage barriers and degraded estuarine areas, riparian
corridors, stream channels, and wetlands.
(6) "Project sponsor" is a county, city, special district, tribal
government, state agency, a combination of such governments through
interlocal or interagency agreements, a nonprofit organization,
regional fisheries enhancement group, or one or more private citizens.
A project sponsored by a state agency may be funded by the board only
if it is included on the habitat project list submitted by the lead
entity for that area and the state agency has a local partner that
would otherwise qualify as a project sponsor.
(7) "Regional recovery organization" or "regional salmon recovery
organization" means an entity formed for the purpose of recovering
salmon, which is recognized in statute or by the salmon recovery
office.
(8) "Salmon" includes all species of the family Salmonidae which
are capable of self-sustaining, natural production.
(((8))) (9) "Salmon recovery plan" means a state or regional plan
developed in anticipation of or in response to a candidate, or proposed
or actual listing under the federal endangered species act that
addresses limiting factors including, but not limited to harvest,
hatchery, hydropower, habitat, and other factors of decline.
(((9))) (10) "Salmon recovery region" means geographic areas of the
state identified in the statewide salmon recovery strategy that
encompass groups of watersheds in the state with common stocks of
salmon identified for recovery activities, and that generally are
consistent with the geographic areas within the state identified by the
federal fish services for activities under the federal endangered
species act. The southwest Washington salmon recovery region
designated under RCW 77.85.090 is a salmon recovery region for all
purposes of this chapter.
(11) "Tribe" or "tribes" means federally recognized Indian tribes.
(((10))) (12) "WRIA" means a water resource inventory area
established in chapter 173-500 WAC as it existed on January 1, 1997.
(((11))) (13) "Owner" means the person holding title to the land or
the person under contract with the owner to lease or manage the legal
owner's property.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.85.020 and 1998 c 246 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Beginning in)) (1) By December ((2000)) 1, 2006, December 1,
2008, December 1, 2010, and December 1, 2012, the governor shall submit
a ((biennial state of the salmon)) report to the legislature ((during
the first week of December)) regarding the implementation of the
state's salmon recovery strategy. The report may include the
following:
(((1))) (a) A description of the amount of in-kind and financial
contributions, including volunteer, private, and state, federal, tribal
as available, and local government money directly spent on salmon
recovery in response to actual, proposed, or expected endangered
species act listings;
(((2))) (b) A summary of habitat projects including but not limited
to:
(((a))) (i) A summary of accomplishments in removing barriers to
salmon passage and an identification of existing barriers;
(((b))) (ii) A summary of salmon restoration efforts undertaken in
the past two years;
(((c))) (iii) A summary of the role which private volunteer
initiatives contribute in salmon habitat restoration efforts; and
(((d))) (iv) A summary of efforts taken to protect salmon habitat;
(((3))) (c) A summary of collaborative efforts undertaken with
adjoining states or Canada;
(((4))) (d) A summary of harvest and hatchery management activities
affecting salmon recovery;
(((5))) (e) A summary of information regarding impediments to
successful salmon recovery efforts;
(((6))) (f) A summary of the number and types of violations of
existing laws pertaining to: (((a))) (i) Water quality; and (((b)))
(ii) salmon. The summary shall include information about the types of
sanctions imposed for these violations;
(((7))) (g) Information on the estimated carrying capacity of new
habitat created pursuant to chapter 246, Laws of 1998; and
(((8))) (h) Recommendations to the legislature that would further
the success of salmon recovery. The recommendations may include:
(((a))) (i) The need to expand or improve nonregulatory programs
and activities; ((and
(b))) (ii) The need to expand or improve state and local laws and
regulations; and
(iii) Recommendations for state funding assistance to recovery
activities and projects.
(2) The report shall summarize the monitoring data coordinated by
the monitoring forum created in section 10 of this act. The summary
must include but is not limited to data and analysis related to:
(a) Measures of progress in fish recovery;
(b) Measures of factors limiting recovery as well as trends in such
factors; and
(c) The status of implementation of projects and activities.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.85.030 and 2000 c 107 s 93 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The salmon recovery office is created within the office of the
governor to coordinate state strategy to allow for salmon recovery to
healthy sustainable population levels with productive commercial and
recreational fisheries. The primary purpose of the office is to
coordinate and assist in the development of regional salmon recovery
plans ((for evolutionarily significant units, and submit those plans to
the appropriate tribal governments and federal agencies)) as an
integral part of a statewide strategy developed consistent with the
guiding principles and procedures under RCW 77.85.150. The governor's
salmon recovery office ((may also:
(a))) shall assist regional recovery organizations in submitting
plans to the federal fish services for adoption as federal recovery
plans. The governor's salmon recovery office may also:
(a) Assist state agencies, local governments, landowners, and other
interested parties in obtaining federal assurances that plans,
programs, or activities are consistent with fish recovery under the
federal endangered species act;
(b) Act as liaison to local governments, the state congressional
delegation, the United States congress, federally recognized tribes,
and the federal executive branch agencies for issues related to the
state's ((endangered species act)) salmon recovery plans; and
(((b))) (c) Provide ((the biennial state of the salmon report to
the legislature)) periodic reports pursuant to RCW 77.85.020.
(2) This section expires June 30, ((2006)) 2015.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.85.040 and 2000 c 107 s 94 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governor shall request the national academy of sciences,
the American fisheries society, or a comparable institution to screen
candidates to serve as members on the independent science panel. The
institution that conducts the screening of the candidates shall submit
a list of the nine most qualified candidates to the governor, the
speaker of the house of representatives, and the majority leader of the
senate. The candidates shall reflect expertise in habitat requirements
of salmon, protection and restoration of salmon populations, artificial
propagation of salmon, hydrology, or geomorphology.
(2) The speaker of the house of representatives and the majority
leader in the senate may each remove one name from the nomination list.
The governor shall consult with tribal representatives and the governor
shall appoint five scientists from the remaining names on the
nomination list.
(3) The members of the independent science panel shall serve four-year terms. Vacant positions on the panel shall be filled in the same
manner as the original appointments. Members shall serve no more than
two full terms. The independent science panel members shall elect the
chair of the panel among themselves every two years. Based upon
available funding, the governor's salmon recovery office may contract
for services with members of the independent science panel for
compensation under chapter 39.29 RCW.
(4) The independent science panel shall be governed by generally
accepted guidelines and practices governing the activities of
independent science boards such as the national academy of sciences.
The purpose of the independent science panel is to help ensure that
sound science is used in salmon recovery efforts. The governor's
salmon recovery office ((shall)) may request review of regional salmon
recovery plans by the science review panel. The science panel does not
have the authority to review individual projects or habitat project
lists developed under RCW 77.85.050((,)) or 77.85.060((, and
75.46.080)) or to make policy decisions. The panel shall periodically
submit its findings and recommendations under this subsection to the
legislature and the governor.
(((5) The independent science panel, in conjunction with the
technical review team, shall recommend standardized monitoring
indicators and data quality guidelines for use by entities involved in
habitat projects and salmon recovery activities across the state.
(6) The independent science panel, in conjunction with the
technical review team, shall also recommend criteria for the systematic
and periodic evaluation of monitoring data in order for the state to be
able to answer critical questions about the effectiveness of the
state's salmon recovery efforts.
(7) The recommendations on monitoring as required in this section
shall be provided in a report to the governor and to the legislature by
the independent science panel, in conjunction with the salmon recovery
office, no later than December 31, 2000. The report shall also include
recommendations on the level of effort needed to sustain monitoring of
salmon projects and other recovery efforts, and any other
recommendations on monitoring deemed important by the independent
science panel and the technical review team. The report may be
included in the biennial state of the salmon report required under RCW
77.85.020.))

Sec. 6 RCW 77.85.050 and 1999 sp.s. c 13 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Counties, cities, and tribal governments must jointly
designate, by resolution or by letters of support, the area for which
a habitat project list is to be developed and the lead entity that is
to be responsible for submitting the habitat project list. No project
included on a habitat project list shall be considered mandatory in
nature and no private landowner may be forced or coerced into
participation in any respect. The lead entity may be a county, city,
conservation district, special district, tribal government, regional
recovery organization, or other entity.
(b) The lead entity shall establish a committee that consists of
representative interests of counties, cities, conservation districts,
tribes, environmental groups, business interests, landowners, citizens,
volunteer groups, regional fish enhancement groups, and other habitat
interests. The purpose of the committee is to provide a citizen-based
evaluation of the projects proposed to promote salmon habitat. ((The
technical review team may provide the lead entity with organizational
models that may be used in establishing the committees.))
(c) The committee shall compile a list of habitat projects,
establish priorities for individual projects, define the sequence for
project implementation, and submit these activities as the habitat
project list. The committee shall also identify potential federal,
state, local, and private funding sources.
(2) The area covered by the habitat project list must be based, at
a minimum, on a WRIA, combination of WRIAs, or any other area as agreed
to by the counties, cities, and tribes in resolutions or in letters of
support meeting the requirements of this subsection. Preference will
be given to projects in an area that contain a salmon species that is
listed or proposed for listing under the federal endangered species
act.
(3) The lead entity shall submit the habitat project list to the
((technical review team)) board in accordance with procedures adopted
by the board.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.85.090 and 2000 c 107 s 99 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The southwest Washington salmon recovery region, whose
boundaries are provided in chapter 60, Laws of 1998, is created.
(2) The governor, with the assistance of the salmon recovery
office, may designate additional salmon recovery regions that generally
are consistent with the areas within the state designated by the
federal fish services for federal recovery planning.
(3) The governor, with the assistance of the salmon recovery
office, may recognize regional salmon recovery organizations for the
purpose of planning, coordinating, and monitoring the implementation of
regional recovery plans. Organizations seeking such recognition shall
demonstrate that the organization has support from the existing lead
entities within the region, and have invited the participation of
counties, cities, conservation districts, tribes, environmental groups,
business interests, landowners, citizens, volunteer groups, regional
fish enhancement groups, utilities, agriculture, and fishing and water
management interests. The sponsors shall also demonstrate a
willingness and capability to carry out the planning, coordinating, and
monitoring assigned to a regional recovery organization under this
chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 77.85.130 and 2000 c 107 s 102 and 2000 c 15 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The salmon recovery funding board shall develop procedures and
criteria for allocation of funds for salmon habitat projects and salmon
recovery activities on a statewide basis to address the highest
priorities for salmon habitat protection and restoration. To the
extent practicable the board shall adopt an annual allocation of
funding. The allocation should address both protection and restoration
of habitat, and should recognize the varying needs in each area of the
state on an equitable basis. The board has the discretion to partially
fund, or to fund in phases, salmon habitat projects. The board may
annually establish a maximum amount of funding available for any
individual project, subject to available funding. No projects required
solely as a mitigation or a condition of permitting are eligible for
funding.
(2)(a) In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and
activities the board shall give preference to projects that:
(i) Are based upon the limiting factors analysis identified under
RCW 77.85.060;
(ii) Provide a greater benefit to salmon recovery based upon the
stock status information contained in the department of fish and
wildlife salmonid stock inventory (SASSI), the salmon and steelhead
habitat inventory and assessment project (SSHIAP), and any comparable
science-based assessment when available;
(iii) Will benefit listed species and other fish species; ((and))
(iv) Will preserve high quality salmonid habitat; and
(v) Are included in a regional or watershed-based salmon recovery
plan that accords the project, action, or area a high priority for
funding.
(b) In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and
activities the board shall also give consideration to projects that:
(i) Are the most cost-effective;
(ii) Have the greatest matched or in-kind funding; ((and))
(iii) Will be implemented by a sponsor with a successful record of
project implementation; and
(iv) Are part of a regionwide list developed by lead entities.
(3) The board may reject, but not add, projects from a habitat
project list submitted by a lead entity for funding.
(4) ((For fiscal year 2000, the board may authorize the interagency
review team to evaluate, rank, and make funding decisions for
categories of projects or activities or from funding sources provided
for categories of projects or activities. In delegating such authority
the board shall consider the review team's staff resources, procedures,
and technical capacity to meet the purposes and objectives of this
chapter. The board shall maintain general oversight of the team's
exercise of such authority.
(5) The board shall seek the guidance of the technical review team
to ensure that scientific principles and information are incorporated
into the allocation standards and into proposed projects and
activities. If the technical review team determines that a habitat
project list complies with the critical pathways methodology under RCW
77.85.060, it shall provide substantial weight to the list's project
priorities when making determinations among applications for funding of
projects within the area covered by the list.
(6))) The board shall establish criteria for determining when block
grants may be made to a lead entity ((or other recognized regional
recovery entity)) consistent with one or more habitat project lists
developed for that region. Where a lead entity has been established
pursuant to RCW 77.85.050, the board may provide block grants to the
lead entity to assist in ((carrying out lead entity functions under
this chapter,)) project implementation subject to available funding.
The board shall determine an equitable minimum amount of project
implementation funds for each recovery region, and shall distribute the
remainder of funds on a competitive basis. The board may also provide
grants to the lead entity or regional recovery organization to assist
in carrying out functions described under this chapter.
(((7))) (5) The board may waive or modify portions of the
allocation procedures and standards adopted under this section in the
award of grants or loans to conform to legislative appropriations
directing an alternative award procedure or when the funds to be
awarded are from federal or other sources requiring other allocation
procedures or standards as a condition of the board's receipt of the
funds. The board shall develop an integrated process to manage the
allocation of funding from federal and state sources to minimize delays
in the award of funding while recognizing the differences in state and
legislative appropriation timing.
(((8))) (6) The board may award a grant or loan for a salmon
recovery project on private or public land when the landowner has a
legal obligation under local, state, or federal law to perform the
project, when expedited action provides a clear benefit to salmon
recovery, and there will be harm to salmon recovery if the project is
delayed. For purposes of this subsection, a legal obligation does not
include a project required solely as a mitigation or a condition of
permitting.
(((9))) (7) The board may condition a grant or loan to include the
requirement that property may only be transferred to a federal agency
if the agency that will acquire the property agrees to comply with all
terms of the grant or loan to which the project sponsor was obligated.
Property acquired or improved by a project sponsor may be conveyed to
a federal agency, but only if the agency agrees to comply with all
terms of the grant or loan to which the project sponsor was obligated.

Sec. 9 RCW 77.85.150 and 1999 sp.s. c 13 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((By September 1, 1999,)) The governor, with the assistance of
the salmon recovery office, shall ((submit a statewide salmon recovery
strategy to the appropriate federal agencies administering the federal
endangered species act)) maintain and revise a statewide salmon
recovery strategy.
(2) The governor and the salmon recovery office shall be guided by
the following considerations in ((developing)) maintaining and revising
the strategy:
(a) The strategy should identify statewide initiatives and
responsibilities with regional recovery plans and local watershed
initiatives as the principal ((mechanism)) means for implementing the
strategy;
(b) The strategy should emphasize collaborative, incentive-based
approaches;
(c) The strategy should address all factors limiting the recovery
of Washington's listed or depressed salmon stocks, including habitat
and water quality degradation, harvest and hatchery management,
inadequate streamflows, and other barriers to fish passage. Where
other limiting factors are beyond the state's jurisdictional
authorities to respond to, such as some natural predators and high seas
fishing, the strategy shall include the state's requests for federal
action to effectively address these factors;
(d) The strategy should identify immediate actions necessary to
prevent extinction of a listed or depressed salmon stock, establish
performance measures to determine if restoration efforts are working,
recommend effective monitoring and data management, and recommend to
the legislature clear and certain measures to be implemented if
performance goals are not met;
(e) The strategy shall rely on the best scientific information
available and provide for incorporation of new information as it is
obtained;
(f) The strategy should seek a fair allocation of the burdens and
costs upon economic and social sectors of the state whose activities
may contribute to limiting the recovery of salmon; and
(g) The strategy should seek clear measures and procedures from the
appropriate federal agencies for removing Washington's salmon stocks
from listing under the federal act.
(3) Beginning on September 1, 2000, the strategy shall be updated
through an active public involvement process, including early and
meaningful opportunity for public comment. In obtaining public
comment, the salmon recovery office shall hold public meetings
throughout the state and shall encourage regional and local recovery
planning efforts to similarly ensure an active public involvement
process.
(4) This section shall apply prospectively only and not
retroactively. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
invalidate actions taken in recovery planning at the local, regional,
or state level prior to July 1, 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 77.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that pursuant to chapter 298, Laws of
2001 and acting upon recommendations of the state's independent science
panel, the monitoring oversight committee developed recommendations for
a comprehensive statewide strategy for monitoring watershed health,
with a focus upon salmon recovery, entitled The Washington
Comprehensive Monitoring Strategy and Action Plan for Watershed Health
and Salmon Recovery. The legislature further finds that funding to
begin implementing the strategy and action plan was provided in the
2003-2005 biennial budget, and that executive order 04-03 was issued to
coordinate state agency implementation activities. It is therefore the
purpose of this section to adopt the strategy and action plan and to
provide guidance to ensure that the coordination activities directed by
executive order 04-03 are effectively carried out.
(2) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health is
created. The director of the governor's salmon recovery office and the
director of the department of fish and wildlife shall serve as cochairs
of the forum. The forum shall include representatives of the following
state agencies that have responsibilities related to monitoring of
salmon recovery and watershed health:
(a) Department of ecology;
(b) Salmon recovery funding board;
(c) Salmon recovery office;
(d) Department of fish and wildlife;
(e) Department of natural resources;
(f) Puget Sound action team;
(g) Conservation commission;
(h) Department of agriculture; and
(i) Department of transportation.
(3) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health
shall provide a multiagency venue for coordinating technical and policy
issues and actions related to monitoring salmon recovery and watershed
health.
(4) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health
shall develop a set of measures to convey results and progress on
salmon recovery and watershed health in ways that are easily understood
by the general public.
(5) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health
shall invite the participation of federal, tribal, regional, and local
agencies and entities that carry out salmon recovery and watershed
health monitoring, and work toward coordination and standardization of
measures used.
(6) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health
shall periodically report to the governor and the appropriate standing
committees of the senate and house of representatives on the forum's
activities and recommendations for improving monitoring programs by
state agencies.
(7) The forum shall review pilot monitoring programs including
those that integrate (a) data collection, management, and access; and
(b) information regarding habitat projects and project management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 77.85.070 (Technical advisory groups) and 2000 c 107 s 97
& 1998 c 246 s 10; and
(2) RCW 77.85.210 (Monitoring activities -- Monitoring oversight
committee -- Legislative steering committee -- Report to the legislature--Monitoring strategy and action plan) and 2001 c 298 s 3.

--- END ---