BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.185.070 and 1994 sp.s. c 3 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) During each calendar year in which funds from the housing trust
fund or other legislative appropriations are available for use by the
department for the housing assistance program, the department shall
announce to all known interested parties, and through major media
throughout the state, a grant and loan application period of at least
ninety days' duration. This announcement shall be made as often as the
director deems appropriate for proper utilization of resources. The
department shall then promptly grant as many applications as will
utilize available funds less appropriate administrative costs of the
department. Administrative costs paid out of the housing trust fund
may not exceed four percent of annual revenues available for
distribution to housing trust fund projects. In awarding funds under
this chapter, the department shall provide for a geographic
distribution on a statewide basis.
(2) The department shall give first priority to applications for
projects and activities which utilize existing privately owned housing
stock including privately owned housing stock purchased by nonprofit
public development authorities and public housing authorities as
created in chapter 35.82 RCW. As used in this subsection, privately
owned housing stock includes housing that is acquired by a federal
agency through a default on the mortgage by the private owner. Such
projects and activities shall be evaluated under subsection (3) of this
section. Second priority shall be given to activities and projects
which utilize existing publicly owned housing stock. All projects and
activities shall be evaluated by some or all of the criteria under
subsection (3) of this section, and similar projects and activities
shall be evaluated under the same criteria.
(3) The department shall give preference for applications based on
some or all of the criteria under this subsection, and similar projects
and activities shall be evaluated under the same criteria:
(a) The degree of leveraging of other funds that will occur;
(b) The degree of commitment from programs to provide necessary
habilitation and support services for projects focusing on special
needs populations;
(c) Recipient contributions to total project costs, including
allied contributions from other sources such as professional, craft and
trade services, and lender interest rate subsidies;
(d) Local government project contributions in the form of
infrastructure improvements, and others;
(e) Projects that encourage ownership, management, and other
project-related responsibility opportunities;
(f) Projects that demonstrate a strong probability of serving the
original target group or income level for a period of at least twenty-five years;
(g) The applicant has the demonstrated ability, stability and
resources to implement the project;
(h) Projects which demonstrate serving the greatest need;
(i) Projects that provide housing for persons and families with the
lowest incomes;
(j) Projects serving special needs populations which are under
statutory mandate to develop community housing;
(k) Project location and access to employment centers in the region
or area;
(l) Projects that provide employment and training opportunities for
disadvantaged youth under a youthbuild or youthbuild-type program as
defined in RCW 50.72.020; ((and))
(m) Project location and access to available public transportation
services; and
(n) Projects that provide employment and training opportunities in
Washington state certified apprenticeship programs.
(4) The department shall only approve applications for projects for
mentally ill persons that are consistent with a regional support
network six-year capital and operating plan.

--- END ---