BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
With regard to waivers for courses offered for the purpose of
satisfying related or supplemental educational requirements for
apprentices registered with the Washington state apprenticeship council
or the federal bureau of apprenticeship and training, colleges may
deduct the tuition owed from training contracts with apprentice
organizations.

--- END ---