BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.270 and 2001 c 180 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26,
41.28, 41.32, 41.35, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW to the contrary, on and after
March 19, 1976, any member or former member who (a) receives a
retirement allowance earned by said former member as deferred
compensation from any public retirement system authorized by the
general laws of this state, or (b) is eligible to receive a retirement
allowance from any public retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030,
but chooses not to apply, or (c) is the beneficiary of a disability
allowance from any public retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030
shall be estopped from becoming a member of or accruing any contractual
rights whatsoever in any other public retirement system listed in RCW
41.50.030: PROVIDED, That (a) and (b) of this subsection shall not
apply to persons who have accumulated less than fifteen years service
credit in any such system or to persons receiving a retirement
allowance under RCW 41.26.430.
(2) Nothing in this section is intended to apply to any retirement
system except those listed in RCW 41.50.030 and the city employee
retirement systems for Seattle, Tacoma, and Spokane. Subsection (1)(b)
of this section does not apply to a dual member as defined in RCW
41.54.010.

--- END ---