BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The purpose of designating forest lands of long-term commercial
significance under RCW 36.70A.170(1)(b) is to maintain the land base
required for the forest products industry and to derive the economic,
social, and environmental benefits that result from a viable industry.
While counties and cities have discretion to consider local factors
when designating forest lands of long-term commercial significance,
local factors must be consistent with the goals and requirements of
this chapter.
(2) Access to markets may be considered by counties and cities when
designating forest lands of long-term commercial significance.
Jurisdictions designating or de-designating such lands, however, may
not predicate designation determinations upon a lack of forest products
processing facilities, including milling, sorting, or supporting
facilities, in the county or city.
(3) Counties and cities may require that forest land designated
under RCW 36.70A.170(1)(b) be part of an area or tract of forest land,
but the area or tract may not be larger than those typically used for
the growing and harvesting of forest products on private lands within
the county.
(4) The classification of land under chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW
shall not be a determinative factor in excluding lands from designation
under RCW 36.70A.170(1)(b).

--- END ---