BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington's
marine waters are at significant risk.
(2) As one example the legislature recognizes Hood Canal is a
marine water of the state exhibiting water quality problems that create
significant environmental concerns. The legislature finds:
(a) Hood Canal has a dead zone related to low-dissolved oxygen
concentrations, a condition that has recurred for many years;
(b) The May 2004 Preliminary Assessment and Corrective Action Plan
published by the state Puget Sound action team and the Hood Canal
coordinating council finds that the low-dissolved oxygen concentrations
in Hood Canal may result from nitrogen loading in the water and that
failing on-site sewage systems and storm water runoff are the most
likely human sources of nitrogen in the Hood Canal dead zone; and
(c) The Preliminary Assessment and Corrective Action Plan includes
recommendations to address Hood Canal's problems, including education,
training, incentives, and requirements for protecting and restoring
buffers along Hood Canal streams and shorelines, and use of low-impact
development techniques.
(3) The legislature also finds the Hood Canal dead zone is not an
isolated problem. The legislature recognizes that the United States
commission on ocean policy's September 2004 report, An Ocean Blueprint
for the 21st Century, documents that these problems affect Washington's
sounds, coasts, and oceans. The legislature also recognizes this
report documents that adverse coastal impacts occur not only from uses
of coastal areas but also from uses occurring a considerable distance
from the ocean. The legislature further recognizes this report
includes recommendations regarding clear goals for marine areas, better
coordination, clarification of laws, adaptive management, and improved
coastal and ocean resources protection.
(4) The legislature finds that, while substantial progress has been
made in protecting Washington's environment, more is now known about
the significant effects of development along the state's shorelines.
The legislature intends to provide the tools necessary to address the
evolving understanding of measures needed to maintain and, when
required, enhance water quality for Washington's marine shorelines
while accommodating appropriate development consistent with city and
county comprehensive plans.
(5) The legislature recognizes the state's growth management act
includes a goal and general requirements to protect water quality as
well as the state's surface and ground waters, including Puget Sound.
The legislature also recognizes these provisions are codified at RCW
36.70A.020(10), 36.70A.030(14)(g), and 36.70A.070 (1) and (5)(c)(iv).
The legislature further recognizes the growth management act defines
this goal and these requirements and gives additional guidance for
local governments and the public while allowing for local choices and
solutions. The legislature finds the approach taken in the growth
management act will protect our marine waters and assist counties,
cities, and the public. The legislature therefore intends that the
provisions of this act be implemented by counties and cities according
to the schedule specified in RCW 36.70A.130.
(6) Nothing in this act affects the settlement that led to the
adoption of the current shoreline master program guidelines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When preparing comprehensive plans and development regulations
according to this chapter and when reviewing comprehensive plans and
development regulations according to RCW 36.70A.130, cities and
counties shall consider land use measures to maintain and, when
required, enhance water quality and habitat as recommended by public
agency plans or programs.
(2) When designating and protecting critical areas according to
this chapter, counties and cities shall consider measures to maintain
and, when required, enhance water quality at a level allowing water
bodies to support fish and wildlife conservation areas, wetlands, and
any aquifers used for potable water to which the surface water body
contributes.
(3) Counties and cities may not designate in a comprehensive plan
adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW urban growth areas on marine
shorelines not already occupied by urban growth unless the designation
is necessary for water-dependent or water-related uses.
(4) Counties and cities shall implement the requirements of this
section according to the schedule specified in RCW 36.70A.130.
(5) The requirements of this section apply to counties whose
territory includes Hood Canal, Puget Sound, the Strait of Juan de Fuca,
or the Pacific Ocean and to the cities and towns in those counties.
(6) Nothing in this section is intended to affect the requirements
or provisions of the state's water pollution control laws, chapter
90.48 RCW, or the federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.
(7) Nothing in this act shall create a new cause of action before
the growth management hearings boards for any plans or programs not
adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW.

--- END ---