BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.34.055 and 1994 c 264 s 76 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The county legislative authority may direct the county
planning commission to set open space priorities and adopt, after a
public hearing, an open space plan and public benefit rating system for
the county. The plan shall consist of criteria for determining
eligibility of lands, the process for establishing a public benefit
rating system, and an assessed valuation schedule. The assessed
valuation schedule shall be developed by the county assessor and shall
be a percentage of market value based upon the public benefit rating
system. The open space plan, the public benefit rating system, and the
assessed valuations schedule shall not be effective until approved by
the county legislative authority after at least one public hearing:
PROVIDED, That any county which has complied with the procedural
requisites of chapter 393, Laws of 1985, prior to July 28, 1985, need
not repeat those procedures in order to adopt an open space plan
pursuant to chapter 393, Laws of 1985.
(b) County legislative authorities, in open space plans, public
benefit rating systems, and assessed valuation schedules, shall give
priority consideration to lands used for buffers that are planted with
or primarily contain native vegetation.
(c) "Priority consideration" as used in this section may include,
but is not limited to, establishing classification eligibility and
maintenance criteria for buffers meeting the requirements of (b) of
this subsection.
(d) Classified open space land within the boundaries of airport
property shall receive priority consideration under this section and
shall not be removed or declassified without receipt of written notice
from the owner to remove all or a portion of the classification
pursuant to RCW 84.34.108.
(e) County legislative authorities shall meet the requirements of
(b) of this subsection no later than July 1, 2006, unless buffers
already receive priority consideration in the existing open space
plans, public benefit rating systems, and assessed valuation schedules.
(2) In adopting an open space plan, recognized sources shall be
used unless the county does its own survey of important open space
priorities or features, or both. Recognized sources include but are
not limited to the natural heritage data base; the state office of
historic preservation; the interagency committee for outdoor recreation
inventory of dry accretion beach and shoreline features; state,
national, county, or city registers of historic places; the shoreline
master program; or studies by the parks and recreation commission and
by the departments of fish and wildlife and natural resources.
Features and sites may be verified by an outside expert in the field
and approved by the appropriate state or local agency to be sent to the
county legislative authority for final approval as open space.
(3) When the county open space plan is adopted, owners of open
space lands then classified under this chapter shall be notified in the
same manner as is provided in RCW 84.40.045 of their new assessed
value. These lands may be removed from classification, upon request of
owner, without penalty within thirty days of notification of value.
(4) The open space plan and public benefit rating system under this
section may be adopted for taxes payable in 1986 and thereafter.

--- END ---