BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the early
years of a child's life are a time of enormous growth. The legislature
further finds that when parents choose to provide early educational
opportunities for their children in public or private preschools,
parents should have the tools to help find high-quality programs for
their children that will help their students be ready to go to school.
(2) The legislature intends to establish a voluntary certification
process for the child development and educational program offerings of
public and nonpublic preschool programs. The purpose of the voluntary
certification is to give parents and other consumers of preschool
programs the ability to evaluate the educational quality of the
preschool program including the program's ability to prepare the child
for kindergarten.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By rule, the superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt standards and procedures for the voluntary
certification of public and nonpublic preschool child development and
educational programs. The standards at a minimum should outline
essential components including but not limited to the following
categories: School-home relationships; class size and teacher-student
ratios; standards for teachers and staff; specification of pedagogical
goals, content, and methods, consistent with early learning development
benchmarks developed in Washington; and methods for monitoring quality.
The superintendent shall develop programs to encourage preschool
programs to apply for approval.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall post a list of certified preschool programs on its
web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any program that meets the definition of
nursery school or kindergarten under RCW 74.15.020(2)(g) and is not
required to be licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW shall annually file its
business name, name of the business owner, address, and phone number
with the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 28A.215 RCW.

--- END ---