BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that ambulance and
emergency medical services are essential services and the availability
of these services is vital to preserving and promoting the health,
safety, and welfare of people in local communities throughout the
state. All persons, businesses, and industries benefit from the
availability of ambulance and emergency medical services, and survival
rates can be increased when these services are adequately funded and
appropriately regulated. It is thus the public's expectation that
ambulance and emergency medical service systems will be comprehensive
in nature and properly funded to address the needs of a given
community.
It is the legislature's intent to explicitly recognize local
jurisdictions' ability and authority to collect utility service charges
to fund ambulance and emergency medical service systems that are based,
at least in some part, upon a charge for the availability of these
services. In fact, notwithstanding some of the discussion in the
Washington State Supreme Court's Arborwood Idaho LLC vs. City of
Kennewick decision, the legislature finds that reliance on a funding
policy which is based only on actual use of these services would be
inequitable, would lead to disproportionate impacts on sick and injured
persons, and could impede the likelihood that persons would seek
ambulance or emergency medical service assistance in their time of
need. The legislature further finds that without a funding mechanism,
local governments would no longer be able to operate or contract for
ambulance and emergency medical services, thereby threatening the
health, safety, and welfare of the people. The legislature therefore
intends to ensure and promote the health, safety, and welfare of the
people by clarifying cities' and towns' authority to operate ambulance
and emergency medical services as a public utility, to contract for
these services, and to fix rates and charges for both the availability
and the actual use of ambulance and emergency medical services.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.21.766 and 2004 c 129 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a regional fire protection service authority or the
legislative authority of any city or town determines that the fire
protection jurisdictions that are members of the authority or the city
or town or a substantial portion of the city or town is not adequately
served by existing private ambulance service, the governing board of
the authority may by resolution, or the legislative authority of the
city or town may by appropriate legislation, provide for the
establishment of a system of ambulance service to be operated by the
authority as a public utility of the city or town, or operated by
contract after a call for bids.
(2) In determining the adequacy of existing ambulance service, the
legislative authority of the city or town shall determine if the
service is meeting relevant performance standards. Before making any
adequacy determination, performance standards shall be established by
the city or town through adoption of a resolution or ordinance by its
legislative body, which shall first hold one or more public hearings on
the subject of proposed performance standards, or any amendment
thereto, after giving at least fourteen days' notice of the time and
place by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the city
and individual written notice to any private ambulance company
registered with the jurisdiction as operating an ambulance service in
the city or town, and to the department of health. Performance
standards adopted by any city or town shall be no less stringent than
existing standards adopted by the department of health or any other
agency with applicable jurisdiction, and may include, but not be
limited to, standards regarding response times, equipment, personnel,
training, communication, dispatch, reporting, and other relevant
requirements and expectations.
(3) The city or town legislative authority is authorized to set and
collect rates and charges for the availability of an ambulance and
emergency medical service system, and actual utilization of this
service, which rates and charges combined shall not exceed the total
cost of the maintenance, operation, and capital improvements of the
utility. Rates and charges shall be set based upon (a) the benefit
conferred on ratepayers through the availability of the ambulance and
emergency medical service; and (b) the burden produced to the utility
by the ratepayer, which considerations can include the frequency of
calls made, distance to hospitals, individual demands for service, or
other factors identified in studies conducted to assess benefits
conferred and burdens imposed on the utility. Rates may reflect a
reduction or exemption for designated classes consistent with Article
VIII, section 7 of the state Constitution. Revenues generated by these
rates and charges must be deposited in a separate fund or funds and be
used only for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost and
expense of regulating, maintaining, and operating ambulance and
emergency medical service system facilities, and all or any part of the
cost and expense of planning, designing, establishing, acquiring,
developing, constructing, supporting, and improving any of these
facilities. Refunds for charges collected under authority of this
section shall not be required for any period before the time a written
appeal is filed by a party claiming a refund from a city or town under
appeal procedures established by the city or town.
(4) Ambulance and emergency medical rates charged pursuant to this
section do not constitute taxes or charges under RCW 82.02.050 through
82.02.090, 35.21.768, or charges otherwise prohibited by law.

--- END ---