BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.110.040 and 1997 c 5 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The executive director of the higher education coordinating board,
in consultation with the council of presidents and the state board for
community and technical colleges, shall monitor the compliance by
institutions of higher education with this chapter.
(1) The board shall establish a timetable and guidelines for
compliance with this chapter.
(2) By November 30, 1990, each institution shall submit to the
board for approval a plan to comply with the requirements of RCW
28B.110.030. The plan shall contain measures to ensure institutional
compliance with the provisions of this chapter by September 30, 1994.
If participation in activities, such as intercollegiate athletics and
matriculation in academic programs is not proportionate to the
percentages of male and female enrollment, the plan should outline
efforts to identify barriers to equal participation and to encourage
gender equity in all aspects of college and university life. For the
purpose of determining whether participation is proportionate to the
percentage of male and female enrollment, the institutions may use a
three-year rolling average for male and female enrollments.
(3) The board shall report every four years, beginning December
31, 1998, to the governor and the higher education committees of the
house of representatives and the senate on institutional efforts to
comply with this chapter. The report shall include recommendations on
measures to assist institutions with compliance. This report may be
combined with the report required in RCW 28B.15.465.
(4) The board may delegate to the state board for community and
technical colleges any or all responsibility for community college
compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

--- END ---