BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.021 and 1997 1st sp.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Any person requested or signaled to stop by a law enforcement
officer for a traffic infraction has a duty to stop.
(2) Whenever any person is stopped for a traffic infraction, the
officer may detain that person for a reasonable period of time
necessary to identify the person, check for outstanding warrants, check
the status of the person's license, insurance identification card, and
the vehicle's registration, and complete and issue a notice of traffic
infraction.
(3) Any person requested to identify himself or herself to a law
enforcement officer pursuant to an investigation of a traffic
infraction has a duty to identify himself or herself, give his or her
current address, and sign an acknowledgement of receipt of the notice
of infraction. The requirement for a signature does not apply when the
person is served with a notice of infraction that is created by
electronic means or served by mail.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.63.060 and 1993 c 501 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A notice of traffic infraction represents a determination that
an infraction has been committed. The determination will be final
unless contested as provided in this chapter.
(2) The form for the notice of traffic infraction shall be
prescribed by rule of the supreme court and shall include the
following:
(a) A statement that the notice represents a determination that a
traffic infraction has been committed by the person named in the notice
and that the determination shall be final unless contested as provided
in this chapter;
(b) A statement that a traffic infraction is a noncriminal offense
for which imprisonment may not be imposed as a sanction; that the
penalty for a traffic infraction may include sanctions against the
person's driver's license including suspension, revocation, or denial;
that the penalty for a traffic infraction related to standing,
stopping, or parking may include nonrenewal of the vehicle license;
(c) A statement of the specific traffic infraction for which the
notice was issued;
(d) A statement of the monetary penalty established for the traffic
infraction;
(e) A statement of the options provided in this chapter for
responding to the notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these
options;
(f) A statement that at any hearing to contest the determination
the state has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the infraction was committed; and that the person may
subpoena witnesses including the officer who issued the notice of
infraction;
(g) A statement that at any hearing requested for the purpose of
explaining mitigating circumstances surrounding the commission of the
infraction the person will be deemed to have committed the infraction
and may not subpoena witnesses;
(h) A statement that the person must respond to the notice as
provided in this chapter within fifteen days or the person's driver's
license or driving privilege will be suspended by the department until
any penalties imposed pursuant to this chapter have been satisfied;
(i) A statement that failure to appear at a hearing requested for
the purpose of contesting the determination or for the purpose of
explaining mitigating circumstances will result in the suspension of
the person's driver's license or driving privilege, or in the case of
a standing, stopping, or parking violation, refusal of the department
to renew the vehicle license, until any penalties imposed pursuant to
this chapter have been satisfied; and
(j) A statement, which the person shall sign, that the person
promises to respond to the notice of infraction in one of the ways
provided in this chapter. The requirement for a signature does not
apply when the person is served with a notice of infraction that is
created by electronic means or served by mail.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.64.025 and 1999 c 86 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever any person ((violates his or her written promise to appear
in court, or)) served with a traffic citation fails to appear for a
scheduled court hearing, the court in which the defendant failed to
appear shall promptly give notice of such fact to the department of
licensing. Whenever thereafter the case in which the defendant failed
to appear is adjudicated, the court hearing the case shall promptly
file with the department a certificate showing that the case has been
adjudicated.

Sec. 4 RCW 7.80.070 and 1987 c 456 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A notice of civil infraction represents a determination that a
civil infraction has been committed. The determination is final unless
contested as provided in this chapter.
(2) The form for the notice of civil infraction shall be prescribed
by rule of the supreme court and shall include the following:
(a) A statement that the notice represents a determination that a
civil infraction has been committed by the person named in the notice
and that the determination is final unless contested as provided in
this chapter;
(b) A statement that a civil infraction is a noncriminal offense
for which imprisonment may not be imposed as a sanction;
(c) A statement of the specific civil infraction for which the
notice was issued;
(d) A statement of the monetary penalty established for the civil
infraction;
(e) A statement of the options provided in this chapter for
responding to the notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these
options;
(f) A statement that at any hearing to contest the determination
the state has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the civil infraction was committed and that the person
may subpoena witnesses including the enforcement officer who issued the
notice of civil infraction;
(g) A statement that at any hearing requested for the purpose of
explaining mitigating circumstances surrounding the commission of the
civil infraction, the person will be deemed to have committed the civil
infraction and may not subpoena witnesses;
(h) A statement that the person must respond to the notice as
provided in this chapter within fifteen days;
(i) A statement that failure to respond to the notice or a failure
to appear at a hearing requested for the purpose of contesting the
determination or for the purpose of explaining mitigating circumstances
will result in a default judgment against the person in the amount of
the penalty and that this failure may be referred to the prosecuting
attorney for criminal prosecution for failure to respond or appear;
(j) A statement, which the person shall sign, that the person
promises to respond to the notice of civil infraction in one of the
ways provided in this chapter. The requirement for a signature does
not apply when the person is served with a notice of civil infraction
that is created by electronic means or served by mail; and
(k) A statement that failure to respond to a notice of civil
infraction ((as promised)) or to appear at a requested hearing is a
misdemeanor and may be punished by a fine or imprisonment in jail.

Sec. 5 RCW 7.80.160 and 2002 c 175 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who fails to sign a notice of civil infraction is
guilty of a misdemeanor. The requirement for a signature does not
apply when the person is served with a notice of civil infraction that
is created by electronic means or served by mail.
(2) Any person who willfully ((violating his or her written and
signed promise to appear in court or his or her written and signed
promise)) fails to respond to a notice of civil infraction is guilty of
a misdemeanor regardless of the disposition of the notice of civil
infraction. A ((written promise to appear in court or a written
promise to respond to a)) notice of civil infraction may be complied
with by an appearance by counsel.
(3) A person who willfully fails to pay a monetary penalty or to
perform community restitution as required by a court under this chapter
may be found in contempt of court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 7.84.050 and 1987 c 380 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A notice of infraction represents a determination that an
infraction has been committed. The determination shall be final unless
contested as provided in this chapter.
(2) The form for the notice of infraction shall be prescribed by
rule of the supreme court and shall include the following:
(a) A statement that the notice represents a determination that an
infraction has been committed by the person named in the notice and
that the determination shall be final unless contested as provided in
this chapter;
(b) A statement that an infraction is a noncriminal offense for
which imprisonment will not be imposed as a sanction;
(c) A statement of the specific infraction for which the notice was
issued;
(d) A statement of the monetary penalty established for the
infraction;
(e) A statement of the options provided in this chapter for
responding to the notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these
options;
(f) A statement that at any hearing to contest the determination,
the state has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the infraction was committed; and that the person may
subpoena witnesses including the officer who issued the notice of
infraction;
(g) A statement that at any hearing requested for the purpose of
explaining mitigating circumstances surrounding the commission of the
infraction the person shall be deemed to have committed the infraction
and shall not subpoena witnesses;
(h) A statement that failure to respond to a notice of infraction
within fifteen days is a misdemeanor and may be punished by fine or
imprisonment;
(i) A statement that failure to appear at a hearing requested for
the purpose of contesting the determination or for the purpose of
explaining mitigating circumstances is a misdemeanor and may be
punished by fine or imprisonment; and
(j) A statement, which the person shall sign, that the person
promises to respond to the notice of infraction in one of the ways
provided in this chapter. The requirement for a signature does not
apply when the person is served with a notice of infraction that is
created by electronic means or served by mail.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.27.240 and 1986 c 197 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The form of the notice of infraction issued under this chapter
shall include the following:
(1) A statement that the notice represents a determination that the
infraction has been committed by the contractor named in the notice and
that the determination shall be final unless contested as provided in
this chapter;
(2) A statement that the infraction is a noncriminal offense for
which imprisonment shall not be imposed as a sanction;
(3) A statement of the specific violation which necessitated
issuance of the infraction;
(4) A statement of penalty involved if the infraction is
established;
(5) A statement of the options provided in this chapter for
responding to the notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these
options;
(6) A statement that at any hearing to contest the notice of
infraction the state has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of
the evidence, that the infraction was committed; and that the
contractor may subpoena witnesses, including the compliance inspector
of the department who issued and served the notice of infraction;
(7) A statement, which the person who has been served with the
notice of infraction shall sign, that the contractor ((promises to))
must respond to the notice of infraction in one of the ways provided in
this chapter. The requirement for a signature does not apply when the
person is served with a notice of infraction that is created by
electronic means or served by mail;
(8) A statement that refusal to sign the infraction as directed in
subsection (7) of this section is a misdemeanor and may be punished by
a fine or imprisonment in jail; and
(9) A statement that a contractor's willful failure to respond to
a notice of infraction ((as promised)) is a misdemeanor and may be
punished by a fine or imprisonment in jail.
The requirement for a signature does not apply when the person is
served with a notice of infraction that is created by electronic means
or served by mail.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.106.190 and 1994 c 174 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The form of the notice of infraction issued under this chapter
shall include the following:
(1) A statement that the notice represents a determination that the
infraction has been committed by the person named in the notice and
that the determination shall be final unless contested as provided in
this chapter;
(2) A statement that the infraction is a noncriminal offense for
which imprisonment shall not be imposed as a sanction;
(3) A statement of the specific infraction for which the notice was
issued;
(4) A statement of the monetary penalty that has been established
for the infraction;
(5) A statement of the options provided in this chapter for
responding to the notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these
options;
(6) A statement that at any hearing to contest the determination
the state has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the infraction was committed; and that the person may
subpoena witnesses, including the authorized representative of the
department who issued and served the notice of infraction;
(7) A statement, which the person shall sign, that the person
promises to respond to the notice of infraction in one of the ways
provided in this chapter;
(8) A statement that refusal to sign the infraction as directed in
subsection (7) of this section is a misdemeanor; and
(9) A statement that willful failure to respond to a notice of
infraction as promised is a misdemeanor and may be punished by a fine
or imprisonment in jail.
The requirement for a signature does not apply when the person is
served with a notice of infraction that is created by electronic means
or served by mail.

Sec. 9 RCW 20.01.482 and 2004 c 43 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall have the authority to issue a notice of
civil infraction if an infraction is committed in his or her presence
or, if after investigation, the director has reasonable cause to
believe an infraction has been committed.
(2) It is a misdemeanor for any person to refuse to properly
identify himself or herself for the purpose of issuance of a notice of
infraction ((or to refuse to sign the written or electronic promise to
appear or respond to a notice of infraction)).
(3) Any person willfully ((violating a written or electronic and
signed promise)) failing to respond to a notice of infraction is guilty
of a misdemeanor regardless of the disposition of the notice of
infraction.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.63B.140 and 1994 c 284 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall prescribe the form of the notice of
infraction issued under this chapter.
(2) The notice of infraction shall include the following:
(a) A statement that the notice represents a determination that the
infraction has been committed by the person named in the notice and
that the determination is final unless contested as provided in this
chapter;
(b) A statement that the infraction is a noncriminal offense for
which imprisonment may not be imposed as a sanction;
(c) A statement of the specific infraction for which the notice was
issued;
(d) A statement of a monetary penalty that has been established for
the infraction;
(e) A statement of the options provided in this chapter for
responding to the notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these
options;
(f) A statement that, at a hearing to contest the determination,
the state has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the infraction was committed, and that the person may
subpoena witnesses including the authorized representative who issued
and served the notice of the infraction;
(g) A statement, that the person shall sign, that the person
promises to respond to the notice of infraction in one of the ways
provided in this chapter;
(h) A statement that refusal to sign the infraction as directed in
(g) of this subsection is a misdemeanor; and
(i) A statement that willful failure to respond to a notice of
infraction as promised is a misdemeanor and may be punished by a fine
or imprisonment in jail.
The requirement for a signature does not apply when the person is
served with a notice of infraction that is created by electronic means
or served by mail.

Sec. 11 RCW 81.112.230 and 1999 c 20 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in RCW 81.112.020 and 81.112.210 through 81.112.230 shall
be deemed to prevent law enforcement authorities from prosecuting for
theft, trespass, or other charges by any individual who:
(1) Fails to pay the required fare on more than one occasion within
a twelve-month period;
(2) Fails to ((sign)) respond to a notice of civil infraction; or
(3) Fails to depart the train, including but not limited to
commuter trains and light rail trains, when requested to do so by a
person designated to monitor fare payment.

--- END ---