BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the purpose of this chapter to
establish the office of student assistance.
(2) The office shall administer the state's responsibilities for
federal student financial aid programs.
(3) The office, in consultation with students, the higher education
coordinating board, the work force training and education coordinating
board, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
council of presidents, public and private institutions of higher
education, and career schools and colleges has the following duties:
(a) To work collaboratively with organizations representing the
public, students, institutions of higher education, faculty, and
community scholarship groups and corporations;
(b) To provide objective and timely information to the governor,
legislature, public, institutions of higher education, and higher
education organizations;
(c) To be an advocate for the needs of financially needy students
to the public, the governor, the legislature, and congress;
(d) To ensure that public funds are effectively managed and that
the maximum amount possible of those funds are provided directly to
needy students;
(e) To the extent feasible, streamline distribution and
accountability processes to reduce the need for administrative staff at
the state and institutions of higher education;
(f) To the extent feasible, ensure that programs follow the
principle that funding follows resident students to their choice of
accredited in-state career schools and colleges; and
(g) To raise donations and matching grants from people and
organizations that wish to donate to statewide financial aid programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Director" means the director of the office.
(2) "Office" means the office of student assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The office of student assistance is created.
The office is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under
this chapter and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The executive head and appointing authority
of the office is the director. The director shall be appointed by the
governor, with the consent of the senate, and shall serve at the
pleasure of the governor. The director shall be paid a salary to be
fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040. If a vacancy
occurs in the position while the senate is not in session, the governor
shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting of the
senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 It is the intent of the legislature wherever
possible to place the internal affairs of the office under the control
of the director in order that the director may institute therein the
flexible, alert, and intelligent management of its business that
changing contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever the
director's authority is not specifically limited by law, the director
has complete charge and supervisory powers over the office. The
director may create such administrative structures as the director
considers appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law. The
director may employ such assistants and personnel as necessary for the
general administration of the office. This employment shall be in
accordance with the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, except
as otherwise provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The director shall appoint a deputy
director, an office personnel director, and such assistant directors as
may be needed to administer the office. The deputy director shall have
charge and general supervision of the office in the absence or
disability of the director and, in case of a vacancy in the office of
director, shall continue in charge of the office until a successor is
appointed and qualified, or until the governor appoints an acting
director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Any power or duty vested in or transferred
to the director by law or executive order may be delegated by the
director to the deputy director or to any other assistant or
subordinate; but the director is responsible for the official acts of
the officers and employees of the office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The director may appoint such advisory
committees or councils as may be required by any federal legislation as
a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the office. The
director may also appoint statewide committees or councils on such
subject matters as are or come within the office's responsibilities.
The statewide committees and councils shall have representation from
both major political parties and shall have substantial consumer
representation.
Members of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid
their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 In furtherance of the policy of the state to
cooperate with the federal government in all of the programs under the
jurisdiction of the office, such rules as may become necessary to
entitle the state to participate in federal funds may be adopted,
unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal
funds. Any section or provision of law dealing with the office that
may be susceptible to more than one construction shall be interpreted
in favor of the construction most likely to comply with federal laws
entitling this state to receive federal funds for the various programs
of the office. If any law dealing with the office is ruled to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition of
the allocation of federal funds to the state, or to any departments or
agencies thereof, the conflicting part is declared to be inoperative
solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply in the office of student assistance to
the director, the director's personal secretary, the deputy director,
all division directors and assistant directors, and one confidential
secretary for each of these officers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of
the higher education coordinating board and the office of the adjutant
general of the state military department pertaining to financial
assistance for students at institutions of higher education are
transferred to the office of student assistance. All references to the
executive director of the higher education coordinating board, the
higher education coordinating board, the adjutant general, or the
office of the adjutant general in the military department, in the
Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or
the office when referring to the functions transferred in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the higher education
coordinating board and the office of the adjutant general of the state
military department pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the office of student
assistance. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles,
and other tangible property employed by the higher education
coordinating board and the office of the adjutant general of the state
military department in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be made available to the office of student
assistance. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection
with the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to
the office of student assistance.
(b) Any appropriations made to the higher education coordinating
board and the office of the adjutant general of the state military
department for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the office of student assistance.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the higher education coordinating board and
the office of the adjutant general of the state military department
engaged January 1, 2005, in performing the powers, functions, and
duties transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the office of
student assistance. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW,
the state civil service law, are assigned to the office of student
assistance to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as
formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be
appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing
state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the higher education
coordinating board and the office of the adjutant general of the state
military department pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the office of student
assistance. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in
full force and shall be performed by the office of student assistance.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the higher education coordinating board and the office of the adjutant
general of the state military department shall not affect the validity
of any act performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 9 and 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---