BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.09.100 and 2004 c 167 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department the
power to provide for a comprehensive inmate work program and to remove
statutory and other restrictions which have limited work programs in
the past. It is also the intent of the legislature to ensure that the
correctional industries board of directors, in developing and selecting
correctional industries work programs, does not encourage the
development of, or provide for selection of or contracting for, or the
significant expansion of, any new or existing class I correctional
industries work programs that unfairly compete with Washington
businesses. The legislature intends that the requirements relating to
fair competition in the correctional industries work programs be
liberally construed by the correctional industries board of directors
to protect Washington businesses from unfair competition. For purposes
of establishing such a comprehensive program, the legislature
recommends that the department consider adopting any or all, or any
variation of, the following classes of work programs:
(1) CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES.
(a) The employer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit organization
pursuant to an agreement between the organization and the department.
The organization shall produce goods or services for sale to both the
public and private sector.
(b) The customer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed by the department to provide Washington state manufacturers
or businesses with products or services currently produced or provided
by out-of-state or foreign suppliers.
(c) The correctional industries board of directors shall review
these proposed industries, including any potential new class I
industries work program or the significant expansion of an existing
class I industries work program, before the department contracts to
provide such products or services. The review shall include the
analysis required under RCW 72.09.115 to determine if the proposed
correctional industries work program will compete with any Washington
business. An agreement for a new class I correctional industries work
program, or an agreement for a significant expansion of an existing
class I correctional industries work program, that unfairly competes
with any Washington business is prohibited.
(d) The department of corrections shall supply appropriate security
and custody services without charge to the participating firms.
(e) Inmates who work in free venture industries shall do so at
their own choice. They shall be paid a wage comparable to the wage
paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry
is located, as determined by the director of correctional industries.
If the director cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage, then
the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.
(f) An inmate who is employed in the class I program of
correctional industries shall not be eligible for unemployment
compensation benefits pursuant to any of the provisions of Title 50 RCW
until released on parole or discharged.
(2) CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be state-owned and operated
enterprises designed primarily to reduce the costs for goods and
services for tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations.
(b)(i) The industries selected for development within this class
shall, as much as possible, match the available pool of inmate work
skills and aptitudes with the work opportunities in the free community.
The industries shall be closely patterned after private sector
industries but with the objective of reducing public support costs
rather than making a profit.
(ii) The products and services of this industry, including
purchased products and services necessary for a complete product line,
may be sold to the following:
(A) Public agencies((, to));
(B) Nonprofit organizations((, and to));
(C) Private contractors when the goods purchased will be ultimately
used by a public agency or a nonprofit organization;
(D) An employee and immediate family members of an employee of the
department of corrections; and
(E) A person under the supervision of the department of corrections
and his or her immediate family members.
(iii) Clothing manufactured by an industry in this class may be
donated to nonprofit organizations that provide clothing free of charge
to low-income persons.
(c)(i) Class II correctional industries products and services shall
be reviewed by the correctional industries board of directors before
offering such products and services for sale to private contractors.
(ii) The board of directors shall conduct a yearly marketing review
of the products and services offered under this subsection. Such
review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the
proposed products and services on the Washington state business
community. To avoid waste or spoilage and consequent loss to the
state, when there is no public sector market for such goods, byproducts
and surpluses of timber, agricultural, and animal husbandry enterprises
may be sold to private persons, at private sale. Surplus byproducts
and surpluses of timber, agricultural and animal husbandry enterprises
that cannot be sold to public agencies or to private persons may be
donated to nonprofit organizations. All sales of surplus products
shall be carried out in accordance with rules prescribed by the
secretary.
(d) Security and custody services shall be provided without charge
by the department of corrections.
(e) Inmates working in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall be paid for their work on a gratuity scale
which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar nature in
the locality in which the industry is located and which is approved by
the director of correctional industries.
(f) Subject to approval of the correctional industries board,
provisions of RCW 41.06.142 shall not apply to contracts with
Washington state businesses entered into by the department of
corrections through class II industries.
(3) CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department of
corrections. They shall be designed and managed to accomplish the
following objectives:
(i) Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and
experience so that the inmate will be able to qualify for better work
both within correctional industries and the free community. It is not
intended that an inmate's work within this class of industries should
be his or her final and total work experience as an inmate.
(ii) Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or work
training per week.
(iii) Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public support
costs.
(b) Class III correctional industries shall be reviewed by the
correctional industries board of directors to set policy for work
crews. The department shall present to the board of directors
quarterly detail statements showing where work crews worked, what
correctional industry class, and the hours worked. The board of
directors may review any class III program at its discretion.
(c) Supervising, management, and custody staff shall be employees
of the department.
(d) All able and eligible inmates who are assigned work and who are
not working in other classes of industries shall work in this class.
(e) Except for inmates who work in work training programs, inmates
in this class shall be paid for their work in accordance with an inmate
gratuity scale. The scale shall be adopted by the secretary of
corrections.
(4) CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department of
corrections. They shall be designed and managed to provide services in
the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost. The services shall
be provided to public agencies, to persons who are poor or infirm, or
to nonprofit organizations.
(b) Class IV correctional industries shall be reviewed by the
correctional industries board of directors to set policy for work
crews. The department shall present to the board of directors
quarterly detail statements showing where work crews worked, what
correctional industry class, and the hours worked. The board of
directors may review any class IV program at its discretion. Class IV
correctional industries operated in work camps established pursuant to
RCW 72.64.050 are exempt from the requirements of this subsection
(4)(b).
(c) Inmates in this program shall reside in facilities owned by,
contracted for, or licensed by the department of corrections. A unit
of local government shall provide work supervision services without
charge to the state and shall pay the inmate's wage.
(d) The department of corrections shall reimburse participating
units of local government for liability and workers compensation
insurance costs.
(e) Inmates who work in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall receive a gratuity which shall not exceed
the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the
industry is located.
(5) CLASS V: COMMUNITY RESTITUTION PROGRAMS.
(a) Programs in this class shall be subject to supervision by the
department of corrections. The purpose of this class of industries is
to enable an inmate, placed on community supervision, to work off all
or part of a community restitution order as ordered by the sentencing
court.
(b) Employment shall be in a community restitution program operated
by the state, local units of government, or a nonprofit agency.
(c) To the extent that funds are specifically made available for
such purposes, the department of corrections shall reimburse nonprofit
agencies for workers compensation insurance costs.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.335.190 and 2000 c 138 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When, in the opinion of the board of directors of any school
district, the cost of any furniture, supplies, equipment, building,
improvements, or repairs, or other work or purchases, except books,
will equal or exceed the sum of fifty thousand dollars, complete plans
and specifications for such work or purchases shall be prepared and
notice by publication given in at least one newspaper of general
circulation within the district, once each week for two consecutive
weeks, of the intention to receive bids therefor and that
specifications and other information may be examined at the office of
the board or any other officially designated location: PROVIDED, That
the board without giving such notice may make improvements or repairs
to the property of the district through the shop and repair department
of such district when the total of such improvements or repair does not
exceed the sum of (a) fifteen thousand dollars, for districts with
fifteen thousand five hundred or more full-time equivalent students; or
(b) for districts with fewer than fifteen thousand five hundred full-time equivalent students, fifteen thousand dollars if more than one
craft or trade is involved with the school district improvement or
repair, or ten thousand dollars if a single craft or trade is involved
with the school district improvement or repair. The cost of any public
work, improvement or repair for the purposes of this section shall be
the aggregate of all amounts to be paid for labor, material, and
equipment on one continuous or interrelated project where work is to be
performed simultaneously or in close sequence. The bids shall be in
writing and shall be opened and read in public on the date and in the
place named in the notice and after being opened shall be filed for
public inspection.
(2) Every purchase of furniture, equipment or supplies, except
books, the cost of which is estimated to be in excess of fifteen
thousand dollars, shall be on a competitive basis. The board of
directors shall establish a procedure for securing telephone and/or
written quotations for such purchases. Whenever the estimated cost is
from fifteen thousand dollars up to fifty thousand dollars, the
procedure shall require quotations from at least three different
sources to be obtained in writing or by telephone, and recorded for
public perusal. Whenever the estimated cost is in excess of fifty
thousand dollars, the public bidding process provided in subsection (1)
of this section shall be followed.
(3) Any school district may purchase goods produced or provided in
whole or in part from class II inmate work programs operated by the
department of corrections pursuant to RCW 72.09.100, including but not
limited to furniture, equipment, or supplies. School districts are
encouraged to set as a target to contract, beginning after June 30,
2006, to purchase up to one percent of the total goods required by the
school districts each year, goods produced or provided in whole or in
part from class II inmate work programs operated by the department of
corrections.
(4) Every building, improvement, repair or other public works
project, the cost of which is estimated to be in excess of (a) fifteen
thousand dollars, for districts with fifteen thousand five hundred or
more full-time equivalent students; or (b) for districts with fewer
than fifteen thousand five hundred full-time equivalent students,
fifteen thousand dollars if more than one craft or trade is involved
with the school district improvement or repair, or ten thousand dollars
if a single craft or trade is involved with the school district
improvement or repair, shall be on a competitive bid process. Whenever
the estimated cost of a public works project is fifty thousand dollars
or more, the public bidding process provided in subsection (1) of this
section shall be followed unless the contract is let using the small
works roster process in RCW 39.04.155 or under any other procedure
authorized for school districts. One or more school districts may
authorize an educational service district to establish and operate a
small works roster for the school district under the provisions of RCW
39.04.155.
(((4))) (5) The contract for the work or purchase shall be awarded
to the lowest responsible bidder as defined in RCW 43.19.1911 but the
board may by resolution reject any and all bids and make further calls
for bids in the same manner as the original call. On any work or
purchase the board shall provide bidding information to any qualified
bidder or the bidder's agent, requesting it in person.
(((5))) (6) In the event of any emergency when the public interest
or property of the district would suffer material injury or damage by
delay, upon resolution of the board declaring the existence of such an
emergency and reciting the facts constituting the same, the board may
waive the requirements of this section with reference to any purchase
or contract: PROVIDED, That an "emergency", for the purposes of this
section, means a condition likely to result in immediate physical
injury to persons or to property of the school district in the absence
of prompt remedial action.
(((6))) (7) This section does not apply to the direct purchase of
school buses by school districts and educational services in accordance
with RCW 28A.160.195.

--- END ---