BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.17.250 and 1991 c 89 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In carrying out the responsibilities for the development of a
voluntary compliance program under the authority of RCW 49.17.050(8)
and the rendering of advisory and consultative services to employers,
the director: (a) May grant an employer's application for advice and
consultation((, and)); (b) shall, except as provided in subsection
(3)(b) of this section, consider an initial visit to a small farming
operation to be a visit for advice and consultation; (c) for the
purpose of affording ((such)) consultation and advice under either (a)
or (b) of this subsection, may visit the employer's work place.
((Such)) Consultation and advice shall be limited to ((the)) matters
((specified in the request)) affecting the interpretation and
applicability of safety and health standards to the conditions,
structures, machines, equipment, apparatus, devices, materials,
methods, means, and practices in the employer's work place, as
specified in the employer's request, if any. The director in granting
any requests for or otherwise performing consultative or advisory
service may provide for an alternative means of affording consultation
and advice other than on-site consultation, including, but not limited
to geographic or industry-specific safety education forums or
conferences conducted solely by the department or in cooperation with
one or more industry or trade associations.
(2) The director, or an authorized representative, will make
recommendations regarding the elimination of any hazards disclosed
within the scope of the on-site consultation. No visit to an
employer's work place made under subsection (1) of this section shall
be regarded as an inspection or investigation under the authority of
this chapter, and no notices or citations shall be issued, nor, shall
any civil penalties be assessed upon such visit, nor shall any
authorized representative of the director designated to render advice
and consult with employers under the voluntary compliance program have
any enforcement authority: PROVIDED, That in the event an on-site
visit discloses a serious violation of a health and safety standard as
defined in RCW 49.17.180(6), and the hazard of such violation is either
not abated by the cooperative action of the employer, or, is not
subject to being satisfactorily abated by the cooperative action of the
employer, the director shall either invoke the administrative
restraining authority provided in RCW 49.17.130 or seek the issuance of
injunctive process under the authority of RCW 49.17.170 or invoke both
such remedies.
(3)(a) Nothing in this section shall be construed as providing
immunity to any employer who has made application for consultative
services during the pendency of the granting of such application from
inspections or investigations conducted under RCW 49.17.070 or any
inspection conducted as a result of a complaint, nor immunity from
inspections under RCW 49.17.070 or inspections resulting from a
complaint subsequent to the conclusion of the consultative period.
(b) An initial visit of a small farming operation resulting from a
report of a work-related injury or fatality shall not be considered a
visit for advice and consultation under subsection (1) of this section.
(c) This section shall not be construed as requiring an inspection
under RCW 49.17.070 of any work place which has been visited for
consultative purposes. However, in the event of a subsequent
inspection, the director, or an authorized representative, may in his
or her discretion take into consideration any information obtained
during the consultation visit of that work place in determining the
nature of an alleged violation and the amount of penalties to be
assessed, if any. ((Such))
(d) Rules ((and regulations to be promulgated pursuant to)) adopted
under this section shall provide that in all instances of serious
violations as defined in RCW 49.17.180(6) which are disclosed in any
consultative period, shall be corrected within a specified period of
time at the expiration of which an inspection will be conducted under
the authority of RCW 49.17.070. All employers requesting or receiving
consultative services shall be advised of the provisions of this
section and the rules adopted by the director relating to the voluntary
compliance program.
(e) Information obtained by the department as a result of
((employer-requested)) consultation and training services provided
under this section shall be deemed confidential and shall not be open
to public inspection, but may be included in a service report in
accordance with (f) of this subsection, or a report made pursuant to
RCW 43.05.090, and thereby disclosed to the employer's employees or
their collective bargaining representatives.
(f) Within thirty days of receipt, the employer shall make
voluntary services reports available to employees or their collective
bargaining representatives for review. Employers may satisfy the
availability requirement by requesting a copy of the reports from the
department.
(g) The director may provide by rule for the frequency, manner, and
method of the rendering of consultative services to employers, and for
the scheduling and priorities in granting applications consistent with
the availability of personnel, and in such a manner as not to
jeopardize the enforcement requirements of this chapter.
(4) For the purposes of this section, a "small farming operation"
means an employer that:
(a) Is engaged in the growing of or harvesting of crops, the
raising of livestock or poultry, or related activities conducted on
sites such as a farm, ranch, orchard, dairy farm, or similar farming
operation;
(b) Employs ten or fewer employees on the day of the visit and at
all times during the twelve months preceding the visit; and
(c) Has not housed any seasonal or temporary farm workers in
permanent or temporary structures located on or off the property of the
employer during the twelve months preceding the visit.
"Small farming operation" shall be interpreted to be consistent
with that term as it is defined or used by the United States department
of labor, occupational safety and health administration in the
administration of the federal occupational safety and health act (29
U.S.C. chapter 15).

Sec. 2 RCW 43.05.090 and 1996 c 206 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Following a consultative visit pursuant to RCW 49.17.250, the
department of labor and industries shall issue a report to the employer
that the employer shall make available to its employees. The report
shall contain:
(a) A description of ((the)) any condition that is not in
compliance and the text of the specific section or subsection of the
applicable state or federal law or rule;
(b) A statement of what is required to achieve compliance;
(c) The date by which the department requires compliance to be
achieved;
(d) Notice of means to contact technical assistance services
provided by the department; and
(e) Notice of when, where, and to whom a request to extend the time
to achieve compliance for good cause may be filed with the department.
(2) Following a compliance inspection pursuant to RCW 49.17.120,
the department of labor and industries shall issue a citation for
violations of industrial safety and health standards. The citation
shall not assess a penalty if the violations:
(a) Are determined not to be of a serious nature;
(b) Have not been previously cited;
(c) Are not willful; and
(d) Do not have a mandatory penalty under chapter 49.17 RCW.

--- END ---