BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
verify that credits earned by certificated staff, that are used to
increase earnings on the salary schedule consistent with RCW
28A.415.023, are obtained from an educational institution accredited by
an accrediting association recognized by rule of the higher education
coordinating board.
(2) No salary increase may be approved before there has been
verification of accreditation under subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) Certificated staff who submit credits received from an
unaccredited educational institution for the purposes of receiving a
salary increase shall be fined three hundred dollars. The fine shall
be paid to the office of the superintendent of public instruction and
used for costs of administering this section.
(b) In addition to the fine in (a) of this subsection, certificated
staff who receive salary increases based upon credits earned from
educational institutions that have been verified to be unaccredited
must reimburse the district for any compensation received based on
these credits.

--- END ---