BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2004 c 19 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which
the student was not successful, ((and if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (11) of this section,)) one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards, and any appeals process. The objective
alternative assessments for each content area shall be ((comparable))
equivalent in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must
demonstrate on the Washington assessment of student learning for each
content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045, acquisition of the certificate is required for graduation
from a public high school but is not the only requirement for
graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a
student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more
content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement,
then the student may retake the assessment in the content area up to
four times at no cost to the student. If the student successfully
meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the
student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Once
objective alternative assessments are ((authorized)) implemented
pursuant to subsection (11) of this section, a student may use the
objective alternative assessments to demonstrate that the student
successfully meets the state standards for that content area if the
student has retaken the Washington assessment of student learning at
least once. If the student successfully meets the state standards on
the objective alternative assessments then the student shall earn a
certificate of academic achievement. The student's transcript shall
note whether the certificate of academic achievement was acquired by
means of the Washington assessment of student learning or by an
alternative assessment.
(4) Beginning with the graduating class of 2010, a student must
meet the state standards in science in addition to the other content
areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the Washington
assessment of student learning or the objective alternative assessments
in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment. A
student may combine content area results from the Washington assessment
of student learning and any subsequent retakes of the assessment and
results from any alternative assessments to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards.
(7) Beginning with the graduating class of 2006, the highest scale
score and level achieved in each content area on the high school
Washington assessment of student learning shall be displayed on a
student's transcript. In addition, beginning with the graduating class
of 2008, each student shall receive a scholar's designation on his or
her transcript for each content area in which the student achieves
level four the first time the student takes that content area
assessment.
(8) Beginning in 2006, school districts must make available to
students the following options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(9) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(10) Subject to available funding, the superintendent shall pilot
opportunities for retaking the high school assessment beginning in the
2004-05 school year. Beginning no later than September 2006,
opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year shall be
available to each school district.
(11)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments((, which may include an appeals process,)) for students to
demonstrate achievement of the state academic standards. The objective
alternative assessments shall be ((comparable)) equivalent in rigor to
the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the
Washington assessment of student learning and be objective in its
determination of student achievement of the state standards. Before
any objective alternative assessments are used by a student to
demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in a content
area required to obtain a certificate, the ((legislature shall formally
approve the use of any objective alternative assessments through the
omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution))
superintendent of public instruction shall provide to the education
committees of the legislature an opportunity to review any and all
options developed and planned for implementation by January 15th of the
school year before the school year planned for implementation.
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
pilot two or more alternative assessments in the 2005-06 school year,
with the goal of implementing at least one alternative assessment in
the 2006-07 school year. The superintendent of public instruction
shall direct school districts to make available for student use any
alternative assessments reviewed by the education committees of the
legislature and deemed adequate by the superintendent of public
instruction for implementation. The implementation shall begin with
options that are complete and, to the extent funds are appropriated,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall continue
to develop, pilot, and implement additional alternative assessments.
In its development and implementation of alternative assessments, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consult with
parents, administrators, practicing classroom teachers including
teachers in career and technical education, practicing principals,
employers, tribal representatives from federally recognized tribes of
Washington state and tribes that have signed the Washington state
centennial accord, appropriate agencies, professional organizations,
assessment experts, and other interested parties.
(12) ((By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and
senate education committees shall obtain information and conclusions
from recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations)) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop appeals processes for use by students no later than the
2007-08 school year. The appeals processes shall be developed with
criteria that can be consistently applied throughout the state.
(13) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for students as provided in this subsection (13).
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who ((were not successful)) did not score the level of
proficient or above on any or all of the content areas of the
Washington assessment for student learning during the previous school
year. The plan shall include the courses, competencies, and other
steps needed to be taken by the student to meet state academic
standards and stay on track for graduation. This requirement shall be
phased in as follows:
(i) Beginning no later than the 2004-05 school year ninth grade
students as described in this subsection (13)(a) shall have a plan.
(ii) Beginning no later than the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter eighth grade students as described in this subsection
(13)(a) shall have a plan.
(iii) The parent or guardian shall be notified, preferably through
a parent conference, of the student's results on the Washington
assessment of student learning, actions the school intends to take to
improve the student's skills in any content area in which the student
was ((unsuccessful)) not proficient, strategies to help them improve
their student's skills, and the content of the student's plan.
(iv) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.
(b) Beginning with the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter, all fifth grade students who ((were not successful)) did
not score the level of proficient or above in one or more of the
content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment of student
learning shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of a student described in this
subsection (13)(b) shall be notified, preferably through a parent
conference, of the student's results on the Washington assessment of
student learning, actions the school intends to take to improve the
student's skills in any content area in which the student was
((unsuccessful)) not proficient, and provide strategies to help them
improve their student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.
(14) Beginning in the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter, each public high school shall notify students and parents,
in the primary language of parents to the extent practicable, of the
options under the high school assessment system and any appeals
processes for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic
standards.
(15) Beginning in the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter, each public high school shall notify students and parents,
in the primary language of parents to the extent practicable, of the
different courses and programs in career and technical education and
those offered through area skill centers that provide students the
skills and knowledge in those content areas assessed by the high school
assessment system and included in the certificate of academic
achievement.

--- END ---