BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to amounts received
as royalties for copyrights or patents for five years, beginning with
the date the copyright is registered or patent is filed. This section
applies to royalties received for copyrights registered or patents
issued after June 30, 2005.
(2) "Royalties" means compensation for the use of copyrights or
patents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---