BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the encouragement
of entrepreneurial development and business ownership is necessary if
the state's opportunities for economic growth and job creation are to
be realized. Recent research shows that new job growth comes primarily
from start-up firms and that entrepreneurial training and technical
assistance to small businesses and self-employed individuals can
increase the survival and success rate of new businesses.
The legislature further finds that: The state's current mechanisms
for encouraging and supporting entrepreneurship is inadequate; training
and technical support for small businesses and entrepreneurial
development is fragmented; no comprehensive plan guides the different
entities providing services; and there is no single point of leadership
and responsibility.
It is the intention of the legislature to increase job creation in
the state by providing a comprehensive network of technical assistance,
training, and support services to entrepreneurs and start-up firms;
encouraging self-employment, and coordinating private and public
support to entrepreneurs and start-up firms. It is the purpose of this
act to create a coordinated, efficient, responsive, and accountable
system to support small business and entrepreneurial development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The Washington entrepreneurial assistance
center is created in the department of community, trade, and economic
development.
(1) The center shall have a director who shall be appointed by the
director of the department of community, trade, and economic
development.
(2) The center shall have an advisory board composed of small
business owners and advocates, the chair of the economic development
commission, the director of the work force training and education
coordinating board, the executive director of the state board for
community and technical colleges, the commissioner of the employment
security department, representatives of the University of Washington
business school and the Washington State University college of business
and economics, the director of an associate development organization
from an urban county, the director of an associate development
organization from a rural county, and the state director of the small
business development center. Each member of the advisory board may
appoint a designee to function in his or her place. The director of
the center is authorized to convene such other individuals or groups as
it deems necessary in carrying out its obligations under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The Washington entrepreneurial assistance
center shall:
(1) Develop and maintain a state comprehensive plan for small
business and entrepreneurial development. The plan shall include but
not be limited to setting measurable goals, objectives, and priorities
for (a) encouraging and supporting small business and entrepreneurial
development in the state; and (b) the coordination and delivery of
small business and entrepreneurial training and technical assistance;
(2) In conjunction with the work force training and education
coordinating board, (a) establish and maintain an inventory of the
entrepreneurial education, training, and technical assistance services
and programs available in the state; (b) disseminate information about
available entrepreneurial development services and programs via
in-person presentations and electronic and printed materials; and (c)
undertake other activities to raise awareness of entrepreneurial
training and assistance offerings;
(3) Evaluate the extent to which existing entrepreneurial training
and technical assistance programs in the state are effective and
represent a consistent, integrated approach to meeting the needs of
start-up and existing entrepreneurs;
(4) Advocate for the state's small business and entrepreneurial
development system and for meeting the needs of small start-ups and
existing entrepreneurs;
(5) Identify policies to reduce administrative and other barriers
to efficient delivery and coordination of entrepreneurial assistance;
(6) Develop with appropriate public and private entities
entrepreneurial instructional materials and curricula including
materials that meet the particular needs of rural and low-income
communities;
(7) Distribute awards for excellence in entrepreneurial training
and assistance;
(8) Report to the governor, the economic development commission,
the work force training and education coordinating board, and the
appropriate legislative committees its recommendations for statutory
changes necessary to enhance operational efficiencies or enhance
coordination related to entrepreneurial education, training, and
assistance.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.30.530 and 1984 c 77 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of regents of Washington State University shall
establish the Washington State University small business development
center.
(2) The center shall provide management and technical assistance
including but not limited to training, counseling, and research
services to small businesses throughout the state. The center shall
work with ((public and private community development and economic
assistance agencies and shall work towards the goal of coordinating
activities with such agencies)) the department of community, trade, and
economic development, the work force training and education
coordination board, the employment security department, the higher
education coordinating board, and the state board for community and
technical colleges to: (a) Integrate small business development
centers with other state economic development and work force
development programs; (b) facilitate the development of
interinstitutional entrepreneurial education, training, and assistance
programs; and (c) coordinate services to avoid duplication of services.
(3) The administrator of the center may contract with other public
or private entities for the provision of specialized services.
(4) The small business ((and)) development center may accept and
disburse federal grants or federal matching funds or other funds or
donations from any source when made, granted, or donated to carry out
the center's purposes.

Sec. 5 RCW 28C.18.060 and 1996 c 99 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board, in cooperation with the operating agencies of the state
training system and private career schools and colleges shall:
(1) Concentrate its major efforts on planning, coordination
evaluation, policy analysis, and recommending improvements to the
state's training system.
(2) Advocate for the state training system and for meeting the
needs of employers and the work force for work force education and
training.
(3) Establish and maintain an inventory of the programs of the
state training system, and related state programs, and perform a
biennial assessment of the vocational education, training, and adult
basic education and literacy needs of the state; identify ongoing and
strategic education needs; and assess the extent to which employment,
training, vocational and basic education, rehabilitation services, and
public assistance services represent a consistent, integrated approach
to meet such needs.
(4) Develop and maintain a state comprehensive plan for work force
training and education, including but not limited to, goals,
objectives, and priorities for the state training system, and review
the state training system for consistency with the state comprehensive
plan. In developing the state comprehensive plan for work force
training and education, the board shall use, but shall not be limited
to: Economic, labor market, and populations trends reports in office
of financial management forecasts; joint office of financial management
and employment security department labor force, industry employment,
and occupational forecasts; the results of scientifically based
outcome, net-impact and cost-benefit evaluations; the needs of
employers as evidenced in formal employer surveys and other employer
input; and the needs of program participants and workers as evidenced
in formal surveys and other input from program participants and the
labor community.
(5) In consultation with the higher education coordinating board,
review and make recommendations to the office of financial management
and the legislature on operating and capital facilities budget requests
for operating agencies of the state training system for purposes of
consistency with the state comprehensive plan for work force training
and education.
(6) Provide for coordination among the different operating agencies
and components of the state training system at the state level and at
the regional level.
(7) Develop a consistent and reliable data base on vocational
education enrollments, costs, program activities, and job placements
from publicly funded vocational education programs in this state.
(8) Establish standards for data collection and maintenance for the
operating agencies of the state training system in a format that is
accessible to use by the board. The board shall require a minimum of
common core data to be collected by each operating agency of the state
training system.
The board shall develop requirements for minimum common core data
in consultation with the office of financial management and the
operating agencies of the training system.
(9) Establish minimum standards for program evaluation for the
operating agencies of the state training system, including, but not
limited to, the use of common survey instruments and procedures for
measuring perceptions of program participants and employers of program
participants, and monitor such program evaluation.
(10) Every two years administer scientifically based outcome
evaluations of the state training system, including, but not limited
to, surveys of program participants, surveys of employers of program
participants, and matches with employment security department payroll
and wage files. Every five years administer scientifically based net-impact and cost-benefit evaluations of the state training system.
(11) In cooperation with the employment security department,
provide for the improvement and maintenance of quality and utility in
occupational information and forecasts for use in training system
planning and evaluation. Improvements shall include, but not be
limited to, development of state-based occupational change factors
involving input by employers and employees, and delineation of skill
and training requirements by education level associated with current
and forecasted occupations.
(12) Provide for the development of common course description
formats, common reporting requirements, and common definitions for
operating agencies of the training system.
(13) Provide for effectiveness and efficiency reviews of the state
training system.
(14) In cooperation with the higher education coordinating board,
facilitate transfer of credit policies and agreements between
institutions of the state training system, and encourage articulation
agreements for programs encompassing two years of secondary work force
education and two years of postsecondary work force education.
(15) In cooperation with the higher education coordinating board,
facilitate transfer of credit policies and agreements between private
training institutions and institutions of the state training system.
(16) ((Participate in the development of)) Develop policy
objectives for the work force investment act, P.L. 105-220, or its
successor; develop coordination criteria for activities under the ((job
training partnership)) act with related programs and services provided
by state and local education and training agencies; and ensure that
entrepreneurial training opportunities are available through programs
of each local work force investment board in the state.
(17) Make recommendations to the commission of student assessment,
the state board of education, and the superintendent of public
instruction, concerning basic skill competencies and essential core
competencies for K-12 education. Basic skills for this purpose shall
be reading, writing, computation, speaking, and critical thinking,
essential core competencies for this purpose shall be English, math,
science/technology, history, geography, and critical thinking. The
board shall monitor the development of and provide advice concerning
secondary curriculum which integrates vocational and academic
education.
(18) Establish and administer programs for marketing and outreach
to businesses and potential program participants.
(19) Facilitate the location of support services, including but not
limited to, child care, financial aid, career counseling, and job
placement services, for students and trainees at institutions in the
state training system, and advocate for support services for trainees
and students in the state training system.
(20) Facilitate private sector assistance for the state training
system, including but not limited to: Financial assistance, rotation
of private and public personnel, and vocational counseling.
(21) Facilitate the development of programs for school-to-work
transition that combine classroom education and on-the-job training,
including entrepreneurial education and training, in industries and
occupations without a significant number of apprenticeship programs.
(22) Include in the planning requirements for local work force
investment boards a requirement that the local work force investment
boards specify how entrepreneurial training is to be offered through
the one-stop system required under the work force investment act, P.L.
105-220, or its successor.
(23) Encourage and assess progress for the equitable representation
of racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with disabilities
among the students, teachers, and administrators of the state training
system. Equitable, for this purpose, shall mean substantially
proportional to their percentage of the state population in the
geographic area served. This function of the board shall in no way
lessen more stringent state or federal requirements for representation
of racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with disabilities.
(((23))) (24) Participate in the planning and policy development of
governor set-aside grants under P.L. 97-300, as amended.
(((24))) (25) Administer veterans' programs, licensure of private
vocational schools, the job skills program, and the Washington award
for vocational excellence.
(((25))) (26) Allocate funding from the state job training trust
fund.
(((26))) (27) Work with the director of community, trade, and
economic development to ensure coordination between work force training
priorities and that department's economic development and
entrepreneurial development efforts.
(((27))) (28) Adopt rules as necessary to implement this chapter.
The board may delegate to the director any of the functions of this
section.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.162.020 and 2003 c 235 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state economic development commission shall perform
the following duties:
(1) Review and periodically update the state's economic development
strategy, including implementation steps, and performance measures, and
perform an annual evaluation of the strategy and the effectiveness of
the state's laws, policies, and programs which target economic
development;
(2) Provide policy, strategic, and programmatic direction to the
department of community, trade, and economic development regarding
strategies to:
(a) Promote business retention, expansion, and creation within the
state;
(b) Promote the business climate of the state and stimulate
increased national and international investment in the state;
(c) Promote products and services of the state;
(d) Enhance relationships and cooperation between local
governments, economic development councils, federal agencies, state
agencies, and the legislature;
(e) Integrate economic development programs, including work force
training, technology transfer, entrepreneurial development, and export
assistance; and
(f) Make the funds available for economic development purposes more
flexible to meet emergent needs and maximize opportunities;
(3) Identify policies and programs to assist Washington's start-up
firms and small businesses;
(4) Assist the department of community, trade, and economic
development with procurement and deployment of private funds for
business development, retention, expansion, and recruitment as well as
other economic development efforts;
(5) Meet with the chairs and ranking minority members of the
legislative committees from both the house of representatives and the
senate overseeing economic development policies; and
(6) Make a biennial report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature regarding the commission's review of the state's economic
development policy, the commission's recommendations, and steps taken
by the department of community, trade, and economic development to
implement the recommendations. The first report is due by December 31,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 50.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the establishment of a
self-employment assistance program would assist unemployed individuals
and create new businesses and job opportunities in Washington state.
The commissioner is directed to inform individuals identified as likely
to exhaust regular unemployment benefits of the opportunity to enroll
in commissioner-approved self-employment assistance programs.
(2) An unemployed individual is eligible to participate in a
self-employment assistance program if it has been determined that he or
she:
(a) Is otherwise eligible for regular benefits as defined in RCW
50.22.010;
(b) Has been identified as likely to exhaust regular unemployment
benefits under a profiling system established by the commissioner as
defined in P.L. 103-152; and
(c) Is enrolled in a self-employment assistance program that is
approved by the commissioner, and includes entrepreneurial training,
business counseling, technical assistance, and requirements to engage
in activities relating to the establishment of a business and becoming
self-employed.
(3) Individuals participating in a self-employment assistance
program approved by the commissioner are eligible to receive their
regular unemployment benefits.
(a) The requirements of RCW 50.20.010 and 50.20.080 relating to
availability for work, active search for work, and refusal to accept
suitable work are not applicable to an individual in the
self-employment assistance program for the first fifty-two weeks of the
individual's participation in the program.
(b) An individual who meets the requirements of this section is
considered to be "unemployed" under RCW 50.04.310 and 50.20.010.
(4) An individual who fails to participate in his or her approved
self-employment assistance program as prescribed by the commissioner is
disqualified from continuation in the program.
(5) The commissioner shall take all steps necessary in carrying out
this section to assure collaborative involvement of interested parties
in program development, and to ensure that the self-employment
assistance programs meet all federal criteria for withdrawal from the
unemployment fund. The commissioner may approve, as self-employment
assistance programs, existing self-employment training programs
available through community colleges, work force investment boards, or
other organizations and is not obligated by this section to expend any
departmental funds for the operation of self-employment assistance
programs, unless specific funding is provided to the department for
that purpose through federal or state appropriations.
(6) The commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
section.

Sec. 8 RCW 50.20.095 and 1980 c 74 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any individual registered at an established school in a course of
study providing scholastic instruction of twelve or more hours per
week, or the equivalent thereof, shall be disqualified from receiving
benefits or waiting period credit for any week during the school term
commencing with the first week of such scholastic instruction or the
week of leaving employment to return to school, whichever is the
earlier, and ending with the week immediately before the first full
week in which the individual is no longer registered for twelve or more
hours of scholastic instruction per week: PROVIDED, That registration
for less than twelve hours will be for a period of sixty days or
longer. The term "school" includes primary schools, secondary schools,
and "institutions of higher education" as that phrase is defined in RCW
50.44.037.
This disqualification shall not apply to any individual who:
(1) Is in approved training within the meaning of RCW 50.20.043;
((or))
(2) Is in an approved self-employment assistance program under
section 7 of this act; or
(3) Demonstrates to the commissioner by a preponderance of the
evidence his or her actual availability for work, and in arriving at
this determination the commissioner shall consider the following
factors:
(a) Prior work history;
(b) Scholastic history;
(c) Past and current labor market attachment; and
(d) Past and present efforts to seek work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The Washington entrepreneurial assistance
center fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist
of such private and public funds as are received to support Washington
entrepreneurial assistance center functions. Expenditures from the
fund may only be used to support Washington entrepreneurial assistance
center functions, consistent with the Washington entrepreneurial
assistance center comprehensive plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 3 and 9 of this act are
each added to chapter 43.330 RCW.

--- END ---