BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that structural
changes in the state's economy have resulted in business failures and
job loss leading to large increases in social costs such as
unemployment compensation, public assistance, health programs, and lost
taxes normally paid by workers and businesses.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to develop a comprehensive
program to retain businesses and jobs.
(3) It is the purpose of this act to authorize and fund the
creation of a statewide business and job retention program that places
primary reliance on locally based business and job retention programs
to assist businesses that are likely to close, fail, or experience a
permanent mass layoff. The state's primary role in the business and
job retention program is to provide continuing financial and technical
assistance and training to the locally based business and job retention
programs to ensure their success.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 There is established within the department
of community, trade, and economic development the business and job
retention and expansion program. The director shall solicit volunteer
assistance; work with the small business development centers, associate
development organizations, the Washington manufacturing service, the
Washington technology center, institutions of higher education, the
employment security department, the work force training and education
coordinating board, labor representatives, and other appropriate public
and private agencies and organizations; and contract with private
consultants for such services as the director deems advisable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The director shall:
(1) Designate service delivery regions in the state, each of which
shall have at least one county and no more than six counties;
(2) Put out requests for proposals for the operation of business
and job retention and expansion programs for each region. The local
programs shall be required to provide a local matching contribution to
the operation of the program. The director shall evaluate the
proposals and select a program for each region based on each
proposal's:
(a) Inclusion of representatives of business, labor, training
institutions, nonprofit organizations, technical assistance providers,
and local government;
(b) Plan for administration of surveys of businesses, utilities,
employees, financial institutions, and community groups to gather
information about business needs, expansion plans, relocation
decisions, training needs, potential layoffs, financing needs, the
availability of financing and other appropriate information about
economic trends, and specific employer and employee needs in the
region;
(c) Plan for delivery of job retention and business retention and
expansion services including job skills training, production process
analysis, product development assistance, marketing, and financial and
other management services; and
(d) Showing of cross-jurisdictional collaboration;
(3) Develop a model local economic survey and assist the regional
business and job retention and expansion programs in administering a
survey in each region;
(4) Designate proposed criteria for receipt of services offered by
the regional programs to businesses, labor unions, employee groups,
community groups, local governments, and port districts. Such
criteria shall include the number of employees affected, the type of
business involved, reemployment potential of employees, severity of
problems affecting the business or work force, skill level of the work
force, availability of financing, and the social and economic costs of
layoffs or closure;
(5) Be responsible for the development and implementation of
training programs for the regional business and job retention and
expansion programs. The training programs shall be designed to assist
the programs in administering economic surveys, developing and
coordinating local resources, assessing the need for outside resources,
and locating other public and private resources needed to assist firms;
and
(6) Provide or coordinate the delivery of technical and managerial
assistance upon request from the local business and job retention and
expansion programs in the areas of financial management, marketing,
product development, production process analysis, training, and other
business services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The local business and job retention and
expansion programs shall provide marketing, technical, managerial, and
training assistance or referral appropriate to client businesses,
unions, employee groups, and work forces. The programs shall initiate
contact with those firms or employees indicating, through the economic
surveys or otherwise, the potential for closure, mass layoff, or
relocation. For firms or employees not indicating such potential, the
provision of services from the programs shall be in response to direct
requests from firms, labor unions, employee groups, community groups,
local governments, and port districts. Where appropriate, program
coordinators shall assist local governments or organizations in
applying for matching funds from the department of community, trade,
and economic development.
The local programs shall coordinate the delivery of technical,
managerial, financial, training, and other assistance. The programs
shall work with the employment security department, local work force
investment boards, and local WorkSource centers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 In addition to the responsibilities set
forth in sections 2 through 5 of this act, the department of community,
trade, and economic development shall draw upon its existing resources,
employment and economic data from the employment security department,
and data from the department of licensing and the department of revenue
and other sources, to do nonduplicative analyses of trends in the
state's industries and work forces. The department shall make such
analyses available to relevant businesses, labor organizations or work
forces, local governments, economic development organizations, early
warning programs, and business and job retention and expansion
programs, and shall work with them to develop long-term strategies for
economic growth and revitalization.

Sec. 6 RCW 50.12.190 and 1945 c 35 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall take all appropriate steps to reduce and
prevent unemployment; to encourage and assist in the adoption of
practical methods of vocational training, retraining and vocational
guidance; to investigate, recommend, advise, and assist in the
establishment and operation by municipalities, counties, school
districts, and the state, of reserves for public works to be used in
times of business depression and unemployment; to promote the
reemployment of unemployed workers throughout the state in every other
way that may be feasible; and to these ends to carry and publish the
results of investigations and research studies.
(2) The employment security department shall:
(a) Assess the number and causes of potential plant closures and
mass layoffs as covered by the federal worker adjustment and retraining
notification act;
(b) Assess the number and causes of permanent mass layoffs and
closures using the permanent mass layoff and plant closure data base
that is presently funded by the federal government; and
(c) Supply the director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development with data gathered under this subsection, which
will allow the state and local components of the business and job
retention and expansion program to prioritize delivery of service to
distressed, mature, and cyclical industries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The sum of six hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2006, from the general fund--state to the
department of community, trade, and economic development for the
purposes of this act.
(2) The sum of six hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2007, from the general fund--state to the department of community,
trade, and economic development for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---