BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The intent of this act is to prevent
confidentiality agreements in lawsuits involving a public hazard so
that the public and public institutions are better able to identify
newly emerging risks and prevent future injuries produced by similar
situations, as well as to better identify the safety records of
manufacturers, vendors, practitioners, and facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section may be cited as the "sunshine in public hazard
litigation act."
(2) As used in this section, "public hazard" means a condition,
product, or practice that is reasonably likely to cause harm to others
if not publicly disclosed.
(3) Except pursuant to this section, a court shall not enter an
order or judgment, or approve or enforce any provision of an agreement
between or among parties to a civil action, which has the purpose or
effect of concealing a public hazard or any information concerning a
public hazard, nor shall the court enter an order or judgment which has
the purpose or effect of concealing any information which may be useful
to members of the public in protecting themselves from injury which may
result from a public hazard.
(4) Any portion of an agreement or contract which has the purpose
or effect of concealing: (a) One or more past incidents involving a
public hazard; (b) any information concerning a public hazard; or (c)
any information which may be useful to members of the public in
protecting themselves from injury which may result from a public
hazard, is void, contrary to public policy, and may not be enforced.
(5) Trade secrets as defined in RCW 19.108.010 which are not
pertinent to the public hazard shall be protected pursuant to chapter
19.108 RCW.
(6) Any substantially affected person, including but not limited to
representatives of news media, has standing to contest an order,
judgment, agreement, or contract that violates this section. A person
may contest an order, judgment, agreement, or contract that violates
this section by motion in the court that entered the order or judgment,
or by bringing a declaratory judgment action.
(7) Upon motion and good cause shown by a party attempting to
prevent disclosure of information or materials which have not
previously been disclosed, including but not limited to alleged trade
secrets, the court shall examine the disputed information or materials
in camera. If the court finds that the information or materials or
portions thereof consist of information concerning a public hazard or
information which may be useful to members of the public in protecting
themselves from injury which may result from a public hazard, the court
shall allow disclosure of the information or materials. If allowing
disclosure, the court shall allow disclosure of only that portion of
the information or materials necessary or useful to the public
regarding the public hazard.

--- END ---