BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.93 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Unless otherwise required by law or court order, all general
or limited authority Washington peace officers or specially
commissioned Washington peace officers shall refrain from the
enforcement of federal civil immigration laws. General or limited
authority Washington peace officers or specially commissioned
Washington peace officers shall not single out individuals for legal
scrutiny or enforcement activity based solely on their country of
origin, religion, ethnicity, or immigration status.
(b) No general authority Washington law enforcement agency, agency
with primary territorial jurisdiction, or primary commissioning agency
shall use moneys, resources, or personnel solely for the purpose of
detecting or apprehending persons whose only violation of law is or may
be a civil immigration violation.
(c) Subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section does not apply if the
Washington officer has reasonable suspicion to believe that the person
was convicted for a felony in this state or any state, the person was
deported or left the United States after the felony conviction, and the
person is again present in the United States.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any
general or limited authority Washington peace officer or specially
commissioned Washington peace officer from cooperating with federal
immigration authorities when required under federal law.
(3) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section shall be
liable in a civil action brought by the aggrieved party in the amount
of one thousand dollars per violation, all economic damages actually
incurred as a direct result of the violation, and for the costs of
litigation including reasonable attorneys' fees and costs. The court
may award additional damages in an amount determined necessary to
ensure the violator's future compliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---