BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.97 RCW
to read as follows:
General or limited authority Washington peace officers or specially
commissioned Washington peace officers, and general or limited
authority Washington law enforcement agencies, as defined in RCW
10.93.020, shall not inquire about the immigration status of crime
victims, witnesses, or others who call or approach these officers or
agencies seeking assistance. Officers or agencies who provide public
safety services shall not request specific documents for the sole
purpose of determining an individual's immigration status. However, if
voluntarily offered by an individual in response to a general request
for identification, it is permissible to rely on immigration documents
for the purpose of establishing the individual's identity.

--- END ---