BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall implement, as part of the required
training and continuing education, food safety training and testing
integrated into the curriculum that meets the standards established by
the state board of health pursuant to chapter 69.06 RCW. Individual
food handler permits are not required for persons who begin working in
an adult family home after June 30, 2005, and successfully complete the
basic and modified-basic caregiver training if they receive information
or training regarding safe food handling practices from the employer
before providing food handling or service for the adult family home
clients. Documentation that the information or training has been
provided to the individual must be kept on file by the employer.
(2) Licensed adult family home providers or employees who hold
individual food handler permits before June 30, 2005, must maintain
continuing education of one-half hour per year to maintain food
handling and safety training.
(3) Licensed adult family home providers or employees who hold
individual food handler permits before June 30, 2005, are not required
to renew the permit if the continuing education requirement in
subsection (2) of this section is met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 69.06 RCW
to read as follows:
Except for the food safety training standards adopted by the state
board of health pursuant to RCW 69.06.010, this chapter is not
applicable to persons who work in adult family homes and successfully
complete training and continuing education as required in section 1 of
this act.

--- END ---