BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that requiring all
patients who need to travel in a prone or supine position but are
medically stable, to be transported by ambulance can be overly
restrictive to individuals with disabilities. These individuals
frequently travel by means of reclining wheelchairs or devices commonly
referred to as banana carts. Expanding travel options for these
individuals will give them greater opportunities for mobility and
reduce their costs of travel.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.73.030 and 2000 c 93 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the
following words and phrases as used in this chapter shall have the
meanings indicated.
(1) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Committee" means the emergency medical services licensing and
certification advisory committee.
(4) "Ambulance" means a ground or air vehicle designed and used to
transport the ill and injured and to provide personnel, facilities, and
equipment to treat patients before and during transportation.
(5) "Aid vehicle" means a vehicle used to carry aid equipment and
individuals trained in first aid or emergency medical procedure.
(6) "Emergency medical technician" means a person who is authorized
by the secretary to render emergency medical care pursuant to RCW
18.73.081.
(7) "Ambulance service" means an organization that operates one or
more ambulances.
(8) "Aid service" means an organization that operates one or more
aid vehicles.
(9) "Emergency medical service" means medical treatment and care
which may be rendered at the scene of any medical emergency or while
transporting any patient in an ambulance to an appropriate medical
facility, including ambulance transportation between medical
facilities.
(10) "Communications system" means a radio and landline network
which provides rapid public access, coordinated central dispatching of
services, and coordination of personnel, equipment, and facilities in
an emergency medical services and trauma care system.
(11) "Prehospital patient care protocols" means the written
procedure adopted by the emergency medical services medical program
director which direct the out-of-hospital emergency care of the
emergency patient which includes the trauma care patient. These
procedures shall be based upon the assessment of the patient's medical
needs and what treatment will be provided for emergency conditions.
The protocols shall meet or exceed statewide minimum standards
developed by the department in rule as authorized in chapter 70.168
RCW.
(12) "Patient care procedures" means written operating guidelines
adopted by the regional emergency medical services and trauma care
council, in consultation with the local emergency medical services and
trauma care councils, emergency communication centers, and the
emergency medical services medical program director, in accordance with
statewide minimum standards. The patient care procedures shall
identify the level of medical care personnel to be dispatched to an
emergency scene, procedures for triage of patients, the level of trauma
care facility to first receive the patient, and the name and location
of other trauma care facilities to receive the patient should an
interfacility transfer be necessary. Procedures on interfacility
transfer of patients shall be consistent with the transfer procedures
in chapter 70.170 RCW.
(13) "Emergency medical services medical program director" means a
person who is an approved medical program director as defined by RCW
18.71.205(4).
(14) "Council" means the local or regional emergency medical
services and trauma care council as authorized under chapter 70.168
RCW.
(15) "Basic life support" means noninvasive emergency medical
services requiring basic medical treatment skills as defined in chapter
18.73 RCW.
(16) "Advanced life support" means invasive emergency medical
services requiring advanced medical treatment skills as defined by
chapter 18.71 RCW.
(17) "First responder" means a person who is authorized by the
secretary to render emergency medical care as defined by RCW 18.73.081.
(18) "Stretcher" means a cart designed to serve as a litter for the
transportation of a patient in a prone or supine position as is
commonly used in the ambulance industry, such as wheeled stretchers,
portable stretchers, stair chairs, solid backboards, scoop stretchers,
basket stretchers, or flexible stretchers. The term does not include
personal mobility aids that recline at an angle or remain at a flat
position, that are owned or leased for a period of at least one week by
the individual using the equipment or the individual's guardian or
representative, such as wheelchairs, personal gurneys, or
banana carts.

--- END ---