BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Social studies and civics is the integrated study of the social
sciences and humanities to promote involvement in civic affairs, and
because civic issues are multidisciplinary in nature, understanding
these issues and developing resolutions to them require
multidisciplinary education;
(2) The primary purpose of social studies and civics is to help
young people develop the ability to make informed and reasoned
decisions for the public good as citizens of a culturally diverse,
democratic society in a diverse world;
(3) Cross-cultural respect and understanding are fostered through
a culturally rich curriculum and instruction;
(4) Teaching Washington state tribal history and culture can be a
critical factor in successful educational experiences and promoting
cultural sensitivity for all students. The effect is particularly
strong for Native American students;
(5) Within the twenty-nine federally recognized tribes whose
traditional lands and territories reach across and beyond the
boundaries of Washington state, there are more than fifty tribal
nations represented with uniquely diverse histories, languages, and
cultures;
(6) The full and remarkable history of the state of Washington has
never been compiled nor taught in our state's education system;
(7) The potential to have a positive impact on student learning is
in part dependent upon the willingness of the local education agency to
collaborate with sovereign tribal governments; and
(8) Tribes possess the ultimate authority and expertise of their
history and culture.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2004 c 19 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements ((is encouraged to)) shall
include information on the culture, history, and government of the
American Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of
education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2015, or when a school district reviews or adopts
its social studies curriculum, whichever is sooner, the school district
must incorporate into its history and social studies curricula for each
grade in which the district offers instruction on Washington state and
United States history, the tribally and district-approved history and
culture curriculum of a federally recognized Indian tribe whose
reservation in whole or in part sits within the boundaries of the
school district. If a district has no portion of a tribal reservation
located within its boundaries, the district must incorporate into its
curricula the tribally and district-approved history and culture
curriculum of the federally recognized Indian tribes whose traditional
lands and territories are within a one hundred mile radius of the
school district. The program of Indian education within the office of
the superintendent of public instruction must assist school districts
in determining the location of tribal reservations and traditional
lands and territories.
(2) A school district must collaborate with the Indian tribe to
develop and implement the history and culture curriculum required under
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The tribal history and culture curriculum required under this
section may be taught only by a teacher who has completed that tribe's
first people's language and culture teacher certification program, or
by a teacher who has been approved by the respective tribe whose
curriculum is to be taught.

--- END ---