BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who sells at retail, supplies, handles, or transports
liquefied petroleum gas is not liable for civil damages for death,
injury, or loss of property caused by:
(1) The installation, alteration, modification, or repair of
liquefied petroleum gas equipment or a liquefied petroleum gas
appliance if the installation, alteration, modification, or repair was
done without the constructive knowledge and consent of the person
selling, supplying, handling, or transporting liquefied petroleum gas;
or
(2) The use of liquefied petroleum gas equipment or a liquefied
petroleum gas appliance in a manner or for a purpose other than that
for which the equipment or appliance was intended or foreseeable and
that could not reasonably have been expected.

--- END ---