BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Container" means all vessels, such as tanks, portable
cylinders, or drums, with a water capacity equal to or greater than two
hundred thirty-nine pounds, used for transporting or storing liquefied
petroleum gas.
(2) "Cylinder" means a portable container that is constructed to
United States department of transportation specifications that has less
than two hundred thirty-nine pounds of water capacity and that is
capable of storing liquified petroleum gas.
(3) "Liquefied petroleum gas" means any hydrocarbon or mixture of
hydrocarbons composed predominantly of propane, propyleme, butanes,
normal butane, isobutane, or butylenes.
(4) "Person" means a natural person, corporation, partnership,
firm, receiver, trustee, or any organized group of persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A person, other than the owner of a
liquified petroleum gas container or a person authorized in writing by
the owner, may not:
(a) Fill or refill a liquified petroleum gas container with
liquified petroleum gas or any other gas or compound; or
(b) Deface, erase, obliterate, cover up, or otherwise remove or
conceal any name, mark, initial, or device on a liquified petroleum gas
container.
(2) This section does not apply to cylinders.
(3) A violation of this chapter is a class 1 civil infraction under
chapter 7.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---