BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that rules enacted to
improve air quality in selected parts of eastern Washington created a
financial hardship for some growers of cereal grains and grass grown
for seed. As stated in RCW 70.94.656, it is "the policy of this state
...to promote the development of economical and practical alternate
agricultural practices to such burning...". The legislature provided
tax incentives in 2000 to assist such growers transition to alternative
management systems while further improving air quality. Because those
incentives have been difficult to administer, the legislature finds
that it is necessary to refine and narrow those incentives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to:
(a) Sales of the following machinery and equipment to qualified
farmers: No-till drills, minimum-till drills, chisels, plows,
sprayers, discs, cultivators, harrows, mowers, swathers, power rakes,
balers, bale handlers, shredders, transplanters, tractors two hundred
fifty horsepower and over designed to pull conservation equipment on
steep hills and highly erodible lands, and combine components limited
to straw choppers, chaff spreaders, and stripper headers; and
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to constructing hay
sheds for qualified farmers or to sales of tangible personal property
to qualified farmers that becomes an ingredient or component of hay
sheds during the course of the constructing.
(2)(a) No application is necessary for the tax exemption in this
section. A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility. The
department may request from a qualified farmer, copies of farm service
agency or crop insurance records for verification purposes, however
information obtained from farm service agency or crop insurance records
is deemed taxpayer information under RCW 82.32.330 and is not
disclosable.
(b) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Qualified farmer" means a farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213
who has more than fifty percent of his or her tillable acres in cereal
grains and/or field and turf grass grown for seed in qualified
counties.
(b) "Qualified counties" means those counties in Washington state
where cereal grain production within the county exceeds fifteen
thousand acres, and cereal grain production from nonirrigated acreage
exceeds cereal grain production from irrigated acreage.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.12.020 does not apply in respect to:
(a) The use of the following machinery and equipment by qualified
farmers: No-till drills, minimum-till drills, chisels, plows,
sprayers, discs, cultivators, harrows, mowers, swathers, power rakes,
balers, bale handlers, shredders, transplanters, tractors two hundred
fifty horsepower and over designed to pull conservation equipment on
steep hills and highly erodible lands, and combine components limited
to straw choppers, chaff spreaders, and stripper headers; and
(b) The use of tangible personal property that will be incorporated
as an ingredient or component of hay sheds by a qualified farmer,
during the course of constructing such hay sheds;
(2) The eligibility requirements, conditions, and definitions in
section 2 of this act apply to this section.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.08.840 (Exemptions -- Machinery, equipment, or structures
that reduce field burning) and 2000 c 40 s 2;
(2) RCW 82.12.840 (Exemptions -- Machinery, equipment, or structures
that reduce field burning) and 2003 c 5 s 14 & 2000 c 40 s 3;
(3) RCW 82.04.4459 (Credit -- Field burning reduction costs) and 2000
c 40 s 4; and
(4) RCW 84.36.580 (Property used to reduce field burning) and 2000
c 40 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---