BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.415.023 and 1997 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Credits earned by certificated instructional staff after
September 1, 1995, shall be eligible for application to the salary
schedule developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee only if the course content:
(a) Is consistent with a school-based plan for mastery of student
learning goals as referenced in RCW ((28A.320.205)) 28A.655.110, the
annual school performance report, for the school in which the
individual is assigned. The school-based plan shall address issues of
research-based assessment and instructional strategies for students
with dyslexia, dysgraphia, and language disabilities when addressing
learning goal one under RCW 28A.655.110, as applicable and appropriate
for individual certificated instructional staff;
(b) Pertains to the individual's current assignment or expected
assignment for the subsequent school year;
(c) Is necessary to obtain an endorsement as prescribed by the
state board of education;
(d) Is specifically required to obtain advanced levels of
certification; or
(e) Is included in a college or university degree program that
pertains to the individual's current assignment, or potential future
assignment, as a certified instructional staff.
(2) For the purpose of this section, "credits" mean college quarter
hour credits and equivalent credits for approved in-service, approved
continuing education, or approved internship hours computed in
accordance with RCW 28A.415.020.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules and
standards consistent with the limits established by this section for
certificated instructional staff.

--- END ---