BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that to aid in the
prevention of tragic deaths of children in the child welfare system,
those responsible for making placement decisions in cases of child
abuse or neglect should have the relevant evidence available to them to
aid them in making placement decisions that will best protect the
safety and welfare of the child.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.350 and 2001 c 52 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to facilitate communication of information needed to
serve the best interest of any child who is the subject of a dependency
case filed under this chapter, the department of social and health
services shall, consistent with state and federal law governing the
release of confidential information, establish guidelines, and shall
use those guidelines for the facilitation of communication of relevant
information among divisions, providers, the courts, the family,
caregivers, caseworkers, and others.
(2) In any case in which a child is removed from his or her home
based on allegations of child abuse or neglect, the following
information or documents must be provided in their entirety to persons
listed in subsection (3) of this section, when those individuals are
involved in a placement decision:
(a) Health care information regarding the child, including but not
limited to physician or other medical professional records, reports,
notes, or letters regarding the child;
(b) Substance abuse treatment records regarding the parent or the
child that may be relevant to the placement decision and then only if
treatment was ordered by the court or the subject of the record
consents to the release, and the release is consistent with state and
federal law;
(c) Mental health treatment records of the parent or the child that
may be relevant to the placement decision, if treatment was ordered by
the court or the subject of the record consents to the release, and the
release is consistent with state and federal law;
(d) Other information or documents relevant to the placement
decision.
(3) The information and documents listed in subsection (2) of this
section must be made available, in their entirety, to the following
persons, when applicable, prior to any review hearing or permanency
planning hearing in which any party is recommending that a child be
returned home:
(a) Any caseworker assigned to the case;
(b) Any supervisor of a caseworker assigned to the case;
(c) Any court hearing a matter relating to the dependency of the
child;
(d) Any member of a child protection team reviewing the case;
(e) Any guardian ad litem or legal counsel for the child;
(f) A parent, guardian, or custodian of the child or to the
parent's, guardian's, or custodian's counsel.

--- END ---