BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The uniform application of election laws,
rules, and procedures is of the paramount importance to the citizens of
this state. It is the intent of the legislature to make the position
of county auditor, and of the chief elections official, however named,
in all counties an elective office. This act therefore applies to all
counties, including without limitation counties operating under a home
rule charter.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.04.216 and 2004 c 271 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor, as chief elections officer, of each county
shall be ex officio the supervisor of all primaries and elections,
general or special, and it shall be the county auditor's duty to
provide places for holding such primaries and elections; to appoint the
precinct election officers and to provide for their compensation; to
provide the supplies and materials necessary for the conduct of
elections to the precinct election officers; and to publish and post
notices of calling such primaries and elections in the manner provided
by law. The notice of a primary held in an even-numbered year must
indicate that the office of precinct committee officer will be on the
ballot. The auditor shall also apportion to each city, town, or
district, and to the state of Washington in the odd-numbered year, its
share of the expense of such primaries and elections. This section
does not apply to general or special elections for any city, town, or
district that is not subject to RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330, but all
such elections must be held and conducted at the time, in the manner,
and by the officials (with such notice, requirements for filing for
office, and certifications by local officers) as provided and required
by the laws governing such elections.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.16.030 and 1996 c 108 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided elsewhere in this section, in every county there
shall be elected from among the qualified voters of the county a county
assessor, a county auditor, a county clerk, a county coroner, three
county commissioners, a county prosecuting attorney, a county sheriff
and a county treasurer, except that in each county with a population of
less than forty thousand no coroner shall be elected and the
prosecuting attorney shall be ex officio coroner. Whenever the
population of a county increases to forty thousand or more, the
prosecuting attorney shall continue as ex officio coroner until a
coroner is elected, at the next general election at which the office of
prosecuting attorney normally would be elected, and assumes office as
provided in RCW ((29.04.170)) 29A.20.040. In any county where the
population has once attained forty thousand people and a current
coroner is in office and a subsequent census indicates less than forty
thousand people, the county legislative authority may maintain the
office of coroner by resolution or ordinance. If the county
legislative authority has not passed a resolution or enacted an
ordinance to maintain the office of coroner, the elected coroner shall
remain in office for the remainder of the term for which he or she was
elected, but no coroner shall be elected at the next election at which
that office would otherwise be filled and the prosecuting attorney
shall be the ex officio coroner. In a county with a population of two
hundred fifty thousand or more, the county legislative authority may
replace the office of coroner with a medical examiner system and
appoint a medical examiner as specified in RCW 36.24.190. A noncharter
county may have five county commissioners as provided in RCW 36.32.010
and 36.32.055 through 36.32.0558.

--- END ---