BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.41.130 and 1982 c 163 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director of financial management, after consultation with other
interested or affected state agencies, shall establish overall policies
governing the acquisition, operation, management, maintenance, repair,
and disposal of, all passenger motor vehicles owned or operated by any
state agency. Such policies shall include but not be limited to a
definition of what constitutes authorized use of a state owned or
controlled passenger motor vehicle and other motor vehicles on official
state business. The definition shall include, but not be limited to,
the use of state-owned motor vehicles for commuter ride sharing so long
as the entire capital depreciation and operational expense of the
commuter ride-sharing arrangement is paid by the commuters. Any use
other than such defined use shall be considered as personal use.
The policies must also include verification of a valid Washington
state driver's license. Before an employee is allowed to use a vehicle
owned, leased, or rented by a state agency, the agency director, or the
director's designee, shall check with the department of licensing and
confirm that the Washington state driver's license in the person's
possession is valid. If the person does not have a valid license, use
of a state vehicle is prohibited.
Such policies shall also include the widest possible use of gasohol
and cost-effective alternative fuels in all motor vehicles owned or
operated by any state agency. As used in this section, "gasohol" means
motor vehicle fuel which contains more than nine and one-half percent
alcohol by volume.

--- END ---