BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commercial parking business" means the ownership, lease,
operation, or management of a commercial parking lot.
(2) "Commercial parking lot" means a covered or uncovered area with
or without stalls for the purpose of parking motor vehicles for a fee.
(3) "Event parking" means parking for which fees are charged
outside of the rates normally charged for hourly or other periodic
parking, or of the rates specified in any sign that may be posted on
the commercial parking lot under section 2(1) of this act.
(4) "Parking charge" means a monetary fee charged to a parking
customer for parking in a commercial parking lot, and includes fees
charged for monthly parking, fees charged for reserved parking, fees
charged for parking for a given amount of time, fees charged for event
parking, fees charged for unauthorized parking, late fees, and
collection agency fees.
(5) "Parking customer" means a person who parks a vehicle in a
commercial parking lot, and the registered owner of the vehicle; and
also means a person or entity that enters into an agreement, written or
otherwise, with a commercial parking business for parking services.
(6) "Unauthorized parking" means parking a vehicle in a commercial
parking lot in an area not designated for parking; in a reserved stall
or area without permission of the commercial parking business; in a
stall or area without paying the posted parking charge or without
paying a sufficient parking charge for the length of time the vehicle
is parked; in more than one stall simultaneously without paying the
appropriate parking charge for each stall; in a stall or area during
event parking without paying the event parking rate; or in a stall or
area without paying the parking charge provided in, or otherwise
without complying with, the terms of an agreement between the parking
customer and the commercial parking business.
(7) "Unauthorized vehicle" means a vehicle parked in a manner
constituting unauthorized parking.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2),
(3), and (4) of this section, a commercial parking business may not
charge a parking charge unless a sign is conspicuously posted on the
parking lot that clearly indicates:
(a) The times and circumstances in which a parking charge will be
charged;
(b) The amount of the parking charge, a schedule of hourly or daily
rates, or a schedule of parking charges for different circumstances or
durations; and
(c) The name, telephone number, and address of the commercial
parking business.
(2) A commercial parking business need not comply with subsection
(1) of this section to charge a parking charge with respect to a
specific parking customer when the commercial parking business has an
agreement, written or otherwise, with the parking customer for parking
services.
(3) A commercial parking business need not comply with subsection
(1) of this section to charge a parking charge with respect to a
specific parking customer when the information required under
subsection (1) of this section is contained in a ticket, card, or other
written memorandum provided to the parking customer upon entry into the
commercial parking lot.
(4) A commercial parking business need not comply with subsection
(1) of this section to charge a parking charge for event parking,
provided the parking charge for the event is clearly disclosed to the
parking customer upon entry to the commercial parking lot by an on-site
attendant or by conspicuous signage posted at the entrance to the
commercial parking lot.
(5) A sign is "conspicuously posted" for the purposes of this
chapter only when the sign: (a) Is clearly visible at all times,
including after dark, to a person seated in the driver's seat of a
vehicle fifty feet away; (b) contains no information other than as is
required under this section or RCW 46.55.070; and (c) is in compliance
with the rules adopted by the department of licensing under RCW
46.55.070.
(6) A commercial parking business shall neither authorize nor
allow:
(a) The impounding of any vehicle engaged in unauthorized parking,
unless:
(i) The unauthorized parking constitutes a traffic hazard or
obstruction;
(ii) A customer of the commercial parking business requests removal
of a vehicle that is engaging in unauthorized parking in the customer's
reserved stall at the time of the request; or
(iii) The commercial parking business has twice previously notified
the registered owner of the vehicle pursuant to section 3 of this act
that the vehicle had parked without authorization at a facility owned,
leased, operated, or managed by the commercial parking business; has
either collected or attempted to collect, and has not waived the
unauthorized parking fee in either previous instance; and has with at
least one of the notices provided pursuant to section 3 of this act
informed the registered owner in writing that the vehicle could be
subject to impound if the vehicle engaged in unauthorized parking at
any of the parking business's facilities again; or
(b) The immobilization, or impound-in-place, of a vehicle that is
engaging in unauthorized parking.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A parking customer who engages in
unauthorized parking shall be liable to the commercial parking business
for a reasonable parking charge if notice of the amount of the parking
charge is provided to such customer. If the customer fails to pay the
reasonable parking charge within fifteen days and after notice as
provided in this section, then the customer shall also be liable to the
commercial parking business for a late fee not to exceed twenty-five
dollars and for reasonable collection agency fees in the event the
account is assigned to a collection agency licensed under chapter 19.16
RCW. In addition, in the event of court action on the parking charges,
it shall be the burden of the party bringing the action to show, by a
preponderance of the evidence, both that the claimed unauthorized
parking occurred, including that payment of the posted parking charge
was not tendered, and that the commercial parking business was, at the
time of the alleged unauthorized parking, in compliance with section 2
of this act. The court shall award statutory costs and reasonable
attorneys' fees to the prevailing party in any action brought to
recover or defend against parking charges pursuant to this chapter.
(1) The following shall be presumed reasonable parking charges for
unauthorized parking:
(a) The posted parking charge that would be charged for the actual
time the vehicle remains parked at the commercial parking lot; or
(b) A fee not to exceed fifty dollars.
(2) If a reasonable parking charge for unauthorized parking is to
be charged in an amount other than the posted parking charge that would
be charged for the actual time the vehicle remains parked, then the
amount of the reasonable parking charge shall be stated in a sign or
signs that are conspicuously posted on the premises of the commercial
parking lot. In addition, written notice of the amount of the parking
charge, however calculated, and the date or dates of the unauthorized
parking, the license number of the unauthorized vehicle, and the name
and address of the commercial parking business shall be provided by any
of the following means:
(a) By affixing the notice to the windshield of the vehicle, or
otherwise conspicuously affixing it to the vehicle, while the vehicle
is still parked at the commercial parking lot;
(b) By mailing the notice via first class mail, postage prepaid, to
the registered owner of the vehicle within the later of ninety days
after the effective date of this act or ninety days after the date the
unauthorized parking occurred; or
(c) By delivering the notice to the registered owner of the vehicle
through any commercially reasonable means within the later of ninety
days after the effective date of this act or ninety days after the date
the unauthorized parking occurred.
(3) If a late fee is to be charged, then the amount of the late fee
shall be stated in a sign or signs that are conspicuously posted on the
premises of the commercial parking lot. In addition, written notice of
the amount of the fee and the date or dates of the unauthorized
parking, the license number of the unauthorized vehicle, and the name
and address of the commercial parking business shall be provided by any
of the following means:
(a) By affixing the notice to the windshield of the vehicle, or
otherwise conspicuously affixing it to the vehicle, while the vehicle
is still parked at the commercial parking lot;
(b) By mailing the notice via first class mail, postage prepaid, to
the registered owner of the vehicle within the later of ninety days
after the effective date of this act or ninety days after the date the
unauthorized parking occurred; or
(c) By delivering the notice to the registered owner of the vehicle
through any commercially reasonable means within the later of ninety
days after the effective date of this act or ninety days after the date
the unauthorized parking occurred.
(4) If a reasonable collection fee is to be charged, the commercial
parking business or its agent shall provide notice of the possibility
of assignment to collection of the fee, or the method of its
calculation, not less than fifteen days prior to assessment of such
fee. The amount to be paid for collection services shall be left to
the agreement of the commercial parking business and its collection
agency or agencies, but a contingent fee of the full amount of the debt
up to one hundred dollars and of fifty percent of the debt over one
hundred dollars per account is reasonable. The notice required under
this subsection can be given by any of the following means, and can be
combined with any other notice given to the parking customer:
(a) By including the notice in the sign or signs that are required
to be posted at the commercial parking lot or that are otherwise
conspicuously posted on the premises of the commercial parking lot;
(b) By affixing the notice to the windshield of the vehicle, or
otherwise conspicuously affixing it to the vehicle, while the vehicle
is still parked at the commercial parking lot;
(c) By mailing the notice via first class mail, postage prepaid, to
the registered owner of the vehicle within the later of ninety days
after the effective date of this act or ninety days after the date the
unauthorized parking occurred; or
(d) By delivering the notice to the registered owner of the vehicle
through any commercially reasonable means within the later of ninety
days after the effective date of this act or ninety days after the date
the unauthorized parking occurred.
(5) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a commercial parking
business or its agent from allowing more than fifteen days for a
parking customer to pay a reasonable parking charge prior to assessing
a late fee or a collection agency fee. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit a commercial parking business or its agent from discounting
any parking charges for payment within a specified time frame, or from
notifying a parking customer that any parking charges will be
discounted if paid within such time frame.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The registered owner of an unauthorized
vehicle in a commercial parking lot is presumed to be liable for
parking charges. It shall be an affirmative defense of the registered
owner, provable by a preponderance of the evidence, that the person who
parked the vehicle at the commercial parking lot was not authorized,
either actually or impliedly, by the registered owner to use or drive
the vehicle. Any notice provided under this chapter to the registered
owner of an unauthorized vehicle shall conclusively be presumed to have
been provided to every parking customer responsible for the parking
charges associated with the unauthorized vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Nothing in this chapter precludes the
right to commence action in a court under chapter 12.40 RCW for small
claims.
(2) This chapter shall apply to all parking charges incurred on or
after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---