BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.56.210 and 2000 c 69 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each onshore and offshore facility shall have a contingency
plan for the containment and cleanup of oil spills from the facility
into the waters of the state and for the protection of fisheries and
wildlife, shellfish beds, natural resources, and public and private
property from such spills. The department shall by rule adopt and
periodically revise standards for the preparation of contingency plans.
The department shall require contingency plans, at a minimum, to meet
the following standards:
(a) Include full details of the method of response to spills of
various sizes from any facility which is covered by the plan;
(b) Be designed to be capable in terms of personnel, materials, and
equipment, of promptly and properly, to the maximum extent practicable,
as defined by the department removing oil and minimizing any damage to
the environment resulting from a worst case spill;
(c) Provide a clear, precise, and detailed description of how the
plan relates to and is integrated into relevant contingency plans which
have been prepared by cooperatives, ports, regional entities, the
state, and the federal government;
(d) Provide procedures for early detection of oil spills and timely
notification of such spills to appropriate federal, state, and local
authorities under applicable state and federal law;
(e) State the number, training preparedness, and fitness of all
dedicated, prepositioned personnel assigned to direct and implement the
plan;
(f) Incorporate periodic training and drill programs to evaluate
whether personnel and equipment provided under the plan are in a state
of operational readiness at all times;
(g) Describe important features of the surrounding environment,
including fish and wildlife habitat, shellfish beds, environmentally
and archaeologically sensitive areas, and public facilities. The
departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, and natural resources, and
the office of archaeology and historic preservation, upon request,
shall provide information that they have available to assist in
preparing this description. The description of archaeologically
sensitive areas shall not be required to be included in a contingency
plan until it is reviewed and updated pursuant to subsection (9) of
this section;
(h) State the means of protecting and mitigating effects on the
environment, including fish, shellfish, marine mammals, and other
wildlife, and ensure that implementation of the plan does not pose
unacceptable risks to the public or the environment;
(i) Provide arrangements for the prepositioning of oil spill
containment and cleanup equipment and trained personnel at strategic
locations from which they can be deployed to the spill site to promptly
and properly remove the spilled oil;
(j) Provide arrangements for enlisting the use of qualified and
trained cleanup personnel to implement the plan;
(k) Provide for disposal of recovered spilled oil in accordance
with local, state, and federal laws;
(l) Until a spill prevention plan has been submitted pursuant to
RCW 90.56.200, state the measures that have been taken to reduce the
likelihood that a spill will occur, including but not limited to,
design and operation of a facility, training of personnel, number of
personnel, and backup systems designed to prevent a spill;
(m) State the amount and type of equipment available to respond to
a spill, where the equipment is located, and the extent to which other
contingency plans rely on the same equipment; and
(n) If the department has adopted rules permitting the use of
dispersants, the circumstances, if any, and the manner for the
application of the dispersants in conformance with the department's
rules.
(2)(a) The following shall submit contingency plans to the
department within six months after the department adopts rules
establishing standards for contingency plans under subsection (1) of
this section:
(i) Onshore facilities capable of storing one million gallons or
more of oil; and
(ii) Offshore facilities.
(b) Contingency plans for all other onshore and offshore facilities
shall be submitted to the department within eighteen months after the
department has adopted rules under subsection (1) of this section. The
department may adopt a schedule for submission of plans within the
eighteen-month period.
(3)(a) The owner or operator of a facility shall submit the
contingency plan for the facility.
(b) A person who has contracted with a facility to provide
containment and cleanup services and who meets the standards
established pursuant to RCW 90.56.240, may submit the plan for any
facility for which the person is contractually obligated to provide
services. Subject to conditions imposed by the department, the person
may submit a single plan for more than one facility.
(4) A contingency plan prepared for an agency of the federal
government or another state that satisfies the requirements of this
section and rules adopted by the department may be accepted by the
department as a contingency plan under this section. The department
shall ((assure)) ensure that to the greatest extent possible,
requirements for contingency plans under this section are consistent
with the requirements for contingency plans under federal law.
(5) In reviewing the contingency plans required by this section,
the department shall consider at least the following factors:
(a) The adequacy of containment and cleanup equipment, personnel,
communications equipment, notification procedures and call down lists,
response time, and logistical arrangements for coordination and
implementation of response efforts to remove oil spills promptly and
properly and to protect the environment;
(b) The nature and amount of vessel traffic within the area covered
by the plan;
(c) The volume and type of oil being transported within the area
covered by the plan;
(d) The existence of navigational hazards within the area covered
by the plan;
(e) The history and circumstances surrounding prior spills of oil
within the area covered by the plan;
(f) The sensitivity of fisheries, shellfish beds, and wildlife and
other natural resources within the area covered by the plan;
(g) Relevant information on previous spills contained in on-scene
coordinator reports prepared by the department; and
(h) The extent to which reasonable, cost-effective measures to
prevent a likelihood that a spill will occur have been incorporated
into the plan.
(6) The department shall approve a contingency plan only if it
determines that the plan meets the requirements of this section and
that, if implemented, the plan is capable, in terms of personnel,
materials, and equipment, of removing oil promptly and properly and
minimizing any damage to the environment.
(7) The approval of the contingency plan shall be valid for five
years. Upon approval of a contingency plan, the department shall
provide to the person submitting the plan a statement indicating that
the plan has been approved, the facilities or vessels covered by the
plan, and other information the department determines should be
included.
(8) An owner or operator of a facility shall notify the department
in writing immediately of any significant change of which it is aware
affecting its contingency plan, including changes in any factor set
forth in this section or in rules adopted by the department. The
department may require the owner or operator to update a contingency
plan as a result of these changes.
(9) The department by rule shall require contingency plans to be
reviewed, updated, if necessary, and resubmitted to the department at
least once every five years.
(10) Approval of a contingency plan by the department does not
constitute an express assurance regarding the adequacy of the plan nor
constitute a defense to liability imposed under this chapter or other
state law.

Sec. 2 RCW 88.46.060 and 2000 c 69 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each covered vessel shall have a contingency plan for the
containment and cleanup of oil spills from the covered vessel into the
waters of the state and for the protection of fisheries and wildlife,
shellfish beds, natural resources, and public and private property from
such spills. The department shall by rule adopt and periodically
revise standards for the preparation of contingency plans. The
department shall require contingency plans, at a minimum, to meet the
following standards:
(a) Include full details of the method of response to spills of
various sizes from any vessel which is covered by the plan;
(b) Be designed to be capable in terms of personnel, materials, and
equipment, of promptly and properly, to the maximum extent practicable,
as defined by the department, removing oil and minimizing any damage to
the environment resulting from a worst case spill;
(c) Provide a clear, precise, and detailed description of how the
plan relates to and is integrated into relevant contingency plans which
have been prepared by cooperatives, ports, regional entities, the
state, and the federal government;
(d) Provide procedures for early detection of spills and timely
notification of such spills to appropriate federal, state, and local
authorities under applicable state and federal law;
(e) State the number, training preparedness, and fitness of all
dedicated, prepositioned personnel assigned to direct and implement the
plan;
(f) Incorporate periodic training and drill programs to evaluate
whether personnel and equipment provided under the plan are in a state
of operational readiness at all times;
(g) Describe important features of the surrounding environment,
including fish and wildlife habitat, shellfish beds, environmentally
and archaeologically sensitive areas, and public facilities. The
departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, and natural resources, and
the office of archaeology and historic preservation, upon request,
shall provide information that they have available to assist in
preparing this description. ((If the office of marine safety adopted
rules for contingency plans prior to July 1, 1992, the description of
archaeologically sensitive areas shall only be required when the
department revises the rules for contingency plans after July 1,
1992.)) The description of archaeologically sensitive areas shall not
be required to be included in a contingency plan until it is reviewed
and updated pursuant to subsection (9) of this section;
(h) State the means of protecting and mitigating effects on the
environment, including fish, shellfish, marine mammals, and other
wildlife, and ensure that implementation of the plan does not pose
unacceptable risks to the public or the environment;
(i) Establish guidelines for the use of equipment by the crew of a
vessel to minimize vessel damage, stop or reduce any spilling from the
vessel, and, only when appropriate and only when vessel safety is
assured, contain and clean up the spilled oil;
(j) Provide arrangements for the prepositioning of spill
containment and cleanup equipment and trained personnel at strategic
locations from which they can be deployed to the spill site to promptly
and properly remove the spilled oil;
(k) Provide arrangements for enlisting the use of qualified and
trained cleanup personnel to implement the plan;
(l) Provide for disposal of recovered spilled oil in accordance
with local, state, and federal laws;
(m) Until a spill prevention plan has been submitted pursuant to
RCW 88.46.040, state the measures that have been taken to reduce the
likelihood that a spill will occur, including but not limited to,
design and operation of a vessel, training of personnel, number of
personnel, and backup systems designed to prevent a spill;
(n) State the amount and type of equipment available to respond to
a spill, where the equipment is located, and the extent to which other
contingency plans rely on the same equipment; and
(o) If the department has adopted rules permitting the use of
dispersants, the circumstances, if any, and the manner for the
application of the dispersants in conformance with the department's
rules.
(2)(a) The owner or operator of a tank vessel of three thousand
gross tons or more shall submit a contingency plan to the department
within six months after the department adopts rules establishing
standards for contingency plans under subsection (1) of this section.
(b) Contingency plans for all other covered vessels shall be
submitted to the department within eighteen months after the department
has adopted rules under subsection (1) of this section. The department
may adopt a schedule for submission of plans within the eighteen-month
period.
(3)(a) The owner or operator of a tank vessel or of the facilities
at which the vessel will be unloading its cargo, or a Washington state
nonprofit corporation established for the purpose of oil spill response
and contingency plan coverage and of which the owner or operator is a
member, shall submit the contingency plan for the tank vessel. Subject
to conditions imposed by the department, the owner or operator of a
facility may submit a single contingency plan for tank vessels of a
particular class that will be unloading cargo at the facility.
(b) The contingency plan for a cargo vessel or passenger vessel may
be submitted by the owner or operator of the cargo vessel or passenger
vessel, by the agent for the vessel resident in this state, or by a
Washington state nonprofit corporation established for the purpose of
oil spill response and contingency plan coverage and of which the owner
or operator is a member. Subject to conditions imposed by the
department, the owner, operator, or agent may submit a single
contingency plan for cargo vessels or passenger vessels of a particular
class.
(c) A person who has contracted with a covered vessel to provide
containment and cleanup services and who meets the standards
established pursuant to RCW 90.56.240, may submit the plan for any
covered vessel for which the person is contractually obligated to
provide services. Subject to conditions imposed by the department, the
person may submit a single plan for more than one covered vessel.
(4) A contingency plan prepared for an agency of the federal
government or another state that satisfies the requirements of this
section and rules adopted by the department may be accepted by the
department as a contingency plan under this section. The department
shall ((assure)) ensure that to the greatest extent possible,
requirements for contingency plans under this section are consistent
with the requirements for contingency plans under federal law.
(5) In reviewing the contingency plans required by this section,
the department shall consider at least the following factors:
(a) The adequacy of containment and cleanup equipment, personnel,
communications equipment, notification procedures and call down lists,
response time, and logistical arrangements for coordination and
implementation of response efforts to remove oil spills promptly and
properly and to protect the environment;
(b) The nature and amount of vessel traffic within the area covered
by the plan;
(c) The volume and type of oil being transported within the area
covered by the plan;
(d) The existence of navigational hazards within the area covered
by the plan;
(e) The history and circumstances surrounding prior spills of oil
within the area covered by the plan;
(f) The sensitivity of fisheries and wildlife, shellfish beds, and
other natural resources within the area covered by the plan;
(g) Relevant information on previous spills contained in on-scene
coordinator reports prepared by the director; and
(h) The extent to which reasonable, cost-effective measures to
prevent a likelihood that a spill will occur have been incorporated
into the plan.
(6) The department shall approve a contingency plan only if it
determines that the plan meets the requirements of this section and
that, if implemented, the plan is capable, in terms of personnel,
materials, and equipment, of removing oil promptly and properly and
minimizing any damage to the environment.
(7) The approval of the contingency plan shall be valid for five
years. Upon approval of a contingency plan, the department shall
provide to the person submitting the plan a statement indicating that
the plan has been approved, the vessels covered by the plan, and other
information the department determines should be included.
(8) An owner or operator of a covered vessel shall notify the
department in writing immediately of any significant change of which it
is aware affecting its contingency plan, including changes in any
factor set forth in this section or in rules adopted by the department.
The department may require the owner or operator to update a
contingency plan as a result of these changes.
(9) The department by rule shall require contingency plans to be
reviewed, updated, if necessary, and resubmitted to the department at
least once every five years.
(10) Approval of a contingency plan by the department does not
constitute an express assurance regarding the adequacy of the plan nor
constitute a defense to liability imposed under this chapter or other
state law.

--- END ---