BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The state can enhance the safety of our neighborhoods by
encouraging local governments to implement community planning policies
and environmental design concepts intended to reduce the opportunities
for crime and thus promote public security. Model approaches to crime
prevention through environmental and community planning processes,
such as those promoted by the crime prevention through environmental
design movement, provide an opportunity for our communities to reduce
crime at the neighborhood level. By making crime reduction a priority
in the planning and organization of our neighborhoods, communities can
begin to shape neighborhood environments in such a way as to discourage
criminal behavior;
(2) Local governments can utilize appropriate environmental design,
community programs, architectural concepts, land use policies, building
codes, zoning laws, and community development policies in order to
create physical environments conducive to increasing public safety. In
doing so, local governments can facilitate the creation of
neighborhoods that discourage criminal activity and enhance the sense
of personal safety to which our citizens are entitled; and
(3) To this end, local governments should be provided with the
opportunity to obtain assistance from the state for the purpose of
adopting or revising community planning processes to include concepts
and policies designed to achieve the goal of improving neighborhood
safety and security. This goal should be accomplished through
community-based pilot projects funded through matching funds to be
implemented through a grant process administered by the department of
community, trade, and economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Local government" means a city, code city, town, or county.
(3) "Safe neighborhood planning" means policies, community
programs, plans, ordinances, rules, regulations, and studies relating
to comprehensive planning for the creation of safe neighborhoods and
crime reduction through the implementation of innovative environmental
design and planning principles. Such planning may involve both public
and private development projects, and should involve coordination
between the public and private sectors. The components of safe
neighborhood planning may include, but are not limited to:
(a) The physical design of neighborhood environments, including
public and private infrastructure, buildings, streets, sidewalks,
parks, lighting, parking areas, and other facilities;
(b) The application of innovative planning and design concepts with
respect to the development of building codes and zoning regulations;
(c) Land use policies;
(d) The criteria for the approval of building permits;
(e) The various environmental design principles developed by the
crime prevention through environmental design movement; and
(f) Community crime prevention programs involving coordination
between local law enforcement agencies and property owners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Subject to funding made available for
this purpose, the department shall include in its program of technical
and financial assistance established in RCW 36.70A.190, two pilot
projects created by local governments to encourage and facilitate both
the study and implementation of safe neighborhood planning. Priority
should be given to programs:
(a) Aimed at facilitating improvements to existing private
properties for the purpose of crime prevention;
(b) Integrated into a comprehensive crime prevention and property
improvement plan; and
(c) Involving a partnership between the public and private sectors.
(2) The department shall include in its grant program under RCW
36.70A.190, direct financial assistance to local governments for the
implementation of two pilot projects for safe neighborhood planning
under this chapter. Such financial assistance shall be provided in the
form of matching funds which shall be distributed on a dollar-for-dollar basis.
(3) The grants made under this chapter may be expended for any
purpose directly related to the study, preparation, or implementation
of safe neighborhood planning by a local government, including the
conducting of studies and other data gathering, management activities,
the training of public employees, the retention of planning
consultants, and other related purposes. Local governments may allow
the participation of neighborhood associations in the study, planning,
or implementation of a safe neighborhood planning program.
(4) The department shall include in its program of technical
assistance, established under RCW 36.70A.190, the development of safe
neighborhood planning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall make a written report to the house of
representatives local government committee by December 1, 2005,
containing a description and evaluation of the pilot projects
implemented under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---