BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.43.535 and 2000 c 5 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is a need for a process for the fair consideration of
disputes relating to decisions by carriers that offer a health plan to
deny, modify, reduce, or terminate coverage of or payment for health
care services for an enrollee.
(2) An enrollee may seek review by a certified independent review
organization of a carrier's decision to deny, modify, reduce, or
terminate coverage of or payment for a health care service, after
exhausting the carrier's grievance process and receiving a decision
that is unfavorable to the enrollee, or after the carrier has exceeded
the timelines for grievances provided in RCW 48.43.530, without good
cause and without reaching a decision.
(3) The commissioner must establish and use a rotational registry
system for the assignment of a certified independent review
organization to each dispute. The system should be flexible enough to
ensure that an independent review organization has the expertise
necessary to review the particular medical condition or service at
issue in the dispute.
(4) Carriers must provide to the appropriate certified independent
review organization, not later than the third business day after the
date the carrier receives a request for review, a copy of:
(a) Any medical records of the enrollee that are relevant to the
review;
(b) Any documents used by the carrier in making the determination
to be reviewed by the certified independent review organization;
(c) Any documentation and written information submitted to the
carrier in support of the appeal; and
(d) A list of each physician or health care provider who has
provided care to the enrollee and who may have medical records relevant
to the appeal. Health information or other confidential or proprietary
information in the custody of a carrier may be provided to an
independent review organization, subject to rules adopted by the
commissioner.
(5) The medical reviewers from a certified independent review
organization will make determinations regarding the medical necessity
or appropriateness of, and the application of health plan coverage
provisions to, health care services for an enrollee. The medical
reviewers' determinations must be based upon their expert medical
judgment, after consideration of relevant medical, scientific, and
cost-effectiveness evidence, and medical standards of practice in the
state of Washington. Except as provided in this subsection, the
certified independent review organization must ensure that
determinations are consistent with the scope of covered benefits as
outlined in the medical coverage agreement. Medical reviewers may
override the health plan's medical necessity or appropriateness
standards if the standards are determined upon review to be
unreasonable or inconsistent with sound, evidence-based medical
practice.
(6) Once a request for an independent review determination has been
made, the independent review organization must proceed to a final
determination, unless requested otherwise by both the carrier and the
enrollee or the enrollee's representative.
(7) Carriers must timely implement the certified independent review
organization's determination, and must pay the certified independent
review organization's charges.
(8) When an enrollee requests independent review of a dispute under
this section, and the dispute involves a carrier's decision to modify,
reduce, or terminate an otherwise covered health service that an
enrollee is receiving at the time the request for review is submitted
and the carrier's decision is based upon a finding that the health
service, or level of health service, is no longer medically necessary
or appropriate, the carrier must continue to provide the health service
if requested by the enrollee until a determination is made under this
section. If the determination affirms the carrier's decision, the
enrollee may be responsible for the cost of the continued health
service.
(9) A certified independent review organization may notify the
office of the insurance commissioner if, based upon its review of
disputes under this section, it finds a pattern of substandard or
egregious conduct by a carrier.
(10)(a) The commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this
section after considering relevant standards adopted by national
managed care accreditation organizations.
(b) This section is not intended to supplant any existing authority
of the office of the insurance commissioner under this title to oversee
and enforce carrier compliance with applicable statutes and rules.
(11) This section does not apply to enrollees who are receiving
medical assistance from the department of social and health services
under Title 74 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.43.545 and 2000 c 5 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A health carrier shall adhere to the accepted standard of
care for health care providers under chapter 7.70 RCW when arranging
for the provision of medically necessary health care services to its
enrollees. A health carrier shall be liable for any and all harm
proximately caused by its failure to follow that standard of care when
the failure resulted in the denial, delay, or modification of the
health care service recommended for, or furnished to, an enrollee.
(b) A health carrier is also liable for damages under (a) of this
subsection for harm to an enrollee proximately caused by health care
treatment decisions that result from a failure to follow the accepted
standard of care made by its:
(i) Employees;
(ii) Agents; or
(iii) Ostensible agents who are acting on its behalf and over whom
it has the right to exercise influence or control or has actually
exercised influence or control.
(2) The provisions of this section may not be waived, shifted, or
modified by contract or agreement and responsibility for the provisions
shall be a duty that cannot be delegated. Any effort to waive, modify,
delegate, or shift liability for a breach of the duty established by
this section, through a contract for indemnification or otherwise, is
invalid.
(3) This section does not create any new cause of action, or
eliminate any presently existing cause of action, with respect to
health care providers and health care facilities that are included in
and subject to the provisions of chapter 7.70 RCW.
(4) It is a defense to any action or liability asserted under this
section against a health carrier that:
(a) The health care service in question is not a benefit provided
under the plan or the service is subject to limitations under the plan
that have been exhausted;
(b) Neither the health carrier, nor any employee, agent, or
ostensible agent for whose conduct the health carrier is liable under
subsection (1)(b) of this section, controlled, influenced, or
participated in the health care decision; or
(c) The health carrier did not deny or unreasonably delay payment
for treatment prescribed or recommended by a participating health care
provider for the enrollee.
(5) This section does not create any liability on the part of an
employer, an employer group purchasing organization that purchases
coverage or assumes risk on behalf of its employers, or a governmental
agency that purchases coverage on behalf of individuals and families.
The governmental entity established to offer and provide health
insurance to public employees, public retirees, and their covered
dependents under RCW 41.05.140 is subject to liability under this
section.
(6) Nothing in any law of this state prohibiting a health carrier
from practicing medicine or being licensed to practice medicine may be
asserted as a defense by the health carrier in an action brought
against it under this section.
(7)(a) A person may not maintain a cause of action under this
section against a health carrier unless:
(i) The affected enrollee has suffered substantial harm. As used
in this subsection, "substantial harm" means loss of life, loss or
significant impairment of limb, bodily or cognitive function,
significant disfigurement, or severe or chronic physical pain; and
(ii) The affected enrollee or the enrollee's representative has
exercised the opportunity established in RCW 48.43.535 to seek
independent review of the health care treatment decision or the
opportunity for an adjudicative proceeding if the enrollee is receiving
medical assistance under RCW 74.09.522.
(b) This subsection (7) does not prohibit an enrollee from pursuing
other appropriate remedies, including injunctive relief, a declaratory
judgment, or other relief available under law, if its requirements
place the enrollee's health in serious jeopardy.
(8) In an action against a health carrier, a finding that a health
care provider is an employee, agent, or ostensible agent of such a
health carrier shall not be based solely on proof that the person's
name appears in a listing of approved physicians or health care
providers made available to enrollees under a health plan.
(9) Any action under this section shall be commenced within three
years of the completion of the independent review process.
(10) This section does not apply to workers' compensation insurance
under Title 51 RCW.

--- END ---