BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.360 and 2003 c 167 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a beer and/or wine retailer's license to be
designated as a grocery store license to sell beer, strong beer, and/or
wine at retail in bottles, cans, and original containers, not to be
consumed upon the premises where sold, at any store other than the
state liquor stores.
(1) Licensees obtaining a written endorsement from the board may
also sell malt liquor in kegs or other containers capable of holding
less than five and one-half gallons of liquid.
(2) The annual fee for the grocery store license is one hundred
fifty dollars for each store.
(3)(a) Licensees under this section may provide, free or for a
charge, single-serving samples of two ounces or less, but no more than
a total of eight ounces, per customer for the purpose of sales
promotion if: (i) The primary commercial activity of the licensees is
the sale of grocery products; and (ii) the licensees operate fully
enclosed retail areas encompassing at least twelve thousand square
feet. Sampling activities of licensees under this section are subject
to RCW 66.28.010 and 66.28.040 and the cost of sampling under this
section may not be borne, directly or indirectly, by any manufacturer,
importer, or distributor of liquor.
(b) The service area and facilities must be located within the
licensee's fully enclosed retail area, and must be of a size and design
such that the licensee can observe and control persons in the area to
ensure that persons under twenty-one years of age and apparently
intoxicated persons cannot possess or consume alcohol. Customers must
remain in the service area while consuming samples.
(4) The board shall issue a restricted grocery store license
authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table wine, if the board
finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that the sale of strong
beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest. In
determining the public interest, the board shall consider at least the
following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or
fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;
(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's
establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or
fortified wine at the establishment; and
(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded
alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.
If the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of
strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest, it
shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as applicable.
The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or fortified
wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on those
persons objecting.
(((4))) (5) Licensees holding a grocery store license must maintain
a minimum three thousand dollar inventory of food products for human
consumption, not including pop, beer, strong beer, or wine.
(((5))) (6) Upon approval by the board, the grocery store licensee
may also receive an endorsement to permit the international export of
beer, strong beer, and wine.
(a) Any beer, strong beer, or wine sold under this endorsement must
have been purchased from a licensed beer or wine distributor licensed
to do business within the state of Washington.
(b) Any beer, strong beer, and wine sold under this endorsement
must be intended for consumption outside the state of Washington and
the United States and appropriate records must be maintained by the
licensee.
(c) A holder of this special endorsement to the grocery store
license shall be considered not in violation of RCW 66.28.010.
(d) Any beer, strong beer, or wine sold under this license must be
sold at a price no less than the acquisition price paid by the holder
of the license.
(e) The annual cost of this endorsement is five hundred dollars and
is in addition to the license fees paid by the licensee for a grocery
store license.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.371 and 2003 c 167 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a beer and/or wine retailer's license to be
designated as a beer and/or wine specialty shop license to sell beer,
strong beer, and/or wine at retail in bottles, cans, and original
containers, not to be consumed upon the premises where sold, at any
store other than the state liquor stores. Licensees obtaining a
written endorsement from the board may also sell malt liquor in kegs or
other containers capable of holding less than five and one-half gallons
of liquid. The annual fee for the beer and/or wine specialty shop
license is one hundred dollars for each store.
(2) Licensees under this section may provide, free or for a charge,
single-serving samples of two ounces or less ((to customers)), but no
more than a total of eight ounces, per customer for the purpose of
sales promotion. Sampling activities of licensees under this section
are subject to RCW 66.28.010 and 66.28.040 and the cost of sampling
under this section may not be borne, directly or indirectly, by any
manufacturer, importer, or distributor of liquor.
(3) The board shall issue a restricted beer and/or wine specialty
shop license, authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table
wine, if the board finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that
the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public
interest. In determining the public interest, the board shall consider
at least the following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or
fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;
(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's
establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or
fortified wine at the establishment; and
(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded
alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.
If the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of
strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest, it
shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as applicable.
The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or fortified
wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on those
persons objecting.
(4) Licensees holding a beer and/or wine specialty shop license
must maintain a minimum three thousand dollar wholesale inventory of
beer, strong beer, and/or wine.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The board may adopt rules to implement this act. The rules shall
include a requirement that employees of licensees under RCW 66.24.360
and 66.24.371 who are involved in sampling activities complete a
board-approved limited alcohol server training program that addresses
only those subjects reasonably related to the licensees' sampling
activities.

--- END ---