BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
The fish and wildlife enforcement reward account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from criminal wildlife
penalty assessments under RCW 77.15.420 must be deposited into the
account. The department may accept money or personal property from
persons under conditions requiring the property or money to be used
consistent with the intent of expenditures from the fish and wildlife
enforcement reward account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for investigation and prosecution of fish and wildlife offenses,
to provide rewards to persons informing the department about violations
of this title and rules adopted under this title, and for other valid
enforcement uses as determined by the commission. Only the director or
the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.15.070 and 2000 c 107 s 231 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Fish and wildlife officers and ex officio fish and wildlife
officers may seize without warrant boats, airplanes, vehicles,
motorized implements, conveyances, gear, appliances, or other articles
they have probable cause to believe have been held with intent to
violate or used in violation of this title or rule of the commission or
director. However, fish and wildlife officers or ex officio fish and
wildlife officers may not seize any item or article, other than for
evidence, if under the circumstances, it is reasonable to conclude that
the violation was inadvertent. The property seized is subject to
forfeiture to the state under this section regardless of ownership.
Property seized may be recovered by its owner by depositing with the
department or into court a cash bond or equivalent security equal to
the value of the seized property but not more than ((twenty-five)) one
hundred thousand dollars. Such cash bond or security is subject to
forfeiture in lieu of the property. Forfeiture of property seized
under this section is a civil forfeiture against property and is
intended to be a remedial civil sanction.
(2) In the event of a seizure of property under this section,
jurisdiction to begin the forfeiture proceedings shall commence upon
seizure. Within fifteen days following the seizure, the seizing
authority shall serve a written notice of intent to forfeit property on
the owner of the property seized and on any person having any known
right or interest in the property seized. Notice may be served by any
method authorized by law or court rule, including service by certified
mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail is deemed complete
upon mailing within the fifteen-day period following the seizure.
(3) Persons claiming a right of ownership or right to possession of
property are entitled to a hearing to contest forfeiture. Such a claim
shall specify the claim of ownership or possession and shall be made in
writing and served on the director within forty-five days of the
seizure. If the seizing authority has complied with notice
requirements and there is no claim made within forty-five days, then
the property shall be forfeited to the state.
(4) If any person timely serves the director with a claim to
property, the person shall be afforded an opportunity to be heard as to
the person's claim or right. The hearing shall be before the director
or director's designee, or before an administrative law judge appointed
under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that a person asserting a claim or
right may remove the matter to a court of competent jurisdiction if the
aggregate value of the property seized is more than five thousand
dollars. The department may settle a person's claim of ownership prior
to the administrative hearing.
(5) The hearing to contest forfeiture and any subsequent appeal
shall be as provided for in chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative
procedure act. The seizing authority has the burden to demonstrate
that it had reason to believe the property was held with intent to
violate or was used in violation of this title or rule of the
commission or director. The person contesting forfeiture has the
burden of production and proof by a preponderance of evidence that the
person owns or has a right to possess the property and:
(a) That the property was not held with intent to violate or used
in violation of this title; or
(b) If the property is a boat, airplane, or vehicle, that the
illegal use or planned illegal use of the boat, airplane, or vehicle
occurred without the owner's knowledge or consent, and that the owner
acted reasonably to prevent illegal uses of such boat, airplane, or
vehicle.
(6) A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a perfected security
interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured
party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission.
No security interest in seized property may be perfected after seizure.
(7) If seized property is forfeited under this section the
department may retain it for official use unless the property is
required to be destroyed, or upon application by any law enforcement
agency of the state, release such property to the agency for the use of
enforcing this title, or sell such property, and deposit the proceeds
to the wildlife fund, as provided for in RCW 77.12.170.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.15.370 and 2001 c 253 s 38 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful recreational fishing in the
first degree if:
(a) The person takes, possesses, or retains two times or more than
the bag limit or possession limit of fish or shellfish allowed by any
rule of the director or commission setting the amount of food fish,
game fish, or shellfish that can be taken, possessed, or retained for
noncommercial use;
(b) The person fishes in a fishway; ((or))
(c) The person shoots, gaffs, snags, snares, spears, dipnets, or
stones fish or shellfish in state waters, or possesses fish or
shellfish taken by such means, unless such means are authorized by
express rule of the commission or director; or
(d) The person fishes for or possesses a fish listed as threatened
or endangered in 50 C.F.R. Sec. 17.11 (2002), unless fishing for or
possession of such fish is specifically allowed under federal or state
law.
(2) Unlawful recreational fishing in the first degree is a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.15.380 and 2001 c 253 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful recreational fishing in the
second degree if the person fishes for, takes, possesses, or harvests
fish or shellfish and:
(a) The person does not have and possess the license or the catch
record card required by chapter 77.32 RCW for such activity; or
(b) The action violates any rule of the commission or the director
regarding seasons, bag or possession limits but less than two times the
bag or possession limit, closed areas, closed times, or any other rule
addressing the manner or method of fishing or possession of fish,
except for:
(i) Use of a net to take fish as provided for in RCW 77.15.580; or
(ii) Fishing for or possession of a fish listed as threatened or
endangered in 50 C.F.R. Sec. 17.11 (2002), unless fishing for or
possession of such fish is specifically allowed under federal or state
law.
(2) Unlawful recreational fishing in the second degree is a
misdemeanor.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.15.410 and 1999 c 258 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of big game in the
second degree if the person:
(a) Hunts for, takes, or possesses big game and the person does not
have and possess all licenses, tags, or permits required under this
title;
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or director regarding
seasons, bag or possession limits, closed areas including game
reserves, closed times, or any other rule governing the hunting,
taking, or possession of big game; or
(c) Possesses big game taken during a closed season for that big
game or taken from a closed area for that big game.
(2) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of big game in the first
degree if the person was previously convicted of any crime under this
title involving unlawful hunting, killing, possessing, or taking big
game, and within five years of the date that the prior conviction was
entered the person:
(a) Hunts for big game and does not have and possess all licenses,
tags, or permits required under this title;
(b) Acts in violation of any rule of the commission or director
regarding seasons, bag or possession limits, closed areas including
game reserves, or closed times; or
(c) Possesses big game taken during a closed season for that big
game or taken from a closed area for that big game.
(3)(a) Unlawful hunting of big game in the second degree is a gross
misdemeanor. Upon conviction of an offense involving killing or
possession of big game taken during closed season or in excess of the
bag or possession limit, the department shall revoke all hunting
licenses and tags and order a suspension of hunting privileges for two
years.
(b) Unlawful hunting of big game in the first degree is a class C
felony. Upon conviction, the department shall revoke all hunting
licenses or tags ((involved in the crime)) and the department shall
order the person's hunting privileges suspended for ((two)) ten years.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.15.420 and 1998 c 190 s 62 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a person is convicted of violating RCW 77.15.410 and that
violation results in the death of wildlife listed in this section, the
court shall require payment of the following amounts for each animal
killed or possessed. This shall be a criminal wildlife penalty
assessment that shall be paid to the clerk of the court and distributed
each month to the state treasurer for deposit in the ((public safety
and education)) fish and wildlife enforcement reward account created in
section 1 of this act.

(2) For the purposes of subsection (1)(a) through (d) of this
section, except for an accidental shooting under subsection (1)(b) of
this section, if the shooter: (a) Reports the shooting to the
department within twenty-four hours; (b) admits guilt; and (c)
surrenders the animal, then the shooter is required to pay only
one-half of the fine required under subsection (1)(a) through (d) of
this section, and have the shooter's hunting privileges revoked for one
year.
(3) No forfeiture of bail may be less than the amount of the bail
established for hunting during closed season plus the amount of the
criminal wildlife penalty assessment in subsection (1) of this section.
(((3))) (4) For the purpose of this section a "trophy animal" is:
(a) A buck deer with four or more antler points on both sides, not
including eyeguards;
(b) A bull elk with five or more antler points on both sides, not
including eyeguards; or
(c) A mountain sheep with a horn curl of three-quarter curl or
greater.
For purposes of this subsection, "eyeguard" means an antler
protrusion on the main beam of the antler closest to the eye of the
animal.
(((4))) (5) If two or more persons are convicted of illegally
possessing wildlife in subsection (1) of this section, the criminal
wildlife penalty assessment shall be imposed on them jointly and
separately.
(((5))) (6) The criminal wildlife penalty assessment shall be
imposed regardless of and in addition to any sentence, fines, or costs
otherwise provided for violating any provision of this title. The
criminal wildlife penalty assessment shall be included by the court in
any pronouncement of sentence and may not be suspended, waived,
modified, or deferred in any respect. This section may not be
construed to abridge or alter alternative rights of action or remedies
in equity or under common law or statutory law, criminal or civil.
(((6))) (7) A defaulted criminal wildlife penalty assessment may be
collected by any means authorized by law for the enforcement of orders
of the court or collection of a fine or costs, including but not
limited to vacation of a deferral of sentencing or vacation of a
suspension of sentence.
(((7))) (8) A person assessed a criminal wildlife penalty
assessment under this section shall have his or her hunting license
revoked and all hunting privileges suspended until the penalty
assessment is paid through the registry of the court in which the
penalty assessment was assessed.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.15.450 and 1998 c 190 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of spotlighting big game in the second
degree if the person hunts big game with the aid of a spotlight or
other artificial light while in possession or control of a firearm, bow
and arrow, or cross bow.
(2) A person is guilty of spotlighting big game in the first degree
if:
(a) The person has any prior conviction for gross misdemeanor or
felony for a crime under this title involving big game including but
not limited to subsection (1) of this section or RCW 77.15.410; and
(b) Within ten years of the date that such prior conviction was
entered the person commits the act described by subsection (1) of this
section.
(3)(a) Spotlighting big game in the second degree is a gross
misdemeanor. Upon conviction, the department shall revoke all hunting
licenses and tags and order a suspension of the person's hunting
privileges for two years.
(b) Spotlighting big game in the first degree is a class C felony.
Upon conviction, the department shall order suspension of all
privileges to hunt wildlife for a period of ((two)) ten years.

--- END ---