BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that as of 2000, child care workers in the
state earned an average hourly wage of eight dollars and twenty-two
cents, only fifty-eight percent received medical insurance through
employers, only sixty-six percent received paid sick leave, and only
seventy-three percent received paid vacation. The legislature further
finds that low wages for child care workers create a barrier for
individuals entering the profession, result in child care workers
leaving the profession in order to earn a living wage in another
profession, and make it difficult for child care workers to afford
professional education and training. As a result, the availability of
quality child care in the state suffers.
The legislature intends to increase wages to child care workers
through establishing a child care career and wage ladder that provides
increased wages for child care workers based on their work experience,
level of responsibility, and education. To the extent practicable
within available funds, this child care career and wage ladder shall
mirror the successful child care career and wage ladder pilot project
operated by the state between 2000 and 2003. While it is the intent of
the legislature to establish the vision of a statewide child care
career and wage ladder that will enhance employment quality and
stability for child care workers, the legislature also recognizes that
funding allocations will determine the extent of statewide
implementation of a child care career and wage ladder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this
specific purpose, the division of child care and early learning in the
department of social and health services shall establish a child care
career and wage ladder in licensed child care centers that meet the
following criteria: (a) At least ten percent of child care slots are
dedicated to children whose care is subsidized by the state or any
political subdivision thereof or any local government; (b) the center
agrees to adopt the child care career and wage ladder, which, at a
minimum, shall be at the same pay schedule as existed in the previous
child care career and wage ladder pilot project; and (c) the center
meets further program standards as established by rule pursuant to
section 4 of this act.
The child care career and wage ladder shall include wage increments
for levels of education, years of relevant experience, levels of work
responsibility, relevant early childhood education credits, and
relevant requirements in the state training and registry system.
(2) The division shall establish procedures for the allocation of
funds to implement the child care career and wage ladder among child
care centers meeting the criteria identified in subsection (1) of this
section. In developing these procedures, the division shall:
(a) Review past efforts or administration of the child care career
and wage ladder pilot project in order to take advantage of any
findings, recommendations, or administrative practices that contributed
to that pilot project's success;
(b) Consult with stakeholders, including organizations representing
child care teachers and providers, in developing an allocation formula
that incorporates consideration of geographic and demographic
distribution of child care centers adopting the child care career and
wage ladder; and
(c) Develop a system for prioritizing child care centers interested
in adopting the child care career and wage ladder that is based on the
criteria identified in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (2) of this
section, child care centers meeting the criteria in subsection (1) of
this section located in urban areas of the department of social and
health services region one shall receive a minimum of fifteen percent
of the funds allocated through the child care career and wage ladder,
and of these centers, child care centers meeting the criteria in
subsection (1) of this section participating in the department of
social and health services Spokane tiered reimbursement pilot project
shall have first priority for child care career and wage ladder
funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
Child care centers adopting the child care career and wage ladder
established pursuant to section 2 of this act shall increase wages for
child care workers who have earned a high school diploma or GED
certificate, gain additional years of experience, or accept increasing
levels of responsibility in providing child care, in accordance with
the child care career and wage ladder. The department of social and
health services shall pay wage increments for child care workers
employed by child care centers adopting the child care career and wage
ladder established pursuant to section 2 of this act who earn early
childhood education credits or meet relevant requirements in the state
training and registry system, in accordance with the child care career
and wage ladder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The division of child care and early learning in the department of
social and health services shall establish further program standards by
rule. The division of child care and early learning shall also study
the impact of the child care career and wage ladder on the quality of
child care and the child care work force, and report its findings to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The sum of five million dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund
to the department of social and health services for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2006, to carry out the purposes of this act.
(2) The sum of five million dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the department of
social and health services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, to
carry out the purposes of this act.

--- END ---