BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.45.010 and 2003 c 86 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person that files an application for a
license under this chapter, including the applicant's sole proprietor,
owners, directors, officers, partners, members, and controlling
persons.
(2) "Borrower" means a natural person who receives a small loan.
(3) "Broker" means a person engaged in brokering as defined in
subsection (4) of this section.
(4) "Brokering" means receiving compensation or gain of any kind,
directly or indirectly, in connection with (a) assisting a consumer in
applying for or obtaining a small loan from a licensee or financial
institution, (b) referring a consumer to a licensee or financial
institution for the purpose of obtaining a small loan, or (c)
advertising or soliciting for or on behalf of a licensee or financial
institution, or otherwise holding oneself out to the public as being
engaged in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection.
(5) "Business day" means any day that the licensee is open for
business in at least one physical location.
(((4))) (6) "Check" means the same as defined in RCW 62A.3-104(f)
and, for purposes of conducting the business of making small loans,
includes other electronic forms of payment, including stored value
cards, internet transfers, and automated clearing house transactions.
(((5))) (7) "Check casher" means an individual, partnership,
unincorporated association, or corporation that, for compensation,
engages, in whole or in part, in the business of cashing checks,
drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper serving the same
purpose.
(((6))) (8) "Check seller" means an individual, partnership,
unincorporated association, or corporation that, for compensation,
engages, in whole or in part, in the business of or selling checks,
drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper serving the same
purpose.
(((7))) (9) "Collateral" means the same as defined in chapter
62A.9A RCW.
(((8))) (10) "Controlling person" means a person owning or
controlling ten percent or more of the total outstanding shares of the
applicant or licensee, if the applicant or licensee is a corporation,
and a member who owns ten percent or more of a limited liability
company or limited liability partnership.
(((9))) (11) "Default" means the borrower's failure to repay the
small loan in compliance with the terms contained in the small loan
agreement or note or failure to make payments in compliance with a loan
payment plan.
(((10))) (12) "Director" means the director of financial
institutions.
(((11))) (13) "Financial institution" means a commercial bank,
savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union.
(((12))) (14) "Licensee" means a check casher or seller licensed by
the director to engage in business in accordance with this chapter.
For purposes of the enforcement powers of this chapter, including the
power to issue cease and desist orders under RCW 31.45.110, "licensee"
also means a check casher or seller who fails to obtain the license
required by this chapter.
(((13))) (15) "Origination date" means the date upon which the
borrower and the licensee initiate a small loan transaction.
(((14))) (16) "Outstanding principal balance" of a small loan means
any of the principal amount that has not been paid by the borrower.
(((15))) (17) "Paid" means that moment in time when the licensee
deposits the borrower's check or accepts cash for the full amount owing
on a valid small loan.
(((16))) (18) "Person" means an individual, partnership,
association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership,
trust, corporation, and any other legal entity.
(((17))) (19) "Principal" means the loan proceeds advanced for the
benefit of the borrower in a small loan, excluding any fee or interest
charge.
(((18))) (20) "Rescission" means annulling the loan contract and,
with respect to the small loan contract, returning the borrower and the
licensee to their financial condition prior to the origination date of
the loan.
(((19))) (21) "Servicer" means a person who engages in the
servicing of a small loan for a licensee or financial institution.
(22) "Servicing" means to service a small loan, or a refinance of
a small loan, for a licensee or financial institution, including
collection activities, processing payments, and arranging with the
consumer for payment of the loan.
(23) "Small loan" means a loan of up to the maximum amount and for
a period of time up to the maximum term specified in RCW 31.45.073.
(((20))) (24) "Successive loans" means a series of loans made by
the same licensee to the same borrower in such a manner that no more
than three business days separate the termination date of any one loan
and the origination date of any other loan in the series.
(((21))) (25) "Termination date" means the date upon which payment
for the small loan transaction is due or paid to the licensee,
whichever occurs first.
(((22))) (26) "Total of payments" means the principal amount of the
small loan plus all fees or interest charged on the loan.
(((23))) (27) "Trade secret" means the same as defined in RCW
19.108.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 31.45.079 and 2003 c 86 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person, other than a financial institution, may not engage in the
business of brokering, servicing, or making small loans as an agent,
broker, or servicer for a licensee or ((exempt entity)) financial
institution without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to a check
casher or check seller license under this chapter. A person, other
than a financial institution, that is an agent, broker, or servicer of
a licensee ((or exempt entity)) engaged in the business of making small
loans is subject to this chapter. A person, other than a financial
institution, that is an agent, broker, or servicer of a financial
institution engaged in the business of making small loans is also
subject to this chapter. To the extent that federal law preempts the
applicability of any part of this chapter, all other parts of this
chapter remain in effect.

--- END ---