BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.128.010 and 2001 c 319 s 6 and 2001 c 319 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adult family home" means a residential home in which a person
or persons provide personal care, special care, room, and board to more
than one but not more than ((six)) eight adults who are not related by
blood or marriage to the person or persons providing the services.
(2) "Provider" means any person who is licensed under this chapter
to operate an adult family home. For the purposes of this section,
"person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, association,
or limited liability company.
(3) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(4) "Resident" means an adult in need of personal or special care
in an adult family home who is not related to the provider.
(5) "Adults" means persons who have attained the age of eighteen
years.
(6) "Home" means an adult family home.
(7) "Imminent danger" means serious physical harm to or death of a
resident has occurred, or there is a serious threat to resident life,
health, or safety.
(8) "Special care" means care beyond personal care as defined by
the department, in rule.
(9) "Capacity" means the maximum number of persons in need of
personal or special care permitted in an adult family home at a given
time. This number shall include related children or adults in the home
and who received special care.
(10) "Resident manager" means a person employed or designated by
the provider to manage the adult family home.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All adult family homes licensed for more than six clients shall
install smoke detectors. Smoke detectors must be installed in each
sleeping room and installed at a central point in a corridor or area
which gives access to each separate sleeping room. All smoke detectors
located inside adult family homes shall be interconnected so as to
sound an alarm from all smoke detectors located in the home when any
one detector is activated.
(2) Adult family homes licensed for more than six clients shall
have their interconnected smoke detectors monitored by a central
monitoring company and the adult family home provider shall maintain
the central monitoring service so long as the home is licensed as an
adult family home.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.128.175 and 1997 c 392 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, these
definitions shall apply throughout this section and RCW 35.63.140,
35A.63.149, 36.70.755, 35.22.680, and 36.32.560:
(a) "Adult family home" means a regular family abode in which a
person or persons provides personal care, special care, room, and board
to more than one but not more than ((six)) eight adults who are not
related by blood or marriage to the person or persons providing the
services.
(b) "Residential care facility" means a facility that cares for at
least five, but not more than fifteen functionally disabled persons,
that is not licensed pursuant to chapter 70.128 RCW.
(c) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(2) An adult family home shall be considered a residential use of
property for zoning and public and private utility rate purposes.
Adult family homes shall be a permitted use in all areas zoned for
residential or commercial purposes, including areas zoned for single
family dwellings.

--- END ---