BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The illegal discharge of pollutants to Washington's air and
water, and the improper management and disposal of solid and hazardous
wastes in Washington's environment can create significant risks to
public health and environmental quality;
(b) Washington's businesses bear much of the costs incurred when
polluters fail to clean up environmental contamination;
(c) A polluting business may gain an economic advantage that is
unfair to businesses that are in compliance with emission limitations,
waste management standards, and other environmental quality
requirements;
(d) The protection of Washington's environment from unnecessary
degradation is a matter of public trust;
(e) The public has a right to clean air and water and to a healthy
environment; and
(f) Because of the importance of these resources to the health and
welfare of Washington citizens, there must be disclosure of pertinent
environmental compliance information by those persons submitting
applications and persons with operational responsibility or ownership
of the activity to be covered by the permit.
(2) It is the purpose of this chapter to ensure that the state has
adequate information about the environmental quality compliance history
of applicants for the purpose of reviewing the application and making
decisions on the application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Environmental quality permit" means the following permits or
approvals, or the renewal of a permit or approval, required from the
department of ecology, department of fish and wildlife, department of
natural resources, or a regional air pollution control agency:
(a) Air operating permits, registration of air contaminant sources,
and new source reviews required by chapter 70.94 RCW;
(b) Water quality discharge permits required by chapter 90.48 RCW;
(c) Water quality certifications by the department of ecology under
section 401 of the federal water pollution control amendments, 33
U.S.C. Sec. 1341;
(d) Surface water and ground water withdrawal permits required by
chapters 90.03 and 90.44 RCW;
(e) Hazardous waste management, treatment, storage, or disposal
permits required by chapter 70.105 RCW;
(f) Approvals required from the department of ecology for metals
mining and milling operations under chapter 78.56 RCW;
(g) Hydraulic project approvals required by the department of fish
and wildlife under chapter 77.55 RCW; and
(h) Surface mining reclamation permits by the department of natural
resources under chapter 78.44 RCW.
(2) "Responsible official" means the official charged by law with
making a decision upon an environmental quality permit application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) An applicant for an environmental
quality permit shall include in the application the names and business
addresses of:
(a) All corporate officers of the applicant and all personnel
responsible for overall operation of the activities that are the
subject of the application;
(b) Businesses with whom the applicant has agreed to assume
operational responsibilities for activities that are the subject of the
application, and the names by which the businesses operated under
within the past ten years;
(c) Each general or limited partner where the applicant is a
partnership;
(d) Each person owning or controlling ten percent or more of the
assets of the applicant's assets; and
(e) All subsidiary and parent companies of the applicant.
(2) The application shall also include the following information as
to those persons or businesses described in subsection (1) of this
section, for the ten years preceding the date of the application:
(a) All permit revocations, criminal citations, arrests,
convictions, or civil or administrative penalties assessed, that relate
directly to the violation of an environmental quality statute, rule,
regulation, permit, license, approval, or order, whether in the state
of Washington, another state, or another country, and a brief
description of the disposition of the matter. The description must
also address public funds that were expended to restore or remediate
damage or the threat of damage caused by the violation, except where
such funds were voluntarily recovered without litigation;
(b) Any felony conviction, and any other criminal conviction
involving harm to environmental quality or a violation of environmental
quality standards that resulted in a penalty or fine of more than five
thousand dollars or a sentence longer than seven days, without regard
to whether such penalty, fine, or sentence was suspended;
(c) A description of any civil judgment awarding damages for harm
to environmental quality or public health, and all settlements of
damage claims for environmental harm; and
(d) A description of all pending criminal complaints or charges
alleging the violation of any state or federal environmental quality
law.
(3) This section does not apply where the applicant is a unit of
local or state government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Applicants for an environmental quality
permit have a continuing duty to respond to requests for additional
information from the agency processing the permit application where the
request relates to information required by section 3 of this act. The
agency is authorized to investigate and to verify the accuracy of the
information submitted in the application.
(2) The applicant shall promptly supplement the information
provided if the applicant becomes aware of additional required
information or if changed circumstances render the submitted
information inaccurate or incomplete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Except as provided in this section, all
information provided under section 3 of this act shall be maintained by
the agency reviewing the application as public information and subject
to disclosure as public records under chapter 42.17 RCW. Information
exempt from public inspection and copying under RCW 42.17.310 shall not
be otherwise disclosable under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The responsible official must deny an
environmental quality permit application if:
(a) The applicant or a person acting at the direction of the
applicant intentionally withholds or misrepresents material information
required to be submitted under section 3 of this act;
(b) The applicant or a person acting at the direction of the
applicant has offered or conferred any benefit personally to an
employee of the state of a local air pollution control agency in the
expectation that such offer will result in or contribute to an approval
of the application;
(c) The applicant or any person listed in the information provided
in section 3(1) of this act has been convicted of a felony in
Washington state or a criminal conviction in another state or country
where the violation is punishable in Washington state as a felony, and
the conviction is based upon the violation of an environmental quality
statute, rule, regulation, permit, license, approval, or order.
(2) The responsible official may deny an application for an
environmental quality permit, or may approve the application with the
imposition of conditions to ensure compliance with the permit and
applicable laws, if:
(a) The applicant has failed to pay a penalty or judgment within
the past ten years obtained by a state or federal agency for the
violation by the applicant of an environmental quality statute, rule,
regulation, permit, license, approval, or order;
(b) An environmental quality permit issued in this state or a
comparable permit issued by another state or a federal agency to the
applicant has been revoked within the past ten years; or
(c) The applicant has defaulted on a corporate guarantee,
inadequately funded a reserve or trust account established for
environmental remediation purposes, or forfeited a bond obtained in
connection with an environmental quality permit issued in this state or
a comparable permit issued by another state or an agency of the federal
government.
(3) This section is in addition to any other applicable statute
establishing criteria guiding the responsible official's decision on an
environmental quality permit application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---