BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that current processes
for the siting of essential public facilities fail to ensure that the
costs and benefits of the facility are distributed in a fair and
equitable manner. Throughout the state there are proposals for siting
essential public facilities that will adversely impact surrounding
neighborhoods and communities while benefiting the larger region or the
entire state. In some cases the public entity planning the facility
may not be directly accountable through democratic processes to the
neighborhoods and communities that will be adversely impacted.
The legislature also finds that although the growth management act
requires that all local comprehensive plans include procedures for
identifying and siting essential public facilities, the current
requirements do not provide guidance as to mitigation responsibilities
when there are adverse impacts on host and neighboring communities.
The legislature further finds that countywide planning policy
procedures and other mechanisms under the growth management act are
often inadequate to involve all the impacted and benefited communities
and jurisdictions to resolve both siting and mitigation
responsibilities in a collaborative, regional manner.
Therefore, the legislature finds that there is a need to clarify
regional and state mitigation responsibilities and develop regional and
state mitigation tools to compensate host communities that are impacted
as a result of the siting of essential public facilities. The
legislature further finds that those mitigation tools need to be
incorporated into regional and statewide planning policies and
agreements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The joint task force on essential public facilities is created
to consist of the following twelve members:
(a) Four members of the house of representatives from diverse
geographic locations, two from each of the two largest political
caucuses, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(b) Four members of the senate from diverse geographic locations,
two from each of the two largest political caucuses, appointed by the
president of the senate;
(c) Four members representing local governments as follows:
(i) One member representing cities, to be selected by the
association of Washington cities;
(ii) One member representing counties, to be selected by the
Washington state association of counties;
(iii) Two members representing the interests of general purpose and
special purpose districts, selected jointly by the speaker of the house
of representatives and the president of the senate.
(2) The joint task force is cochaired by one senator and one
representative appointed by the president of the senate and the speaker
of the house of representatives, respectively.
(3) The cochairs of the joint task force may appoint an advisory
committee of nonvoting advisors and experts to provide input on various
subjects. For purposes of this subsection, "advisors and experts"
includes, but is not limited to, representatives of: Cities, counties,
port districts, other special purpose districts, the office of the
governor, and state agencies with planning functions and permitting
authority.
(4) Any final findings, conclusions, or recommendations of the
joint task force must be agreed to by a majority of the members;
however, minority findings, conclusions, or recommendations may be
included that are submitted by any member or group of members.
(5) The joint task force on essential public facilities shall:
(a) Evaluate and develop processes to define regional and state
mitigation responsibility resulting from the siting of essential public
facilities of regional and statewide significance. Issues the task
force shall consider include, but are not limited to: Definitions of
essential public facilities, strategies for determining which
communities are adversely impacted, ways to quantify the adverse
impacts on communities, and ways to identify any regional or state
responsibilities for mitigation;
(b) Evaluate and develop funding options for state and regional
jurisdictions to pay for mitigation costs; and
(c) Consider options to incorporate regional and state mitigation
responsibilities and funding tools into regional and state planning
policies and agreements to ensure that regional and state mitigation
measures will be fully implemented.
(6) The joint task force on essential public facilities shall
commence by June 1, 2005. The joint task force shall present a final
report, including any legislative recommendations, to the legislature
no later than January 1, 2006.
(7) The powers and duties of the task force are terminated June 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires June 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---