BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be known and cited as the
tax refund anticipation loan act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Facilitator" means a person who receives or accepts for
delivery an application for a refund anticipation loan, delivers a
check in payment of refund anticipation loan proceeds, or in any other
manner acts to allow the making of a refund anticipation loan.
"Facilitator" does not include a bank, thrift, savings association,
industrial bank, or credit union operating under the laws of the United
States or this state, an affiliate that is a servicer for such an
entity, or any person who acts solely as an intermediary and does not
deal with a taxpayer in the making of the refund anticipation loan.
(2) "Person" means an individual, a firm, a partnership, an
association, a corporation, or other entity.
(3) "Lender" means a person who extends credit to a borrower in the
form of a refund anticipation loan.
(4) "Taxpayer" means an individual who files a federal income tax
return.
(5) "Borrower" means a taxpayer who receives the proceeds of a
refund anticipation loan.
(6) "Refund anticipation loan" means a loan borrowed by a taxpayer
from a lender based on the taxpayer's anticipated federal income tax
refund.
(7) "Refund anticipation loan fee" means the charges, fees, or
other consideration imposed by the facilitator or the lender for a
refund anticipation loan. This term does not include any charge, fee,
or other consideration usually imposed by the facilitator in the
ordinary course of business for nonloan services, such as fees for tax
return preparation and fees for electronic filing of tax returns.
(8) "Refund anticipation loan fee schedule" means a listing or
table of refund anticipation loan fees charged by the facilitator or
the lender for three or more representative refund anticipation loan
amounts. The schedule shall list separately each fee or charge
imposed, as well as a total of all fees imposed, related to the making
of refund anticipation loans. The schedule shall also include, for
each representative loan amount, the estimated annual percentage rate
calculated under the guidelines established by the federal truth in
lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) For all refund anticipation loans, a
facilitator must provide a clear disclosure statement to the borrower,
prior to the borrower's completion of the application. The disclosure
statement required under this subsection must be printed in a minimum
of ten-point type. Further, the disclosure statement must contain the
following:
(a) The refund anticipation loan fee schedule; and
(b) A written statement containing the following elements:
(i) That a refund anticipation loan is a loan, and is not the
borrower's actual income tax refund;
(ii) That the taxpayer can file an income tax return electronically
without applying for a refund anticipation loan;
(iii) The average times according to the internal revenue service
within which a taxpayer who does not obtain a refund anticipation loan
can expect to receive a refund if the taxpayer's return is (A) filed
electronically and the refund is directly deposited to the taxpayer's
bank account or mailed to the taxpayer, and (B) mailed to the internal
revenue service and the refund is directly deposited to the taxpayer's
bank account or mailed to the taxpayer;
(iv) That the internal revenue service does not guarantee that it
will pay the full amount of the anticipated refund and it does not
guarantee a specific date that a refund will be deposited into a
taxpayer's financial institution account or mailed to a taxpayer;
(v) That the borrower is responsible for repayment of the loan and
related fees in the event that the tax refund is not paid or paid in
full;
(vi) The estimated time within which the loan proceeds will be paid
to the borrower if the loan is approved; and
(vii) The fee that will be charged, if any, if the borrower's loan
is not approved.
(2) The following additional information must be provided to the
borrower of a refund anticipation loan before consummation of the loan
transaction:
(a) The estimated total fees for obtaining the refund anticipation
loan; and
(b) The estimated annual percentage rate for the borrower's refund
anticipation loan, using the guidelines established under the federal
truth in lending act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.).
(3) This chapter shall preempt and be exclusive of all local acts,
statutes, ordinances, and regulations relating to refund anticipation
loans. This section shall be given retroactive and prospective effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 It is unlawful for a facilitator of a refund
anticipation loan to engage in any of the following activities:
(1) Misrepresent a material factor or condition of a refund
anticipation loan;
(2) Fail to process the application for a refund anticipation loan
promptly after the consumer applies for the loan;
(3) Engage in any dishonest, fraudulent, unfair, unconscionable, or
unethical practice or conduct in connection with a refund anticipation
loan; and
(4) Arrange for a creditor to take a security interest in any
property of the consumer other than the proceeds of the consumer's tax
refund to secure payment of the loan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Any person who knowingly and willfully
violates this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined up
to five hundred dollars for each offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---