BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.12.185 and 1973 2nd ex.s. c 16 s 17 are each
amended to read as follows:
This chapter ((16, Laws of 1973 2nd ex. sess.)) shall not apply to
((newspaper vendors or carriers and)) domestic or casual labor in or
about private residences and agricultural labor as defined in RCW
50.04.150((, as now or hereafter amended)).

Sec. 2 RCW 49.12.320 and 1989 c 216 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 49.12.300 and 49.12.310:
(1) "Employ" includes to engage, suffer, or permit to work, but
does not include voluntary or donated services performed for no
compensation, or without expectation or contemplation of compensation
as the adequate consideration for the services performed, for an
educational, charitable, religious, state or local government body or
agency, or nonprofit organization, or services performed by a
((newspaper vendor or a)) person in the employ of his or her parent or
stepparent.
(2) "House-to-house sales" includes a sale or other transaction in
consumer goods, the demonstration of products or equipment, the
obtaining of orders for consumer goods, or the obtaining of contracts
for services, in which the employee personally solicits the sale or
transaction at a place other than the place of business of the
employer.

--- END ---