BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the levy provided for in RCW 84.52.065, in each
year the state shall levy for collection in the following year a state
tax of twenty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value upon the
assessed valuation of all taxable property within the state adjusted to
the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed
by the state department of revenue.
(2) The taxes levied by the state under this section shall be
deposited into the public health subsidy account hereby created in the
state treasury. Money in the public health subsidy account may be
spent first for distribution to public hospital districts under section
2 of this act and second to the department of health solely for the
purpose of maintaining and improving local public health services and
for subsidizing emergency room care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in calendar year 2006 and every year thereafter, the
state treasurer shall distribute, based on calculations by the
department of revenue, from the public health subsidy account to public
hospital districts levying a regular ad valorem property tax in
calendar year 2005 the amount of taxes collected by the public hospital
district in calendar year 2005 as follows:
(a) On June 1st, the state treasurer shall distribute fifty-five
percent of the amount of taxes collected by the public hospital
district in calendar year 2005.
(b) On December 1st, the state treasurer shall distribute forty-five percent of the amount of taxes collected by the public hospital
district in calendar year 2005.
(2) For calendar years beginning in 2007, the distributions under
subsection (1) of this section shall equal the distributions from the
previous year increased by the increase in the state property tax levy
under section 1 of this act from the previous year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW
to read as follows:
The first levy by the state under section 2 of this act is not
subject to RCW 84.55.010.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.44.060 and 2003 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
All public hospital districts organized under the provisions of
this chapter shall have power:
(1) To make a survey of existing hospital and other health care
facilities within and without such district.
(2) To construct, condemn and purchase, purchase, acquire, lease,
add to, maintain, operate, develop and regulate, sell and convey all
lands, property, property rights, equipment, hospital and other health
care facilities and systems for the maintenance of hospitals,
buildings, structures, and any and all other facilities, and to
exercise the right of eminent domain to effectuate the foregoing
purposes or for the acquisition and damaging of the same or property of
any kind appurtenant thereto, and such right of eminent domain shall be
exercised and instituted pursuant to a resolution of the commission and
conducted in the same manner and by the same procedure as in or may be
provided by law for the exercise of the power of eminent domain by
incorporated cities and towns of the state of Washington in the
acquisition of property rights: PROVIDED, That no public hospital
district shall have the right of eminent domain and the power of
condemnation against any health care facility.
(3) To lease existing hospital and other health care facilities and
equipment and/or other property used in connection therewith, including
ambulances, and to pay such rental therefor as the commissioners shall
deem proper; to provide hospital and other health care services for
residents of said district by facilities located outside the boundaries
of said district, by contract or in any other manner said commissioners
may deem expedient or necessary under the existing conditions; and said
hospital district shall have the power to contract with other
communities, corporations, or individuals for the services provided by
said hospital district; and they may further receive in said hospitals
and other health care facilities and furnish proper and adequate
services to all persons not residents of said district at such
reasonable and fair compensation as may be considered proper:
PROVIDED, That it must at all times make adequate provision for the
needs of the district and residents of said district shall have prior
rights to the available hospital and other health care facilities of
said district, at rates set by the district commissioners.
(4) For the purpose aforesaid, it shall be lawful for any district
so organized to take, condemn and purchase, lease, or acquire, any and
all property, and property rights, including state and county lands,
for any of the purposes aforesaid, and any and all other facilities
necessary or convenient, and in connection with the construction,
maintenance, and operation of any such hospitals and other health care
facilities, subject, however, to the applicable limitations provided in
subsection (2) of this section.
(5) To contract indebtedness or borrow money for corporate purposes
on the credit of the corporation or the revenues of the hospitals
thereof, and the revenues of any other facilities or services that the
district is or hereafter may be authorized by law to provide, and to
issue and sell: (a) Revenue bonds, revenue warrants, or other revenue
obligations therefor payable solely out of a special fund or funds into
which the district may pledge such amount of the revenues of the
hospitals thereof, and the revenues of any other facilities or services
that the district is or hereafter may be authorized by law to provide,
to pay the same as the commissioners of the district may determine,
such revenue bonds, warrants, or other obligations to be issued and
sold in the same manner and subject to the same provisions as provided
for the issuance of revenue bonds, warrants, or other obligations by
cities or towns under the Municipal Revenue Bond Act, chapter 35.41
RCW, as may hereafter be amended; (b) general obligation bonds therefor
in the manner and form as provided in RCW 70.44.110 and 70.44.130, as
may hereafter be amended; or (c) interest-bearing warrants to be drawn
on a fund pending deposit in such fund of money sufficient to redeem
such warrants and to be issued and paid in such manner and upon such
terms and conditions as the board of commissioners may deem to be in
the best interest of the district; and to assign or sell hospital
accounts receivable, and accounts receivable for the use of other
facilities or services that the district is or hereafter may be
authorized by law to provide, for collection with or without recourse.
General obligation bonds shall be issued and sold in accordance with
chapter 39.46 RCW. Revenue bonds, revenue warrants, or other revenue
obligations may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46
RCW.
(6) To raise revenue by the levy of ((an annual tax on all taxable
property within such public hospital district not to exceed fifty cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value, and an additional annual tax on
all taxable property within such public hospital district not to exceed
twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, or such
further amount as has been or shall be authorized by a vote of the
people. Although public hospital districts are authorized to impose
two separate regular property tax levies, the levies shall be
considered to be a single levy for purposes of the limitation provided
for in chapter 84.55 RCW. Public hospital districts are authorized to
levy such a general tax in excess of their regular property taxes when
authorized so to do at a special election conducted in accordance with
and subject to all of the requirements of the Constitution and the laws
of the state of Washington now in force or hereafter enacted governing
the limitation of tax levies)) ad valorem property taxes, in excess of
the one percent limitation, upon the property within the district for
a one-year period to be used for operating or capital purposes whenever
authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and
Article VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution and for the
retirement of voter-approved general obligation bonds, issued for
capital purposes only, by levying bond retirement ad valorem property
tax levies, in excess of the one percent limitation, whenever
authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to Article VII,
section 2(b) of the state Constitution and RCW 84.52.056. The said
board of district commissioners is authorized and empowered to call a
special election for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters
of the hospital district a proposition or propositions to levy taxes in
excess of its regular property taxes. The superintendent shall prepare
a proposed budget of the contemplated financial transactions for the
ensuing year and file the same in the records of the commission on or
before the first day of November. Notice of the filing of said
proposed budget and the date and place of hearing on the same shall be
published for at least two consecutive weeks, at least one time each
week, in a newspaper printed and of general circulation in said county.
On or before the fifteenth day of November the commission shall hold a
public hearing on said proposed budget at which any taxpayer may appear
and be heard against the whole or any part of the proposed budget.
Upon the conclusion of said hearing, the commission shall, by
resolution, adopt the budget as finally determined and fix the final
amount of expenditures for the ensuing year. Taxes levied by the
commission shall be certified to and collected by the proper county
officer of the county in which such public hospital district is located
in the same manner as is or may be provided by law for the
certification and collection of port district taxes. The commission is
authorized, prior to the receipt of taxes raised by levy, to borrow
money or issue warrants of the district in anticipation of the revenue
to be derived by such district from the levy of taxes for the purpose
of such district, and such warrants shall be redeemed from the first
money available from such taxes when collected, and such warrants shall
not exceed the anticipated revenues of one year, and shall bear
interest at a rate or rates as authorized by the commission.
(7) To enter into any contract with the United States government or
any state, municipality, or other hospital district, or any department
of those governing bodies, for carrying out any of the powers
authorized by this chapter.
(8) To sue and be sued in any court of competent jurisdiction:
PROVIDED, That all suits against the public hospital district shall be
brought in the county in which the public hospital district is located.
(9) To pay actual necessary travel expenses and living expenses
incurred while in travel status for (a) qualified physicians or other
health care practitioners who are candidates for medical staff
positions, and (b) other qualified persons who are candidates for
superintendent or other managerial and technical positions, which
expenses may include expenses incurred by family members accompanying
the candidate, when the district finds that hospitals or other health
care facilities owned and operated by it are not adequately staffed and
determines that personal interviews with said candidates to be held in
the district are necessary or desirable for the adequate staffing of
said facilities.
(10) To employ superintendents, attorneys, and other technical or
professional assistants and all other employees; to make all contracts
useful or necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter,
including, but not limited to, (a) contracts with private or public
institutions for employee retirement programs, and (b) contracts with
current or prospective employees, physicians, or other health care
practitioners providing for the payment or reimbursement by the public
hospital district of health care training or education expenses,
including but not limited to debt obligations, incurred by current or
prospective employees, physicians, or other health care practitioners
in return for their agreement to provide services beneficial to the
public hospital district; to print and publish information or
literature; and to do all other things necessary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.52.010 and 2004 c 129 s 21 and 2004 c 80 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and
purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on
any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW
84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either of
these sections, the assessor shall recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(1) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
road district, and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax
rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law;
however any state levy shall take precedence over all other levies and
shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 84.52.135,
36.54.130, 84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and
84.52.105, the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation exceeds one percent of the true
and fair value of any property, then these levies shall be reduced as
follows:
(a) The levy imposed by a county under RCW 84.52.135 must be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;
(b) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry
district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or must be eliminated;
(c) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(d) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; and
(e) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or eliminated.
(2) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be
reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of
taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(a) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(b) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(c) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire
protection service authorities, library districts, and the first fifty
cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan
park districts, ((and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation levies for public hospital districts,)) shall be
reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(d) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(e) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to
regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b)
and (c) and fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160
shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and
(f) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for
regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a),
fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, library districts, and
metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, ((and
public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levy,)) shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.52.043 and 2004 c 80 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as
amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal
property by the taxing districts hereafter named shall be as follows:
(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts shall be as follows:
(a) The levy by the state under RCW 84.52.065 shall not exceed
three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value
adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated
ratio fixed by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively
for the support of the common schools;
(b) The levy by the state under section 1 of this act shall not
exceed twenty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value adjusted to
the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed
by the state department of revenue to be used as provided in section 1
of this act;
(c) The levy by any county shall not exceed one dollar and eighty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value;
(((c))) (d) The levy by any road district shall not exceed two
dollars and twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value;
and
(((d))) (e) The levy by any city or town shall not exceed three
dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value.
However, any county is hereby authorized to increase its levy from
one dollar and eighty cents to a rate not to exceed two dollars and
forty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value
for general county purposes if the total levies for both the county and
any road district within the county do not exceed four dollars and five
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, and no other taxing
district has its levy reduced as a result of the increased county levy.
(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior
taxing districts, other than the state, shall not exceed five dollars
and ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term
"junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than the
state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and
public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection
shall not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law
by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax
levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution;
(c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW
84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical
services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable
housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; (f)
the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are
protected under RCW 84.52.120; (g) levies imposed by ferry districts
under RCW 36.54.130; and (h) levies for criminal justice purposes under
RCW 84.52.135.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.52.068 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 19 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A portion of the proceeds of the state property tax levy under
RCW 84.52.065 shall be distributed to school districts in the amounts
and in the manner provided in this section.
(2) The amount of the distribution to each school district shall be
based upon the average number of full-time equivalent students in the
school district during the previous school year, and shall be
calculated as follows:
(a) Out of taxes collected in calendar years 2001 through and
including 2003, an annual amount equal to one hundred forty dollars per
each full-time equivalent student in all school districts shall be
deposited in the student achievement fund to be distributed to each
school district based on one hundred forty dollars per full-time
equivalent student in the school district for each year beginning with
the school year 2001-2002 and through the end of the 2003-2004 school
year.
(b) For the 2004-2005 school year, an annual amount equal to two
hundred fifty-four dollars per full-time equivalent student in all
school districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund to
be distributed to each school district based on two hundred fifty-four
dollars per full-time equivalent student.
(c) For the 2005-2006 school year, an amount equal to three hundred
dollars per full-time equivalent student in all school districts shall
be deposited in the student achievement fund to be distributed to each
school district based on three hundred dollars per full-time equivalent
student.
(d) For the 2006-2007 school year, an amount equal to three hundred
seventy-five dollars per full-time equivalent student in all school
districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund to be
distributed to each school district based on three hundred seventy-five
dollars per full-time equivalent student.
(e) For the 2007-2008 school year, an amount equal to four hundred
fifty dollars per full-time equivalent student in all school districts
shall be deposited in the student achievement fund to be distributed to
each school district based on four hundred fifty dollars per full-time
equivalent student.
(f) Each subsequent year following the 2007-2008 school year, the
amount deposited and distributed shall be adjusted for inflation as
defined in RCW 43.135.025(8).
(3) For the 2001-2002 through 2003-2004 school years, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall verify the average
number of full-time equivalent students in each school district from
the previous school year to the state treasurer by August 1st of each
year.
(4) Beginning with the 2004-2005 school year:
(a) The annual distributions to each school district shall be based
on the average number of full-time equivalent students in the school
district from the previous school year as reported to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction by August 31st of the previous
school year; and
(b) The school district annual amounts as defined in subsection (2)
of this section shall be distributed on the monthly apportionment
schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall notify the department of the
monthly amounts to be deposited into the student achievement fund to
meet the apportionment schedule distributions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The sum of twenty-one million dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the public
health subsidy account to the state treasurer for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2006, for distribution to public hospital districts
under section 2 of this act.
(2) The sum of seventeen million dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated from the public health subsidy account to
the state treasurer for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, for
distribution to public hospital districts under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2006 and thereafter.

--- END ---