BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.335.190 and 2000 c 138 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When, in the opinion of the board of directors of any school
district, the cost of any furniture, supplies, equipment, building,
improvements, or repairs, or other work or purchases, except books,
will equal or exceed the sum of fifty thousand dollars, complete plans
and specifications for such work or purchases shall be prepared and
notice by publication given in at least one newspaper of general
circulation within the district, once each week for two consecutive
weeks, of the intention to receive bids ((therefor)) and that
specifications and other information may be examined at the office of
the board or any other officially designated location: PROVIDED, That
the board without giving such notice may make improvements or repairs
to the property of the district through the shop and repair department
of such district when the total of such improvements or repair does not
exceed the sum of (((a) fifteen)) fifty thousand dollars((, for
districts with fifteen thousand five hundred or more full-time
equivalent students; or (b) for districts with fewer than fifteen
thousand five hundred full-time equivalent students, fifteen thousand
dollars if more than one craft or trade is involved with the school
district improvement or repair, or ten thousand dollars if a single
craft or trade is involved with the school district improvement or
repair)). The cost of any public work, improvement or repair for the
purposes of this section shall be the aggregate of all amounts to be
paid for labor, material, and equipment on one continuous or
interrelated project where work is to be performed simultaneously or in
close sequence. The bids shall be in writing and shall be opened and
read in public on the date and in the place named in the notice and
after being opened shall be filed for public inspection.
(2) Every purchase of furniture, equipment or supplies, except
books, the cost of which is estimated to be in excess of ((fifteen))
thirty thousand dollars, shall be on a competitive basis. The board of
directors shall establish a procedure for securing telephone and/or
written quotations for such purchases. Whenever the estimated cost is
from ((fifteen)) thirty thousand dollars up to fifty thousand dollars,
the procedure shall require quotations from at least three different
sources to be obtained in writing or by telephone, and recorded for
public perusal. Whenever the estimated cost is in excess of fifty
thousand dollars, the public bidding process provided in subsection (1)
of this section shall be followed.
(3) Every building, improvement, repair or other public works
project, the cost of which is estimated to be in excess of (((a)
fifteen)) fifty thousand dollars, ((for districts with fifteen thousand
five hundred or more full-time equivalent students; or (b) for
districts with fewer than fifteen thousand five hundred full-time
equivalent students, fifteen thousand dollars if more than one craft or
trade is involved with the school district improvement or repair, or
ten thousand dollars if a single craft or trade is involved with the
school district improvement or repair,)) shall be on a competitive bid
process. Whenever the estimated cost of a public works project is
fifty thousand dollars or more, the public bidding process provided in
subsection (1) of this section shall be followed unless the contract is
let using the small works roster process in RCW 39.04.155 or under any
other procedure authorized for school districts. One or more school
districts may authorize an educational service district to establish
and operate a small works roster for the school district under the
provisions of RCW 39.04.155.
(4) The contract for the work or purchase shall be awarded to the
lowest responsible bidder as defined in RCW 43.19.1911 but the board
may by resolution reject any and all bids and make further calls for
bids in the same manner as the original call. On any work or purchase
the board shall provide bidding information to any qualified bidder or
the bidder's agent, requesting it in person.
(5) In the event of any emergency when the public interest or
property of the district would suffer material injury or damage by
delay, upon resolution of the board declaring the existence of such an
emergency and reciting the facts constituting the same, the board may
waive the requirements of this section with reference to any purchase
or contract: PROVIDED, That an "emergency", for the purposes of this
section, means a condition likely to result in immediate physical
injury to persons or to property of the school district in the absence
of prompt remedial action.
(6) This section does not apply to the direct purchase of school
buses by school districts and educational services in accordance with
RCW 28A.160.195.

--- END ---