BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.060 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 17 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The commission, after hearing upon reasonable notice, shall
decide in each application for certification as an exclusive bargaining
representative, the unit appropriate for the purpose of collective
bargaining. In determining, modifying, or combining the bargaining
unit, the commission shall consider the duties, skills, and working
conditions of the public employees; the history of collective
bargaining by the public employees and their bargaining
representatives; the extent of organization among the public employees;
and the desire of the public employees. The commission shall determine
the bargaining representative by (((1))): (a) Examination of
organization membership rolls((, (2))); (b) comparison of signatures on
organization bargaining authorization cards((, or (3) by)); or (c)
conducting an election specifically therefor.
(2) For classified employees of school districts and educational
service districts:
(a) Appropriate bargaining units existing on the effective date of
this section may not be divided into more than one unit without the
agreement of the public employer and the certified bargaining
representative of the unit; and
(b) In making bargaining unit determinations under this section,
the commission must consider, in addition to the factors listed in
subsection (1) of this section, the avoidance of excessive
fragmentation.

--- END ---