BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington state
is widely recognized as being a steady leader in advancing rights and
opportunities for women in all spheres of life. The legislature
declares its intent to initiate the establishment of a Washington
women's history consortium. This will improve the availability of
historical information about the many actions taken by Washingtonians
which have resulted in such notable and influential achievements for
women and girls, for use by citizens, educators, researchers, and
historians.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A women's history consortium is created
with the Washington state historical society as the managing agency.
To ensure geographic, demographic, and subject matter diversity, the
consortium shall be managed by a board of advisors representing a range
of perspectives, including private citizens, business, labor,
historical societies, colleges and universities, educators, tribes, and
public officials. Appointment of the board of advisors must be
completed by September 30, 2005.
(2) The consortium is attached to the Washington state historical
society as the managing agency. Accordingly, the agency shall:
(a) Direct and supervise the budgeting, recordkeeping, recording,
and related administrative and clerical functions of the consortium;
(b) Include the consortium's budgetary requests in the society's
departmental budget;
(c) Collect all nonappropriated revenues for the consortium and
deposit them in the proper fund or account;
(d) Provide staff support for the consortium;
(e) Print and disseminate for the consortium any required notices,
rules, or orders adopted by the consortium; and
(f) Allocate or otherwise provide office space for the consortium
as may be necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The board of advisors shall consist of
fifteen members. The governor shall appoint eleven members to the
board of advisors. Two members of the senate, one each representing
the two largest caucuses of the senate, shall be appointed by the
president of the senate, and two members of the house of
representatives, one each representing the two largest caucuses of the
house of representatives shall be appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Key responsibilities of the board of
advisors include:
(1) Organizational and fiscal planning, management, and oversight;
(2) Adopting criteria and procedures for consortium membership and
member responsibilities;
(3) Identifying short-term and long-term priorities of the
consortium, with special emphasis on short-term priorities relating to
preserving historical information from the last several decades before
it is lost;
(4) Appointing special committees and task forces including people
from consortium members and nonmembers to assist with the consortium's
tasks; and
(5) Developing recommendations for statewide commemoration of the
centennial of the adoption in 1910 of the fifth amendment to the
Washington state Constitution, guaranteeing women's suffrage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Within available resources, the consortium
responsibilities include:
(1) Compiling a comprehensive index of existing historically
relevant materials and making it available in electronic and print
form;
(2) Identifying topics, historical periods, materials, or
activities not well represented in publicly accessible collections and
developing strategies for making them publicly available;
(3) Encouraging collection and preservation of materials important
to understanding Washington women's history, with special emphasis on
the last several decades;
(4) Referring potential donors of historical materials to
appropriate museums, archives, libraries, and other organizations
throughout the state;
(5) Developing protocols for protection of donations, loans,
leases, and purchases of historically relevant materials;
(6) Encouraging exhibit development and sharing among member
organizations and others;
(7) Encouraging public access and educational institution access to
women's history information, materials, and exhibits;
(8) Seeking private donations to assist with consortium work;
(9) Developing a concept for a grant program;
(10) Developing a volunteer program; and
(11) Encouraging development of curriculum materials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The consortium board of advisors shall
provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2006, addressing the following:
(1) Progress on activities identified in sections 4 and 5 of this
act; and
(2) Consortium needs and plans for the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The consortium shall provide a report to the
governor and the legislature by September 1, 2006, regarding
recommendations for commemorating the 2010 centennial of the women's
suffrage amendment to the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 27.34 RCW.

--- END ---