BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.73.250 and 2001 c 24 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All of the state's ambulance and aid services shall make
epinephrine available to their emergency medical technicians in their
emergency care supplies. The emergency medical technician may
administer epinephrine ((to a patient of any age upon the presentation
of evidence of a prescription for epinephrine or to a patient under
eighteen years of age:
(a) Upon the request of the patient or his or her parent or
guardian; or
(b) Upon the request of a person who presents written authorization
from the patient or his or her parent or guardian making such a
request)).
(2) ((Any emergency medical technician, emergency medical service,
or medical program director acting in good faith and in compliance with
the provisions of this section shall not be liable for any civil
damages arising out of the furnishing or administration of epinephrine.
(3))) Nothing in this section authorizes the administration of
epinephrine by a first responder.

--- END ---