BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that protecting
human health and the environment is of the utmost importance to the
citizens of the state of Washington.
(2) Mercury is introduced into the environment in a variety of ways
and although it is beyond the state's power to control all mercury
emissions, there are many sources that can be controlled, including the
mercury contained in automobiles.
(3) Mercury is or has historically been present in a number of auto
components, including but not limited to: Hood and trunk light
switches, antilock brake (ABS) sensors, lights, and navigational
systems.
(4) The recycling of automobiles involves the crushing, shredding,
and melting of auto scrap via thermal combustion. Preventing mercury
or mercury-added components from entering thermal combustion units is
an effective way to reduce mercury emissions into the environment.
(5) It is the intent of this chapter is to reduce the quantity of
mercury released into the environment by:
(a) Removing mercury containing light switches and antilock brake
sensors from end-of-life vehicles in the state of Washington; and
(b) Creating a collection and recovery program for mercury-added
components removed from vehicles in the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Capture rate" means the quantity of mercury removed,
collected, or recovered stated as a percentage of the total mercury
available from end-of-life motor vehicles, computed annually.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(4) "End-of-life vehicle" means any motor vehicle that is sold,
given, or otherwise conveyed to a motor vehicle crusher, motor vehicle
recycler, or scrap recycling facility.
(5) "Manufacturer" includes any person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization,
combination, or joint venture that produced or assembled a new motor
vehicle that used mercury-added components, or in the case of an
imported motor vehicle, the importer or domestic distributor of the
motor vehicle.
(6) "Manufacturer-dealer warranty program" means an arrangement
between a manufacturer and its franchisee, whereby the manufacturer
agrees to reimburse the franchisee, at established rates, for labor or
parts necessary to repair a vehicle pursuant to the manufacturer's
original equipment warranty to the original purchaser of the vehicle.
(7) "Mercury-added component" means mercury-containing light
switches and antilock brake system sensors, which were intentionally
installed in the motor vehicle.
(8) "Motor vehicle" includes any automobile, van, truck, motor
home, motorcycle, travel trailer, or bus.
(9) "Motor vehicle recycler" means any person or entity licensed
under chapter 46.80 RCW and engaged in the business of either acquiring
or dismantling, or both, motor vehicles for the primary purpose of
resale of their parts or materials.
(10) "Scrap recycling facility" means a fixed location, where
machinery and equipment are utilized for processing and manufacturing
scrap metal into prepared grades and whose principal product is scrap
iron, scrap steel, or nonferrous metallic scrap for sale for remelting
purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Manufacturers shall, individually or as part
of a group, submit to the department for review and approval a plan to
remove, collect, and recover mercury-added components before crushing
or shredding motor vehicles. Manufacturers are responsible for
ensuring that mercury-added components are properly removed, collected,
and recovered from end-of-life vehicles.
(1)(a) Vehicle manufacturers shall develop and implement a system
to remove, collect, and recover mercury-added components from end-of-life vehicles.
(b) The removal, collection, and recovery system must include, at
a minimum, the following elements, which shall be described within the
plan:
(i) An education program to inform the stakeholders about the
purposes of the removal, collection, and recovery program and how to
participate in it;
(ii) A plan for implementing and financing the system;
(iii) Documentation of the willingness of all necessary parties to
implement the proposed system;
(iv) Information identifying: The make, model, and year of
vehicles containing mercury-added components; a description of the
component; the locations of these components; and the safe, cost-effective, and environmentally sound methods for their removal from
end-of-life vehicles;
(v) An overall mercury-added component capture rate of at least
ninety percent, consistent with the principle that mercury-added
components must be removed, collected, and recovered unless the part is
inaccessible because of significant damage to that part of the vehicle
where the component is located;
(vi) A description of the performance measures that will be used
and reported upon by the manufacturer (or group of manufacturers) to
demonstrate that the system is meeting the capture rate as well as
other measures of program effectiveness. The performance measures must
include, but are not limited to: The number of mercury-added
components collected from end-of-life vehicles and the number of
vehicles processed for recycling; the amount of mercury collected; and
the number of vehicles containing mercury-added components;
(vii) A process to ensure that, upon request, the motor vehicle
recycler, scrap recycling facility, or mobile crusher provide to the
department documentation to show that the mercury-added components have
been removed. This process must ensure that the information is treated
as confidential business information, and will be publicly released
only in the aggregate;
(viii) A description of additional or alternative actions to be
implemented to improve the system and its operation in the event that
the program measures established in (b)(vi) of this subsection are not
met;
(ix) A system to mark vehicles to be processed for shredding or
crushing to indicate the presence or absence of mercury-added
components;
(x) Training of employees on how to identify vehicles containing
mercury-added components, how to remove them, how to handle and store
them, human health risks associated with mercury, and spill response;
(xi) A plan to transfer mercury and mercury-added components that
are removed, collected, and recovered from end-of-life vehicles to
recycling, storage, or disposal facilities.
(c) In order to ensure that mercury-added components are removed
and collected in a safe and consistent manner, manufacturers shall, to
the extent practicable, utilize the existing end-of-life vehicle
recycling infrastructure.
(d) Manufacturers shall indemnify, defend, and hold harmless motor
vehicle recyclers and scrap recyclers for any liabilities arising from
the release of the mercury from the mercury-added components after the
components are transferred to the manufacturer or its agent or
contractor.
(e) Any person or entity holding legal title to a motor vehicle
shall be held harmless for liabilities arising from the release of
mercury from any mercury-added component installed in such a vehicle,
delivered to motor vehicle recyclers or scrap recyclers, or transferred
to the manufacturer or its agent or contractor.
(2) The total cost of the removal, collection, and recovery system
for mercury-added components must be borne by the manufacturers who
installed mercury-added components in their vehicles. Costs include,
but are not limited to, the following:
(a) Labor to remove mercury-added components. Labor must be
reimbursed at the prevailing rate auto manufacturers use to reimburse
automotive dealers for replacing faulty components under the
manufacturer-dealer warranty program;
(b) Training as described in subsection (1)(b)(x) of this section;
(c) Packaging in which to transport mercury-added components to
recycling, storage, or disposal facilities;
(d) Shipping of mercury-added components to recycling, storage, or
disposal facilities;
(e) Proper recycling, storage, or disposal of mercury-added
components;
(f) Public education materials and presentations;
(g) Maintenance of all appropriate systems and procedures to
protect the environment from mercury contamination;
(h) State administrative costs associated with the oversight of the
manufacturer's plan;
(i) Any additional costs for documentation required of motor
vehicle recyclers and scrap recycling facilities.
(3) Nothing in this section restricts the ability of a
manufacturer, importer, or domestic distributor from transporting
products through the state, or storing products in the state for later
distribution outside the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Every effort must be made by vehicle
manufacturers to ensure that mercury-added components are removed from
vehicles before they are crushed or shredded.
(1) It is unlawful to shred or crush vehicles that have not had
mercury-added components removed, except where removal is not possible
because the mercury-added component is inaccessible due to significant
damage to the part of the vehicle where the component is located. To
comply with this section, automobile crushers or shredders may rely on,
as reasonable evidence of removal, representations of certifications
from motor vehicle recyclers that mercury-added components have been
removed. Crushed vehicle hulks imported from out of state may be
shredded provided the scrap recycling facilities have, to the best of
their abilities, ensured that their out-of-state suppliers have removed
mercury-added components.
(2) It is unlawful for any person to represent that mercury-added
components have been removed from a vehicle or vehicle hulk being sold,
given, or otherwise conveyed for recycling if the mercury-added
components have in fact not been removed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Every manufacturer of motor vehicles
sold in this state shall, individually or as part of a group, submit a
plan to the department, within ninety days of the effective date of
this section, describing a program meeting the requirements established
in this chapter.
(2) The director shall:
(a) Determine within sixty days after receipt of a manufacturer's
plan, whether the plan complies with this chapter. If the plan is
approved, the director shall send a letter of approval and the
manufacturer shall begin implementation within ninety days after
receipt of the letter;
(b) In the event the plan is rejected, inform the manufacturer as
to the reasons for rejection. The manufacturer has thirty days after
receipt of the letter of disapproval to submit a new plan;
(c) Consider the manufacturer or manufacturers in violation of this
chapter, subject to the penalties described in section 7 of this act,
if they fail to have an approved plan in place within two hundred forty
days of the effective date of this section;
(d) Review any plan approved under this section three years after
the original date of approval and every three years thereafter. The
director may require modifications to the plan as appropriate;
(e) Make available to the public and to the legislature the reports
required under this chapter.
(3) The manufacturers shall submit revised plans as directed within
ninety days of receipt of notification by the department. The
submission and review deadlines are as specified in subsection (2) of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A manufacturer subject to this chapter
shall, individually or as part of a group, annually report to the
department concerning the performance of the manufacturer's plan. The
report must include, but is not limited to:
(1) A detailed description and documentation of the capture rate
achieved and how and where the mercury was recycled or otherwise
appropriately managed;
(2) A plan to implement additional or alternative actions, if
necessary, to improve the capture rate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A violation of sections 3 through 6 of this
act is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars
per violation per day. Penalties collected under this section must be
deposited in the state toxics control account created in RCW
70.105D.070. The civil penalties are in addition to any other
penalties authorized under other state or local laws governing the use
of mercury in motor vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---