BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.680 and 2002 c 156 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No employer or labor organization may increase the salary of an
officer or employee, or give an emolument to an officer, employee, or
other person or entity, with the intention that the increase in salary,
or the emolument, or a part of it, be contributed or spent to support
or oppose a candidate, state official against whom recall charges have
been filed, political party, or political committee.
(2) No employer or labor organization may discriminate against an
officer or employee in the terms or conditions of employment for (a)
the failure to contribute to, (b) the failure in any way to support or
oppose, or (c) in any way supporting or opposing a candidate, ballot
proposition, political party, or political committee. At least
annually, an employee from whom wages or salary are withheld under
subsection (3) of this section shall be notified of the provisions of
this subsection.
(3) No employer, labor organization, or other person or entity
responsible for the disbursement of funds in payment of wages or
salaries may withhold or divert a portion of an employee's wages or
salaries for contributions to political committees or for use as
political contributions or for payment to a third party for such
contribution or use except upon the written request of the employee.
The request must be made on a form prescribed by the commission
informing the employee of the prohibition against employer and labor
organization discrimination described in subsection (2) of this
section. The employee may revoke the request at any time. At least
annually, the employee shall be notified about the right to revoke the
request.
(4) Each person or entity who withholds contributions under
subsection (3) of this section shall maintain open for public
inspection for a period of no less than three years, during normal
business hours, documents and books of accounts that shall include a
copy of each employee's request, the amounts and dates funds were
actually withheld, and the amounts and dates funds were transferred to
a political committee. Copies of such information shall be delivered
to the commission upon request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A labor organization that is an exclusive bargaining
representative of a bargaining unit of employees covered under chapter
28B.52 RCW, chapter 41.56 RCW, chapter 41.59 RCW, chapter 41.76 RCW,
chapter 41.80 RCW, or chapter 47.64 RCW, receiving dues deducted
pursuant to an agency shop or other union security provision in the
collective bargaining agreement covering those employees, must deposit
all funds received in one or more identifiable deposit accounts
maintained as required in subsection (4) of this section. No funds
from any other source may be deposited in the account. Funds from this
account may be expended for any lawful purpose, but may not be expended
to make contributions to political committees or for use as political
contributions, or to operate a political committee or conduct
grassroots activities beyond communicating to its own membership,
except on the written request of the employee as provided in RCW
42.17.680.
(2) All expenditures for political activities by a labor or
employee organization subject to this section must be drawn from a
deposit account designated as a political activity account and
maintained as required under subsection (4) of this section.
(3) A labor or employee organization shall maintain complete
records of:
(a) All funds deposited into a deposit account subject to this
section and provide the public disclosure commission an annual itemized
report of all income to the accounts. The report must contain, at a
minimum, the name of each person or entity from whom funds have been
received into the account and each employee whose wages or salary was
subject to deduction as part of the funds received; and
(b) Expenditures from the deposit accounts subject to this section
and provide the public disclosure commission with an annual report
detailing all expenditures. Expenditure items should contain
sufficient detail to identify the purpose and recipient of each
expenditure.
(4) Each deposit account subject to this section must be a deposit
account in a financial institution authorized by federal or state law
to do business in Washington.
(5) A labor organization or employee organization must notify
bargaining unit employees of the intended use of funds expended from
deposit accounts subject to this section.
(6) A person or entity who violates any provision of this section
is liable to the person from whose wages or salary the funds were
deducted for three times the amount deducted or one thousand dollars,
whichever is greater, and for costs and such reasonable attorneys' fees
as may be allowed by the court.

--- END ---