BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.14.030 and 1997 c 429 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
An owner of property making application under this chapter must
meet the following requirements:
(1) The new or rehabilitated multiple-unit housing must be located
in a residential targeted area as designated by the city;
(2) The multiple-unit housing must meet the guidelines as adopted
by the governing authority that may include height, density, public
benefit features, number and size of proposed development, parking,
low-income or moderate-income occupancy requirements, and other adopted
requirements indicated necessary by the city. The required amenities
should be relative to the size of the project and tax benefit to be
obtained;
(3) The new, converted, or rehabilitated multiple-unit housing must
provide for a minimum of fifty percent of the space for permanent
residential occupancy. In the case of existing occupied multifamily
development, the multifamily housing must also provide for a minimum of
four additional multifamily units. Existing multifamily vacant housing
that has been vacant for twelve months or more does not have to provide
additional multifamily units;
(4) New construction multifamily housing and rehabilitation
improvements must be completed within three years from the date of
approval of the application;
(5) Property proposed to be rehabilitated must ((be vacant at least
twelve months before submitting an application and)) fail to comply
with one or more standards of the applicable state or local building or
housing codes on or after July 23, 1995. If the property proposed to
be rehabilitated is not vacant, an applicant shall provide each
existing tenant housing of comparable size, quality, and price and a
reasonable opportunity to relocate; and
(6) The applicant must enter into a contract with the city approved
by the governing body under which the applicant has agreed to the
implementation of the development on terms and conditions satisfactory
to the governing authority.

--- END ---