BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that Washington state has the highest
incidence of breast cancer in the nation. Despite this, mortality
rates from breast cancer have declined due largely to early screening
and detection. Invasive cervical cancer is the most preventable type
of cancer. The Pap test, used to detect early signs of this disease,
has been called "medicine's most successful screening test." Applied
consistently, invasive cervical cancer could nearly be eliminated. The
legislature further finds that increasing access to breast and cervical
cancer screening is critical to reducing incidence and mortality rates,
and eliminating the disparities of this disease in women in Washington
state. Furthermore, the legislature finds there is a need for a
permanent program providing early detection and screening to the women
and families of Washington state.
It is the intent of the legislature to establish an early detection
breast and cervical cancer screening program as a voluntary screening
program directed at reducing mortalities through early detection to be
offered to eligible women only as funds are available, and only so long
as the current federal funding level continues.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Eligible woman" means a woman who is age forty to sixty-four,
and whose income is at or below two hundred fifty percent of the
federal poverty level, as published annually by the federal department
of health and human services. Priority enrollment shall be given to
women as defined by the federal national breast and cervical cancer
early detection program, under P.L. 101-354.
(b) "Approved providers" means those state-supported health
providers, radiology facilities, and cytological laboratories that are
recognized by the department as meeting the minimum program policies
and procedures adopted by the department to qualify under the federal
national breast and cervical cancer early detection program, and are
designated as eligible for funding by the department.
(c) "Comprehensive" means a screening program that focuses on
breast and cervical cancer screening as a preventive health measure,
and includes diagnostic and case management services.
(3) The department of health shall administer a state-supported
early detection breast and cervical cancer screening program to assist
eligible women with preventive health services. Eligible women shall
be enrolled in the early detection breast and cervical cancer screening
program and additional eligible women may be enrolled to the extent
that grants and contributions from community sources provide sufficient
funds for expanding the program.
(4) Funds appropriated for the state program shall be used only to
operate early detection breast and cervical cancer screening programs
that have been approved by the department, or to increase access to
existing state-approved programs, and shall not supplant federally
supported breast and cervical cancer early detection programs.

--- END ---