BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The public health system as defined in RCW 43.70.575 is
essential to fulfilling the state's constitutional responsibility to
protect the health and safety of its citizens.
(2) The population-based services provided by the public health
system are cost-effective and are critical in improving the value of
public investments in all types of health services and in controlling
health care costs.
(3) Our state public health system lacks the capacity to fulfill
its critical functions with respect to well understood health threats
such as impure air and water, unsanitary living conditions, unsafe
food, and inadequate rates of immunization.
(4) The public health system lacks the capacity to address the
emerging health threats of the 21st century including bioterrorism and
other emergencies, health disparities, the spread of drug-resistant
tuberculosis, HIV, SARS, West Nile virus, and other infectious
diseases, and the predictable increases of heart disease, cancer,
diabetes, and other diseases that will result from tobacco and other
drug addiction, poor diet, and inadequate exercise.
(5) According to the provisions of chapter 43.70 RCW the department
of health has developed a public health improvement plan, in
consultation with local health jurisdictions, the state board of
health, and other state agencies, health services providers, and
citizens concerned about public health.
(6) The public health improvement plan includes standards for all
elements of the public health system and provides a detailed accounting
of both performance and funding deficits in the current system,
suggesting ways in which additional funds could be used to improve that
system.
(7) The legislature's most urgent business is the review of this
plan and the determination of a legislative plan for public health
improvement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) There is hereby established the joint
public health financing committee. Its members shall include the
chairs, vice-chairs, and ranking minority members of the house of
representatives and senate committees on health and of the principal
fiscal committee within each chamber. In addition, one representative
of the office of the governor and one representative of each member of
the public health improvement partnership shall also serve as nonvoting
members. The committee shall appoint an executive committee not to
exceed four members from among its voting members and may appoint such
subcommittees, advisory groups, or other bodies as it sees fit.
Staffing assistance shall be provided by the house of representatives
office of program research, senate committee services, and the joint
legislative audit and review committee. The legislative auditor shall
coordinate legislative staffing. The department of health and the
office of the governor shall provide such staffing assistance as may be
reasonably required within their existing resources.
(2) The committee shall:
(a) Analyze the costs and benefits to state government, to private
businesses, and to state residents from fully implementing the
standards for public health contained in the 2004 public health
improvement plan;
(b) Recommend strategies and a schedule for improving public health
programs throughout the state according to that plan, including the
timing of increased funding for public health services linked to not
more than a six-year schedule for full implementation of recommended
improvements;
(c) Recommend a source and level of dedicated funding the
legislature should provide for public health services. The
recommendation shall include methods to ensure that such funding does
not supplant existing federal, state, and local funds received by any
element of the public health system; and
(d) Conduct a review of the public health improvement plan as
presently authorized in state law and recommend how its needed
functions might most efficiently be integrated in the regular
functioning of the public health system, and make recommendations about
the need to continue requiring a public health improvement plan.
(3) The committee shall complete an interim report to the governor
and the legislature by December 1, 2005, and a final report by December
1, 2006.

--- END ---