BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that skill centers
provide students with high quality educational opportunities through
programs that combine academics with career and technical education.
The legislature also finds that skill centers provide extremely
valuable support to local businesses seeking skilled entry-level
employees and to communities attempting to enhance local economic
development opportunities. Through skill center programs, students
learn the technical knowledge and skills necessary either to pursue
additional education through apprenticeships, technical schools, or
institutions of higher education, or go directly into entry-level
employment and begin careers. The legislature finds that skill centers
permit a number of school districts to cooperatively offer programs
that the school districts cannot provide individually.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The work force training and education
coordinating board, in collaboration with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, shall conduct a study and report
back to the 2007 legislature regarding how best to provide increased
opportunities for students living in areas of the state that are
currently not adequately served by a skill center. If plausible, the
work force training and education coordinating board, in collaboration
with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall
provide preliminary recommendations to Washington Learns by June 2006.
(2) The study shall be focused on these primary issues:
(a) A report on current skill center geographic coverage and what
geographic gaps in service area currently exist;
(b) Recommendations on how best to provide students in rural and
remote areas increased access to a skill center program as well as how
best to address the difficulties in providing adequate services to high
density areas of the state. In making these recommendations, the work
force board shall, at a minimum, explore the feasibility of creating
satellite sites, creating joint programs between high schools and
community colleges, using the K-20 network, and offering additional
evening and summer programs. The report shall provide analysis on any
additional funding needs or different funding methods necessary to
implement the recommendations;
(c) Recommendations on how best to integrate core academic content
into skill center programs and how to determine and report skill center
course equivalencies for the purpose of meeting high school graduation
requirements; and
(d) Recommendations on the role that skills centers can play as a
promising dropout prevention/retrieval program by increasing student
engagement through meaningful curriculum and effective instruction,
providing opportunities for students to apply their learning in
relevant, real world situations, and helping students see the
connections to their own futures.

--- END ---