BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.40.169 and 2003 c 378 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Any charter county with a population of not more than seventy
thousand shall establish a pilot program to implement the community
commitment disposition alternative contained in this section. The
pilot project shall be limited to five beds.)) Any county or group of
cooperating counties within close proximity may establish a program to
implement the community commitment disposition alternative under this
section. A program established by a county or group of cooperating
counties shall be limited to ten beds. A court in a county that has
established a program under this section or has entered an agreement
with other counties to establish such a program may impose a community
commitment disposition alternative as provided in this section.
(1) When the offender is subject to a standard range commitment of
15 to 36 weeks and is ineligible for a suspended disposition
alternative, a manifest injustice disposition below the standard range,
special sex offender disposition alternative, chemical dependency
disposition alternative, or mental health disposition alternative,
((the)) a court ((in a county with a pilot program under this section))
may impose a community commitment disposition alternative and:
(a) Retain juvenile court jurisdiction over the youth;
(b) Confine the youth in a secure county detention facility ((for
a period of time not to exceed thirty days)), or another alternative to
secure county detention as described in subsection (4) of this section;
and
(c) Impose a term of postrelease community supervision for up to
one year.
((If the youth receives a standard range)) At the time of the
disposition, the court shall set the release date within the standard
range. ((The court shall determine the release date prior to
expiration of sixty percent of the juvenile's minimum term of
confinement.)) The offender shall spend no more than thirty days in
secure county detention between the date of the disposition and the
initial release date.
(2) The court may impose this community commitment disposition
alternative if the court finds the following:
(a) Placement in a local secure county detention facility in close
proximity to the youth's family or local support systems will
facilitate a smoother reintegration to the youth's family and
community;
(b) Placement in the local secure county detention facility will
allow the youth to benefit from locally provided family intervention
programs and other research-based treatment programs, school,
employment, and drug and alcohol or mental health counseling; or
(c) Confinement in a facility operated by the department would
result in a negative disruption to local services, school, or
employment or impede or delay developing those services and support
systems in the community.
(3) The court shall consider the youth's offense, prior criminal
history, security classification, risk level, and treatment needs and
history when determining whether the youth is appropriate for the
community commitment disposition alternative. If the court finds that
a community commitment disposition alternative is appropriate, the
court shall order the youth into secure county detention while the
details of the reintegration program are developed. The program shall
include delivery of programs which meet the Washington state institute
for public policy's effectiveness standards for juvenile accountability
programs.
(4) Upon approval of the treatment and community reintegration
plan, the court may order the youth to serve the term of confinement in
one ((or more)) of the following placements or combination of the
following placements: Secure county detention, an alternative to
secure detention such as electronic home monitoring, county group care,
day or evening reporting, or home detention. The court may order the
youth to serve time in secure county detention on weekends or
intermittently. The court shall set periodic reviews to review the
youth's progress in the program. ((At least fifty percent)) No more
than thirty days of the ((term of confinement)) community commitment
disposition alternative shall be served in secure county detention,
unless the youth violates the conditions of the community commitment
program.
(5) If the youth violates the conditions of the community
commitment program, the court may impose sanctions under RCW 13.40.200
or modify the terms of the reintegration plan and order the youth to
serve ((all or a portion)) up to thirty days of the remaining
confinement term in secure county detention or another alternative to
secure county detention as described in subsection (4) of this section.
If, in the opinion of the court, the youth's cumulative violations
would require more than a total of thirty days of secure detention, the
court shall revoke the community commitment disposition alternative and
order the disposition's execution, with credit for time served, at a
facility operated by the juvenile rehabilitation administration of the
department of social and health services. The court shall retain
jurisdiction for purposes of community supervision upon release from
the facility. Except for a youth transferred to a facility operated by
the juvenile rehabilitation administration, time not spent in secure
county detention may be served in one of the alternative placements
described in subsection (4) of this section. The court shall consider
the youth's risk level in selecting alternative placements.
(6) A county may enter into interlocal agreements with other
counties to develop joint community commitment programs or to allow one
county to send a youth appropriate for this alternative to another
county that has a community commitment program.
(7) Implementation of this alternative is subject to available
state funding for the costs of the community commitment program,
including costs of detention and community supervision, treatment
programs, and administration.
(8) Each county or group of cooperating counties establishing a
program to implement the community commitment disposition alternative
under this act shall provide an interim report on a program to the
Washington association of juvenile court administrators by November 1,
2006, and a final report by May 1, 2007. Each report shall include,
but is not limited to, the number of offenders eligible for the
program, the number of offenders sentenced to the program, evaluation
and treatment costs for each participant, administrative costs, costs
of detention, supervision, and other related costs, and whether an
offender has reoffended after participation in the program. The
Washington association of juvenile court administrators shall submit an
interim report ((on)) analyzing the data submitted by each of the
((pilot)) programs established in this section to the legislature and
appropriate committees by December 31, ((2004)) 2006, and submit a
final report to the legislature and the appropriate committees by June
30, ((2005)) 2007.
((This section expires July 1, 2005.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---