BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.138.100 and 2001 c 44 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person, firm, or corporation may act or hold itself out as a
seller of travel unless, prior to engaging in the business of selling
or advertising to sell travel services or travel-related benefits, the
person, firm, or corporation registers with the director under this
chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.
(1) The registration number must be conspicuously posted in the
place of business and must be included in all advertisements. Sellers
of travel are not required to include registration numbers on
institutional advertising. For the purposes of this subsection,
"institutional advertising" is advertising that does not include prices
or dates for travel services.
(2) No person or entity may publish, in this state, any
advertisement which offers travel services or travel-related benefits
unless the person submitting the advertisement for publication is
registered under this chapter.
(3) Any publisher who publishes, in good faith and without
knowledge that the person submitting the advertisement is not
registered under this chapter, an advertisement which offers travel
services or travel-related benefits is not liable for any damages as a
result of the advertisement's publication.
For purposes of this section, "publisher" means any person or
entity that prints or distributes any newspaper, magazine, billboard,
or other advertising medium.
(4) The director shall issue duplicate registrations upon payment
of a duplicate registration fee to valid registration holders operating
more than one office. The duplicate registration fee for each office
shall be an amount equal to the original registration fee.
(((3))) (5) No registration is assignable or transferable.
(((4))) (6) If a registered seller of travel sells his or her
business, when the new owner becomes responsible for the business, the
new owner must comply with all provisions of this chapter, including
registration.
(((5))) (7) If a seller of travel is employed by or under contract
as an independent contractor or an outside agent of a seller of travel
who is registered under this chapter, the employee, independent
contractor, or outside agent need not also be registered if:
(a) The employee, independent contractor, or outside agent is
conducting business as a seller of travel in the name of and under the
registration of the registered seller of travel; and
(b) All money received for travel services by the employee,
independent contractor, or outside agent is collected in the name of
the registered seller of travel and processed by the registered seller
of travel as required under this chapter.

--- END ---