BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.185.300 and 2004 c 186 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before a bail bond recovery agent may apprehend a person
subject to a bail bond in a planned forced entry, the bail bond
recovery agent must notify an appropriate law enforcement agency in the
local jurisdiction in which the apprehension is expected to occur.
Notification must include, at a minimum: The name of the defendant;
the address, or the approximate location if the address is
undeterminable, of the dwelling, building, or other structure where the
planned forced entry is expected to occur; the name of the bail bond
recovery agent; the name of the contracting bail bond agent; and the
alleged offense or conduct the defendant committed that resulted in the
issuance of a bail bond.
(2) During the actual planned forced entry, a bail bond recovery
agent may wear either:
(a) ((Shall wear)) A shirt, vest, or other garment with the words
"BAIL BOND RECOVERY AGENT" displayed in at least ((two)) one-inch-high
reflective print letters across the front and back of the garment and
in a contrasting color to that of the garment; ((and)) or
(b) A shirt, vest, or other garment with the words "BAIL
ENFORCEMENT AGENT" displayed in at least one-inch-high reflective print
letters across the front and back of the garment and in a contrasting
color to that of the garment.
(3) During the actual planned forced entry, a bail bond recovery
agent may display a badge approved by the department with the words
"BAIL BOND RECOVERY AGENT" prominently displayed.

--- END ---