BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Washington state institute for public
policy shall study the feasibility of potential funding methods and a
finance system for the incorporation of community and technical
colleges into an expanded definition of basic education. The
Washington state institute for public policy shall complete its study
and make recommendations no later than December 1, 2006, to the
governor, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
higher education coordinating board, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, and the fiscal and education committees of the
senate and the house of representatives.

--- END ---