BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.85.020 and 2003 c 166 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply through this chapter.
(1) "Small business" means any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that
is owned and operated independently from all other businesses, and that
has fifty or fewer employees.
(2) "Small business economic impact statement" means a statement
meeting the requirements of RCW 19.85.040 prepared by a state agency
pursuant to RCW 19.85.030.
(3) "Industry" means all of the businesses in this state in any
((one)) single North American industry classification system
classification or four-digit standard industrial classification as
published by the United States department of commerce. However, if the
use of a ((four-digit standard industrial)) classification would result
in the release of data that would violate state confidentiality laws,
"industry" means all businesses in a three-digit standard industrial
classification or equivalent North American industry classification
system classification.
(4) "Minor cost" means a cost per business that is less than three-tenths of one percent of one hundred dollars in sales, or less than
one-tenth of one percent of the annual payroll.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.85.030 and 2000 c 171 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the adoption of a rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, an agency
shall prepare a small business economic impact statement: (a) If the
proposed rule will impose more than minor costs on businesses in an
industry; or (b) if requested to do so by a majority vote of the joint
administrative rules review committee within forty-five days of
receiving the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320.
However, if the agency has completed the pilot rule process as defined
by RCW 34.05.313 before filing the notice of a proposed rule, the
agency is not required to prepare a small business economic impact
statement.
An agency shall prepare the small business economic impact
statement in accordance with RCW 19.85.040, and file it with the code
reviser along with the notice required under RCW 34.05.320. An agency
shall file a statement prepared at the request of the joint
administrative rules review committee with the code reviser upon its
completion before the adoption of the rule. An agency shall provide a
copy of the small business economic impact statement to any person
requesting it.
(2) Based upon the extent of disproportionate impact on small
business identified in the statement prepared under RCW 19.85.040, the
agency shall, where legal and feasible in meeting the stated objectives
of the statutes upon which the rule is based, maximally reduce the
costs imposed by the rule on small businesses. ((Methods to reduce the
costs on small businesses may include)) The agency shall consider,
without limitation, each of the following methods of reducing the
impact of the proposed rule on small businesses:
(a) Reducing, modifying, or eliminating substantive regulatory
requirements;
(b) Simplifying, reducing, or eliminating recordkeeping and
reporting requirements;
(c) Reducing the frequency of inspections;
(d) Delaying compliance timetables;
(e) Reducing or modifying fine schedules for noncompliance; ((or))
(f) Any other mitigation techniques including those suggested by
small businesses or their advocates.
(3) If the agency determines it cannot reduce the disproportionate
impact of a rule on small businesses, the agency shall provide a clear
explanation of why it has made that determination and include a
statement to that effect with the notice required by RCW 34.05.320.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.85.040 and 1995 c 403 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A small business economic impact statement must include a brief
description of the reporting, recordkeeping, and other compliance
requirements of the proposed rule, and the kinds of professional
services that a small business is likely to need in order to comply
with such requirements. It shall analyze the costs of compliance for
businesses required to comply with the proposed rule adopted pursuant
to RCW 34.05.320, including costs of equipment, supplies, labor,
professional services, and increased administrative costs. It shall
consider, based on input received, whether compliance with the rule
will cause businesses to lose sales or revenue. To determine whether
the proposed rule will have a disproportionate cost impact on small
businesses, the impact statement must compare the cost of compliance
for small business with the cost of compliance for the ten percent of
businesses that are the largest businesses required to comply with the
proposed rules using one or more of the following as a basis for
comparing costs:
(a) Cost per employee;
(b) Cost per hour of labor; or
(c) Cost per one hundred dollars of sales.
(2) A small business economic impact statement must also include:
(a) A statement of the steps taken by the agency to reduce the
costs of the rule on small businesses as required by RCW
19.85.030(((3))) (2), or reasonable justification for not doing so,
addressing the options listed in RCW 19.85.030(((3))) (2);
(b) A description of how the agency will involve small businesses
in the development of the rule; and
(c) A list of industries that will be required to comply with the
rule. However, this subsection (2)(c) shall not be construed to
preclude application of the rule to any business or industry to which
it would otherwise apply.
(3) To obtain information for purposes of this section, an agency
may survey a representative sample of affected businesses or trade
associations and should, whenever possible, appoint a committee under
RCW 34.05.310(2) to assist in the accurate assessment of the costs of
a proposed rule, and the means to reduce the costs imposed on small
business.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.85.070 and 1992 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When any rule is proposed for which a small business economic
impact statement is required, the adopting agency shall provide notice
to small businesses of the proposed rule through ((any of the
following)):
(1) Direct notification of known interested small businesses or
trade organizations affected by the proposed rule; ((or))
(2) Providing information of the proposed rule making to
publications likely to be obtained by small businesses of the types
affected by the proposed rule; and
(3) Posting on the agency web site.

Sec. 5 RCW 34.05.671 and 1995 c 403 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The rules review committee may make reports from time to time
to the members of the legislature and to the public with respect to any
of its findings or recommendations. The committee shall keep complete
minutes of its meetings.
(2) The committee may establish ad hoc advisory boards, including
but not limited to, ad hoc economics or science advisory boards to
assist the committee in its rules review functions. The committee
shall establish a small business advisory board to ensure that small
business concerns are reflected in the rules review process.
(3) The committee may hire staff as needed to perform functions
under this chapter.

--- END ---