BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Washington state legislature finds that
the safety of children is paramount and that safety belts on school
buses save lives. Therefore, safety belts for use by every child
riding a school bus must be provided.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.04.521 and 1995 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
School bus means every motor vehicle used regularly to transport
children to and from school or in connection with school activities,
which is subject to the requirements set forth in the most recent
edition of "Specifications for School Buses" published by the state
superintendent of public instruction, but does not include buses
operated by common carriers in urban transportation of school children
((or private carrier buses operated as school buses in the
transportation of children to and from private schools or school
activities)).

Sec. 3 RCW 46.37.510 and 1987 c 330 s 729 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person may sell any automobile manufactured or assembled
after January 1, 1964, nor may any owner cause such vehicle to be
registered thereafter under the provisions of chapter 46.12 RCW unless
such motor car or automobile is equipped with automobile seat belts
installed for use on the front seats thereof which are of a type and
installed in a manner conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol.
Where registration is for transfer from an out-of-state license, the
applicant shall be informed of this section by the issuing agent and
has thirty days to comply. The state patrol shall adopt and enforce
standards as to what constitutes adequate and safe seat belts and for
the fastening and installation of them. Such standards shall not be
below those specified as minimum requirements by the Society of
Automotive Engineers on June 13, 1963.
(2) Every passenger car manufactured or assembled after January 1,
1965, shall be equipped with at least two lap-type safety belt
assemblies for use in the front seating positions.
(3) Every passenger car manufactured or assembled after January 1,
1968, shall be equipped with a lap-type safety belt assembly for each
permanent passenger seating position. This requirement shall not apply
to police vehicles.
(4) Every passenger car manufactured or assembled after January 1,
1968, shall be equipped with at least two shoulder harness-type safety
belt assemblies for use in the front seating positions.
(5) The state patrol shall excuse specified types of motor vehicles
or seating positions within any motor vehicle from the requirements
imposed by subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section when
compliance would be impractical.
(6) Every school bus purchased after June 30, 2005, must provide
safety belts for use by each person riding the bus. The safety belts
must be of a design to provide a lap belt for pelvic restraint and a
shoulder belt to restrain upper torso movement.
(7) No person may distribute, have for sale, offer for sale, or
sell any safety belt or shoulder harness for use in motor vehicles
unless it meets current minimum standards and specifications conforming
to rules adopted by the state patrol or the United States department of
transportation.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.61.440 and 2003 c 192 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to RCW 46.61.400(1), and except in those instances
where a lower maximum lawful speed is provided by this chapter or
otherwise, it shall be unlawful for the operator of any vehicle to
operate the same at a speed in excess of twenty miles per hour when
operating any vehicle upon a highway either inside or outside an
incorporated city or town when passing any marked school or playground
crosswalk when such marked crosswalk is fully posted with standard
school speed limit signs or standard playground speed limit signs. The
speed zone at the crosswalk shall extend three hundred feet in either
direction from the marked crosswalk.
(2) A county or incorporated city or town may create a school or
playground speed zone on a highway bordering a marked school or
playground, in which zone it is unlawful for a person to operate a
vehicle at a speed in excess of twenty miles per hour. The school or
playground speed zone may extend three hundred feet from the border of
the school or playground property; however, the speed zone may only
include area consistent with active school or playground use.
(3) A person found to have committed any infraction relating to
speed restrictions within a school or playground speed zone shall be
assessed a monetary penalty equal to ((twice)) three times the penalty
assessed under RCW 46.63.110. This penalty may not be waived, reduced,
or suspended.
(4) The speed limit established under this section applies between
six a.m. and six p.m., regardless of whether a standard school speed
limit sign or a standard playground speed limit sign requires children
to be present.
(5) The school zone safety account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. ((Fifty percent)) One-third of the moneys collected
under subsection (3) of this section shall be deposited into the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only by the
Washington traffic safety commission solely to fund projects in local
communities to improve school zone safety, pupil transportation safety,
and student safety in school bus loading and unloading areas. Only the
director of the traffic safety commission or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for expenditures until July 1, 1999, after which date moneys
in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
(6) The school bus safety enhancement account is created in the
state treasury. One-third of the moneys collected under subsection (3)
of this section must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for the purposes of RCW 46.37.510(6) regarding
the requirement for seat belts in school buses.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.61.688 and 2003 c 353 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, the term "motor vehicle"
includes:
(a) "Buses," meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except
trailers, designed to carry more than ten passengers, and includes
school buses;
(b) "Multipurpose passenger vehicles," meaning motor vehicles with
motive power, except trailers, designed to carry ten persons or less
that are constructed either on a truck chassis or with special features
for occasional off-road operation;
(c) "Neighborhood electric vehicle," meaning a self-propelled,
electrically powered four-wheeled motor vehicle whose speed attainable
in one mile is more than twenty miles per hour and not more than
twenty-five miles per hour and conforms to federal regulations under
Title 49 C.F.R. Part 571.500;
(d) "Passenger cars," meaning motor vehicles with motive power,
except multipurpose passenger vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers,
designed for carrying ten passengers or less; and
(e) "Trucks," meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except
trailers, designed primarily for the transportation of property.
(2) This section only applies to motor vehicles that meet the
manual seat belt safety standards as set forth in federal motor vehicle
safety standard 208, to school buses, and to neighborhood electric
vehicles. This section does not apply to a vehicle occupant for whom
no safety belt is available when all designated seating positions as
required by federal motor vehicle safety standard 208 are occupied.
(3) Every person sixteen years of age or older operating or riding
in a motor vehicle shall wear the safety belt assembly in a properly
adjusted and securely fastened manner.
(4) No person may operate a motor vehicle unless all child
passengers under the age of sixteen years are either: (a) Wearing a
safety belt assembly or (b) are securely fastened into an approved
child restraint device.
(5) A person violating this section shall be issued a notice of
traffic infraction under chapter 46.63 RCW. A finding that a person
has committed a traffic infraction under this section shall be
contained in the driver's abstract but shall not be available to
insurance companies or employers.
(6) Failure to comply with the requirements of this section does
not constitute negligence, nor may failure to wear a safety belt
assembly be admissible as evidence of negligence in any civil action.
(7) This section does not apply to an operator or passenger who
possesses written verification from a licensed physician that the
operator or passenger is unable to wear a safety belt for physical or
medical reasons.
(8) The state patrol may adopt rules exempting operators or
occupants of farm vehicles, construction equipment, and vehicles that
are required to make frequent stops from the requirement of wearing
safety belts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2007, from the highway safety fund to the
superintendent of public instruction to carry out the purposes of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---