BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.060 and 1998 c 286 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040, and each city within such county, shall adopt development
regulations on or before September 1, 1991, to assure the conservation
of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated under
RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations adopted under this subsection may not
prohibit uses legally existing on any parcel prior to their adoption
and shall remain in effect until the county or city adopts development
regulations pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040. Such regulations shall assure
that the use of lands adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral
resource lands shall not interfere with the continued use, in the
accustomed manner and in accordance with best management practices, of
these designated lands for the production of food, agricultural
products, or timber, or for the extraction of minerals. Counties and
cities shall require that all plats, short plats, development permits,
and building permits issued for development activities on, or within
five hundred feet of, lands designated as agricultural lands, forest
lands, or mineral resource lands, contain a notice that the subject
property is within or near designated agricultural lands, forest lands,
or mineral resource lands on which a variety of commercial activities
may occur that are not compatible with residential development for
certain periods of limited duration. The notice for mineral resource
lands shall also inform that an application might be made for mining-related activities, including mining, extraction, washing, crushing,
stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and recycling of minerals.
(2) Each county and city shall adopt development regulations that
protect critical areas that are required to be designated under RCW
36.70A.170. For counties and cities that are required or choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be
adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the
counties and cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on
or before March 1, 1992.
(3) Such counties and cities shall review these designations and
development regulations when adopting their comprehensive plans under
RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development regulations under RCW
36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and development regulations
to insure consistency.
(4) Forest land and agricultural land located within urban growth
areas shall not be designated by a county or city as forest land or
agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW
36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a program authorizing
transfer or purchase of development rights.
(5)(a) Development regulations adopted under this section may
permit agricultural lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170 that are not
being used for the commercial production of food or other agricultural
products to be used for recreational activities, including, but not
limited to, playing fields for sports played on grass.
(b) Development regulations adopted under this subsection (5) shall
require an amendment to the comprehensive plan required by RCW
36.70A.070, may not permit permanent structures to be erected on the
agricultural land, and may not permit more than one percent of the
designated agricultural land within the jurisdiction as of January 1,
2005, to be used for recreational activities. The regulations may,
however, require the landowner to submit to the legislative authority
of the jurisdiction a plan providing for the resumption of the
commercial production of food or other agricultural products on the
land.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.130 and 2002 c 320 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
shall be subject to continuing review and evaluation by the county or
city that adopted them. A county or city shall take legislative action
to review and, if needed, revise its comprehensive land use plan and
development regulations to ensure the plan and regulations comply with
the requirements of this chapter according to the time periods
specified in subsection (4) of this section. A county or city not
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if
needed, revise its policies and development regulations regarding
critical areas and natural resource lands adopted according to this
chapter to ensure these policies and regulations comply with the
requirements of this chapter according to the time periods specified in
subsection (4) of this section. Legislative action means the adoption
of a resolution or ordinance following notice and a public hearing
indicating at a minimum, a finding that a review and evaluation has
occurred and identifying the revisions made, or that a revision was not
needed and the reasons therefore. The review and evaluation required
by this subsection may be combined with the review required by
subsection (3) of this section. The review and evaluation required by
this subsection shall include, but is not limited to, consideration of
critical area ordinances and, if planning under RCW 36.70A.040, an
analysis of the population allocated to a city or county from the most
recent ten-year population forecast by the office of financial
management.
(b) Any amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan
shall conform to this chapter. Any amendment of or revision to
development regulations shall be consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan.
(2)(a) Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate
to the public a public participation program consistent with RCW
36.70A.035 and 36.70A.140 that identifies procedures and schedules
whereby updates, proposed amendments, or revisions of the comprehensive
plan are considered by the governing body of the county or city no more
frequently than once every year. "Updates" means to review and revise,
if needed, according to subsection (1) of this section, and the time
periods specified in subsection (4) of this section. Amendments may be
considered more frequently than once per year under the following
circumstances:
(i) The initial adoption of a subarea plan that does not modify the
comprehensive plan policies and designations applicable to the subarea;
(ii) The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under
the procedures set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW; ((and))
(iii) The amendment of the capital facilities element of a
comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently with the adoption or
amendment of a county or city budget; and
(iv) The concurrent adoption or amendment of development
regulations authorized by RCW 36.70A.060(5).
(b) Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all
proposals shall be considered by the governing body concurrently so the
cumulative effect of the various proposals can be ascertained.
However, after appropriate public participation a county or city may
adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that conform
with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board
or with the court.
(3) Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW
36.70A.110 shall review, at least every ten years, its designated urban
growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both the
incorporated and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In
conjunction with this review by the county, each city located within an
urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within its
boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within
the county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions
of the urban growth areas. The county comprehensive plan designating
urban growth areas, and the densities permitted in the urban growth
areas by the comprehensive plans of the county and each city located
within the urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the
urban growth projected to occur in the county for the succeeding
twenty-year period. The review required by this subsection may be
combined with the review and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.
(4) The department shall establish a schedule for counties and
cities to take action to review and, if needed, revise their
comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and
regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter. The schedule
established by the department shall provide for the reviews and
evaluations to be completed as follows:
(a) On or before December 1, 2004, and every seven years
thereafter, for Clallam, Clark, Jefferson, King, Kitsap, Pierce,
Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those
counties;
(b) On or before December 1, 2005, and every seven years
thereafter, for Cowlitz, Island, Lewis, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and
Skamania counties and the cities within those counties;
(c) On or before December 1, 2006, and every seven years
thereafter, for Benton, Chelan, Douglas, Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and
Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; and
(d) On or before December 1, 2007, and every seven years
thereafter, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield,
Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille,
Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and the cities
within those counties.
(5)(a) Nothing in this section precludes a county or city from
conducting the review and evaluation required by this section before
the time limits established in subsection (4) of this section.
Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be eligible
for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they
elect to do so.
(b) State agencies are encouraged to provide technical assistance
to the counties and cities in the review of critical area ordinances,
comprehensive plans, and development regulations.
(6) A county or city subject to the time periods in subsection
(4)(a) of this section that, pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the
county or city establishing a schedule for periodic review of its
comprehensive plan and development regulations, has conducted a review
and evaluation of its comprehensive plan and development regulations
and, on or after January 1, 2001, has taken action in response to that
review and evaluation shall be deemed to have conducted the first
review required by subsection (4)(a) of this section. Subsequent
review and evaluation by the county or city of its comprehensive plan
and development regulations shall be conducted in accordance with the
time periods established under subsection (4)(a) of this section.
(7) The requirements imposed on counties and cities under this
section shall be considered "requirements of this chapter" under the
terms of RCW 36.70A.040(1). Only those counties and cities in
compliance with the schedules in this section shall have the requisite
authority to receive grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees
from those accounts established in RCW 43.155.050 and 70.146.030. Only
those counties and cities in compliance with the schedules in this
section shall receive preference for grants or loans subject to the
provisions of RCW 43.17.250.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.177 and 2004 c 207 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county or a city may use a variety of innovative zoning
techniques in areas designated as agricultural lands of long-term
commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170. The innovative zoning
techniques should be designed to conserve agricultural lands and
encourage the agricultural economy. A county or city should encourage
nonagricultural uses to be limited to lands with poor soils or
otherwise not suitable for agricultural purposes.
(2) Innovative zoning techniques a county or city may consider
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Agricultural zoning, which limits the density of development
and restricts or prohibits nonfarm uses of agricultural land and may
allow accessory uses that support, promote, or sustain agricultural
operations and production, as provided in subsection (3) of this
section;
(b) Cluster zoning, which allows new development on one portion of
the land, leaving the remainder in agricultural or open space uses;
(c) Large lot zoning, which establishes as a minimum lot size the
amount of land necessary to achieve a successful farming practice;
(d) Quarter/quarter zoning, which permits one residential dwelling
on a one-acre minimum lot for each one-sixteenth of a section of land;
and
(e) Sliding scale zoning, which allows the number of lots for
single-family residential purposes with a minimum lot size of one acre
to increase inversely as the size of the total acreage increases.
(3)(a) Accessory uses allowed under subsection (2)(a) of this
section shall comply with the following:
(i) Accessory uses shall be located, designed, and operated so as
not to interfere with natural resource land uses and shall be accessory
to the growing of crops or raising of animals;
(ii) Accessory commercial or retail uses shall predominately
produce, store, or sell regionally produced agricultural products from
one or more producers, products derived from regional agricultural
production, agriculturally related experiences, or products produced
on-site. Accessory commercial and retail uses shall offer for sale
predominantly products or services produced on-site; and
(iii) Accessory uses may operate out of existing or new buildings
with parking and other supportive uses consistent with the size and
scale of existing agricultural buildings on the site but shall not
otherwise convert agricultural land to nonagricultural uses.
(b) Accessory uses may include compatible commercial or retail uses
including, but not limited to:
(i) Storage and refrigeration of regional agricultural products;
(ii) Production, sales, and marketing of value-added agricultural
products derived from regional sources;
(iii) Supplemental sources of on-farm income that support and
sustain on-farm agricultural operations and production;
(iv) Support services that facilitate the production, marketing,
and distribution of agricultural products; and
(v) Off-farm and on-farm sales and marketing of predominately
regional agricultural products and experiences, locally made art and
arts and crafts, and ancillary retail sales or service activities.
(4) In accordance with the provisions of RCW 36.70A.060(5), a
county or city may permit agricultural lands designated under RCW
36.70A.170 that are not being used for the commercial production of
food or other agricultural products to be used for recreational
activities, including, but not limited to, playing fields for sports
played on grass.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.58.100 and 1997 c 369 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The master programs provided for in this chapter, when adopted
or approved by the department shall constitute use regulations for the
various shorelines of the state. In preparing the master programs, and
any amendments thereto, the department and local governments shall to
the extent feasible:
(a) Utilize a systematic interdisciplinary approach which will
insure the integrated use of the natural and social sciences and the
environmental design arts;
(b) Consult with and obtain the comments of any federal, state,
regional, or local agency having any special expertise with respect to
any environmental impact;
(c) Consider all plans, studies, surveys, inventories, and systems
of classification made or being made by federal, state, regional, or
local agencies, by private individuals, or by organizations dealing
with pertinent shorelines of the state;
(d) Conduct or support such further research, studies, surveys, and
interviews as are deemed necessary;
(e) Utilize all available information regarding hydrology,
geography, topography, ecology, economics, and other pertinent data;
(f) Employ, when feasible, all appropriate, modern scientific data
processing and computer techniques to store, index, analyze, and manage
the information gathered.
(2) The master programs shall include, when appropriate, the
following:
(a) An economic development element for the location and design of
industries, industrial projects of statewide significance,
transportation facilities, port facilities, tourist facilities,
commerce and other developments that are particularly dependent on
their location on or use of the shorelines of the state;
(b) A public access element making provision for public access to
publicly owned areas;
(c) A recreational element for the preservation and enlargement of
recreational opportunities, including but not limited to parks,
tidelands, beaches, and recreational areas;
(d) A circulation element consisting of the general location and
extent of existing and proposed major thoroughfares, transportation
routes, terminals, and other public utilities and facilities, all
correlated with the shoreline use element;
(e) A use element which considers the proposed general distribution
and general location and extent of the use on shorelines and adjacent
land areas for housing, business, industry, transportation,
agriculture, natural resources, recreation, education, public buildings
and grounds, and other categories of public and private uses of the
land;
(f) A conservation element for the preservation of natural
resources, including but not limited to scenic vistas, aesthetics, and
vital estuarine areas for fisheries and wildlife protection;
(g) An historic, cultural, scientific, and educational element for
the protection and restoration of buildings, sites, and areas having
historic, cultural, scientific, or educational values;
(h) An element that gives consideration to the statewide interest
in the prevention and minimization of flood damages; and
(i) Any other element deemed appropriate or necessary to effectuate
the policy of this chapter.
(3) The master programs shall include such map or maps, descriptive
text, diagrams and charts, or other descriptive material as are
necessary to provide for ease of understanding.
(4) Master programs will reflect that state-owned shorelines of the
state are particularly adapted to providing wilderness beaches,
ecological study areas, and other recreational activities for the
public and will give appropriate special consideration to same.
(5) Each master program shall contain provisions to allow for the
varying of the application of use regulations of the program, including
provisions for permits for conditional uses and variances, to insure
that strict implementation of a program will not create unnecessary
hardships or thwart the policy enumerated in RCW 90.58.020. Any such
varying shall be allowed only if extraordinary circumstances are shown
and the public interest suffers no substantial detrimental effect. The
concept of this subsection shall be incorporated in the rules adopted
by the department relating to the establishment of a permit system as
provided in RCW 90.58.140(3).
(6) Each master program shall contain standards governing the
protection of single family residences and appurtenant structures
against damage or loss due to shoreline erosion. The standards shall
govern the issuance of substantial development permits for shoreline
protection, including structural methods such as construction of
bulkheads, and nonstructural methods of protection. The standards
shall provide for methods which achieve effective and timely protection
against loss or damage to single family residences and appurtenant
structures due to shoreline erosion. The standards shall provide a
preference for permit issuance for measures to protect single family
residences occupied prior to January 1, 1992, where the proposed
measure is designed to minimize harm to the shoreline natural
environment.
(7)(a) Master programs may permit agricultural lands within
shorelines of the state that are not being used for the commercial
production of food or other agricultural products to be used for
recreational activities, including, but not limited to, playing fields
for sports played on grass.
(b) Master programs may not permit permanent structures to be
erected on the agricultural land and may not permit more than one
percent of the agricultural land within the jurisdiction within
shorelines of the state as of January 1, 2005, to be used for
recreational activities. Master programs may, however, require the
landowner to submit to the legislative authority of the jurisdiction a
plan providing for the resumption of the commercial production of food
or other agricultural products on the land.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (7), "agricultural land"
shall have the same meaning as defined in RCW 90.58.065(2)(d).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---