BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.32.010 and 2003 c 111 s 801 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall, whenever at least one statewide
measure or office is scheduled to appear on the primary or general
election ballot, print and distribute a voters' pamphlet.
The secretary of state shall distribute the voters' pamphlet to
each household in the state, to public libraries, and to any other
locations he or she deems appropriate. The secretary of state shall
also produce taped or Braille transcripts of the voters' pamphlet,
publicize their availability, and mail without charge a copy to any
person who requests one.
The secretary of state may make the material required to be
distributed by this chapter available to the public in electronic form.
The secretary of state may provide the material in electronic form to
computer bulletin boards, print and broadcast news media, community
computer networks, and similar services at the cost of reproduction or
transmission of the data.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.32.060 and 2003 c 111 s 806 are each amended to
read as follows:
Committees shall write and submit arguments advocating the approval
or rejection of each statewide ballot issue and rebuttals of those
arguments. The secretary of state, the presiding officer of the
senate, and the presiding officer of the house of representatives shall
appoint ((the)) at least one but not more than two initial ((two))
members of each committee. In making these committee appointments the
secretary of state and presiding officers of the senate and house of
representatives shall consider legislators, sponsors of initiatives and
referendums, and other interested groups known to advocate or oppose
the ballot measure.
The initial ((two)) member or members may select ((up to four))
additional members, and the committee shall elect a chairperson. A
committee may have up to six members. The remaining committee member
or members may fill vacancies through appointment.
After the committee submits its initial argument statements to the
secretary of state, the secretary of state shall transmit the
statements to the opposite committee. The opposite committee may then
prepare rebuttal arguments. Rebuttals may not interject new points.
The voters' pamphlet may contain only argument statements prepared
according to this section. Arguments may contain graphs and charts
supported by factual statistical data and pictures or other
illustrations. Cartoons or caricatures are not permitted.

--- END ---