BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.008 and 2004 c 271 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this title:
(1) "Ballot" means, as the context implies, either:
(a) The issues and offices to be voted upon in a jurisdiction or
portion of a jurisdiction at a particular primary, general election, or
special election;
(b) A facsimile of the contents of a particular ballot whether
printed on a paper ballot or ballot card or as part of a voting machine
or voting device;
(c) A physical or electronic record of the choices of an individual
voter in a particular primary, general election, or special election;
or
(d) The physical document on which the voter's choices are to be
recorded;
(2) "Paper ballot" means a piece of paper on which the ballot for
a particular election or primary has been printed, on which a voter may
record his or her choices for any candidate or for or against any
measure, and that is to be tabulated manually;
(3) "Ballot card" means any type of card or piece of paper of any
size on which a voter may record his or her choices for any candidate
and for or against any measure and that is to be tabulated on a vote
tallying system;
(4) "Sample ballot" means a printed facsimile of all the issues and
offices on the ballot in a jurisdiction and is intended to give voters
notice of the issues, offices, and candidates that are to be voted on
at a particular primary, general election, or special election;
(5) "Provisional ballot" means a ballot issued to a voter at the
polling place on election day by the precinct election board, for one
of the following reasons:
(a) The voter's name does not appear in the poll book;
(b) There is an indication in the poll book that the voter has
requested an absentee ballot, but the voter wishes to vote at the
polling place;
(c) There is a question on the part of the voter concerning the
issues or candidates on which the voter is qualified to vote((;
(6) "Party ballot" means a primary election ballot specific to a
particular major political party that lists all partisan offices to be
voted on at that primary, and the candidates for those offices who
affiliate with that same major political party;
(7) "Nonpartisan ballot" means a primary election ballot that lists
all nonpartisan races and ballot measures to be voted on at that
primary)).

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.04.086 and 2004 c 271 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Major political party" means a political party ((of which at least
one nominee for president, vice president, United States senator, or a
statewide office received at least five percent of the total vote cast
at the last preceding state general election in an even-numbered year.
A political party qualifying as a major political party under this
section retains such status until the next even-year election at which
a candidate of that party does not achieve at least five percent of the
vote for one of the previously specified offices. If none of these
offices appear on the ballot in an even-year general election, the
major party retains its status as a major party through that election.
However, a political party of which no nominee received at least ten
percent of the total vote cast may forgo its status as a major
political party by filing with the secretary of state an appropriate
party rule within sixty days of attaining major party status under this
section, or within fifteen days of June 10, 2004, whichever is later))
identified on the declaration of candidacy of at least one candidate
for statewide office who received at least five percent of the total
votes cast for that office at the last primary or general election in
a year in which the office of governor appeared on the ballot. Once
qualified, a major political party retains that status until the next
primary or general election in a year in which the office of governor
appears on the ballot.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.04.127 and 2005 c 2 s 5 (Initiative Measure No.
872) are each reenacted to read as follows:
"Primary" or "primary election" means a procedure for winnowing
candidates for public office to a final list of two as part of a
special or general election. Each voter has the right to cast a vote
for any candidate for each office without any limitation based on party
preference or affiliation, of either the voter or the candidate.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.04.216 and 2004 c 271 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor of each county shall be ex officio the
supervisor of all primaries and elections, general or special, and it
shall be the county auditor's duty to provide places for holding such
primaries and elections; to appoint the precinct election officers and
to provide for their compensation; to provide the supplies and
materials necessary for the conduct of elections to the precinct
election officers; and to publish and post notices of calling such
primaries and elections in the manner provided by law. The notice of
a ((primary)) general election held in an even-numbered year must
indicate that the office of precinct committee officer will be on the
ballot. The auditor shall also apportion to each city, town, or
district, and to the state of Washington in the odd-numbered year, its
share of the expense of such primaries and elections. This section
does not apply to general or special elections for any city, town, or
district that is not subject to RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330, but all
such elections must be held and conducted at the time, in the manner,
and by the officials (with such notice, requirements for filing for
office, and certifications by local officers) as provided and required
by the laws governing such elections.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.04.310 and 2005 c 2 s 8 (Initiative Measure No.
872) are each reenacted to read as follows:
Primaries for general elections to be held in November must be held
on:
(1) The third Tuesday of the preceding September; or
(2) The seventh Tuesday immediately preceding that general
election, whichever occurs first.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.04.321 and 2004 c 271 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All state, county, city, town, and district general elections
for the election of federal, state, legislative, judicial, county,
city, town, ((and)) district, and precinct officers, and for the
submission to the voters of the state, county, city, town, or district
of any measure for their adoption and approval or rejection, shall be
held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November, in the
year in which they may be called. A statewide general election shall
be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November of each
year. However, the statewide general election held in odd-numbered
years shall be limited to (a) city, town, and district general
elections as provided for in RCW 29A.04.330, or as otherwise provided
by law; (b) the election of federal officers for the remainder of any
unexpired terms in the membership of either branch of the Congress of
the United States; (c) the election of state and county officers for
the remainder of any unexpired terms of offices created by or whose
duties are described in Article II, section 15, Article III, sections
16, 17, 19, 20, 21, 22, and 23, and Article IV, sections 3 and 5 of the
state Constitution and RCW 2.06.080; (d) the election of county
officers in any county governed by a charter containing provisions
calling for general county elections at this time; and (e) the approval
or rejection of state measures, including proposed constitutional
amendments, matters pertaining to any proposed constitutional
convention, initiative measures and referendum measures proposed by the
electorate, referendum bills, and any other matter provided by the
legislature for submission to the electorate.
(2) A county legislative authority may, if it deems an emergency to
exist, call a special county election by presenting a resolution to the
county auditor at least forty-five days prior to the proposed election
date. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a special
election called by the county legislative authority shall be held on
one of the following dates as decided by such governing body:
(a) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;
(b) The second Tuesday in March;
(c) The fourth Tuesday in April;
(d) The third Tuesday in May;
(e) The day of the primary as specified by RCW ((29A.04.311))
29A.04.310; or
(f) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) In addition to the dates set forth in subsection (2)(a) through
(f) of this section, a special election to validate an excess levy or
bond issue may be called at any time to meet the needs resulting from
fire, flood, earthquake, or other act of God. Such county special
election shall be noticed and conducted in the manner provided by law.
(4) In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference
primary is conducted in February, March, April, or May under chapter
29A.56 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called by the
county legislative authority under subsection (2) of this section
during the month of that primary is the date of the presidential
primary.
(5) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all
other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose of this
section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections except
for those elections held pursuant to a home-rule charter adopted under
Article XI, section 4 of the state Constitution. This section shall
not be construed as fixing the time for holding primary elections, or
elections for the recall of any elective public officer.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.08.161 and 2004 c 271 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
No record may be created or maintained by a state or local
governmental agency or a political organization that identifies a voter
with the information marked on the voter's ballot((, including the
choice that a voter makes on a partisan primary ballot regarding
political party affiliation)).

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.20.021 and 2004 c 271 s 153 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person filing a declaration of candidacy for an office shall,
at the time of filing, be a registered voter and possess the
qualifications specified by law for persons who may be elected to the
office.
(2) Excluding the office of precinct committee officer or a
temporary elected position such as a charter review board member or
freeholder, no person may file for more than one office.
(3) The name of a candidate for an office shall not appear on a
ballot for that office unless, except as provided in RCW 3.46.067 and
3.50.057, the candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration of
candidacy is filed, properly registered to vote in the geographic area
represented by the office. For the purposes of this section, each
geographic area in which registered voters may cast ballots for an
office is represented by that office. If a person elected to an office
must be ((nominated)) qualified from a district or similar division of
the geographic area represented by the office, the name of a candidate
for the office shall not appear on a primary ballot for that office
unless the candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration of
candidacy is filed, properly registered to vote in that district or
division. The officer with whom declarations of candidacy must be
filed under this title shall review each such declaration filed
regarding compliance with this subsection.
(4) The requirements of voter registration and residence within the
geographic area of a district do not apply to candidates for
congressional office. Qualifications for the United States congress
are specified in the United States Constitution.

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.20.121 and 2004 c 271 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) Any nomination of a candidate for partisan public office by
other than a major political party may be made only: (a) In a
convention held not earlier than the last Saturday in June and not
later than the first Saturday in July or during any of the seven days
immediately preceding the first day for filing declarations of
candidacy as fixed in accordance with RCW 29A.28.041; (b) as provided
by RCW 29A.60.021; or (c) as otherwise provided in this section.))
Minor political party and independent candidates for president and vice
president of the United States may appear only on the general election
ballot.
(((2))) Nominations of candidates for president and vice president
of the United States other than by a major political party ((may)) must
be made ((either at a convention conducted under subsection (1) of this
section, or)) at ((a similar)) conventions ((taking place)) held not
earlier than the first Sunday in July and not later than seventy days
before the general election. ((Conventions held during this time
period may not nominate candidates for any public office other than
president and vice president of the United States, except as provided
in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) If a special filing period for a partisan office is opened
under RCW 29A.24.211, candidates of minor political parties and
independent candidates may file for office during that special filing
period. The names of those candidates may not appear on the general
election ballot unless they are nominated by convention held no later
than five days after the close of the special filing period and a
certificate of nomination is filed with the filing officer no later
than three days after the convention. The requirements of RCW
29A.20.131 do not apply to such a convention.
(4) A minor political party may hold more than one convention but
in no case shall any such party nominate more than one candidate for
any one partisan public office or position. For the purpose of
nominating candidates for the offices of president and vice president,
United States senator, United States representative, or a statewide
office, a minor party or independent candidate holding multiple
conventions may add together the number of signatures of different
individuals from each convention obtained in support of the candidate
or candidates in order to obtain the number required by RCW 29A.20.141.
For all other offices for which nominations are made, signatures of the
requisite number of registered voters must be obtained at a single
convention.))

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.20.130 and 2003 c 111 s 507 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each minor party or independent candidate seeking nomination for
president or vice president must publish a notice in a newspaper of
general circulation within ((the)) each county in which the party or
the candidate intends to hold a convention. The notice must appear at
least ten days before the convention is to be held, and shall state the
date, time, and place of the convention. Additionally, it shall
include the mailing address of the person or organization sponsoring
the convention.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.20.141 and 2004 c 271 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) To be valid, a convention must be attended by at least one
hundred registered voters.
(2))) In order to nominate candidates for the offices of president
and vice president of the United States, ((United States senator,
United States representative, or any statewide office, a nominating
convention shall obtain and submit to the filing officer)) the
signatures of at least ((one thousand)) two hundred fifty registered
voters of the state of Washington must be obtained at nominating
conventions and submitted to the secretary of state. ((In order to
nominate candidates for any other office, a nominating convention shall
obtain and submit to the filing officer the signatures of one hundred
persons who are registered to vote in the jurisdiction of the office
for which the nominations are made.))

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.20.151 and 2004 c 271 s 112 are each amended to
read as follows:
A nominating petition submitted under this chapter shall clearly
identify the names of the minor party or independent candidates
((convention as it appears on the certificate of nomination as required
by RCW 29A.20.161(3))). The petition shall also contain a statement
that the person signing the petition is a registered voter of the state
of Washington and shall have a space for the voter to sign his or her
name and to print his or her name and address. ((No person may sign
more than one nominating petition under this chapter for an office for
an election.)) The nominating petition must be submitted to the
secretary of state not later than ten days after adjournment of the
convention.

Sec. 13 RCW 29A.20.161 and 2004 c 271 s 154 are each amended to
read as follows:
A certificate evidencing nominations of candidates for the offices
of president and vice president made at a convention must:
(1) Be in writing;
(2) Contain the name of each person nominated, ((his or her
residence, and the office for which he or she is named, and if the
nomination is for the offices of president and vice president of the
United States,)) their addresses, and a sworn statement from both
nominees giving their consent to the nomination;
(3) Identify the minor political party or the independent candidate
on whose behalf the convention was held;
(4) Be verified by the oath of the presiding officer and secretary;
(5) Be accompanied by a nominating petition or petitions bearing
the signatures and addresses of registered voters equal in number to
that required by RCW 29A.20.141;
(6) Contain proof of publication of the notice of calling the
convention; and
(7) Be submitted to the ((appropriate filing officer)) secretary of
state not later than ((one week)) ten days following the adjournment of
the convention at which the nominations were made. ((If the
nominations are made only for offices whose jurisdiction is entirely
within one county, the certificate and nominating petitions must be
filed with the county auditor. If a minor party or independent
candidate convention nominates any candidates for offices whose
jurisdiction encompasses more than one county, all nominating petitions
and the convention certificates must be filed with the secretary of
state.))

Sec. 14 RCW 29A.20.171 and 2004 c 271 s 155 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If two or more valid certificates of nomination are filed
purporting to nominate different candidates for ((the same position))
president and vice president using the same party name, the filing
officer must give effect to both certificates. If conflicting claims
to the party name are not resolved either by mutual agreement or by a
judicial determination of the right to the name, the candidates must be
treated as independent candidates. Disputes over the right to the name
must not be permitted to delay the printing of either ballots or a
voters' pamphlet. ((Other candidates nominated by the same conventions
may continue to use the partisan affiliation unless a court of
competent jurisdiction directs otherwise.))
(2) A person affected may petition the superior court of the county
in which the filing officer is located for a judicial determination of
the right to the name of a minor political party, either before or
after documents are filed with the filing officer. The court shall
resolve the conflict between competing claims to the use of the same
party name according to the following principles: (a) The prior
established public use of the name during previous elections by a party
composed of or led by the same individuals or individuals in documented
succession; (b) prior established public use of the name earlier in the
same election cycle; (c) ((the nomination of a more complete slate of
candidates for a number of offices or in a number of different regions
of the state; (d))) documented affiliation with a national or statewide
party organization with an established use of the name; (((e))) (d) the
first date of filing of a certificate of nomination; and (((f))) (e)
such other indicia of an established right to use of the name as the
court may deem relevant. ((If more than one filing officer is
involved, and one of them is the secretary of state, the petition must
be filed in the superior court for Thurston county.)) Upon resolving
the conflict between competing claims, the court may also address any
ballot designation for the candidate who does not prevail.

Sec. 15 RCW 29A.20.181 and 2004 c 271 s 156 are each amended to
read as follows:
A minor political party or independent candidate convention
nominating candidates for the offices of president and vice president
of the United States shall, not later than ten days after the
adjournment of the convention, submit a list of presidential electors
to the office of the secretary of state. The list shall contain the
names and the mailing addresses of the persons selected and shall be
verified by the ((presiding officer of the convention)) candidates
named on the nominating petition.

Sec. 16 RCW 29A.20.191 and 2004 c 271 s 157 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the receipt of the ((certificate of nomination)) nominating
petition, the ((officer with whom it is filed shall check the
certificate and)) secretary of state shall canvass the signatures ((on
the accompanying nominating petitions to determine if the requirements
of RCW 29A.20.141 have been met)). Once the determination of the
sufficiency of the petitions has been made, the ((filing officer))
secretary of state shall notify the ((presiding officer of the
convention)) candidates and any other persons requesting ((the))
notification((, of his or her decision regarding the sufficiency of the
certificate or the nominating petitions)). Any appeal regarding the
((filing officer's)) secretary of state's determination must be filed
((with)) in the superior court ((of the)) for Thurston county ((in
which the certificate or petitions were filed)) not later than five
days from the date the determination is made, and shall be heard and
finally disposed of by the court within five days of the filing.
Nominating petitions shall not be available for public inspection or
copying.

Sec. 17 RCW 29A.24.030 and 2005 c 2 s 9 (Initiative Measure No.
872) are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
A candidate who desires to have his or her name printed on the
ballot for election to an office other than president of the United
States, vice president of the United States, or an office for which
ownership of property is a prerequisite to voting shall complete and
file a declaration of candidacy. The secretary of state shall adopt,
by rule, a declaration of candidacy form for the office of precinct
committee officer and a separate standard form for candidates for all
other offices filing under this chapter. Included on the standard form
shall be:
(1) A place for the candidate to declare that he or she is a
registered voter within the jurisdiction of the office for which he or
she is filing, and the address at which he or she is registered;
(2) A place for the candidate to indicate the position for which he
or she is filing;
(3) For partisan offices only, a place for the candidate to
indicate his or her major or minor party preference, or independent
status;
(4) A place for the candidate to indicate the amount of the filing
fee accompanying the declaration of candidacy or for the candidate to
indicate that he or she is filing a ((nominating)) petition in lieu of
the filing fee under RCW ((29A.24.090)) 29A.24.091;
(5) A place for the candidate to sign the declaration of candidacy,
stating that the information provided on the form is true and swearing
or affirming that he or she will support the Constitution and laws of
the United States and the Constitution and laws of the state of
Washington.
In the case of a declaration of candidacy filed electronically,
submission of the form constitutes agreement that the information
provided with the filing is true, that he or she will support the
Constitutions and laws of the United States and the state of
Washington, and that he or she agrees to electronic payment of the
filing fee established in RCW ((29A.24.090)) 29A.24.091.
The secretary of state may require any other information on the
form he or she deems appropriate to facilitate the filing process.

Sec. 18 RCW 29A.24.081 and 2004 c 271 s 159 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any candidate may mail his or her declaration of candidacy for an
office to the filing officer. Such declarations of candidacy shall be
processed by the filing officer in the following manner:
(1) Any declaration received by the filing officer by mail before
the tenth business day immediately preceding the first day for
candidates to file for office shall be returned to the candidate
submitting it, together with a notification that the declaration of
candidacy was received too early to be processed. The candidate shall
then be permitted to resubmit his or her declaration of candidacy
during the filing period.
(2) Any properly executed declaration of candidacy received by mail
on or after the tenth business day immediately preceding the first day
for candidates to file for office and before the close of business on
the last day of the filing period shall be included with filings made
in person during the filing period. ((In partisan and judicial
elections)) The filing officer shall determine by lot the order in
which the names of ((those)) candidates shall appear upon sample and
absentee primary ballots.
(3) Any declaration of candidacy received by the filing officer
after the close of business on the last day for candidates to file for
office shall be rejected and returned to the candidate attempting to
file it.

Sec. 19 RCW 29A.24.091 and 2004 c 271 s 160 are each amended to
read as follows:
A filing fee of one dollar shall accompany each declaration of
candidacy for precinct committee officer; a filing fee of ten dollars
shall accompany the declaration of candidacy for any office with a
fixed annual salary of one thousand dollars or less; a filing fee equal
to one percent of the annual salary of the office at the time of filing
shall accompany the declaration of candidacy for any office with a
fixed annual salary of more than one thousand dollars per annum. No
filing fee need accompany a declaration of candidacy for any office for
which compensation is on a per diem or per meeting attended basis.
A candidate who lacks sufficient assets or income at the time of
filing to pay the filing fee required by this section shall submit with
his or her declaration of candidacy a ((nominating)) filing petition.
The petition shall contain not less than a number of signatures of
registered voters equal to the number of dollars of the filing fee.
The signatures shall be of voters registered to vote within the
jurisdiction of the office for which the candidate is filing.
When the candidacy is for:
(1) A legislative or judicial office that includes territory from
more than one county, the fee shall be paid to the secretary of state
for equal division between the treasuries of the counties comprising
the district.
(2) A city or town office, the fee shall be paid to the county
auditor who shall transmit it to the city or town clerk for deposit in
the city or town treasury.

Sec. 20 RCW 29A.24.101 and 2004 c 271 s 114 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((nominating)) filing petition authorized by RCW 29A.24.091
must be printed on sheets of uniform color and size, must include a
place for each individual to sign and print his or her name and the
address, city, and county at which he or she is registered to vote,
((and)) must contain no more than twenty numbered lines((.
(2) For candidates for nonpartisan office and candidates of a major
political party for partisan office, the nominating petition)), and
must be in substantially the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

We, the undersigned registered voters of (the state of
Washington or the political subdivision for which the ((nomination))
filing is made) , hereby petition that the name of (candidate's
name) be printed on the official primary ballot for the office of
(insert name of office) .

(((3) For independent candidates and candidates of a minor
political party for partisan office, the nominating petition must be in
substantially the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

We, the undersigned registered voters of (the state of
Washington or the political subdivision for which the nomination is
made) , hereby petition that the name of (candidate's name) be
printed on the official general election ballot for the office of
(insert name of office) .))
(2) If the candidate listed a political party on the declaration of
candidacy, the name of that party must appear on the filing petition.

Sec. 21 RCW 29A.24.111 and 2004 c 271 s 161 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Nominating)) Filing petitions may be rejected for the following
reasons:
(1) The petition is not in the proper form;
(2) The petition clearly bears insufficient signatures;
(3) The petition is not accompanied by a declaration of candidacy;
(4) The time within which the petition and the declaration of
candidacy could have been filed has expired.
If the petition is accepted, the officer with whom it is filed
shall canvass the signatures contained on it and shall reject the
signatures of those persons who are not registered voters and the
signatures of those persons who are not registered to vote within the
jurisdiction of the office for which the ((nominating)) filing petition
is filed. He or she shall additionally reject any signature that
appears on the ((nominating)) filing petitions of two or more
candidates for the same office and shall also reject, each time it
appears, the name of any person who signs the same petition more than
once.
If the officer with whom the petition is filed refuses to accept
the petition or refuses to certify the petition as bearing sufficient
valid signatures, the person filing the petition may appeal that action
to the superior court. The application for judicial review shall take
precedence over other cases and matters and shall be speedily heard and
determined.

Sec. 22 RCW 29A.24.131 and 2004 c 271 s 115 are each amended to
read as follows:
A candidate may withdraw his or her declaration of candidacy at any
time before the close of business on the Thursday following the last
day for candidates to file under RCW 29A.24.050 by filing, with the
officer with whom the declaration of candidacy was filed, a signed
request that his or her name not be printed on the ballot. There shall
be no withdrawal period for declarations of candidacy filed during
special filing periods held under this title. The filing officer may
permit the withdrawal of a filing for the office of precinct committee
officer at the request of the candidate at any time if no absentee
ballots have been issued for that office and the general election
ballots for that precinct have not been printed. The filing officer
may permit the withdrawal of a filing for any elected office of a city,
town, or special district at the request of the candidate at any time
before a primary if the primary ballots for that city, town, or special
district have not been ordered. No filing fee may be refunded to any
candidate who withdraws under this section. Notice of the deadline for
withdrawal of candidacy and that the filing fee is not refundable shall
be given to each candidate at the time he or she files.

Sec. 23 RCW 29A.24.141 and 2004 c 271 s 162 are each amended to
read as follows:
A void in candidacy for ((a nonpartisan)) an office occurs when an
election for such office, except for the short term, has been scheduled
and no valid declaration of candidacy has been filed for the position
or all persons filing such valid declarations of candidacy have died or
been disqualified.

Sec. 24 RCW 29A.24.151 and 2004 c 271 s 163 are each amended to
read as follows:
The election officer with whom declarations of candidacy are filed
shall give notice of a void in candidacy for ((a nonpartisan)) an
office((,)) by notifying press, radio, and television in the county
((and by such other means as may now or hereafter be provided by law))
or counties involved. The notice shall state the office, and the time
and place for filing declarations of candidacy.

Sec. 25 RCW 29A.24.161 and 2004 c 271 s 164 are each amended to
read as follows:
Filings to fill a void in candidacy ((for nonpartisan office)) must
be made in the same manner and with the same official as required
during the regular filing period for such office((, except that
nominating signature petitions that may be required of candidates
filing for certain district offices during the normal filing period may
not be required of candidates filing during the special three-day
filing period)).

Sec. 26 RCW 29A.24.171 and 2004 c 271 s 165 are each amended to
read as follows:
Filings for ((a nonpartisan)) an office shall be reopened for a
period of three normal business days, such three-day period to be fixed
by the election officer with whom such declarations of candidacy are
filed and notice thereof given by notifying press, radio, and
television in the county ((and by such other means as may now or
hereafter be provided by law)) or counties involved whenever before the
sixth Tuesday prior to a primary:
(1) A void in candidacy occurs;
(2) A vacancy occurs in ((any nonpartisan)) an office leaving an
unexpired term to be filled by an election for which filings have not
been held; or
(3) A ((nominee)) candidate for judge of the superior court
entitled to a certificate of election pursuant to Article 4, section
29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution, dies or is disqualified.
Candidacies validly filed within said three-day period shall appear
on the ballot as if made during the earlier filing period.

Sec. 27 RCW 29A.24.181 and 2004 c 271 s 166 are each amended to
read as follows:
Filings for ((a nonpartisan)) an office (other than judge of the
supreme court or superintendent of public instruction) shall be
reopened for a period of three normal business days, such three-day
period to be fixed by the election officer with whom such declarations
of candidacy are filed and notice thereof given by notifying press,
radio, and television in the county ((and by such other means as may
now or hereafter be provided by law)) or counties, when:
(1) A void in candidacy ((for such nonpartisan office)) occurs on
or after the sixth Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the sixth
Tuesday before an election; or
(2) A ((nominee)) candidate for judge of the superior court
eligible after a contested primary for a certificate of election by
Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution, dies or
is disqualified within the ten-day period immediately following the
last day allotted for a candidate to withdraw; or
(3) A vacancy occurs in ((any nonpartisan)) an office on or after
the sixth Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the sixth Tuesday
before an election leaving an unexpired term to be filled by an
election for which filings have not been held.
The candidate receiving a plurality of the votes cast for that
office in the general election shall be deemed elected.

Sec. 28 RCW 29A.24.191 and 2004 c 271 s 167 are each amended to
read as follows:
A scheduled election shall ((be lapsed)) lapse, the office deemed
stricken from the ballot, no purported write-in votes counted, and no
candidate certified as elected, when:
(1) In an election for judge of the supreme court or superintendent
of public instruction, a void in candidacy occurs on or after the sixth
Tuesday prior to a primary, public filings and the primary being an
indispensable phase of the election process for such offices;
(2) Except as otherwise specified in RCW 29A.24.181, a ((nominee))
candidate for judge of the superior court entitled to a certificate of
election pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state
Constitution dies or is disqualified on or after the sixth Tuesday
prior to a primary;
(3) ((In other elections for nonpartisan office)) A void in
candidacy occurs or a vacancy occurs involving an unexpired term to be
filled on or after the sixth Tuesday prior to an election.

Sec. 29 RCW 29A.24.210 and 2005 c 2 s 10 (Initiative Measure No.
872) are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Filings for a partisan elective office shall be opened for a period
of three normal business days whenever, on or after the first day of
the regular filing period and before the sixth Tuesday prior to an
election, a vacancy occurs in that office, leaving an unexpired term to
be filled by an election for which filings have not been held.
Any special three-day filing period shall be fixed by the election
officer with whom declarations of candidacy for that office are filed.
The election officer shall give notice of the special three-day filing
period by notifying the press, radio, and television in the county or
counties involved, and by any other means as may be required by law.
Candidacies validly filed within the special three-day filing
period shall appear on the primary or general election ballot as if
filed during the regular filing period.
The procedures for filings for partisan offices where a vacancy
occurs under this section or a void in candidacy occurs under RCW
((29A.24.140)) 29A.24.141 must be substantially similar to the
procedures for nonpartisan offices under RCW ((29A.24.150)) 29A.24.151
through 29A.24.170.

Sec. 30 RCW 29A.24.311 and 2004 c 271 s 117 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who desires to be a write-in candidate and have such
votes counted at a primary or election may file a declaration of
candidacy with the officer designated in RCW 29A.24.070 not later than
the day before the primary or election. Declarations of candidacy for
write-in candidates must be accompanied by a filing fee in the same
manner as required of other candidates filing for the office as
provided in RCW 29A.24.091.
Votes cast for write-in candidates who have filed such declarations
of candidacy ((and write-in votes for persons appointed by major
political parties pursuant to RCW 29A.28.021)) need only specify the
name of the candidate in the appropriate location on the ballot in
order to be counted. Write-in votes cast for any other candidate, in
order to be counted, must designate the office sought and position
number ((or political party)), if the manner in which the write-in is
done does not make the office or position clear.
No person may file as a write-in candidate where:
(1) At a general election, the person attempting to file either
filed as a write-in candidate for the same office at the preceding
primary or the person's name appeared on the ballot for the same office
at the preceding primary;
(2) The person attempting to file as a write-in candidate has
already filed a valid write-in declaration for that primary or
election, unless one or the other of the two filings is for the office
of precinct committeeperson;
(3) The name of the person attempting to file already appears on
the ballot as a candidate for another office, unless one of the two
offices for which he or she is a candidate is precinct committeeperson.
The declaration of candidacy shall be similar to that required by
RCW ((29A.24.031)) 29A.24.030. No write-in candidate filing under this
section may be included in any voter's pamphlet produced under chapter
29A.32 RCW unless that candidate qualifies to have his or her name
printed on the general election ballot. The legislative authority of
any jurisdiction producing a local voter's pamphlet under chapter
29A.32 RCW may provide, by ordinance, for the inclusion of write-in
candidates in such pamphlets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 A new section is added to chapter 29A.28
RCW to read as follows:
If the death or disqualification of a candidate for a partisan or
nonpartisan office does not give rise to the opening of a new filing
period under RCW 29A.24.171, then the following will occur:
(1) If the candidate dies or becomes disqualified after filing a
declaration of candidacy but before the close of the filing period,
then the declaration of candidacy is void and his or her name will not
appear on the ballot;
(2) If the candidate dies or becomes disqualified after the close
of the filing period but before the day of the primary, then his or her
name will appear on the primary ballot and all otherwise valid votes
for that candidate will be tabulated. The candidate's name will not
appear on the general election ballot even if he or she otherwise would
have qualified to do so, but no other candidate will advance, or be
substituted, in the place of that candidate. If the candidate was the
only candidate to qualify to advance to the general election, then the
general election for that office lapses, and the office will be
regarded as vacant as of the time the newly elected official would have
otherwise taken office;
(3) If the candidate dies or becomes disqualified on or after the
day of the primary, and he or she would have otherwise qualified to
appear on the general election ballot, then his or her name will appear
on the general election ballot and all otherwise valid votes for that
candidate will be tabulated. If the candidate received a number of
votes sufficient to be elected to office, but for his or her death or
disqualification, then the office will be regarded as vacant as of the
time the newly elected official would have otherwise taken office.

Sec. 32 RCW 29A.28.041 and 2004 c 271 s 118 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the United States house of
representatives or the United States senate from this state, the
governor shall order a special election to fill the vacancy. ((Minor
political party candidates and independent candidates may be nominated
through the convention procedures provided in chapter 29A.20 RCW.))
(2) Within ten days of such vacancy occurring, he or she shall
issue a writ of election fixing a date for the special vacancy election
not less than ninety days after the issuance of the writ, fixing a date
for the primary for ((nominating major political party)) qualifying
candidates for the special vacancy election not less than thirty days
before the day fixed for holding the special vacancy election, fixing
the dates for the special filing period, and designating the term or
part of the term for which the vacancy exists. If the vacancy is in
the office of United States representative, the writ of election shall
specify the congressional district that is vacant.
(3) If the vacancy occurs less than six months before a state
general election and before the second Friday following the close of
the filing period for that general election, the special primary((,))
and special vacancy election((, and minor party and independent
candidate nominating conventions)) must be held in concert with the
state primary and state general election in that year.
(4) If the vacancy occurs on or after the first day for filing
under RCW 29A.24.050 and on or before the second Friday following the
close of the filing period, a special filing period of three normal
business days shall be fixed by the governor and notice thereof given
to all media, including press, radio, and television within the area in
which the vacancy election is to be held, to the end that, insofar as
possible, all interested persons will be aware of such filing period.
The last day of the filing period shall not be later than the third
Tuesday before the primary ((at which major political party candidates
are to be nominated)). The names of ((major political party))
candidates who have filed valid declarations of candidacy during this
three-day period shall appear on the approaching primary ballot. ((The
requirements of RCW 29A.20.131 do not apply to a minor political party
or independent candidate convention held under this subsection.))
(5) If the vacancy occurs later than the second Friday following
the close of the filing period, a special primary((,)) and special
vacancy election((, and the minor party and independent candidate
conventions)) to fill the position shall be held after the next state
general election but, in any event, no later than the ninetieth day
following the November election.

Sec. 33 RCW 29A.28.061 and 2004 c 271 s 119 are each amended to
read as follows:
The general election laws and laws relating to ((partisan))
primaries ((shall)) for partisan offices apply to the special primaries
and vacancy elections provided for in this chapter ((29A.28 RCW)) to
the extent that they are not inconsistent with the provisions of these
sections. ((Minor political party and independent candidates may
appear only on the general election ballot.)) Statutory time deadlines
relating to availability of absentee ballots, certification,
canvassing, and related procedures that cannot be met in a timely
fashion may be modified for the purposes of a specific primary or
vacancy election under this chapter by the secretary of state through
emergency rules adopted under RCW 29A.04.611.

Sec. 34 RCW 29A.28.071 and 2004 c 271 s 120 are each amended to
read as follows:
If a vacancy occurs in the office of precinct committee officer by
reason of death, resignation, or disqualification of the incumbent, or
because of failure to elect, the respective county chair of the county
central committee shall fill the vacancy by appointment. However, in
a legislative district having a majority of its precincts in a county
with a population of one million or more, the appointment may be made
only upon the recommendation of the legislative district chair. The
person so appointed must have the same qualifications as candidates
when filing for election to the office for that precinct. When a
vacancy in the office of precinct committee officer exists because of
failure to elect at a state ((primary)) general election, the vacancy
may not be filled until after the organization meeting of the county
central committee and the new county chair has been selected as
provided by RCW 29A.80.030.

Sec. 35 RCW 29A.32.031 and 2004 c 271 s 121 are each amended to
read as follows:
The voters' pamphlet must contain:
(1) Information about each ballot measure initiated by or referred
to the voters for their approval or rejection as required by RCW
29A.32.070;
(2) In even-numbered years, statements, if submitted, advocating
the ((candidacies of nominees)) candidates qualified to appear on the
general election ballot for the offices of president and vice president
of the United States, United States senator, United States
representative, governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state,
state treasurer, state auditor, attorney general, commissioner of
public lands, superintendent of public instruction, insurance
commissioner, state senator, state representative, justice of the
supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, or judge of the superior
court. Candidates may also submit a campaign mailing address and
telephone number and a photograph not more than five years old and of
a size and quality that the secretary of state determines to be
suitable for reproduction in the voters' pamphlet;
(3) In odd-numbered years, if any office voted upon statewide
appears on the ballot due to a vacancy, then statements and photographs
for candidates for any vacant office listed in subsection (2) of this
section must appear;
(4) In even-numbered years, a section explaining how voters may
participate in the election campaign process; the address and telephone
number of the public disclosure commission established under RCW
42.17.350; and a summary of the disclosure requirements that apply when
contributions are made to candidates and political committees;
(5) In even-numbered years the name, address, and telephone number
of each political party ((with nominees listed in the pamphlet, if
filed with the secretary of state by the state committee of a major
political party or the presiding officer of the convention of a minor
political party)) for which a candidate appearing on the ballot has
expressed a preference on his or her declaration of candidacy, if the
party has provided that information to the secretary of state;
(6) In each odd-numbered year immediately before a year in which a
president of the United States is to be nominated and elected,
information explaining the precinct caucus and convention process used
by each major political party to elect delegates to its national
presidential candidate nominating convention. The pamphlet must also
provide a description of the statutory procedures by which minor
political parties are formed and the statutory methods used by the
parties to nominate candidates for president;
(7) In even-numbered years, a description of the office of precinct
committee officer and its duties;
(8) An application form for an absentee ballot;
(((8))) (9) A brief statement explaining the deletion and addition
of language for proposed measures under RCW 29A.32.080;
(((9))) (10) Any additional information pertaining to elections as
may be required by law or in the judgment of the secretary of state is
deemed informative to the voters.

Sec. 36 RCW 29A.32.121 and 2004 c 271 s 168 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The maximum number of words for statements submitted by
candidates is as follows: State representative, one hundred words;
state senator, judge of the superior court, judge of the court of
appeals, justice of the supreme court, and all state offices voted upon
throughout the state, except that of governor, two hundred words;
president and vice president, United States senator, United States
representative, and governor, three hundred words.
(2) Arguments written by committees under RCW 29A.32.060 may not
exceed two hundred fifty words in length.
(3) Rebuttal arguments written by committees may not exceed
seventy-five words in length.
(4) The secretary of state shall allocate space in the pamphlet
based on the number of candidates ((or nominees)) for each office.

Sec. 37 RCW 29A.32.241 and 2004 c 271 s 123 are each amended to
read as follows:
The local voters' pamphlet shall include but not be limited to the
following:
(1) Appearing on the cover, the words "official local voters'
pamphlet," the name of the jurisdiction producing the pamphlet, and the
date of the election or primary;
(2) A list of jurisdictions that have measures or candidates in the
pamphlet;
(3) Information on how a person may register to vote and obtain an
absentee ballot;
(4) The text of each measure accompanied by an explanatory
statement prepared by the prosecuting attorney for any county measure
or by the attorney for the jurisdiction submitting the measure if other
than a county measure. All explanatory statements for city, town, or
district measures not approved by the attorney for the jurisdiction
submitting the measure shall be reviewed and approved by the county
prosecuting attorney or city attorney, when applicable, before
inclusion in the pamphlet; and
(5) The arguments for and against each measure submitted by
committees selected pursuant to RCW 29A.32.280((; and
(6) For partisan primary elections, information on how to vote the
applicable ballot format and an explanation that minor political party
candidates and independent candidates will appear only on the general
election ballot)).

Sec. 38 RCW 29A.36.010 and 2005 c 2 s 12 (Initiative Measure No.
872) are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
On or before the day following the last day allowed for candidates
to withdraw under RCW ((29A.24.130)) 29A.24.131, the secretary of state
shall certify to each county auditor a list of the candidates who have
filed declarations of candidacy in his or her office for the primary.
For each office, the certificate shall include the name of each
candidate, his or her address, and his or her party preference or
independent designation as shown on filed declarations.

Sec. 39 RCW 29A.36.071 and 2004 c 271 s 169 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided to the contrary in RCW 82.14.036, 82.46.021,
or 82.80.090, the ballot title of any referendum filed on an enactment
or portion of an enactment of a local government and any other question
submitted to the voters of a local government consists of three
elements: (a) An identification of the enacting legislative body and
a statement of the subject matter; (b) a concise description of the
measure; and (c) a question. The ballot title must conform with the
requirements and be displayed substantially as provided under RCW
29A.72.050, except that the concise description must not exceed
seventy-five words. If the local governmental unit is a city or a
town, the concise statement shall be prepared by the city or town
attorney. If the local governmental unit is a county, the concise
statement shall be prepared by the prosecuting attorney of the county.
If the unit is a unit of local government other than a city, town, or
county, the concise statement shall be prepared by the prosecuting
attorney of the county within which the majority area of the unit is
located.
(2) A referendum measure on the enactment of a unit of local
government shall be advertised in the manner provided for ((nominees))
candidates for elective office.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if another
provision of law specifies the ballot title for a specific type of
ballot question or proposition.

Sec. 40 RCW 29A.36.101 and 2004 c 271 s 125 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except for the candidates for the positions of president and vice
president((,)) or for a partisan or nonpartisan office for which no
primary is required, ((or for independent or minor party candidates,))
the names of all candidates who, under this title, filed a declaration
of candidacy ((or were certified as a candidate to fill a vacancy on a
major party ticket)) will appear on the appropriate ballot at the
primary throughout the jurisdiction ((in which they are to be
nominated)) of the office for which they are a candidate.

Sec. 41 RCW 29A.36.121 and 2004 c 271 s 129 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(((a))) The positions or offices on a primary ((consolidated))
ballot shall be arranged in substantially the following order: United
States senator; United States representative; governor; lieutenant
governor; secretary of state; state treasurer; state auditor; attorney
general; commissioner of public lands; superintendent of public
instruction; insurance commissioner; state senator; state
representative; county officers; justices of the supreme court; judges
of the court of appeals; judges of the superior court; and judges of
the district court. For all other jurisdictions on the primary
((consolidated)) ballot, the offices in each jurisdiction shall be
grouped together and be in the order of the position numbers assigned
to those offices, if any.
(((b)(i) The positions or offices on a primary party ballot must be
arranged in substantially the following order: United States senator;
United States representative; governor; lieutenant governor; secretary
of state; state treasurer; state auditor; attorney general;
commissioner of public lands; insurance commissioner; state senator;
state representative; and partisan county officers. For all other
jurisdictions on the primary party ballot, the offices in each
jurisdiction must be grouped together and be in the order of the
position numbers assigned to those offices, if any.
(ii) The positions or offices on a primary nonpartisan ballot must
be arranged in substantially the following order: Superintendent of
public instruction; justices of the supreme court; judges of the court
of appeals; judges of the superior court; and judges of the district
court. For all other jurisdictions on the primary nonpartisan ballot,
the offices in each jurisdiction must be grouped together and be in the
order of the position numbers assigned to those offices, if any.))
(2) The order of the positions or offices on ((an)) a general
election ballot shall be substantially the same as on a primary
((consolidated)) ballot except that state ballot issues must be placed
before all offices. The offices of president and vice president of the
United States shall precede all other offices on a presidential
election ballot. The positions on a ballot to be assigned to ballot
measures regarding local units of government shall be established by
the secretary of state by rule.
(3) The political party or independent candidacy of each candidate
for partisan office shall be indicated next to the name of the
candidate on the primary ((and)) or general election ballot. ((A
candidate shall file a written notice with the filing officer within
three business days after the close of the filing period designating
the political party to be indicated next to the candidate's name on the
ballot if either: (a) The candidate has been nominated by two or more
minor political parties or independent conventions; or (b) the
candidate has both filed a declaration of candidacy declaring an
affiliation with a major political party and been nominated by a minor
political party or independent convention. If no written notice is
filed the filing officer shall give effect to the party designation
shown upon the first document filed. A candidate may be deemed
nominated by a minor party or independent convention only if all
documentation required by chapter 29A.20 RCW has been timely filed.))

Sec. 42 RCW 29A.36.131 and 2004 c 271 s 130 are each amended to
read as follows:
After the close of business on the last day for candidates to file
for office, the filing officer shall((, from among those filings made
in person and by mail,)) determine by lot the order in which the names
of ((those)) candidates will appear on all primary, sample, and
absentee ballots. The determination shall be done publicly and may be
witnessed by the media and by any candidate. If no primary is required
for any ((nonpartisan)) office ((under RCW 29A.52.011 or 29A.52.220, or
if any independent or minor party candidate files a declaration of
candidacy)), the names shall appear on the general election ballot in
the order determined by lot.

Sec. 43 RCW 29A.36.151 and 2004 c 271 s 131 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except in each county with a population of one million or more, on
or before the fifteenth day before a primary or election, the county
auditor shall prepare a sample ballot which shall be made readily
available to members of the public. The secretary of state shall adopt
rules governing the preparation of sample ballots in counties with a
population of one million or more. The rules shall permit, among other
alternatives, the preparation of more than one sample ballot by a
county with a population of one million or more for a primary or
election, each of which lists a portion of the offices and issues to be
voted on in that county. The position of precinct committee officer
shall be shown on the sample ballot for the ((primary)) general
election, but the names of candidates for the individual positions need
not be shown.

Sec. 44 RCW 29A.36.161 and 2004 c 271 s 132 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On the top of each ballot must be printed clear and concise
instructions directing the voter how to mark the ballot, including
write-in votes. ((On the top of each primary ballot must be printed
the instructions required by this chapter.))
(2) The questions of adopting constitutional amendments or any
other state measure authorized by law to be submitted to the voters at
that election must appear after the instructions and before any
offices.
(3) In a year that president and vice president appear on the
general election ballot, the names of candidates for president and vice
president for each political party must be grouped together with a
single response position for a voter to indicate his or her choice.
(4) ((On a general election ballot, the candidate or candidates of
the major political party that received the highest number of votes
from the electors of this state for the office of president of the
United States at the last presidential election must appear first
following the appropriate office heading. The candidate or candidates
of the other major political parties will follow according to the votes
cast for their nominees for president at the last presidential
election, and independent candidates and the candidate or candidates of
all other parties will follow in the order of their qualification with
the secretary of state.
(5))) All paper ballots and ballot cards used at a polling place
must be sequentially numbered in such a way to permit removal of such
numbers without leaving any identifying marks on the ballot.

Sec. 45 RCW 29A.36.170 and 2005 c 2 s 6 (Initiative Measure No.
872) are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For any office for which a primary was held, only the names of
the top two candidates will appear on the general election ballot; the
name of the candidate who received the greatest number of votes will
appear first and the candidate who received the next greatest number of
votes will appear second. No candidate's name may be printed on the
subsequent general election ballot unless he or she receives at least
one percent of the total votes cast for that office at the preceding
primary, if a primary was conducted. On the ballot at the general
election for an office for which no primary was held, the names of the
candidates shall be listed in the order determined under RCW
((29A.36.130)) 29A.36.131.
(2) For the office of justice of the supreme court, judge of the
court of appeals, judge of the superior court, or state superintendent
of public instruction, if a candidate in a contested primary receives
a majority of all the votes cast for that office or position, only the
name of that candidate may be printed for that position on the ballot
at the general election.

Sec. 46 RCW 29A.36.201 and 2004 c 271 s 171 are each amended to
read as follows:
The names of the persons certified ((as nominees)) by the secretary
of state or the county canvassing board as having qualified to appear
on the general election ballot shall be printed on the ballot at the
ensuing election.
No name of any candidate ((whose nomination at a primary is
required by law shall)) for an office for which a primary is conducted
may be placed upon the ballot at a general or special election unless
it appears upon the certificate of either (1) the secretary of
state((,)) or (2) the county canvassing board((, or (3) a minor party
convention or the state or county central committee of a major
political party to fill a vacancy on its ticket under RCW 29A.28.021)).
Excluding the office of precinct committee officer or a temporary
elected position such as a charter review board member or freeholder,
a candidate's name shall not appear more than once upon a ballot for a
position regularly ((nominated or)) elected at the same election.

Sec. 47 RCW 29A.40.091 and 2004 c 271 s 135 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot, a
security envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger
envelope in which to return the security envelope, and instructions on
how to mark the ballot and how to return it to the county auditor.
((The instructions that accompany an absentee ballot for a partisan
primary must include instructions for voting the applicable ballot
style, as provided in chapter 29A.36 RCW.)) The larger return envelope
must contain a declaration by the absentee voter reciting his or her
qualifications and stating that he or she has not voted in any other
jurisdiction at this election, together with a summary of the penalties
for any violation of any of the provisions of this chapter. The return
envelope must provide space for the voter to indicate the date on which
the ballot was voted and for the voter to sign the oath. A summary of
the applicable penalty provisions of this chapter must be printed on
the return envelope immediately adjacent to the space for the voter's
signature. The signature of the voter on the return envelope must
affirm and attest to the statements regarding the qualifications of
that voter and to the validity of the ballot. For out-of-state voters,
overseas voters, and service voters, the signed declaration on the
return envelope constitutes the equivalent of a voter registration for
the election or primary for which the ballot has been issued. The
voter must be instructed to either return the ballot to the county
auditor by whom it was issued or attach sufficient first class postage,
if applicable, and mail the ballot to the appropriate county auditor no
later than the day of the election or primary for which the ballot was
issued.
If the county auditor chooses to forward absentee ballots, he or
she must include with the ballot a clear explanation of the
qualifications necessary to vote in that election and must also advise
a voter with questions about his or her eligibility to contact the
county auditor. This explanation may be provided on the ballot
envelope, on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on the ballot
itself. If the information is not included, the envelope must clearly
indicate that the ballot is not to be forwarded and that return postage
is guaranteed.

Sec. 48 RCW 29A.44.201 and 2004 c 271 s 136 are each amended to
read as follows:
A voter desiring to vote shall give his or her name to the precinct
election officer who has the precinct list of registered voters. This
officer shall announce the name to the precinct election officer who
has the copy of the inspector's poll book for that precinct. If the
right of this voter to participate in the primary or election is not
challenged, the voter must be issued a ballot or permitted to enter a
voting booth or to operate a voting device. ((For a partisan primary
in a jurisdiction using the physically separate ballot format, the
voter must be issued a nonpartisan ballot and each party ballot.)) The
number of the ballot or the voter must be recorded by the precinct
election officers. If the right of the voter to participate is
challenged, RCW 29A.08.810 and 29A.08.820 apply to that voter.

Sec. 49 RCW 29A.44.221 and 2004 c 271 s 137 are each amended to
read as follows:
On signing the precinct list of registered voters or being issued
a ballot, the voter shall, without leaving the polling place or
disability access location, proceed to one of the voting booths or
voting devices to cast his or her vote. When county election
procedures so provide, the election officers may tear off and retain
the numbered stub from the ballot before delivering it to the voter.
If an election officer has not already done so, when the voter has
finished, he or she shall either (1) remove the numbered stub from the
ballot, place the ballot in the ballot box, and return the number to
the election officers, or (2) deliver the entire ballot to the election
officers, who shall remove the numbered stub from the ballot and place
the ballot in the ballot box. ((For a partisan primary in a
jurisdiction using the physically separate ballot format, the voter
shall also return unvoted party ballots to the precinct election
officers, who shall void the unvoted party ballots and return them to
the county auditor.)) If poll-site ballot counting devices are used,
the voter shall put the ballot in the device.

Sec. 50 RCW 29A.44.231 and 2004 c 271 s 138 are each amended to
read as follows:
As each voter casts his or her vote, the precinct election officers
shall insert in the poll books or precinct list of registered voters
opposite that voter's name, a notation to credit the voter with having
participated in that primary or election. ((No record may be made of
a voter's party affiliation in a partisan primary.)) The precinct
election officers shall record the voter's name so that a separate
record is kept.

Sec. 51 RCW 29A.52.010 and 2005 c 2 s 13 (Initiative Measure No.
872) are each reenacted to read as follows:
Whenever it shall be necessary to hold a special election in an
odd-numbered year to fill an unexpired term of any office which is
scheduled to be voted upon for a full term in an even-numbered year, no
primary election shall be held in the odd-numbered year if, after the
last day allowed for candidates to withdraw, no more than two
candidates have filed a declaration of candidacy for a single office to
be filled.
In this event, the officer with whom the declarations of candidacy
were filed shall immediately notify all candidates concerned and the
names of the candidates that would have been printed upon the primary
ballot, but for the provisions of this section, shall be printed as
candidates for the positions sought upon the general election ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 52 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The purpose of any primary held in this state is to qualify
candidates to appear on the general election ballot. Partisan primary
elections do not function as a procedure to determine the nominees of
political parties. The sole purpose of allowing candidates for
partisan office to identify a political party preference is to provide
voters a brief description of each candidate's political philosophy,
which the voters may consider when casting their votes at a primary or
general election. In a primary election, each voter, regardless of
party affiliation, may vote for any candidate listed on the ballot, and
the two candidates who receive the most votes, also known as the top
two vote getters, and who receive at least one percent of the total
votes cast for that office, advance to the general election. Primary
election voters are not choosing a party's nominee. A qualifying
primary, as opposed to a nominating primary, ensures more choice,
greater participation, increased privacy, and a sense of fairness for
voters.
(2) The provisions of this title relating to primaries must be
liberally construed to further the following interests:
(a) The legislature finds that the process of determining which
candidates will appear on the general election ballot or be elected to
office is a public process, in which all voters must be permitted to
participate. The legislature further finds that it is not in the
public interest to expend public funds on an election procedure that
limits the rights of voters by restricting their ability to participate
based on the party affiliation, if any, of the voters or the
candidates, or that requires voters to declare an affiliation with a
political party;
(b) All qualified registered voters of the state of Washington must
be permitted to participate in all meaningful stages of the process for
qualifying candidates to appear on the general election ballot by
voting for the candidates of their choice in the districts and
jurisdictions where they are eligible to vote; and
(c) No registered voter of the state of Washington should be
required to divulge to any public or private entity his or her party
affiliation, if any, as a prerequisite to voting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 53 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Whenever candidates for partisan office are to be elected, the
general election must be preceded by a primary conducted under this
chapter, except as otherwise provided in law. Based upon votes cast at
the primary and according to RCW 29A.36.170 and section 52 of this act,
two candidates may be certified under RCW 29A.52.321 as qualified to
appear on the general election ballot.
(2) A partisan primary may not be used to select the nominees of a
political party. A primary is a critical stage in the public process
by which voters elect candidates to public office.
(3) If a candidate for partisan office indicates a party preference
on his or her declaration of candidacy, then the party preference will
be listed for the candidate on the primary and general election
ballots. Each candidate who does not express a party preference will
be listed as an independent candidate on the primary and general
election ballots. Party preference will be listed for the information
of the voters only, and may not be used for any purpose relating to the
conduct, canvassing, or certification of the primary, and may in no way
limit the options available to voters in deciding for whom to cast a
vote.

Sec. 54 RCW 29A.52.210 and 2003 c 111 s 1305 are each amended to
read as follows:
All city and town primaries shall be nonpartisan. Primaries for
special purpose districts, except those districts that require
ownership of property within the district as a prerequisite to voting,
shall be nonpartisan. Subject to the exemptions in RCW 29A.52.220,
city, town, and district primaries shall be held as provided in RCW
29A.04.310 and 29A.36.170.
((The purpose of this section is to establish the holding of a
primary, subject to the exemptions in RCW 29A.52.220, as a uniform
procedural requirement to the holding of city, town, and district
elections. These provisions supersede any and all other statutes,
whether general or special in nature, having different election
requirements.))

Sec. 55 RCW 29A.52.220 and 2003 c 111 s 1306 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No primary may be held for any single position in any city,
town, district, or district court, as required by RCW 29A.52.210, if,
after the last day allowed for candidates to withdraw, there are no
more than two candidates filed for the position. The county auditor
shall, as soon as possible, notify all the candidates so affected that
the office for which they filed will not appear on the primary ballot.
(2) No primary may be held for the office of commissioner of a park
and recreation district or for the office of cemetery district
commissioner.
(3) Names of candidates for offices that do not appear on the
primary ballot shall be printed upon the general election ballot in the
manner specified by RCW ((29A.36.130)) 29A.36.131.

Sec. 56 RCW 29A.52.231 and 2004 c 271 s 174 are each amended to
read as follows:
The offices of superintendent of public instruction, justice of the
supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of the superior
court, and judge of the district court shall be nonpartisan and the
candidates therefor shall be ((nominated)) qualified and elected as
such.
All city, town, and special purpose district elective offices shall
be nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be ((nominated))
qualified and elected as such.

Sec. 57 RCW 29A.52.311 and 2004 c 271 s 145 are each amended to
read as follows:
Not more than ten nor less than three days before the primary the
county auditor shall publish notice of such primary in one or more
newspapers of general circulation within the county. The notice must
contain the ((proper party designations)) offices to be voted upon at
the primary, the names and addresses of all persons who have filed
((a)) valid declarations of candidacy ((to be voted upon at that
primary, instructions for voting the applicable ballot, as provided in
chapter 29A.36 RCW)), the hours during which the polls will be open,
and the address of each polling place((s)) for each precinct((, giving
the address of each polling place. The names of all candidates for
nonpartisan offices must be published separately with designation of
the offices for which they are candidates but without party
designation)). The notice must include the political party preference
of candidates for partisan office, if one was provided, and may not
contain any political party preference for candidates for nonpartisan
office. This is the only notice required for the holding of any
primary.

Sec. 58 RCW 29A.52.321 and 2004 c 271 s 146 are each amended to
read as follows:
No later than the day following the certification of the returns of
any primary, the secretary of state shall certify to the appropriate
county auditors the names of all persons ((nominated for offices at a
primary, or at an independent candidate or minor party convention))
qualified to appear as candidates on the general election ballot.

Sec. 59 RCW 29A.52.351 and 2004 c 271 s 175 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 29A.32.260, notice for any state, county,
district, or municipal election, whether special or general, must be
given by at least one publication not more than ten nor less than three
days before the election by the county auditor or the officer
conducting the election as the case may be, in one or more newspapers
of general circulation within the county. The legal notice must
contain the title of each office ((under the proper party designation))
to be voted on at that election, the names and addresses of all
((officers)) candidates who have ((been nominated for an office to be
voted upon at that election, together with)) qualified to appear on the
ballot, the ballot titles of all measures, the hours during which the
polls will be open, and the address of each polling place((s)) for each
precinct((, giving the address of each polling place. The names of all
candidates for nonpartisan offices must be published separately with
designation of the offices for which they are candidates but without
party designation)). The notice must include the political party
preference of candidates for partisan office, if one was provided, and
may not contain any political party preference for candidates for
nonpartisan office. This is the only notice required for a state,
county, district, or municipal general or special election ((and
supersedes the provisions of any and all other statutes, whether
general or special in nature, having different requirements for the
giving of notice of any general or special elections)).

Sec. 60 RCW 29A.60.010 and 2003 c 111 s 1501 are each amended to
read as follows:
All elections, whether special or general, held under RCW
((29A.04.320)) 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330 must be conducted by the
county auditor as ex officio county supervisor of elections and, except
as provided in RCW 29A.60.240, the returns canvassed by the county
canvassing board.

Sec. 61 RCW 29A.60.021 and 2004 c 271 s 147 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For any office at any election or primary, any voter may write
in on the ballot the name of any person for an office who has filed as
a write-in candidate for the office in the manner provided by RCW
29A.24.311 and such vote shall be counted the same as if the name had
been printed on the ballot and marked by the voter. ((For a partisan
primary in a jurisdiction using the physically separate ballot format,
a voter may write in on a party ballot only the names of write-in
candidates who affiliate with that major political party.)) No write-in vote made for any person who has not filed a declaration of
candidacy pursuant to RCW 29A.24.311 is valid if that person filed for
the same office, either as a regular candidate or a write-in candidate,
at the preceding primary. Any abbreviation used to designate
office((,)) or position((, or political party)) shall be accepted if
the canvassing board can determine, to ((their)) its satisfaction, the
voter's intent.
(2) The number of write-in votes cast for each office must be
recorded and reported with the canvass for the election.
(3) Write-in votes cast for an individual candidate for an office
need not be tallied if the total number of write-in votes and under
votes recorded by the vote tabulation system for the office is not
greater than the number of votes cast for the candidate apparently
((nominated)) qualified to appear on the general election ballot or
elected, and the write-in votes could not have altered the outcome of
the primary or election. In the case of write-in votes for statewide
office or for any office whose jurisdiction encompasses more than one
county, write-in votes for an individual candidate must be tallied
whenever the county auditor is notified by either the office of the
secretary of state or another auditor in a multicounty jurisdiction
that it appears that the write-in votes could alter the outcome of the
primary or election.
(4) In the case of statewide offices or jurisdictions that
encompass more than one county, if the total number of write-in votes
and under votes recorded by the vote tabulation system for an office
within a county is greater than the number of votes cast for a
candidate apparently ((nominated)) qualified to appear on the general
election ballot or elected in a primary or election, the auditor shall
tally all write-in votes for individual candidates for that office and
notify the office of the secretary of state and the auditors of the
other counties within the jurisdiction, that the write-in votes for
individual candidates should be tallied.

Sec. 62 RCW 29A.60.030 and 2004 c 266 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided by rule under RCW ((29A.04.610)) 29A.04.611, on
the day of the primary or election, the tabulation of ballots at the
polling place or at the counting center shall proceed without
interruption or adjournment until all of the ballots cast at the polls
at that primary or election have been tabulated.

Sec. 63 RCW 29A.60.040 and 2003 c 111 s 1504 are each amended to
read as follows:
A ballot is invalid and no votes on that ballot may be counted if
it is found folded together with another ballot or it is marked so as
to identify the voter.
Those parts of a ballot are invalid and no votes may be counted for
those issues or offices where more votes are cast for the office or
issue than are permitted by law; write-in votes do not contain all of
the information required under RCW ((29A.60.020)) 29A.60.021; or that
issue or office is not marked with sufficient definiteness to determine
the voter's choice or intention. No write-in vote may be rejected due
to a variation in the form of the name if the election board or the
canvassing board can determine the issue for or against which or the
person and the office for which the voter intended to vote.

Sec. 64 RCW 29A.60.080 and 2004 c 266 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except for reopening to make a recanvass, the registering mechanism
of each mechanical voting device used in any primary or election shall
remain sealed until ten days after the completion of the canvass of
that primary or election in that county. Except where provided by a
rule adopted under RCW ((29A.04.610)) 29A.04.611, voting devices used
in a primary or election shall remain sealed until ten days after the
completion of the canvass of that primary or election in that county.

Sec. 65 RCW 29A.60.221 and 2004 c 271 s 176 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the requisite number of any federal, state, county, city, or
district offices have not been ((nominated)) qualified in a primary by
reason of two or more persons having an equal and requisite number of
votes for being placed on the general election ballot, the official
empowered by state law to certify candidates for the general election
ballot shall give notice to the several persons so having the equal and
requisite number of votes to attend at the appropriate office at the
time designated by that official, who shall then and there proceed
publicly to decide by lot which of those persons will be declared
((nominated)) qualified and placed on the general election ballot.
(2) If the requisite number of any federal, state, county, city,
district, or precinct officers have not been elected by reason of two
or more persons having an equal and highest number of votes for one and
the same office, the official empowered by state law to issue the
original certificate of election shall give notice to the several
persons so having the highest and equal number of votes to attend at
the appropriate office at the time to be appointed by that official,
who shall then and there proceed publicly to decide by lot which of
those persons will be declared duly elected, and the official shall
make out and deliver to the person thus duly declared elected a
certificate of election.

Sec. 66 RCW 29A.64.011 and 2004 c 271 s 177 are each amended to
read as follows:
An officer of a political party or any person for whom votes were
cast in a primary who was not declared ((nominated)) qualified to
appear on the general election ballot may file a written application
for a recount of the votes or a portion of the votes cast at that
primary for all persons for whom votes were cast for ((nomination to))
that office.
An officer of a political party or any person for whom votes were
cast at any election may file a written application for a recount of
the votes or a portion of the votes cast at that election for all
candidates for election to that office.
Any group of five or more registered voters may file a written
application for a recount of the votes or a portion of the votes cast
upon any question or issue. They shall designate one of the members of
the group as chair and shall indicate the voting residence of each
member of the group.
An application for a recount of the votes cast for an office or on
a ballot measure must be filed with the officer with whom filings are
made for the jurisdiction.
An application for a recount must specify whether the recount will
be done manually or by the vote tally system. A recount done by the
vote tally system must use programming that recounts and reports only
the office or ballot measure in question. The county shall also
provide for a test of the logic and accuracy of that program.
An application for a recount must be filed within three business
days after the county canvassing board or secretary of state has
declared the official results of the primary or election for the office
or issue for which the recount is requested.
This chapter applies to the recounting of votes cast by paper
ballots and to the recounting of votes recorded on ballots counted by
a vote tally system.

Sec. 67 RCW 29A.64.021 and 2004 c 271 s 178 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the official canvass of all of the returns for any office at
any primary or election reveals that the difference in the number of
votes cast for a candidate apparently ((nominated)) qualified or
elected to any office and the number of votes cast for the closest
apparently defeated opponent is less than two thousand votes and also
less than one-half of one percent of the total number of votes cast for
both candidates, the county canvassing board shall conduct a recount of
all votes cast on that position.
(a) Whenever such a difference occurs in the number of votes cast
for candidates for a position the declaration of candidacy for which
was filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall,
within three business days of the day that the returns of the primary
or election are first certified by the canvassing boards of those
counties, direct those boards to recount all votes cast on the
position.
(b) If the difference in the number of votes cast for the apparent
winner and the closest apparently defeated opponent is less than one
hundred fifty votes and also less than one-fourth of one percent of the
total number of votes cast for both candidates, the votes shall be
recounted manually or as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) A mandatory recount shall be conducted in the manner provided
by RCW 29A.64.030, 29A.64.041, and 29A.64.061. No cost of a mandatory
recount may be charged to any candidate.
(3) The apparent winner and closest apparently defeated opponent
for an office for which a manual recount is required under subsection
(1)(b) of this section may select an alternative method of conducting
the recount. To select such an alternative, the two candidates shall
agree to the alternative in a signed, written statement filed with the
election official for the office. The recount shall be conducted using
the alternative method if: It is suited to the balloting system that
was used for casting the votes for the office; it involves the use of
a vote tallying system that is approved for use in this state by the
secretary of state; and the vote tallying system is readily available
in each county required to conduct the recount. If more than one
balloting system was used in casting votes for the office, an
alternative to a manual recount may be selected for each system.

Sec. 68 RCW 29A.64.030 and 2003 c 111 s 1603 are each amended to
read as follows:
An application for a recount shall state the office for which a
recount is requested and whether the request is for all or only a
portion of the votes cast in that jurisdiction of that office. The
person filing an application for a manual recount shall, at the same
time, deposit with the county canvassing board or secretary of state,
in cash or by certified check, a sum equal to twenty-five cents for
each ballot cast in the jurisdiction or portion of the jurisdiction for
which the recount is requested as security for the payment of any costs
of conducting the recount. If the application is for a machine
recount, the deposit must be equal to fifteen cents for each ballot.
These charges shall be determined by the county canvassing board or
boards under RCW ((29A.64.080)) 29A.64.081.
The county canvassing board shall determine a time and a place or
places at which the recount will be conducted. This time shall be less
than three business days after the day upon which: The application was
filed with the board; the request for a recount or directive ordering
a recount was received by the board from the secretary of state; or the
returns are certified which indicate that a recount is required under
RCW ((29A.64.020)) 29A.64.021 for an issue or office voted upon only
within the county. Not less than two days before the date of the
recount, the county auditor shall mail a notice of the time and place
of the recount to the applicant or affected parties and, if the recount
involves an office, to any person for whom votes were cast for that
office. The county auditor shall also notify the affected parties by
either telephone, fax, e-mail, or other electronic means at the time of
mailing. At least three attempts must be made over a two-day period to
notify the affected parties or until the affected parties have received
the notification. Each attempt to notify affected parties must request
a return response indicating that the notice has been received. Each
person entitled to receive notice of the recount may attend, witness
the recount, and be accompanied by counsel.
Proceedings of the canvassing board are public under chapter 42.30
RCW. Subject to reasonable and equitable guidelines adopted by the
canvassing board, all interested persons may attend and witness a
recount.

Sec. 69 RCW 29A.64.041 and 2004 c 271 s 179 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) At the time and place established for a recount, the canvassing
board or its duly authorized representatives, in the presence of all
witnesses who may be in attendance, shall open the sealed containers
containing the ballots to be recounted, and shall recount the votes for
the offices or issues for which the recount has been ordered. Ballots
shall be handled only by the members of the canvassing board or their
duly authorized representatives.
Witnesses shall be permitted to observe the ballots and the process
of tabulating the votes, but they shall not be permitted to handle the
ballots. The canvassing board shall not permit the tabulation of votes
for any ((nomination, election,)) office or issue other than the ones
for which a recount was applied for or required.
(2) At any time before the ballots from all of the precincts listed
in the application for the recount have been recounted, the applicant
may file with the board a written request to stop the recount.
(3) The recount may be observed by persons representing the
candidates affected by the recount or the persons representing both
sides of an issue that is being recounted. The observers may not make
a record of the names, addresses, or other information on the ballots,
poll books, or applications for absentee ballots unless authorized by
the superior court. The secretary of state or county auditor may limit
the number of observers to not less than two on each side if, in his or
her opinion, a greater number would cause undue delay or disruption of
the recount process.

Sec. 70 RCW 29A.64.050 and 2003 c 111 s 1605 are each amended to
read as follows:
When a partial recount of votes cast for an office or issue changes
the result of the election, the canvassing board or the secretary of
state, if the office or issue is being recounted at his or her
direction, shall order a complete recount of all ballots cast for the
office or issue for the jurisdiction in question.
This recount will be conducted in a manner consistent with RCW
((29A.64.020)) 29A.64.021.

Sec. 71 RCW 29A.64.061 and 2004 c 271 s 180 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon completion of the canvass of a recount, the canvassing board
shall prepare and certify an amended abstract showing the votes cast in
each precinct for which the recount was conducted. Copies of the
amended abstracts must be transmitted to the same officers who received
the abstract on which the recount was based.
If the ((nomination, election,)) office or issue for which the
recount was conducted was submitted only to the voters of a county, the
canvassing board shall file the amended abstract with the original
results of that election or primary.
If the ((nomination, election,)) office or issue for which a
recount was conducted was submitted to the voters of more than one
county, the secretary of state shall canvass the amended abstracts and
shall file an amended abstract with the original results of that
election. An amended abstract certified under this section supersedes
any prior abstract of the results for the same offices or issues at the
same primary or election.

Sec. 72 RCW 29A.64.081 and 2004 c 271 s 181 are each amended to
read as follows:
The canvassing board shall determine the expenses for conducting a
recount of votes.
The cost of the recount shall be deducted from the amount deposited
by the applicant for the recount at the time of filing the request for
the recount, and the balance shall be returned to the applicant. If
the costs of the recount exceed the deposit, the applicant shall pay
the difference. No charges may be deducted by the canvassing board
from the deposit for a recount if the recount changes the result of the
((nomination)) primary or election for which the recount was ordered.

Sec. 73 RCW 29A.64.090 and 2003 c 111 s 1609 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the official canvass of returns of any election reveals that
the difference in the number of votes cast for the approval of a
statewide measure and the number of votes cast for the rejection of
such measure is less than two thousand votes and also less than one-half of one percent of the total number of votes cast on such measure,
the secretary of state shall direct that a recount of all votes cast on
such measure be made on such measure, in the manner provided by RCW
((29A.64.040 and 29A.64.060)) 29A.64.041 and 29A.64.061, and the cost
of such recount will be at state expense.

Sec. 74 RCW 29A.68.011 and 2004 c 271 s 182 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, or
judge of the superior court in the proper county shall, by order,
require any person charged with error, wrongful act, or neglect to
forthwith correct the error, desist from the wrongful act, or perform
the duty and to do as the court orders or to show cause forthwith why
the error should not be corrected, the wrongful act desisted from, or
the duty or order not performed, whenever it is made to appear to such
justice or judge by affidavit of an elector that:
(1) An error or omission has occurred or is about to occur in
printing the name of any candidate on official ballots; or
(2) An error other than as provided in subsections (1) and (3) of
this section has been committed or is about to be committed in printing
the ballots; or
(3) The name of any person has been or is about to be wrongfully
placed upon the ballots; or
(4) A wrongful act other than as provided for in subsections (1)
and (3) of this section has been performed or is about to be performed
by any election officer; or
(5) Any neglect of duty on the part of an election officer other
than as provided for in subsections (1) and (3) of this section has
occurred or is about to occur; or
(6) An error or omission has occurred or is about to occur in the
issuance of a certificate of election.
An affidavit of an elector under subsections (1) and (3) ((above))
of this section when relating to a primary election must be filed with
the appropriate court no later than the second Friday following the
closing of the filing period ((for nominations)) for such office and
shall be heard and finally disposed of by the court not later than five
days after the filing thereof. An affidavit of an elector under
subsections (1) and (3) of this section when relating to a general
election must be filed with the appropriate court no later than three
days following the official certification of the primary election
returns and shall be heard and finally disposed of by the court not
later than five days after the filing thereof. An affidavit of an
elector under subsection (6) of this section shall be filed with the
appropriate court no later than ten days following the issuance of a
certificate of election.

Sec. 75 RCW 29A.68.020 and 2003 c 111 s 1702 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any registered voter may contest the right of any person declared
elected to an office to be issued a certificate of election for any of
the following causes:
(1) For misconduct on the part of any member of any precinct
election board involved therein;
(2) Because the person whose right is being contested was not at
the time the person was declared elected eligible to that office;
(3) Because the person whose right is being contested was previous
to the election convicted of a felony by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the conviction not having been reversed nor the person's
civil rights restored after the conviction;
(4) Because the person whose right is being contested gave a bribe
or reward to a voter or to an inspector or judge of election for the
purpose of procuring the election, or offered to do so;
(5) On account of illegal votes.
(a) Illegal votes include but are not limited to the following:
(i) More than one vote cast by a single voter;
(ii) A vote cast by a person disqualified under Article VI, section
3 of the state Constitution.
(b) Illegal votes do not include votes cast by improperly
registered voters who were not properly challenged under RCW 29A.08.810
and 29A.08.820.
All election contests must proceed under RCW ((29A.68.010))
29A.68.011.

Sec. 76 RCW 29A.68.030 and 2003 c 111 s 1703 are each amended to
read as follows:
An affidavit of an elector with respect to RCW ((29A.68.010(6)))
29A.68.011(6) must be filed with the appropriate court no later than
ten days following the issuance of a certificate of election and must
set forth specifically:
(1) The name of the contestant and that he or she is a registered
voter in the county, district or precinct, as the case may be, in which
the office is to be exercised;
(2) The name of the person whose right is being contested;
(3) The office;
(4) The particular causes of the contest.
No statement of contest may be dismissed for want of form if the
particular causes of contest are alleged with sufficient certainty.
The person charged with the error or omission must be given the
opportunity to call any witness, including the candidate to whom he or
she has issued or intends to issue the certificate of election.

Sec. 77 RCW 29A.72.130 and 2003 c 111 s 1814 are each amended to
read as follows:
Petitions ordering that acts or parts of acts passed by the
legislature be referred to the people at the next ensuing general
election, or special election ordered by the legislature, must be
substantially in the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

PETITION FOR REFERENDUM

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully order and direct that Referendum Measure No.
. . . . ., filed to revoke a (or part or parts of a) bill that (concise
statement required by RCW ((29A.36.070)) 29A.36.071) and that was
passed by the . . . . . . legislature of the State of Washington at the
last regular (special) session of said legislature, shall be referred
to the people of the state for their approval or rejection at the
regular (special) election to be held on the . . . . day of November,
(year); and each of us for himself or herself says: I have personally
signed this petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Washington, in
the city (or town) and county written after my name, my residence
address is correctly stated, and I have knowingly signed this petition
only once.

The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.

Sec. 78 RCW 29A.80.010 and 2005 c 2 s 14 (Initiative Measure No.
872) are each reenacted to read as follows:
Each political party organization may adopt rules governing its own
organization and the nonstatutory functions of that organization.

Sec. 79 RCW 29A.80.020 and 2003 c 111 s 2002 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state committee of each major political party consists of one
committeeman and one committeewoman from each county elected by the
county central committee at its organization meeting. It must have a
chair and vice-chair of opposite sexes. This committee shall meet
during January of each odd-numbered year for the purpose of
organization at a time and place designated by a notice mailed at least
one week before the date of the meeting to all the newly elected state
committeemen and committeewomen by the authorized officers of the
retiring committee. At its organizational meeting it shall elect its
chair and vice-chair, and such officers as its bylaws may provide, and
adopt bylaws, rules, and regulations. It may:
(1) Call conventions at such time and place and under such
circumstances and for such purposes as the call to convention
designates. The manner, number, and procedure for selection of state
convention delegates is subject to the committee's rules and
regulations duly adopted;
(2) Provide for the election of delegates to national conventions;
(3) ((Fill vacancies on the ticket for any federal or state office
to be voted on by the electors of more than one county;
(4))) Provide for the nomination of presidential electors; and
(((5))) (4) Perform all functions inherent in such an organization.
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the committee may
not adopt rules governing the conduct of the actual proceedings at a
party state convention.

Sec. 80 RCW 29A.80.041 and 2004 c 271 s 148 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any member of a major political party who is a registered voter in
the precinct may upon payment of a fee of one dollar file his or her
declaration of candidacy as prescribed under RCW ((29A.24.031))
29A.24.030 with the county auditor for the office of precinct committee
officer of his or her party in that precinct. When elected at the
((primary)) general election, the precinct committee officer shall
serve so long as the committee officer remains an eligible voter in
that precinct.

Sec. 81 RCW 29A.80.051 and 2004 c 271 s 149 are each amended to
read as follows:
The statutory requirements for filing as a candidate ((at the
primaries)) apply to candidates for precinct committee officer. The
office must be voted upon at the ((primaries)) general election, and
the names of all candidates must appear under the proper party and
office designations on the general election ballot ((for the primary
for)) in each even-numbered year((, and the one)). The candidate
receiving the highest number of votes will be declared elected.
((However, to be declared elected, a candidate must receive at least
ten percent of the number of votes cast for the candidate of the
candidate's party receiving the greatest number of votes in the
precinct.)) The term of office of precinct committee officer is two
years, commencing ((the first day of December following the primary))
upon completion of the official canvass of votes by the county
canvassing board of election returns.

Sec. 82 RCW 29A.84.210 and 2003 c 111 s 2109 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every officer who willfully violates any of the provisions of
chapter 29A.72 RCW or RCW 29A.32.010 through ((29A.32.120)) 29A.32.121,
for the violation of which no penalty is herein prescribed, or who
willfully fails to comply with the provisions of chapter 29A.72 RCW or
RCW 29A.32.010 through ((29A.32.120)) 29A.32.121, is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that
is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 83 RCW 29A.84.261 and 2004 c 271 s 184 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following apply to persons signing nominating petitions
prescribed by RCW 29A.20.151 and filing petitions prescribed by RCW
29A.24.101:
(1) A person who signs a petition with any other than his or her
name shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
(2) A person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor if the person
knowingly: Signs more than one petition for any single candidacy of
any single candidate; signs the petition when he or she is not a legal
voter; or makes a false statement as to his or her residence.

Sec. 84 RCW 29A.84.311 and 2004 c 271 s 185 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every person who:
(1) Knowingly provides false information on ((his or her)) a
declaration of candidacy ((or)), filing petition, nominating petition,
or certificate of nomination; or
(2) Conceals or fraudulently defaces or destroys any part of a
((certificate that has been filed with an elections officer under
chapter 29A.20 RCW or a)) declaration of candidacy ((or)), filing
petition, nominating petition, or certificate of nomination that has
been filed with an elections officer((, or any part of such a
certificate, declaration, or petition,));
is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 85 RCW 29A.84.711 and 2004 c 271 s 186 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every person who((:
(1))) knowingly and falsely issues a certificate of ((nomination))
qualification or election((; or
(2) Knowingly provides false information on a certificate which
must be filed with an elections officer under chapter 29A.20 RCW,)) is
guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 86 RCW 42.17.020 and 2002 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(2) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized
by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges
have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf
of the candidate or public official.
(3) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
((29.01.110)) 29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum
proposition proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any
municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other voting
constituency from and after the time when the proposition has been
initially filed with the appropriate election officer of that
constituency prior to its circulation for signatures.
(4) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic,
or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary,
financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(5) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has filed a valid certificate of
nomination with the secretary of state under chapter ((29.24)) 29A.20
RCW;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW ((29.01.090)) 29A.04.086, that is
the body authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise
authority on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(6) "Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or
political committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.
(7) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW
42.17.050, to perform the duties specified in that section.
(8) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks ((nomination for
election or)) to qualify for the general election or seeks election to
public office. An individual seeks ((nomination)) qualification or
election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(9) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee
organized and maintained by the members of ((a major political party))
the majority caucus in the state senate or state house of
representatives, or by the members of the minority caucus in the state
senate or state house of representatives.
(10) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service
of communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast
or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public
whether through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio
stations, billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies,
printing companies, or otherwise.
(11) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350.
(12) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services
of any kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance with RCW
42.17.241, the term "compensation" shall not include per diem
allowances or other payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse
a public official for expenses incurred while the official is engaged
in the official business of the governmental entity.
(13) "Continuing political committee" means a political committee
that is an organization of continuing existence not established in
anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(14)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising prepared by a candidate, a
political committee, or its authorized agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for which the
individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(15) "Elected official" means any person elected at a general or
special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill
a vacancy in any such office.
(16) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special election
for public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is
submitted to the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in which the
qualifications for voting include other than those requirements set
forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the Constitution of
the state of Washington shall not be considered an election for
purposes of this chapter.
(17) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in
opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(18) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day
of December after the date of the last previous general election for
the office that the candidate seeks and ending on November 30th after
the next election for the office. In the case of a special election to
fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the period
beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on November 30th
after the special election.
(19) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of
value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not
legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure"
also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of
value in exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or
anything of value for the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring
any public official or candidate, or assisting in furthering or
opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of this chapter,
agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises to pay may be
reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is made. The
term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete repayment
by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a loan, the
receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(20) "Final report" means the report described as a final report in
RCW 42.17.080(2).
(21) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
election that results in the election of a person to a state office.
It does not include a primary.
(22) "Gift," is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.
(23) "Immediate family" includes the spouse, dependent children,
and other dependent relatives, if living in the household. For the
purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, "immediate family" means
an individual's spouse, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent,
stepparent, grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister
of the individual and the spouse of any such person and a child,
stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half
brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's spouse and the
spouse of any such person.
(24) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that has each
of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of five hundred dollars or
more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under five hundred
dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is five hundred dollars or more.
(25)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a
contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless the
contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family as
defined for purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an
association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(26) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions, amendments,
nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in either house of
the state legislature, and includes any other matter that may be the
subject of action by either house or any committee of the legislature
and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both houses, are
pending approval by the governor.
(27) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to influence the
passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of
Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate,
or other legislative enactment of any state agency under the state
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Neither "lobby" nor
"lobbying" includes an association's or other organization's act of
communicating with the members of that association or organization.
(28) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in his or
her own or another's behalf.
(29) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by whom a
lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is compensated
for acting as a lobbyist.
(30) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint venture,
public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or local
governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(31) "Person in interest" means the person who is the subject of a
record or any representative designated by that person, except that if
that person is under a legal disability, the term "person in interest"
means and includes the parent or duly appointed legal representative.
(32) "Political advertising" includes any advertising displays,
newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles, tabloids,
flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other means of
mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing, directly or
indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support in any election
campaign.
(33) "Political committee" means any person (except a candidate or
an individual dealing with his or her own funds or property) having the
expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in
support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any ballot proposition.
(34) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
procedure for ((nominating)) qualifying a candidate to state office
under chapter ((29.18 or 29.21 RCW or any other primary for an election
that uses, in large measure, the procedures established in chapter
29.18 or 29.21)) 29A.52 RCW.
(35) "Public office" means any federal, state, county, city, town,
school district, port district, special district, or other state
political subdivision elective office.
(36) "Public record" includes any writing containing information
relating to the conduct of government or the performance of any
governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or retained
by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.
(37) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning on the
date of the filing of recall charges under RCW ((29.82.015)) 29A.56.120
and ending thirty days after the recall election.
(38) "State legislative office" means the office of a member of the
state house of representatives or the office of a member of the state
senate.
(39) "State office" means state legislative office or the office of
governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general,
commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner, superintendent of
public instruction, state auditor, or state treasurer.
(40) "State official" means a person who holds a state office.
(41) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political committee or
candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the possession
or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the election
for which the contributions were received, and that are in excess of
the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the committee
or candidate prior to that election. In the case of a continuing
political committee, "surplus funds" mean those contributions remaining
in the possession or control of the committee that are in excess of the
amount necessary to pay all remaining debts when it makes its final
report under RCW 42.17.065.
(42) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation, including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.
As used in this chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any
gender, the other, as the context requires.

Sec. 87 RCW 42.17.790 and 1995 c 397 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
candidate for public office or the candidate's political committee may
not use or permit the use of contributions, whether or not surplus,
solicited for or received by the candidate for public office or the
candidate's political committee to further the candidacy of the
individual for an office other than the office designated on the
statement of organization. A contribution solicited for or received on
behalf of the candidate for public office is considered solicited or
received for the candidacy for which the individual is then a candidate
if the contribution is solicited or received before the general
elections for which the candidate for public office is ((a nominee))
qualified or is unopposed.
(2) With the written approval of the contributor, a candidate for
public office or the candidate's political committee may use or permit
the use of contributions, whether or not surplus, solicited for or
received by the candidate for public office or the candidate's
political committee from that contributor to further the candidacy of
the individual for an office other than the office designated on the
statement of organization. If the contributor does not approve the use
of his or her contribution to further the candidacy of the individual
for an office other than the office designated on the statement of
organization at the time of the contribution, the contribution must be
considered surplus funds and disposed of in accordance with RCW
42.17.095.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 88 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.04.128 (Primary) and 2004 c 271 s 152;
(2) RCW 29A.04.158 (September primary) and 2004 c 271 s 187;
(3) RCW 29A.04.311 (Primaries) and 2004 c 271 s 105;
(4) RCW 29A.04.610 (Rules by secretary of state) and 2004 c 267 s
702, 2003 c 111 s 161, 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 2, & 1965 c 9 s 29.04.080;
(5) RCW 29A.20.110 (Definitions -- "Convention" and "election
jurisdiction") and 2003 c 111 s 505, 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 1, & 1965 c 9
s 29.24.010;
(6) RCW 29A.20.111 (Definitions--"Convention" and "election
jurisdiction") and 2004 c 271 s 188;
(7) RCW 29A.20.131 (Convention--Notice) and 2004 c 271 s 189;
(8) RCW 29A.20.200 (Declarations of candidacy required,
exceptions -- Payment of fees) and 2003 c 111 s 514, 1990 c 59 s 103,
1989 c 215 s 8, 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 7, & 1965 c 9 s 29.24.070;
(9) RCW 29A.20.201 (Declarations of candidacy required,
exceptions--Payment of fees) and 2004 c 271 s 113;
(10) RCW 29A.24.031 (Declaration of candidacy) and 2004 c 271 s
158;
(11) RCW 29A.24.200 (Lapse of election when no filing for single
positions -- Effect) and 2003 c 111 s 620;
(12) RCW 29A.24.201 (Lapse of election when no filing for single
positions--Effect) and 2004 c 271 s 190;
(13) RCW 29A.24.211 (Lapse of election when no filing for single
positions--Effect) and 2004 c 271 s 116;
(14) RCW 29A.28.010 (Major party ticket) and 2003 c 111 s 701, 1990
c 59 s 102, 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 12, & 1965 c 9 s 29.18.150;
(15) RCW 29A.28.011 (Major party ticket) and 2004 c 271 s 191;
(16) RCW 29A.28.020 (Death or disqualification -- Correcting
ballots -- Counting votes already cast) and 2003 c 111 s 702, 2001 c 46
s 4, & 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 13;
(17) RCW 29A.28.021 (Death or disqualification--Correcting
ballots--Counting votes already cast) and 2004 c 271 s 192;
(18) RCW 29A.32.036 (Even year primary contents) and 2004 c 271 s
122;
(19) RCW 29A.36.011 (Certifying primary candidates) and 2004 c 271
s 124;
(20) RCW 29A.36.104 (Partisan primary ballots--Formats) and 2004 c
271 s 126;
(21) RCW 29A.36.106 (Partisan primary ballots--Required statements)
and 2004 c 271 s 127;
(22) RCW 29A.36.171 (Nonpartisan candidates qualified for general
election) and 2004 c 271 s 170;
(23) RCW 29A.36.190 (Partisan candidates qualified for general
election) and 2003 c 111 s 919;
(24) RCW 29A.36.191 (Partisan candidates qualified for general
election) and 2004 c 271 s 133;
(25) RCW 29A.44.220 (Casting vote) and 2004 c 267 s 319, 2003 c 111
s 1121, 1990 c 59 s 43, 1988 c 181 s 4, 1965 ex.s. c 101 s 15, & 1965
c 9 s 29.51.100;
(26) RCW 29A.52.011 (Elections to fill unexpired term--No primary,
when) and 2004 c 271 s 172;
(27) RCW 29A.52.106 (Intent) and 2004 c 271 s 140;
(28) RCW 29A.52.111 (Application of chapter--Exceptions) and 2004
c 271 s 173;
(29) RCW 29A.52.116 (Application of chapter--Exceptions) and 2004
c 271 s 139;
(30) RCW 29A.52.130 (Blanket primary authorized) and 2003 c 111 s
1304;
(31) RCW 29A.52.141 (Instructions) and 2004 c 271 s 141;
(32) RCW 29A.52.151 (Ballot format--Procedures) and 2004 c 271 s
142; and
(33) RCW 29A.80.011 (Authority--Generally) and 2004 c 271 s 183.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 89 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---