BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.216 and 2004 c 271 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor of each county shall be ex officio the
supervisor of all primaries and elections, general or special, and it
shall be the county auditor's duty to provide places for holding such
primaries and elections; to appoint the precinct election officers and
to provide for their compensation; to provide the supplies and
materials necessary for the conduct of elections to the precinct
election officers; and to publish and post notices of calling such
primaries and elections in the manner provided by law. The notice of
a primary held in an even-numbered year must indicate that the office
of precinct committee officer will be on the ballot. The auditor shall
also apportion to each city, town, or district, and to the state of
Washington ((in the odd-numbered year)), its share of the expense of
such primaries and elections. This section does not apply to general
or special elections for any city, town, or district that is not
subject to RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330, but all such elections must
be held and conducted at the time, in the manner, and by the officials
(with such notice, requirements for filing for office, and
certifications by local officers) as provided and required by the laws
governing such elections.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.04.420 and 2003 c 111 s 147 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever state officers or measures are voted upon at a state
primary or general election ((held in an odd-numbered year)) under RCW
((29A.04.320)) 29A.04.321, the state of Washington shall assume a
prorated share of the costs of that state primary or general election.
(2) Whenever a primary or vacancy election is held to fill a
vacancy in the position of United States senator or United States
representative under chapter 29A.28 RCW, the state of Washington shall
assume a prorated share of the costs of that primary or vacancy
election.
(3) The county auditor shall apportion the state's share of these
expenses when prorating election costs under RCW 29A.04.410 and shall
file such expense claims with the secretary of state.
(4) The secretary of state shall include in his or her biennial
budget requests sufficient funds to carry out this section.
Reimbursements for election costs shall be from appropriations
specifically provided by law for that purpose.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.04.430 and 2003 c 111 s 148 are each amended to
read as follows:
((For any reimbursement of election costs under RCW 29A.04.420, the
secretary of state shall pay interest at an annual rate equal to two
percentage points in excess of the discount rate on ninety-day
commercial paper in effect at the federal reserve bank in San Francisco
on the fifteenth day of the month immediately preceding the payment for
any period of time in excess of thirty days after the receipt of a
properly executed and documented voucher for such expenses and the
entry of an allotment from specifically appropriated funds for this
purpose.)) The secretary of state shall promptly notify any county
that submits an incomplete or inaccurate voucher for reimbursement
under RCW 29A.04.420.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 29A.64 RCW
to read as follows:
If a mandatory recount is required under RCW 29A.64.021 for an
office where a candidate for the office must file the declaration of
candidacy with the secretary of state, the county auditor shall
determine the expense of conducting the recount and file an expense
claim for such costs with the secretary of state. The secretary of
state shall reimburse the county an amount equal to seventy-five
percent of the cost of the recount.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.64.081 and 2004 c 271 s 181 are each amended to
read as follows:
The canvassing board shall determine the expenses for conducting a
recount of votes.
The cost of the recount shall be deducted from the amount deposited
by the applicant for the recount at the time of filing the request for
the recount, and the balance shall be returned to the applicant. If
the costs of the recount exceed the deposit, the applicant shall pay
the difference. No charges may be deducted by the canvassing board
from the deposit for a recount if the recount changes the result of the
nomination or election for which the recount was ordered.
If the recount was requested for an office where a candidate for
the office must file the declaration of candidacy with the secretary of
state, and the recount changed the results of the primary or election,
the canvassing board shall file an expense claim for the costs of that
recount with the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall
reimburse the county an amount equal to seventy-five percent of the
cost of the recount.

--- END ---