BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds:
(1) Assuring the well-being of our state's residents through a
viable, accessible health care system is one of our fundamental
responsibilities. The current system, however, is broken and
unsustainable. Medical expenditures threaten to overwhelm government
budgets, displacing other essential public goods. Double digit cost
increases have become routine, dampening our economy and denying an
increasing number of people even their basic health care needs. Yet
the product of these expenditures is too often poor; too much is spent
on that which contributes little to quality or length of life;
(2) The state must be a leader in the development of an affordable,
effective, and sustainable health care system, that acknowledges that
resources are limited, and directs the use of those limited resources
to those things that do the most to maintain and improve the health
status of our population as a whole. We cannot promise every service
to every resident, but we can assure everyone's access to a basic level
of care, and the best health outcomes given the resources available;
(3) The foundation of such a system is good information, and the
use of that information by all to reduce the need and demand for
medical treatment, and assure that when treatment is necessary, it
provides the best expected result at the lowest possible cost; and
(4) Recent efforts in this state to collect, analyze, and act on
information to improve health care decision making have not been
sufficiently comprehensive or coordinated. Our continued reliance on
incomplete information, and a lack of uniform standards, will only
perpetuate current inefficiencies. A statewide, systematic approach is
necessary to more clearly define the purpose of our health care system,
and align its various components to serve that purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The authority shall promote and coordinate on a statewide basis
the use and application of the best available information and data in
support of:
(a) The proper allocation of financial and human resources within
the health care system, including public health, to best maintain and
improve the health status of all Washington residents;
(b) Intelligent and informed purchasing and reimbursement decisions
by state agencies, employers, health carriers, and others responsible
for financing medical treatment;
(c) Treatment decisions by health care providers that result in the
best health outcomes at the lowest possible cost; and
(d) Consumer choices to improve their own health, reduce the demand
for medical treatment, and when treatment is necessary, receive only
the most efficacious and cost-effective treatment available.
(2) All state agencies shall cooperate with the authority in the
implementation of its duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The authority shall:
(1) Design and periodically update the schedule of benefits
included in the basic health plan to reflect the conscientious,
explicit, and judicious use of current best information and data with
regard to patient care. In designing the schedule of benefits and
enrollee cost-sharing, the authority shall:
(a) Include preventive care services, based on the recommendations
of the United States preventive services task force, with no enrollee
cost-sharing;
(b) Include other benefits determined to be the most efficacious
and cost-effective use of the funds available within the limits
established in this section. Any benefit otherwise mandated by state
law, requiring coverage of certain types of providers, services, or
conditions, shall not be included unless explicitly determined by the
authority to meet the requirements of this subsection;
(c) Structure enrollee cost-sharing to discourage demand for
inappropriate or unnecessary treatment, encourage enrollee
responsibility, including the use of efficacious and cost-effective
services and products, and promote quality care. Costs imposed on
enrollees should not be a barrier to the appropriate use of necessary
health care services; and
(d) Assure that the actuarial value of the plan on January 1st of
each year is no greater than its actuarial value on January 1, 2006,
adjusted annually to reflect the rate of medical inflation;
(2) Develop and incorporate contract standards for the
administration of the basic health plan which address the role of the
managed care plan administrator in:
(a) Educating enrollees regarding proper health care decision
making, engaging them in health promotion and wellness activities, and
assuring their receipt of appropriate preventive services;
(b) Identifying and encouraging appropriate, efficacious, and
cost-effective care by providers based on evidence of best practices,
and promoting the use of quality providers by enrollees;
(c) Identifying enrollees with, or with the potential for, chronic
or other high-cost conditions and providing them coordinated care
through disease and demand management programs;
(d) Encouraging innovative, efficient, and patient-centered
facility designs and service delivery methods that improve enrollee
access to care and health outcomes; and
(3) Develop and incorporate contract standards for the medical
treatment of enrollees by providers in the basic health plan to assure
the receipt of appropriate, efficacious, and cost-effective care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The authority shall design and implement a centralized technology
assessment pilot project to strengthen the capacity of state health
care agencies and others to obtain and evaluate scientific evidence
regarding evolving health care procedures, services, devices, and
technology in support of appropriate purchasing, coverage, and medical
necessity decisions and criteria. A preliminary evaluation of the
project is due to the legislature by May 2007 with a final evaluation
by March 2008.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.47.060 and 2004 c 192 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator has the following powers and duties:
(1) To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered
basic health care services((, including physician services, inpatient
and outpatient hospital services, prescription drugs and medications,
and other services that may be necessary for basic health care. In
addition, the administrator may, to the extent that funds are
available, offer as basic health plan services chemical dependency
services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services
shall increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by
more than five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office
of financial management)) under section 3 of this act. All subsidized
and nonsubsidized enrollees in any participating managed health care
system under the Washington basic health plan shall be entitled to
receive covered basic health care services in return for premium
payments to the plan. ((The schedule of services shall emphasize
proven preventive and primary health care and shall include all
services necessary for prenatal, postnatal, and well-child care.))
However, with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees who are
eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal services through the medical
assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator shall not
contract for such services except to the extent that such services are
necessary over not more than a one-month period in order to maintain
continuity of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the managed care
provider. The schedule of services shall also include a separate
schedule of basic health care services for children, eighteen years of
age and younger, for those subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees who
choose to secure basic coverage through the plan only for their
dependent children. ((In designing and revising the schedule of
services, the administrator shall consider the guidelines for assessing
health services under the mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW 48.47.030,
and such other factors as the administrator deems appropriate.))
(2)(a) To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due
the administrator from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross
family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size and the
ages of all family members. The enrollment of children shall not
require the enrollment of their parent or parents who are eligible for
the plan. The structure of periodic premiums shall be applied to
subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals pursuant to
subsection (11) of this section and to the share of the cost of the
plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees
pursuant to subsection (12) of this section.
(b) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees
shall be in an amount equal to the cost charged by the managed health
care system provider to the state for the plan plus the administrative
cost of providing the plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under
RCW 48.14.0201.
(c) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. Premiums due from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees must be in an amount
equal to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to
the state for the plan, plus the administrative cost of providing the
plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201. The
administrator will consider the impact of eligibility determination by
the appropriate federal agency designated by the Trade Act of 2002
(P.L. 107-210) as well as the premium collection and remittance
activities by the United States internal revenue service when
determining the administrative cost charged for health coverage tax
credit eligible enrollees.
(d) An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior
approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other
amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by
arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism acceptable to the
administrator. The administrator shall establish a mechanism for
receiving premium payments from the United States internal revenue
service for health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees.
(((e) To develop, as an offering by every health carrier providing
coverage identical to the basic health plan, as configured on January
1, 2001, a basic health plan model plan with uniformity in enrollee
cost-sharing requirements.))
(3) To evaluate, with the cooperation of participating managed
health care system providers, the impact on the basic health plan of
enrolling health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The
administrator shall issue to the appropriate committees of the
legislature preliminary evaluations on June 1, 2005, and January 1,
2006, and a final evaluation by June 1, 2006. The evaluation shall
address the number of persons enrolled, the duration of their
enrollment, their utilization of covered services relative to other
basic health plan enrollees, and the extent to which their enrollment
contributed to any change in the cost of the basic health plan.
(4) To end the participation of health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees in the basic health plan if the federal government reduces or
terminates premium payments on their behalf through the United States
internal revenue service.
(5) To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost-sharing
consistent with section 3 of this act due a managed health care system
from subsidized, nonsubsidized, and health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees. ((The structure shall discourage inappropriate enrollee
utilization of health care services, and may utilize copayments,
deductibles, and other cost-sharing mechanisms, but shall not be so
costly to enrollees as to constitute a barrier to appropriate
utilization of necessary health care services.))
(6) To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so as
to prevent an overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes.
Whenever the administrator finds that there is danger of such an
overexpenditure, the administrator shall close enrollment until the
administrator finds the danger no longer exists. Such a closure does
not apply to health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees who receive
a premium subsidy from the United States internal revenue service as
long as the enrollees qualify for the health coverage tax credit
program.
(7) To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as
defined in RCW 70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided to persons who
qualify may be based on the lowest cost plans, as defined by the
administrator.
(8) To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the delivery
of services and availability of the plan to residents of the state,
subject to the limitations contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act
appropriating funds for the plan.
(9) To solicit and accept applications from managed health care
systems, as defined in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible basic
health care providers under the plan for subsidized enrollees,
nonsubsidized enrollees, or health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees. The administrator shall endeavor to assure that covered
basic health care services are available to any enrollee of the plan
from among a selection of two or more participating managed health care
systems. In adopting any rules or procedures applicable to managed
health care systems and in its dealings with such systems, the
administrator shall consider and make suitable allowance for the need
for health care services and the differences in local availability of
health care resources, along with other resources, within and among the
several areas of the state. Contracts with participating managed
health care systems shall ensure that basic health plan enrollees who
become eligible for medical assistance may, at their option, continue
to receive services from their existing providers within the managed
health care system if such providers have entered into provider
agreements with the department of social and health services.
(10) To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of subsidized,
nonsubsidized, and health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees,
deposit them in the basic health plan operating account, keep records
of enrollee status, and authorize periodic payments to managed health
care systems on the basis of the number of enrollees participating in
the respective managed health care systems.
(11) To accept applications from individuals residing in areas
served by the plan, on behalf of themselves and their spouses and
dependent children, for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan
as subsidized, nonsubsidized, or health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees, to establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for
enrollees as may be necessary, and to determine, upon application and
on a reasonable schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of
any enrollee, eligibility due to current gross family income for
sliding scale premiums. Funds received by a family as part of
participation in the adoption support program authorized under RCW
26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall not be counted toward
a family's current gross family income for the purposes of this
chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income or income changes
accurately, the administrator shall have the authority either to bill
the enrollee for the amounts overpaid by the state or to impose civil
penalties of up to two hundred percent of the amount of subsidy
overpaid due to the enrollee incorrectly reporting income. The
administrator shall adopt rules to define the appropriate application
of these sanctions and the processes to implement the sanctions
provided in this subsection, within available resources. No subsidy
may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose current gross family
income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW
70.47.110, who is a recipient of medical assistance or medical care
services under chapter 74.09 RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their
enrollment for no apparent good cause, the administrator may establish
appropriate rules or requirements that are applicable to such
individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in the plan.
(12) To accept applications from business owners on behalf of
themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent children, as
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, who reside in an area served by
the plan. The administrator may require all or the substantial
majority of the eligible employees of such businesses to enroll in the
plan and establish those procedures necessary to facilitate the orderly
enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed health care system.
The administrator may require that a business owner pay at least an
amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its portion
of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for
medicare who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic
health care coverage and services from a managed care system
participating in the plan. The administrator shall adjust the amount
determined to be due on behalf of or from all such enrollees whenever
the amount negotiated by the administrator with the participating
managed health care system or systems is modified or the administrative
cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.
(13) To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed
health care system in return for the provision of covered basic health
care services to enrollees in the system. Although the schedule of
covered basic health care services will be the same or actuarially
equivalent for similar enrollees, the rates negotiated with
participating managed health care systems may vary among the systems.
In negotiating rates with participating systems, the administrator
shall consider the characteristics of the populations served by the
respective systems, economic circumstances of the local area, the need
to conserve the resources of the basic health plan trust account, and
other factors the administrator finds relevant.
(14) To monitor the provision of covered services to enrollees by
participating managed health care systems in order to assure enrollee
access to good quality basic health care, to require periodic data
reports concerning the utilization of health care services rendered to
enrollees in order to provide adequate information for evaluation, and
to inspect the books and records of participating managed health care
systems to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter. In
requiring reports from participating managed health care systems,
including data on services rendered enrollees, the administrator shall
endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed health care systems and
to the plan. The administrator shall coordinate any such reporting
requirements with other state agencies, such as the insurance
commissioner and the department of health, to minimize duplication of
effort.
(15) To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private employer-based health care coverage and to take appropriate measures consistent
with state and federal statutes that will discourage the reduction of
such coverage in the state.
(16) To develop a program of proven preventive health measures and
to integrate it into the plan wherever possible and consistent with
this chapter.
(17) To provide, consistent with available funding, assistance for
rural residents, underserved populations, and persons of color.
(18) In consultation with appropriate state and local government
agencies, to establish criteria defining eligibility for persons
confined or residing in government-operated institutions.
(19) To administer the premium discounts provided under RCW
48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii) pursuant to a contract with the Washington
state health insurance pool.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The sum of one million dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2006, from the general fund to the health care
authority for the purposes of this act.
(2) The sum of one million dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007,
from the general fund to the health care authority for the purposes of
this act.

--- END ---