BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the current law
applying to enhanced 911 service on multiline telephone systems is
based on old technology, and that the law should be annually reviewed
and updated to allow the deployment of new technologies.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.36.560 and 1995 c 243 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By January 1, 1997, or one year after enhanced 911 service
becomes available or a private switch automatic location identification
service approved by the Washington utilities and transportation
commission is available from the serving local exchange
telecommunications company, whichever is later, any commercial shared
services provider of private shared telecommunications services for
hire or resale to the general public to multiple unaffiliated business
users from a single system shall assure that such a system is connected
to the public switched network such that calls to 911 result in
automatic location identification for each telephone in a format that
is compatible with the existing or planned county enhanced 911 system.
This section shall apply only to providers of service to businesses
containing a physical area exceeding twenty-five thousand square feet,
or businesses on more than one floor of a building, or businesses in
multiple buildings.
(2) The adjutant general, in consultation with the state enhanced
911 coordinator, the state fire protection board, and other interested
parties, should annually review new technologies that relate to this
section. If the adjutant general determines that this section should
be amended to incorporate new technologies, a recommendation to the
legislature shall be made. The adjutant general shall report the
recommendations to the legislature sixty days before the start of any
regular legislative session.

--- END ---