BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds:
(1) As an employer, the state incurs significant costs due to the
poor health of some of its employees. Costs come in the form of
increased health care premiums, lower productivity of employees, and
higher absenteeism.
(2) Lifestyle choices contribute to health status and health care
costs, and employees have control over their level of physical
activity, diet, alcohol and drug use, and whether they smoke.
(3) Employer promotion of self-care and consumer engagement in
health care decision making, by providing appropriate information and
motivation, can improve consumer utilization of services, encourage
employees to seek preventive care and health interventions with
demonstrated efficacy, and discourage the use of high-cost alternatives
when equally effective low-cost alternatives are available.
(4) Employers cannot rely on health plans alone to address the
lifestyle and consumer demand issues of the health care consumer.
Employers have a unique opportunity with direct and frequent access to
employees to structure environments and policies that are more
compelling with regard to behavior change.
(5) The health benefits of worksite health promotion programs can
include increased physical activity, improved nutrition and eating
habits, reduced rates of obesity, lower stress and associated
conditions, decreased rates of smoking, reductions in other health
risks, increased self-management of chronic conditions and compliance
with care regimens, improved health outcomes, and decreased costs for
family members of employees.
(6) The financial benefits of worksite health promotion programs
can include decreased absenteeism, reduction in medical costs, improved
productivity, and improved employee satisfaction and loyalty leading to
increased retention and short-term disability savings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The health care authority shall create a worksite health promotion
program to develop and implement initiatives designed to promote
improved self-care and engagement in health care decision making among
state employees at state agency worksites. The program shall:
(1) Identify, in coordination with the department of personnel, the
department of health, health plans participating in public employees'
benefit board programs, and the University of Washington's center for
health promotion, worksite health promotion programs and activities
that are known to be effective. The coordination shall take advantage
of available knowledge and expertise and ensure a strong link between
this program and the department of health's nutrition and physical
activity program;
(2) Determine the health promotion strategies that would be most
effective for state employees and compatible with existing health
promotion efforts of health plans participating in the public
employees' benefits board programs;
(3) Implement strategies identified in subsection (1) of this
section and provide support to individual agencies as they develop
agency specific programming targeting the particularities of that
agency's work force and environment;
(4) Establish performance measurements and facilitate data
collection to enable an assessment of the impact of health management
and promotion programming at state agencies;
(5) Report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature and the governor by December 1, 2006, on progress in
implementing strategies and evaluating the results of the worksite
health promotion programs.

--- END ---