BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In order to safeguard human health, safety,
and property, and to promote public welfare, any person in either a
public or private capacity using the title of registered interior
designer is required to submit evidence that he or she is qualified
under the provisions of section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Registered interior designer" means a person registered under
this chapter who is a registered design professional qualified by
education, experience, and examination.
(3) "Registration" means the certificate of registration issued by
the department to an interior designer under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) An applicant may qualify for
registration as a registered interior designer if the applicant pays
any applicable fee established by the department and shows to the
satisfaction of the department that the applicant:
(a)(i) Has a current certificate number issued by the national
council for interior design qualification; and
(ii) Has six years' combined work experience and formal education
in interior design from an accredited degree program. At a minimum,
there must be two years of formal education in interior design. The
curriculum for formal education in interior design should encompass:
Manual and computer-aided design, two and three-dimensional design,
design and composition fundamentals, color theory, building systems,
material, finishes and specifications, codes and ordinances,
presentation skills, and business practices and management. Hours of
experience must be distributed among six competency areas:
Programming, schematic design, design development, contract documents,
contract administration, and professional practice; or
(b) Has provided the department, by July 1, 2007, with proof of
fifteen years of work experience as an interior designer and two years
of formal education in interior design.
(2) The department may also grant registration by reciprocity. An
applicant applying to the department for registration by reciprocity
must furnish satisfactory evidence that the applicant holds both a:
(a) Valid registration or license issued by another registration
authority recognized by the department, where the qualifications for
registration or licensure are substantially equivalent to those
required by this chapter on the date of original registration or
licensure with the other registration authority; and
(b) Current certificate number issued by the national council for
interior design qualification.
(3) The department shall develop by rule the necessary forms to use
in verifying education and work experience for registration.
(4) The fees charged by the department must cover the costs of
establishing and maintaining the registration program in accordance
with RCW 43.24.086.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department shall grant a certificate of
registration to an applicant who meets the requirements of section 3 of
this act beginning July 1, 2006. After July 1, 2007, a person may not
use the title "registered interior designer" in this state or any other
title, designation, sign, card, or device indicating that the person is
a registered interior designer unless he or she is registered under
this chapter. Every holder of a certificate of registration under this
chapter must display it in a conspicuous place in the holder's
principal office, place of business, or employment. No corporation,
firm, partnership, or association may be granted a certificate of
registration under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The renewal date for certificates of
registration shall be set by the department by rule. A registered
interior designer who fails to pay the renewal fee within thirty days
of the due date shall pay all delinquent renewal fees, plus a penalty
equal to one-third of the renewal fee. A registered interior designer
who fails to pay a renewal fee for a period of five years may be
reinstated under such circumstances as the department determines by
rule. The department must adopt the renewal fees, penalty fees, and
the frequency of renewal by rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 An interior designer registered under this
chapter must complete ten hours of continuing education instruction
every two years. The department shall develop by rule a form to verify
continuing education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department may issue a new certificate
of registration to replace a lost, destroyed, or mutilated certificate.
The director must charge a fee as determined by RCW 43.24.086 for the
issuance of the new certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A person who violates a provision of
this chapter or a rule adopted under it is guilty of a misdemeanor and
may also be subject to a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed five
thousand dollars for each offense.
(2) The department must issue a cease and desist order to any
individual who is not registered under this chapter and holds himself
or herself out as a "registered interior designer."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) This chapter does not affect or prevent
the practice of architecture under chapter 18.08 RCW or engineering
under chapter 18.43 RCW.
(2) This chapter does not prevent any individual from offering or
providing interior design services provided they do not use the title
"registered interior designer."
(3) This chapter does not prevent any individual from using the
term "interior designer."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act may be known and cited as the
registered interior designer professionals act of 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---