BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that more than
forty percent of children from high-income families received a
bachelor's degree or higher within five years of high school
graduation, compared with only six percent of those in the lowest
income group. Opening educational opportunities for these students can
address and correct this disparity. Effective mentoring programs,
along with financial assistance, prepare these low-income students to
succeed and achieve their educational goals.
(2) In order to broaden higher education opportunities, to the
extent funds are specifically appropriated for this purpose, the
legislature supports the Washington state achievers' scholarship
program. This program: (a) Provides mentoring to ensure academic
support is available to students while in high school, encourages
college enrollment, and gives assistance when enrolled in college; (b)
identifies and reduces financial barriers to college for talented, low-
income students; and (c) leverages private funding for higher education
financial assistance.

--- END ---