BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.09.010 and 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature hereby finds and declares that the forest land
resources are among the most valuable of all resources in the state;
that a viable forest products industry is of prime importance to the
state's economy; that it is in the public interest for public and
private commercial forest lands to be managed consistent with sound
policies of natural resource protection; that coincident with
maintenance of a viable forest products industry, it is important to
afford protection to forest soils, fisheries, wildlife, water quantity
and quality, air quality, recreation, and scenic beauty.
(2) The legislature further finds and declares it to be in the
public interest of this state to create and maintain through the
adoption of this chapter a comprehensive statewide system of laws and
forest practices rules which will achieve the following purposes and
policies:
(a) Afford protection to, promote, foster and encourage timber
growth, and require such minimum reforestation of commercial tree
species on forest lands as will reasonably utilize the timber growing
capacity of the soil following current timber harvest;
(b) Afford protection to forest soils and public resources by
utilizing all reasonable methods of technology in conducting forest
practices;
(c) Recognize both the public and private interest in the
profitable growing and harvesting of timber;
(d) Promote efficiency by permitting maximum operating freedom
consistent with the other purposes and policies stated herein;
(e) Provide for regulation of forest practices so as to avoid
unnecessary duplication in such rules;
(f) Provide for interagency input and intergovernmental and tribal
coordination and cooperation;
(g) Achieve compliance with all applicable requirements of federal
and state law with respect to nonpoint sources of water pollution from
forest practices;
(h) To consider reasonable land use planning goals and concepts
contained in local comprehensive plans and zoning regulations;
(i) Foster cooperation among managers of public resources, forest
landowners, Indian tribes and the citizens of the state; and
(j) Develop a watershed analysis system that addresses the
cumulative effect of forest practices on, at a minimum, the public
resources of fish, water, and public capital improvements of the state
and its political subdivisions.
(3) The legislature further finds and declares that it is also in
the public interest of the state to encourage forest landowners to
undertake corrective and remedial action to reduce the impact of mass
earth movements and fluvial processes.
(4) The legislature further finds and declares that it is in the
public interest that the applicants for state forest practices permits
should assist in paying for the cost of review and permitting necessary
for the environmental protection of these resources.
(5) The legislature further finds and declares that:
(a) The long-term stewardship that is provided by family forest
landowners in urban growth areas and rural areas is important for
maintaining the evergreen state's special character and quality of life
and provides citizens living in the urban/rural interface with an
important buffer that provides aesthetic values at minimal cost to the
taxpayers;
(b) Many family forest landowners live and raise their families on
their forest land, or otherwise foster intergenerational involvement,
creating an emotional attachment to and love for the land that
increases the likelihood of continued ownership and management of
family forests by future generations;
(c) Many family forests are characterized by a "light touch on the
land." This includes: Species diversity; low-impact harvesting; small
harvest openings and long stand rotations with multiple thinning
entries; and a variety of nontimber management objectives that benefit
the public;
(d) Family forest landowners provide: Family wage jobs to their
local communities; a reliable tax base to their counties, generally
utilizing fewer public services than taxes paid; and a way of life
integral to rural communities;
(e) Family forest lands provide significant benefits to the
economic and environmental well-being of Washington's citizens,
including: Clean air and water; habitat for a broad array of fish,
wildlife, and plant species, including some threatened and endangered
species; and a variety of renewable natural resource products;
(f) If these lands were to be converted to nonforestry uses, these
benefits would be lost to future generations as well as current
generations of citizens;
(g) Current forest practices rules and other administrative
regulations and complexity pose significant challenges to the continued
ownership and management of family forests, creating a disincentive to
their continued management as forest lands and are among the causes of
their conversion to nonforest land uses;
(h) It is in the best interests of the citizens of the state of
Washington and the environment that legislation and rules be developed
and implemented that will encourage family forest ownership and long-term management planning; and
(i) It is also in the best interests of the citizens of the state
of Washington and the environment that family forest landowners and the
state of Washington are given the opportunity to enter into long-term
management plans that will provide enhanced flexibility and secure the
many benefits of forest land management for current and future
generations of Washington citizens.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.09.020 and 2003 c 311 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adaptive management" means reliance on scientific methods to
test the results of actions taken so that the management and related
policy can be changed promptly and appropriately.
(2) "Appeals board" means the forest practices appeals board
created by RCW 76.09.210.
(3) "Aquatic resources" includes water quality, salmon, other
species of the vertebrate classes Cephalaspidomorphi and Osteichthyes
identified in the forests and fish report, the Columbia torrent
salamander (Rhyacotriton kezeri), the Cascade torrent salamander
(Rhyacotriton cascadae), the Olympic torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton
olympian), the Dunn's salamander (Plethodon dunni), the Van Dyke's
salamander (Plethodon vandyke), the tailed frog (Ascaphus truei), and
their respective habitats.
(4) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(5) "Contiguous" means land adjoining or touching by common corner
or otherwise. Land having common ownership divided by a road or other
right of way shall be considered contiguous.
(6) "Conversion to a use other than commercial timber operation"
means a bona fide conversion to an active use which is incompatible
with timber growing and as may be defined by forest practices rules.
(7) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(8) "Fish passage barrier" means any artificial instream structure
that impedes the free passage of fish.
(9) "Forest land" means all land which is capable of supporting a
merchantable stand of timber and is not being actively used for a use
which is incompatible with timber growing. Forest land does not
include agricultural land that is or was enrolled in the conservation
reserve enhancement program by contract if such agricultural land was
historically used for agricultural purposes and the landowner intends
to continue to use the land for agricultural purposes in the future.
As it applies to the operation of the road maintenance and abandonment
plan element of the forest practices rules on ((small)) family forest
landowners, the term "forest land" excludes:
(a) Residential home sites, which may include up to five acres; and
(b) Cropfields, orchards, vineyards, pastures, feedlots, fish pens,
and the land on which appurtenances necessary to the production,
preparation, or sale of crops, fruit, dairy products, fish, and
livestock exist.
(10) "Forest landowner" means any person in actual control of
forest land, whether such control is based either on legal or equitable
title, or on any other interest entitling the holder to sell or
otherwise dispose of any or all of the timber on such land in any
manner. However, any lessee or other person in possession of forest
land without legal or equitable title to such land shall be excluded
from the definition of "forest landowner" unless such lessee or other
person has the right to sell or otherwise dispose of any or all of the
timber located on such forest land.
(11) "Forest practice" means any activity conducted on or directly
pertaining to forest land and relating to growing, harvesting, or
processing timber, including but not limited to:
(a) Road and trail construction;
(b) Harvesting, final and intermediate;
(c) Precommercial thinning;
(d) Reforestation;
(e) Fertilization;
(f) Prevention and suppression of diseases and insects;
(g) Salvage of trees; and
(h) Brush control.
"Forest practice" shall not include preparatory work such as tree
marking, surveying and road flagging, and removal or harvesting of
incidental vegetation from forest lands such as berries, ferns,
greenery, mistletoe, herbs, mushrooms, and other products which cannot
normally be expected to result in damage to forest soils, timber, or
public resources.
(12) "Forest practices rules" means any rules adopted pursuant to
RCW 76.09.040.
(13) "Forest road," as it applies to the operation of the road
maintenance and abandonment plan element of the forest practices rules
on ((small)) family forest landowners, means a road or road segment
that crosses land that meets the definition of forest land, but
excludes residential access roads.
(14) "Forest trees" does not include hardwood trees cultivated by
agricultural methods in growing cycles shorter than fifteen years if
the trees were planted on land that was not in forest use immediately
before the trees were planted and before the land was prepared for
planting the trees. "Forest trees" includes Christmas trees, but does
not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural
methods, as that term is defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(15) "Forests and fish report" means the forests and fish report to
the board dated April 29, 1999.
(16) "Application" means the application required pursuant to RCW
76.09.050.
(17) "Operator" means any person engaging in forest practices
except an employee with wages as his or her sole compensation.
(18) "Person" means any individual, partnership, private, public,
or municipal corporation, county, the department or other state or
local governmental entity, or association of individuals of whatever
nature.
(19) "Public resources" means water, fish and wildlife, and in
addition shall mean capital improvements of the state or its political
subdivisions.
(20) "((Small)) Family forest landowner" has the same meaning as
defined in RCW 76.09.450.
(21) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, of a commercial
species, including Christmas trees. However, "timber" does not include
Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods, as that
term is defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(22) "Timber owner" means any person having all or any part of the
legal interest in timber. Where such timber is subject to a contract
of sale, "timber owner" shall mean the contract purchaser.
(23) "Board" means the forest practices board created in RCW
76.09.030.
(24) "Unconfined avulsing channel migration zone" means the area
within which the active channel of an unconfined avulsing stream is
prone to move and where the movement would result in a potential near-term loss of riparian forest adjacent to the stream. Sizeable islands
with productive timber may exist within the zone.
(25) "Unconfined avulsing stream" means generally fifth order or
larger waters that experience abrupt shifts in channel location,
creating a complex flood plain characterized by extensive gravel bars,
disturbance species of vegetation of variable age, numerous side
channels, wall-based channels, oxbow lakes, and wetland complexes.
Many of these streams have dikes and levees that may temporarily or
permanently restrict channel movement.

Sec. 3 RCW 76.09.040 and 2000 c 11 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Where necessary to accomplish the purposes and policies stated
in RCW 76.09.010, and to implement the provisions of this chapter, the
board shall adopt forest practices rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW
and in accordance with the procedures enumerated in this section that:
(a) Establish minimum standards for forest practices;
(b) Provide procedures for the voluntary development of resource
management plans which may be adopted as an alternative to the minimum
standards in (a) of this subsection if the plan is consistent with the
purposes and policies stated in RCW 76.09.010 and the plan meets or
exceeds the objectives of the minimum standards;
(c) Set forth necessary administrative provisions;
(d) Establish procedures for the collection and administration of
forest practice fees as set forth by this chapter; and
(e) Allow for the development of watershed analyses.
Forest practices rules pertaining to water quality protection shall
be adopted by the board after reaching agreement with the director of
the department of ecology or the director's designee on the board with
respect thereto. All other forest practices rules shall be adopted by
the board.
Forest practices rules shall be administered and enforced by either
the department or the local governmental entity as provided in this
chapter. Such rules shall be adopted and administered so as to give
consideration to all purposes and policies set forth in RCW 76.09.010.
(2) The board shall prepare proposed forest practices rules. In
addition to any forest practices rules relating to water quality
protection proposed by the board, the department of ecology may submit
to the board proposed forest practices rules relating to water quality
protection.
Prior to initiating the rule making process, the proposed rules
shall be submitted for review and comments to the department of fish
and wildlife and to the counties of the state. After receipt of the
proposed forest practices rules, the department of fish and wildlife
and the counties of the state shall have thirty days in which to review
and submit comments to the board, and to the department of ecology with
respect to its proposed rules relating to water quality protection.
After the expiration of such thirty day period the board and the
department of ecology shall jointly hold one or more hearings on the
proposed rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. At such hearing(s) any
county may propose specific forest practices rules relating to problems
existing within such county. The board may adopt and the department of
ecology may approve such proposals if they find the proposals are
consistent with the purposes and policies of this chapter.
(3) The board, when adopting rules, shall consider how to
accomplish the intent of the new rules while encouraging continued
family forest land ownership and management.
(4) The legislature has given the board authority to implement
long-term management plans as forest practice applications through
alternate plans and other means for family forest landowners. The
needs of family forest landowners for longer term approval of
management plans are not being met as the legislature intended. The
board shall work with the department, the small forest landowner
advisory committee, and other stakeholders to expeditiously authorize
approval of long-term plans for family forest landowners.
(5) The board shall explore other family forest issues, such as a
reasonable use exception, continued conversion pressures, and
regulatory incentives. The board shall report to the commissioner of
public lands, the governor, and the legislature on its progress in
addressing these and other family forest issues by June 30th of each
odd-numbered year.
(6) The board shall establish by rule a riparian open space program
that includes acquisition of a fee interest in, or at the landowner's
option, a conservation easement on lands within unconfined avulsing
channel migration zones. Once acquired, these lands may be held and
managed by the department, transferred to another state agency,
transferred to an appropriate local government agency, or transferred
to a private nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined in
RCW 64.04.130, in fee or transfer of management obligation. The board
shall adopt rules governing the acquisition by the state or donation to
the state of such interest in lands including the right of refusal if
the lands are subject to unacceptable liabilities. The rules shall
include definitions of qualifying lands, priorities for acquisition,
and provide for the opportunity to transfer such lands with limited
warranties and with a description of boundaries that does not require
full surveys where the cost of securing the surveys would be
unreasonable in relation to the value of the lands conveyed. The rules
shall provide for the management of the lands for ecological protection
or fisheries enhancement. Because there are few, if any, comparable
sales of forest land within unconfined avulsing channel migration
zones, separate from the other lands or assets, these lands are likely
to be extraordinarily difficult to appraise and the cost of a
conventional appraisal often would be unreasonable in relation to the
value of the land involved. Therefore, for the purposes of voluntary
sales under this section, the legislature declares that these lands are
presumed to have a value equal to: (a) The acreage in the sale
multiplied by the average value of commercial forest land in the region
under the land value tables used for property tax purposes under RCW
((84.33.120)) 84.33.140; plus (b) the cruised volume of any timber
located within the channel migration multiplied by the appropriate
quality code stumpage value for timber of the same species shown on the
appropriate table used for timber harvest excise tax purposes under RCW
84.33.091. For purposes of this section, there shall be an eastside
region and a westside region as defined in the forests and fish report
as defined in RCW 76.09.020.
(((4))) (7) Subject to appropriations sufficient to cover the cost
of such an acquisition program and the related costs of administering
the program, the department is directed to purchase a fee interest or,
at the owner's option, a conservation easement in land that an owner
tenders for purchase; provided that such lands have been taxed as
forest lands and are located within an unconfined avulsing channel
migration zone. Lands acquired under this section shall become
riparian open space. These acquisitions shall not be deemed to trigger
the compensating tax of chapters 84.33 and 84.34 RCW.
(((5))) (8) Instead of offering to sell interests in qualifying
lands, owners may elect to donate the interests to the state.
(((6))) (9) Any acquired interest in qualifying lands by the state
under this section shall be managed as riparian open space.

Sec. 4 RCW 76.09.368 and 2002 c 120 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature intends that ((small)) family forest landowners
have access to alternate plan processes or alternate harvest
restrictions, or both if necessary, that meet the public resource
protection standard set forth in RCW 76.09.370(3), but which also
lowers the overall cost of regulation to ((small)) family forest
landowners including, but not limited to, timber value forgone, layout
costs, and operating costs. The forest practices board shall consult
with the small forest landowner office advisory committee in developing
these alternate approaches. By July 1, 2003, the forest practices
board shall provide the legislature with a written report that
describes the board's progress in developing alternate plan processes
or alternate harvest restrictions, or both if necessary, that meet
legislative intent.
As used in this section, "((small)) family forest landowner" has
the same meaning as defined in RCW ((76.13.120(2))) 76.09.450.

Sec. 5 RCW 76.09.410 and 2003 c 311 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state may not require a ((small)) family forest landowner
to invest in upgrades, replacements, or other engineering of a forest
road, and any fish passage barriers that are a part of the road, that
do not threaten public resources or create a barrier to the passage of
fish.
(2) Participation in the forests and fish agreement provides a
benefit to both the landowner in terms of federal assurances, and the
public in terms of aquatic habitat preservation and water quality
enhancement; therefore, if conditions do threaten public resources or
create a fish passage barrier, the road maintenance and abandonment
planning process may not require a ((small)) family forest landowner to
take a positive action that will result in high cost without a
significant portion of that cost being shared by the public.
(3) Some fish passage barriers are more of a threat to public
resources than others; therefore, no ((small)) family forest landowner
should be required to repair a fish passage barrier until higher
priority fish passage barriers on other lands in the watershed have
been repaired.
(4) If an existing fish passage barrier on land owned by a
((small)) family forest landowner was installed under an approved
forest practices application or notification, and hydraulics approval,
and that fish passage barrier becomes a high priority for fish passage
based on the watershed ranking in RCW ((76.13.150)) 77.12.755, one
hundred percent public funding shall be provided.
(5) The preparation of a road maintenance and abandonment plan can
require technical expertise that may require large expenditures before
the time that the landowner plans to conduct any revenue-generating
operations on his or her land; therefore, ((small)) family forest
landowners should be allowed to complete a simplified road maintenance
and abandonment plan checklist, that does not require professional
engineering or forestry expertise to complete, and that does not need
to be submitted until the time that the landowner submits a forest
practices application or notification for final or intermediate
harvesting, or for salvage of trees. Chapter 311, Laws of 2003 is
intended to provide an alternate way for ((small)) family forest
landowners to comply with the road maintenance and abandonment plan
goals identified in the forest practices rules.

Sec. 6 RCW 76.09.420 and 2003 c 311 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board must amend the forest practices rules relating to
road maintenance and abandonment plans that exist on May 14, 2003, to
reflect the following:
(a) A forest landowner who owns a total of eighty acres or less of
forest land in Washington is not required to submit a road maintenance
and abandonment plan for any block of forest land that is twenty
contiguous acres or less in area;
(b) A landowner who satisfies the definition of a ((small)) family
forest landowner, but who does not qualify under (a) of this
subsection, is only required to submit a checklist road maintenance and
abandonment plan with the abbreviated content requirements provided for
in subsection (3) of this section, and is not required to comply with
annual reporting and review requirements; and
(c) Existing forest roads must be maintained only to the extent
necessary to prevent damage to public resources.
(2) The department must provide a landowner who is either exempted
from submitting a road maintenance and abandonment plan under
subsection (1)(a) of this section, or who qualifies for a checklist
road maintenance and abandonment plan under subsection (1)(b) of this
section, with an educational brochure outlining road maintenance
standards and requirements. In addition, the department must develop
a series of nonmandatory educational workshops on the rules associated
with road construction and maintenance.
(3)(a) A landowner who qualifies for a checklist road maintenance
and abandonment plan under subsection (1)(b) of this section is only
required to submit a checklist, designed by the department in
consultation with the small forest landowner office advisory committee
created in RCW 76.13.110, that confirms that the landowner is applying
the checklist criteria to forest roads covered or affected by a forest
practices application or notification. When developing the checklist
road maintenance and abandonment plan, the department shall ensure that
the checklist does not exceed current state law. Nothing in this
subsection increases or adds to ((small)) family forest landowners'
duties or responsibilities under any other section of the forest
practices rules or any other state law or rule.
(b) A landowner who qualifies for the checklist road maintenance
and abandonment plan is not required to submit the checklist before the
time that he or she submits a forest practices application or
notification for final or intermediate harvesting, or for salvage of
trees. The department may encourage and accept checklists prior to the
time that they are due.
(4) The department must monitor the extent of the checklist road
maintenance and abandonment plan approach and report its findings to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2008, and
December 31, 2013.
(5) The board shall adopt emergency rules under RCW 34.05.090 by
October 31, 2003, to implement this section. The emergency rules shall
remain in effect until permanent rules can be adopted. The forest
practices rules that relate to road maintenance and abandonment plans
shall remain in effect as they existed on May 14, 2003, until emergency
rules have been adopted under this section.
(6) This section is only intended to relate to the board's duties
as they relate to the road maintenance and abandonment plan element of
the forests and fish report. Nothing in this section alters any forest
landowner's duties and responsibilities under any other section of the
forest practices rules, or any other state law or rule.

Sec. 7 RCW 76.09.440 and 2003 c 311 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall not disapprove a forest practices application
filed by a ((small)) family forest landowner on the basis that fish
passage barriers have not been removed or replaced if the ((small))
family forest landowner filing the application has committed to
participate in the program established in RCW 76.13.150 for all fish
passage barriers existing on the block of forest land covered by the
forest practices application, and the fish passage barriers existing on
the block of forest land covered by the forest practices application
are lower on the funding order list established for the program than
the current projects that are capable of being funded by the program.

Sec. 8 RCW 76.09.450 and 2003 c 311 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter and RCW 76.13.150 and 77.12.755,
"((small)) family forest landowner" means ((an owner of forest land))
a forest landowner, except any publicly held corporation, governmental
entity, nonprofit organization, or public utility, who, at the time of
submission of required documentation to the department, has harvested
from his or her own lands in this state no more than an average timber
volume of two million board feet per year during the three years prior
to submitting documentation to the department and who certifies that he
or she does not expect to harvest from his or her own lands in the
state more than an average timber volume of two million board feet per
year during the ten years following the submission of documentation to
the department. However, any landowner who exceeded the two million
board feet annual average timber harvest threshold from their land in
the three years prior to submitting documentation to the department, or
who expects to exceed the threshold during any of the following ten
years, shall still be deemed a "((small)) family forest landowner" if
he or she establishes to the department's reasonable satisfaction that
the harvest limits were, or will be, exceeded in order to raise funds
to pay estate taxes or for an equally compelling and unexpected
obligation, such as for a court-ordered judgment or for extraordinary
medical expenses.

Sec. 9 RCW 77.12.755 and 2003 c 311 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
In coordination with the department of natural resources and lead
entity groups, the department must establish a ranked inventory of fish
passage barriers on land owned by ((small)) family forest landowners
based on the principle of fixing the worst first within a watershed
consistent with the fish passage priorities of the forest and fish
report. The department shall first gather and synthesize all available
existing information about the locations and impacts of fish passage
barriers in Washington. This information must include, but not be
limited to, the most recently available limiting factors analysis
conducted pursuant to RCW 77.85.060(2), the stock status information
contained in the department of fish and wildlife salmonid stock
inventory (SASSI), the salmon and steelhead habitat inventory and
assessment project (SSHIAP), and any comparable science-based
assessment when available. The inventory of fish passage barriers must
be kept current and at a minimum be updated by the beginning of each
calendar year. Nothing in this section grants the department or others
additional right of entry onto private property.

Sec. 10 RCW 76.13.100 and 2003 c 39 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that increasing regulatory requirements
continue to diminish the economic viability of ((small)) family forest
landowners. The concerns set forth in RCW 77.85.180 about the
importance of sustaining forestry as a viable land use are particularly
applicable to ((small)) family landowners because of the location of
their holdings, the expected complexity of the regulatory requirements,
and the need for significant technical expertise not readily available
to small landowners. The further reduction in harvestable timber owned
by ((small)) family forest landowners as a result of the rules to be
adopted under RCW 76.09.055 will further erode ((small)) family
landowners' economic viability and willingness or ability to keep the
lands in forestry use and, therefore, reduce the amount of habitat
available for salmon recovery and conservation of other aquatic
resources, as defined in RCW 76.09.020.
(2) The legislature finds that the concerns identified in
subsection (1) of this section should be addressed by establishing
within the department of natural resources a small forest landowner
office that shall be a resource and focal point for ((small)) family
forest landowner concerns and policies. The legislature further finds
that a forestry riparian easement program shall be established to
acquire easements from ((small)) family landowners along riparian and
other areas of value to the state for protection of aquatic resources.
The legislature further finds that ((small)) family forest landowners
should have the option of alternate management plans or alternate
harvest restrictions on smaller harvest units that may have a
relatively low impact on aquatic resources. The small forest landowner
office should be responsible for assisting ((small)) family landowners
in the development and implementation of these plans or restrictions.

Sec. 11 RCW 76.13.110 and 2002 c 120 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of natural resources shall establish and
maintain a small forest landowner office. The small forest landowner
office shall be a resource and focal point for ((small)) family forest
landowner concerns and policies, and shall have significant expertise
regarding the management of small forest holdings, governmental
programs applicable to such holdings, and the forestry riparian
easement program.
(2) The small forest landowner office shall administer the
provisions of the forestry riparian easement program created under RCW
76.13.120.
(3) The small forest landowner office shall assist in the
development of ((small)) family landowner options through alternate
management plans or alternate harvest restrictions appropriate to
((small)) family landowners. The small forest landowner office shall
develop criteria to be adopted by the forest practices board in rules
and a manual for alternate management plans or alternate harvest
restrictions. These alternate plans or alternate harvest restrictions
shall meet riparian functions while requiring less costly regulatory
prescriptions. At the landowner's option, alternate plans or alternate
harvest restrictions may be used to further meet riparian functions.
The small forest landowner office shall evaluate the cumulative
impact of such alternate management plans or alternate harvest
restrictions on essential riparian functions at the subbasin or
watershed level. The small forest landowner office shall adjust future
alternate management plans or alternate harvest restrictions in a
manner that will minimize the negative impacts on essential riparian
functions within a subbasin or watershed.
(4) An advisory committee is established to assist the small forest
landowner office in developing policy and recommending rules to the
forest practices board. The advisory committee shall consist of seven
members, including a representative from the department of ecology, the
department of fish and wildlife, and a tribal representative. Four
additional committee members shall be ((small)) family forest
landowners who shall be appointed by the commissioner of public lands
from a list of candidates submitted by the board of directors of the
Washington farm forestry association or its successor organization.
The association shall submit more than one candidate for each position.
The commissioner shall designate two of the initial ((small)) family
forest landowner appointees to serve five-year terms and the other two
((small)) family forest landowner appointees to serve four-year terms.
Thereafter, appointees shall serve for a term of four years. The small
forest landowner office shall review draft rules or rule concepts with
the committee prior to recommending such rules to the forest practices
board. The office shall reimburse nongovernmental committee members
for reasonable expenses associated with attending committee meetings as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) By December 1, 2002, the small forest landowner office shall
provide a report to the board and the legislature containing:
(a) Estimates of the amounts of nonindustrial forests and woodlands
in holdings of twenty acres or less, twenty-one to one hundred acres,
one hundred to one thousand acres, and one thousand to five thousand
acres, in western Washington and eastern Washington, and the number of
persons having total nonindustrial forest and woodland holdings in
those size ranges;
(b) Estimates of the number of parcels of nonindustrial forests and
woodlands held in contiguous ownerships of twenty acres or less, and
the percentages of those parcels containing improvements used: (i) As
primary residences for half or more of most years; (ii) as vacation
homes or other temporary residences for less than half of most years;
and (iii) for other uses;
(c) The watershed administrative units in which significant
portions of the riparian areas or total land area are nonindustrial
forests and woodlands;
(d) Estimates of the number of forest practices applications and
notifications filed per year for forest road construction,
silvicultural activities to enhance timber growth, timber harvest not
associated with conversion to nonforest land uses, with estimates of
the number of acres of nonindustrial forests and woodlands on which
forest practices are conducted under those applications and
notifications; and
(e) Recommendations on ways the board and the legislature could
provide more effective incentives to encourage continued management of
nonindustrial forests and woodlands for forestry uses in ways that
better protect salmon, other fish and wildlife, water quality, and
other environmental values.
(6) By December 1, 2004, and every four years thereafter, the small
forest landowner office shall provide to the board and the legislature
an update of the report described in subsection (5) of this section,
containing more recent information and describing:
(a) Trends in the items estimated under subsection (5)(a) through
(d) of this section;
(b) Whether, how, and to what extent the forest practices act and
rules contributed to those trends; and
(c) Whether, how, and to what extent: (i) The board and
legislature implemented recommendations made in the previous report;
and (ii) implementation of or failure to implement those
recommendations affected those trends.

Sec. 12 RCW 76.13.120 and 2004 c 102 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the state should acquire easements
along riparian and other sensitive aquatic areas from ((small)) family
forest landowners willing to sell or donate such easements to the state
provided that the state will not be required to acquire such easements
if they are subject to unacceptable liabilities. The legislature
therefore establishes a forestry riparian easement program.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section and RCW 76.13.100 and 76.13.110 unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(a) "Forestry riparian easement" means an easement covering
qualifying timber granted voluntarily to the state by a ((small))
family forest landowner.
(b) "Qualifying timber" means those trees covered by a forest
practices application that the ((small)) family forest landowner is
required to leave unharvested under the rules adopted under RCW
76.09.055 and 76.09.370 or that is made uneconomic to harvest by those
rules, and for which the ((small)) family landowner is willing to grant
the state a forestry riparian easement. "Qualifying timber" is timber
within or bordering a commercially reasonable harvest unit as
determined under rules adopted by the forest practices board, or timber
for which an approved forest practices application for timber harvest
cannot be obtained because of restrictions under the forest practices
rules.
(c) "((Small)) Family forest landowner" means a landowner meeting
all of the following characteristics: (i) A forest landowner as
defined in RCW 76.09.020 whose interest in the land and timber is in
fee or who has rights to the timber to be included in the forestry
riparian easement that extend at least fifty years from the date the
forest practices application associated with the easement is submitted;
(ii) an entity that has harvested from its own lands in this state
during the three years prior to the year of application an average
timber volume that would qualify the owner as a small harvester under
RCW 84.33.035; and (iii) an entity that certifies at the time of
application that it does not expect to harvest from its own lands more
than the volume allowed by RCW 84.33.035 during the ten years following
application. If a landowner's prior three-year average harvest exceeds
the limit of RCW 84.33.035, or the landowner expects to exceed this
limit during the ten years following application, and that landowner
establishes to the department of natural resources' reasonable
satisfaction that the harvest limits were or will be exceeded to raise
funds to pay estate taxes or equally compelling and unexpected
obligations such as court-ordered judgments or extraordinary medical
expenses, the landowner shall be deemed to be a ((small)) family forest
landowner.
For purposes of determining whether a person qualifies as a
((small)) family forest landowner, the small forest landowner office,
created in RCW 76.13.110, shall evaluate the landowner under this
definition, pursuant to RCW 76.13.160, as of the date that the forest
practices application is submitted or the date the landowner notifies
the department that the harvest is to begin with which the forestry
riparian easement is associated. ((A small forest landowner can
include an individual, partnership, corporate, or other nongovernmental
legal entity.)) If a landowner grants timber rights to another entity
for less than five years, the landowner may still qualify as a
((small)) family forest landowner under this section. If a landowner
is unable to obtain an approved forest practices application for timber
harvest for any of his or her land because of restrictions under the
forest practices rules, the landowner may still qualify as a ((small))
family forest landowner under this section.
(d) "Completion of harvest" means that the trees have been
harvested from an area and that further entry into that area by
mechanized logging or slash treating equipment is not expected.
(3) The department of natural resources is authorized and directed
to accept and hold in the name of the state of Washington forestry
riparian easements granted by ((small)) family forest landowners
covering qualifying timber and to pay compensation to such landowners
in accordance with subsections (6) and (7) of this section. The
department of natural resources may not transfer the easements to any
entity other than another state agency.
(4) Forestry riparian easements shall be effective for fifty years
from the date the forest practices application associated with the
qualifying timber is submitted to the department of natural resources,
unless the easement is terminated earlier by the department of natural
resources voluntarily, based on a determination that termination is in
the best interest of the state, or under the terms of a termination
clause in the easement.
(5) Forestry riparian easements shall be restrictive only, and
shall preserve all lawful uses of the easement premises by the
landowner that are consistent with the terms of the easement and the
requirement to protect riparian functions during the term of the
easement, subject to the restriction that the leave trees required by
the rules to be left on the easement premises may not be cut during the
term of the easement. No right of public access to or across, or any
public use of the easement premises is created by this statute or by
the easement. Forestry riparian easements shall not be deemed to
trigger the compensating tax of or otherwise disqualify land from being
taxed under chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW.
(6) Upon application of a ((small)) family forest landowner for a
riparian easement that is associated with a forest practices
application and the landowner's marking of the qualifying timber on the
qualifying lands, the small forest landowner office shall determine the
compensation to be offered to the ((small)) family forest landowner as
provided for in this section. The small forest landowner office shall
also determine the compensation to be offered to a ((small)) family
forest landowner for qualifying timber for which an approved forest
practices application for timber harvest cannot be obtained because of
restrictions under the forest practices rules. The legislature
recognizes that there is not readily available market transaction
evidence of value for easements of this nature, and thus establishes
the following methodology to ascertain the value for forestry riparian
easements. Values so determined shall not be considered competent
evidence of value for any other purpose.
The small forest landowner office shall establish the volume of the
qualifying timber. Based on that volume and using data obtained or
maintained by the department of revenue under RCW 84.33.074 and
84.33.091, the small forest landowner office shall attempt to determine
the fair market value of the qualifying timber as of the date the
forest practices application associated with the qualifying timber was
submitted or the date the landowner notifies the department that the
harvest is to begin. Removal of any qualifying timber before the
expiration of the easement must be in accordance with the forest
practices rules and the terms of the easement. There shall be no
reduction in compensation for reentry.
(7) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the small
forest landowner office shall, subject to available funding, offer
compensation to the ((small)) family forest landowner in the amount of
fifty percent of the value determined in subsection (6) of this
section, plus the compliance and reimbursement costs as determined in
accordance with RCW 76.13.140. If the landowner accepts the offer for
qualifying timber that will be harvested pursuant to an approved forest
practices application, the department of natural resources shall pay
the compensation promptly upon (a) completion of harvest in the area
covered by the forestry riparian easement; (b) verification that there
has been compliance with the rules requiring leave trees in the
easement area; and (c) execution and delivery of the easement to the
department of natural resources. If the landowner accepts the offer
for qualifying timber for which an approved forest practices
application for timber harvest cannot be obtained because of
restrictions under the forest practices rules, the department of
natural resources shall pay the compensation promptly upon (i)
verification that there has been compliance with the rules requiring
leave trees in the easement area; and (ii) execution and delivery of
the easement to the department of natural resources. Upon donation or
payment of compensation, the department of natural resources may record
the easement.
(8) For approved forest practices applications where the regulatory
impact is greater than the average percentage impact for all ((small))
family landowners as determined by the department of natural resources
analysis under the regulatory fairness act, chapter 19.85 RCW, the
compensation offered will be increased to one hundred percent for that
portion of the regulatory impact that is in excess of the average.
Regulatory impact includes trees left in buffers, special management
zones, and those rendered uneconomic to harvest by these rules. A
separate average or high impact regulatory threshold shall be
established for western and eastern Washington. Criteria for these
measurements and payments shall be established by the small forest
landowner office.
(9) The forest practices board shall adopt rules under the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to implement the
forestry riparian easement program, including the following:
(a) A standard version or versions of all documents necessary or
advisable to create the forestry riparian easements as provided for in
this section;
(b) Standards for descriptions of the easement premises with a
degree of precision that is reasonable in relation to the values
involved;
(c) Methods and standards for cruises and valuation of forestry
riparian easements for purposes of establishing the compensation. The
department of natural resources shall perform the timber cruises of
forestry riparian easements required under this chapter and chapter
76.09 RCW. Any rules concerning the methods and standards for
valuations of forestry riparian easements shall apply only to the
department of natural resources, ((small)) family forest landowners,
and the small forest landowner office;
(d) A method to determine that a forest practices application
involves a commercially reasonable harvest, and adopt criteria for
entering into a forest riparian easement where a commercially
reasonable harvest is not possible or a forest practices application
that has been submitted cannot be approved because of restrictions
under the forest practices rules;
(e) A method to address blowdown of qualified timber falling
outside the easement premises;
(f) A formula for sharing of proceeds in relation to the
acquisition of qualified timber covered by an easement through the
exercise or threats of eminent domain by a federal or state agency with
eminent domain authority, based on the present value of the department
of natural resources' and the landowner's relative interests in the
qualified timber;
(g) High impact regulatory thresholds;
(h) A method to determine timber that is qualifying timber because
it is rendered uneconomic to harvest by the rules adopted under RCW
76.09.055 and 76.09.370; and
(i) A method for internal department of natural resources review of
small forest landowner office compensation decisions under subsection
(7) of this section.

Sec. 13 RCW 76.13.140 and 2002 c 120 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to assist ((small)) family forest landowners, as defined
in RCW 76.09.450, to remain economically viable, the legislature
intends that the ((small)) family forest landowners be able to net
fifty percent of the value of the trees left in the buffer areas. The
amount of compensation offered in RCW 76.13.120 shall also include the
compliance costs for participation in the riparian easement program.
For purposes of this section, "compliance costs" includes the cost of
preparing and recording the easement, and any business and occupation
tax and real estate excise tax imposed because of entering into the
easement. The office may contract with private consultants that the
office finds qualified to perform timber cruises of forestry riparian
easements or to lay out streamside buffers and comply with other forest
and fish regulatory requirements related to the forest riparian
easement program. The department shall reimburse ((small)) family
forest landowners for the actual costs incurred for laying out the
streamside buffers and marking the qualifying timber once a contract
has been executed for the forestry riparian easement program.
Reimbursement is subject to the work being acceptable to the
department. The small forest landowner office shall determine how the
reimbursement costs will be calculated.

Sec. 14 RCW 76.13.150 and 2003 c 311 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that a state-led cost-sharing program is
necessary to assist ((small)) family forest landowners with removing
and replacing fish passage barriers that were added to their land prior
to May 14, 2003, to help achieve the goals of the forests and fish
report, and to assist ((small)) family forest landowners in complying
with the state's fish passage requirements.
(2) The small forest landowner office must, in cooperation with the
department of fish and wildlife, establish a program designed to assist
((small)) family forest landowners with repairing or removing fish
passage barriers and assist lead entities in acquiring the data
necessary to fill any gaps in fish passage barrier information. The
small forest landowner office and the department of fish and wildlife
must work closely with lead entities or other local watershed groups to
make maximum use of current information regarding the location and
priority of current fish passage barriers. Where additional fish
passage barrier inventories are necessary, funding will be sought for
the collection of this information. Methods, protocols, and formulas
for data gathering and prioritizing must be developed in consultation
with the department of fish and wildlife. The department of fish and
wildlife must assist in the training and management of fish passage
barrier location data collection.
(3) The small forest landowner office must actively seek out
funding for the program authorized in this section. The small forest
landowner office must work with consenting landowners to identify and
secure funding from local, state, federal, tribal, or nonprofit habitat
restoration organizations and other private sources, including the
salmon recovery funding board, the United States department of
agriculture, the United States department of transportation, the
Washington state department of transportation, the United States
department of commerce, and the federal highway administration.
(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the small
forest landowner office, in implementing the program established in
this section, must provide the highest proportion of public funding
available for the removal or replacement of any fish passage barrier.
(b) In no case shall a ((small)) family forest landowner be
required to pay more than the lesser of either: (i) Twenty-five
percent of any costs associated with the removal or replacement of a
particular fish passage barrier; or (ii) five thousand dollars for the
removal or replacement of a particular fish passage barrier. No
((small)) family forest landowner shall be required to pay more than
the maximum total annual costs in (c) of this subsection.
(c) The portion of the total cost of removing or replacing fish
passage barriers that a ((small)) family forest landowner must pay in
any calendar year shall be determined based on the average annual
timber volume harvested from the landowner's lands in this state during
the three preceding calendar years, and whether the fish passage
barrier is in eastern or western Washington.
(i) In western Washington (west of the Cascade Crest), a ((small))
family forest landowner who has harvested an average annual timber
volume of less than five hundred thousand board feet shall not be
required to pay more than a total of eight thousand dollars during that
calendar year, a ((small)) family forest landowner who has harvested an
annual average timber volume between five hundred thousand and nine
hundred ninety-nine thousand board feet shall not be required to pay
more than a total of sixteen thousand dollars during that calendar
year, a ((small)) family forest landowner who has harvested an average
annual timber volume between one million and one million four hundred
ninety-nine thousand board feet shall not be required to pay more than
a total of twenty-four thousand dollars during that calendar year, and
a ((small)) family forest landowner who has harvested an average annual
timber volume greater than or equal to one million five hundred
thousand board feet shall not be required to pay more than a total of
thirty-two thousand dollars during that calendar year, regardless of
the number of fish passage barriers removed or replaced on the
landowner's lands during that calendar year.
(ii) In eastern Washington (east of the Cascade Crest), a ((small))
family forest landowner who has harvested an average annual timber
volume of less than five hundred thousand board feet shall not be
required to pay more than a total of two thousand dollars during that
calendar year, a ((small)) family forest landowner who has harvested an
annual average timber volume between five hundred thousand and nine
hundred ninety-nine thousand board feet shall not be required to pay
more than a total of four thousand dollars during that calendar year,
a ((small)) family forest landowner who has harvested an average annual
timber volume between one million and one million four hundred ninety-nine thousand board feet shall not be required to pay more than a total
of twelve thousand dollars during that calendar year, and a ((small))
family forest landowner who has harvested an average annual timber
volume greater than or equal to one million five hundred thousand board
feet shall not be required to pay more than a total of sixteen thousand
dollars during that calendar year, regardless of the number of fish
passage barriers removed or replaced on the landowner's lands during
that calendar year.
(iii) Maximum total annual costs for ((small)) family forest
landowners with fish passage barriers in both western and eastern
Washington shall be those specified under (c)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection.
(d) If an existing fish passage barrier on land owned by a
((small)) family forest landowner was installed under an approved
forest practices application or notification, and hydraulics approval,
and that fish passage barrier becomes a high priority for fish passage
based on the watershed ranking in RCW ((76.13.150)) 77.12.755, one
hundred percent public funding shall be provided.
(5) If a ((small)) family forest landowner is required to
contribute a portion of the funding under the cost-share program
established in this section, that landowner may satisfy his or her
required proportion by providing either direct monetary contributions
or in-kind services to the project. In-kind services may include
labor, equipment, materials, and other landowner-provided services
determined by the department to have an appropriate value to the
removal of a particular fish passage barrier.
(6)(a) The department, using fish passage barrier assessments and
ranked inventory information provided by the department of fish and
wildlife and the appropriate lead entity as delineated in RCW
77.12.755, must establish a prioritized list for the funding of fish
passage barrier removals on property owned by ((small)) family forest
landowners that ensures that funding is provided first to the known
fish passage barriers existing on forest land owned by ((small)) family
forest landowners that cause the greatest harm to public resources.
(b) As the department collects information about the presence of
fish passage barriers from submitted checklists, it must share this
information with the department of fish and wildlife and the technical
advisory groups established in RCW 77.85.070. If the addition of the
information collected in the checklists or any other changes to the
scientific instruments described in RCW 77.12.755 alter the analysis
conducted under RCW 77.12.755, the department must alter the funding
order appropriately to reflect the new information.
(7) The department may accept commitments from ((small)) family
forest landowners that they will participate in the program to remove
fish passage barriers from their land at any time, regardless of the
funding order given to the fish passage barriers on a particular
landowner's property.

Sec. 15 RCW 76.13.160 and 2004 c 102 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
When establishing a forest riparian easement program applicant's
status as a qualifying ((small)) family forest landowner pursuant to
RCW 76.13.120, the department shall not review the applicant's timber
harvest records, or any other tax-related documents, on file with the
department of revenue. The department of revenue may confirm or deny
an applicant's status as a ((small)) family forest landowner at the
request of the department; however, for the purposes of this section,
the department of revenue may not disclose more information than
whether or not the applicant has reported a harvest or harvests
totaling greater than or less than the qualifying thresholds
established in RCW 76.13.120. Nothing in this section, or RCW
84.33.280, prohibits the department from reviewing aggregate or general
information provided by the department of revenue.

--- END ---