BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that persons with
mental disorders, chemical dependency disorders, or co-occurring mental
and substance abuse disorders are disproportionately more likely to be
confined in a correctional institution, become homeless, become
involved with child protective services or involved in a dependency
proceeding, or lose those state and federal benefits to which they may
be entitled as a result of their disorders. The legislature finds that
prior state policy of addressing mental health and chemical dependency
in isolation from each other has not been cost-effective and has often
resulted in longer-term, more costly treatment that may be less
effective over time. The legislature finds that a substantial number
of persons have co-occurring mental and substance abuse disorders and
that identification and integrated treatment of co-occurring disorders
is critical to successful outcomes and recovery. Consequently, the
legislature intends to:
(1) Establish a process for determining which persons with mental
disorders and substance abuse disorders have co-occurring disorders;
(2) Reduce the gap between available chemical dependency treatment
and the documented need for treatment;
(3) Improve treatment outcomes by shifting treatment, where
possible, to evidence-based, research-based, and consensus-based
treatment practices and by removing barriers to the use of those
practices;
(4) Expand the authority for and use of therapeutic courts
including drug courts, mental health courts, and therapeutic courts for
dependency proceedings;
(5) Improve access to treatment for persons who are not enrolled in
medicaid by improving and creating consistency in the application
processes, and by minimizing the numbers of eligible confined persons
who leave confinement without medical assistance;
(6) Improve access to inpatient treatment by creating expanded
services facilities for persons needing intensive treatment in a secure
setting who do not need inpatient care, but are unable to access
treatment under current licensing restrictions in other settings;
(7) Establish secure detoxification centers for persons
involuntarily detained as gravely disabled or presenting a likelihood
of serious harm due to chemical dependency and authorize combined
crisis responders for both mental disorders and chemical dependency
disorders on a pilot basis and study the outcomes;
(8) Following the receipt of outcomes from the pilot programs in
subsection (7) of this section, implement a single, comprehensive,
involuntary treatment act with a unified set of standards, rights,
obligations, and procedures for adults and children with mental
disorders, chemical dependency disorders, and co-occurring disorders;
(9) Slow or stop the loss of inpatient and intensive residential
beds and children's long-term inpatient placements and refine the
balance of state hospital and community inpatient and residential beds;
(10) Improve cross-system collaboration including collaboration
with first responders and hospital emergency rooms, schools, primary
care, developmental disabilities, law enforcement and corrections, and
federally funded and licensed programs; and
(11) Amend existing state law to address organizational and
structural barriers to effective use of state funds for treating
persons with mental and substance abuse disorders, minimize internal
inconsistencies, clarify policy and requirements, and maximize the
opportunity for effective and cost-effective outcomes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 (1) The department of social and health
services shall explore and report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2005, on the feasibility, costs, benefits,
and time frame to access federal medicaid funds for mental health and
substance abuse treatment under the following provisions:
(a) The optional clinic provisions;
(b) Children's mental health treatment or co-occurring disorders
treatment under the early periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment
provisions;
(c) Targeted case management, including a plan for coordination of
various case management opportunities under medicaid.
(2) The department shall provide the appropriate committees of the
legislature with a clear and concise explanation of the reasons for
reducing state hospital capacity and the differences in costs and
benefits of treatment in state and community hospital treatment.
(3) The department may not reduce the capacity of either state
hospital until at least an equal number of skilled nursing,
residential, expanded services facility, or supported housing
placements are available in the community to the persons displaced by
the capacity reduction. The department shall retain sufficient
capacity at the state hospital to address the cyclical need for
hospitalization for persons moved to the community under a bed
reduction program. For purposes of this section, "sufficient" means
not less than one hospital bed for every ten beds created in the
community unless the department can demonstrate conclusively to the
legislature that a lesser ratio is sufficient.

Mental Health Treatment
NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 A new section is added to chapter 71.05
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Not later than January 1, 2007, all persons providing treatment
under this chapter shall also implement the integrated comprehensive
screening and assessment process for chemical dependency and mental
disorders adopted pursuant to section 701 of this act and shall
document the numbers of clients with co-occurring mental and substance
abuse disorders based on a quadrant system of low and high needs.
(2) Treatment providers and regional support networks who fail to
implement the integrated comprehensive screening and assessment process
for chemical dependency and mental disorders by July 1, 2007, shall be
subject to contractual penalties established under section 701 of this
act.

Sec. 104 RCW 71.05.020 and 2000 c 94 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician that a
person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;
(2) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily
used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with
thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical
antipsychotic medications;
(3) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or
private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a
patient;
(4) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person
should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or
both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;
(5) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a
commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;
(6) "County designated mental health professional" means a mental
health professional appointed by the county or the regional support
network to perform the duties specified in this chapter;
(7) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of
this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of
unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing
involuntary care and treatment;
(8) "Department" means the department of social and health
services;
(9) "Designated chemical dependency specialist" means a person
designated by the county alcoholism and other drug addiction program
coordinator designated under RCW 70.96A.310 to perform the commitment
duties described in chapter 70.96A RCW and sections 202 through 216 of
this act or chapter 70.-- RCW (sections 302 through 374 of this act);
(10) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health
professional appointed by the county or the regional support network to
perform the duties specified in this chapter or under chapter 70.-- RCW
(sections 302 through 374 of this act);
(11) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a
person, under the provisions of this chapter;
(((10))) (12) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a
person who has specialized training and three years of experience in
directly treating or working with persons with developmental
disabilities and is a psychiatrist, psychologist, or social worker, and
such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined
by rules adopted by the secretary;
(((11))) (13) "Developmental disability" means that condition
defined in RCW 71A.10.020(3);
(((12))) (14) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical
authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be
amended by court order;
(((13))) (15) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any
facility which can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with
other public or private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment,
outpatient care, and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons
suffering from a mental disorder, and which is certified as such by the
department. A physically separate and separately operated portion of
a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment
facility. A facility which is part of, or operated by, the department
or any federal agency will not require certification. No correctional
institution or facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment
facility within the meaning of this chapter;
(((14))) (16) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a
person, as a result of a mental disorder: (a) Is in danger of serious
physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her
essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe
deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and
escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her
actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her
health or safety;
(((15))) (17) "Habilitative services" means those services provided
by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining
life skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social,
and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education,
training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall
be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety
presented by the ((individual)) person being assisted as manifested by
prior charged criminal conduct;
(((16))) (18) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the
period of time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this
chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed,
in a mental health facility or in confinement as a result of a criminal
conviction;
(((17))) (19) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared
by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals
as a team, for ((an individual)) a person with developmental
disabilities, which shall state:
(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged
criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;
(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes
of habilitation;
(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation
program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;
(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve
those intermediate and long-range goals;
(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;
(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due
consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to
less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or
release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and
(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person
and possible future types of residences;
(((18))) (20) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
(((19))) (21) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:
(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted
by ((an individual)) a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced
by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on
oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by ((an individual)) a
person upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such
harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of
sustaining such harm; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by ((an
individual)) a person upon the property of others, as evidenced by
behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of
others; or
(b) The ((individual)) person has threatened the physical safety of
another and has a history of one or more violent acts;
(((20))) (22) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or
emotional impairment which has substantial adverse effects on ((an
individual's)) a person's cognitive or volitional functions;
(((21))) (23) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist,
psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other
mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the
secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
(((22))) (24) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of
a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically
given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or
judicial order of appointment;
(((23))) (25) "Private agency" means any person, partnership,
corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not
financed in whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an
evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, hospital, or
sanitarium, which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward
conducted for, the care and treatment of persons who are mentally ill;
(((24))) (26) "Professional person" means a mental health
professional and shall also mean a physician, registered nurse, and
such others as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
(((25))) (27) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has
a bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university, and who
has had, in addition, at least two years of experience in the direct
treatment of mentally ill or emotionally disturbed persons under the
supervision of a mental health professional. "Psychiatric nurse" also
means any other registered nurse who has at least three years of such
experience.
(28) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician
and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of
graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American
medical association or the American osteopathic association and is
certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of
psychiatry and neurology;
(((26))) (29) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed
as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;
(((27))) (30) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment
facility or institution, hospital, or sanitarium which is conducted
for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and
treatment of persons who are mentally ill((;[,])), if the agency is
operated directly by, federal, state, county, or municipal government,
or a combination of such governments;
(((28))) (31) "Registration records" include all the records of the
department, regional support networks, treatment facilities, and other
persons providing services to the department, county departments, or
facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness.
(32) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the
provisions of this chapter;
(((29))) (33) "Resource management services" has the meaning given
in chapter 71.24 RCW;
(((30))) (34) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of
social and health services, or his or her designee;
(((31))) (35) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or
further advanced degree from an accredited school of social work or a
degree deemed equivalent under rules adopted by the secretary;
(((32))) (36) "Treatment records" include registration and all
other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the
department, by regional support networks and their staffs, and by
treatment facilities. Treatment records do not include notes or
records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment
services for the department, regional support networks, or a treatment
facility if the notes or records are not available to others.
(37) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide,
attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to
property.

Sec. 105 RCW 71.24.025 and 2001 c 323 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Acutely mentally ill" means a condition which is limited to a
short-term severe crisis episode of:
(a) A mental disorder as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case
of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020;
(b) Being gravely disabled as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the
case of a child, a gravely disabled minor as defined in RCW 71.34.020;
or
(c) Presenting a likelihood of serious harm as defined in RCW
71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020.
(2) "Available resources" means funds appropriated for the purpose
of providing community mental health programs under RCW 71.24.045,
federal funds, except those provided according to Title XIX of the
Social Security Act, and state funds appropriated under this chapter or
chapter 71.05 RCW by the legislature during any biennium for the
purpose of providing residential services, resource management
services, community support services, and other mental health services.
This does not include funds appropriated for the purpose of operating
and administering the state psychiatric hospitals, except as negotiated
according to RCW 71.24.300(1)(e).
(3) "Child" means a person under the age of eighteen years.
(4) "Chronically mentally ill adult" means an adult who has a
mental disorder and meets at least one of the following criteria:
(a) Has undergone two or more episodes of hospital care for a
mental disorder within the preceding two years; or
(b) Has experienced a continuous psychiatric hospitalization or
residential treatment exceeding six months' duration within the
preceding year; or
(c) Has been unable to engage in any substantial gainful activity
by reason of any mental disorder which has lasted for a continuous
period of not less than twelve months. "Substantial gainful activity"
shall be defined by the department by rule consistent with Public Law
92-603, as amended.
(5) "Community mental health program" means all mental health
services, activities, or programs using available resources.
(6) "Community mental health service delivery system" means public
or private agencies that provide services specifically to persons with
mental disorders as defined under RCW 71.05.020 and receive funding
from public sources.
(7) "Community support services" means services authorized,
planned, and coordinated through resource management services
including, at a minimum, assessment, diagnosis, emergency crisis
intervention available twenty-four hours, seven days a week,
prescreening determinations for mentally ill persons being considered
for placement in nursing homes as required by federal law, screening
for patients being considered for admission to residential services,
diagnosis and treatment for acutely mentally ill and severely
emotionally disturbed children discovered under screening through the
federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and
treatment program, investigation, legal, and other nonresidential
services under chapter 71.05 RCW, case management services, psychiatric
treatment including medication supervision, counseling, psychotherapy,
assuring transfer of relevant patient information between service
providers, and other services determined by regional support networks.
(8) "County authority" means the board of county commissioners,
county council, or county executive having authority to establish a
community mental health program, or two or more of the county
authorities specified in this subsection which have entered into an
agreement to provide a community mental health program.
(9) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(10) "Licensed service provider" means an entity licensed according
to this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW or an entity deemed to meet state
minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a recognized
behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a current
agreement with the department, that meets state minimum standards or
((individuals)) persons licensed under chapter 18.57, 18.71, 18.83, or
18.79 RCW, as it applies to registered nurses and advanced registered
nurse practitioners.
(11) "Mental health services" means all services provided by
regional support networks and other services provided by the state for
the mentally ill.
(12) "Mentally ill persons" and "the mentally ill" mean persons and
conditions defined in subsections (1), (4), (((17), and)) (18), and
(19) of this section.
(13) "Regional support network" means a county authority or group
of county authorities recognized by the secretary that enter into joint
operating agreements to contract with the secretary pursuant to this
chapter.
(14) "Registration records" include all the records of the
department, regional support networks, treatment facilities, and other
persons providing services to the department, county departments, or
facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness.
(15) "Residential services" means a complete range of residences
and supports authorized by resource management services and which may
involve a facility, a distinct part thereof, or services which support
community living, for acutely mentally ill persons, chronically
mentally ill adults, severely emotionally disturbed children, or
seriously disturbed adults determined by the regional support network
to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. The
services shall include at least evaluation and treatment services as
defined in chapter 71.05 RCW, acute crisis respite care, long-term
adaptive and rehabilitative care, and supervised and supported living
services, and shall also include any residential services developed to
service mentally ill persons in nursing homes. Residential services
for children in out-of-home placements related to their mental disorder
shall not include the costs of food and shelter, except for children's
long-term residential facilities existing prior to January 1, 1991.
(((15))) (16) "Resource management services" mean the planning,
coordination, and authorization of residential services and community
support services administered pursuant to an individual service plan
for: (a) Acutely mentally ill adults and children; (b) chronically
mentally ill adults; (c) severely emotionally disturbed children; or
(d) seriously disturbed adults determined solely by a regional support
network to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill.
Such planning, coordination, and authorization shall include mental
health screening for children eligible under the federal Title XIX
early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program.
Resource management services include seven day a week, twenty-four hour
a day availability of information regarding mentally ill adults' and
children's enrollment in services and their individual service plan to
county-designated mental health professionals, evaluation and treatment
facilities, and others as determined by the regional support network.
(((16))) (17) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health
services.
(((17))) (18) "Seriously disturbed person" means a person who:
(a) Is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to
himself or herself or others, or to the property of others, as a result
of a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW;
(b) Has been on conditional release status, or under a less
restrictive alternative order, at some time during the preceding two
years from an evaluation and treatment facility or a state mental
health hospital;
(c) Has a mental disorder which causes major impairment in several
areas of daily living;
(d) Exhibits suicidal preoccupation or attempts; or
(e) Is a child diagnosed by a mental health professional, as
defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, as experiencing a mental disorder which
is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school
or with peers or is clearly interfering with the child's personality
development and learning.
(((18))) (19) "Severely emotionally disturbed child" means a child
who has been determined by the regional support network to be
experiencing a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW,
including those mental disorders that result in a behavioral or conduct
disorder, that is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in
family or school or with peers and who meets at least one of the
following criteria:
(a) Has undergone inpatient treatment or placement outside of the
home related to a mental disorder within the last two years;
(b) Has undergone involuntary treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW
within the last two years;
(c) Is currently served by at least one of the following child-serving systems: Juvenile justice, child-protection/welfare, special
education, or developmental disabilities;
(d) Is at risk of escalating maladjustment due to:
(i) Chronic family dysfunction involving a mentally ill or
inadequate caretaker;
(ii) Changes in custodial adult;
(iii) Going to, residing in, or returning from any placement
outside of the home, for example, psychiatric hospital, short-term
inpatient, residential treatment, group or foster home, or a
correctional facility;
(iv) Subject to repeated physical abuse or neglect;
(v) Drug or alcohol abuse; or
(vi) Homelessness.
(((19))) (20) "State minimum standards" means minimum requirements
established by rules adopted by the secretary and necessary to
implement this chapter for: (a) Delivery of mental health services;
(b) licensed service providers for the provision of mental health
services; (c) residential services; and (d) community support services
and resource management services.
(((20))) (21) "Treatment records" include registration and all
other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the
department, by regional support networks and their staffs, and by
treatment facilities. Treatment records do not include notes or
records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment
services for the department, regional support networks, or a treatment
facility if the notes or records are not available to others.
(22) "Tribal authority," for the purposes of this section and RCW
71.24.300 only, means: The federally recognized Indian tribes and the
major Indian organizations recognized by the secretary insofar as these
organizations do not have a financial relationship with any regional
support network that would present a conflict of interest.

Sec. 106 RCW 10.77.010 and 2004 c 157 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Admission" means acceptance based on medical necessity, of a
person as a patient.
(2) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person
should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or
both, in an inpatient or a less-restrictive setting.
(3) "Conditional release" means modification of a court-ordered
commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms.
(4) "County designated mental health professional" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.
(5) A "criminally insane" person means any person who has been
acquitted of a crime charged by reason of insanity, and thereupon found
to be a substantial danger to other persons or to present a substantial
likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or
security unless kept under further control by the court or other
persons or institutions.
(6) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(7) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a
person, under the provisions of this chapter, pending evaluation.
(8) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who
has specialized training and three years of experience in directly
treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is
a psychiatrist or psychologist, or a social worker, and such other
developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules
adopted by the secretary.
(9) "Developmental disability" means the condition as defined in
RCW 71A.10.020(3).
(10) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical
authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be
amended by court order.
(11) "Furlough" means an authorized leave of absence for a resident
of a state institution operated by the department designated for the
custody, care, and treatment of the criminally insane, consistent with
an order of conditional release from the court under this chapter,
without any requirement that the resident be accompanied by, or be in
the custody of, any law enforcement or institutional staff, while on
such unescorted leave.
(12) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by
program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life
skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and
vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education,
training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall
be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety
presented by the ((individual)) person being assisted as manifested by
prior charged criminal conduct.
(13) "History of one or more violent acts" means violent acts
committed during: (a) The ten-year period of time prior to the filing
of criminal charges; plus (b) the amount of time equal to time spent
during the ten-year period in a mental health facility or in
confinement as a result of a criminal conviction.
(14) "Incompetency" means a person lacks the capacity to understand
the nature of the proceedings against him or her or to assist in his or
her own defense as a result of mental disease or defect.
(15) "Indigent" means any person who is financially unable to
obtain counsel or other necessary expert or professional services
without causing substantial hardship to the person or his or her
family.
(16) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a
developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a
team, for an individual with developmental disabilities, which shall
state:
(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged
criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;
(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes
of habilitation;
(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation
program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;
(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve
those intermediate and long-range goals;
(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;
(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due
consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to
less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual release, and
a projected possible date for release; and
(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person
and possible future types of residences.
(17) "Professional person" means:
(a) A psychiatrist licensed as a physician and surgeon in this
state who has, in addition, completed three years of graduate training
in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical association
or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible to
be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology or the
American osteopathic board of neurology and psychiatry;
(b) A psychologist licensed as a psychologist pursuant to chapter
18.83 RCW; or
(c) A social worker with a master's or further advanced degree from
an accredited school of social work or a degree deemed equivalent under
rules adopted by the secretary.
(18) "Registration records" include all the records of the
department, regional support networks, treatment facilities, and other
persons providing services to the department, county departments, or
facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness.
(19) "Release" means legal termination of the court-ordered
commitment under the provisions of this chapter.
(((19))) (20) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of
social and health services or his or her designee.
(((20))) (21) "Treatment" means any currently standardized medical
or mental health procedure including medication.
(((21))) (22) "Treatment records" include registration and all
other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the
department, by regional support networks and their staffs, and by
treatment facilities. Treatment records do not include notes or
records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment
services for the department, regional support networks, or a treatment
facility if the notes or records are not available to others.
(23) "Violent act" means behavior that: (a)(i) Resulted in; (ii)
if completed as intended would have resulted in; or (iii) was
threatened to be carried out by a person who had the intent and
opportunity to carry out the threat and would have resulted in,
homicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to property; or (b)
recklessly creates an immediate risk of serious physical injury to
another person. As used in this subsection, "nonfatal injuries" means
physical pain or injury, illness, or an impairment of physical
condition. "Nonfatal injuries" shall be construed to be consistent
with the definition of "bodily injury," as defined in RCW 9A.04.110.

Sec. 107 RCW 71.05.360 and 1997 c 112 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Every person involuntarily detained or committed under the
provisions of this chapter shall be entitled to all the rights set
forth in this chapter, which shall be prominently posted in the
facility, and shall retain all rights not denied him or her under this
chapter except as chapter 9.41 RCW may limit the right of a person to
purchase or possess a firearm or to qualify for a concealed pistol
license.
(b) No person shall be presumed incompetent as a consequence of
receiving an evaluation or voluntary or involuntary treatment for a
mental disorder, under this chapter or any prior laws of this state
dealing with mental illness. Competency shall not be determined or
withdrawn except under the provisions of chapter 10.97 or 11.88 RCW.
(c) Any person who leaves a public or private agency following
evaluation or treatment for mental disorder shall be given a written
statement setting forth the substance of this section.
(2) Each person involuntarily detained or committed pursuant to
this chapter shall have the right to adequate care and individualized
treatment.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to deny
to any person treatment by spiritual means through prayer in accordance
with the tenets and practices of a church or religious denomination.
(4) Persons receiving evaluation or treatment under this chapter
shall be given a reasonable choice of an available physician or other
professional person qualified to provide such services.
(5) Whenever any person is detained for evaluation and treatment
pursuant to this chapter, both the person and, if possible, a
responsible member of his or her immediate family, personal
representative, guardian, or conservator, if any, shall be advised as
soon as possible in writing or orally, by the officer or person taking
him or her into custody or by personnel of the evaluation and treatment
facility where the person is detained that unless the person is
released or voluntarily admits himself or herself for treatment within
seventy-two hours of the initial detention:
(a) A judicial hearing in a superior court, either by a judge or
court commissioner thereof, shall be held not more than seventy-two
hours after the initial detention to determine whether there is
probable cause to detain the person after the seventy-two hours have
expired for up to an additional fourteen days without further automatic
hearing for the reason that the person is a person whose mental
disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm or that the person is
gravely disabled;
(b) The person has a right to communicate immediately with an
attorney; has a right to have an attorney appointed to represent him or
her before and at the probable cause hearing if he or she is indigent;
and has the right to be told the name and address of the attorney that
the mental health professional has designated pursuant to this chapter;
(c) The person has the right to remain silent and that any
statement he or she makes may be used against him or her;
(d) The person has the right to present evidence and to cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her at the probable cause
hearing; and
(e) The person has the right to refuse psychiatric medications,
including antipsychotic medication beginning twenty-four hours prior to
the probable cause hearing.
(6) When proceedings are initiated under RCW 71.05.150 (2), (3), or
(4)(b), no later than twelve hours after such person is admitted to the
evaluation and treatment facility the personnel of the evaluation and
treatment facility or the county designated mental health professional
shall serve on such person a copy of the petition for initial detention
and the name, business address, and phone number of the designated
attorney and shall forthwith commence service of a copy of the petition
for initial detention on the designated attorney.
(7) The judicial hearing described in subsection (5) of this
section is hereby authorized, and shall be held according to the
provisions of subsection (5) of this section and rules promulgated by
the supreme court.
(8) At the probable cause hearing the detained person shall have
the following rights in addition to the rights previously specified:
(a) To present evidence on his or her behalf;
(b) To cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her;
(c) To be proceeded against by the rules of evidence;
(d) To remain silent;
(e) To view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file.
(9) The physician-patient privilege or the psychologist-client
privilege shall be deemed waived in proceedings under this chapter
relating to the administration of antipsychotic medications. As to
other proceedings under this chapter, the privileges shall be waived
when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion determines
that such waiver is necessary to protect either the detained person or
the public.
The waiver of a privilege under this section is limited to records
or testimony relevant to evaluation of the detained person for purposes
of a proceeding under this chapter. Upon motion by the detained person
or on its own motion, the court shall examine a record or testimony
sought by a petitioner to determine whether it is within the scope of
the waiver.
The record maker shall not be required to testify in order to
introduce medical or psychological records of the detained person so
long as the requirements of RCW 5.45.020 are met except that portions
of the record which contain opinions as to the detained person's mental
state must be deleted from such records unless the person making such
conclusions is available for cross-examination.
(10) Insofar as danger to the person or others is not created, each
person involuntarily detained, treated in a less restrictive
alternative course of treatment, or committed for treatment and
evaluation pursuant to this chapter shall have, in addition to other
rights not specifically withheld by law, the following rights:
(a) To wear his or her own clothes and to keep and use his or her
own personal possessions, except when deprivation of same is essential
to protect the safety of the resident or other persons;
(b) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of his or her
own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;
(c) To have access to individual storage space for his or her
private use;
(d) To have visitors at reasonable times;
(e) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and
receive confidential calls, consistent with an effective treatment
program;
(f) To have ready access to letter writing materials, including
stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the
mails;
(g) To discuss treatment plans and decisions with professional
persons;
(h) Not to consent to the administration of antipsychotic
medications and not to thereafter be administered antipsychotic
medications unless ordered by a court under RCW 71.05.370 (as
recodified by this act) or pursuant to an administrative hearing under
RCW 71.05.215;
(i) Not to consent to the performance of electroconvulsant therapy
or surgery, except emergency life-saving surgery, unless ordered by a
court under RCW 71.05.370 (as recodified by this act);
(j) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any
circumstances;
(k) To dispose of property and sign contracts unless such person
has been adjudicated an incompetent in a court proceeding directed to
that particular issue.
(11) Every person involuntarily detained shall immediately be
informed of his or her right to a hearing to review the legality of his
or her detention and of his or her right to counsel, by the
professional person in charge of the facility providing evaluation and
treatment, or his or her designee, and, when appropriate, by the court.
If the person so elects, the court shall immediately appoint an
attorney to assist him or her.
(12) A person challenging his or her detention or his or her
attorney, shall have the right to designate and have the court appoint
a reasonably available independent physician or licensed mental health
professional to examine the person detained, the results of which
examination may be used in the proceeding. The person shall, if he or
she is financially able, bear the cost of such expert information,
otherwise such expert examination shall be at public expense.
(13) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the patient
from petitioning by writ of habeas corpus for release.
(14) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a person committed on
or prior to January 1, 1974, from exercising a right available to him
or her at or prior to January 1, 1974, for obtaining release from
confinement.
(15) Nothing in this section permits any person to knowingly
violate a no-contact order or a condition of an active judgment and
sentence or an active condition of supervision by the department of
corrections.

Sec. 108 RCW 71.05.215 and 1997 c 112 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person ((found to be)) who is gravely disabled or presents a
likelihood of serious harm as a result of a mental or chemical
dependency disorder or co-occurring mental and chemical dependency
disorders has a right to refuse antipsychotic medication unless it is
determined that the failure to medicate may result in a likelihood of
serious harm or substantial deterioration or substantially prolong the
length of involuntary commitment and there is no less intrusive course
of treatment than medication in the best interest of that person.
(2) ((The department shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of
this chapter. These rules shall include:
(a) An attempt to obtain the informed consent of the person prior
to administration of antipsychotic medication.
(b) For short-term treatment up to thirty days, the right to refuse
antipsychotic medications unless there is an additional concurring
medical opinion approving medication.
(c) For continued treatment beyond thirty days through the hearing
on any petition filed under RCW 71.05.370(7), the right to periodic
review of the decision to medicate by the medical director or designee.
(d) Administration of antipsychotic medication in an emergency and
review of this decision within twenty-four hours. An emergency exists
if the person presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, and
medically acceptable alternatives to administration of antipsychotic
medications are not available or are unlikely to be successful; and in
the opinion of the physician, the person's condition constitutes an
emergency requiring the treatment be instituted prior to obtaining a
second medical opinion.
(e) Documentation in the medical record of the physician's attempt
to obtain informed consent and the reasons why antipsychotic medication
is being administered over the person's objection or lack of consent.))
The physician must attempt to obtain the informed consent of an
involuntary committed person prior to administration of antipsychotic
medication and document the attempt to obtain consent in the person's
medical record with the reasons that antipsychotic medication is
necessary. If the physician determines that the patient is not able to
provide informed consent, the physician may obtain informed consent
from a person who is named as an agent in the patient's mental health
advance directive executed pursuant to chapter 71.32 RCW, provided that
the agent otherwise has authority under the directive to consent to the
proposed medication.
(3) When a person is detained pursuant to RCW 71.05.150, or
detained for involuntary treatment not to exceed fourteen days pursuant
to RCW 71.05.240, the person may refuse antipsychotic medications
unless there is an additional concurring medical opinion following an
examination of the person that the medications are necessary pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section. Medications administered under this
subsection may not continue beyond the hearing conducted pursuant to
RCW 71.05.320(1) and the petitioner shall notify the court of
administration of involuntary medications under this subsection and
provide the court with an opinion regarding whether continued
involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication is medically
necessary.
(4) If a person involuntarily committed under RCW 71.05.320(1) for
up to ninety days, or for less restrictive alternative treatment not to
exceed ninety days pursuant to RCW 71.05.240 refuses antipsychotic
medications, the medications may not be administered unless the person
has first had a hearing by a panel composed of a physician and two
other persons. The two persons shall be selected from among the
following: A physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner,
psychologist, psychiatric nurse, physician's assistant, and the medical
director of the facility. Recognizing that some facilities will not
have three staff members of the required expertise who are not directly
involved in the person's treatment, the panel shall be composed to the
greatest extent possible of treatment providers who are not directly
involved in the person's treatment at the time of the hearing.
(5) If a majority of the panel, including a psychiatrist if one is
on the panel or another physician in the absence of a psychiatrist,
determines that there is clear, cogent, and convincing evidence
demonstrating that treatment with antipsychotic medications is
medically appropriate, that failure to medicate may result in a
likelihood of serious harm or substantial deterioration or
substantially prolong the length of involuntary commitment, and that
there is no less intrusive course of treatment than medication in the
best interest of that person, the person may be medicated, subject to
the provisions of subsections (6) through (8) of this section.
(6) Medication ordered pursuant to a decision of the panel may only
be continued beyond seven days on an involuntary basis if the panel
conducts a second hearing on the written record and a majority of the
panel determines that there continues to be clear, cogent, and
convincing evidence demonstrating that treatment with antipsychotic
medications continues to be medically appropriate, that failure to
medicate may result in a likelihood of serious harm or substantial
deterioration or substantially prolong the length of involuntary
commitment, and that there is no less intrusive course of treatment
than medication in the best interest of that person.
(a) Following the second hearing, involuntary medication with
antipsychotic medication may be continued if the treating psychiatrist
certifies, not less than every fourteen days, that the medication
continues to be medically appropriate and failure to medicate may
result in a likelihood of serious harm or substantial deterioration or
substantially prolong the length of involuntary commitment, and that
there is no less intrusive course of treatment than medication in the
best interest of that person.
(b) No administrative order for involuntary medication may be
continued beyond one hundred eighty days, or the next commitment
proceeding in the superior court, whichever comes first.
(7) The committed person may appeal the panel's decision to the
medical director within twenty-four hours, excluding weekends and
holidays, and the medical director must decide the appeal within
twenty-four hours of receipt.
(8) The committed person may seek judicial review of the medical
director's decision at the next commitment proceeding or by means of an
extraordinary writ.
(9) Minutes of the hearing shall be kept and a copy shall be
provided to the committed person.
(10) With regard to the involuntary medication hearing, the
committed person has the right:
(a) To notice at least twenty-four hours in advance of the hearing
that includes the intent to convene the hearing, the tentative
diagnosis and the factual basis for the diagnosis, and why the staff
believes that medication is necessary;
(b) Not to be medicated between the delivery of the notice and the
hearing;
(c) To attend the hearing;
(d) To present evidence, including witnesses, and to cross-examine
witnesses, including staff;
(e) To the assistance of a lay assistant, who is not involved in
the case and who understands psychiatric issues;
(f) To receive a copy of the minutes of the hearing; and
(g) To appeal the panel's decision to the medical director.
(11) Antipsychotic medications may be administered in an emergency
without the consent of the person pursuant to the provisions of RCW
71.05.370(3)(b) (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 109 RCW 71.05.370 and 1997 c 112 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Insofar as danger to the individual or others is not created,
each person involuntarily detained, treated in a less restrictive
alternative course of treatment, or committed for treatment and
evaluation pursuant to this chapter shall have, in addition to other
rights not specifically withheld by law, the following rights, a list
of which shall be prominently posted in all facilities, institutions,
and hospitals providing such services:
(1) To wear his or her own clothes and to keep and use his or her
own personal possessions, except when deprivation of same is essential
to protect the safety of the resident or other persons;
(2) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of his or her
own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;
(3) To have access to individual storage space for his or her
private use;
(4) To have visitors at reasonable times;
(5) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and
receive confidential calls;
(6) To have ready access to letter writing materials, including
stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the
mails;
(7) Not to consent to the administration of antipsychotic
medications beyond the hearing conducted pursuant to RCW 71.05.320(2)
or the performance of electroconvulsant therapy or surgery, except
emergency life-saving surgery, unless ordered by a court of competent
jurisdiction)) (1) A court of competent jurisdiction may order that a
person involuntarily detained, or committed for inpatient treatment and
evaluation or to treatment in a less restrictive alternative pursuant
to this chapter be administered antipsychotic medications or the
performance of electroconvulsant therapy or surgery pursuant to the
following standards and procedures:
(a) The administration of antipsychotic medication or
electroconvulsant therapy shall not be ordered by the court unless the
petitioning party proves by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that
((there exists a compelling state interest that justifies overriding
the patient's lack of consent to the administration of antipsychotic
medications or electroconvulsant therapy, that the proposed treatment
is necessary and effective, and that medically acceptable alternative
forms of treatment are not available, have not been successful, or are
not likely to be effective)) treatment with antipsychotic medications
is medically appropriate, that failure to medicate may result in a
likelihood of serious harm or substantial deterioration or
substantially prolong the length of involuntary commitment, and that
there is no less intrusive course of treatment than medication or
electroconvulsive therapy in the best interest of the person.
(b) The court shall make specific findings of fact concerning: (i)
The existence of ((one or more compelling state interests)) the
likelihood of serious harm or substantial deterioration or
substantially prolonging the length of involuntary commitment; (ii) the
necessity and effectiveness of the treatment; ((and)) (iii) the
person's desires regarding the proposed treatment; and (iv) the best
interests of the person.
(c) If the ((patient)) person is unable to make a rational and
informed decision about consenting to or refusing the proposed
((treatment)) electroconvulsive therapy, the court shall make a
substituted judgment for the patient as if he or she were competent to
make such a determination.
(((c))) (d) The person shall be present at any hearing on a request
to administer antipsychotic medication or electroconvulsant therapy
filed pursuant to this ((subsection)) section. The person has the
right:
(i) To be represented by an attorney;
(ii) To present evidence;
(iii) To cross-examine witnesses;
(iv) To have the rules of evidence enforced;
(v) To remain silent;
(vi) To view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file;
and
(vii) To be given reasonable notice and an opportunity to prepare
for the hearing.
(e) The court may appoint a psychiatrist, psychologist within their
scope of practice, or physician to examine and testify on behalf of
such person. The court shall appoint a psychiatrist, psychologist
within their scope of practice, or physician designated by such person
or the person's counsel to testify on behalf of the person in cases
where an order for electroconvulsant therapy is sought.
(((d))) (f) An order for the administration of antipsychotic
medications entered following a hearing conducted pursuant to this
section shall be effective for the period of the current involuntary
treatment order, and any interim period during which the person is
awaiting trial or hearing on a new petition for involuntary treatment
or involuntary medication.
(((e))) (2) Any person detained for a period of greater than ninety
days pursuant to RCW 71.05.320(((2))), who subsequently refuses
antipsychotic medication, shall be entitled to the procedures set forth
in ((RCW 71.05.370(7))) subsection (1) of this section.
(((f))) (3) Antipsychotic medication may be administered to a
nonconsenting person detained or committed pursuant to this chapter
without a court order:
(a) Pursuant to RCW 71.05.215(((2))); or
(b) Under the following circumstances:
(i) A person presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm;
(ii) Medically acceptable alternatives to administration of
antipsychotic medications are not available, have not been successful,
or are not likely to be effective; and
(iii) In the opinion of the physician with responsibility for
treatment of the person, or his or her designee, the person's condition
constitutes an emergency requiring the treatment be instituted before
a judicial hearing as authorized pursuant to this section can be held.
If antipsychotic medications are administered over a person's lack
of consent pursuant to (b) of this subsection, a petition for an order
authorizing the administration of antipsychotic medications shall be
filed on the next judicial day. The hearing shall be held within two
judicial days. If deemed necessary by the physician with
responsibility for the treatment of the person, administration of
antipsychotic medications may continue until the hearing is held;
(((8) To dispose of property and sign contracts unless such person
has been adjudicated an incompetent in a court proceeding directed to
that particular issue;
(9) Not to have)) (4) No court has the authority to order
psychosurgery performed on ((him or her)) any person involuntarily
detained, treated in a less restrictive alternative course of
treatment, or committed for treatment and evaluation pursuant to this
chapter under any circumstances.
(5) A petition for involuntary medication may be joined with a
petition for involuntary treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 RCW 71.05.370 is recodified as a new
section in chapter 71.05 RCW to be codified in proximity to RCW
71.05.215.

Sec. 111 RCW 71.05.390 and 2004 c 166 s 6, 2004 c 157 s 5, and
2004 c 33 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Except as provided in this section, RCW 71.05.445, 71.05.630,
70.96A.150, or pursuant to a valid release under RCW 70.02.030, the
fact of admission and all information and records compiled, obtained,
or maintained in the course of providing services to either voluntary
or involuntary recipients of services at public or private agencies
shall be confidential.
Information and records may be disclosed only:
(1) In communications between qualified professional persons to
meet the requirements of this chapter, in the provision of services or
appropriate referrals, or in the course of guardianship proceedings.
The consent of the ((patient)) person, or his or her personal
representative or guardian, shall be obtained before information or
records may be disclosed by a professional person employed by a
facility unless provided to a professional person:
(a) Employed by the facility;
(b) Who has medical responsibility for the patient's care;
(c) Who is a county designated mental health professional;
(d) Who is providing services under chapter 71.24 RCW;
(e) Who is employed by a state or local correctional facility where
the person is confined or supervised; or
(f) Who is providing evaluation, treatment, or follow-up services
under chapter 10.77 RCW.
(2) When the communications regard the special needs of a patient
and the necessary circumstances giving rise to such needs and the
disclosure is made by a facility providing ((outpatient)) services to
the operator of a ((care)) facility in which the patient resides or
will reside.
(3)(a) When the person receiving services, or his or her guardian,
designates persons to whom information or records may be released, or
if the person is a minor, when his or her parents make such
designation.
(b) A public or private agency shall release to a person's next of
kin, attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if
any:
(i) The information that the person is presently a patient in the
facility or that the person is seriously physically ill;
(ii) A statement evaluating the mental and physical condition of
the patient, and a statement of the probable duration of the patient's
confinement, if such information is requested by the next of kin,
attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator; and
(iii) Such other information requested by the next of kin or
attorney as may be necessary to decide whether or not proceedings
should be instituted to appoint a guardian or conservator.
(4) To the extent necessary for a recipient to make a claim, or for
a claim to be made on behalf of a recipient for aid, insurance, or
medical assistance to which he or she may be entitled.
(5)(a) For either program evaluation or research, or both:
PROVIDED, That the secretary adopts rules for the conduct of the
evaluation or research, or both. Such rules shall include, but need
not be limited to, the requirement that all evaluators and researchers
must sign an oath of confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning
persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency,
or person) I, . . . . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or
otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any
information obtained in the course of such evaluation or research
regarding persons who have received services such that the person who
received such services is identifiable.
I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information
may subject me to civil liability under the provisions of state law.

/s/ . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the
compilation and publication of statistical data for use by government
or researchers under standards, including standards to assure
maintenance of confidentiality, set forth by the secretary.
(6)(a) To the courts as necessary to the administration of this
chapter or to a court ordering an evaluation or treatment under chapter
10.77 RCW solely for the purpose of preventing the entry of any
evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any order
entered under this chapter.
(b) To a court or its designee in which a motion under chapter
10.77 RCW has been made for involuntary medication of a defendant for
the purpose of competency restoration.
(c) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purpose
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(7)(a) When a mental health professional is requested by a
representative of a law enforcement or corrections agency, including a
police officer, sheriff, community corrections officer, a municipal
attorney, or prosecuting attorney to undertake an investigation under
RCW 71.05.150, the mental health professional shall, if requested to do
so, advise the representative in writing of the results of the
investigation including a statement of reasons for the decision to
detain or release the person investigated. Such written report shall
be submitted within seventy-two hours of the completion of the
investigation or the request from the law enforcement or corrections
representative, whichever occurs later.
(b) To law enforcement officers, public health officers, or
personnel of the department of corrections or the indeterminate
sentence review board for persons who are the subject of the records
and who are committed to the custody or supervision of the department
of corrections or indeterminate sentence review board which information
or records are necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their
office. Except for dissemination of information released pursuant to
RCW 71.05.425 and 4.24.550, regarding persons committed under this
chapter under RCW 71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(2)(c) after dismissal of
a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the extent of information
that may be released is limited as follows:
(((a))) (i) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary
commitment, the fact and date of discharge or release, and the last
known address shall be disclosed upon request;
(((b))) (ii) The law enforcement and public health officers or
personnel of the department of corrections or indeterminate sentence
review board shall be obligated to keep such information confidential
in accordance with this chapter;
(((c))) (iii) Additional information shall be disclosed only after
giving notice to said person and his or her counsel and upon a showing
of clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that such information is
necessary and that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality
are and will be maintained. However, in the event the said person has
escaped from custody, said notice prior to disclosure is not necessary
and that the facility from which the person escaped shall include an
evaluation as to whether the person is of danger to persons or property
and has a propensity toward violence;
(((d))) (iv) Information and records shall be disclosed to the
department of corrections pursuant to and in compliance with the
provisions of RCW 71.05.445 for the purposes of completing presentence
investigations or risk assessment reports, supervision of an
incarcerated offender or offender under supervision in the community,
planning for and provision of supervision of an offender, or assessment
of an offender's risk to the community; and
(((e))) (v) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the
purposes of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(8) To the attorney of the detained person.
(9) To the prosecuting attorney as necessary to carry out the
responsibilities of the office under RCW 71.05.330(2) and
71.05.340(1)(b) and 71.05.335. The prosecutor shall be provided access
to records regarding the committed person's treatment and prognosis,
medication, behavior problems, and other records relevant to the issue
of whether treatment less restrictive than inpatient treatment is in
the best interest of the committed person or others. Information shall
be disclosed only after giving notice to the committed person and the
person's counsel.
(10) To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person, when
the identity of the person is known to the public or private agency,
whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is known to have
been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may designate a
representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure shall be made
by the professional person in charge of the public or private agency or
his or her designee and shall include the dates of commitment,
admission, discharge, or release, authorized or unauthorized absence
from the agency's facility, and only such other information that is
pertinent to the threat or harassment. The decision to disclose or not
shall not result in civil liability for the agency or its employees so
long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross
negligence.
(11) To appropriate corrections and law enforcement agencies all
necessary and relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent
situation that poses a significant and imminent risk to the public.
The decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for
the mental health service provider or its employees so long as the
decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence.
(12) To the persons designated in RCW 71.05.425 for the purposes
described in that section.
(13) Civil liability and immunity for the release of information
about a particular person who is committed to the department under RCW
71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(2)(c) after dismissal of a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030, is governed by RCW 4.24.550.
(14) ((To a patient's next of kin, guardian, or conservator, if
any, in the event of death, as provided in RCW 71.05.400.)) Upon the
death of a person, his or her next of kin, personal representative,
guardian, or conservator, if any, shall be notified.
Next of kin who are of legal age and competent shall be notified
under this section in the following order: Spouse, parents, children,
brothers and sisters, and other relatives according to the degree of
relation. Access to all records and information compiled, obtained, or
maintained in the course of providing services to a deceased patient
shall be governed by RCW 70.02.140.
(15) To the department of health for the purposes of determining
compliance with state or federal licensure, certification, or
registration rules or laws. However, the information and records
obtained under this subsection are exempt from public inspection and
copying pursuant to chapter 42.17 RCW.
(16) To mark headstones or otherwise memorialize patients interred
at state hospital cemeteries. The department of social and health
services shall make available the name, date of birth, and date of
death of patients buried in state hospital cemeteries fifty years after
the death of a patient.
(17) When a patient would otherwise be subject to the provisions of
RCW 71.05.390 and disclosure is necessary for the protection of the
patient or others due to his or her unauthorized disappearance from the
facility, and his or her whereabouts is unknown, notice of such
disappearance, along with relevant information, may be made to
relatives, the department of corrections when the person is under the
supervision of the department, and governmental law enforcement
agencies designated by the physician in charge of the patient or the
professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her
professional designee.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the uniform health
care information act, chapter 70.02 RCW, applies to all records and
information compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of
providing services.
(18) The fact of admission, as well as all records, files,
evidence, findings, or orders made, prepared, collected, or maintained
pursuant to this chapter shall not be admissible as evidence in any
legal proceeding outside this chapter without the written consent of
the person who was the subject of the proceeding except in a subsequent
criminal prosecution of a person committed pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3)
or 71.05.320(2)(c) on charges that were dismissed pursuant to chapter
10.77 RCW due to incompetency to stand trial ((or)), in a civil
commitment proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW, or, in the case of
a minor, a guardianship or dependency proceeding. The records and
files maintained in any court proceeding pursuant to this chapter shall
be confidential and available subsequent to such proceedings only to
the person who was the subject of the proceeding or his or her
attorney. In addition, the court may order the subsequent release or
use of such records or files only upon good cause shown if the court
finds that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality are and
will be maintained.

Sec. 112 RCW 71.05.420 and 1990 c 3 s 113 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 71.05.425, when any disclosure of
information or records is made as authorized by RCW 71.05.390 ((through
71.05.410)), the physician in charge of the patient or the professional
person in charge of the facility shall promptly cause to be entered
into the patient's medical record the date and circumstances under
which said disclosure was made, the names and relationships to the
patient, if any, of the persons or agencies to whom such disclosure was
made, and the information disclosed.

Sec. 113 RCW 71.05.620 and 1989 c 205 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) Informed consent for disclosure of information from court or
treatment records to an individual, agency, or organization must be in
writing and must contain the following information:
(a) The name of the individual, agency, or organization to which
the disclosure is to be made;
(b) The name of the individual whose treatment record is being
disclosed;
(c) The purpose or need for the disclosure;
(d) The specific type of information to be disclosed;
(e) The time period during which the consent is effective;
(f) The date on which the consent is signed; and
(g) The signature of the individual or person legally authorized to
give consent for the individual.
(2))) The files and records of court proceedings under this chapter
and chapters ((71.05)) 70.96A, 71.34, 70.-- (sections 202 through 216
of this act), and 70.-- (sections 302 through 374 of this act) RCW
shall be closed but shall be accessible to any ((individual)) person
who is the subject of a petition and to the ((individual's)) person's
attorney, guardian ad litem, resource management services, or service
providers authorized to receive such information by resource management
services.

Sec. 114 RCW 71.05.630 and 2000 c 75 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, all treatment records
shall remain confidential((. Treatment records)) and may be released
only to the persons designated in this section, or to other persons
designated in an informed written consent of the patient.
(2) Treatment records of ((an individual)) a person may be released
without informed written consent in the following circumstances:
(a) To ((an individual)) a person, organization, or agency as
necessary for management or financial audits, or program monitoring and
evaluation. Information obtained under this subsection shall remain
confidential and may not be used in a manner that discloses the name or
other identifying information about the ((individual)) person whose
records are being released.
(b) To the department, the director of regional support networks,
or a qualified staff member designated by the director only when
necessary to be used for billing or collection purposes. The
information shall remain confidential.
(c) For purposes of research as permitted in chapter 42.48 RCW.
(d) Pursuant to lawful order of a court.
(e) To qualified staff members of the department, to the director
of regional support networks, to resource management services
responsible for serving a patient, or to service providers designated
by resource management services as necessary to determine the progress
and adequacy of treatment and to determine whether the person should be
transferred to a less restrictive or more appropriate treatment
modality or facility. The information shall remain confidential.
(f) Within the treatment facility where the patient is receiving
treatment, confidential information may be disclosed to ((individuals))
persons employed, serving in bona fide training programs, or
participating in supervised volunteer programs, at the facility when it
is necessary to perform their duties.
(g) Within the department as necessary to coordinate treatment for
mental illness, developmental disabilities, alcoholism, or drug abuse
of ((individuals)) persons who are under the supervision of the
department.
(h) To a licensed physician who has determined that the life or
health of the ((individual)) person is in danger and that treatment
without the information contained in the treatment records could be
injurious to the patient's health. Disclosure shall be limited to the
portions of the records necessary to meet the medical emergency.
(i) To a facility that is to receive ((an individual)) a person who
is involuntarily committed under chapter 71.05 RCW, or upon transfer of
the ((individual)) person from one treatment facility to another. The
release of records under this subsection shall be limited to the
treatment records required by law, a record or summary of all somatic
treatments, and a discharge summary. The discharge summary may include
a statement of the patient's problem, the treatment goals, the type of
treatment which has been provided, and recommendation for future
treatment, but may not include the patient's complete treatment record.
(j) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 71.05.390(7), to a
correctional facility or a corrections officer who is responsible for
the supervision of ((an individual)) a person who is receiving
inpatient or outpatient evaluation or treatment. Except as provided in
RCW 71.05.445 and 71.34.225, release of records under this section is
limited to:
(i) An evaluation report provided pursuant to a written supervision
plan.
(ii) The discharge summary, including a record or summary of all
somatic treatments, at the termination of any treatment provided as
part of the supervision plan.
(iii) When ((an individual)) a person is returned from a treatment
facility to a correctional facility, the information provided under
(j)(iv) of this subsection.
(iv) Any information necessary to establish or implement changes in
the ((individual's)) person's treatment plan or the level or kind of
supervision as determined by resource management services. In cases
involving a person transferred back to a correctional facility,
disclosure shall be made to clinical staff only.
(k) To the ((individual's)) person's counsel or guardian ad litem,
without modification, at any time in order to prepare for involuntary
commitment or recommitment proceedings, reexaminations, appeals, or
other actions relating to detention, admission, commitment, or
patient's rights under chapter 71.05 RCW.
(l) To staff members of the protection and advocacy agency or to
staff members of a private, nonprofit corporation for the purpose of
protecting and advocating the rights of persons with mental ((illness))
disorders or developmental disabilities. Resource management services
may limit the release of information to the name, birthdate, and county
of residence of the patient, information regarding whether the patient
was voluntarily admitted, or involuntarily committed, the date and
place of admission, placement, or commitment, the name and address of
a guardian of the patient, and the date and place of the guardian's
appointment. Any staff member who wishes to obtain additional
information shall notify the patient's resource management services in
writing of the request and of the resource management services' right
to object. The staff member shall send the notice by mail to the
guardian's address. If the guardian does not object in writing within
fifteen days after the notice is mailed, the staff member may obtain
the additional information. If the guardian objects in writing within
fifteen days after the notice is mailed, the staff member may not
obtain the additional information.
(3) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the
release of information contained in the treatment records of any
patient who receives treatment for ((alcoholism or drug)) chemical
dependency, the department may restrict the release of the information
as necessary to comply with federal law and regulations.

Sec. 115 RCW 71.05.640 and 2000 c 94 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Procedures shall be established by resource management services
to provide reasonable and timely access to individual treatment
records. However, access may not be denied at any time to records of
all medications and somatic treatments received by the ((individual))
person.
(2) Following discharge, the ((individual)) person shall have a
right to a complete record of all medications and somatic treatments
prescribed during evaluation, admission, or commitment and to a copy of
the discharge summary prepared at the time of his or her discharge. A
reasonable and uniform charge for reproduction may be assessed.
(3) Treatment records may be modified prior to inspection to
protect the confidentiality of other patients or the names of any other
persons referred to in the record who gave information on the condition
that his or her identity remain confidential. Entire documents may not
be withheld to protect such confidentiality.
(4) At the time of discharge all ((individuals)) persons shall be
informed by resource management services of their rights as provided in
RCW ((71.05.610)) 71.05.390 and 71.05.620 through 71.05.690.

Sec. 116 RCW 71.05.660 and 1989 c 205 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter ((205, Laws of 1989)) or chapter 70.96A,
71.05, 71.34, 70.-- (sections 202 through 216 of this act), or 70.--(sections 302 through 374 of this act) RCW shall be construed to
interfere with communications between physicians or psychologists and
patients and attorneys and clients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 A new section is added to chapter 71.05
RCW to read as follows:
A petition for commitment under this chapter may be joined with a
petition for commitment under chapter 70.96A RCW.

PART II
PILOT PROGRAMS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 Sections 202 through 216 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician that a
person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital, an
evaluation and treatment facility, or other inpatient facility, or a
decision by a professional person in charge or his or her designee that
a person should be detained as a patient for evaluation and treatment
in a secure detoxification facility or other certified chemical
dependency provider.
(2) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily
used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with
thought disorders, which includes but is not limited to atypical
antipsychotic medications.
(3) "Approved treatment program" means a discrete program of
chemical dependency treatment provided by a treatment program certified
by the department as meeting standards adopted under chapter 70.96A
RCW.
(4) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or
private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a
patient.
(5) "Chemical dependency" means:
(a) Alcoholism;
(b) Drug addiction; or
(c) Dependence on alcohol and one or more other psychoactive
chemicals, as the context requires.
(6) "Chemical dependency professional" means a person certified as
a chemical dependency professional by the department of health under
chapter 18.205 RCW.
(7) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person
should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or
both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting.
(8) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a
commitment that may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms.
(9) "County-designated crisis responder" means a person designated
by the county or regional support network to perform the duties
specified in this chapter.
(10) "County-designated mental health professional" means a mental
health professional appointed by the county or the regional support
network to perform the duties in chapter 71.05 RCW.
(11) "Custody" means involuntary detention under either chapter
71.05 or 70.96A RCW or this chapter, uninterrupted by any period of
unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing
involuntary care and treatment.
(12) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(13) "Designated chemical dependency specialist" or "specialist"
means a person designated by the county alcoholism and other drug
addiction program coordinator designated under RCW 70.96A.310 to
perform the commitment duties described in RCW 70.96A.140 and this
chapter, and qualified to do so by meeting standards adopted by the
department.
(14) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a
person under this chapter, or chapter 70.96A or 71.05 RCW.
(15) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who
has specialized training and three years of experience in directly
treating or working with individuals with developmental disabilities
and is a psychiatrist, psychologist, or social worker, and such other
developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules
adopted by the secretary.
(16) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW
71A.10.020.
(17) "Discharge" means the termination of facility authority. The
commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court
order.
(18) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility that
can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or
private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care,
and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a
mental disorder, and that is certified as such by the department. A
physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital
may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility
that is part of, or operated by, the department or any federal agency
does not require certification. No correctional institution or
facility, or jail, may be an evaluation and treatment facility within
the meaning of this chapter.
(19) "Facility" means either an evaluation and treatment facility
or a secure detoxification facility.
(20) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a
result of a mental disorder, or as a result of the use of alcohol or
other psychoactive chemicals:
(a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure
to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or
(b) Manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced
by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over
his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for
his or her health or safety.
(21) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of
time ten years before the filing of a petition under this chapter, or
chapter 70.96A or 71.05 RCW, excluding any time spent, but not any
violent acts committed, in a mental health facility or a long-term
alcoholism or drug treatment facility, or in confinement as a result of
a criminal conviction.
(22) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical
functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol
or other psychoactive chemicals.
(23) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court under this
chapter.
(24) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice
medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of
Washington.
(25) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:
(a) A substantial risk that:
(i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon his or her own
person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or
inflict physical harm on oneself;
(ii) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as
evidenced by behavior that has caused such harm or that places another
person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or
(iii) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property
of others, as evidenced by behavior that has caused substantial loss or
damage to the property of others; or
(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and
has a history of one or more violent acts.
(26) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional
impairment that has substantial adverse effects on a person's cognitive
or volitional functions.
(27) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist,
psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other
mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the
secretary under the authority of chapter 71.05 RCW.
(28) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public
agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given
peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial
order of appointment.
(29) "Person in charge" means a physician or chemical dependency
counselor as defined in rule by the department, who is empowered by a
certified treatment program with authority to make assessment,
admission, continuing care, and discharge decisions on behalf of the
certified program.
(30) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation,
or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in
whole or in part by public funds, that constitutes an evaluation and
treatment facility or private institution, hospital, or sanitarium, or
approved treatment program, that is conducted for, or includes a
department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons who
are mentally ill and/or chemically dependent.
(31) "Professional person" means a mental health professional or
chemical dependency professional and shall also mean a physician,
registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by rules adopted by
the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
(32) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has a
bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university, and who
has, in addition, at least two years' experience in the direct
treatment of mentally ill or emotionally disturbed persons under the
supervision of a mental health professional. "Psychiatric nurse" also
means any other registered nurse who has three years of such
experience.
(33) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician
and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of
graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American
medical association or the American osteopathic association and is
certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of
psychiatry and neurology.
(34) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a
psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.
(35) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or
institution, hospital, or sanitarium, or approved treatment program
that is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for,
the care and treatment of persons who are mentally ill and/or
chemically dependent, if the agency is operated directly by federal,
state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such
governments.
(36) "Registration records" means all the records of the
department, regional support networks, treatment facilities, and other
persons providing services to the department, county departments, or
facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness.
(37) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under
chapter 70.96A or 71.05 RCW or this chapter.
(38) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or the
secretary's designee.
(39) "Secure detoxification facility" means a facility operated by
either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency that
serves the purpose of providing evaluation and assessment, and acute
and/or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated persons and
includes security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff,
and community.
(40) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further
advanced degree from an accredited school of social work or a degree
deemed equivalent under rules adopted by the secretary.
(41) "Treatment records" means registration records and all other
records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have
received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the
department, by regional support networks and their staffs, and by
treatment facilities. Treatment records do not include notes or
records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment
services for the department, regional support networks, or a treatment
facility if the notes or records are not available to others.
(42) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide,
attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to
property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 (1) The secretary, in consultation with
the Washington state association of counties, shall select and contract
with regional support networks or counties to provide two integrated
crisis response and involuntary treatment pilot programs for adults and
shall allocate resources for both integrated services and secure
detoxification services in the pilot areas. In selecting the two
regional support networks or counties, the secretary shall endeavor to
site one in an urban and one in a rural regional support network or
county; and to site them in counties other than those selected pursuant
to section 220 of this act, to the extent necessary to facilitate
evaluation of pilot project results.
(2) The regional support networks or counties shall implement the
pilot programs by providing integrated crisis response and involuntary
treatment to persons with a chemical dependency, a mental disorder, or
both, consistent with this chapter. The pilot programs shall:
(a) Combine the crisis responder functions of a county-designated
mental health professional under chapter 71.05 RCW and a county-designated chemical dependency specialist under chapter 70.96A RCW by
establishing a new county-designated crisis responder who is authorized
to conduct investigations and detain persons up to seventy-two hours to
the proper facility;
(b) Provide training to the crisis responders as required by the
department;
(c) Provide sufficient staff and resources to ensure availability
of an adequate number of crisis responders twenty-four hours a day,
seven days a week;
(d) Provide the administrative and court-related staff, resources,
and processes necessary to facilitate the legal requirements of the
initial detention and the commitment hearings for persons with a
chemical dependency;
(e) Participate in the evaluation and report to assess the outcomes
of the pilot programs including providing data and information as
requested;
(f) Provide the other services necessary to the implementation of
the pilot programs, consistent with this chapter as determined by the
secretary in contract; and
(g) Collaborate with the department of corrections where persons
detained or committed are also subject to supervision by the department
of corrections.
(3) The pilot programs established by this section shall begin
providing services by March 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 To qualify as a county-designated crisis
responder, a person must have received chemical dependency training as
determined by the department and be a:
(1) Psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social
worker;
(2) Person with a master's degree or further advanced degree in
counseling or one of the social sciences from an accredited college or
university and who have, in addition, at least two years of experience
in direct treatment of persons with mental illness or emotional
disturbance, such experience gained under the direction of a mental
health professional;
(3) Person who meets the waiver criteria of RCW 71.24.260, which
waiver was granted before 1986;
(4) Person who had an approved waiver to perform the duties of a
mental health professional that was requested by the regional support
network and granted by the department before July 1, 2001; or
(5) Person who has been granted a time-limited exception of the
minimum requirements of a mental health professional by the department
consistent with rules adopted by the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 In addition to the provisions of this
chapter, a designated crisis responder has all the powers and duties of
a county-designated mental health professional as well as the powers
and duties of a designated chemical dependency specialist under RCW
70.96A.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 (1)(a) When a county-designated crisis
responder receives information alleging that a person, as a result of
a mental disorder, chemical dependency disorder, or both, presents a
likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, the
county-designated crisis responder may, after investigation and
evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and
credibility of any person providing information to initiate detention,
if satisfied that the allegations are true and that the person will not
voluntarily seek appropriate treatment, file a petition for initial
detention. Before filing the petition, the county-designated crisis
responder must personally interview the person, unless the person
refuses an interview, and determine whether the person will voluntarily
receive appropriate evaluation and treatment at either an evaluation
and treatment facility, a detoxification facility, or other certified
chemical dependency provider.
(b)(i)(A) Whenever it appears, by petition for initial detention,
to the satisfaction of a judge of the superior court that a person
presents as a result of a mental disorder, a likelihood of serious
harm, or is gravely disabled, and that the person has refused or failed
to accept appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily, the judge
may issue an order requiring the person to appear within twenty-four
hours after service of the order at a designated evaluation and
treatment facility for not more than a seventy-two hour evaluation and
treatment period; or
(B) Whenever it appears, by petition for initial detention, to the
satisfaction of a judge of the superior court, district court, or other
court permitted by court rule, that a person presents as a result of a
chemical dependency, a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely
disabled, and that the person has refused or failed to accept
appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily, the judge may issue
an order requiring the person to appear within twenty-four hours after
service of the order at a secure detoxification facility or other
certified chemical dependency provider for not more than a seventy-two
hour evaluation and treatment period.
(ii) The order issued under this subsection (1)(b) shall state the
address of the evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification
facility, or other certified chemical dependency provider to which the
person is to report; whether the required seventy-two hour evaluation
and treatment services may be delivered on an outpatient or inpatient
basis; and that if the person named in the order fails to appear at the
evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification facility, or
other certified chemical dependency provider at or before the date and
time stated in the order, the person may be involuntarily taken into
custody for evaluation and treatment. The order shall also designate
retained counsel or, if counsel is appointed from a list provided by
the court, the name, business address, and telephone number of the
attorney appointed to represent the person.
(c) The county-designated crisis responder shall then serve or
cause to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and
conservator, if any, a copy of the order to appear, together with a
notice of rights and a petition for initial detention. After service
on the person, the county-designated crisis responder shall file the
return of service in court and provide copies of all papers in the
court file to the evaluation and treatment facility or secure
detoxification facility and the designated attorney. The
county-designated crisis responder shall notify the court and the
prosecuting attorney that a probable cause hearing will be held within
seventy-two hours of the date and time of outpatient evaluation or
admission to the evaluation and treatment facility, secure
detoxification facility, or other certified chemical dependency
provider. The person shall be permitted to remain in his or her home
or other place of his or her choosing before the time of evaluation and
shall be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of his or her
relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or other
professional or religious advisor to the place of evaluation. An
attorney accompanying the person to the place of evaluation shall be
permitted to be present during the admission evaluation. Any other
person accompanying the person may be present during the admission
evaluation. The facility may exclude the person if his or her presence
would present a safety risk, delay the proceedings, or otherwise
interfere with the evaluation.
(d) If the person ordered to appear does appear on or before the
date and time specified, the evaluation and treatment facility, secure
detoxification facility, or other certified chemical dependency
provider may admit the person as required by subsection (3) of this
section or may provide treatment on an outpatient basis. If the person
ordered to appear fails to appear on or before the date and time
specified, the evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification
facility, or other certified chemical dependency provider shall
immediately notify the county-designated crisis responder who may
notify a peace officer to take the person or cause the person to be
taken into custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment facility,
a secure detoxification facility, or other certified chemical
dependency provider. Should the county-designated crisis responder
notify a peace officer authorizing the officer to take a person into
custody under this subsection, the county-designated crisis responder
shall file with the court a copy of the authorization and a notice of
detention. At the time the person is taken into custody there shall
commence to be served on the person, his or her guardian, and
conservator, if any, a copy of the original order together with a
notice of detention, a notice of rights, and a petition for initial
detention.
(2) If a county-designated crisis responder receives information
alleging that a person, as the result of:
(a) A mental disorder, presents an imminent likelihood of serious
harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after
investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the
reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the
information if any, the county-designated crisis responder may take the
person, or cause by oral or written order the person to be taken into
emergency custody in an evaluation and treatment facility for not more
than seventy-two hours as described in this chapter; or
(b) Chemical dependency, presents an imminent likelihood of serious
harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after
investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the
reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the
information if any, the county-designated crisis responder may take the
person, or cause by oral or written order the person to be taken into
emergency custody in a secure detoxification facility for not more than
seventy-two hours as described in this chapter.
(3) If the county-designated crisis responder petitions for
detention of a person whose actions constitute a likelihood of serious
harm, or who is gravely disabled, the evaluation and treatment
facility, the secure detoxification facility, or other certified
chemical dependency provider providing seventy-two hour evaluation and
treatment must immediately accept on a provisional basis the petition
and the person. The evaluation and treatment facility, the secure
detoxification facility, or other certified chemical dependency
provider shall then evaluate the person's condition and admit, detain,
transfer, or discharge such person in accordance with this chapter.
The facility shall notify in writing the court and the
county-designated crisis responder of the date and time of the initial
detention of each person involuntarily detained so that a probable
cause hearing will be held no later than seventy-two hours after
detention.
(4) A peace officer may, without prior notice of the proceedings
provided for in subsection (1) of this section, take or cause the
person to be taken into custody and immediately delivered to an
evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification facility,
other certified chemical dependency treatment provider only pursuant to
subsections (1)(d) and (2) of this section.
(5) Nothing in this chapter limits the power of a peace officer to
take a person into custody and immediately deliver the person to the
emergency department of a local hospital or to a detoxification
facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 (1) A person or public or private entity
employing a person is not civilly or criminally liable for performing
duties under this chapter if the duties were performed in good faith
and without gross negligence.
(2) This section does not relieve a person from giving the required
notices under RCW 71.05.330(2) or 71.05.340(1)(b), or the duty to warn
or to take reasonable precautions to provide protection from violent
behavior where the patient has communicated an actual threat of
physical violence against a reasonably identifiable victim or victims.
The duty to warn or to take reasonable precautions to provide
protection from violent behavior is discharged if reasonable efforts
are made to communicate the threat to the victim or victims and to law
enforcement personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 If the evaluation and treatment facility,
secure detoxification facility, or other certified chemical dependency
provider admits the person, it may detain the person for evaluation and
treatment for a period not to exceed seventy-two hours from the time of
acceptance. The computation of the seventy-two hour period excludes
Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 Whenever any person is detained for
evaluation and treatment for a mental disorder under section 206 of
this act, chapter 71.05 RCW applies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 (1) A person detained for seventy-two hour
evaluation and treatment under section 206 of this act or RCW
70.96A.120 may be detained for not more than fourteen additional days
of involuntary chemical dependency treatment if there are beds
available at the secure detoxification facility and the following
conditions are met:
(a) The professional person in charge of the agency or facility or
the person's designee providing evaluation and treatment services in a
secure detoxification facility has assessed the person's condition and
finds that the condition is caused by chemical dependency and either
results in a likelihood of serious harm or in the detained person being
gravely disabled, and the professional person or his or her designee is
prepared to testify those conditions are met;
(b) The person has been advised of the need for voluntary treatment
and the professional person in charge of the agency or facility or his
or her designee has evidence that he or she has not in good faith
volunteered for treatment; and
(c) The professional person in charge of the agency or facility or
the person's designee has filed a petition for fourteen-day involuntary
detention with the superior court, district court, or other court
permitted by court rule. The petition must be signed by the chemical
dependency professional who has examined the person.
(2) The petition under subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be
accompanied by a certificate of a licensed physician who has examined
the person, unless the person whose commitment is sought has refused to
submit to a medical examination, in which case the fact of refusal
shall be alleged in the petition. The certificate shall set forth the
licensed physician's findings in support of the allegations of the
petition. A physician employed by the petitioning program or the
department is eligible to be the certifying physician.
(3) The petition shall state facts that support the finding that
the person, as a result of chemical dependency, presents a likelihood
of serious harm or is gravely disabled, and that there are no less
restrictive alternatives to detention in the best interest of the
person or others. The petition shall state specifically that less
restrictive alternative treatment was considered and specify why
treatment less restrictive than detention is not appropriate.
(4) A copy of the petition shall be served on the detained person,
his or her attorney, and his or her guardian or conservator, if any,
before the probable cause hearing.
(5)(a) The court shall inform the person whose commitment is sought
of his or her right to contest the petition, be represented by counsel
at every stage of any proceedings relating to his or her commitment,
and have counsel appointed by the court or provided by the court, if he
or she wants the assistance of counsel and is unable to obtain counsel.
If the court believes that the person needs the assistance of counsel,
the court shall require, by appointment if necessary, counsel for him
or her regardless of his or her wishes. The person shall, if he or she
is financially able, bear the costs of such legal service; otherwise
such legal service shall be at public expense. The person whose
commitment is sought shall be informed of his or her right to be
examined by a licensed physician of his or her choice. If the person
is unable to obtain a licensed physician and requests examination by a
physician, the court shall appoint a reasonably available licensed
physician designated by the person.
(b) At the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court
finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the person, as the result
of chemical dependency, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is
gravely disabled and, after considering less restrictive alternatives
to involuntary detention and treatment, finds that no such alternatives
are in the best interest of such person or others, the court shall
order that the person be detained for involuntary chemical dependency
treatment not to exceed fourteen days in a secure detoxification
facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 If a person is detained for additional
treatment beyond fourteen days under section 210 of this act, the
professional staff of the agency or facility may petition for
additional treatment under RCW 70.96A.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 The prosecuting attorney of the county in
which an action under this chapter is taken must represent the
petitioner in judicial proceedings under this chapter for the
involuntary chemical dependency treatment of a person, including any
judicial proceeding where the person sought to be treated for chemical
dependency challenges the action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 (1) Every person involuntarily detained or
committed under this chapter as a result of a mental disorder is
entitled to all the rights set forth in this chapter and in chapter
71.05 RCW, and retains all rights not denied him or her under this
chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW.
(2) Every person involuntarily detained or committed under this
chapter as a result of a chemical dependency is entitled to all the
rights set forth in this chapter and chapter 70.96A RCW, and retains
all rights not denied him or her under this chapter or chapter 70.96A
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 (1) When a county designated crisis
responder is notified by a jail that a defendant or offender who was
subject to a discharge review under RCW 71.05.232 is to be released to
the community, the county designated crisis responder shall evaluate
the person within seventy-two hours of release.
(2) When an offender is under court-ordered treatment in the
community and the supervision of the department of corrections, and the
treatment provider becomes aware that the person is in violation of the
terms of the court order, the treatment provider shall notify the
county designated crisis responder of the violation and request an
evaluation for purposes of revocation of the less restrictive
alternative.
(3) When a county designated crisis responder becomes aware that an
offender who is under court-ordered treatment in the community and the
supervision of the department of corrections is in violation of a
treatment order or a condition of supervision that relates to public
safety, or the county designated crisis responder detains a person
under this chapter, the county designated crisis responder shall notify
the person's treatment provider and the department of corrections.
(4) When an offender who is confined in a state correctional
facility or is under supervision of the department of corrections in
the community is subject to a petition for involuntary treatment under
this chapter, the petitioner shall notify the department of corrections
and the department of corrections shall provide documentation of its
risk assessment or other concerns to the petitioner and the court if
the department of corrections classified the offender as a high risk or
high needs offender.
(5) Nothing in this section creates a duty on any treatment
provider or county designated crisis responder to provide offender
supervision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 The secretary may adopt rules to implement
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 The provisions of RCW 71.05.550 apply to
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall evaluate the pilot programs and make a preliminary
report to appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1,
2007, and a final report by September 30, 2008.
(2) The evaluation of the pilot programs shall include:
(a) Whether the county designated crisis responder pilot program:
(i) Has increased efficiency of evaluation and treatment of persons
involuntarily detained for seventy-two hours;
(ii) Is cost-effective;
(iii) Results in better outcomes for persons involuntarily
detained;
(iv) Increased the effectiveness of the crisis response system in
the pilot catchment areas;
(b) The effectiveness of providing a single chapter in the Revised
Code of Washington to address initial detention of persons with mental
disorders or chemical dependency, in crisis response situations and the
likelihood of effectiveness of providing a single, comprehensive
involuntary treatment act.
(3) The reports shall consider the impact of the pilot programs on
the existing mental health system and on the persons served by the
system.

Sec. 218 RCW 71.05.550 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 142 s 60 are each
amended to read as follows:
The department of social and health services, in planning and
providing funding to counties pursuant to chapter 71.24 RCW, shall
recognize the financial necessities imposed upon counties by
implementation of this chapter and chapter 70.-- RCW (sections 202
through 216 of this act), and shall consider needs, if any, for
additional community mental health services and facilities and
reduction in commitments to state hospitals for the mentally ill
accomplished by individual counties, in planning and providing such
funding. The state shall provide financial assistance to the counties
to enable the counties to meet all increased costs, if any, to the
counties resulting from their administration of the provisions of
chapter 142, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 Sections 202 through 216 of this act
expire March 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 A new section is added to chapter 70.96A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall select and contract with counties to
provide intensive case management for chemically dependent persons with
histories of high utilization of crisis services at two sites. In
selecting the two sites, the secretary shall endeavor to site one in an
urban county, and one in a rural county; and to site them in counties
other than those selected pursuant to section 203 of this act, to the
extent necessary to facilitate evaluation of pilot project results.
(2) The contracted sites shall implement the pilot programs by
providing intensive case management to persons with a primary chemical
dependency diagnosis or dual primary chemical dependency and mental
health diagnoses, through the employment of chemical dependency case
managers. The chemical dependency case managers shall:
(a) Be trained in and use the integrated, comprehensive screening
and assessment process adopted under section 701 of this act;
(b) Reduce the use of crisis medical, chemical dependency and
mental health services, including but not limited to, emergency room
admissions, hospitalizations, detoxification programs, inpatient
psychiatric admissions, involuntary treatment petitions, emergency
medical services, and ambulance services;
(c) Reduce the use of emergency first responder services including
police, fire, emergency medical, and ambulance services;
(d) Reduce the number of criminal justice interventions including
arrests, violations of conditions of supervision, bookings, jail days,
prison sanction day for violations, court appearances, and prosecutor
and defense costs;
(e) Where appropriate and available, work with therapeutic courts
including drug courts and mental health courts to maximize the outcomes
for the individual and reduce the likelihood of reoffense;
(f) Coordinate with local offices of the economic services
administration to assist the person in accessing and remaining enrolled
in those programs to which the person may be entitled;
(g) Where appropriate and available, coordinate with primary care
and other programs operated through the federal government including
federally qualified health centers, Indian health programs, and
veterans' health programs for which the person is eligible to reduce
duplication of services and conflicts in case approach;
(h) Where appropriate, advocate for the client's needs to assist
the person in achieving and maintaining stability and progress toward
recovery;
(i) Document the numbers of persons with co-occurring mental and
substance abuse disorders and the point of determination of the co-occurring disorder by quadrant of intensity of need; and
(j) Where a program participant is under supervision by the
department of corrections, collaborate with the department of
corrections to maximize treatment outcomes and reduce the likelihood of
reoffense.
(3) The pilot programs established by this section shall begin
providing services by March 1, 2006.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 A new section is added to chapter 71.05
RCW to read as follows:
The department shall, in cooperation with the Washington state
institute for public policy, develop a pilot program to evaluate the
effectiveness of clubhouse psychiatric rehabilitation programs. A
clubhouse program means a program in which consumers of mental health
services are involved in the design, development, and operation of the
program and where a primary goal of the program is the employment of
the members of the program. The pilot project shall provide support
and evaluation of existing and established clubhouse programs.
Clubhouse programs shall be evaluated on at least the following
criteria:
(1) Number of members in independent, supported, or transitional
employment, the stability of that employment, and the income to members
as a result of employment;
(2) Reductions in hospitalizations of members, and in the length of
stay in inpatient facilities when hospitalization is necessary;
(3) Reductions in crisis interventions, including arrests,
incarcerations, sobering or detoxification, evaluations for involuntary
treatment, and emergency room admissions; and
(4) Increases in independence and stability of member's housing.
The Washington state institute for public policy shall report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007.

PART III
OMNIBUS INVOLUNTARY TREATMENT ACT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 Sections 302 through 374 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 The legislature finds that mental
disorders and the abuse of alcohol and other drugs have become a
serious threat to the health of the citizens of the state of Washington
and that the use of psychoactive chemicals is a prime factor in the
current AIDS epidemic. The legislature also finds that some persons
with mental disorders and substance abuse disorders have little or no
insight into their condition and are unable or unwilling to seek
treatment voluntarily. The legislature further finds that it is not
always evident at the time of commitment that a person has co-occurring
mental and substance abuse disorders but that treatment of the
disabilities in isolation can lead to inappropriate or conflicting
treatment plans that can substantially reduce the opportunity for the
person to recover from his or her disorders. Therefore, a unified
involuntary treatment act is necessary.
The provisions of this chapter are intended by the legislature:
(1) To establish a single involuntary treatment act with a uniform
set of standards and procedures for persons with mental and substance
abuse disorders;
(2) To adequately assess whether a person presents a likelihood of
serious harm or a grave disability due to his or her disorder,
including an assessment of any prior history or pattern of repeated
hospitalizations or law enforcement interventions due to decompensation
in his or her mental or substance abuse disorder. The consideration of
prior mental history is particularly relevant in determining whether
the person would receive, if released, such care as is essential for
his or her health or safety;
(3) To prevent inappropriate, indefinite commitment of mentally
disordered and chemically dependent persons and to eliminate legal
disabilities that arise from such commitment where possible;
(4) To provide prompt evaluation and timely and appropriate
treatment of persons with serious mental and substance abuse disorders;
(5) To safeguard individual rights;
(6) To provide continuity of care for persons with serious mental
and substance abuse disorders, so that the procedures and services
authorized in this chapter are integrated with those in chapter 71.24
RCW to the maximum extent possible to provide a continuum of care
founded on evidence-based practices that support recovery, promote
independent living, encourage persons to participate in education and
employment to the maximum extent that they are able, reduce criminal
involvement, and reduce family violence and cycles of child abuse and
neglect leading to long-term use of the child welfare system;
(7) To encourage the integrated use of all existing agencies,
professional personnel, and public funds to prevent duplication of
services and unnecessary expenditures;
(8) To encourage, whenever appropriate, that services be provided
within the community;
(9) To promote the use of less restrictive alternatives to
inpatient commitments for persons with disorders that can be controlled
or stabilized in a less restrictive alternative. Within the guidelines
stated in In Re LaBelle 107 Wn.2d 196 (1986), the legislature intends
to encourage appropriate interventions at a point when there is the
best opportunity to restore the person to or maintain satisfactory
functioning; and
(10) To protect the public safety.

Definitions
NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician that a
person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital, an
evaluation and treatment facility, or other inpatient facility, or a
decision by a professional person in charge or his or her designee that
a person should be detained as a patient for evaluation and treatment
in a secure detoxification facility or other certified chemical
dependency provider.
(2) "Alcoholic" means a person who suffers from the disease of
alcoholism.
(3) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on
alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances
of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological
withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment
of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.
(4) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily
used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with
thought disorders, which includes but is not limited to atypical
antipsychotic medications.
(5) "Approved treatment program" means a discrete program of
chemical dependency treatment provided by a treatment program certified
by the department as meeting standards adopted under chapter 70.96A
RCW.
(6) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or
private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a
patient.
(7) "Certified facility" means a facility certified by the
department for detention or commitment under this chapter and includes,
but is not limited to, an evaluation and treatment center, a
psychiatric hospital, a secure detoxification facility, and an expanded
services facility that has been certified for detention or commitment.
(8) "Chemical dependency" means:
(a) Alcoholism;
(b) Drug addiction; or
(c) Dependence on alcohol and one or more other psychoactive
chemicals, as the context requires.
(9) "Chemical dependency professional" means a person certified as
a chemical dependency professional by the department of health under
chapter 18.205 RCW.
(10) "Chemical dependency program" means expenditures and
activities of the department designed and conducted to prevent or treat
alcoholism and other drug addiction, including reasonable
administration and overhead.
(11) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person
should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or
both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting.
(12) "Conditional release" means a modification of a commitment
that may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms.
(13) "Custody" means involuntary detention under either chapter
71.05 or 70.96A RCW or this chapter, uninterrupted by any period of
unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing
involuntary care and treatment.
(14) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(15) "Designated chemical dependency specialist" means a person
designated by the county alcoholism and other drug addiction program
coordinator designated under RCW 70.96A.310 to perform the commitment
duties described in this chapter and chapter 70.96A RCW.
(16) "Designated crisis responder" means a person designated by the
county or regional support network to perform the duties specified in
this chapter.
(17) "Designated mental health professional" means a mental health
professional appointed by the county or the regional support network to
perform the duties in chapter 71.05 RCW.
(18) "Designated responder" means a designated crisis responder, if
there is one, otherwise a designated mental health professional or a
designated chemical dependency specialist, as appropriate.
(19) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a
person under this chapter, or chapter 70.96A or 71.05 RCW.
(20) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who
has specialized training and three years of experience in directly
treating or working with individuals with developmental disabilities
and is a psychiatrist, psychologist, or social worker, and such other
developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules
adopted by the secretary.
(21) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW
71A.10.020.
(22) "Director" means the person administering the division of
alcohol and substance abuse or the mental health division within the
department.
(23) "Discharge" means the termination of facility authority. The
commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court
order.
(24) "Drug addict" means a person who suffers from the disease of
drug addiction.
(25) "Drug addiction" means a disease characterized by a dependency
on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and
circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or
psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued,
and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic
functioning.
(26) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility that
can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or
private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care,
and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a
mental disorder, and that is certified as such by the department. A
physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital
may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility
that is part of, or operated by, the department or any federal agency
does not require certification. No correctional institution or
facility, or jail, may be an evaluation and treatment facility within
the meaning of this chapter.
(27) "Facility" means either an evaluation and treatment facility
or a secure detoxification facility.
(28) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a
result of a mental disorder, as a result of the use of alcohol or other
psychoactive chemicals, or both:
(a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure
to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or
(b) Manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced
by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over
his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for
his or her health or safety.
(29) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by
program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life
skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and
vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education,
training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall
be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety
presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged
criminal conduct.
(30) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of
time ten years before the filing of a petition under this chapter, or
chapter 70.96A or 71.05 RCW, excluding any time spent, but not any
violent acts committed, in a mental health facility or a long-term
alcoholism or drug treatment facility, or in confinement as a result of
a criminal conviction.
(31) "Incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals"
means that a person, as a result of the use of alcohol or other
psychoactive chemicals, is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of
serious harm to himself or herself, to any other person, or to
property.
(32) "Incompetent person" means a person who has been adjudged
incompetent by the superior court.
(33) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a
developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a
team, for an individual with developmental disabilities, which shall
state:
(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged
criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;
(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes
of habilitation;
(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation
program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;
(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve
those intermediate and long-range goals;
(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;
(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due
consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to
less restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or
release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and
(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person
and possible future types of residences.
(34) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical
functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol
or other psychoactive chemicals.
(35) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court under this
chapter.
(36) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice
medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of
Washington.
(37) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:
(a) A substantial risk that:
(i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon his or her own
person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or
inflict physical harm on oneself;
(ii) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as
evidenced by behavior that has caused such harm or that places another
person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or
(iii) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property
of others, as evidenced by behavior that has caused substantial loss or
damage to the property of others; or
(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and
has a history of one or more violent acts.
(38) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care of a minor means a
requested certified inpatient service that is reasonably calculated to:
(a) Diagnose, arrest, or alleviate a chemical dependency; or (b)
prevent the worsening of chemical dependency conditions that endanger
life or cause suffering and pain, or result in illness or infirmity or
threaten to cause or aggravate a handicap, or cause physical deformity
or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative
available.
(39) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional
impairment that has substantial adverse effects on a person's cognitive
or volitional functions.
(40) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist,
psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other
mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the
secretary under the authority of chapter 71.05 RCW.
(41) "Minor" means a person less than eighteen years of age.
(42) "Parent" means the parent or parents who have the legal right
to custody of the child. Parent includes custodian or guardian.
(43) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public
agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given
peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial
order of appointment.
(44) "Person" means an individual, including a minor.
(45) "Person in charge" means a physician or chemical dependency
counselor as defined in rule by the department, who is empowered by a
certified treatment program with authority to make assessment,
admission, continuing care, and discharge decisions on behalf of the
certified program.
(46) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation,
or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in
whole or in part by public funds, that constitutes an evaluation and
treatment facility or private institution, hospital, or sanitarium, or
approved treatment program, that is conducted for, or includes a
department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons who
are mentally ill and/or chemically dependent.
(47) "Professional person" means a mental health professional or a
chemical dependency professional and shall also mean a physician,
registered nurse, and such others as may be defined in rules adopted by
the secretary.
(48) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has a
bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university, and who
has, in addition, at least two years of experience in the direct
treatment of mentally ill or emotionally disturbed persons under the
supervision of a mental health professional, or any other registered
nurse who has at least three years of such experience.
(49) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician
and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of
graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American
medical association or the American osteopathic association and is
certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of
psychiatry and neurology.
(50) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a
psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.
(51) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or
institution, hospital, or sanitarium, or approved treatment program
that is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for,
the care and treatment of persons who are mentally ill and/or
chemically dependent, if the agency is operated directly by federal,
state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such
governments.
(52) "Registration records" include all the records of the
department, regional support networks, treatment facilities, and other
persons providing services to the department, county departments, or
facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness.
(53) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under
chapter 70.96A or 71.05 RCW or this chapter.
(54) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in
chapter 71.24 RCW.
(55) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or the
secretary's designee.
(56) "Secure detoxification facility" means a facility operated by
either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency that
serves the purpose of providing evaluation and assessment, and acute
and/or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated persons and
includes security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff,
and community.
(57) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further
advanced degree from an accredited school of social work or a degree
deemed equivalent under rules adopted by the secretary.
(58) "Treatment" means the broad range of emergency,
detoxification, residential, inpatient and outpatient services and
care, including diagnostic evaluation, mental health or chemical
dependency education and counseling, medical, psychiatric,
psychological, and social service care, vocational rehabilitation and
career counseling, which may be extended to persons with mental and
substance abuse disorders, and their families.
(59) "Treatment program" means an organization, institution, or
corporation, public or private, engaged in the care, treatment, or
rehabilitation of alcoholics or other drug addicts.
(60) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records
concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received
services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department, by
regional support networks and their staffs, and by treatment
facilities. Treatment records do not include notes or records
maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services
for the department, regional support networks, or a treatment facility
if the notes or records are not available to others.
(61) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide,
attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to
property.

General Provisions
NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 Persons suffering from a mental disorder,
chemical dependency disorder, or both may not be involuntarily
committed for treatment of such disorder except pursuant to provisions
of this chapter, or chapter 10.77 or 71.09 RCW, transfer pursuant to
RCW 72.68.031 through 72.68.037, or pursuant to court ordered
evaluation and treatment not to exceed ninety days pending a criminal
trial or sentencing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 Persons who are developmentally disabled,
impaired by chronic alcoholism or drug abuse, or suffering from
dementia and who otherwise meet the criteria for detention or judicial
commitment are not ineligible for detention or commitment based on this
condition alone.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 Pursuant to the interlocal cooperation
act, chapter 39.34 RCW, the department may enter into agreements to
accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 All facilities, plans, or programs
receiving financial assistance under RCW 70.96A.040 are subject to the
provisions of RCW 70.96A.045 and 70.96A.047.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 To qualify as a designated crisis
responder, a person must have received chemical dependency training as
determined by the department and be a:
(1) Psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social
worker;
(2) Person with a master's degree or further advanced degree in
counseling or one of the social sciences from an accredited college or
university and, who have in addition, at least two years of experience
in direct treatment of persons with mental illness or emotional
disturbance, such experience gained under the direction of a mental
health professional;
(3) Person who meets the waiver criteria of RCW 71.24.260, which
waiver was granted before 1986;
(4) Person who had an approved waiver to perform the duties of a
mental health professional that was requested by the regional support
network and granted by the department before July 1, 2001; or
(5) Person who has been granted a time-limited exception of the
minimum requirements of a mental health professional by the department
consistent with rules adopted by the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 The prosecuting attorney of the county in
which an action under this chapter is taken must represent the
petitioner in judicial proceedings under this chapter for the
involuntary chemical dependency treatment of a person, including any
judicial proceeding where the person sought to be treated for chemical
dependency challenges the action.

Department Responsibilities
NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 The department shall have the
responsibility to determine whether all rights of persons recognized
and guaranteed by the provisions of this chapter and the Constitutions
of the state of Washington and the United States are, in fact,
protected and effectively secured. To this end, the department shall
assign appropriate staff who shall from time to time as may be
necessary have authority to examine records, inspect facilities, attend
proceedings, and do whatever is necessary to monitor, evaluate, and
assure adherence to such rights. Such persons shall also recommend
such additional safeguards or procedures as may be appropriate to
secure individual rights set forth in this chapter and as guaranteed by
the state and federal Constitutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 The department shall adopt such rules as
may be necessary to effectuate the intent and purposes of this chapter,
which shall include but not be limited to evaluation of the quality of
the program and facilities operating pursuant to this chapter,
evaluation of the effectiveness and cost effectiveness of such programs
and facilities, and procedures and standards for certification and
other action relevant to facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312 The provisions of chapter 420, Laws of
1989 shall apply equally to persons in the custody of the department on
May 13, 1989, who were found by a court to be not guilty by reason of
insanity or incompetent to stand trial, or who have been found to have
committed acts constituting a felony pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) and
present a substantial likelihood of repeating similar acts, and the
secretary shall cause such persons to be evaluated to ascertain if such
persons are developmentally disabled for placement in a program
specifically reserved for the treatment and training of persons with
developmental disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 313 By December 1, 2006, the department shall
provide the appropriate committees of the legislature with a report
identifying the types of facilities that will be certified for
detention or commitment under this chapter including the locations and
capacity of existing facilities and facilities under development, by
type of facility, in a manner that indicates the geographic
distribution of the available capacity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 314 The department shall ensure that the
provisions of this chapter are applied by the counties in a consistent
and uniform manner. The department shall also ensure that, to the
extent possible within available funds, the designated responders are
specifically trained in adolescent chemical dependency and mental
health issues, commitment laws, and the criteria for commitment.

Initial Detention
NEW SECTION. Sec. 315 (1)(a) When a designated responder
receives information alleging that a person, as a result of a mental
disorder, chemical dependency disorder, or both:
(i) Presents a likelihood of serious harm; or
(ii) Is gravely disabled;
the designated responder may, after investigation and evaluation of the
specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of any
person providing information to initiate detention, if satisfied that
the allegations are true and that the person will not voluntarily seek
appropriate treatment, file a petition for initial detention. Before
filing the petition, the designated responder must personally interview
the person, unless the person refuses an interview, and determine
whether the person will voluntarily receive appropriate evaluation and
treatment at a certified facility.
(b)(i) Whenever it appears, by petition for initial detention, to
the satisfaction of a judge of the superior court that a person
presents, as a result of a mental disorder, chemical dependency
disorder, or both, a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely
disabled, and that the person has refused or failed to accept
appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily, the judge may issue
an order requiring the person to appear within twenty-four hours after
service of the order at a certified facility for not more than a
seventy-two hour evaluation and treatment period.
(ii) The order shall state the address of the certified facility to
which the person is to report and whether the required seventy-two hour
evaluation and treatment services may be delivered on an outpatient or
inpatient basis and that if the person named in the order fails to
appear at the certified facility at or before the date and time stated
in the order, such person may be involuntarily taken into custody for
evaluation and treatment. The order shall also designate retained
counsel or, if counsel is appointed from a list provided by the court,
the name, business address, and telephone number of the attorney
appointed to represent the person.
(c) The designated responder shall then serve or cause to be served
on such person, and his or her personal representative, guardian, or
conservator, if any, a copy of the order to appear together with a
notice of rights and a petition for initial detention. After service
on the person, the designated responder shall file the return of
service in court and provide copies of all papers in the court file to
the certified facility and the designated attorney. The designated
responder shall notify the court and the prosecuting attorney that a
probable cause hearing will be held within seventy-two hours of the
date and time of outpatient evaluation or admission to the certified
facility. The person shall be permitted to remain in his or her home
or other place of his or her choosing prior to the time of evaluation
and shall be permitted to be accompanied by one or more of his or her
relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or other
professional or religious advisor to the place of evaluation. An
attorney accompanying the person to the place of evaluation shall be
permitted to be present during the admission evaluation. Any other
person accompanying the person may be present during the admission
evaluation. The facility may exclude the person if his or her presence
would present a safety risk, delay the proceedings, or otherwise
interfere with the evaluation.
(d) If the person ordered to appear does appear on or before the
date and time specified, the evaluation and treatment facility may
admit such person as required by section 317 of this act or may provide
treatment on an outpatient basis. If the person ordered to appear
fails to appear on or before the date and time specified, the
evaluation and treatment facility shall immediately notify the
designated responder who may notify a peace officer to take such person
or cause such person to be taken into custody and placed in a certified
facility. Should the designated responder notify a peace officer
authorizing him or her to take a person into custody under the
provisions of this subsection, he or she shall file with the court a
copy of such authorization and a notice of detention. At the time such
person is taken into custody there shall commence to be served on the
person, and his or her personal representative, guardian, or
conservator, if any, a copy of the original order together with a
notice of detention, a notice of rights, and a petition for initial
detention.
(2) When a designated responder receives information alleging that
a person, as the result of a mental disorder, chemical dependency
disorder, or both, presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or
is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after
investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the
reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the
information if any, the designated responder may take the person or
cause, by oral or written order the person to be taken into emergency
custody in a certified facility for not more than seventy-two hours as
described in section 318 of this act.
(3) A peace officer may take the person or cause the person to be
taken into custody and placed in a certified facility pursuant to
subsection (1)(d) of this section.
(4) A peace officer may, without prior notice of the proceedings
provided for in subsection (1) of this section, take or cause such
person to be taken into custody and immediately delivered to a
certified facility or the emergency department of a local hospital:
(a) Only pursuant to subsections (1)(d) and (2) of this section; or
(b) When he or she has reasonable cause to believe that such person
is suffering from a mental disorder, chemical dependency disorder, or
both and presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm or is in
imminent danger because of being gravely disabled.
(5) Persons delivered to certified facilities by peace officers
pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section may be held by the
facility for a period of up to twelve hours: PROVIDED, That they are
examined by a mental health professional or chemical dependency
professional within three hours of their arrival. Within twelve hours
of their arrival, the designated responder must file a supplemental
petition for detention, and commence service on the designated attorney
for the detained person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 316 Any facility receiving a person pursuant
to section 315 of this act shall require a petition for initial
detention stating the circumstances under which the person's condition
was made known and stating that such officer or person has evidence, as
a result of his or her personal observation or investigation, that the
actions of the person for which application is made constitute a
likelihood of serious harm, or that he or she is gravely disabled, and
stating the specific facts known to him or her as a result of his or
her personal observation or investigation, upon which he or she bases
the belief that such person should be detained for the purposes and
under the authority of this chapter.
If a person is involuntarily placed in a certified facility
pursuant to section 315 of this act, on the next judicial day following
the initial detention, the designated responder shall file with the
court and serve the designated attorney of the detained person the
petition or supplemental petition for initial detention, proof of
service of notice, and a copy of a notice of emergency detention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 317 Whenever the designated responder
petitions for detention of a person whose actions constitute a
likelihood of serious harm, or who is gravely disabled, the facility
providing seventy-two hour evaluation and treatment must immediately
accept on a provisional basis the petition and the person. The
facility shall then evaluate the person's condition and admit, detain,
transfer, or discharge such person in accordance with section 337 of
this act. The facility shall notify in writing the court and the
designated responder of the date and time of the initial detention of
each person involuntarily detained in order that a probable cause
hearing shall be held no later than seventy-two hours after detention.
The duty of a state hospital to accept persons for evaluation and
treatment under this section shall be limited by chapter 71.24 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 318 If the certified facility admits the
person, it may detain him or her for evaluation and treatment for a
period not to exceed seventy-two hours from the time of acceptance as
set forth in section 317 of this act. The computation of such seventy-two hour period shall exclude Saturdays, Sundays and holidays.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 319 If the person is not approved for
admission by a facility providing seventy-two hour evaluation and
treatment, and the person has not been arrested, the facility shall
furnish transportation, if not otherwise available, for the person to
his or her place of residence or other appropriate place. If the
person has been arrested, the certified facility shall detain the
person for not more than eight hours at the request of the peace
officer in order to enable a peace officer to return to the facility
and take the person back into custody.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 320 When a designated responder detains a
person to a certified facility under this chapter, he or she shall make
every effort to detain the person to the certified facility that is
most appropriate to the person's condition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 321 The legislature intends that, when
evaluating a person who is identified under RCW 72.09.370(7), the
professional person at the evaluation and treatment facility shall,
when appropriate after consideration of the person's mental condition
and relevant public safety concerns, file a petition for a ninety-day
less restrictive alternative in lieu of a petition for a fourteen-day
commitment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 322 (1) When a designated responder is
notified by a jail that a defendant or offender who was subject to a
discharge review under section 339 of this act is to be released to the
community, the designated responder shall evaluate the person within
seventy-two hours of release.
(2) When an offender is under court-ordered treatment in the
community and the supervision of the department of corrections, and the
treatment provider becomes aware that the person is in violation of the
terms of the court order, the treatment provider shall notify the
designated responder and the department of corrections of the violation
and request an evaluation for purposes of revocation of the less
restrictive alternative.
(3) When a designated responder becomes aware that an offender who
is under court-ordered treatment in the community and the supervision
of the department of corrections is in violation of a treatment order
or a condition of supervision that relates to public safety, or the
designated responder detains a person under this chapter, the
designated responder shall notify the person's treatment provider and
the department of corrections.
(4) When an offender who is confined in a state correctional
facility or is under supervision of the department of corrections in
the community is subject to a petition for involuntary treatment under
this chapter, the petitioner shall notify the department of corrections
and the department of corrections shall provide documentation of its
risk assessment or other concerns to the petitioner and the court if
the department of corrections classified the offender as a high risk or
high needs offender.
(5) Nothing in this section creates a duty on any treatment
provider or designated responder to provide offender supervision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 323 (1) If a person is referred to a
designated responder under RCW 10.77.090(1)(d)(iii)(A), the designated
responder shall examine the person within forty-eight hours. If the
designated responder determines it is not appropriate to detain the
person or petition for a ninety-day less restrictive alternative under
section 324(4) of this act, that decision shall be immediately
presented to the superior court for hearing. The court shall hold a
hearing to consider the decision of the designated responder not later
than the next judicial day. At the hearing the superior court shall
review the determination of the designated responder and determine
whether an order should be entered requiring the person to be evaluated
at a certified facility. No person referred to a certified facility
may be held at the facility longer than seventy-two hours.
(2) If a person is placed in an evaluation and treatment facility
under RCW 10.77.090(1)(d)(iii)(B), a professional person shall evaluate
the person for purposes of determining whether to file a ninety-day
inpatient or outpatient petition under this chapter. Before expiration
of the seventy-two hour evaluation period authorized under RCW
10.77.090(1)(d)(iii)(B), the professional person shall file a petition
or, if the recommendation of the professional person is to release the
person, present his or her recommendation to the superior court of the
county in which the criminal charge was dismissed. The superior court
shall review the recommendation not later than forty-eight hours,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, after the recommendation is
presented. If the court rejects the recommendation to unconditionally
release the person, the court may order the person detained at a
certified facility for not more than a seventy-two hour evaluation and
treatment period and direct the person to appear at a surety hearing
before that court within seventy-two hours, or the court may release
the person but direct the person to appear at a surety hearing set
before that court within eleven days, at which time the prosecutor may
file a petition under this chapter for ninety-day inpatient or
outpatient treatment. If a petition is filed by the prosecutor, the
court may order that the person named in the petition be detained at
the certified facility that performed the evaluation under this
subsection or order the respondent to be in outpatient treatment. If
a petition is filed but the person fails to appear in court for the
surety hearing, the court shall order that a mental health
professional, a chemical dependency professional, or peace officer
shall take such person or cause such person to be taken into custody
and placed in a certified facility to be brought before the court the
next judicial day after detention. Upon the person's first appearance
in court after a petition has been filed, proceedings under sections
330 and 331 of this act shall commence. For a person subject to this
subsection, the prosecutor or professional person may directly file a
petition for ninety-day inpatient or outpatient treatment and no
petition for initial detention or fourteen-day detention is required
before such a petition may be filed.
The court shall conduct the hearing on the petition filed under
this subsection within five judicial days of the date the petition is
filed. The court may continue the hearing upon the written request of
the person named in the petition or the person's attorney, for good
cause shown. Such a continuance shall not exceed five additional
judicial days. If the person named in the petition requests a jury
trial, the trial shall commence within ten judicial days of the date of
the filing of the petition. The burden of proof shall be by clear,
cogent, and convincing evidence and shall be upon the petitioner. The
person shall be present at such proceeding, which shall in all respects
accord with the constitutional guarantees of due process of law and the
rules of evidence pursuant to section 359 (8) and (9) of this act.
During the proceeding the person named in the petition shall
continue to be detained and treated until released by order of the
court. If no order has been made within thirty days after the filing
of the petition, not including any extensions of time requested by the
detained person or his or her attorney, the detained person shall be
released.
(3) If a designated responder or the professional person and
prosecuting attorney for the county in which the criminal charge was
dismissed or attorney general, as appropriate, stipulate that the
person does not present a likelihood of serious harm or is not gravely
disabled, the hearing under this section is not required and the
person, if in custody, shall be released.
(4) The person shall have the rights specified in section 359 (8)
and (9) of this act.

Detention and Commitment (14 Day)
NEW SECTION. Sec. 324 A person detained for seventy-two hour
evaluation and treatment may be detained for not more than fourteen
additional days of involuntary intensive treatment or ninety additional
days of a less restrictive alternative to involuntary intensive
treatment if the following conditions are met:
(1) The professional staff of the agency or facility providing
evaluation services has analyzed the person's condition and finds that
the condition is caused by mental disorder, chemical dependency
disorder, or both, and either results in a likelihood of serious harm,
or results in the detained person being gravely disabled and are
prepared to testify those conditions are met; and
(2) The person has been advised of the need for voluntary treatment
and the professional staff of the facility has evidence that he or she
has not in good faith volunteered; and
(3) The facility providing intensive treatment is certified to
provide such treatment by the department; and
(4) The professional staff of the agency or facility or the
designated responder has filed a petition for fourteen day involuntary
detention or a ninety day less restrictive alternative with the court.
The petition must be signed either by two physicians or by one
physician and a mental health professional or chemical dependency
professional, as appropriate, who have examined the person. If
involuntary detention is sought the petition shall state facts that
support the finding that the person, as a result of mental disorder,
chemical dependency disorder, or both, presents a likelihood of serious
harm, or is gravely disabled and that there are no less restrictive
alternatives to detention in the best interest of the person or others.
The petition shall state specifically that less restrictive alternative
treatment was considered and specify why treatment less restrictive
than detention is not appropriate. If an involuntary less restrictive
alternative is sought, the petition shall state facts that support the
finding that the person, as a result of mental disorder, chemical
dependency disorder, or both, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or
is gravely disabled and shall set forth the less restrictive
alternative proposed by the facility; and
(5) A copy of the petition has been served on the detained person,
his or her attorney and his or her personal representative, guardian,
or conservator, if any, if the person is a minor, his or her parent,
and if the person is under the supervision of the department of
corrections, the department of corrections prior to the probable cause
hearing; and
(6) The court at the time the petition was filed and before the
probable cause hearing has appointed counsel to represent such person
if no other counsel has appeared; and
(7) The court has ordered a fourteen day involuntary intensive
treatment or a ninety day less restrictive alternative treatment after
a probable cause hearing has been held pursuant to section 325 of this
act; and
(8) At the conclusion of the initial commitment period, the
professional staff of the agency or facility or the designated
responder may petition for an additional period of either ninety days
of less restrictive alternative treatment or ninety days of involuntary
intensive treatment as provided in section 328 of this act; and
(9) If the hospital or facility designated to provide outpatient
treatment is other than the facility providing involuntary treatment,
the outpatient facility so designated has agreed to assume such
responsibility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 325 If a petition is filed for fourteen day
involuntary treatment or ninety days of less restrictive alternative
treatment, the court shall hold a probable cause hearing within
seventy-two hours of the initial detention of such person as determined
in section 318 of this act. If requested by the detained person or his
or her attorney, the hearing may be postponed for a period not to
exceed forty-eight hours. The hearing may also be continued subject to
the conditions set forth in section 337 of this act or subject to the
petitioner's showing of good cause for a period not to exceed twenty-four hours.
At the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, if the court finds
by a preponderance of the evidence that the person, as the result of a
mental disorder, chemical dependency disorder, or both, presents a
likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled, and, after
considering less restrictive alternatives to involuntary detention and
treatment, finds that no such alternatives are in the best interests of
such person or others, the court shall order that such person be
detained for involuntary treatment not to exceed fourteen days in a
facility certified to provide treatment by the department. If the
court finds that the person, as the result of a mental disorder,
chemical dependency disorder, or both, presents a likelihood of serious
harm, or is gravely disabled, but that treatment in a less restrictive
setting than detention is in the best interest of such person or
others, the court shall order an appropriate less restrictive course of
treatment for not to exceed ninety days.
The court shall specifically state to the person and give the
person notice in writing that if involuntary treatment beyond the
fourteen day period or beyond the ninety days of less restrictive
treatment is to be sought, the person will have the right to a full
hearing or jury trial as required by section 330 of this act. The
court shall also provide written notice that, where required under
chapter 9.41 RCW, the person is barred from the possession of firearms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 326 (1) Involuntary intensive treatment
ordered at the time of the probable cause hearing shall be for no more
than fourteen days, and shall terminate sooner when, in the opinion of
the professional person in charge of the facility or his or her
professional designee, (a) the person no longer constitutes a
likelihood of serious harm, or (b) no longer is gravely disabled, or
(c) is prepared to accept voluntary treatment upon referral, or (d) is
to remain in the facility providing intensive treatment on a voluntary
basis.
(2) A person who has been detained for fourteen days of intensive
treatment shall be released at the end of the fourteen days unless one
of the following applies: (a) Such person agrees to receive further
treatment on a voluntary basis; or (b) such person is a patient to whom
section 327 of this act is applicable.

Detention and Commitment (90/180 Day)
NEW SECTION. Sec. 327 At the expiration of the fourteen-day
period of intensive treatment, a person may be confined for further
treatment pursuant to section 331 of this act if:
(1) Such person after having been taken into custody for evaluation
and treatment has threatened, attempted, or inflicted: (a) Physical
harm upon the person of another or himself or herself, or substantial
damage upon the property of another, and (b) as a result of mental
disorder, chemical dependency disorder, or both presents a likelihood
of serious harm; or
(2) Such person was taken into custody as a result of conduct in
which he or she attempted or inflicted physical harm upon the person of
another or himself or herself, or substantial damage upon the property
of others, and continues to present, as a result of mental disorder,
chemical dependency disorder, or both, a likelihood of serious harm; or
(3) Such person has been determined to be incompetent and criminal
charges have been dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.090 (4), and has
committed acts constituting a felony, and as a result of a mental
disorder or co-occurring mental and chemical dependency disorders,
presents a substantial likelihood of repeating similar acts. In any
proceeding pursuant to this subsection it shall not be necessary to
show intent, willfulness, or state of mind as an element of the crime;
or
(4) Such person is gravely disabled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 328 (1) At any time during a person's fourteen
day intensive treatment period, the professional person in charge of a
treatment facility or his or her professional designee or the
designated responder may petition the superior court for an order
requiring such person to undergo an additional period of treatment.
Such petition must be based on one or more of the grounds set forth in
section 327 of this act.
(2) The petition shall summarize the facts which support the need
for further confinement and shall be supported by affidavits signed by
two examining physicians, or by one examining physician and examining
mental health professional or chemical dependency specialist, as
appropriate. The affidavits shall describe in detail the behavior of
the detained person which supports the petition and shall explain what,
if any, less restrictive treatments which are alternatives to detention
are available to such person, and shall state the willingness of the
affiant to testify to such facts in subsequent judicial proceedings
under this chapter.
(3) If a person has been determined to be incompetent pursuant to
RCW 10.77.090(4), then the professional person in charge of the
treatment facility or his or her professional designee or the
designated responder may directly file a petition for one hundred
eighty day treatment under section 327(3) of this act. No petition for
initial detention or fourteen day detention is required before such a
petition may be filed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 329 The petition for ninety day treatment
shall be filed with the clerk of the superior court at least three days
before expiration of the fourteen-day period of intensive treatment.
At the time of filing such petition, the clerk shall set a time for the
person to come before the court on the next judicial day after the day
of filing unless such appearance is waived by the person's attorney,
and the clerk shall notify the designated responder. The designated
responder shall immediately notify the person detained, his or her
attorney, if any, his or her personal representative, guardian, or
conservator, if any, where the person is a minor, his or her guardian,
the department of corrections where the person is under its
supervision, and the prosecuting attorney, and provide a copy of the
petition to such persons as soon as possible.
At the time set for appearance the detained person shall be brought
before the court, unless such appearance has been waived and the court
shall advise him or her of his or her right to be represented by an
attorney and of his or her right to a jury trial. If the detained
person is not represented by an attorney, or is indigent or is
unwilling to retain an attorney, the court shall immediately appoint an
attorney to represent him or her. The court shall, if requested,
appoint a reasonably available licensed physician, psychologist, or
psychiatrist, designated by the detained person to examine and testify
on behalf of the detained person.
The court may, if requested, also appoint a professional person as
defined in section 303 of this act to seek less restrictive alternative
courses of treatment and to testify on behalf of the detained person.
In the case of a developmentally disabled person who has been
determined to be incompetent pursuant to RCW 10.77.090(4), then the
appointed professional person under this section shall be a
developmental disabilities professional.
The court shall also set a date for a full hearing on the petition
as provided in section 330 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 330 The court shall conduct a hearing on the
petition for ninety day treatment within five judicial days of the
first court appearance after the probable cause hearing. The court may
continue the hearing upon the written request of the person named in
the petition or the person's attorney, for good cause shown, which
continuance shall not exceed five additional judicial days. If the
person named in the petition requests a jury trial, the trial shall
commence within ten judicial days of the first court appearance after
the probable cause hearing. The burden of proof shall be by clear,
cogent, and convincing evidence and shall be upon the petitioner. The
person shall be present at such proceeding, which shall in all respects
accord with the constitutional guarantees of due process of law and the
rules of evidence pursuant to section 359 (8) and (9) of this act.
During the proceeding, the person named in the petition shall
continue to be treated until released by order of the superior court.
If no order has been made within thirty days after the filing of the
petition, not including extensions of time requested by the detained
person or his or her attorney, the detained person shall be released.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 331 (1)(a) If the court or jury finds that
grounds set forth in section 327 of this act have been proven and that
the best interests of the person or others will not be served by a less
restrictive treatment which is an alternative to detention, the court
shall remand him or her to the custody of the department or to a
facility certified by the department to provide treatment to persons
committed under this chapter for a further period of intensive
treatment not to exceed ninety days from the date of judgment:
PROVIDED, That if the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) are the
basis of commitment, then the period of treatment may be up to but not
exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment in a facility
certified by the department to provide treatment to persons committed
under this chapter.
(b) If the committed person is developmentally disabled and has
been determined incompetent pursuant to RCW 10.77.090(4), and the best
interests of the person or others will not be served by a less-restrictive treatment which is an alternative to detention, the court
shall remand him or her to the custody of the department or to a
facility certified by the department to provide treatment to persons
committed under this chapter. When appropriate and subject to
available funds, treatment and training of such persons must be
provided in a program specifically reserved for the treatment and
training of developmentally disabled persons. A person so committed
shall receive habilitation services pursuant to an individualized
service plan specifically developed to treat the behavior which was the
subject of the criminal proceedings. The treatment program shall be
administered by developmental disabilities professionals and others
trained specifically in the needs of developmentally disabled persons.
(c) If the committed person meets the admission requirements under
section 505 of this act, the court may remand the person to an enhanced
services facility.
(d) The department may limit admissions to these specialized
programs in order to ensure that expenditures for services do not
exceed amounts appropriated by the legislature and allocated by the
department for such services. The department may establish admission
priorities in the event that the number of eligible persons exceeds the
limits set by the department. An order for treatment less restrictive
than involuntary detention may include conditions, and if such
conditions are not adhered to, the designated mental health
professional, designated chemical dependency specialist, or
developmental disabilities professional may order the person
apprehended under the terms and conditions of section 336 of this act.
If the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in section 327 of
this act have been proven, but finds that treatment less restrictive
than detention will be in the best interest of the person or others,
then the court shall remand him or her to the custody of the department
or to a facility certified by the department to provide treatment to
persons committed under this chapter or to a less restrictive
alternative for a further period of less restrictive treatment not to
exceed ninety days from the date of judgment: PROVIDED, That if the
grounds set forth in section 327(3) of this act are the basis of
commitment, then the period of treatment may be up to but not exceed
one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment.
(2) The person shall be released from involuntary treatment at the
expiration of the period of commitment imposed under subsection (1) of
this section unless the superintendent or professional person in charge
of the facility in which he or she is confined, or in the event of a
less restrictive alternative, the designated mental health professional
or developmental disabilities professional, files a new petition for
involuntary treatment on the grounds that the committed person;
(a) During the current period of court ordered treatment: (i) Has
threatened, attempted, or inflicted physical harm upon the person of
another, or substantial damage upon the property of another, and (ii)
as a result of a mental disorder, chemical dependency disorder, or
both, or as the result of a developmental disability, presents a
likelihood of serious harm; or
(b) Was taken into custody as a result of conduct in which he or
she attempted or inflicted serious physical harm upon the person of
another, and continues to present, as a result of mental disorder,
chemical dependency disorder, or both, or as the result of a
developmental disability, a likelihood of serious harm; or
(c) Is in custody pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) and as a result of
mental disorder, chemical dependency disorder, or both, or as the
result of a developmental disability, presents a substantial likelihood
of repeating similar acts considering the charged criminal behavior,
life history, progress in treatment, and the public safety; or
(d) Continues to be gravely disabled.
If the conduct required to be proven in (b) and (c) of this
subsection was found by a judge or jury in a prior trial under this
chapter, it shall not be necessary to reprove that element. Such new
petition for involuntary treatment shall be filed and heard in the
superior court of the county of the facility which is filing the new
petition for involuntary treatment unless good cause is shown for a
change of venue. The cost of the proceedings shall be borne by the
state.
The hearing shall be held as provided in RCW 71.05.310, and if the
court or jury finds that the grounds for additional confinement as set
forth in this subsection are present, the court may order the committed
person returned for an additional period of treatment not to exceed one
hundred eighty days from the date of judgment. At the end of the one
hundred eighty day period of commitment, the committed person shall be
released unless a petition for another one hundred eighty day period of
continued treatment is filed and heard in the same manner as provided
in this subsection. Successive one hundred eighty day commitments are
permissible on the same grounds and pursuant to the same procedures as
the original one hundred eighty day commitment.
(3) No person committed as provided in this section may be detained
unless a valid order of commitment is in effect. No order of
commitment can exceed one hundred eighty days in length.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 332 (1) If a minor is committed for one
hundred eighty-day inpatient treatment and is to be placed in a state-supported program, the secretary shall accept immediately and place the
minor in a state-funded long-term evaluation and treatment facility.
(2) The secretary's placement authority shall be exercised through
a designated placement committee appointed by the secretary and
composed of children's mental health specialists, including at least
one child psychiatrist who represents the state-funded, long-term,
evaluation and treatment facility for minors. The responsibility of
the placement committee will be to:
(a) Make the long-term placement of the minor in the most
appropriate, available state-funded evaluation and treatment facility,
having carefully considered factors including the treatment needs of
the minor, the most appropriate facility able to respond to the minor's
identified treatment needs, the geographic proximity of the facility to
the minor's family, the immediate availability of bed space, and the
probable impact of the placement on other residents of the facility;
(b) Approve or deny requests from treatment facilities for transfer
of a minor to another facility;
(c) Receive and monitor reports required under this section;
(d) Receive and monitor reports of all discharges.
(3) The secretary may authorize transfer of minors among treatment
facilities if the transfer is in the best interests of the minor or due
to treatment priorities.
(4) The responsible state-funded evaluation and treatment facility
shall submit a report to the department's designated placement
committee within ninety days of admission and no less than every one
hundred eighty days thereafter, setting forth such facts as the
department requires, including the minor's individual treatment plan
and progress, recommendations for future treatment, and possible less
restrictive treatment.

Detention and Commitment (CDMHP/CDCDS Responsibility)
NEW SECTION. Sec. 333 Whenever a designated responder or
professional person is conducting an evaluation under this chapter,
consideration shall include all reasonably available information and
records regarding:
(1) Prior recommendations for evaluation of the need for civil
commitments when the recommendation is made pursuant to an evaluation
conducted under chapter 10.77 RCW;
(2) History of one or more violent acts;
(3) Prior determinations of incompetency or insanity under chapter
10.77 RCW; and
(4) Prior commitments under this chapter or chapter 70.96A, 71.05,
or 71.34 RCW.
In addition, when conducting an evaluation for offenders identified
under RCW 72.09.370, the designated responder or professional person
shall consider an offender's history of judicially required or
administratively ordered antipsychotic medication while in confinement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 334 The department shall develop statewide
protocols to be utilized by professional persons, and designated
responders in administration of this chapter and chapter 10.77 RCW.
The protocols shall be updated at least every three years. The
protocols shall provide uniform development and application of criteria
in evaluation and commitment recommendations, of persons who have, or
are alleged to have, a mental disorder, chemical dependency disorder,
or both, and are subject to this chapter.
The initial protocols shall be developed not later than September
1, 2008. The department shall develop and update the protocols in
consultation with representatives of designated responders, local
government, law enforcement, county and city prosecutors, public
defenders, the department of corrections, and groups concerned with
mental and chemical dependency disorders. The protocols shall be
submitted to the governor and legislature upon adoption by the
department.

Modifications and Reviews
NEW SECTION. Sec. 335 In any proceeding under this chapter to
modify a commitment order of a person committed to inpatient treatment
under grounds set forth in section 327(3) or 331(2)(c) of this act in
which the requested relief includes treatment less restrictive than
detention, the prosecuting attorney shall be entitled to intervene.
The party initiating the motion to modify the commitment order shall
serve the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the criminal
charges against the committed person were dismissed with written notice
and copies of the initiating papers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 336 (1)(a) When, in the opinion of the
superintendent or the professional person in charge of the hospital or
facility providing involuntary treatment, the committed person can be
appropriately served by outpatient treatment prior to or at the
expiration of the period of commitment, then such outpatient care may
be required as a term of conditional release for a period which, when
added to the inpatient treatment period, shall not exceed the period of
commitment. If the hospital or facility designated to provide
outpatient treatment is other than the facility providing involuntary
treatment, the outpatient facility so designated must agree in writing
to assume such responsibility. A copy of the terms of conditional
release shall be given to the person, and if the person is a minor, the
person's parent, the designated responder in the county in which the
patient is to receive outpatient treatment, the department of
corrections if the person is under supervision by the department of
corrections, and the court of original commitment.
(b) Before a person committed under grounds set forth in RCW
71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(2)(c) is conditionally released under (a) of
this subsection, the superintendent or professional person in charge of
the hospital or facility providing involuntary treatment shall in
writing notify the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the
criminal charges against the committed person were dismissed, of the
decision to conditionally release the person. Notice and a copy of the
terms of conditional release shall be provided at least thirty days
before the person is released from inpatient care. Within twenty days
after receiving notice, the prosecuting attorney may petition the court
in the county that issued the commitment order to hold a hearing to
determine whether the person may be conditionally released and the
terms of the conditional release. The prosecuting attorney shall
provide a copy of the petition to the superintendent or professional
person in charge of the hospital or facility providing involuntary
treatment, the committed person and, if the person is a minor, his or
her parent, the attorney, if any, and personal representative,
guardian, or conservator of the committed person, the department of
corrections if the person is under its supervision, and the court of
original commitment. If the county in which the committed person is to
receive outpatient treatment is the same county in which the criminal
charges against the committed person were dismissed, then the court
shall, upon the motion of the prosecuting attorney, transfer the
proceeding to the court in that county. The court shall conduct a
hearing on the petition within ten days of the filing of the petition.
The committed person shall have the same rights with respect to notice,
hearing, and counsel as for an involuntary treatment proceeding, except
as set forth in this subsection and except that there shall be no right
to jury trial. The issue to be determined at the hearing is whether or
not the person may be conditionally released without substantial danger
to other persons, or substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts
jeopardizing public safety or security. If the court disapproves of
the conditional release, it may do so only on the basis of substantial
evidence. Pursuant to the determination of the court upon the hearing,
the conditional release of the person shall be approved by the court on
the same or modified conditions or the person shall be returned for
involuntary treatment on an inpatient basis subject to release at the
end of the period for which he or she was committed, or otherwise in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The hospital or facility designated to provide outpatient care
or the secretary may modify the conditions for continued release when
such modification is in the best interest of the person. Notification
of such changes shall be sent to all persons receiving a copy of the
original conditions.
(3)(a) If the hospital or facility designated to provide outpatient
care, the designated responder, or the secretary determines that:
(i) A conditionally released person is failing to adhere to the
terms and conditions of his or her release;
(ii) Substantial deterioration in a conditionally released person's
functioning has occurred;
(iii) There is evidence of substantial decompensation with a
reasonable probability that the decompensation can be reversed by
further inpatient treatment; or
(iv) The person poses a likelihood of serious harm.
Upon notification by the hospital or facility designated to provide
outpatient care, or on his or her own motion, the designated responder
or the secretary may order that the conditionally released person be
apprehended and taken into custody and temporarily detained in a
certified facility in or near the county in which he or she is
receiving outpatient treatment.
(b) The hospital or facility designated to provide outpatient
treatment shall notify the secretary or designated responder when a
conditionally released person fails to adhere to terms and conditions
of his or her conditional release or experiences substantial
deterioration in his or her condition and, as a result, presents an
increased likelihood of serious harm. The designated responder or
secretary shall order the person apprehended and temporarily detained
in a certified facility in or near the county in which he or she is
receiving outpatient treatment. When the person is under the
supervision of the department of corrections the designated responder
shall also notify the department of corrections.
(c) A person detained under this subsection (3) shall be held until
such time, not exceeding five days, as a hearing can be scheduled to
determine whether or not the person should be returned to the hospital
or facility from which he or she had been conditionally released. The
designated responder or the secretary may modify or rescind such order
at any time prior to commencement of the court hearing.
(d) The court that originally ordered commitment shall be notified
within two judicial days of a person's detention under the provisions
of this section, and the designated responder or the secretary shall
file his or her petition and order of apprehension and detention with
the court and serve them upon the person detained, and if the person is
a minor, his or her parent, his or her attorney, personal
representative, guardian, or conservator, if any, and the department of
corrections, where the person is under its supervision, shall receive
a copy of such papers as soon as possible. Such person shall have the
same rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as for an
involuntary treatment proceeding, except as specifically set forth in
this section and except that there shall be no right to jury trial.
The issues to be determined shall be: (i) Whether the conditionally
released person did or did not adhere to the terms and conditions of
his or her conditional release; (ii) that substantial deterioration in
the person's functioning has occurred; (iii) there is evidence of
substantial decompensation with a reasonable probability that the
decompensation can be reversed by further inpatient treatment; or (iv)
there is a likelihood of serious harm; and, if any of the conditions
listed in this subsection (3)(d) have occurred, whether the terms of
conditional release should be modified or the person should be returned
to the facility.
(e) Pursuant to the determination of the court upon such hearing,
the conditionally released person shall either continue to be
conditionally released on the same or modified conditions or shall be
returned for involuntary treatment on an inpatient basis subject to
release at the end of the period for which he or she was committed for
involuntary treatment, or otherwise in accordance with the provisions
of this chapter. Such hearing may be waived by the person, his or her
counsel, his or her personal representative, guardian, or conservator,
if any, and, where the person is a minor, his or her parent, but shall
not be waivable unless all such persons agree to waive, and upon such
waiver the person may be returned for involuntary treatment or
continued on conditional release on the same or modified conditions.
(4) The proceedings set forth in subsection (3) of this section may
be initiated by the designated responder or the secretary on the same
basis set forth therein without requiring or ordering the apprehension
and detention of the conditionally released person, in which case the
court hearing shall take place in not less than five days from the date
of service of the petition upon the conditionally released person.
Upon expiration of the period of commitment, or when the person is
released from outpatient care, notice in writing to the court which
committed the person for treatment shall be provided.
(5) The grounds and procedures for revocation of less restrictive
alternative treatment shall be the same as those set forth in this
section for conditional releases.
(6) In the event of a revocation of a conditional release, the
subsequent treatment period may be for no longer than the actual period
authorized in the original court order.

Treatment Provider Responsibilities
NEW SECTION. Sec. 337 Each person involuntarily detained and
accepted or admitted at a certified facility shall, within twenty-four
hours of his or her admission or acceptance at the facility, be
examined and evaluated by a licensed physician who may be assisted by
a physician assistant according to chapter 18.71A RCW or an advanced
registered nurse practitioner according to chapter 18.79 RCW and a
mental health professional or chemical dependency professional, as
appropriate, and shall receive such treatment and care as his or her
condition requires including treatment on an outpatient basis for the
period that he or she is detained, except that, beginning twenty-four
hours prior to a trial or hearing pursuant to section 325, 330, 331,
336, 360, or 361 of this act, the person may refuse psychiatric
medications, but may not refuse: (1) Any other medication previously
prescribed by a person licensed under Title 18 RCW; or (2) emergency
lifesaving treatment, and the person shall be informed at an
appropriate time of his or her right of such refusal. The person shall
be detained up to seventy-two hours if, in the opinion of the
professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her
professional designee, the person presents a likelihood of serious harm
or is gravely disabled. A person who has been detained for seventy-two
hours shall, no later than the end of such period, be released unless
referred for further care on a voluntary basis or detained pursuant to
court order for further treatment as provided in this chapter.
If, after examination and evaluation, the licensed physician and
mental health professional determine that the initial needs of the
person would be better served by placement in an alternate facility,
then the person shall be referred to that facility.
A certified facility admitting or accepting any person pursuant to
this chapter whose physical condition reveals the need for
hospitalization shall assure that such person is transferred to an
appropriate hospital for evaluation or admission for treatment. Notice
of such fact shall be given to the court, the designated attorney, and
the designated responder and where the person is a minor, his or her
parent, and the court shall order such continuance in proceedings under
this chapter as may be necessary, but in no event may this continuance
be more than fourteen days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 338 At the time a person is involuntarily
admitted to a certified facility, the professional person in charge or
his or her designee shall take reasonable precautions to inventory and
safeguard the personal property of the person detained. A copy of the
inventory, signed by the staff member making it, shall be given to the
person detained and where the person is a minor, his or her parent. It
shall, in addition, be open to inspection to the person's attorney,
guardian, or conservator, if any, and any responsible relative, subject
to limitations, if any, specifically imposed by the detained person.
For purposes of this section, "responsible relative" includes the
spouse, parent, adult child, or adult brother or sister of the person.
The facility shall not disclose the contents of the inventory to any
other person without the consent of the person or order of the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 339 (1) When a state hospital admits a person
for evaluation or treatment under this chapter, the state hospital
shall consult with the appropriate corrections and chemical dependency
personnel and the appropriate forensic staff at the state hospital to
conduct a discharge review to determine whether the person presents a
likelihood of serious harm and whether the person is appropriate for
release to a less restrictive alternative, if the person has a history
of one or more violent acts and:
(a) Has been transferred from a correctional facility; or
(b) Is or has been under the authority of the department of
corrections or the indeterminate sentence review board.
(2) When a state hospital returns a person who was reviewed under
subsection (1) of this section to a correctional facility, the hospital
shall notify the correctional facility that the person was subject to
a discharge review pursuant to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 340 Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the
professional person in charge of a treatment facility, or his or her
professional designee, from permitting a person detained for intensive
treatment to leave the facility for prescribed periods during the term
of the person's detention, under such conditions as may be appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 341 No indigent patient shall be conditionally
released or discharged from involuntary treatment without suitable
clothing, and the superintendent of a state hospital shall furnish the
same, together with such sum of money as he or she deems necessary for
the immediate welfare of the patient. Such sum of money shall be the
same as the amount required by RCW 72.02.100 to be provided to persons
in need being released from correctional institutions. As funds are
available, the secretary may provide payment to indigent persons
conditionally released pursuant to this chapter consistent with the
optional provisions of RCW 72.02.100 and 72.02.110, and may adopt rules
and regulations to do so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 342 A certified facility shall provide for
adequate and appropriate treatment of a person committed to its
custody. A person committed under this section may be transferred from
one certified facility to another if transfer is medically advisable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 343 (1) Before a person committed under
grounds set forth in section 327(3) of this act is released because a
new petition for involuntary treatment has not been filed under section
331(2) of this act, the superintendent, professional person, or
designated responder responsible for the decision whether to file a new
petition shall in writing notify the prosecuting attorney of the county
in which the criminal charges against the committed person were
dismissed, of the decision not to file a new petition for involuntary
treatment. Notice shall be provided at least forty-five days before
the period of commitment expires.
(2)(a) Before a person committed under grounds set forth in section
327(3) of this act is permitted temporarily to leave a treatment
facility pursuant to section 340 of this act for any period of time
without constant accompaniment by facility staff, the superintendent,
professional person in charge of a treatment facility, or his or her
professional designee shall in writing notify the prosecuting attorney
of any county of the person's destination and the prosecuting attorney
of the county in which the criminal charges against the committed
person were dismissed. The notice shall be provided at least forty-five days before the anticipated leave and shall describe the
conditions under which the leave is to occur.
(b) The provisions of section 344(2) of this act apply to proposed
leaves, and either or both prosecuting attorneys receiving notice under
this subsection may petition the court under section 344(2) of this
act.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize
detention of a person unless a valid order of commitment is in effect.
(4) The existence of the notice requirements in this section will
not require any extension of the leave date in the event the leave plan
changes after notification.
(5) The notice requirements contained in this section shall not
apply to emergency medical transfers.
(6) The notice provisions of this section are in addition to those
provided in section 345 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 344 (1) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit
the superintendent or professional person in charge of the hospital or
facility in which the person is being involuntarily treated from
releasing him or her prior to the expiration of the commitment period
when, in the opinion of the superintendent or professional person in
charge, the person being involuntarily treated no longer presents a
likelihood of serious harm.
Whenever the superintendent or professional person in charge of a
hospital or facility providing involuntary treatment pursuant to this
chapter releases a person prior to the expiration of the period of
commitment, the superintendent or professional person in charge shall
in writing notify the court which committed the person for treatment.
(2) Before a person committed under grounds set forth in section
327(3) or 331(2)(c) of this act is released under this section, the
superintendent or professional person in charge shall in writing notify
the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the criminal charges
against the committed person were dismissed, of the release date.
Notice shall be provided at least thirty days before the release date.
Within twenty days after receiving notice, the prosecuting attorney may
petition the court in the county in which the person is being
involuntarily treated for a hearing to determine whether the person is
to be released. The prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the
petition to the superintendent or professional person in charge of the
hospital or facility providing involuntary treatment, the committed
person and his or her attorney, personal representative, guardian, or
conservator, if any, the department of corrections if the person is
under its supervision, and where the person is a minor, his or her
parent. The court shall conduct a hearing on the petition within ten
days of filing the petition. The committed person shall have the same
rights with respect to notice, hearing, and counsel as for an
involuntary treatment proceeding, except as set forth in this
subsection and except that there shall be no right to jury trial. The
issue to be determined at the hearing is whether or not the person may
be released without substantial danger to other persons, or substantial
likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or
security. If the court disapproves of the release, it may do so only
on the basis of substantial evidence. Pursuant to the determination of
the court upon the hearing, the committed person shall be released or
shall be returned for involuntary treatment subject to release at the
end of the period for which he or she was committed, or otherwise in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 345 (1)(a) Except as provided in subsection
(2) of this section, at the earliest possible date, and in no event
later than thirty days before conditional release, final release,
authorized leave under section 343(2) of this act, or transfer to a
facility other than a state mental hospital, the superintendent shall
send written notice of conditional release, release, authorized leave,
or transfer of a person committed under section 327(3) or 331(2)(c) of
this act following dismissal of a sex, violent, or felony harassment
offense pursuant to RCW 10.77.090(4) to the following:
(i) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the person
will reside;
(ii) The sheriff of the county in which the person will reside; and
(iii) The department of corrections, if the person is under its
supervision.
(b) The same notice as required by (a) of this subsection shall be
sent to the following, if such notice has been requested in writing
about a specific person committed under section 327(3) or 331(2)(c) of
this act following dismissal of a sex, violent, or felony harassment
offense pursuant to RCW 10.77.090(4):
(i) The victim of the sex, violent, or felony harassment offense
that was dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.090(4) preceding commitment
under section 327(3) or 331(2)(c) of this act or the victim's next of
kin if the crime was a homicide;
(ii) Any witnesses who testified against the person in any court
proceedings; and
(iii) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney.
Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting the
notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing by
the prosecuting attorney to receive the notice, and the notice are
confidential and shall not be available to the person committed under
this chapter.
(c) The thirty-day notice requirements contained in this subsection
shall not apply to emergency medical transfers.
(d) The existence of the notice requirements in this subsection
will not require any extension of the release date in the event the
release plan changes after notification.
(2) If a person committed under section 327(3) or 331(2)(c) of this
act following dismissal of a sex, violent, or felony harassment offense
pursuant to RCW 10.77.090(4) escapes, the superintendent shall
immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means
available, the chief of police of the city, the sheriff of the county
in which the person resided immediately before the person's arrest, and
the department of corrections if the person is subject to its
supervision. If previously requested, the superintendent shall also
notify the witnesses and the victim of the sex, violent, or felony
harassment offense that was dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.090(4)
preceding commitment under section 327(3) or 331(2)(c) of this act or
the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide. In addition, the
secretary shall also notify appropriate parties pursuant to section
363(18) of this act. If the person is recaptured, the superintendent
shall send notice to the persons designated in this subsection as soon
as possible but in no event later than two working days after the
department learns of such recapture.
(3) If the victim, the victim's next of kin, or any witness is
under the age of sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be
sent to the parent or legal guardian of the child.
(4) The superintendent shall send the notices required by this
chapter to the last address provided to the department by the
requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department
with a current address.
(5) For purposes of this section the following terms have the
following meanings:
(a) "Violent offense" means a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) "Sex offense" means a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030;
(c) "Next of kin" means a person's spouse, parents, siblings, and
children;
(d) "Felony harassment offense" means a crime of harassment as
defined in RCW 9A.46.060 that is a felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 346 In addition to any other information
required to be released under this chapter, the department is
authorized, pursuant to RCW 4.24.550, to release relevant information
that is necessary to protect the public, concerning a specific person
committed under section 327(3) or 331(2)(c) of this act following
dismissal of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

Attorneys and Courts
NEW SECTION. Sec. 347 Attorneys appointed for persons pursuant
to this chapter shall be compensated for their services as follows:
(1) The person for whom an attorney is appointed shall, if he or she is
financially able pursuant to standards as to financial capability and
indigency set by the superior court of the county in which the
proceeding is held, bear the costs of such legal services; (2) if such
person is indigent pursuant to such standards, the costs of such
services shall be borne by the county in which the proceeding is held,
subject however to the responsibility for costs provided in section
331(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 348 In any judicial proceeding for involuntary
commitment or detention, or in any proceeding challenging such
commitment or detention, the prosecuting attorney for the county in
which the proceeding was initiated shall represent the persons or
agencies petitioning for commitment or detention and shall defend all
challenges to such commitment or detention: PROVIDED, That the
attorney general shall represent and provide legal services and advice
to state hospitals with regard to all provisions of and proceedings
under this chapter except in proceedings initiated by hospitals seeking
fourteen day detention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 349 When any court orders a person to receive
treatment under this chapter, the order shall include a statement that
if the person is, or becomes, subject to supervision by the department
of corrections, the person must notify the treatment provider and the
person's mental health and chemical dependency treatment information
must be shared with the department of corrections for the duration of
the offender's incarceration and supervision, under RCW 71.05.445.
Upon a petition by a person who does not have a history of one or more
violent acts, the court may, for good cause, find that public safety
would not be enhanced by the sharing of this person's information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 350 In each county the superior court may
appoint the following persons to assist the superior court in disposing
of its business: PROVIDED, That such positions may not be created
without prior consent of the county legislative authority:
(1) One or more attorneys to act as involuntary treatment
commissioners; and
(2) Such investigators, stenographers, and clerks as the court
shall find necessary to carry on the work of the involuntary treatment
commissioners.
The appointments provided for in this section shall be made by a
majority vote of the judges of the superior court of the county and may
be in addition to all other appointments of commissioners and other
judicial attaches otherwise authorized by law. Involuntary treatment
commissioners and investigators shall serve at the pleasure of the
judges appointing them and shall receive such compensation as the
county legislative authority shall determine. The appointments may be
full or part-time positions. A person appointed as an involuntary
treatment commissioner may also be appointed to any other commissioner
position authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 351 The judges of the superior court of the
county by majority vote may authorize involuntary treatment
commissioners, appointed pursuant to RCW 71.05.135, to perform any or
all of the following duties:
(1) Receive all applications, petitions, and proceedings filed in
the superior court for the purpose of disposing of them pursuant to
this chapter;
(2) Investigate the facts upon which to base warrants, subpoenas,
orders to directions in actions, or proceedings filed pursuant to this
chapter;
(3) For the purpose of this chapter, exercise all powers and
perform all the duties of a court commissioner appointed pursuant to
RCW 2.24.010;
(4) Hold hearings in proceedings under this chapter and make
written reports of all proceedings under this chapter which shall
become a part of the record of superior court;
(5) Provide such supervision in connection with the exercise of its
jurisdiction as may be ordered by the presiding judge; and
(6) Cause the orders and findings to be entered in the same manner
as orders and findings are entered in cases in the superior court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 352 A record of all applications, petitions,
and proceedings under this chapter shall be maintained by the county
clerk in which the application, petition, or proceeding was initiated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 353 In any judicial proceeding in which a
professional person has made a recommendation regarding whether a
person should be committed for treatment under this chapter, and the
court does not follow the recommendation, the court shall enter
findings that state with particularity its reasoning, including a
finding whether the state met its burden of proof in showing whether
the person presents a likelihood of serious harm or grave disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 354 In making a determination of whether there
is a likelihood of serious harm in a hearing conducted under section
325 or 331 of this act, the court shall give great weight to any
evidence before the court regarding whether the person has: (1) A
recent history of one or more violent acts; or (2) a recent history of
one or more commitments under this chapter or its equivalent provisions
under the laws of another state which were based on a likelihood of
serious harm. The existence of prior violent acts or commitments under
this chapter or its equivalent shall not be the sole basis for
determining whether a person presents a likelihood of serious harm.
For the purposes of this section "recent" refers to the period of
time not exceeding three years prior to the current hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 355 In determining whether an inpatient or
less restrictive alternative commitment under the process provided in
section 327 or 331 of this act is appropriate, great weight shall be
given to evidence of a prior history or pattern of decompensation and
discontinuation of treatment resulting in: (1) Repeated
hospitalizations; or (2) repeated peace officer interventions resulting
in juvenile offenses, criminal charges, diversion programs, or jail
admissions. Such evidence may be used to provide a factual basis for
concluding that the person would not receive, if released, such care as
is essential for his or her health or safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 356 The supreme court of the state of
Washington shall adopt such rules as it shall deem necessary with
respect to the court procedures and proceedings provided for by this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 357 (1) When making a decision under this
chapter whether to require a less restrictive alternative treatment,
the court shall consider whether it is appropriate to include or
exclude time spent in confinement when determining whether the person
has committed a recent overt act.
(2) When determining whether an offender is a danger to himself or
herself or others under this chapter, a court shall give great weight
to any evidence submitted to the court regarding an offender's recent
history of judicially required or administratively ordered involuntary
antipsychotic medication while in confinement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 358 The venue for proceedings under this
section is the county in which person to be committed resides or is
present.

Individual Rights and Medications
NEW SECTION. Sec. 359 (1)(a) Every person involuntarily detained
or committed under the provisions of this chapter shall be entitled to
all the rights set forth in this chapter, which shall be prominently
posted in the facility, and shall retain all rights not denied him or
her under this chapter except as chapter 9.41 RCW may limit the right
of a person to purchase or possess a firearm or to qualify for a
concealed pistol license.
(b) No person shall be presumed incompetent as a consequence of
receiving an evaluation or voluntary or involuntary treatment for a
mental disorder, chemical dependency disorder, or both, under this
chapter, chapter 70.96A, 71.05, or 71.34 RCW, or any prior laws of this
state dealing with mental illness. Competency shall not be determined
or withdrawn except under the provisions of chapter 10.97 or 11.88 RCW.
(c) Any person who leaves a public or private agency following
evaluation or treatment for a mental disorder, chemical dependency
disorder, or both, shall be given a written statement setting forth the
substance of this section.
(2) Each person involuntarily detained or committed pursuant to
this chapter shall have the right to adequate care and individualized
treatment.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to deny
to any person treatment by spiritual means through prayer in accordance
with the tenets and practices of a church or religious denomination.
(4) Persons receiving evaluation or treatment under this chapter
shall be given a reasonable choice of an available physician or other
professional person qualified to provide such services.
(5) Whenever any person is detained for evaluation and treatment
pursuant to this chapter, both the person and, if the person is a
minor, his or her parent, or if possible, a responsible member of his
or her immediate family, his or her personal representative, guardian,
or conservator, if any, shall be advised as soon as possible in writing
or orally, by the officer or person taking him or her into custody or
by personnel of the certified facility where the person is detained
that unless the person is released or voluntarily admits himself or
herself for treatment within seventy-two hours of the initial
detention:
(a) That a judicial hearing in a superior court, either by a judge
or court commissioner thereof, shall be held not more than seventy-two
hours after the initial detention to determine whether there is
probable cause to detain the person after the seventy-two hours have
expired for up to an additional fourteen days without further automatic
hearing for the reason that the person is a person whose mental
disorder, chemical dependency disorder, or both, presents a likelihood
of serious harm or that the person is gravely disabled;
(b) That the person has a right to communicate immediately with an
attorney; has a right to have an attorney appointed to represent him or
her before and at the probable cause hearing if he or she is indigent;
and has the right to be told the name and address of the attorney that
the mental health professional or chemical dependency professional, as
appropriate, has designated pursuant to this chapter;
(c) That the person has the right to remain silent and that any
statement he or she makes may be used against him or her;
(d) That the person has the right to present evidence and to cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her at the probable cause
hearing; and
(e) That the person has the right to refuse psychiatric
medications, including antipsychotic medication beginning twenty-four
hours prior to the probable cause hearing.
(6) When proceedings are initiated under section 315 (2), (3), or
(4)(b) of this act, no later than twelve hours after such person is
admitted to the certified facility the personnel of the certified
facility or the designated responder shall serve on such person and if
the person is a minor, the person's parent, a copy of the petition for
initial detention and the name, business address, and phone number of
the designated attorney and shall forthwith commence service of a copy
of the petition for initial detention on the designated attorney.
(7) The judicial hearing described in subsection (5) of this
section is hereby authorized, and shall be held according to the
provisions of subsection (5) of this section and rules promulgated by
the supreme court.
(8) At the probable cause hearing the detained person shall have
the following rights in addition to the rights previously specified:
(a) To present evidence on his or her behalf;
(b) To cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her;
(c) To be proceeded against by the rules of evidence;
(d) To remain silent;
(e) To view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file.
(9) The physician-patient privilege or the psychologist-client
privilege shall be deemed waived in proceedings under this chapter
relating to the administration of antipsychotic medications. As to
other proceedings under this chapter, the privileges shall be waived
when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion determines
that such waiver is necessary to protect either the detained person or
the public.
The waiver of a privilege under this section is limited to records
or testimony relevant to evaluation of the detained person for purposes
of a proceeding under this chapter. Upon motion by the detained person
or on its own motion, the court shall examine a record or testimony
sought by a petitioner to determine whether it is within the scope of
the waiver.
The record maker shall not be required to testify in order to
introduce medical or psychological records of the detained person so
long as the requirements of RCW 5.45.020 are met except that portions
of the record which contains opinions as to the detained person's
mental state must be deleted from such records unless the person making
such conclusions is available for cross-examination.
(10) Insofar as danger to the person or others is not created, each
person involuntarily detained, treated in a less restrictive
alternative course of treatment, or committed for treatment and
evaluation pursuant to this chapter shall have, in addition to other
rights not specifically withheld by law, the following rights:
(a) To wear his or her own clothes and to keep and use his or her
own personal possessions, except when deprivation of same is essential
to protect the safety of the resident or other persons;
(b) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of his or her
own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;
(c) To have access to individual storage space for his or her
private use;
(d) To have visitors at reasonable times;
(e) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and
receive confidential calls, consistent with an effective treatment
program;
(f) To have ready access to letter writing materials, including
stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the
mails;
(g) To discuss treatment plans and decisions with professional
persons;
(h) Not to consent to the administration of antipsychotic
medications beyond the hearing conducted pursuant to section 331 of
this act, or the performance of electroconvulsant therapy or surgery,
except emergency life-saving surgery, unless ordered by a court under
section 361 of this act;
(i) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any
circumstances;
(j) To dispose of property and sign contracts unless such person
has been adjudicated an incompetent in a court proceeding directed to
that particular issue.
(11) Every person involuntarily detained shall immediately be
informed, and if the person is a minor, his or her parent shall be
informed, of his or her right to a hearing to review the legality of
his or her detention and of his or her right to counsel, by the
professional person in charge of the facility providing evaluation and
treatment, or his or her designee, and, when appropriate, by the court.
If the person so elects, the court shall immediately appoint an
attorney to assist him or her.
(12) A person challenging his or her detention or his or her
attorney shall have the right to designate and have the court appoint
a reasonably available independent physician or licensed mental health
professional to examine the person detained, the results of which
examination may be used in the proceeding. The person shall, if he or
she is financially able, bear the cost of such expert information,
otherwise such expert examination shall be at public expense.
(13) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the patient
from petitioning by writ of habeas corpus for release.
(14) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a person committed on
or prior to January 1, 1974, from exercising a right available to him
or her at or prior to January 1, 1974, for obtaining release from
confinement.
(15) The court shall inform the person whose commitment or
recommitment is sought and, if the person is a minor, his or her
parent, of his or her right to contest the application, be represented
by counsel at every stage of any proceedings relating to his or her
commitment and recommitment, and have counsel appointed by the court or
provided by the court, if he or she wants the assistance of counsel and
is unable to obtain counsel. If the court believes that the person
needs the assistance of counsel, the court shall require, by
appointment if necessary, counsel for him or her regardless of his or
her wishes. The person shall, if he or she is financially able, bear
the costs of such legal service; otherwise such legal service shall be
at public expense. The person whose commitment or recommitment is
sought shall be informed of his or her right to be examined by a
licensed physician of his or her choice. If the person is unable to
obtain a licensed physician and requests examination by a physician,
the court shall employ a licensed physician.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 360 (1) A person who is gravely disabled or
presents a likelihood of serious harm as a result of a mental or
chemical dependency disorder or co-occurring mental and chemical
dependency disorders has a right to refuse antipsychotic medication
unless it is determined that the failure to medicate may result in a
likelihood of serious harm or substantial deterioration or
substantially prolong the length of involuntary commitment and there is
no less intrusive course of treatment than medication in the best
interest of that person.
(2) The physician must attempt to obtain the informed consent of an
involuntary committed person prior to administration of antipsychotic
medication and document the attempt to obtain consent in the person's
medical record with the reasons that antipsychotic medication is
necessary. If the physician determines that the patient is not able to
provide informed consent, the physician may obtain informed consent
from a person who is named as an agent in the patient's mental health
advance directive executed pursuant to chapter 71.32 RCW, provided that
the agent otherwise has authority under the directive to consent to the
proposed medication.
(3) When a person is detained pursuant to section 315 of this act,
or detained for involuntary treatment not to exceed fourteen days
pursuant to section 324 of this act, the person may refuse
antipsychotic medications unless there is an additional concurring
medical opinion following an examination of the person that the
medications are necessary pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
Medications administered under this subsection may not continue beyond
the hearing conducted pursuant to section 331 of this act and the
petitioner shall notify the court of administration of involuntary
medications under this subsection and provide the court with an opinion
regarding whether continued involuntary administration of antipsychotic
medication is medically necessary.
(4) If a person involuntarily committed pursuant to section 331(1)
of this act for up to ninety days, or for less restrictive alternative
treatment not to exceed ninety days pursuant to section 324 of this
act, refuses antipsychotic medications, the medications may not be
administered unless the person has first had a hearing by a panel
composed of a physician and two other persons. The two persons shall
be selected from among the following: A physician, advanced registered
nurse practitioner, psychologist, psychiatric nurse, physician's
assistant, and the medical director of the facility. Recognizing that
some facilities will not have three staff members of the required
expertise who are not directly involved in the person's treatment, the
panel shall be composed to the greatest extent possible of treatment
providers who are not directly involved in the person's treatment at
the time of the hearing.
(5) If a majority of the panel, including a psychiatrist if one is
on the panel or another physician in the absence of a psychiatrist,
determines that there is clear, cogent, and convincing evidence
demonstrating that treatment with antipsychotic medications is
medically appropriate, that failure to medicate may result in a
likelihood of serious harm or substantial deterioration or
substantially prolong the length of involuntary commitment, and that
there is no less intrusive course of treatment than medication in the
best interest of that person, the person may be medicated, subject to
the provisions of subsections (6) through (8) of this section.
(6) Medication ordered pursuant to a decision of the panel may only
be continued beyond seven days on an involuntary basis if the panel
conducts a second hearing on the written record and a majority of the
panel determines that there continues to be clear, cogent, and
convincing evidence demonstrating that treatment with antipsychotic
medications continues to be medically appropriate, that failure to
medicate may result in a likelihood of serious harm or substantial
deterioration or substantially prolong the length of involuntary
commitment, and that there is no less intrusive course of treatment
than medication in the best interest of that person.
(a) Following the second hearing, involuntary medication with
antipsychotic medication may be continued if the treating psychiatrist
certifies, not less than every fourteen days, that the medication
continues to be medically appropriate and failure to medicate may
result in a likelihood of serious harm or substantial deterioration or
substantially prolong the length of involuntary commitment, and that
there is no less intrusive course of treatment than medication in the
best interest of that person.
(b) No administrative order for involuntary medication may be
continued beyond one hundred eighty days, or the next commitment
proceeding in the superior court, whichever comes first.
(7) The committed person may appeal the panel's decision to the
medical director within twenty-four hours excluding weekends and
holidays and the medical director must decide the appeal within twenty-four hours of receipt.
(8) The committed person may seek judicial review of the medical
director's decision at the next commitment proceeding or by means of an
extraordinary writ.
(9) Minutes of the hearing shall be kept and a copy shall be
provided to the committed person.
(10) With regard to the involuntary medication hearing, the
committed person has the right:
(a) To notice at least twenty-four hours in advance of the hearing
that includes the intent to convene the hearing, the tentative
diagnosis and the factual basis for the diagnosis, and why the staff
believes that medication is necessary;
(b) Not to be medicated between the delivery of the notice and the
hearing;
(c) To attend the hearing;
(d) To present evidence, including witnesses, and to cross-examine
witnesses, including staff;
(e) To the assistance of a lay assistant, who is not involved in
the case and who understands psychiatric issues;
(f) To receive a copy of the minutes of the hearing; and
(g) To appeal the panel's decision to the medical director.
(11) Antipsychotic medications may be administered in an emergency
without the consent of the person pursuant to section 361 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 361 (1) A court of competent jurisdiction may
order that a person involuntarily detained, or committed for inpatient
treatment and evaluation or to treatment in a less restrictive
alternative pursuant to this chapter be administered antipsychotic
medications or the performance of electroconvulsant therapy or surgery
pursuant to the following standards and procedures:
(a) The administration of antipsychotic medication or
electroconvulsant therapy shall not be ordered by the court unless the
petitioning party proves by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that
treatment with antipsychotic medications is medically appropriate, that
failure to medicate may result in a likelihood of serious harm or
substantial deterioration or substantially prolong the length of
involuntary commitment, and that there is no less intrusive course of
treatment than medication or electroconvulsive therapy in the best
interest of the person.
(b) The court shall make specific findings of fact concerning: (i)
The existence of the likelihood of serious harm or substantial
deterioration or substantially prolonging the length of involuntary
commitment; (ii) the necessity and effectiveness of the treatment;
(iii) the person's desires regarding the proposed treatment; and (iv)
the best interests of the person.
(c) If the person is unable to make a rational and informed
decision about consenting to or refusing the proposed electroconvulsive
therapy, the court shall make a substituted judgment for the patient as
if he or she were competent to make such a determination.
(d) The person shall be present at any hearing on a request to
administer antipsychotic medication or electroconvulsant therapy filed
pursuant to this section. The person has the right:
(i) To be represented by an attorney;
(ii) To present evidence;
(iii) To cross-examine witnesses;
(iv) To have the rules of evidence enforced;
(v) To remain silent;
(vi) To view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file;
and
(vii) To be given reasonable notice and an opportunity to prepare
for the hearing.
(e) The court may appoint a psychiatrist, psychologist within their
scope of practice, or physician to examine and testify on behalf of
such person. The court shall appoint a psychiatrist, psychologist
within their scope of practice, or physician designated by such person
or the person's counsel to testify on behalf of the person in cases
where an order for electroconvulsant therapy is sought.
(f) An order for the administration of antipsychotic medications
entered following a hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall be
effective for the period of the current involuntary treatment order,
and any interim period during which the person is awaiting trial or
hearing on a new petition for involuntary treatment or involuntary
medication.
(2) Any person detained for a period of greater than ninety days
pursuant to section 331 of this act, who subsequently refuses
antipsychotic medication, shall be entitled to the procedures set forth
in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Antipsychotic medication may be administered to a nonconsenting
person detained or committed pursuant to this chapter without a court
order:
(a) Pursuant to section 360 of this act; or
(b) Under the following circumstances:
(i) A person presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm;
(ii) Medically acceptable alternatives to administration of
antipsychotic medications are not available, have not been successful,
or are not likely to be effective; and
(iii) In the opinion of the physician with responsibility for
treatment of the person, or his or her designee, the person's condition
constitutes an emergency requiring the treatment be instituted before
a judicial hearing as authorized pursuant to this section can be held.
If antipsychotic medications are administered over a person's lack
of consent pursuant to (b) of this subsection, a petition for an order
authorizing the administration of antipsychotic medications shall be
filed on the next judicial day. The hearing shall be held within two
judicial days. If deemed necessary by the physician with
responsibility for the treatment of the person, administration of
antipsychotic medications may continue until the hearing is held.
(4) No court has the authority to order psychosurgery performed on
any person involuntarily detained, treated in a less restrictive
alternative course of treatment, or committed for treatment and
evaluation pursuant to this chapter under any circumstances.
(5) A petition for involuntary medication may be joined with a
petition for involuntary treatment.

Financial Responsibility
NEW SECTION. Sec. 362 (1)(a) In addition to the responsibility
provided for by RCW 43.20B.330, any person, or his or her estate, or
his or her spouse, or the parents of a minor person who is
involuntarily detained pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of
treatment and evaluation outside of a facility maintained and operated
by the department shall be responsible for the cost of such care and
treatment.
(b) In the event that a person is unable to pay for such treatment
or in the event payment would result in a substantial hardship upon the
person or his or her family, then the county of residence of such
person shall be responsible for such costs. If it is not possible to
determine the county of residence of the person, the cost shall be
borne by the county where the person was originally detained.
(c) The department shall, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, adopt
standards as to:
(i) Inability to pay in whole or in part;
(ii) A definition of substantial hardship; and
(iii) Appropriate payment schedules. Such standards shall be
applicable to all county mental health administrative boards.
(d) Financial responsibility with respect to department services
and facilities shall continue to be as provided in RCW 43.20B.320
through 43.20B.360 and 43.20B.370.
(2) If the person has not paid or is unable to pay for treatment or
payment would result in a substantial hardship on the person or his or
her family, the program is entitled to any payment:
(a) Received by the person or to which he or she may be entitled
because of the services rendered; and
(b) From any public or private source available to the program
because of the treatment provided to the person.
(3) The department shall not refuse admission for diagnosis,
evaluation, guidance, or treatment to any applicant because it is
determined that the applicant is financially unable to contribute fully
or in part to the cost of any services.
(4)(a) The department may limit admissions of such applicants or
modify its programs in order to ensure that expenditures for services
or programs do not exceed amounts appropriated by the legislature and
are allocated by the department for such services or programs. The
department may establish admission priorities in the event that the
number of eligible applicants exceeds the limits set by the department.
(b) The department is authorized to allocate appropriated funds in
the manner that it determines best meets the purposes of this chapter.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to entitle any person to
services authorized in this chapter, or to require the department or
its contractors to reallocate funds in order to ensure that services
are available to any eligible person upon demand.

Confidentiality
NEW SECTION. Sec. 363 Except as provided in this section, RCW
71.05.445, 71.05.630, 70.96A.150, or pursuant to a valid release under
RCW 70.02.030, the fact of admission and all information and records
compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services
to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of services at public or
private agencies shall be confidential.
Information and records may be disclosed only:
(1) In communications between qualified professional persons to
meet the requirements of this chapter, in the provision of services or
appropriate referrals, or in the course of guardianship proceedings.
The consent of the person, or his or her guardian, or if the person is
a minor, his or her parent, shall be obtained before information or
records may be disclosed by a professional person employed by a
facility unless provided to a professional person:
(a) Employed by the facility;
(b) Who has medical responsibility for the patient's care;
(c) Who is a designated responder;
(d) Who is providing services under chapter 71.24 RCW;
(e) Who is employed by a state or local correctional facility where
the person is confined or supervised; or
(f) Who is providing evaluation, treatment, or follow-up services
under chapter 10.77 RCW.
(2) When the communications regard the special needs of a patient
and the necessary circumstances giving rise to such needs and the
disclosure is made by a facility providing services to the operator of
a care facility in which the patient resides.
(3)(a) When the person receiving services, or his or her guardian,
designates persons to whom information or records may be released, or
if the person is a minor, when his or her parents make such
designation.
(b) A public or private agency shall release to a patient's next of
kin, attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if
any:
(i) The information that the person is presently a patient in the
facility or that the person is seriously physically ill;
(ii) A statement evaluating the mental and physical condition of
the patient, and a statement of the probable duration of the patient's
confinement, if such information is requested by the next of kin,
attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator; and such
other information requested by the next of kin or attorney as may be
necessary to decide whether or not proceedings should be instituted to
appoint a guardian or conservator.
(4) To the extent necessary for a recipient to make a claim, or for
a claim to be made on behalf of a recipient for aid, insurance, or
medical assistance to which he or she may be entitled.
(5)(a) For either program evaluation or research, or both:
PROVIDED, That the secretary adopts rules for the conduct of the
evaluation or research, or both. Such rules shall include, but need
not be limited to, the requirement that all evaluators and researchers
must sign an oath of confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning
persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency,
or person) I, . . . . . . . . , agree not to divulge, publish, or
otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any
information obtained in the course of such evaluation or research
regarding persons who have received services such that the person who
received such services is identifiable.
I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information
may subject me to civil liability under the provisions of state law.

/s/ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the
compilation and publication of statistical data for use by government
or researchers under standards, including standards to assure
maintenance of confidentiality, set forth by the secretary of the
department of social and health services.
(6)(a) To the courts as necessary to the administration of this
chapter or to a court ordering an evaluation or treatment under chapter
10.77 RCW solely for the purpose of preventing the entry of any
evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any order
entered under this chapter.
(b) To a court or its designee in which a motion under chapter
10.77 RCW has been made for involuntary medication of a defendant for
the purpose of competency restoration.
(c) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purpose
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(7)(a) When a designated responder is requested by a representative
of a law enforcement agency, including a police officer, sheriff, a
municipal attorney, or prosecuting attorney to undertake an
investigation under section 315 of this act, the designated responder
shall, if requested to do so, advise the representative in writing of
the results of the investigation including a statement of reasons for
the decision to detain or release the person investigated. Such
written report shall be submitted within seventy-two hours of the
completion of the investigation or the request from the law enforcement
representative, whichever occurs later.
(b) To law enforcement officers, public health officers, or
personnel of the department of corrections or the indeterminate
sentence review board for persons who are the subject of the records
and who are committed to the custody or supervision of the department
of corrections or indeterminate sentence review board which information
or records are necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their
office. Except for dissemination of information released pursuant to
section 345 of this act and RCW 4.24.550, regarding persons committed
under this chapter under sections 327(3) and 331(2)(c) of this act
after dismissal of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the
extent of information that may be released is limited as follows:
(i) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, the
fact and date of discharge or release, and the last known address shall
be disclosed upon request;
(ii) The law enforcement and public health officers or personnel of
the department of corrections or indeterminate sentence review board
shall be obligated to keep such information confidential in accordance
with this chapter;
(iii) Additional information shall be disclosed only after giving
notice to said person and his or her counsel and upon a showing of
clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that such information is
necessary and that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality
are and will be maintained. However, in the event the said person has
escaped from custody, said notice prior to disclosure is not necessary
and the facility from which the person escaped shall include an
evaluation as to whether the person is of danger to persons or property
and has a propensity toward violence;
(iv) Information and records shall be disclosed to the department
of corrections pursuant to and in compliance with the provisions of RCW
71.05.445 for the purposes of completing presentence investigations or
risk assessment reports, supervision of an incarcerated offender or
offender under supervision in the community, planning for and provision
of supervision of an offender, or assessment of an offender's risk to
the community; and
(v) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(8) To the attorney of the detained person.
(9) To the prosecuting attorney as necessary to carry out the
responsibilities of the office under sections 335, 336(1)(b), and
344(2) of this act. The prosecutor shall be provided access to records
regarding the committed person's treatment and prognosis, medication,
behavior problems, and other records relevant to the issue of whether
treatment less restrictive than inpatient treatment is in the best
interest of the committed person or others. Information shall be
disclosed only after giving notice to the committed person and the
person's counsel.
(10) To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person, when
the identity of the person is known to the public or private agency,
whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is known to have
been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may designate a
representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure shall be made
by the professional person in charge of the public or private agency or
his or her designee and shall include the dates of commitment,
admission, discharge, or release, authorized or unauthorized absence
from the agency's facility, and only such other information that is
pertinent to the threat or harassment. The decision to disclose or not
shall not result in civil liability for the agency or its employees so
long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross
negligence.
(11) To appropriate corrections and law enforcement agencies all
necessary and relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent
situation that poses a significant and imminent risk to the public.
The decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for
the mental health service provider or its employees so long as the
decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence.
(12) To the persons designated in section 345 of this act for the
purposes described in that section.
(13) Civil liability and immunity for the release of information
about a particular person who is committed to the department under
sections 327(3) and 331(2)(c) of this act after dismissal of a sex
offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, is governed by RCW 4.24.550.
(14) Upon the death of a patient, his or her parent if the patient
is a minor, his or her next of kin, personal representative, guardian,
or conservator, if any, shall be notified.
Next of kin who are of legal age and competent shall be notified
under this section in the following order: Spouse, parents, children,
brothers and sisters, and other relatives according to the degree of
relation. Access to all records and information compiled, obtained, or
maintained in the course of providing services to a deceased patient
shall be governed by RCW 70.02.140.
(15) To the department of health for the purposes of determining
compliance with state or federal licensure, certification, or
registration rules or laws. However, the information and records
obtained under this subsection are exempt from public inspection and
copying pursuant to chapter 42.17 RCW.
(16) To mark headstones or otherwise memorialize patients interred
at state hospital cemeteries. The department of social and health
services shall make available the name, date of birth, and date of
death of patients buried in state hospital cemeteries fifty years after
the death of a patient.
(17) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the uniform
health care information act, chapter 70.02 RCW, applies to all records
and information compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of
providing services.
(18) When a person would otherwise be subject to the provisions of
this section and disclosure is necessary for the protection of the
person or others due to his or her unauthorized disappearance from the
facility, and his or her whereabouts is unknown, notice of such
disappearance, along with relevant information, may be made to
relatives and governmental law enforcement agencies designated by the
physician in charge of the person or the professional person in charge
of the facility, or his or her professional designee.
(19) The fact of admission, as well as all records, files,
evidence, findings, or orders made, prepared, collected, or maintained
pursuant to this chapter shall not be admissible as evidence in any
legal proceeding outside this chapter without the written consent of
the person who was the subject of the proceeding except in a subsequent
criminal prosecution of a person committed pursuant to sections 327(3)
and 331(2)(c) of this act on charges that were dismissed pursuant to
chapter 10.77 RCW due to incompetency to stand trial or in a civil
commitment proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW. The records and
files maintained in any court proceeding pursuant to this chapter shall
be confidential and available subsequent to such proceedings only to
the person who was the subject of the proceeding or his or her
attorney. In addition, the court may order the subsequent release or
use of such records or files only upon good cause shown if the court
finds that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality are and
will be maintained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 364 Except as provided in section 345 of this
act, when any disclosure of information or records is made as
authorized by sections 363 through 368 of this act, or pursuant to RCW
71.05.390 or 70.96A.150, the physician in charge of the patient or the
professional person in charge of the facility shall promptly cause to
be entered into the patient's medical record the date and circumstances
under which said disclosure was made, the names and relationships to
the patient, if any, of the persons or agencies to whom such disclosure
was made, and the information disclosed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 365 The files and records of court proceedings
under this chapter, chapters 71.05, 70.96A, 71.34, and 70.-- (sections
202 through 216 of this act) RCW shall be closed but shall be
accessible to any person who is the subject of a petition and to the
person's attorney, guardian ad litem, resource management services, or
service providers authorized to receive such information by resource
management services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 366 (1) Except as otherwise provided by law,
all treatment records shall remain confidential and may be released
only to the persons designated in this section, or to other persons
designated in an informed written consent of the patient.
(2) Treatment records of a person may be released without informed
written consent in the following circumstances:
(a) To a person, organization, or agency as necessary for
management or financial audits, or program monitoring and evaluation.
Information obtained under this subsection shall remain confidential
and may not be used in a manner that discloses the name or other
identifying information about the person whose records are being
released.
(b) To the department, the director of regional support networks,
or a qualified staff member designated by the director only when
necessary to be used for billing or collection purposes. The
information shall remain confidential.
(c) For purposes of research as permitted in chapter 42.48 RCW.
(d) Pursuant to lawful order of a court.
(e) To qualified staff members of the department, to the director
of regional support networks, to resource management services
responsible for serving a patient, or to service providers designated
by resource management services as necessary to determine the progress
and adequacy of treatment and to determine whether the person should be
transferred to a less restrictive or more appropriate treatment
modality or facility. The information shall remain confidential.
(f) Within the treatment facility where the patient is receiving
treatment, confidential information may be disclosed to persons
employed, serving in bona fide training programs, or participating in
supervised volunteer programs, at the facility when it is necessary to
perform their duties.
(g) Within the department as necessary to coordinate treatment for
mental illness, developmental disabilities, alcoholism, or drug abuse
of persons who are under the supervision of the department.
(h) To a licensed physician who has determined that the life or
health of the person is in danger and that treatment without the
information contained in the treatment records could be injurious to
the patient's health. Disclosure shall be limited to the portions of
the records necessary to meet the medical emergency.
(i) To a facility that is to receive a person who is involuntarily
committed under this chapter or upon transfer of the person from one
treatment facility to another. The release of records under this
subsection shall be limited to the treatment records required by law,
a record or summary of all somatic treatments, and a discharge summary.
The discharge summary may include a statement of the patient's problem,
the treatment goals, the type of treatment which has been provided, and
recommendation for future treatment, but may not include the patient's
complete treatment record.
(j) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 363(7) of this act,
to a correctional facility or a corrections officer who is responsible
for the supervision of a person who is receiving inpatient or
outpatient evaluation or treatment. Except as provided in RCW
71.05.445 and 71.34.225, release of records under this section is
limited to:
(i) An evaluation report provided pursuant to a written supervision
plan.
(ii) The discharge summary, including a record or summary of all
somatic treatments, at the termination of any treatment provided as
part of the supervision plan.
(iii) When a person is returned from a treatment facility to a
correctional facility, the information provided under (j)(iv) of this
subsection.
(iv) Any information necessary to establish or implement changes in
the person's treatment plan or the level or kind of supervision as
determined by resource management services. In cases involving a
person transferred back to a correctional facility, disclosure shall be
made to clinical staff only.
(k) To the person's counsel or guardian ad litem, without
modification, at any time in order to prepare for involuntary
commitment or recommitment proceedings, reexaminations, appeals, or
other actions relating to detention, admission, commitment, or
patient's rights under chapter 71.05 RCW.
(l) To staff members of the protection and advocacy agency or to
staff members of a private, nonprofit corporation for the purpose of
protecting and advocating the rights of persons with mental or chemical
dependency disorders, or both, or developmental disabilities. Resource
management services may limit the release of information to the name,
birthdate, and county of residence of the patient, information
regarding whether the patient was voluntarily admitted, or
involuntarily committed, the date and place of admission, placement, or
commitment, the name and address of a guardian of the patient, and the
date and place of the guardian's appointment. Any staff member who
wishes to obtain additional information shall notify the patient's
resource management services in writing of the request and of the
resource management services' right to object. The staff member shall
send the notice by mail to the guardian's address. If the guardian
does not object in writing within fifteen days after the notice is
mailed, the staff member may obtain the additional information. If the
guardian objects in writing within fifteen days after the notice is
mailed, the staff member may not obtain the additional information.
(3) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the
release of information contained in the treatment records of any
patient who receives treatment for chemical dependency, the department
may restrict the release of the information as necessary to comply with
federal law and regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 367 (1) Procedures shall be established by
resource management services to provide reasonable and timely access to
individual treatment records. However, access may not be denied at any
time to records of all medications and somatic treatments received by
the person.
(2) Following discharge, the person shall have a right to a
complete record of all medications and somatic treatments prescribed
during evaluation, admission, or commitment and to a copy of the
discharge summary prepared at the time of his or her discharge. A
reasonable and uniform charge for reproduction may be assessed.
(3) Treatment records may be modified prior to inspection to
protect the confidentiality of other patients or the names of any other
persons referred to in the record who gave information on the condition
that his or her identity remain confidential. Entire documents may not
be withheld to protect such confidentiality.
(4) At the time of discharge all persons shall be informed by
resource management services of their rights as provided in sections
363 through 368 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 368 Nothing in this chapter, chapter 70.96A,
71.05, 71.34, or 70.-- (sections 202 through 216 of this act) RCW shall
be construed to interfere with communications between physicians or
psychologists and patients and attorneys and clients.

Liability
NEW SECTION. Sec. 369 (1) Neither the state nor any officer of
a public or private agency; superintendent, professional person in
charge or his or her professional designee, or attending staff of any
such agency; public official performing functions necessary to the
administration of this chapter; peace officer; designated responder; a
unit of local government; or certified facility shall be civilly or
criminally liable for performing duties pursuant to this chapter with
regard to the decision of whether to admit, discharge, release,
administer antipsychotic medications, or detain a person for evaluation
and treatment: PROVIDED, That such duties were performed in good faith
and without gross negligence.
(2) This section does not relieve a person from giving the required
notices under this chapter or chapter 70.96A, 71.05, 71.34, or 70.--(sections 202 through 216 of this act), or the duty to warn or to take
reasonable precautions to provide protection from violent behavior
where the patient has communicated an actual threat of physical
violence against a reasonably identifiable victim or victims. The duty
to warn or to take reasonable precautions to provide protection from
violent behavior is discharged if reasonable efforts are made to
communicate the threat to the victim or victims and to law enforcement
personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 370 Except as provided in RCW 4.24.550, any
person may bring an action against a person who has willfully released
confidential information or records concerning him or her in violation
of the provisions of this chapter, for the greater of the following
amounts:
(1) One thousand dollars; or
(2) Three times the amount of actual damages sustained, if any. It
shall not be a prerequisite to recovery under this section that the
plaintiff shall have suffered or be threatened with special, as
contrasted with general, damages.
Any person may bring an action to enjoin the release of
confidential information or records concerning him or her or his or her
ward, in violation of the provisions of this chapter, and may in the
same action seek damages as provided in this section.
The court may award to the plaintiff, should he or she prevail in
an action authorized by this section, reasonable attorney fees in
addition to those otherwise provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 371 Any person making or filing an application
alleging that a person should be involuntarily detained, certified,
committed, treated, or evaluated pursuant to this chapter shall not be
rendered civilly or criminally liable where the making and filing of
such application was in good faith.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 372 Any person who knowingly, willfully, or
through gross negligence violates the provisions of this chapter by
detaining a person for more than the allowable number of days shall be
liable to the person detained in civil damages. It shall not be a
prerequisite to an action under this section that the plaintiff shall
have suffered or be threatened with special, as contrasted with general
damages.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 373 Any person who requests or obtains
confidential information pursuant to sections 363 through 368 of this
act under false pretenses shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 374 The provisions of RCW 71.05.025,
71.05.530, and 71.05.550 apply to this chapter.

PART IV
TREATMENT GAP
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 70.96A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The division of alcohol and substance abuse shall increase its
capacity to serve adults who meet chemical dependency treatment
criteria and who are enrolled in medicaid as follows:
(a) In fiscal year 2006, the division of alcohol and substance
abuse shall serve forty percent of the calculated need; and
(b) In fiscal year 2007, the division of alcohol and substance
abuse shall serve sixty percent of the calculated need.
(2) The division of alcohol and substance abuse shall increase its
capacity to serve minors who have passed their twelfth birthday and who
are not yet eighteen, who are under two hundred percent of the federal
poverty level as follows:
(a) In fiscal year 2006, the division of alcohol and substance
abuse shall serve forty percent of the calculated need; and
(b) In fiscal year 2007, the division of alcohol and substance
abuse shall serve sixty percent of the calculated need.
(3) For purposes of this section, "calculated need" means the
percentage of the population under two hundred percent of the federal
poverty level in need of chemical dependency services as determined in
the 2003 Washington state needs assessment study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to chapter 70.96A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Not later than January 1, 2007, all persons providing treatment
under this chapter shall also implement the integrated comprehensive
screening and assessment process for chemical dependency and mental
disorders adopted pursuant to section 701 of this act and shall
document the numbers of clients with co-occurring mental and substance
abuse disorders based on a quadrant system of low and high needs.
(2) Treatment providers contracted to provide treatment under this
chapter who fail to implement the integrated comprehensive screening
and assessment process for chemical dependency and mental disorders by
July 1, 2007, are subject to contractual penalties established under
section 701 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 A new section is added to chapter 13.34
RCW to read as follows:
The department of social and health services and the department of
health shall develop and expand comprehensive services for drug-affected and alcohol-affected mothers and infants. Subject to funds
appropriated for this purpose, the expansion shall be in evidence-based, research-based, or consensus-based practices, as those terms are
defined in section 703 of this act, and shall expand capacity in
underserved regions of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 A new section is added to chapter 70.96A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall assess the availability and cost-effectiveness of converting disused skilled nursing facilities to
inpatient or residential chemical dependency or mental health treatment
facilities.
(2) The assessment shall include:
(a) An assessment of the impact of the federal institutions of
mental disease exclusion for purposes of medicaid eligibility;
(b) The viability and cost-effectiveness of contracting with
private, nonprofit entities to operate state-owned facilities and the
difference in rates that would engender;
(c) The viability and cost-effectiveness of leasing state-owned
facilities at market rate to private, nonprofit entities;
(d) The estimated time to operation for these facilities.
(3) The department shall provide the appropriate committees of the
legislature with this assessment, not later than September 1, 2005.
(4) To the extent that the assessment demonstrates that conversion
of disused skilled nursing facilities is consistent with the purposes
of this section and capital funds are appropriated for this purpose,
the secretary may acquire and convert such facilities and enter
contracts with private, nonprofit entities to operate them, provided
that rates are set in such a manner that no private, nonprofit entity
receives an effectively higher rate than a comparable vendor that
leases or owns its own facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 A new section is added to chapter 70.96A
RCW to read as follows:
A petition for commitment under this chapter may be joined with a
petition for commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 A new section is added to chapter 70.96A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall contract for
chemical dependency specialist services at each division of children
and family services office to enhance the timeliness and quality of
child protective services assessments and to better connect families to
needed treatment services.
(2) The chemical dependency specialist's duties may include, but
are not limited to: Conducting on-site chemical dependency screening
and assessment, facilitating progress reports to department social
workers, in-service training of department social workers and staff on
substance abuse issues, referring clients from the department to
treatment providers, and providing consultation on cases to department
social workers.
(3) The department of social and health services shall provide
training in and ensure that each case-carrying social worker is trained
in uniform screening for mental health and chemical dependency.

PART V
RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 Sections 502 through 525 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 The legislature finds that there are
persons with mental disorders, including organic or traumatic brain
disorders, and combinations of mental disorders with other medical
conditions or behavior histories that result in behavioral and security
issues that make these persons ineligible for, or unsuccessful in,
existing types of licensed facilities, including adult residential
rehabilitation centers, boarding homes, adult family homes, group
homes, and skilled nursing facilities. The legislature also finds that
many of these persons have been treated on repeated occasions in
inappropriate acute care facilities and released without an appropriate
placement or have been treated or detained for extended periods in
inappropriate settings including state hospitals and correctional
facilities. The legislature further finds that some of these persons
present complex safety and treatment issues that require security
measures that cannot be instituted under most facility licenses or
supported housing programs. These include the ability to detain
persons under involuntary treatment orders or administer court ordered
medications.
Consequently, the legislature intends to establish a new type of
facility licensed by the department of social and health services as an
enhanced services facility with standards that will provide a safe,
secure treatment environment for a limited population of persons who
are not appropriately served in other facilities or programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily
used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with
thought disorders, which includes but is not limited to atypical
antipsychotic medications.
(2) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or
private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a
patient.
(3) "Chemical dependency" means alcoholism, drug addiction, or
dependence on alcohol and one or more other psychoactive chemicals, as
the context requires and as those terms are defined in chapter 70.96A
RCW.
(4) "Chemical dependency professional" means a person certified as
a chemical dependency professional by the department of health under
chapter 18.205 RCW.
(5) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that an
individual should be detained for a period of either evaluation or
treatment, or both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting.
(6) "Conditional release" means a modification of a commitment that
may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms.
(7) "Custody" means involuntary detention under chapter 71.05,
70.96A, or 70.-- (sections 302 through 374 of this act) RCW,
uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment
from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment.
(8) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(9) "Designated responder" means a county designated mental health
professional, a designated chemical dependency specialist, or a
designated crisis responder as those terms are defined in chapter
70.96A, 71.05, 70.-- (sections 202 through 216 of this act), or 70.--(sections 302 through 374 of this act) RCW.
(10) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of an
individual under chapter 70.96A, 71.05, or 70.-- (sections 302 through
374 of this act) RCW.
(11) "Discharge" means the termination of facility authority. The
commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court
order.
(12) "Enhanced services facility" means a facility that provides
treatment and services to persons for whom acute inpatient treatment is
not medically necessary and who have been determined by the department
to be inappropriate for placement in other licensed facilities due to
the complex needs that result in behavioral and security issues.
(13) "Expanded community services program" means a nonsecure
program of enhanced behavioral and residential support provided to
long-term and residential care providers serving specifically eligible
clients who would otherwise be at risk for hospitalization at state
hospital geriatric units.
(14) "Facility" means an enhanced services facility.
(15) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which an individual,
as a result of a mental disorder, as a result of the use of alcohol or
other psychoactive chemicals, or both:
(a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure
to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or
(b) Manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced
by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over
his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for
his or her health or safety.
(16) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of
time ten years before the filing of a petition under this chapter, or
chapter 70.96A or 71.05 RCW, excluding any time spent, but not any
violent acts committed, in a mental health facility or a long-term
alcoholism or drug treatment facility, or in confinement as a result of
a criminal conviction.
(17) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice
medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of
Washington.
(18) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:
(a) A substantial risk that:
(i) Physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon his or
her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide
or inflict physical harm on oneself;
(ii) Physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon another,
as evidenced by behavior that has caused such harm or that places
another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm;
or
(iii) Physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon the
property of others, as evidenced by behavior that has caused
substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or
(b) The individual has threatened the physical safety of another
and has a history of one or more violent acts.
(19) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional
impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's
cognitive or volitional functions.
(20) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist,
psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other
mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the
secretary under the authority of chapter 71.05 RCW.
(21) "Professional person" means a mental health professional and
also means a physician, registered nurse, and such others as may be
defined in rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter.
(22) "Psychiatric nurse" means:
(a) A registered nurse who has a bachelor's degree from an
accredited college or university and who has had, in addition, at least
two years of experience in the direct treatment of mentally ill or
emotionally disturbed persons under the supervision of a mental health
professional; or
(b) Any other registered nurse who has three years of such
experience.
(23) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician
and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of
graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American
medical association or the American osteopathic association and is
certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of
psychiatry and neurology.
(24) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a
psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.
(25) "Registration records" include all the records of the
department, regional support networks, treatment facilities, and other
persons providing services to the department, county departments, or
facilities which identify individuals who are receiving or who at any
time have received services for mental illness.
(26) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under
chapter 70.96A, 71.05, or 70.-- (sections 302 through 374 of this act)
RCW.
(27) "Resident" means a person admitted to an enhanced services
facility.
(28) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or the
secretary's designee.
(29) "Significant change" means:
(a) A deterioration in a resident's physical, mental, or
psychosocial condition that has caused or is likely to cause clinical
complications or life-threatening conditions; or
(b) An improvement in the resident's physical, mental, or
psychosocial condition that may make the resident eligible for release
or for treatment in a less intensive or less secure setting.
(30) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further
advanced degree from an accredited school of social work or a degree
deemed equivalent under rules adopted by the secretary.
(31) "Treatment" means the broad range of emergency,
detoxification, residential, inpatient, and outpatient services and
care, including diagnostic evaluation, mental health or chemical
dependency education and counseling, medical, psychiatric,
psychological, and social service care, vocational rehabilitation, and
career counseling, which may be extended to persons with mental
disorders, chemical dependency disorders, or both, and their families.
(32) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records
concerning individuals who are receiving or who at any time have
received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the
department, by regional support networks and their staffs, and by
treatment facilities. "Treatment records" do not include notes or
records maintained for personal use by an individual providing
treatment services for the department, regional support networks, or a
treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.
(33) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide,
attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to
property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 A facility shall honor a mental health
advance directive that was validly executed pursuant to chapter 71.32
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 (1) A person who is eligible for admission
to or residence in an adult residential rehabilitation center, a
boarding home, a group home, a skilled nursing facility, or a supported
housing program, including an expanded community services program or a
program for assertive community treatment is not eligible for residence
in an enhanced services facility unless his or her treatment needs
cannot adequately be addressed in the other facility or facilities for
which he or she is eligible.
(2) A person, eighteen years old or older, may be admitted to an
enhanced services facility if he or she meets the criteria in (a)
through (c) of this subsection:
(a) The person requires: (i) Daily care by or under the
supervision of a mental health professional, chemical dependency
professional, or nurse; or (ii) assistance with three or more
activities of daily living; and
(b) The person has: (i) A mental disorder, chemical dependency
disorder, or both; (ii) an organic or traumatic brain injury; or (iii)
a cognitive impairment that results in symptoms or behaviors requiring
supervision and facility services;
(c) The person has two or more of the following:
(i) Self-endangering behaviors that are frequent or difficult to
manage;
(ii) Aggressive, threatening, or assaultive behaviors that create
a risk to the health or safety of other residents or staff, or a
significant risk to property and these behaviors are frequent or
difficult to manage;
(iii) Intrusive behaviors that put residents or staff at risk;
(iv) Complex medication needs and those needs include psychotropic
medications;
(v) A history of or likelihood of unsuccessful placements in other
licensed facilities or a history of rejected applications for admission
to other licensed facilities based on the person's behaviors, history,
or security needs;
(vi) A history of frequent or protracted mental health
hospitalizations;
(vii) A history of offenses against a person or felony offenses
that created substantial damage to property;
(viii) A history of other problematic placements, as defined in
rules adopted by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 (1)(a) Every person who is a resident of
an enhanced services facility or is involuntarily detained or committed
under the provisions of this chapter shall be entitled to all the
rights set forth in this chapter, or chapter 71.05, 70.96A, or 70.--(sections 302 through 374 of this act) RCW and shall retain all rights
not denied him or her under these chapters.
(b) No person shall be presumed incompetent as a consequence of
receiving an evaluation or voluntary or involuntary treatment for a
mental disorder, chemical dependency disorder, or both, under this
chapter, chapter 71.05, 70.96A, or 70.-- (sections 302 through 374 of
this act) RCW, or any prior laws of this state dealing with mental
illness. Competency shall not be determined or withdrawn except under
the provisions of chapter 10.77 or 11.88 RCW.
(c) Every resident of an enhanced services facility shall be given
a written statement setting forth the substance of this section.
(2) Every resident of an enhanced services facility shall have the
right to adequate care and individualized treatment.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to deny
to any person treatment by spiritual means through prayer in accordance
with the tenets and practices of a church or religious denomination.
(4) Persons receiving evaluation or treatment under this chapter
shall be given a reasonable choice of an available physician or other
professional person qualified to provide such services.
(5) The physician-patient privilege or the psychologist-client
privilege shall be deemed waived in proceedings under this chapter
relating to the administration of antipsychotic medications. As to
other proceedings under chapter 10.77, 70.96A, 71.05, or 70.--(sections 302 through 374 of this act) RCW, the privileges shall be
waived when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion
determines that such waiver is necessary to protect either the detained
person or the public.
(6) Insofar as danger to the person or others is not created, each
resident of an enhanced services facility shall have, in addition to
other rights not specifically withheld by law, the following rights, a
list of which shall be prominently posted in all facilities,
institutions, and hospitals providing such services:
(a) To wear his or her own clothes and to keep and use his or her
own personal possessions, except when deprivation of same is essential
to protect the safety of the resident or other persons;
(b) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of his or her
own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;
(c) To have access to individual storage space for his or her
private use;
(d) To have visitors at reasonable times;
(e) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and
receive confidential calls, consistent with an effective treatment
program;
(f) To have ready access to letter writing materials, including
stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the
mails;
(g) Not to consent to the administration of antipsychotic
medications beyond the hearing conducted pursuant to section 108, 109,
360, or 361 of this act, or the performance of electroconvulsant
therapy, or surgery, except emergency life-saving surgery, unless
ordered by a court under section 109 or 361 of this act;
(h) To discuss treatment plans and decisions with professional
persons;
(i) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any
circumstances;
(j) To dispose of property and sign contracts unless such person
has been adjudicated an incompetent in a court proceeding directed to
that particular issue.
(7) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit a resident
from petitioning by writ of habeas corpus for release.
(8) Nothing in this section permits any person to knowingly violate
a no-contact order or a condition of an active judgment and sentence or
active supervision by the department of corrections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 A person who is gravely disabled or
presents a likelihood of serious harm as a result of a mental or
chemical dependency disorder or co-occurring mental and chemical
dependency disorders has a right to refuse antipsychotic medication.
Antipsychotic medication may be administered over the person's
objections only pursuant to RCW 71.05.215, 71.05.370 (as recodified by
this act), or section 360 or 361 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 (1)(a) The department shall not license an
enhanced services facility that serves any residents under sixty-five
years of age for a capacity to exceed sixteen residents.
(b) The department may contract for services for the operation of
enhanced services facilities only to the extent that funds are
specifically provided for that purpose.
(2) The facility shall provide an appropriate level of security for
the characteristics, behaviors, and legal status of the residents.
(3) An enhanced services facility may hold only one license but, to
the extent permitted under state and federal law and medicaid
requirements, a facility may be located in the same building as another
licensed facility, provided that:
(a) The enhanced services facility is in a location that is totally
separate and discrete from the other licensed facility; and
(b) The two facilities maintain separate staffing, unless an
exception to this is permitted by the department in rule.
(4) Enhanced services facilities must meet all applicable state and
local rules, regulations, permits, and code requirements. The
secretary may, by rule, establish a list of currently licensed
facilities that are deemed to meet the requirements of this subsection
by virtue of their existing license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 (1) The enhanced services facility shall
complete a comprehensive assessment for each resident within fourteen
days of admission, and the assessments shall be repeated upon a
significant change in the resident's condition or, at a minimum, every
one hundred eighty days if there is no significant change in condition.
(2) The enhanced services facility shall develop an individualized
treatment plan for each resident based on the comprehensive assessment
and any other information in the person's record. The plan shall be
updated as necessary and shall include a plan for appropriate transfer
or discharge. Where the person is under the supervision of the
department of corrections, the facility shall collaborate with the
department of corrections to maximize treatment outcomes and reduce the
likelihood of reoffense.
(3) The plan shall maximize the opportunities for independence,
recovery, employment, the resident's participation in treatment
decisions, and collaboration with peer-supported services, and provide
for care and treatment in the least restrictive manner appropriate to
the individual resident, and, where relevant, to any court orders with
which the resident must comply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510 (1) An enhanced services facility must
have sufficient numbers of staff with the appropriate credentials and
training to provide residents with the appropriate care and treatment:
(a) Mental health and chemical dependency treatment;
(b) Medication services;
(c) Assistance with the activities of daily living;
(d) Medical or habilitative treatment;
(e) Dietary services; and
(f) Security.
(2) Where an enhanced services facility specializes in medically
fragile persons with mental disorders, the on-site staff must include
at least one licensed nurse twenty-four hours per day. The nurse must
be a registered nurse for at least sixteen hours per day. If the nurse
is not a registered nurse, a registered nurse or a doctor must be on-call during the remaining eight hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511 This chapter does not apply to the
following residential facilities:
(1) Nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW;
(2) Boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW;
(3) Adult family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW;
(4) Facilities approved and certified under chapter 71A.22 RCW;
(5) Residential treatment facilities licensed under chapter 71.12
RCW; and
(6) Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512 (1) The department shall establish
licensing provisions for enhanced services facilities to serve the
populations defined in this chapter.
(2) No person or public or private agency may operate or maintain
an enhanced services facility without a license, which must be renewed
annually.
(3) A licensee shall have the following readily accessible and
available for review by the department, residents, families of
residents, and the public:
(a) Its license to operate and a copy of the department's most
recent inspection report and any recent complaint investigation reports
issued by the department;
(b) Its written policies and procedures for all treatment, care,
and services provided directly or indirectly by the facility; and
(c) The department's toll-free complaint number, which shall also
be posted in a clearly visible place and manner.
(4) No facility shall discriminate or retaliate in any manner
against a resident or employee because the resident, employee, or any
other person made a complaint or provided information to the
department, the long-term care ombudsman, or a mental health ombuds
person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513 (1) In any case in which the department
finds that a licensee of a facility, or any partner, officer, director,
owner of five percent or more of the assets of the facility, or
managing employee failed or refused to comply with the requirements of
this chapter or the rules established under them, the department may
take any or all of the following actions:
(a) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew a license;
(b) Order stop placement; or
(c) Assess civil monetary penalties.
(2) The department may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a
license, assess civil monetary penalties, or both, in any case in which
it finds that the licensee of a facility, or any partner, officer,
director, owner of five percent or more of the assets of the facility,
or managing employee:
(a) Operated a facility without a license or under a revoked or
suspended license;
(b) Knowingly or with reason to know made a false statement of a
material fact in the license application or any data attached thereto,
or in any matter under investigation by the department;
(c) Refused to allow representatives or agents of the department to
inspect all books, records, and files required to be maintained or any
portion of the premises of the facility;
(d) Willfully prevented, interfered with, or attempted to impede in
any way the work of any duly authorized representative of the
department and the lawful enforcement of any provision of this chapter;
(e) Willfully prevented or interfered with any representative of
the department in the preservation of evidence of any violation of any
of the provisions of this chapter or of the rules adopted under it; or
(f) Failed to pay any civil monetary penalty assessed by the
department under this chapter within ten days after the assessment
becomes final.
(3)(a) Civil penalties collected under this chapter shall be
deposited into a special fund administered by the department.
(b) Civil monetary penalties, if imposed, may be assessed and
collected, with interest, for each day the facility is or was out of
compliance. Civil monetary penalties shall not exceed three thousand
dollars per day. Each day upon which the same or a substantially
similar action occurs is a separate violation subject to the assessment
of a separate penalty.
(4) The department, through the director of residential care
services, may use the civil penalty monetary fund for the protection of
the health or property of residents of facilities found to be deficient
including:
(a) Payment for the cost of relocation of residents to other
facilities;
(b) Payment to maintain operation of a facility pending correction
of deficiencies or closure; and
(c) Reimbursement of a resident for personal funds or property
loss.
(5)(a) The department may issue a stop placement order on a
facility, effective upon oral or written notice, when the department
determines:
(i) The facility no longer substantially meets the requirements of
this chapter; and
(ii) The deficiency or deficiencies in the facility:
(A) Jeopardizes the health and safety of the residents; or
(B) Seriously limits the facility's capacity to provide adequate
care.
(b) When the department has ordered a stop placement, the
department may approve a readmission to the facility from a hospital,
residential treatment facility, or crisis intervention facility when
the department determines the readmission would be in the best interest
of the individual seeking readmission.
(6) If the department determines that an emergency exists and
resident health and safety is immediately jeopardized as a result of a
facility's failure or refusal to comply with this chapter, the
department may summarily suspend the facility's license and order the
immediate closure of the facility, or the immediate transfer of
residents, or both.
(7) If the department determines that the health or safety of the
residents is immediately jeopardized as a result of a facility's
failure or refusal to comply with requirements of this chapter, the
department may appoint temporary management to:
(a) Oversee the operation of the facility; and
(b) Ensure the health and safety of the facility's residents while:
(i) Orderly closure of the facility occurs; or
(ii) The deficiencies necessitating temporary management are
corrected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514 (1) All orders of the department denying,
suspending, or revoking the license or assessing a monetary penalty
shall become final twenty days after the same has been served upon the
applicant or licensee unless a hearing is requested.
(2) All orders of the department imposing stop placement, temporary
management, emergency closure, emergency transfer, or summary license
suspension shall be effective immediately upon notice, pending any
hearing.
(3) Subject to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section,
all hearings under this chapter and judicial review of such
determinations shall be in accordance with the administrative procedure
act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 Operation of a facility without a license
in violation of this chapter and discrimination against medicaid
recipients are unfair or deceptive acts in trade or commerce and an
unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516 A person operating or maintaining a
facility without a license under this chapter is guilty of a
misdemeanor and each day of a continuing violation after conviction
shall be considered a separate offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517 Notwithstanding the existence or use of
any other remedy, the department may, in the manner provided by law,
maintain an action in the name of the state for an injunction, civil
penalty, or other process against a person to restrain or prevent the
operation or maintenance of a facility without a license issued under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 518 (1) The department shall make or cause to
be made at least one inspection of each facility prior to licensure and
an unannounced full inspection of facilities at least once every
eighteen months. The statewide average interval between full facility
inspections must be fifteen months.
(2) Any duly authorized officer, employee, or agent of the
department may enter and inspect any facility at any time to determine
that the facility is in compliance with this chapter and applicable
rules, and to enforce any provision of this chapter. Complaint
inspections shall be unannounced and conducted in such a manner as to
ensure maximum effectiveness. No advance notice shall be given of any
inspection unless authorized or required by federal law.
(3) During inspections, the facility must give the department
access to areas, materials, and equipment used to provide care or
support to residents, including resident and staff records, accounts,
and the physical premises, including the buildings, grounds, and
equipment. The department has the authority to privately interview the
provider, staff, residents, and other individuals familiar with
resident care and treatment.
(4) Any public employee giving advance notice of an inspection in
violation of this section shall be suspended from all duties without
pay for a period of not less than five nor more than fifteen days.
(5) The department shall prepare a written report describing the
violations found during an inspection, and shall provide a copy of the
inspection report to the facility.
(6) The facility shall develop a written plan of correction for any
violations identified by the department and provide a plan of
correction to the department within ten working days from the receipt
of the inspection report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 519 The facility shall only admit individuals:
(1) Who are over the age of eighteen;
(2) Who meet the resident eligibility requirements described in
section 505 of this act; and
(3) Whose needs the facility can safely and appropriately meet
through qualified and trained staff, services, equipment, security, and
building design.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 520 If the facility does not employ a
qualified professional able to furnish needed services, the facility
must have a written contract with a qualified professional or agency
outside the facility to furnish the needed services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 521 At least sixty days before the effective
date of any change of ownership, or change of management of a facility,
the current operating entity must provide written notification about
the proposed change separately and in writing, to the department, each
resident of the facility, or the resident's guardian or representative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 522 The facility shall:
(1) Maintain adequate resident records to enable the provision of
necessary treatment, care, and services and to respond appropriately in
emergency situations;
(2) Comply with all state and federal requirements related to
documentation, confidentiality, and information sharing, including
chapters 10.77, 70.02, 70.24, 70.96A, 71.05, and 70.-- (sections 302
through 374 of this act) RCW; and
(3) Where possible, obtain signed releases of information
designating the department, the facility, and the department of
corrections where the person is under its supervision, as recipients of
health care information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 523 (1) Standards for fire protection and the
enforcement thereof, with respect to all facilities licensed under this
chapter, are the responsibility of the chief of the Washington state
patrol, through the director of fire protection, who must adopt
recognized standards as applicable to facilities for the protection of
life against the cause and spread of fire and fire hazards. If the
facility to be licensed meets with the approval of the chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, the
director of fire protection must submit to the department a written
report approving the facility with respect to fire protection before a
full license can be issued. The chief of the Washington state patrol,
through the director of fire protection, shall conduct an unannounced
full inspection of facilities at least once every eighteen months. The
statewide average interval between full facility inspections must be
fifteen months.
(2) Inspections of facilities by local authorities must be
consistent with the requirements adopted by the chief of the Washington
state patrol, through the director of fire protection. Findings of a
serious nature must be coordinated with the department and the chief of
the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection,
for determination of appropriate actions to ensure a safe environment
for residents. The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the
director of fire protection, has exclusive authority to determine
appropriate corrective action under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 524 No facility providing care and treatment
for individuals placed in a facility, acting in the course of its
duties, shall be civilly or criminally liable for performing its duties
under this chapter, provided that such duties were performed in good
faith and without gross negligence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 525 The secretary shall adopt rules to
implement this chapter.

PART VI

FORENSIC AND CORRECTIONAL

Drug and Mental Health Courts
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 A new section is added to chapter 2.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Counties may establish and operate mental health courts.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "mental health court" means
a court that has special calendars or dockets designed to achieve a
reduction in recidivism and symptoms of mental illness among
nonviolent, mentally ill felony and nonfelony offenders by increasing
their likelihood for successful rehabilitation through early,
continuous, and intense judicially supervised treatment including drug
treatment for persons with co-occurring disorders; mandatory periodic
reviews, including drug testing if indicated; and the use of
appropriate sanctions and other rehabilitation services.
(3)(a) Any jurisdiction that seeks a state appropriation to fund a
mental health court program must first:
(i) Exhaust all federal funding that is available to support the
operations of its mental health court and associated services; and
(ii) Match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state moneys allocated
for mental health court programs with local cash or in-kind resources.
Moneys allocated by the state must be used to supplement, not supplant,
other federal, state, and local funds for mental health court
operations and associated services.
(b) Any county that establishes a mental health court pursuant to
this section shall establish minimum requirements for the participation
of offenders in the program. The mental health court may adopt local
requirements that are more stringent than the minimum. The minimum
requirements are:
(i) The offender would benefit from psychiatric treatment;
(ii) The offender has not previously been convicted of a serious
violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and
(iii) Without regard to whether proof of any of these elements is
required to convict, the offender is not currently charged with or
convicted of an offense:
(A) That is a sex offense;
(B) That is a serious violent offense;
(C) During which the defendant used a firearm; or
(D) During which the defendant caused substantial or great bodily
harm or death to another person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 A new section is added to chapter 2.28 RCW
to read as follows:
Any county that has established a drug court and a mental health
court under this chapter may combine the functions of both courts into
a single therapeutic court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 A new section is added to chapter 26.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Every county that authorizes the tax provided in section 904 of
this act shall, and every county may, establish and operate a
therapeutic court component for dependency proceedings designed to be
effective for the court's size, location, and resources. A county with
a drug court for criminal cases or with a mental health court may
include a therapeutic court for dependency proceedings as a component
of its existing program.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "therapeutic court" means a
court that has special calendars or dockets designed for the intense
judicial supervision, coordination, and oversight of treatment provided
to parents and families who have substance abuse or mental health
problems and who are involved in the dependency and is designed to
achieve a reduction in:
(a) Child abuse and neglect;
(b) Out-of-home placement of children;
(c) Termination of parental rights; and
(d) Substance abuse or mental health symptoms among parents or
guardians and their children.
(3) To the extent possible, the therapeutic court shall provide
services for parents and families co-located with the court or as near
to the court as practicable.
(4) The department of social and health services shall furnish
services to the therapeutic court unless a court contracts with
providers outside of the department.
(5) Any jurisdiction that receives a state appropriation to fund a
therapeutic court must first exhaust all federal funding available for
the development and operation of the therapeutic court and associated
services.
(6) Moneys allocated by the state for a therapeutic court must be
used to supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, local, and
private funding for court operations and associated services under this
section.
(7) Any county that establishes a therapeutic court or receives
funds for an existing court under this section shall:
(a) Establish minimum requirements for the participation in the
program; and
(b) Develop an evaluation component of the court, including
tracking the success rates in graduating from treatment, reunifying
parents with their children, and the costs and benefits of the court.

Sec. 604 RCW 2.28.170 and 2002 c 290 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Counties may establish and operate drug courts.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "drug court" means a court
that has special calendars or dockets designed to achieve a reduction
in recidivism and substance abuse among nonviolent, substance abusing
felony and nonfelony offenders by increasing their likelihood for
successful rehabilitation through early, continuous, and intense
judicially supervised treatment; mandatory periodic drug testing; and
the use of appropriate sanctions and other rehabilitation services.
(3)(a) Any jurisdiction that seeks a state appropriation to fund a
drug court program must first:
(i) Exhaust all federal funding ((received from the office of
national drug control policy)) that is available to support the
operations of its drug court and associated services; and
(ii) Match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state moneys allocated
for drug court programs with local cash or in-kind resources. Moneys
allocated by the state must be used to supplement, not supplant, other
federal, state, and local funds for drug court operations and
associated services.
(b) Any county that establishes a drug court pursuant to this
section shall establish minimum requirements for the participation of
offenders in the program. The drug court may adopt local requirements
that are more stringent than the minimum. The minimum requirements
are:
(i) The offender would benefit from substance abuse treatment;
(ii) The offender has not previously been convicted of a serious
violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and
(iii) Without regard to whether proof of any of these elements is
required to convict, the offender is not currently charged with or
convicted of an offense:
(A) That is a sex offense;
(B) That is a serious violent offense;
(C) During which the defendant used a firearm; or
(D) During which the defendant caused substantial or great bodily
harm or death to another person.

Medical Benefits
Sec. 605 RCW 74.09.010 and 1990 c 296 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Children's health program" means the health care services
program provided to children under eighteen years of age and in
households with incomes at or below the federal poverty level as
annually defined by the federal department of health and human services
as adjusted for family size, and who are not otherwise eligible for
medical assistance or the limited casualty program for the medically
needy.
(2) (("Committee" means the children's health services committee
created in section 3 of this act.
(3))) "Community services office" means the county or local office
defined in RCW 74.04.005.
(3) "Confined" or "confinement" means incarcerated in a
correctional institution or admitted to an institution for mental
diseases.
(4) "Correctional institution" means a correctional institution
defined in RCW 9.94.049.
(5) "County" means the board of county commissioners, county
council, county executive, or tribal jurisdiction, or its designee. A
combination of two or more county authorities or tribal jurisdictions
may enter into joint agreements to fulfill the requirements of RCW
74.09.415 through 74.09.435.
(((4))) (6) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(((5))) (7) "Department of health" means the Washington state
department of health created pursuant to RCW 43.70.020.
(((6))) (8) "Institution for mental diseases" has the meaning
defined in 42 C.F.R., part 435, Sec. 1009.
(9) "Internal management" means the administration of medical
assistance, medical care services, the children's health program, and
the limited casualty program.
(((7))) (10) "Likely to be eligible" means that a person:
(a) Was enrolled in medicaid or supplemental security income or
general assistance immediately before he or she was confined and his or
her enrollment was terminated during his or her confinement; or
(b) Was enrolled in medicaid or supplemental security income or
general assistance at any time during the five years before his or her
confinement, and medical or psychiatric examinations during the
person's confinement indicate that the person continues to be disabled
and the disability is likely to last at least twelve months following
release.
(11) "Limited casualty program" means the medical care program
provided to medically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the
federal social security act, and to medically indigent persons who are
without income or resources sufficient to secure necessary medical
services.
(((8))) (12) "Medicaid eligibility category" refers to all existing
eligibility categories established in the state medicaid plan,
including enrollment in medicaid by virtue of eligibility to receive
cash payments under the supplemental security income program of the
social security administration.
(13) "Medical assistance" means the federal aid medical care
program provided to categorically needy persons as defined under Title
XIX of the federal social security act.
(((9))) (14) "Medical care services" means the limited scope of
care financed by state funds and provided to general assistance
recipients, and recipients of alcohol and drug addiction services
provided under chapter 74.50 RCW.
(((10))) (15) "Nursing home" means nursing home as defined in RCW
18.51.010.
(((11))) (16) "Parent" means a parent, guardian, or legal
custodian.
(17) "Poverty" means the federal poverty level determined annually
by the United States department of health and human services, or
successor agency.
(((12))) (18) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 A new section is added to chapter 74.09
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The economic services administration shall adopt standardized
statewide screening and application practices and forms. These
practices and forms shall be implemented in every local office not
later than January 1, 2006.
(2) The forms shall be structured to facilitate completion by
persons with disabilities, including those with mental disorders.
(3) Neither the department nor any local office may exclude a
person from application or screen that person as ineligible for
medicaid based solely on a determination that the person is using or
addicted to alcohol or other psychoactive substances, as defined in
chapter 70.96A RCW.
(4) Neither the department nor any local office may remove a
confined person from an active medicaid caseload sooner than required
by federal law.
(5) Subject to available funds, the department shall provide
persons with assistance in preparing applications and maintaining
eligibility for medicaid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 A new section is added to chapter 74.09
RCW to read as follows:
The secretary shall negotiate with the social security
administration in good faith to establish a prerelease agreement or
agreements under which the department will work collaboratively with
the social security administration, correctional institutions,
institutions for mental diseases, and the department of corrections to
ensure that applications on behalf of confined persons who are likely
to be eligible for supplemental security income or social security
disability income are accepted, whenever possible, at the earliest
possible date prior to release from confinement and are speedily
handled by the social security administration to maximize the
opportunity for confined persons to have an eligibility determination
and enrollment in place on the day of release from confinement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 A new section is added to chapter 74.09
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department and each of its community services offices shall
enter interlocal agreements with correctional institutions, the
regional support networks, the department of corrections, and
institutions for mental diseases to expedite medical assistance
eligibility determinations for persons likely to be eligible for
services under this chapter, upon release from confinement.
(2) The interlocal agreements shall establish procedures to
facilitate eligibility determinations, and enrollment on the day of
release from confinement whenever possible.
(3) The interlocal agreements shall define the responsibilities of
each party, and the procedures through which those responsibilities
will be fulfilled. At a minimum, the agreements shall provide that:
(a) If a person is likely to be eligible, as defined in this
chapter, the correctional institution, department of corrections, or
institution for mental diseases shall notify the designated community
services office of the person's anticipated release date at the
earliest practicable time prior to release from confinement. If a
correctional institution does not know the anticipated release date, or
a person is ordered to be immediately released, the correctional
institution shall notify the community services office at the earliest
opportunity;
(b) The community services office shall find the person
presumptively eligible for medical assistance under this chapter, to
the maximum extent allowable under federal law, and shall facilitate
prompt completion of a final eligibility determination;
(c) Where medical or psychiatric examinations during a person's
confinement indicate that the person is disabled, the correctional
institution, department of corrections, or institution for mental
diseases shall provide that information to the department and the
department shall, to the maximum extent permitted by federal law, use
the examination in making its determination whether the person is
disabled and eligible for medical assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 A new section is added to chapter 71.24
RCW to read as follows:
The secretary shall require the regional support networks to
develop interlocal agreements pursuant to section 608 of this act. To
this end, the regional support networks shall accept referrals for
enrollment on behalf of a confined person, prior to the person's
release.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 A new section is added to chapter 72.09
RCW to read as follows:
The secretary shall negotiate with the department of social and
health services and the regional support networks to reach an agreement
under section 608 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 A new section is added to chapter 71.05
RCW to read as follows:
The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by September 30, 2005, and annually thereafter:
(1) The number of agreements developed under sections 607 through
610 of this act;
(2) The number of persons with mental disorders and co-occurring
mental and chemical dependency disorders leaving confinement with
established or restored medical assistance enrollment;
(3) The number of persons enrolled in the regional support networks
upon release; and
(4) The number of persons denied eligibility or enrollment.

Regional Jails
NEW SECTION. Sec. 612 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall investigate and assess whether there are existing
facilities in the state that could be converted to use as a regional
jail for offenders who have mental or chemical dependency disorders, or
both, that need specialized housing and treatment arrangements.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall consider
the feasibility of using at least the following facilities or types of
facilities:
(a) Green Hill School;
(b) Existing or renovated facilities at the former Northern State
Hospital;
(c) Closed wards at Western State Hospital;
(d) Fircrest School; and
(e) Closed or abandoned nursing homes.
(3) The analysis shall include an assessment of when such
facilities could be available for use as a regional jail and the
potential costs, costs avoided, and benefits of at least the following
considerations:
(a) Any impact on existing offenders or residents;
(b) The conversion of the facilities;
(c) Infrastructure tied to the facilities;
(d) Whether the facility is, or can be, sized proportionately to
the available pool of offenders;
(e) Changes in criminal justice costs, including transport, access
to legal assistance, and access to courts;
(f) Reductions in jail populations; and
(g) Changes in treatment costs for these offenders.
(4) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall report
its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the
legislature not later than December 15, 2005.

Competency and Criminal Insanity
NEW SECTION. Sec. 613 By January 1, 2006, the department of
social and health services shall:
(1) Reduce the waiting times for competency evaluation and
restoration to the maximum extent possible using funds appropriated for
this purpose; and
(2) Report to the legislature with an analysis of several
alternative strategies for addressing increases in forensic population
and minimizing waiting periods for competency evaluation and
restoration. The report shall discuss, at a minimum, the costs and
advantages of, and barriers to co-locating professional persons in
jails, performing restoration treatment in less restrictive
alternatives than the state hospitals, and the use of regional jail
facilities to accomplish competency evaluation and restoration.

ESSB 6358 Implementation Issues
Sec. 614 RCW 71.05.157 and 2004 c 166 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When a county designated mental health professional is notified
by a jail that a defendant or offender who was subject to a discharge
review under RCW 71.05.232 is to be released to the community, the
county designated mental health professional shall evaluate the person
within seventy-two hours of release.
(2) When an offender is under court-ordered treatment in the
community and the supervision of the department of corrections, and the
treatment provider becomes aware that the person is in violation of the
terms of the court order, the treatment provider shall notify the
county designated mental health professional and the department of
corrections of the violation and request an evaluation for purposes of
revocation of the less restrictive alternative.
(3) When a county designated mental health professional becomes
aware that an offender who is under court-ordered treatment in the
community and the supervision of the department of corrections is in
violation of a treatment order or a condition of supervision that
relates to public safety, or the county designated mental health
professional detains a person under this chapter, the county designated
mental health professional shall notify the person's treatment provider
and the department of corrections.
(4) When an offender who is confined in a state correctional
facility or is under supervision of the department of corrections in
the community is subject to a petition for involuntary treatment under
this chapter, the petitioner shall notify the department of corrections
and the department of corrections shall provide documentation of its
risk assessment or other concerns to the petitioner and the court if
the department of corrections classified the offender as a high risk or
high needs offender.
(5) Nothing in this section creates a duty on any treatment
provider or county designated mental health professional to provide
offender supervision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615 A new section is added to chapter 70.96A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Treatment providers shall inquire of each person seeking
treatment, at intake, whether the person is subject to court ordered
mental health or chemical dependency treatment, whether civil or
criminal, and document the person's response in his or her record. If
the person is in treatment on the effective date of this section, and
the treatment provider has not inquired whether the person is subject
to court ordered mental health or chemical dependency treatment, the
treatment provider shall inquire on the person's next treatment session
and document the person's response in his or her record.
(2) Treatment providers shall inquire of each person seeking
treatment, at intake, whether the person is subject to supervision of
any kind by the department of corrections and document the person's
response in his or her record. If the person is in treatment on the
effective date of this section, and the treatment provider has not
inquired whether the person is subject to supervision of any kind by
the department of corrections, the treatment provider shall inquire on
the person's next treatment session and document the person's response
in his or her record.
(3) For all persons who are subject to both court ordered mental
health or chemical dependency treatment and supervision by the
department of corrections, the treatment provider shall request an
authorization to release records and notify the person that, unless
expressly excluded by the court order the law requires treatment
providers to share information with the department of corrections and
the person's mental health treatment provider.
(4) If the treatment provider has reason to believe that a person
is subject to supervision by the department of corrections but the
person's record does not indicate that he or she is, the treatment
provider may call any department of corrections office and provide the
person's name and birth date. If the person is subject to supervision,
the treatment provider shall request, and the department of corrections
shall provide, the name and contact information for the person's
community corrections officer.

PART VII
BEST PRACTICES AND COLLABORATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 (1) The department of social and health
services, in consultation with the members of the team charged with
developing the state plan for co-occurring mental and substance abuse
disorders, shall adopt, not later than January 1, 2006, an integrated
and comprehensive screening and assessment process for chemical
dependency and mental disorders and co-occurring chemical dependency
and mental disorders.
(a) The process adopted shall include, at a minimum:
(i) An initial screening tool that can be used by intake personnel
system-wide and which will identify the most common types of co-occurring disorders;
(ii) An assessment process for those cases in which assessment is
indicated that provides an appropriate degree of assessment for most
situations, which can be expanded for complex situations;
(iii) Identification of triggers in the screening that indicate the
need to begin an assessment;
(iv) Identification of triggers after or outside the screening that
indicate a need to begin or resume an assessment;
(v) The components of an assessment process and a protocol for
determining whether part or all of the assessment is necessary, and at
what point; and
(vi) Emphasis that the process adopted under this section is to
replace and not to duplicate existing intake, screening, and assessment
tools and processes.
(b) The department shall consider existing models, including those
already adopted by other states, and to the extent possible, adopt an
established, proven model.
(c) The integrated, comprehensive screening and assessment process
shall be implemented statewide by all chemical dependency and mental
health treatment providers as well as all county designated mental
health professionals, county designated chemical dependency
specialists, and county designated crisis responders not later than
January 1, 2007.
(2) The department shall provide adequate training to effect
statewide implementation by the dates designated in this section and
shall report the rates of co-occurring disorders and the stage of
screening or assessment at which the co-occurring disorder was
identified to the caseload forecast council.
(3) The department shall establish contractual penalties to
contracted treatment providers, the regional support networks, and
their contracted providers for failure to implement the integrated
screening and assessment process by July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 The department of corrections shall, to
the extent that resources are available for this purpose, utilize the
integrated, comprehensive screening and assessment process for chemical
dependency and mental disorders developed under section 701 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 A new section is added to chapter 71.02
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By June 30, 2006, the department shall develop and implement a
matrix or set of matrices for providing services based on the following
principles:
(a) Maximizing evidence-based practices where these practices
exist; where no evidence-based practice exists, the use of research-based practices, including but not limited to, the adaptation of
evidence-based practices to new situations; where no evidence-based or
research-based practices exist the use of consensus-based practices;
and, to the extent that funds are available, the use of promising
practices;
(b) Maximizing the person's independence, recovery, and employment
by consideration of the person's strengths and supports in the
community;
(c) Maximizing the person's participation in treatment decisions
including, where possible, the person's awareness of, and technical
assistance in preparing, mental health advance directives; and
(d) Collaboration with consumer-based support programs.
(2) The matrix or set of matrices shall include both adults and
children and persons with co-occurring mental and substance abuse
disorders and shall build on the service intensity quadrant models that
have been developed in this state.
(3)(a) The matrix or set of matrices shall be developed in
collaboration with experts in evidence-based practices for mental
disorders, chemical dependency disorders, and co-occurring mental and
chemical dependency disorders at the University of Washington, and in
consultation with representatives of the regional support networks,
community mental health providers, county chemical dependency
coordinators, chemical dependency providers, consumers, family
advocates, and community inpatient providers.
(b) The matrix or set of matrices shall, to the extent possible,
adopt or utilize materials already prepared by the department or by
other states.
(4)(a) The department shall require, by contract with the regional
support networks, that providers maximize the use of evidence-based,
research-based, and consensus-based practices and document the
percentage of clients enrolled in evidence-based, research-based, and
consensus-based programs by program type.
(b) The department shall establish a schedule by which regional
support networks and providers must adopt the matrix or set of matrices
and a schedule of penalties for failure to adopt and implement the
matrices. The department may act against the regional support networks
or providers or both to enforce the provisions of this section and
shall provide the appropriate committees of the legislature with the
schedules adopted under this subsection by June 30, 2006.
(5) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had
multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations
demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for the
population.
(b) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some
research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the
standard of evidence-based practices.
(c) "Consensus-based" means a program or practice that has general
support among treatment providers and experts, based on experience or
professional literature, and may have anecdotal or case study support,
or that is agreed but not possible to perform studies with random
assignment and controlled groups.
(d) "Promising practice" means a practice that presents, based on
preliminary information, potential for becoming a research-based or
consensus-based practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 A new section is added to chapter 71.02
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall collaborate
with community providers of mental health services, early learning and
child care providers, child serving agencies, and child-placing
agencies to identify and utilize federal, state, and local services and
providers for children in out-of-home care and other populations of
vulnerable children who are in need of an evaluation and treatment for
mental health services and do not qualify for medicaid or treatment
services through the regional support networks.
(2) If no appropriate mental health services are available through
federal, state, or local services and providers for a child described
in subsection (1) of this section, the regional support network must
provide a child, at a minimum, with a mental health evaluation
consistent with chapter 71.24 RCW.
(3) The department, in collaboration with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, local providers, local school
districts, and the regional support networks, shall identify and review
existing programs and services as well as the unmet need for programs
and services serving birth to five and school-aged children who exhibit
early signs of behavioral or mental health disorders and who are not
otherwise eligible for services through the regional support networks.
The review of programs and services shall include, but not be limited
to, the utilization and effectiveness of early intervention or
prevention services and the primary intervention programs.
The department of social and health services shall provide a
briefing on the collaboration's findings and recommendations to the
appropriate committee of the legislature by December 31, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 The Washington state institute for public
policy shall assess the long-term and intergenerational cost-effectiveness of investing in the treatment of chemical dependency
disorders, mental disorders, and co-occurring mental and substance
abuse disorders. The assessment shall use, to the extent possible,
existing governmental data bases and research and determine the net
present value of costs avoided or minimized. These costs include, but
are not limited to, primary care, jail or prison, competency
evaluations and restorations, child protective services interventions,
dependencies, foster care, emergency service interventions, and
prosecutorial, defense, and court costs. If possible, the institute
shall indicate whether prevention and early intervention programs
differ from acute and chronic treatment programs in long-term cost-effectiveness.

PART VIII
REPEALERS AND CROSS-REFERENCE CORRECTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed on the effective date of section 107 of this act:
(1) RCW 71.05.060 (Rights of persons complained against) and 1973
1st ex.s. c 142 s 11;
(2) RCW 71.05.070 (Prayer treatment) and 1973 1st ex.s. c 142 s 12;
(3) RCW 71.05.090 (Choice of physicians) and 1973 2nd ex.s. c 24 s
3 & 1973 1st ex.s. c 142 s 14;
(4) RCW 71.05.200 (Notice and statement of rights -- Probable cause
hearing) and 1998 c 297 s 11, 1997 c 112 s 14, 1989 c 120 s 5, 1974
ex.s. c 145 s 13, & 1973 1st ex.s. c 142 s 25;
(5) RCW 71.05.250 (Probable cause hearing -- Detained person's
rights -- Waiver of privilege -- Limitation -- Records as evidence) and 1989
c 120 s 7, 1987 c 439 s 6, 1974 ex.s. c 145 s 17, & 1973 1st ex.s. c
142 s 30;
(6) RCW 71.05.450 (Competency -- Effect -- Statement of Washington law)
and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 440 & 1973 1st ex.s. c 142 s 50;
(7) RCW 71.05.460 (Right to counsel) and 1997 c 112 s 33 & 1973 1st
ex.s. c 142 s 51;
(8) RCW 71.05.470 (Right to examination) and 1997 c 112 s 34 & 1973
1st ex.s. c 142 s 52;
(9) RCW 71.05.480 (Petitioning for release -- Writ of habeas corpus)
and 1974 ex.s. c 145 s 29 & 1973 1st ex.s. c 142 s 53; and
(10) RCW 71.05.490 (Rights of persons committed before January 1,
1974) and 1997 c 112 s 35 & 1973 1st ex.s. c 142 s 54.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed on the effective date of section 111 of this act:
(1) RCW 71.05.155 (Request to mental health professional by law
enforcement agency for investigation under RCW 71.05.150 -- Advisory
report of results) and 1997 c 112 s 9 & 1979 ex.s. c 215 s 10;
(2) RCW 71.05.395 (Application of uniform health care information
act, chapter 70.02 RCW) and 1993 c 448 s 8;
(3) RCW 71.05.400 (Release of information to patient's next of kin,
attorney, guardian, conservator -- Notification of patient's death) and
1993 c 448 s 7, 1974 ex.s. c 115 s 1, 1973 2nd ex.s. c 24 s 6, & 1973
1st ex.s. c 142 s 45;
(4) RCW 71.05.410 (Notice of disappearance of patient) and 1997 c
112 s 32, 1973 2nd ex.s. c 24 s 7, & 1973 1st ex.s. c 142 s 46; and
(5) RCW 71.05.430 (Statistical data) and 1973 1st ex.s. c 142 s 48.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 RCW 71.05.610 (Treatment records -- Definitions) and 1989 c 205 s 11 are each repealed on the effective
date of sections 104 through 106 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 71.05.650 (Treatment records -- Notation of and access to
released data) and 1989 c 205 s 15; and
(2) RCW 71.05.670 (Treatment records -- Violations -- Civil action) and
1999 c 13 s 10.

Sec. 805 RCW 5.60.060 and 2001 c 286 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A husband shall not be examined for or against his wife,
without the consent of the wife, nor a wife for or against her husband
without the consent of the husband; nor can either during marriage or
afterward, be without the consent of the other, examined as to any
communication made by one to the other during marriage. But this
exception shall not apply to a civil action or proceeding by one
against the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime
committed by one against the other, nor to a criminal action or
proceeding against a spouse if the marriage occurred subsequent to the
filing of formal charges against the defendant, nor to a criminal
action or proceeding for a crime committed by said husband or wife
against any child of whom said husband or wife is the parent or
guardian, nor to a proceeding under chapter 70.96A, 70.-- (sections 202
through 216 of this act), 70.-- (sections 302 through 374 of this act),
71.05, or 71.09 RCW: PROVIDED, That the spouse of a person sought to
be detained under chapter 70.96A, 70.-- (sections 202 through 216 of
this act), 70.-- (sections 302 through 374 of this act), 71.05, or
71.09 RCW may not be compelled to testify and shall be so informed by
the court prior to being called as a witness.
(2)(a) An attorney or counselor shall not, without the consent of
his or her client, be examined as to any communication made by the
client to him or her, or his or her advice given thereon in the course
of professional employment.
(b) A parent or guardian of a minor child arrested on a criminal
charge may not be examined as to a communication between the child and
his or her attorney if the communication was made in the presence of
the parent or guardian. This privilege does not extend to
communications made prior to the arrest.
(3) A member of the clergy or a priest shall not, without the
consent of a person making the confession, be examined as to any
confession made to him or her in his or her professional character, in
the course of discipline enjoined by the church to which he or she
belongs.
(4) Subject to the limitations under RCW 70.96A.140 or
((71.05.250)) 71.05.360 (8) and (9), a physician or surgeon or
osteopathic physician or surgeon or podiatric physician or surgeon
shall not, without the consent of his or her patient, be examined in a
civil action as to any information acquired in attending such patient,
which was necessary to enable him or her to prescribe or act for the
patient, except as follows:
(a) In any judicial proceedings regarding a child's injury,
neglect, or sexual abuse or the cause thereof; and
(b) Ninety days after filing an action for personal injuries or
wrongful death, the claimant shall be deemed to waive the physician-patient privilege. Waiver of the physician-patient privilege for any
one physician or condition constitutes a waiver of the privilege as to
all physicians or conditions, subject to such limitations as a court
may impose pursuant to court rules.
(5) A public officer shall not be examined as a witness as to
communications made to him or her in official confidence, when the
public interest would suffer by the disclosure.
(6)(a) A peer support group counselor shall not, without consent of
the law enforcement officer making the communication, be compelled to
testify about any communication made to the counselor by the officer
while receiving counseling. The counselor must be designated as such
by the sheriff, police chief, or chief of the Washington state patrol,
prior to the incident that results in counseling. The privilege only
applies when the communication was made to the counselor while acting
in his or her capacity as a peer support group counselor. The
privilege does not apply if the counselor was an initial responding
officer, a witness, or a party to the incident which prompted the
delivery of peer support group counseling services to the law
enforcement officer.
(b) For purposes of this section, "peer support group counselor"
means a:
(i) Law enforcement officer, or civilian employee of a law
enforcement agency, who has received training to provide emotional and
moral support and counseling to an officer who needs those services as
a result of an incident in which the officer was involved while acting
in his or her official capacity; or
(ii) Nonemployee counselor who has been designated by the sheriff,
police chief, or chief of the Washington state patrol to provide
emotional and moral support and counseling to an officer who needs
those services as a result of an incident in which the officer was
involved while acting in his or her official capacity.
(7) A sexual assault advocate may not, without the consent of the
victim, be examined as to any communication made by the victim to the
sexual assault advocate.
(a) For purposes of this section, "sexual assault advocate" means
the employee or volunteer from a rape crisis center, victim assistance
unit, program, or association, that provides information, medical or
legal advocacy, counseling, or support to victims of sexual assault,
who is designated by the victim to accompany the victim to the hospital
or other health care facility and to proceedings concerning the alleged
assault, including police and prosecution interviews and court
proceedings.
(b) A sexual assault advocate may disclose a confidential
communication without the consent of the victim if failure to disclose
is likely to result in a clear, imminent risk of serious physical
injury or death of the victim or another person. Any sexual assault
advocate participating in good faith in the disclosing of records and
communications under this section shall have immunity from any
liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result from the
action. In any proceeding, civil or criminal, arising out of a
disclosure under this section, the good faith of the sexual assault
advocate who disclosed the confidential communication shall be
presumed.

Sec. 806 RCW 18.83.110 and 1989 c 271 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
Confidential communications between a client and a psychologist
shall be privileged against compulsory disclosure to the same extent
and subject to the same conditions as confidential communications
between attorney and client, but this exception is subject to the
limitations under RCW 70.96A.140 and ((71.05.250)) 71.05.360 (8) and
(9).

Sec. 807 RCW 18.225.105 and 2003 c 204 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person licensed under this chapter shall not disclose the written
acknowledgment of the disclosure statement pursuant to RCW 18.225.100,
nor any information acquired from persons consulting the individual in
a professional capacity when the information was necessary to enable
the individual to render professional services to those persons except:
(1) With the written authorization of that person or, in the case
of death or disability, the person's personal representative;
(2) If the person waives the privilege by bringing charges against
the person licensed under this chapter;
(3) In response to a subpoena from the secretary. The secretary
may subpoena only records related to a complaint or report under RCW
18.130.050;
(4) As required under chapter 26.44 or 74.34 RCW or RCW
((71.05.250)) 71.05.360 (8) and (9); or
(5) To any individual if the person licensed under this chapter
reasonably believes that disclosure will avoid or minimize an imminent
danger to the health or safety of the individual or any other
individual; however, there is no obligation on the part of the provider
to so disclose.

Sec. 808 RCW 71.05.235 and 2000 c 74 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an individual is referred to a county designated mental
health professional under RCW 10.77.090(1)(d)(iii)(A), the county
designated mental health professional shall examine the individual
within forty-eight hours. If the county designated mental health
professional determines it is not appropriate to detain the individual
or petition for a ninety-day less restrictive alternative under RCW
71.05.230(4), that decision shall be immediately presented to the
superior court for hearing. The court shall hold a hearing to consider
the decision of the county designated mental health professional not
later than the next judicial day. At the hearing the superior court
shall review the determination of the county designated mental health
professional and determine whether an order should be entered requiring
the person to be evaluated at an evaluation and treatment facility. No
person referred to an evaluation and treatment facility may be held at
the facility longer than seventy-two hours.
(2) If an individual is placed in an evaluation and treatment
facility under RCW 10.77.090(1)(d)(iii)(B), a professional person shall
evaluate the individual for purposes of determining whether to file a
ninety-day inpatient or outpatient petition under chapter 71.05 RCW.
Before expiration of the seventy-two hour evaluation period authorized
under RCW 10.77.090(1)(d)(iii)(B), the professional person shall file
a petition or, if the recommendation of the professional person is to
release the individual, present his or her recommendation to the
superior court of the county in which the criminal charge was
dismissed. The superior court shall review the recommendation not
later than forty-eight hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and
holidays, after the recommendation is presented. If the court rejects
the recommendation to unconditionally release the individual, the court
may order the individual detained at a designated evaluation and
treatment facility for not more than a seventy-two hour evaluation and
treatment period and direct the individual to appear at a surety
hearing before that court within seventy-two hours, or the court may
release the individual but direct the individual to appear at a surety
hearing set before that court within eleven days, at which time the
prosecutor may file a petition under this chapter for ninety-day
inpatient or outpatient treatment. If a petition is filed by the
prosecutor, the court may order that the person named in the petition
be detained at the evaluation and treatment facility that performed the
evaluation under this subsection or order the respondent to be in
outpatient treatment. If a petition is filed but the individual fails
to appear in court for the surety hearing, the court shall order that
a mental health professional or peace officer shall take such person or
cause such person to be taken into custody and placed in an evaluation
and treatment facility to be brought before the court the next judicial
day after detention. Upon the individual's first appearance in court
after a petition has been filed, proceedings under RCW 71.05.310 and
71.05.320 shall commence. For an individual subject to this
subsection, the prosecutor or professional person may directly file a
petition for ninety-day inpatient or outpatient treatment and no
petition for initial detention or fourteen-day detention is required
before such a petition may be filed.
The court shall conduct the hearing on the petition filed under
this subsection within five judicial days of the date the petition is
filed. The court may continue the hearing upon the written request of
the person named in the petition or the person's attorney, for good
cause shown, which continuance shall not exceed five additional
judicial days. If the person named in the petition requests a jury
trial, the trial shall commence within ten judicial days of the date of
the filing of the petition. The burden of proof shall be by clear,
cogent, and convincing evidence and shall be upon the petitioner. The
person shall be present at such proceeding, which shall in all respects
accord with the constitutional guarantees of due process of law and the
rules of evidence pursuant to RCW ((71.05.250)) 71.05.360 (8) and (9).
During the proceeding the person named in the petition shall
continue to be detained and treated until released by order of the
court. If no order has been made within thirty days after the filing
of the petition, not including any extensions of time requested by the
detained person or his or her attorney, the detained person shall be
released.
(3) If a county designated mental health professional or the
professional person and prosecuting attorney for the county in which
the criminal charge was dismissed or attorney general, as appropriate,
stipulate that the individual does not present a likelihood of serious
harm or is not gravely disabled, the hearing under this section is not
required and the individual, if in custody, shall be released.
(4) The individual shall have the rights specified in RCW
((71.05.250)) 71.05.360 (8) and (9).

Sec. 809 RCW 71.05.310 and 1987 c 439 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The court shall conduct a hearing on the petition for ninety day
treatment within five judicial days of the first court appearance after
the probable cause hearing. The court may continue the hearing upon
the written request of the person named in the petition or the person's
attorney, for good cause shown, which continuance shall not exceed five
additional judicial days. If the person named in the petition requests
a jury trial, the trial shall commence within ten judicial days of the
first court appearance after the probable cause hearing. The burden of
proof shall be by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence and shall be
upon the petitioner. The person shall be present at such proceeding,
which shall in all respects accord with the constitutional guarantees
of due process of law and the rules of evidence pursuant to RCW
((71.05.250)) 71.05.360 (8) and (9).
During the proceeding, the person named in the petition shall
continue to be treated until released by order of the superior court.
If no order has been made within thirty days after the filing of the
petition, not including extensions of time requested by the detained
person or his or her attorney, the detained person shall be released.

Sec. 810 RCW 71.05.425 and 2000 c 94 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the
earliest possible date, and in no event later than thirty days before
conditional release, final release, authorized leave under RCW
71.05.325(2), or transfer to a facility other than a state mental
hospital, the superintendent shall send written notice of conditional
release, release, authorized leave, or transfer of a person committed
under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(2)(c) following dismissal of a sex,
violent, or felony harassment offense pursuant to RCW 10.77.090(4) to
the following:
(i) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the person
will reside; and
(ii) The sheriff of the county in which the person will reside.
(b) The same notice as required by (a) of this subsection shall be
sent to the following, if such notice has been requested in writing
about a specific person committed under RCW 71.05.280(3) or
71.05.320(2)(c) following dismissal of a sex, violent, or felony
harassment offense pursuant to RCW 10.77.090(4):
(i) The victim of the sex, violent, or felony harassment offense
that was dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.090(4) preceding commitment
under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(2)(c) or the victim's next of kin
if the crime was a homicide;
(ii) Any witnesses who testified against the person in any court
proceedings; and
(iii) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney.
Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting the
notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing by
the prosecuting attorney to receive the notice, and the notice are
confidential and shall not be available to the person committed under
this chapter.
(c) The thirty-day notice requirements contained in this subsection
shall not apply to emergency medical transfers.
(d) The existence of the notice requirements in this subsection
will not require any extension of the release date in the event the
release plan changes after notification.
(2) If a person committed under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(2)(c)
following dismissal of a sex, violent, or felony harassment offense
pursuant to RCW 10.77.090(4) escapes, the superintendent shall
immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means
available, the chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the
county in which the person resided immediately before the person's
arrest. If previously requested, the superintendent shall also notify
the witnesses and the victim of the sex, violent, or felony harassment
offense that was dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.090(4) preceding
commitment under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(2) or the victim's next
of kin if the crime was a homicide. In addition, the secretary shall
also notify appropriate parties pursuant to RCW ((71.05.410))
71.05.390(18). If the person is recaptured, the superintendent shall
send notice to the persons designated in this subsection as soon as
possible but in no event later than two working days after the
department learns of such recapture.
(3) If the victim, the victim's next of kin, or any witness is
under the age of sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be
sent to the parent or legal guardian of the child.
(4) The superintendent shall send the notices required by this
chapter to the last address provided to the department by the
requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department
with a current address.
(5) For purposes of this section the following terms have the
following meanings:
(a) "Violent offense" means a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) "Sex offense" means a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030;
(c) "Next of kin" means a person's spouse, parents, siblings, and
children;
(d) "Felony harassment offense" means a crime of harassment as
defined in RCW 9A.46.060 that is a felony.

Sec. 811 RCW 71.05.445 and 2004 c 166 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Information related to mental health services" means all
information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course
of providing services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of
services by a mental health service provider. This may include
documents of legal proceedings under this chapter or chapter 71.34 or
10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information.
(b) "Mental health service provider" means a public or private
agency that provides services to persons with mental disorders as
defined under RCW 71.05.020 and receives funding from public sources.
This includes evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in RCW
71.05.020, community mental health service delivery systems, or
community mental health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and
facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under
chapter 10.77 RCW.
(2)(a) Information related to mental health services delivered to
a person subject to chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW shall be released, upon
request, by a mental health service provider to department of
corrections personnel for whom the information is necessary to carry
out the responsibilities of their office. The information must be
provided only for the purposes of completing presentence investigations
or risk assessment reports, supervision of an incarcerated offender or
offender under supervision in the community, planning for and provision
of supervision of an offender, or assessment of an offender's risk to
the community. The request shall be in writing and shall not require
the consent of the subject of the records.
(b) If an offender subject to chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW has failed
to report for department of corrections supervision or in the event of
an emergent situation that poses a significant risk to the public or
the offender, information related to mental health services delivered
to the offender and, if known, information regarding where the offender
is likely to be found shall be released by the mental health services
provider to the department of corrections upon request. The initial
request may be written or oral. All oral requests must be subsequently
confirmed in writing. Information released in response to an oral
request is limited to a statement as to whether the offender is or is
not being treated by the mental health services provider and the
address or information about the location or whereabouts of the
offender. Information released in response to a written request may
include information identified by rule as provided in subsections (4)
and (5) of this section. For purposes of this subsection a written
request includes requests made by e-mail or facsimile so long as the
requesting person at the department of corrections is clearly
identified. The request must specify the information being requested.
Disclosure of the information requested does not require the consent of
the subject of the records unless the offender has received relief from
disclosure under RCW 9.94A.562, 70.96A.155, or 71.05.132.
(3)(a) When a mental health service provider conducts its initial
assessment for a person receiving court-ordered treatment, the service
provider shall inquire and shall be told by the offender whether he or
she is subject to supervision by the department of corrections.
(b) When a person receiving court-ordered treatment or treatment
ordered by the department of corrections discloses to his or her mental
health service provider that he or she is subject to supervision by the
department of corrections, the mental health services provider shall
notify the department of corrections that he or she is treating the
offender and shall notify the offender that his or her community
corrections officer will be notified of the treatment, provided that if
the offender has received relief from disclosure pursuant to RCW
9.94A.562, 70.96A.155, or 71.05.132 and the offender has provided the
mental health services provider with a copy of the order granting
relief from disclosure pursuant to RCW 9.94A.562, 70.96A.155, or
71.05.132, the mental health services provider is not required to
notify the department of corrections that the mental health services
provider is treating the offender. The notification may be written or
oral and shall not require the consent of the offender. If an oral
notification is made, it must be confirmed by a written notification.
For purposes of this section, a written notification includes
notification by e-mail or facsimile, so long as the notifying mental
health service provider is clearly identified.
(4) The information to be released to the department of corrections
shall include all relevant records and reports, as defined by rule,
necessary for the department of corrections to carry out its duties,
including those records and reports identified in subsection (2) of
this section.
(5) The department and the department of corrections, in
consultation with regional support networks, mental health service
providers as defined in subsection (1) of this section, mental health
consumers, and advocates for persons with mental illness, shall adopt
rules to implement the provisions of this section related to the type
and scope of information to be released. These rules shall:
(a) Enhance and facilitate the ability of the department of
corrections to carry out its responsibility of planning and ensuring
community protection with respect to persons subject to sentencing
under chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW, including accessing and releasing or
disclosing information of persons who received mental health services
as a minor; and
(b) Establish requirements for the notification of persons under
the supervision of the department of corrections regarding the
provisions of this section.
(6) The information received by the department of corrections under
this section shall remain confidential and subject to the limitations
on disclosure outlined in chapter 71.05 RCW, except as provided in RCW
72.09.585.
(7) No mental health service provider or individual employed by a
mental health service provider shall be held responsible for
information released to or used by the department of corrections under
the provisions of this section or rules adopted under this section
except under RCW ((71.05.670 and)) 71.05.440.
(8) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the
release of information contained in the treatment records of any
patient who receives treatment for alcoholism or drug dependency, the
release of the information may be restricted as necessary to comply
with federal law and regulations.
(9) This section does not modify the terms and conditions of
disclosure of information related to sexually transmitted diseases
under chapter 70.24 RCW.
(10) The department shall, subject to available resources,
electronically, or by the most cost-effective means available, provide
the department of corrections with the names, last dates of services,
and addresses of specific regional support networks and mental health
service providers that delivered mental health services to a person
subject to chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW pursuant to an agreement between
the departments.

Sec. 812 RCW 71.05.640 and 2000 c 94 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Procedures shall be established by resource management services
to provide reasonable and timely access to individual treatment
records. However, access may not be denied at any time to records of
all medications and somatic treatments received by the individual.
(2) Following discharge, the individual shall have a right to a
complete record of all medications and somatic treatments prescribed
during evaluation, admission, or commitment and to a copy of the
discharge summary prepared at the time of his or her discharge. A
reasonable and uniform charge for reproduction may be assessed.
(3) Treatment records may be modified prior to inspection to
protect the confidentiality of other patients or the names of any other
persons referred to in the record who gave information on the condition
that his or her identity remain confidential. Entire documents may not
be withheld to protect such confidentiality.
(4) At the time of discharge all individuals shall be informed by
resource management services of their rights as provided in RCW
((71.05.610)) 71.05.620 through 71.05.690.

Sec. 813 RCW 71.05.680 and 1999 c 13 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who requests or obtains confidential information
pursuant to RCW ((71.05.610)) 71.05.620 through 71.05.690 under false
pretenses shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 814 RCW 71.05.690 and 1999 c 13 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall adopt rules to implement RCW ((71.05.610))
71.05.620 through 71.05.680.

Sec. 815 RCW 71.24.035 and 2001 c 334 s 7 and 2001 c 323 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department is designated as the state mental health
authority.
(2) The secretary shall provide for public, client, and licensed
service provider participation in developing the state mental health
program, developing contracts with regional support networks, and any
waiver request to the federal government under medicaid.
(3) The secretary shall provide for participation in developing the
state mental health program for children and other underserved
populations, by including representatives on any committee established
to provide oversight to the state mental health program.
(4) The secretary shall be designated as the county authority if a
county fails to meet state minimum standards or refuses to exercise
responsibilities under RCW 71.24.045.
(5) The secretary shall:
(a) Develop a biennial state mental health program that
incorporates county biennial needs assessments and county mental health
service plans and state services for mentally ill adults and children.
The secretary may also develop a six-year state mental health plan;
(b) Assure that any regional or county community mental health
program provides access to treatment for the county's residents in the
following order of priority: (i) The acutely mentally ill; (ii)
chronically mentally ill adults and severely emotionally disturbed
children; and (iii) the seriously disturbed. Such programs shall
provide:
(A) Outpatient services;
(B) Emergency care services for twenty-four hours per day;
(C) Day treatment for mentally ill persons which includes training
in basic living and social skills, supported work, vocational
rehabilitation, and day activities. Such services may include
therapeutic treatment. In the case of a child, day treatment includes
age-appropriate basic living and social skills, educational and
prevocational services, day activities, and therapeutic treatment;
(D) Screening for patients being considered for admission to state
mental health facilities to determine the appropriateness of admission;
(E) Employment services, which may include supported employment,
transitional work, placement in competitive employment, and other work-related services, that result in mentally ill persons becoming engaged
in meaningful and gainful full or part-time work. Other sources of
funding such as the division of vocational rehabilitation may be
utilized by the secretary to maximize federal funding and provide for
integration of services;
(F) Consultation and education services; and
(G) Community support services;
(c) Develop and adopt rules establishing state minimum standards
for the delivery of mental health services pursuant to RCW 71.24.037
including, but not limited to:
(i) Licensed service providers. The secretary shall provide for
deeming of compliance with state minimum standards for those entities
accredited by recognized behavioral health accrediting bodies
recognized and having a current agreement with the department;
(ii) Regional support networks; and
(iii) Inpatient services, evaluation and treatment services and
facilities under chapter 71.05 RCW, resource management services, and
community support services;
(d) Assure that the special needs of minorities, the elderly,
disabled, children, and low-income persons are met within the
priorities established in this section;
(e) Establish a standard contract or contracts, consistent with
state minimum standards, which shall be used in contracting with
regional support networks or counties. The standard contract shall
include a maximum fund balance, which shall not exceed ten percent;
(f) Establish, to the extent possible, a standardized auditing
procedure which minimizes paperwork requirements of county authorities
and licensed service providers. The audit procedure shall focus on the
outcomes of service and not the processes for accomplishing them;
(g) Develop and maintain an information system to be used by the
state, counties, and regional support networks that includes a tracking
method which allows the department and regional support networks to
identify mental health clients' participation in any mental health
service or public program on an immediate basis. The information
system shall not include individual patient's case history files.
Confidentiality of client information and records shall be maintained
as provided in this chapter and in RCW 71.05.390, ((71.05.400,
71.05.410,)) 71.05.420, ((71.05.430,)) and 71.05.440. The design of
the system and the data elements to be collected shall be reviewed by
the work group appointed by the secretary under section 5(1) of this
act and representing the department, regional support networks, service
providers, consumers, and advocates. The data elements shall be
designed to provide information that is needed to measure performance
and achieve the service outcomes ((identified in section 5 of this
act));
(h) License service providers who meet state minimum standards;
(i) Certify regional support networks that meet state minimum
standards;
(j) Periodically monitor the compliance of certified regional
support networks and their network of licensed service providers for
compliance with the contract between the department, the regional
support network, and federal and state rules at reasonable times and in
a reasonable manner;
(k) Fix fees to be paid by evaluation and treatment centers to the
secretary for the required inspections;
(l) Monitor and audit counties, regional support networks, and
licensed service providers as needed to assure compliance with
contractual agreements authorized by this chapter; and
(m) Adopt such rules as are necessary to implement the department's
responsibilities under this chapter.
(6) The secretary shall use available resources only for regional
support networks.
(7) Each certified regional support network and licensed service
provider shall file with the secretary, on request, such data,
statistics, schedules, and information as the secretary reasonably
requires. A certified regional support network or licensed service
provider which, without good cause, fails to furnish any data,
statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent
reports thereof, may have its certification or license revoked or
suspended.
(8) The secretary may suspend, revoke, limit, or restrict a
certification or license, or refuse to grant a certification or license
for failure to conform to: (a) The law; (b) applicable rules and
regulations; (c) applicable standards; or (d) state minimum standards.
(9) The superior court may restrain any regional support network or
service provider from operating without certification or a license or
any other violation of this section. The court may also review,
pursuant to procedures contained in chapter 34.05 RCW, any denial,
suspension, limitation, restriction, or revocation of certification or
license, and grant other relief required to enforce the provisions of
this chapter.
(10) Upon petition by the secretary, and after hearing held upon
reasonable notice to the facility, the superior court may issue a
warrant to an officer or employee of the secretary authorizing him or
her to enter at reasonable times, and examine the records, books, and
accounts of any regional support network or service provider refusing
to consent to inspection or examination by the authority.
(11) Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy,
the secretary may file an action for an injunction or other process
against any person or governmental unit to restrain or prevent the
establishment, conduct, or operation of a regional support network or
service provider without certification or a license under this chapter.
(12) The standards for certification of evaluation and treatment
facilities shall include standards relating to maintenance of good
physical and mental health and other services to be afforded persons
pursuant to this chapter and chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW, and shall
otherwise assure the effectuation of the purposes of these chapters.
(13)(a) The department, in consultation with affected parties,
shall establish a distribution formula that reflects county needs
assessments based on the number of persons who are acutely mentally
ill, chronically mentally ill, severely emotionally disturbed children,
and seriously disturbed. The formula shall take into consideration the
impact on counties of demographic factors in counties which result in
concentrations of priority populations as set forth in subsection
(5)(b) of this section. These factors shall include the population
concentrations resulting from commitments under chapters 71.05 and
71.34 RCW to state psychiatric hospitals, as well as concentration in
urban areas, at border crossings at state boundaries, and other
significant demographic and workload factors.
(b) The formula shall also include a projection of the funding
allocations that will result for each county, which specifies
allocations according to priority populations, including the allocation
for services to children and other underserved populations.
(c) After July 1, 2003, the department may allocate up to two
percent of total funds to be distributed to the regional support
networks for incentive payments to reward the achievement of superior
outcomes, or significantly improved outcomes, as measured by a
statewide performance measurement system consistent with the framework
recommended in the joint legislative audit and review committee's
performance audit of the mental health system. The department shall
annually report to the legislature on its criteria and allocation of
the incentives provided under this subsection.
(14) The secretary shall assume all duties assigned to the
nonparticipating counties under chapters 71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW.
Such responsibilities shall include those which would have been
assigned to the nonparticipating counties under regional support
networks.
The regional support networks, or the secretary's assumption of all
responsibilities under chapters 71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW, shall be
included in all state and federal plans affecting the state mental
health program including at least those required by this chapter, the
medicaid program, and P.L. 99-660. Nothing in these plans shall be
inconsistent with the intent and requirements of this chapter.
(15) The secretary shall:
(a) Disburse funds for the regional support networks within sixty
days of approval of the biennial contract. The department must either
approve or reject the biennial contract within sixty days of receipt.
(b) Enter into biennial contracts with regional support networks.
The contracts shall be consistent with available resources. No
contract shall be approved that does not include progress toward
meeting the goals of this chapter by taking responsibility for: (i)
Short-term commitments; (ii) residential care; and (iii) emergency
response systems.
(c) Allocate one hundred percent of available resources to the
regional support networks in accordance with subsection (13) of this
section. Incentive payments authorized under subsection (13) of this
section may be allocated separately from other available resources.
(d) Notify regional support networks of their allocation of
available resources at least sixty days prior to the start of a new
biennial contract period.
(e) Deny funding allocations to regional support networks based
solely upon formal findings of noncompliance with the terms of the
regional support network's contract with the department. Written
notice and at least thirty days for corrective action must precede any
such action. In such cases, regional support networks shall have full
rights to appeal under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(16) The department, in cooperation with the state congressional
delegation, shall actively seek waivers of federal requirements and
such modifications of federal regulations as are necessary to allow
federal medicaid reimbursement for services provided by free-standing
evaluation and treatment facilities certified under chapter 71.05 RCW.
The department shall periodically report its efforts to the appropriate
committees of the senate and the house of representatives.

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 RCW 71.05.035 is recodified as a new
section in chapter 71A.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2007, the secretary shall require, in the
contracts the department negotiates pursuant to chapters 71.24 and
70.96A RCW, that any vendor rate increases provided for mental health
and chemical dependency treatment providers or programs who are parties
to the contract or subcontractors of any party to the contract shall be
prioritized to those providers and programs that maximize the use of
evidence-based and research-based practices, as those terms are defined
in section 703 of this act, unless otherwise designated by the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may authorize, fix, and impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter.
(2) The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax
shall equal one-tenth of one percent of the selling price in the case
of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.
(3) Moneys collected under this section shall be used solely for
the purpose of providing new or expanded chemical dependency or mental
health treatment services and for the operation of new or expanded
therapeutic court programs. Moneys collected under this section shall
not be used to supplant existing funding for these purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 This act shall be so applied and construed
as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with
respect to the subject of this act among those states which enact it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 Captions, part headings, and subheadings
used in this act are not part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 (1) If specific funding for the purposes
of sections 203, 217, 220, 221, 401, 406, 612, 701, and 705 of this
act, referencing the section by section number and by bill or chapter
number, is not provided by June 30, 2005, each section not referenced
is null and void.
(2) If specific funding for the purposes of sections 302 through
374 of this act, referencing these sections by section numbers and by
bill or chapter number, or by RCW citation, is not provided by June 30,
2009, sections 302 through 374 of this act are null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 The code reviser shall alphabetize and
renumber the definitions, and correct any internal references affected
by this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 The code reviser shall, not later than
January 1, 2009, report to the appropriate policy committees of the
legislature which sections, or portions thereof, should be repealed on
the effective date of sections 302 through 374 of this act. The report
shall include draft legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910 (1) The secretary of the department of
social and health services may adopt rules as necessary to implement
the provisions of this act.
(2) The secretary of corrections may adopt rules as necessary to
implement the provisions of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911 (1) Except for sections 302 through 374
and 603 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.
(2) Section 603 of this act takes effect July 1, 2006.
(3) Sections 302 through 374 of this act take effect July 1, 2009.

--- END ---