BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW,
to be codified between RCW 18.27.390 and 18.27.900, to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 1 and 4
through 15 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Inhabitable building" means any structure intended or used:
(i) As a dwelling, or for the lodging of persons, including a garage
attached thereto; (ii) for the carrying on of any business therein; or
(iii) for the commercial use, sale, or deposit of goods; and
(b) "Inhabitable building" does not include any structure, commonly
referred to as a "pump house" or "garage," that is detached from an
inhabitable building as otherwise defined in this section and used for
no purpose other than the storage or protection of:
(i) Any of the following potable water or wastewater pressurization
or filtration equipment: Wellhead; pitless adapter; pumps, pipes, and
pipe fittings (not including sinks, toilets, or other plumbing fixtures
other than hose bibs); filtration, softening, and treatment equipment;
pressure and storage tanks; electric panel, wiring, controls,
conductors, telemetry, and auxiliary components; or
(ii) Tangible personal property for other than commercial purposes.
(2) "Potable water or wastewater system pump work" means the
installation, maintenance, and repair of the pressurization and
filtration components of a potable water or wastewater system,
consisting of one or more pumps, pressure tanks, filtration equipment,
and necessary plumbing and electrical connections that:
(a) Are located entirely (i) outside of an inhabitable building; or
(ii) within the interior space of not more than one room or confined
space of an inhabitable building (including but not limited to an
attic, crawl space, or attached garage), which room or space is
separated from the living area of the inhabitable building by a
lockable entrance and fixed walls, ceiling, or floor;
(b) Are connected to plumbing supplied and installed into the
interior room or space by a specialty plumber, or a journeyman plumber
as defined in RCW 18.106.010;
(c) Are connected to electrical service supplied and installed into
the interior room or space by a person who, pursuant to RCW 19.28.161,
possesses a valid certificate of competency as a master journeyman
electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty residential
electrician, specialty residential electrician, or a properly
supervised electrical trainee; and
(d) Do not include any plumbing fixtures, mechanisms, or devices to
distribute or access potable or wastewater within the building, nor any
electric components other than as are necessary for maintenance,
safety, and testing purposes relating to the pressurization and
filtration portion of the system.
(3) "Pump installer advisory board" means the advisory board
established in section 8 of this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.27.010 and 2001 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Contractor" means any person, firm, or corporation who or
which, in the pursuit of an independent business undertakes to, or
offers to undertake, or submits a bid to, construct, alter, repair, add
to, subtract from, improve, move, wreck or demolish, for another, any
building, highway, road, railroad, excavation or other structure,
project, development, or improvement attached to real estate or to do
any part thereof including the installation of carpeting or other floor
covering, the erection of scaffolding or other structures or works in
connection therewith or who installs or repairs roofing or siding; or,
who, to do similar work upon his or her own property, employs members
of more than one trade upon a single job or project or under a single
building permit except as otherwise provided herein. "Contractor"
includes any person, firm, corporation, or other entity covered by this
subsection, whether or not registered as required under this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries or designated representative employed by the department.
(4) "General contractor" means a contractor whose business
operations require the use of more than two unrelated building trades
or crafts whose work the contractor shall superintend or do in whole or
in part. "General contractor" shall not include an individual who does
all work personally without employees or other "specialty contractors"
as defined in this section. The terms "general contractor" and
"builder" are synonymous.
(5) "Partnership" means a business formed under Title 25 RCW.
(6) "Registration cancellation" means a written notice from the
department that a contractor's action is in violation of this chapter
and that the contractor's registration has been revoked.
(7) "Registration suspension" means a written notice from the
department that a contractor's action is a violation of this chapter
and that the contractor's registration has been suspended for a
specified time, or until the contractor shows evidence of compliance
with this chapter.
(8) "Residential homeowner" means an individual person or persons
owning or leasing real property:
(a) Upon which one single-family residence is to be built and in
which the owner or lessee intends to reside upon completion of any
construction; or
(b) Upon which there is a single-family residence to which
improvements are to be made and in which the owner or lessee intends to
reside upon completion of any construction.
(9)(a) "Specialty contractor" means a contractor whose operations
do not fall within the definition of "general contractor".
(b) "Specialty contractor with potable water and wastewater system
pump endorsement" means a specialty contractor recognized by the
department, in accordance with sections 1 and 4 through 15 of this act,
as possessing the necessary competency to engage in both the plumbing
and electrical work relating only to potable water or wastewater system
pump work, as defined in section 1 of this act.
(10) "Unregistered contractor" means a person, firm, corporation,
or other entity doing work as a contractor without being registered in
compliance with this chapter. "Unregistered contractor" includes
contractors whose registration is expired, revoked, or suspended.
"Unregistered contractor" does not include a contractor who has
maintained a valid bond and the insurance or assigned account required
by RCW 18.27.050, and whose registration has lapsed for thirty or fewer
days.
(11) "Unsatisfied final judgment" means a judgment that has not
been satisfied either through payment, court approved settlement,
discharge in bankruptcy, or assignment under RCW 19.72.070.
(12) "Verification" means the receipt and duplication by the city,
town, or county of a contractor registration card that is current on
its face, checking the department's contractor registration data base,
or calling the department to confirm that the contractor is registered.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.27.040 and 2001 c 159 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each applicant shall file with the department a surety bond
issued by a surety insurer who meets the requirements of chapter 48.28
RCW in the sum of twelve thousand dollars if the applicant is a general
contractor, nine thousand dollars if the applicant is not a general
contractor and is a specialty contractor with a potable water and
wastewater system pump endorsement who is not a bona fide employee of
another contractor, and six thousand dollars if the applicant is a
specialty contractor. If no valid bond is already on file with the
department at the time the application is filed, a bond must accompany
the registration application. The bond shall have the state of
Washington named as obligee with good and sufficient surety in a form
to be approved by the department. The bond shall be continuous and may
be canceled by the surety upon the surety giving written notice to the
director. A cancellation or revocation of the bond or withdrawal of
the surety from the bond automatically suspends the registration issued
to the registrant until a new bond or reinstatement notice has been
filed and approved as provided in this section. The bond shall be
conditioned that the applicant will pay all persons performing labor,
including employee benefits, for the contractor, will pay all taxes and
contributions due to the state of Washington, and will pay all persons
furnishing labor or material or renting or supplying equipment to the
contractor and will pay all amounts that may be adjudged against the
contractor by reason of breach of contract including negligent or
improper work in the conduct of the contracting business. A change in
the name of a business or a change in the type of business entity shall
not impair a bond for the purposes of this section so long as one of
the original applicants for such bond maintains partial ownership in
the business covered by the bond.
(2) At the time of initial registration or renewal, the contractor
shall provide a bond or other security deposit as required by this
chapter and comply with all of the other provisions of this chapter
before the department shall issue or renew the contractor's certificate
of registration. Any contractor registered as of July 1, 2001, who
maintains that registration in accordance with this chapter is in
compliance with this chapter until the next renewal of the contractor's
certificate of registration.
(3) Any person, firm, or corporation having a claim against the
contractor for any of the items referred to in this section may bring
suit upon the bond or deposit in the superior court of the county in
which the work was done or of any county in which jurisdiction of the
contractor may be had. The surety issuing the bond shall be named as
a party to any suit upon the bond. Action upon the bond or deposit
brought by a residential homeowner for breach of contract by a party to
the construction contract shall be commenced by filing the summons and
complaint with the clerk of the appropriate superior court within two
years from the date the claimed contract work was substantially
completed or abandoned. Action upon the bond or deposit brought by any
other authorized party shall be commenced by filing the summons and
complaint with the clerk of the appropriate superior court within one
year from the date the claimed labor was performed and benefits
accrued, taxes and contributions owing the state of Washington became
due, materials and equipment were furnished, or the claimed contract
work was substantially completed or abandoned. Service of process in
an action against the contractor, the contractor's bond, or the deposit
shall be exclusively by service upon the department. Three copies of
the summons and complaint and a fee adopted by rule of not less than
twenty dollars to cover the costs shall be served by registered or
certified mail, or other delivery service requiring notice of receipt,
upon the department at the time suit is started and the department
shall maintain a record, available for public inspection, of all suits
so commenced. Service is not complete until the department receives
the fee and three copies of the summons and complaint. The service
shall constitute service on the registrant and the surety for suit upon
the bond or deposit and the department shall transmit the summons and
complaint or a copy thereof to the registrant at the address listed in
the registrant's application and to the surety within two days after it
shall have been received.
(4) The surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate
amount in excess of the amount named in the bond nor for any monetary
penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter for an infraction. The
liability of the surety shall not cumulate where the bond has been
renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued or otherwise extended. The
surety upon the bond may, upon notice to the department and the
parties, tender to the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of the
action an amount equal to the claims thereunder or the amount of the
bond less the amount of judgments, if any, previously satisfied
therefrom and to the extent of such tender the surety upon the bond
shall be exonerated but if the actions commenced and pending at any one
time exceed the amount of the bond then unimpaired, claims shall be
satisfied from the bond in the following order:
(a) Employee labor and claims of laborers, including employee
benefits;
(b) Claims for breach of contract by a party to the construction
contract;
(c) Registered or licensed subcontractors, material, and equipment;
(d) Taxes and contributions due the state of Washington;
(e) Any court costs, interest, and ((attorney's [attorneys']))
attorneys' fees plaintiff may be entitled to recover. The surety is
not liable for any amount in excess of the penal limit of its bond.
A payment made by the surety in good faith exonerates the bond to
the extent of any payment made by the surety.
(5) The total amount paid from a bond or deposit required of a
general contractor by this section to claimants other than residential
homeowners must not exceed one-half of the bond amount. The total
amount paid from a bond or deposit required of a specialty contractor
by this section to claimants other than residential homeowners must not
exceed one-half of the bond amount or four thousand dollars, whichever
is greater.
(6) The prevailing party in an action filed under this section
against the contractor and contractor's bond or deposit, for breach of
contract by a party to a construction contract, is entitled to costs,
interest, and reasonable attorneys' fees. The surety upon the bond is
not liable in an aggregate amount in excess of the amount named in the
bond nor for any monetary penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter for
an infraction.
(7) If a final judgment impairs the liability of the surety upon
the bond so furnished that there is not in effect a bond in the full
amount prescribed in this section, the registration of the contractor
is automatically suspended until the bond liability in the required
amount unimpaired by unsatisfied judgment claims is furnished.
(8) In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the
contractor may file with the department a deposit consisting of cash or
other security acceptable to the department.
(9) Any person having filed and served a summons and complaint as
required by this section having an unsatisfied final judgment against
the registrant for any items referred to in this section may execute
upon the security held by the department by serving a certified copy of
the unsatisfied final judgment by registered or certified mail upon the
department within one year of the date of entry of such judgment. Upon
the receipt of service of such certified copy the department shall pay
or order paid from the deposit, through the registry of the superior
court which rendered judgment, towards the amount of the unsatisfied
judgment. The priority of payment by the department shall be the order
of receipt by the department, but the department shall have no
liability for payment in excess of the amount of the deposit.
(10) The director may require an applicant applying to renew or
reinstate a registration or applying for a new registration to file a
bond of up to three times the normally required amount, if the director
determines that an applicant, or a previous registration of a corporate
officer, owner, or partner of a current applicant, has had in the past
five years a total of six final judgments in actions under this chapter
involving a residential single-family dwelling on two or more different
structures.
(11) The director may adopt rules necessary for the proper
administration of the security.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW,
to be codified between RCW 18.27.390 and 18.27.900, to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation,
or other entity to advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, engage
in, conduct, or carry on the business of installing or maintaining
wires or equipment to convey electric current, or installing or
maintaining equipment to be operated by electric current as it pertains
to any potable water or wastewater system pump work as defined in
section 1 of this act, without having an unrevoked, unsuspended, and
unexpired: (a) Electrical contractor license as required by RCW
19.28.041; (b) certificate of competency as a master journeyman
electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty residential
electrician, specialty residential electrician, or a properly
supervised electrical trainee, as required by RCW 19.28.161; or (c) a
specialty contractor registration with potable water and wastewater
pump endorsement, issued by the department in accordance with this
chapter.
(2) It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation,
or other entity to advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, engage
in, conduct, or carry on the business of plumbing as it pertains to
potable water or wastewater system pump work as defined in section 1 of
this act, without having an unrevoked, unsuspended, and unexpired: (a)
Certificate of competency as a journeyman plumber, specialty plumber,
properly supervised plumbing trainee, or temporary permit, as required
by RCW 18.106.020, and provided in RCW 18.106.070; or (b) a specialty
contractor registration with potable water and wastewater pump
endorsement, issued by the department in accordance with this chapter.
(3) Nothing in section 1 or 4 through 15 of this act requires a
person to obtain a specialty contractor with potable water and
wastewater system pump work endorsement in order to do potable water
and wastewater systems pump work at his or her residence, farm, place
of business, or on other property owned by him or her.
(4) Nothing in this chapter eliminates the requirements of a valid
water or wastewater system code, pump installing code, plumbing code,
or electrical code enacted by statute or by a political subdivision of
the state. However, no code may require the licensee to demonstrate
additional proof of competency or obtain any other license or pay a fee
to engage in the trade of installing or repairing pumps or pump
stations, effluent or lift pumps, conveyance systems, ground source
heat pump loops, and irrigation pumps relating to potable water and
wastewater systems.
(5) Each hour of potable water or wastewater system pump work
engaged in by an applicant may be claimed by the applicant for the
purposes of satisfying the minimum experience requirement necessary to
become eligible to take an examination to be certified as competent as
either: (a) A pump and irrigation specialty electrician, as provided
by RCW 19.28.191(1)(g) in the amount of one hour of work; or (b) a
specialty plumber, as provided by RCW 18.106.040(1)(b) in the amount of
one hour of work; or (c) both (a) and (b) of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW,
to be codified between RCW 18.27.390 and 18.27.900, to read as follows:
The following classifications of potable water and wastewater
system pump endorsements are established:
(1) Limited endorsement: A person issued a general endorsement
under this section is authorized to perform only potable water or
wastewater system pump work relating to pumps, pitless adapters,
pressure and storage tanks, filtration equipment, electric controls,
conductors, service disconnect, telemetry, auxiliary components, and
plumbing or pipe fitting of water or wastewater systems in connection
with the installation or repair of pumps or pump stations, effluent or
lift pumps, conveyance systems, ground source heat pump loops, and
irrigation pumps serving one domestic residence, a group domestic
system that serves fourteen residences or less, or a business that has
twenty-five or fewer full-time employees, which does not involve
electrical work other than the extension of a branch circuit that is
supplied and installed by others and is not to exceed seven and one-half horsepower at 250 volts AC single phase.
(2) General endorsement: A person issued a limited endorsement
under this section is authorized to perform only potable water or
wastewater system pump work relating to pumps, pitless adapters,
pressure and storage tanks, filtration equipment, electric controls,
conductors, service disconnect, telemetry, auxiliary components, and
plumbing or pipe fitting of water or wastewater systems in connection
with the installation or repair of pumps or pump stations, effluent or
lift pumps, conveyance systems, ground source heat pump loops, and
irrigation pumps, which does not involve electrical work other than the
electrical connection of circuits, feeders, controls, low voltage, and
related telecommunications and services relating to the potable water
or wastewater systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW,
to be codified between RCW 18.27.390 and 18.27.900, to read as follows:
(1) Any person applying to register as a specialty contractor with
potable water and wastewater system pump endorsement shall, in addition
to the information required by RCW 18.27.030, deliver evidence in a
form prescribed by the department affirming that the applicant has met
the qualifications described in this section.
(2) Upon receipt of an application to register as a specialty
contractor with potable water and wastewater system pump endorsement,
in either the general or limited classification, the department shall
review the application and determine whether the applicant meets the
following qualifications to take an examination for a potable water and
wastewater system pump endorsements:
(a) An applicant for a general endorsement under section 5(2) of
this act is eligible to take an abbreviated examination for a general
endorsement if, before December 31, 2006, the applicant provides
credible documentation demonstrating that the applicant: (i) Was,
during the two consecutive years immediately preceding the effective
date of this section, either engaged at least two-thirds of the time in
the business of, or continuously employed at least two-thirds of the
time by, a contractor engaged in the business of installing,
maintaining, or repairing the pressurization and filtration components
of potable water or wastewater systems, as described in section 5(2) of
this act; and (ii) has attended a training program conducted by or on
behalf of the department, as provided under section 8 of this act.
(b) An applicant for a general endorsement under section 5(2) of
this act is eligible to take a standard examination for a general
endorsement if the applicant does not meet the requirements of (a) of
this subsection and provides credible documentation demonstrating that
the applicant has at least four thousand hours of supervised or
unsupervised work experience on the pressurization and filtration
components of potable water or wastewater systems, as described in
section 5(2) of this act. The department may, by rule, provide for the
substitution of hours of training for up to two thousand hours of work
experience.
(c) An applicant for a limited endorsement under section 5(1) of
this act is eligible to take an abbreviated examination for a limited
endorsement if, before December 31, 2006, the applicant provides
credible documentation demonstrating that the applicant: (i) Was,
during the two consecutive years immediately preceding the effective
date of this section, either engaged at least two-thirds of the time in
the business of, or continuously employed at least two-thirds of the
time by, a contractor engaged in the business of installing,
maintaining, or repairing the pressurization and filtration components
of potable water or wastewater systems, as described under section 5(1)
of this act; and (ii) has attended a training program conducted by or
on behalf of the department, as provided under section 8 of this act.
(d) An applicant for a limited endorsement under section 5(1) of
this act is eligible to take a standard examination for a limited
endorsement if the applicant does not meet the requirements of (c) of
this subsection and provides credible documentation demonstrating that
the applicant has at least four thousand hours of supervised or
unsupervised work experience on the pressurization and filtration
components of potable water or wastewater systems, as described in
section 5(1) of this act. The department may, by rule, provide for the
substitution of hours of training for up to two thousand hours of work
experience.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW,
to be codified between RCW 18.27.390 and 18.27.900, to read as follows:
(1) Each applicant, other than an individual, seeking to register
as a specialty contractor with potable water and wastewater system pump
endorsement, shall, in addition to providing the information required
by RCW 18.27.030 and section 6 of this act, designate a full-time
supervisory employee or owner of the firm to take an endorsement
administrator's examination.
(2) No person may concurrently qualify as an endorsement
administrator for more than one contractor. If the relationship of the
endorsement administrator with the contractor is terminated, the
contractor's registration is void within ninety days unless another
endorsement administrator is qualified by the pump installer advisory
board. However, if the endorsement administrator dies or is otherwise
incapacitated, the contractor's registration is void within one hundred
eighty days unless another endorsement administrator is qualified by
the pump installer advisory board. The contractor must notify the
department in writing within ten days if the endorsement
administrator's relationship with the contractor terminates due to the
endorsement administrator's death or incapacitation.
(3) The department must issue an endorsement administrator's
certificate to all applicants who have passed the examination as
provided in section 9 of this act. The endorsement administrator's
certificate must bear the date of issuance, expires on the holder's
birthday, and is nontransferable. The certificate must be renewed
every three years, upon application, on or before the holder's
birthday.
(a) If the endorsement administrator certificate holder
demonstrates to the department that he or she has satisfactorily
completed an annual eight-hour continuing education course, the
certificate may be renewed by appropriate application without
examination unless the certificate has been revoked, suspended, or not
renewed within ninety days after the expiration date.
(b) The contents and requirements for satisfactory completion of
the continuing education course must be determined by the director and
approved by the pump installer advisory board.
(c) The department must accept proof of a certificate holder's
satisfactory completion of a continuing education course offered in
another state as meeting the requirements for maintaining a current
Washington state certificate if the department is satisfied the course
is comparable in nature to that required in Washington state for
maintaining a current certificate.
(4) A fee must be assessed for each endorsement administrator's
certificate and for each renewal. An individual holding more than one
administrator's certificate under this chapter is not required to pay
fees for more than one certificate. The department must set the fees
by rule for issuance and renewal of a certificate. The fees must
cover, but not exceed, the costs of issuing the certificates and of
administering and enforcing the administrator certification
requirements of this chapter.
(5) The department may deny an application for an endorsement
administrator's certificate for up to two years if the applicant's
previous endorsement administrator's certificate has been revoked for
a serious violation and all appeals concerning the revocation have been
exhausted. For the purposes of this section only, a serious violation
is a violation that presents imminent danger to the public. The
certificate may be renewed for a three-year period without examination
by appropriate application unless the certificate has been revoked,
suspended, or not renewed within ninety days after the expiration date.
If the certificate is not renewed before the expiration date, the
individual shall pay twice the usual fee. A person may take the
endorsement administrator's examination as many times as necessary to
pass without limit.
(6) The designated endorsement administrator shall:
(a) Be an owner of the firm or a supervisory employee and be
available during working hours to carry out the duties of an
endorsement administrator under this section;
(b) Ensure that all potable water or wastewater system pump work
complies with the electrical installation and plumbing laws and rules
of the state;
(c) Ensure that the proper electrical safety procedures are used;
(d) Ensure that all labels, permits, and licenses required to
perform potable water or wastewater system pump work are used;
(e) See that corrective notices issued by an inspecting authority
are complied with; and
(f) Notify the department in writing within ten days if the
endorsement administrator terminates the relationship with the
electrical contractor.
(7) The department shall not by rule change the endorsement
administrator's duties under subsection (6) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW,
to be codified between RCW 18.27.390 and 18.27.900, to read as follows:
(1) The pump installer advisory board is established. The board
consists of the following and their alternates:
(a) The director or the director's designee, who serves as chair of
the board;
(b) One owner of a contractor that possesses a specialty contractor
with potable water and wastewater system pump general endorsement;
(c) One owner of a contractor that possesses a specialty contractor
with potable water and wastewater system pump limited endorsement;
(d) One person employed as a water system pump installer or
mechanic by a contractor that possesses a specialty contractor with
potable water and wastewater general endorsement;
(e) One person employed as a water system pump installer or
mechanic by a contractor that possesses a specialty contractor with
potable water and wastewater limited endorsement;
(f) One licensed water well operator;
(g) Two persons who are members of, or nominated by, the electrical
board created under RCW 19.28.311; and
(h) Two persons who are members of, or nominated by, the state
advisory board of plumbers, as created by RCW 18.106.110.
(2) The director shall appoint all advisory board members and their
alternates; and, until December 31, 2006, the members identified in
subsection (1)(b) through (f) of this section may be contractors that
have applied for or possess the necessary endorsement, selected from
among a list of not less than three such persons recommended by the
Washington state ground water association, or other statewide trade
association exclusively or primarily representing the interests of
persons engaged in potable water and wastewater system pump work.
(3) Terms for the appointees are four years unless the appointee
voluntarily gives up his or her position or the director removes the
appointee for due cause. Due cause includes, but is not limited to:
Failure to obtain and maintain, after December 31, 2006, the required
endorsement from the department; absence from three consecutive regular
scheduled meetings; disregard for the orderly proceedings of the board;
or dishonest activities within the attendance of the board. At the
first meeting of the board lots must be drawn to determine the initial
terms of the first members and alternates. Two members and alternates
have four-year terms; two members and alternates have three-year terms;
and one member and alternate have a two-year term.
(4) The board must meet quarterly, but may meet more often to
accomplish board business. Alternates do not have a vote unless they
are filling in for a board member. The chair is a nonvoting member.
However, the chair may vote to break a tie vote among the board.
(5) The board must carry out all the functions and duties specified
in this chapter. The department shall consult with the board
regarding: (a) The development and revision of rules necessary to
implement this act; (b) the preparation and revision of training
programs and competency examinations required under sections 6 and 9 of
this act; (c) the administration of the continuing education program
relating to persons holding a specialty contractor with potable water
and wastewater general or limited endorsement; and (d) the
acceptability and sufficiency of evidence supporting an application to
become registered as a specialty contractor with potable water and
wastewater general or limited endorsement under the training and
abbreviated testing program provided by section 6(2) (a) or (c) of this
act. Upon an affirmative recommendation vote of sixty percent of the
members of the advisory board, the department may waive the requirement
of completing the abbreviated testing program provided by section 6(2)
(a) or (c) of this act.
(6) Each member of the pump installer advisory board shall receive
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 for each
day in which such a member is actually engaged in attendance upon the
meetings of the pump installer advisory board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW,
to be codified between RCW 18.27.390 and 18.27.900, to read as follows:
(1) The department, in consultation with the pump installer
advisory board established in section 8 of this act, shall prepare
standard and abbreviated competency written examinations to be
administered to applicants for specialty contractor with potable water
and wastewater general or limited endorsement and related trainee and
endorsement administrator examinations. The examination must be
constructed to determine:
(a) Whether the applicant possesses varied general knowledge of the
technical information and practical procedures that are identified with
the trade of potable water and wastewater installation and maintenance;
and
(b) Whether the applicant is familiar with the applicable plumbing,
electrical, and well construction codes and the administrative rules of
the department and the department of ecology pertaining to potable
water and wastewater installation.
(2) The department shall administer the examination to eligible
persons. All applicants shall, before taking the examination, pay a
fee to the department.
(3) The department shall certify the results of the examination,
and shall notify the applicant in writing whether he or she has passed
or failed. Any applicant who has failed the examination may retake the
examination, upon the terms and after a period of time that the
director sets in rule. The director may not limit the number of times
that a person may take the examination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 18.27
RCW, to be codified between RCW 18.27.390 and 18.27.900, to read as
follows:
(1)(a) The department shall issue a certificate of registration as
a specialty contractor with potable water and wastewater system pump
work general or limited endorsement to all applicants who have passed
the examination provided for in sections 6, 7, and 9 of this act, and
have paid the fee for the certificate. The certificate must bear the
date of issuance, and expires on the birthdate of the holder
immediately following the date of issuance. The certificate is
renewable every other year, upon application, on or before the
birthdate of the holder. The department shall renew a certificate of
competency if the applicant: (i) Pays the renewal fee assessed by the
department; and (ii) during the past two years, has completed sixteen
hours of continuing education approved by the department with the
advice of the pump installer advisory board, including four hours
related to electrical safety. If a person fails to renew the
certificate by the renewal date, he or she must pay a doubled fee. If
the person does not renew the certificate within ninety days of the
renewal date, he or she must retake the examination and pay the
examination fee.
(b) The certificate of registration as a specialty contractor with
potable water and wastewater system pump work endorsement grants the
holder the right to engage in potable water and wastewater system pump
work throughout the state and within any of its political subdivisions
on any job or any employment without additional proof of competency or
any other license or permit or fee to engage in the work. This section
does not preclude employees from adhering to a union security clause in
any employment where such a requirement exists.
(2) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for potable water and wastewater
system pump work within either the plumbing or electrical construction
trade or who is enrolled in a training program relating to potable
water and wastewater system pump work recognized by the pump installer
advisory board may perform potable water and wastewater system pump
work if supervised by a certified journeyman plumber, a certified
journeyman electrician, a certified pump and irrigation specialty
electrician, or a specialty contractor with potable water and
wastewater system pump work endorsement. All apprentices and
individuals learning potable water and wastewater system pump work must
obtain a potable water and wastewater system pump work training
certificate from the department. The certificate authorizes the holder
to learn potable water and wastewater system pump work while under the
direct supervision of a certified journeyman plumber, a certified
journeyman electrician, a certified pump and irrigation specialty
electrician, or a specialty contractor with potable water and
wastewater system pump work endorsement. The holder of the plumbing
training certificate must renew the certificate annually. At the time
of renewal, the holder must provide the department with an accurate
list of the holder's employers who employed the holder to engage in
potable water and wastewater system pump work during the previous year
and the number of hours worked for each employer. An annual fee must
be charged for the issuance or renewal of the certificate. The
department shall set the fee by rule. The fee must cover, but not
exceed, the cost of administering and enforcing the trainee
certification and supervision requirements of this chapter.
Apprentices and individuals learning potable water and wastewater
system pump work must have the training certificates issued under this
section in their possession at all times that they are performing
potable water and wastewater system pump work. They shall show their
certificates to an authorized representative of the department at the
representative's request.
(3) Any person who has been issued a training certificate under
this chapter may perform potable water and wastewater system pump work
if that person is under supervision. Supervision consists of a person
being on the same job site and under the control of a specialty
contractor with potable water and wastewater system pump work
endorsement authorized to do the general or limited scope of work
conducted by the person under supervision. An individual who has a
current training certificate issued under this section and who has
successfully completed or is currently enrolled in a potable water and
wastewater system pump work training course approved by the department
may engage in the same general or limited category of potable water and
wastewater system pump work as is permitted to be performed by the
person's supervisor, provided that the supervisor is a specialty
contractor with potable water and wastewater system pump work
endorsement and is on the same job site as the person for a minimum of
seventy-five percent of a working day on a one-to-one ratio, unless
otherwise provided in this chapter.
(4) An individual who has a current training certificate and who
has successfully completed or is currently enrolled in an approved
apprenticeship program or in a technical school program in the potable
water and wastewater system pump work in a school approved by the work
force training and education coordinating board may work without direct
on-site supervision during the last six months of meeting the practical
experience requirements of this chapter.
(5) The training to become registered as a specialty contractor
with potable water and wastewater system pump work endorsement must
include not less than sixteen hours of classroom training established
by the director with the advice of the pump installer advisory board.
The classroom training must include, but not be limited to, electrical
wiring safety, grounding, bonding, and other related items plumbers
need to know to work under RCW 19.28.091.
(6) All persons who become registered as a specialty contractor
with potable water and wastewater system pump work endorsement under
section 6(2) (a) or (c) of this act are deemed to have received the
classroom training required in subsection (5) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 18.27
RCW, to be codified between RCW 18.27.390 and 18.27.900, to read as
follows:
(1) Contractors shall accurately verify and attest to the trainee
hours worked by potable water and wastewater system pump work trainees
on behalf of the contractor and that all training hours were under the
supervision of a holder of a general or limited potable water or
wastewater system pump work endorsement and within the proper ratio,
and shall provide the supervising potable water and wastewater system
installers' names and license numbers. However, contractors are not
required to identify which hours a trainee works with a specific holder
of a general or limited potable water and wastewater system
endorsement.
(2) The department may audit the records of a contractor that has
verified the hours of experience submitted by a potable water and
wastewater system trainee to the department under this chapter in the
following circumstances: Excessive hours were reported; hours were
reported outside the normal course of the contractor's business; or for
other similar circumstances in which the department demonstrates a
likelihood of excessive or improper hours being reported. The
department shall limit the audit to records necessary to verify hours
for the trainee in question. The department shall adopt rules
implementing audit procedures. Information obtained from a contractor
under this section is confidential and is not subject to public
inspection under chapter 42.17 RCW.
(3) Violation of this section by a contractor is an infraction
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 18.27
RCW, to be codified between RCW 18.27.390 and 18.27.900, to read as
follows:
(1) To maintain a specialty contractor with potable water and
wastewater general or limited endorsement, the holder of the
endorsement shall complete the continuing education requirement as
determined by the department, in consultation with the pump installer
advisory board. Continuing education units will be on the subjects of
potable water and wastewater systems installation, testing, theory,
operation, maintenance, pump equipment, tools, safety, installation
methods, administrative rules, and electrical and plumbing codes as
applied to potable water and wastewater systems. Continuing education
units may include other subjects that apply to the potable water and
wastewater systems industry as established in rule. Every holder of a
certificate of registration issued pursuant to section 10 of this act
shall obtain the required continuing education units prior to renewing
the endorsement and submit to the department verification of completion
statements from approved providers.
(2) Any organization or individual may apply to the department to
become an approved continuing education provider. Continuing education
providers will be organizations or individuals with a history of
providing continuing education courses that have complied with the
requirements for course approval under this section and the rules
adopted by the department. Any individual or organization that desires
to become an approved provider but does not have a history of providing
continuing education courses must submit a comprehensive plan to the
department for approval. The department will, in consultation with the
pump installer advisory board, develop rules identifying elements of
the comprehensive plan and approval criteria. An approved continuing
education provider must, at a minimum, develop and implement methods to
evaluate its course offerings to determine their effectiveness and the
extent to which they meet the needs of persons holding a specialty
contractor with potable water and wastewater general or limited
endorsement. The continuing education provider must provide, upon
request from the department, course evaluations from attendees. The
continuing education provider will obtain course approval and credit
value before offering the course to licensees for approval. The
continuing education provider will present courses consistent with the
standards set forth in this section and rules adopted by the department
and make the course available to all persons holding a specialty
contractor with potable water and wastewater general or limited
endorsement and trainees at locations logistically chosen to facilitate
the attendance of licensees throughout the state. The department, in
consultation with the pump installer advisory board, will establish by
rule the procedure for approval of continuing education providers and
for sanctions including revocation of approval.
(3) The department, in consultation with the pump installer
advisory board, will adopt by rule methods to approve courses and
establish course credit for continuing education units and the amount
of continuing education units required by licensees. To be approved
for credit, a continuing education course must be of intellectual or
practical content, contribute directly to the potable water and
wastewater systems industry, promote professional competence or skills,
or contribute to licensees' education with respect to their
professional or ethical obligations. If a course does not bear
entirely on the general requirements for continuing education or the
ground water or well construction industry, or if the method of
presenting the course is below minimum standards, the department may
assign partial credit. Courses must be presented in a suitable setting
devoted to the educational activity of the program. The department may
approve alternate course curriculum to accommodate the needs of the
handicapped, incapacitated, or a licensee who may be out of state for
the majority of his or her compliance period. Video, motion picture,
or audiotape presentations may be used if a presenter is in attendance
at all presentations to comment and answer questions. The course must
be opened to all licensed operators and trainees. The department will
make available to all interested parties, upon request, a list of all
approved continuing education providers and courses. The department
must, in consultation with the pump installer advisory board, adopt by
rule procedures that allow providers to obtain prior approval of
continuing education courses or which may allow providers to obtain
postpresentation approval of continuing education courses. The
department may, in consultation with the pump installer advisory board,
establish by rule other requirements for continuing education course
approval.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 18.27
RCW, to be codified between RCW 18.27.390 and 18.27.900, to read as
follows:
(1) The department must charge fees for issuance, renewal, and
reinstatement of all certificates of registration, endorsements,
permits, and examinations required by sections 6, 7, 9, and 10 of this
act. The department must set the fees by rule.
(2) The fees must cover the full costs of issuing the certificates
of registration, endorsements, permits, devising and administering the
examinations, and administering and enforcing this chapter. The costs
shall include travel, per diem, and administrative support costs, and
the costs associated with support provided by: (a) The plumbing
advisory board under chapter 18.106 RCW; and (b) the electrical board
under chapter 19.28 RCW.
(3) All moneys received under this section that the director
attributes to the support provided by the: (a) Plumbing advisory board
must be deposited in the plumbing certificate fund, as provided by RCW
18.106.130; and (b) electrical board must be deposited in the
electrical license fund, as provided by RCW 19.28.351.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 18.27
RCW, to be codified between RCW 18.27.390 and 18.27.900, to read as
follows:
An authorized representative of the department may investigate
alleged or apparent violations of chapter 18.106 RCW, chapter 19.28
RCW, and other laws, codes, and rules governing potable water or
wastewater system pump work performed within the scope of the
endorsement defined in section 5 of this act, and the work defined in
section 1(2) of this act. An authorized representative of the
department upon presentation of credentials may inspect sites at which
a person is doing potable water or wastewater system pump work to
determine if that person has a relevant license or endorsement issued
by the department in accordance with this chapter or chapter 18.106 or
19.28 RCW, or is supervised by a person who has such a license or
endorsement. Upon request of the authorized representative of the
department, a person doing potable water and wastewater systems work
must produce evidence that the person has the appropriate relevant
license or endorsement issued by the department in accordance with this
chapter or chapter 18.106 or 19.28 RCW, or is supervised by a person
who has such a license or endorsement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 18.27
RCW, to be codified between RCW 18.27.390 and 18.27.900, to read as
follows:
(1) An authorized representative of the department may issue a
notice of infraction as specified in section 11 of this act to any
person doing potable water or wastewater system pump work who does not
possess the appropriate certificate or certificates of competency as
either (a) a plumber under chapter 18.106 RCW; or (b) an electrician
under chapter 19.28 RCW, or both, and who:
(i) Is performing potable water or wastewater system pump work; and
who is offering to do potable water or wastewater system pump work, and
fails to produce evidence of being registered as a specialty contractor
with a potable water or wastewater system pump work endorsement issued
by the department in accordance with section 10(1) of this act, or
being supervised by a person who has such an endorsement; or
(ii) Employs anyone, or offers or advertises to employ anyone, to
do potable water or wastewater system pump work, and fails to produce
evidence of being registered as a specialty contractor with potable
water or wastewater system pump endorsement as required under this
chapter.
(2) A notice of infraction issued under this section must be
personally served on the person named in the notice by an authorized
representative of the department or sent by certified mail to the last
known address provided to the department of the person named in the
notice.

Sec. 16 RCW 18.106.020 and 2002 c 82 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided by section 4(2) of this act, no person may
engage in or offer to engage in the trade of plumbing without having a
journeyman certificate, specialty certificate, temporary permit, or
trainee certificate. A trainee must be supervised by a person who has
a journeyman certificate, specialty certificate, or temporary permit,
as specified in RCW 18.106.070. No contractor may employ a person to
engage in or offer to engage in the trade of plumbing unless the person
employed has a journeyman certificate, specialty certificate, temporary
permit, or trainee certificate. This section does not apply to a
contractor who is contracting for work on his or her own residence.
(2) No person may engage in or offer to engage in medical gas
piping installation without having a certificate of competency as a
journeyman plumber and a medical gas piping installer endorsement. A
trainee may engage in medical gas piping installation if he or she has
a training certificate and is supervised by a person with a medical gas
piping installer endorsement. No contractor may employ a person to
engage in or offer to engage in medical gas piping installation unless
the person employed has a certificate of competency as a journeyman
plumber and a medical gas piping installer endorsement.
(3) No contractor may advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or
perform any work under this chapter without being registered as a
contractor under chapter 18.27 RCW.
(4) Violation of this section is an infraction. Each day in which
a person engages in the trade of plumbing in violation of this section
or employs a person in violation of this section is a separate
infraction. Each worksite at which a person engages in the trade of
plumbing in violation of this section or at which a person is employed
in violation of this section is a separate infraction.
(5) Notices of infractions for violations of this section may be
issued to:
(a) The person engaging in or offering to engage in the trade of
plumbing in violation of this section;
(b) The contractor in violation of this section; and
(c) The contractor's employee who authorized the work assignment of
the person employed in violation of this section.

Sec. 17 RCW 19.28.041 and 2002 c 249 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided by section 4(1) of this act, it is unlawful
for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity to
engage in, conduct, or carry on the business of installing or
maintaining wires or equipment to convey electric current, or
installing or maintaining equipment to be operated by electric current
as it pertains to the electrical industry, without having an unrevoked,
unsuspended, and unexpired electrical contractor license, issued by the
department in accordance with this chapter. All electrical contractor
licenses expire twenty-four calendar months following the day of their
issue. The department may issue an electrical contractors license for
a period of less than twenty-four months only for the purpose of
equalizing the number of electrical contractor licenses that expire
each month. Application for an electrical contractor license shall be
made in writing to the department, accompanied by the required fee.
The application shall state:
(a) The name and address of the applicant; in case of firms or
partnerships, the names of the individuals composing the firm or
partnership; in case of corporations, the names of the managing
officials thereof;
(b) The location of the place of business of the applicant and the
name under which the business is conducted;
(c) Employer social security number;
(d) Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's
employees working in Washington, as follows:
(i) The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by
the department;
(ii) The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department;
or
(iii) For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada
subject to an agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as
permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of coverage issued by
the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the
applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant
has secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or
province's workers' compensation law;
(e) Employment security department number;
(f) State excise tax registration number;
(g) Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be
substituted for the information required by (d) of this subsection if
the applicant will not employ employees in Washington, and by (e) and
(f) of this subsection; and
(h) Whether a general or specialty electrical contractor license is
sought and, if the latter, the type of specialty. Electrical
contractor specialties include, but are not limited to: Residential,
pump and irrigation, limited energy system, signs, nonresidential
maintenance, restricted nonresidential maintenance, appliance repair,
and a combination specialty. A general electrical contractor license
shall grant to the holder the right to engage in, conduct, or carry on
the business of installing or maintaining wires or equipment to carry
electric current, and installing or maintaining equipment, or
installing or maintaining material to fasten or insulate such wires or
equipment to be operated by electric current, in the state of
Washington. A specialty electrical contractor license shall grant to
the holder a limited right to engage in, conduct, or carry on the
business of installing or maintaining wires or equipment to carry
electrical current, and installing or maintaining equipment; or
installing or maintaining material to fasten or insulate such wires or
equipment to be operated by electric current in the state of Washington
as expressly allowed by the license.
(2) The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage
information provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(d) of this
section, including but not limited to information regarding the
coverage of an individual employee of the applicant. If coverage is
provided under the laws of another state, the department may notify the
other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.
(3) The application for an electrical contractor license shall be
accompanied by a bond in the sum of four thousand dollars with the
state of Washington named as obligee in the bond, with good and
sufficient surety, to be approved by the department. The bond shall at
all times be kept in full force and effect, and any cancellation or
revocation thereof, or withdrawal of the surety therefrom, suspends the
license issued to the principal until a new bond has been filed and
approved as provided in this section. Upon approval of a bond, the
department shall on the next business day deposit the fee accompanying
the application in the electrical license fund and shall file the bond
in the office. The department shall upon request furnish to any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity a certified
copy of the bond upon the payment of a fee that the department shall
set by rule. The fee shall cover but not exceed the cost of furnishing
the certified copy. The bond shall be conditioned that in any
installation or maintenance of wires or equipment to convey electrical
current, and equipment to be operated by electrical current, the
principal will comply with the provisions of this chapter and with any
electrical ordinance, building code, or regulation of a city or town
adopted pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3) that is in effect at the time of
entering into a contract. The bond shall be conditioned further that
the principal will pay for all labor, including employee benefits, and
material furnished or used upon the work, taxes and contributions to
the state of Washington, and all damages that may be sustained by any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity due to a
failure of the principal to make the installation or maintenance in
accordance with this chapter or any applicable ordinance, building
code, or regulation of a city or town adopted pursuant to RCW
19.28.010(3). In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the
license applicant may file with the department a cash deposit or other
negotiable security acceptable to the department. If the license
applicant has filed a cash deposit, the department shall deposit the
funds in a special trust savings account in a commercial bank, mutual
savings bank, or savings and loan association and shall pay annually to
the depositor the interest derived from the account.
(4) The department shall issue general or specialty electrical
contractor licenses to applicants meeting all of the requirements of
this chapter. The provisions of this chapter relating to the licensing
of any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
including the requirement of a bond with the state of Washington named
as obligee therein and the collection of a fee therefor, are exclusive,
and no political subdivision of the state of Washington may require or
issue any licenses or bonds or charge any fee for the same or a similar
purpose. No person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
holding more than one specialty contractor license under this chapter
may be required to pay an annual fee for more than one such license or
to post more than one four thousand dollar bond, equivalent cash
deposit, or other negotiable security.
(5) To obtain a general or specialty electrical contractor license
the applicant must designate an individual who currently possesses a
valid master journeyman electrician's certificate of competency, master
specialty electrician's certificate of competency in the specialty for
which application has been made, or administrator's certificate as a
general electrical contractor administrator or as a specialty
electrical contractor administrator in the specialty for which
application has been made.
(6) Administrator certificate specialties include but are not
limited to: Residential, pump and irrigation, limited energy system,
signs, nonresidential maintenance, restricted nonresidential
maintenance, appliance repair, and combination specialty. To obtain an
administrator's certificate an individual must pass an examination as
set forth in RCW 19.28.051 unless the applicant was a licensed
electrical contractor at any time during 1974. Applicants who were
electrical contractors licensed by the state of Washington at any time
during 1974 are entitled to receive a general electrical contractor
administrator's certificate without examination if the applicants apply
prior to January 1, 1984. The board of electrical examiners shall
certify to the department the names of all persons who are entitled to
either a general or specialty electrical contractor administrator's
certificate.

Sec. 18 RCW 19.28.131 and 2001 c 211 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
violating any of the provisions of RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and
19.28.311 through 19.28.361 shall be assessed a penalty of not less
than fifty dollars or more than ten thousand dollars. The department
shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for violating RCW 19.28.010
through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361. The department
shall notify the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity violating any of the provisions of RCW 19.28.010 through
19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361 of the amount of the penalty
and of the specific violation by certified mail, return receipt
requested, sent to the last known address of the assessed party. Any
penalty is subject to review by an appeal to the board, except for any
appeal submitted by the holder of a certificate of registration as a
specialty contractor with potable water and wastewater system pump
endorsement, as provided in section 10 of this act, in which case the
appeal provided for under this section shall be transferred from the
board to the pump installer advisory board established under section 8
of this act. The filing of an appeal stays the effect of the penalty
until the board makes its decision. The appeal shall be filed within
twenty days after notice of the penalty is given to the assessed party
by certified mail, return receipt requested, sent to the last known
address of the assessed party and shall be made by filing a written
notice of appeal with the department. The notice shall be accompanied
by a certified check for two hundred dollars, which shall be returned
to the assessed party if the decision of the department is not
sustained by the board. If the board sustains the decision of the
department, the two hundred dollars shall be applied by the department
to the payment of the per diem and expenses of the members of the board
incurred in the matter, and any balance remaining after payment of per
diem and expenses shall be paid into the electrical license fund. The
hearing and review procedures shall be conducted in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall assign its hearings to an
administrative law judge to conduct the hearing and issue a proposed
decision and order. The board shall be allowed a minimum of twenty
days to review a proposed decision and shall issue its decision no
later than the next regularly scheduled board meeting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---