BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each county shall create a task force to develop a ten-year
plan addressing short-term and long-term housing for homeless persons.
Membership on the task force must include representatives of the
counties, cities, towns, housing authorities, civic and faith
organizations, schools, community networks, human services providers,
law enforcement personnel, criminal justice personnel, including
prosecutors, probation officers, and jail administrators, substance
abuse treatment providers, mental health care providers, emergency
health care providers, businesses, at-large representatives of the
community, and a homeless or formerly homeless individual.
In lieu of creating a new task force, a local government may
designate an existing body which substantially conforms to this section
and which includes at least one homeless or formerly homeless
individual to serve as its homeless representative. Those counties
which participate in the Washington state balance of state continuum of
care under the McKinney-Vento homelessness assistance act may designate
their participation efforts to comply with the requirements of this
section.
(2) In addition to developing a ten-year plan to end homelessness,
each task force shall establish guidelines, as needed, for the
following:
(a) Emergency shelters;
(b) Short-term housing needs;
(c) Temporary encampments;
(d) Supportive housing for chronically homeless persons; and
(e) Long-term housing.
Guidelines must include, when appropriate, standards for health and
safety and notifying the public of proposed facilities to house the
homeless.
(3) Each county, including counties exempted from creating a new
task force under subsection (1) of this section, shall report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature and to the department of
community, trade, and economic development by January 2006, including
information on guidelines developed, potentials for public-private
partnerships to address homelessness, and requests for further
involvement or support from the legislature. Those counties which
participate in the Washington state balance of state continuum of care
under the McKinney-Vento homelessness assistance act may submit a
single report reflecting information on all participating counties.
Each county shall continue to develop and coordinate planning efforts,
with reports to the legislature of substantive changes and significant
additional information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Each city or town must participate in the task force created under
section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Each code city must participate in the task force created under
section 1 of this act.

--- END ---