BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In 1967, the legislature amended RCW
82.04.260 in chapter 149, Laws of 1967 ex. sess. to authorize a
preferential business and occupation tax rate for slaughtering,
breaking, and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the
same at wholesale. The legislature finds that RCW 82.04.260 was
interpreted by the state supreme court on January 13, 2005, in Agrilink
Foods, Inc. v. Department of Revenue, Docket No. 74478-5. The supreme
court held that the preferential business and occupation tax rate on
the slaughtering, breaking, and/or processing of perishable meat
products applied to the processing of perishable meat products into
nonperishable finished products, such as canned food.
The legislature declares that the sole purpose of chapter 149, Laws
of 1967 ex. sess. as codified in RCW 82.04.260 has always been to
create a preferential business and occupation tax rate for the
slaughtering, breaking, or processing of perishable meat products
and/or selling the finished perishable meat products at wholesale. The
intent was not to allow the preferential tax rate for the processing of
perishable meat products into nonperishable finished products or
selling the nonperishable finished products at wholesale.
The purpose of this act is to make retroactive, remedial, curative,
and technical amendments to clarify the intent of chapter 149, Laws of
1967 ex. sess. and RCW 82.04.260 and resolve any ambiguity. It is the
intent of the legislature to establish that, prior to the effective
date of this act, the preferential business and occupation tax rate for
the "slaughtering, breaking, and/or processing of perishable meat
products and/or selling the same at wholesale" in RCW 82.04.260 applied
only to activities in which the end products continued to be perishable
meat products, and this act applies retroactively to accomplish this
purpose.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.260 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 4 and 2003 2nd
sp.s. c 1 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Seafood products which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw
salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the value of the products manufactured, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) By canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits and vegetables, or selling at wholesale fresh fruits and
vegetables canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated by the
seller and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who
transports in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state,
the seller shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by
the department and retain the statement as a business record;
(d) Dairy products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in
21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including byproducts
from the manufacturing of the dairy products such as whey and casein;
or selling the same to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course
of business the goods out of state; as to such persons the tax imposed
shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports
in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the seller
shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by the
department and retain the statement as a business record;
(e) Alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, as those
terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol
fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock manufactured, multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. This subsection (1)(e) expires July 1,
2009; and
(f) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are defined
in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or ((processing)) manufacturing perishable
meat products and/or selling the ((same)) perishable meat products at
wholesale only and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed
shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales, at retail or wholesale, of nuclear fuel assemblies
manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the assemblies multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing nuclear fuel assemblies, as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products manufactured multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the
gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied
by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter
82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to
the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or
foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to
such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees
imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3
percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(11) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
agent, insurance broker, or insurance solicitor licensed under chapter
48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to
such licensed activities shall be equal to the gross income of such
business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(12) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5
percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.
(13)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of
commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, manufactured by
that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the airplanes
or components multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (13), "commercial
airplane," "component," and "final assembly of a superefficient
airplane" have the meanings given in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (13) must report
as required under RCW 82.32.545.
(e) This subsection (13) does not apply after the earlier of: July
1, 2024; or December 31, 2007, if assembly of a superefficient airplane
does not begin by December 31, 2007, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies retroactively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---