BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.530 and 2003 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful:
(a) For any person to operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle
not equipped with mirrors on the left and right sides of the motorcycle
which shall be so located as to give the driver a complete view of the
highway for a distance of at least two hundred feet to the rear of the
motorcycle or motor-driven cycle: PROVIDED, That mirrors shall not be
required on any motorcycle or motor-driven cycle over twenty-five years
old originally manufactured without mirrors and which has been restored
to its original condition and which is being ridden to or from or
otherwise in conjunction with an antique or classic motorcycle contest,
show, or other such assemblage: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no mirror is
required on any motorcycle manufactured prior to January 1, 1931;
(b) For any person to operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle
which does not have a windshield unless wearing glasses, goggles, or a
face shield of a type conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol;
(c) For any person under the age of twenty-one years to operate or
ride upon a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped on a state
highway, county road, or city street unless wearing upon his or her
head a motorcycle helmet except when the vehicle is an antique motor-driven cycle or automobile that is licensed as a motorcycle or when the
vehicle is equipped with seat belts and roll bars approved by the state
patrol. The motorcycle helmet neck or chin strap must be fastened
securely while the motorcycle or motor-driven cycle is in motion.
Persons operating electric-assisted bicycles shall comply with all laws
and regulations related to the use of bicycle helmets;
(d) For any person to transport a child under the age of five on a
motorcycle or motor-driven cycle;
(e) For any person to sell or offer for sale a motorcycle helmet
that does not meet the requirements established by this section.
(2) The state patrol may adopt and amend rules, pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act, concerning standards for glasses,
goggles, and face shields.
(3) For purposes of this section, "motorcycle helmet" means a
protective covering for the head consisting of a hard outer shell,
padding adjacent to and inside the outer shell, and a neck or chin
strap type retention system, with a sticker indicating that the
motorcycle helmet meets standards established by the United States
Department of Transportation.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.37.535 and 1990 c 270 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is unlawful for any person to rent out motorcycles, motor-driven
cycles, or mopeds unless the person also has on hand for rent helmets
((of a type conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol)) as
defined by RCW 46.37.530.
It shall be unlawful for any person under the age of twenty-one
years to rent a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped unless the
person has in his or her possession a helmet ((of a type approved by
the state patrol)) as defined by RCW 46.37.530, regardless of from whom
the helmet is obtained.

--- END ---