BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Marine fin fish aquaculture programs have
raised fish in state waters for over thirty years and continue to
provide an economic benefit to the state. The state's fin fish
aquaculture sites produce upwards of twelve million pounds of farmed
fish annually, worth approximately forty million dollars. According to
a national atmospheric and oceanic administration sponsored mariculture
study and a department of natural resources fin fish aquaculture study,
the Strait of Juan de Fuca is a potential site for significant fin fish
aquaculture activities. These studies, as well as the federal effluent
limitations guidelines, provide information and standards that can
assist in the development of a streamlined permitting process for fin
fish aquaculture activities in the Strait of Juan de Fuca.
The health and safety of the citizens, natural resources, and
environment of Washington state are vital interests that must be
protected to preserve the state's quality of life. Currently, however,
fin fish aquaculture projects require businesses and governmental
entities to process multiple permits. The existence of multiple
permits and permitting agencies creates the potential for conflict,
overlap, and duplication among the various state, local, and federal
permitting and administrative appeals processes for fin fish
aquaculture activities. Additionally, a lack of coordination in the
processing of permit applications and administrative appeals may cause
costly delays to applicants.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to streamline the
permitting and administrative appeals processes for fin fish
aquaculture projects in the Strait of Juan de Fuca by requiring
permitting agencies to coordinate and develop a multiagency
programmatic permitting process and a consolidated administrative
appeals process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The fin fish aquaculture programmatic
permitting work group is created in the office of regulatory assistance
to streamline the permitting and administrative appeals processes for
fin fish aquaculture projects in the Strait of Juan de Fuca.
(2) The director of the office of financial management shall
designate an employee of the office of regulatory assistance to
coordinate the activities of the work group. The coordinator must have
experience working with federal, state, and local agencies on permit
streamlining projects.
(3) The work group consists of one member designated by the
director of the department of fish and wildlife, one member designated
by the director of the department of ecology, and one member designated
by the commissioner of public lands. The work group shall invite
representatives from the following groups to participate as members:
(a) One representative each from the county governments of Clallam
and Jefferson counties;
(b) One representative each from the United States Army Corps of
Engineers and the United States Coast Guard; and
(c) Two representatives of the fin fish aquaculture industry.
(4) Each member designated to the work group, or invited to serve
as a member, must have knowledge and experience with federal, state, or
local permitting processes.
(5) The office of regulatory assistance shall provide staff to the
committee.
(6) Members of the work group shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(7) The work group shall convene by June 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The work group created in section 2 of
this act shall develop and implement a multiagency programmatic
approach to the permitting of fin fish aquaculture programs in the
Strait of Juan de Fuca. The work group shall also develop and
implement a consolidated administrative appeals process for these
multiagency programmatic permits.
(2) The work group shall develop these permitting and
administrative appeals processes by:
(a) Identifying federal, state, and local agencies responsible for
permitting fin fish aquaculture program activities in the Strait of
Juan de Fuca and analyzing the permitting and administrative appeals
processes used by those agencies;
(b) Identifying existing federal, state, and local environmental
and other standards for fin fish aquaculture program activities in the
Strait of Juan de Fuca and analyzing the application of those
standards;
(c) Identifying substantive and procedural duplications in the
permitting and administrative appeals processes for fin fish
aquaculture program activities in the Strait of Juan de Fuca and
analyzing options for resolving those duplications;
(d) Identifying opportunities for delegation of federal and local
permitting authority to state agencies and exploring those
possibilities with federal and local agencies; and
(e) Employing environmental standards and best management practices
that may be applied with certainty, consistency, and the assurance of
swift permit action.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Best management practices" means currently available and
generally accepted techniques, including new technologies or
strategies, that seek to reduce the negative impacts of fin fish
aquaculture projects and promote more efficient and effective use of
fin fish aquaculture facilities.
(b) "Programmatic approach" means a permit or other action that
covers a geographic or statewide area and applies to a variety of
projects, activities, or locales. A programmatic approach may allow
actions to proceed without individual approval by each permit decision-making agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The work group created in section 2 of this
act shall provide a report to the legislature by December 31, 2005.
The report must include:
(1) A summary of the process the work group used to develop the
multiagency programmatic approach to the permitting of fin fish
aquaculture programs in the Strait of Juan de Fuca;
(2) The multiagency programmatic permitting process developed by
the work group;
(3) A summary of the process the work group used to develop the
consolidated administrative appeals process for fin fish aquaculture
programs in the Strait of Juan de Fuca;
(4) The consolidated administrative appeals process developed by
the work group;
(5) A summary of the process the work group used to implement the
permitting and administrative appeals processes developed;
(6) If the permitting and administrative appeals processes
developed are not yet implemented, an explanation of the factors
preventing implementation; and
(7) If the permitting and administrative appeals processes
developed are not yet implemented, recommendations for any legislation
necessary for implementation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---