BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.12.020 and 2003 c 361 s 302 and 2003 c 168 s 214
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and there shall be collected from every
person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of using within
this state as a consumer: (a) Any article of tangible personal
property purchased at retail, or acquired by lease, gift, repossession,
or bailment, or extracted or produced or manufactured by the person so
using the same, or otherwise furnished to a person engaged in any
business taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) or (7); or (b) any prewritten
computer software, regardless of the method of delivery, but excluding
prewritten computer software that is either provided free of charge or
is provided for temporary use in viewing information, or both.
(2) This tax shall apply to the use of every service defined as a
retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a) and the use of every
article of tangible personal property, including property acquired at
a casual or isolated sale, and including byproducts used by the
manufacturer thereof, except as hereinafter provided, irrespective of
whether the article or similar articles are manufactured or are
available for purchase within this state.
(3) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property or service taxable
under RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a) purchased at retail or acquired by
lease, gift, or bailment if the sale to, or the use by, the present
user or his bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under
chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the
present user or by his bailor or donor.
(4) Except as provided in this section, payment by one purchaser or
user of tangible personal property or service of the tax imposed by
chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW shall not have the effect of exempting any
other purchaser or user of the same property or service from the taxes
imposed by such chapters. If the sale to, or the use by, the present
user or his or her bailor or donor has already been subjected to the
tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid
by the present user or by his or her bailor or donor; or in respect to
the use of property acquired by bailment and the tax has once been paid
based on reasonable rental as determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by
the value of the article at time of first use multiplied by the tax
rate imposed by chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter as of the time of
first use; or in respect to the use of any article of tangible personal
property acquired by bailment, if the property was acquired by a
previous bailee from the same bailor for use in the same general
activity and the original bailment was prior to June 9, 1961, the tax
imposed by this chapter does not apply.
(5) The tax shall be levied and collected in an amount equal to the
value of the article used or value of the service used by the taxpayer
multiplied by the rates in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW
82.08.020, except in the case of a seller required to collect use tax
from the purchaser, the tax shall be collected in an amount equal to
the purchase price multiplied by the rate in effect for the retail
sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.
(6) In addition to the rate in subsection (5) of this section, an
additional rate shall be levied and collected on the value of a motor
vehicle used in this state multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent. In
this subsection, "motor vehicle" has the same meaning in RCW
82.08.020(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---