BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.01.085 and 1985 c 92 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be in the public purpose for all counties to engage in
economic development programs. In order to carry out these programs,
any county with a population of fewer than thirty thousand persons that
borders the Columbia river is authorized to transfer or loan to any
port district, with or without consideration, any funds, real or
personal property, property interests, or services. In addition,
counties may contract with nonprofit corporations in furtherance of
this and other acts relating to economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Any county with fewer than thirty thousand persons that borders the
Columbia river may, upon the request of and pursuant to an interlocal
agreement with a port district, jointly exercise with that port
district any powers of the port district with respect to economic
development programs or projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---