BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes one of its
foremost duties is the prioritization and wise use of taxpayer funds.
The legislature concludes that the placement of art at a correctional
facility which houses sex offenders is not a priority over other state
programs such as education and public safety, and further expenditures
on such activities constitute a misuse and waste of taxpayer funds. To
prevent such misuse of taxpayer dollars, the legislature hereby intends
to prohibit the expenditure of public funds on placement of works of
art in the special commitment center housed at McNeil Island.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.17.200 and 1983 c 204 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
All state agencies including all state departments, boards,
councils, commissions, and quasi public corporations shall allocate, as
a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original
construction of any public building, an amount of one-half of one
percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state
arts commission for the acquisition of works of art; however, no moneys
shall be expended on, nor allocated for, the acquisition or placement
of works of art in a total confinement facility as defined in RCW
71.09.020. The works of art may be placed on public lands, integral to
or attached to a public building or structure, detached within or
outside a public building or structure, part of a portable exhibition
or collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited
in other public facilities. In addition to the cost of the works of
art the one-half of one percent of the appropriation as provided herein
shall be used to provide for the administration of the visual arts
program by the Washington state arts commission and all costs for
installation of the works of art. For the purpose of this section
building shall not include highway construction sheds, warehouses or
other buildings of a temporary nature.

--- END ---