BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
A school district employee under this chapter must disclose in any
letter of recommendation any inappropriate behavior of a sexual nature
on school premises, during a school activity, or in the use of school
property or facilities. Activities or materials used in conjunction
with established curriculum shall not be considered inappropriate under
this section.

--- END ---