BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of social and health
services shall conduct a vendor rate study of home care agencies. The
study shall include an analysis of using a value-based reimbursement
system that provides higher reimbursement rates for providers that
demonstrate:
(a) Contractually obligated labor costs;
(b) Higher percentage of revenue devoted to labor costs;
(c) Higher supervisor-to-client ratios;
(d) Best practices financial audits;
(e) Accurate reporting of hours;
(f) Ethical consumer marketing practices;
(g) Adequate levels of liability insurance;
(h) Compliance with labor and employment laws;
(i) Process to enhance quality and safety; and
(j) Not using public funds to promote or deter, encourage or
discourage employees to exercise their rights under section 7 of the
federal labor relations act.
(2) The governor shall appoint a stakeholder committee made up of
five persons familiar with the operation of home care agencies to
assist the department in conducting the analysis. The five persons
shall be representatives from (a) a for-profit agency, (b) a not-for-profit agency; (c) an organization representing consumers, (d) an
organization representing home care workers, and (e) the area agencies
on aging.
(3) The department shall report its findings, including a cost
analysis of implementing a value-based reimbursement, to the
legislature by December 15, 2005.

--- END ---