BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that teenagers ages
twelve through nineteen are the most victimized segment of our
population. The legislature further finds that online communications
are increasingly common among teenagers and that one of the biggest
dangers to our children's personal safety is getting together or
meeting someone whom they first met online. The legislature further
finds that of youth ages ten to seventeen who use the internet
regularly, approximately one in five received a sexual solicitation or
approach over the internet. The legislature further finds that
Washington's children can be protected by teaching both children and
their parents and guardians how to protect themselves while using the
internet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The safety center advisory committee
shall develop and distribute a pamphlet to promote internet safety for
children particularly in grades seven through twelve. The pamphlet
shall be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's web site.
To the extent funds are available, the pamphlet shall be distributed in
schools throughout the state and in other areas accessible to youth
including but not limited to libraries and community centers.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of forty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2005, from the general fund to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to develop and distribute the
pamphlet under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---