BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that major
technological, economic, and demographic changes have increased the
demand for training and education to maintain a high quality,
competitive work force, and a well-educated populace to meet the
challenges of the twenty-first century. Therefore, the legislature
finds that there is increasing demand for postsecondary educational
opportunities for citizens of the state of Washington.
The legislature declares that the policy of the state of Washington
is to improve the access to, and the quality of, this state's
postsecondary educational system. The budgetary policy of the state is
to provide a level of fiscal commitment to the state's postsecondary
educational system commensurate with the responsibility of the state to
the educational and professional improvement of its citizens and work
force.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.10.776 and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the policy of the state of Washington that the ((essential
requirements level)) state budget ((calculation)) for institutions of
higher education include enrollment levels necessary to ((maintain, by
educational sector, the participation rate funded in the 1993 fiscal
year. The participation rate shall be based on the state's estimated
population ages seventeen and above by appropriate age groups)) meet
the demand for higher education in the state.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.10.778 and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the policy of the state of Washington that((, for new
enrollments provided under RCW 28B.10.776, the essential requirements
level budget calculation for those enrollments)) the state omnibus
appropriations act shall, each biennium, at a minimum, include:
(1) Increased state funding, up to the fiscal growth factor
established under RCW 43.135.025, for the actual number of enrollments
reported by the office of the forecast council for degree-seeking
students enrolled in degree courses for the most recently available
school year; and
(2) A funding level per full-time equivalent student that is equal
to the undergraduate rate by educational sector assumed in the omnibus
appropriations act for the last fiscal year of the previous biennium
((for the instructional, primary support, and library programs,)) plus
an inflation factor. The inflation factor should be equivalent to the
per pupil inflation factor used to calculate basic education in the
common school system budget ((request submitted by the governor)).

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.10.784 and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((participation rate)) enrollment levels used to calculate
((enrollment)) state funding levels under RCW 28B.10.776 and
((28B.10.782)) 28B.10.778 shall be ((based on)) the fall enrollment
reported in the higher education enrollment report as maintained by the
office of ((financial management, fall enrollment as reported in the
management information system of the state board for community and
technical colleges, and the corresponding fall population forecast by
the office of financial management. Formal estimates of the state
participation rates and enrollment levels necessary to fulfill the
requirements of RCW 28B.10.776 and 28B.10.782 shall be determined by
the office of financial management)) the forecast council as part of
its responsibility to develop and maintain student enrollment forecasts
for colleges and universities under RCW 43.62.050. ((Formal estimates
of)) The state ((participation rates and)) enrollment levels required
by this section shall be based on procedures and standards established
by a technical work group consisting of staff from the higher education
coordinating board, the public four-year institutions of higher
education, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
fiscal and higher education committees of the house of representatives
and the senate, and the office of ((financial management. Formal
estimates of the state participation rates and)) the forecast council.
The enrollment levels required by this section shall be submitted to
the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate on or
before November 15th of each ((even-numbered)) year. ((The higher
education coordinating board shall periodically review the enrollment
goals set forth in RCW 28B.10.776 and 28B.10.782 and submit
recommendations concerning modification of these goals to the governor
and to the higher education committees of the house of representatives
and the senate.))

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.10.786 and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the policy of the state of Washington that financial need not
be a barrier to participation in higher education. It is also the
policy of the state of Washington that the ((essential requirements
level)) state budget ((calculation)) include funding for state student
financial aid programs. The ((calculation)) budget should, at a
minimum, include a funding level equal to the amount provided in the
second year of the previous biennium in the omnibus appropriations act,
adjusted for the percentage of needy resident students, by educational
sector, likely to be included in any enrollment increases ((necessary
to maintain, by educational sector, the participation rate funded in
the 1993 fiscal year)). The calculation should also be adjusted to
reflect, by educational sector, any increases in cost of attendance.
The cost of attendance figures should be calculated by the higher
education coordinating board and provided to the office of ((financial
management)) the forecast council and appropriate legislative
committees by June 30th of each even-numbered year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.10.780 (Budget calculation -- Funding level) and 1993
sp.s. c 15 s 4; and
(2) RCW 28B.10.782 (Budget calculation -- Increased enrollment target
level -- Availability of information) and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 5.

--- END ---