BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall consider and make recommendations regarding defining,
regulating, and licensing preschools and kindergartens. In developing
the recommendations, the task force shall, at a minimum:
(a) Define "preschool" and "kindergarten";
(b) Develop an implementation plan for the licensing and regulation
of preschools and kindergartens;
(c) Conduct an examination of and report on the agency best suited
to manage the licensing and regulating of preschools and kindergartens;
(d) Determine the criteria to license preschools and kindergartens;
and
(e) Determine whether to develop health and safety standards and/or
standards for content of curriculum and educational background of
teachers.
(2) In developing the recommendations, the joint legislative audit
and review committee shall consult with the following, to the extent
possible: Early learning teachers, representatives of parent
organizations, representatives from the office of superintendent of
public instruction, representatives from the department of health, and
representatives from the early childhood education and assistance
program and head start.
(3) The task force shall make its recommendations to the
legislature by December 1, 2006.

--- END ---