BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that child care
providers provide valuable services for the families of Washington
state and are an important part of ensuring the healthy growth and
development of young children. It also recognizes the importance of
ensuring that operators of child day-care centers and family day-care
providers are providing safe and quality care and operating in
compliance with minimal standards.
The legislature further recognizes that parents, as consumers, have
an interest in obtaining access to information that is relevant to
making informed decisions about the persons with whom they entrust the
care of their children. The purpose of this act is to establish a
system, consistent throughout the state, through which parents,
guardians, and other persons acting in loco parentis can obtain certain
information about child care providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and maintain a toll-free
telephone number, and an interactive web-based system through which
persons may obtain information regarding child day-care centers and
family day-care providers. This number shall be available twenty-four
hours a day for persons to request information. The department shall
respond to recorded messages left at the number within two business
days. The number shall be published in reasonably available printed
and electronic media. The number shall be easily identifiable as a
number through which persons may obtain information regarding child
day-care centers and family day-care providers as set forth in this
section.
(2) Through the toll-free telephone line established by this
section, the department shall provide information to callers about:
(a) Whether a day-care provider is licensed; (b) whether a day-care
provider's license is current; (c) the general nature of any
enforcement against the providers; (d) how to report suspected or
observed noncompliance with licensing requirements; (e) how to report
alleged abuse or neglect in a day care; (f) how to report health,
safety, and welfare concerns in a day care; (g) how to receive follow-up assistance, including information on the office of the family and
children's ombudsman; and (h) how to receive referral information on
other agencies or entities that may be of further assistance to the
caller.
(3) Beginning in January 2006, the department shall print the toll-free number established by this section on the face of new licenses
issued to child day-care centers and family day-care providers.
(4) This section shall not be construed to require the disclosure
of any information that is exempt from public disclosure under chapter
42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every child day-care center and family day-care provider shall
prominently post the following items, clearly visible to parents and
staff:
(a) The license issued under this chapter;
(b) The department's toll-free telephone number established by
section 2 of this act;
(c) The notice of any pending enforcement action. The notice must
be posted immediately upon receipt. The notice must be posted for at
least two weeks or until the violation causing the enforcement action
is corrected, whichever is longer;
(d) A notice that inspection reports and any notices of enforcement
actions for the previous three years are available from the licensee
and the department; and
(e) Any other information required by the department.
(2) The department shall disclose, upon request, the receipt,
general nature, and resolution or current status of all complaints on
record with the department after the effective date of this act against
a child day-care center or family day-care provider that result in an
enforcement action.
This section shall not be construed to require the disclosure of
any information that is exempt from public disclosure under chapter
42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every child day-care center and family day-care provider shall
have readily available for review by the department, parents, and the
public a copy of each inspection report and notice of enforcement
action received by the center or provider from the department for the
past three years. This subsection only applies to reports and notices
received on or after the effective date of this act.
(2) The department shall make available to the public during
business hours all inspection reports and notices of enforcement
actions involving child day-care centers and family day-care providers
consistent with chapter 42.17 RCW. The department shall include in the
inspection report a statement of the corrective measures taken by the
center or provider.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.15.130 and 1998 c 314 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An agency may be denied a license, or any license issued
pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 may be suspended,
revoked, modified, or not renewed by the secretary upon proof (a) that
the agency has failed or refused to comply with the provisions of
chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 or the requirements promulgated
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031; or
(b) that the conditions required for the issuance of a license under
chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 have ceased to exist with respect
to such licenses. RCW 43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial,
revocation, suspension, or modification and provides the right to an
adjudicative proceeding.
(2) In any adjudicative proceeding regarding the denial,
modification, suspension, or revocation of a foster family home
license, the department's decision shall be upheld if there is
reasonable cause to believe that:
(a) The applicant or licensee lacks the character, suitability, or
competence to care for children placed in out-of-home care, however, no
unfounded report of child abuse or neglect may be used to deny
employment or a license;
(b) The applicant or licensee has failed or refused to comply with
any provision of chapter 74.15 RCW, RCW 74.13.031, or the requirements
adopted pursuant to such provisions; or
(c) The conditions required for issuance of a license under chapter
74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 have ceased to exist with respect to such
licenses.
(3) In any adjudicative proceeding regarding the denial,
modification, suspension, or revocation of any license under this
chapter, other than a foster family home license, the department's
decision shall be upheld if it is supported by a preponderance of the
evidence.
(4) The department may assess civil monetary penalties upon proof
that an agency has failed or refused to comply with the rules adopted
under the provisions of this chapter and RCW 74.13.031 or that an
agency subject to licensing under this chapter and RCW 74.13.031 is
operating without a license except that civil monetary penalties shall
not be levied against a licensed foster home. Monetary penalties
levied against unlicensed agencies that submit an application for
licensure within thirty days of notification and subsequently become
licensed will be forgiven. These penalties may be assessed in addition
to or in lieu of other disciplinary actions. Civil monetary penalties,
if imposed, may be assessed and collected, with interest, for each day
an agency is or was out of compliance. Civil monetary penalties shall
not exceed seventy-five dollars per violation for a family day-care
home and two hundred fifty dollars per violation for group homes, child
day-care centers, and child-placing agencies. Each day upon which the
same or substantially similar action occurs is a separate violation
subject to the assessment of a separate penalty. An agency that
continues to operate following a license revocation is subject to the
maximum penalty for each day of operation following the revocation.
The department shall provide a notification period before a monetary
penalty is effective and may forgive the penalty levied if the agency
comes into compliance during this period. The department may suspend,
revoke, or not renew a license for failure to pay a civil monetary
penalty it has assessed pursuant to this chapter within ten days after
such assessment becomes final. Chapter 43.20A RCW governs notice of a
civil monetary penalty and provides the right of an adjudicative
proceeding. The preponderance of evidence standard shall apply in
adjudicative proceedings related to assessment of civil monetary
penalties.
(5)(a) The department may place a child day-care center or family
day-care provider on nonreferral status or stop placement status if the
center or provider has failed or refused to comply with this chapter or
rules adopted under this chapter or an enforcement action has been
taken. The nonreferral status or stop placement status may continue
until the department determines that: (i) No enforcement action is
appropriate; (ii) a complaint is not founded or valid; or (iii) a
corrective action plan has been successfully concluded. The department
shall then remove the center or provider from nonreferral status and
provide appropriate notice to the public and private child care
resource and referral agencies.
(b) The department shall notify appropriate public and private
child care resource and referral agencies of the department's decision
to take an enforcement action against the center or provider.
(6) Whenever an enforcement action is taken, the department shall
notify the child care agency subject to the action in writing by
personal service within ten business days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every licensed child day-care center shall, at the time of
licensure or renewal and at any inspection, provide to the department
proof that the licensee has day-care insurance as defined in RCW
48.88.020, or is self-insured pursuant to chapter 48.90 RCW.
(a) Every licensed child day-care center shall comply with the
following requirements:
(i) Notify the department when coverage has been terminated;
(ii) Post at the day-care center, in a manner likely to be observed
by patrons, notice that coverage has lapsed or been terminated;
(iii) Provide written notice to parents that coverage has lapsed or
terminated within thirty days of lapse or termination.
(b) Liability limits under this subsection shall be the same as set
forth in RCW 48.88.050.
(c) The department may take action as provided in RCW 74.15.130 if
the licensee fails to maintain in full force and effect the insurance
required by this subsection.
(d) This subsection applies to child day-care centers holding
licenses, initial licenses, and probationary licenses under this
chapter.
(e) A child day-care center holding a license under this chapter on
the effective date of this act, is not required to be in compliance
with this subsection until the time of renewal of the license or until
January 1, 2006, whichever is sooner.
(2)(a) Every licensed family day-care provider shall, at the time
of licensure or renewal either:
(i) Provide to the department proof that the licensee has day-care
insurance as defined in RCW 48.88.020, or other applicable insurance;
or
(ii) Provide written notice of their insurance status to parents
with a child enrolled in family day care.
(b) Any licensed family day-care provider that provides to the
department proof that the licensee has insurance as provided under
(a)(i) of this subsection shall comply with the following requirements:
(i) Notify the department when coverage has been terminated;
(ii) Post at the day-care home, in a manner likely to be observed
by patrons, notice that coverage has lapsed or been terminated;
(iii) Provide written notice to parents that coverage has lapsed or
terminated within thirty days of lapse or termination.
(c) Liability limits under (a)(i) of this subsection shall be the
same as set forth in RCW 48.88.050.
(d) The department may take action as provided in RCW 74.15.130 if
the licensee fails to notify the department when coverage has been
terminated as required under (b) of this subsection.
(e) A family day-care provider holding a license under this chapter
on the effective date of this act is not required to be in compliance
with this subsection until the time of renewal of the license or until
January 1, 2006, whichever is sooner.
(3) Noncompliance or compliance with the provisions of this section
shall not constitute evidence of liability or nonliability in any
injury litigation.

--- END ---