BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.142.040 and 1990 c 55 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A contract for health studio services shall include all of the
following:
(((1))) (a) The name and address of the health studio facilities
operator;
(((2))) (b) The date the buyer signed the contract;
(((3))) (c) A description of the health studio services and general
equipment to be provided, or acknowledgement in a conspicuous form that
the buyer has received a written description of the health studio
services and equipment to be provided. If any of the health studio
services or equipment are to be delivered at a planned facility, at a
facility under construction, or through substantial improvements to an
existing facility, the description shall include a date for completion
of the facility, construction, or improvement. Health studio services
must begin within twelve months from the date the contract is signed
unless the completion of the facility, construction, or improvement is
delayed due to war, or fire, flood, or other natural disaster;
(((4))) (d) A statement of the duration of the contract. No
contract for health studio services may require payments or financing
by the buyer over a period in excess of thirty-six months from the date
of the contract, nor may any contract term be measured by or be for the
life of the buyer;
(((5))) (e) The use fees or dues to be paid by the buyer and if
such fees are subject to periodic adjustment. Use fees or dues may not
be raised more than once in any calendar year;
(((6))) (f) A complete statement of the rules of the health studio
or an acknowledgement in a conspicuous form that the buyer has
received a copy of the rules;
(((7))) (g) Clauses which notify the buyer of the right to cancel:
(((a))) (i) If the buyer dies or becomes totally disabled. The
contract may require that the disability be confirmed by an examination
of a physician agreeable to the buyer and the health studio;
(((b)(i))) (ii)(A) Subject to (((b)))(ii)(B) of this subsection, if
the buyer moves his or her permanent residence to a location more than
twenty-five miles from the health studio or an affiliated health studio
offering the same or similar services and facilities at no additional
expense to the buyer and the buyer cancels after one year from signing
the contract if the contract extends for more than one year. The
health studio may require reasonable evidence of relocation;
(((ii))) (B) If at the time of signing the contract requiring
payment of an initiation or membership fee the buyer lived more than
twenty-five miles from the health studio, the buyer may cancel under
(((7)(b)(i))) (g)(ii)(A) of this ((section)) subsection only if the
buyer moves an additional five miles or more from the health
studio((.));
(((c))) (iii) If a contract extends for more than one year, the
buyer may cancel the contract for any reason upon thirty days' written
notice to the health studio;
(((d))) (iv) If the health studio facilities are permanently closed
and comparable facilities owned and operated by the seller are not made
available within a ten-mile radius of the closed facility;
(((e))) (v) If a facility, construction, or improvement is not
completed by the date represented by the contract;
(((f))) (vi) If the contract for health studio services was sold
prior to the opening of the facility, the buyer may cancel within the
first five business days the facility opens for use of the buyer and
the health studio begins to provide the agreed upon health studio
services;
(((8))) (h) Clauses explaining the buyer's right to a refund and
relief from future payment obligations after cancellation of the
contract;
(((9))) (i) A provision under a conspicuous caption in capital
letters and boldface type stating substantially the following:

"BUYER'S RIGHT TO CANCEL

If you wish to cancel this contract without penalty, you
may cancel it by delivering or mailing a written notice to the
health studio. The notice must say that you do not wish to be
bound by the contract and must be delivered or mailed before
midnight of the third business day after you sign this
contract. The notice must be mailed to . . . . . . (insert
name and mailing address of health studio). If you cancel
within the three days, the health studio will return to you
within thirty days all amounts you have paid."

(2) No contract for health studio services may:
(a) Charge an annual fee in excess of three thousand six hundred
dollars. However, this subsection (2)(a) does not apply to contracts
relating solely to the use of tennis, platform tennis, or racquetball
facilities;
(b) Contain an automatic renewal clause;
(c) Require payments or financing by the buyer over a period that
extends more than one month beyond the expiration of the contract. The
installment payments must be in substantially equal amounts exclusive
of the down payment and are required to be made at substantially equal
intervals, not more frequently than one payment per month;
(d) Require the buyer to execute a promissory note or series of
promissory notes which, when negotiated, cuts off as to third parties
a defense which the buyer may have against the seller.

--- END ---