BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The nursing facility medicaid program trust account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. All funds collected from the
tax in RCW 82.71.020 shall be deposited into this account. Only the
director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
Expenditures from this account shall be used exclusively to increase
medicaid reimbursement rates to the nursing care facilities paid as of
December 31, 2004.
(2) Funds may not be used to replace existing state expenditures
paid to nursing care facilities for providing services pursuant to the
medicaid program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.71 RCW
to read as follows:
The fee collected under RCW 82.71.020 shall be deposited in the
nursing facility medicaid program trust account created in section 1 of
this act.

--- END ---