BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.71.010 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 16 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(2) "Gross income" means all revenue, without deduction, that is
derived from the performance of nursing facility services. "Gross
income" does not include other operating revenue or nonoperating
revenue.
(3) "Other operating revenue" means income from nonpatient care
services to patients, as well as sales and activities to persons other
than patients. It is derived in the course of operating the facility,
such as providing personal laundry service for patients, or from other
sources such as meals provided to persons other than patients, personal
telephones, gift shops, and vending machine commissions.
(4) "Nonoperating revenue" means income from activities not
relating directly to the day-to-day operations of an organization.
"Nonoperating revenue" includes such items as gains on disposal of a
facility's assets, dividends, and interest from security investments,
gifts, grants, and endowments.
(5) "Patient day" means a calendar day of care provided to a
nursing facility resident, excluding a medicare patient day. Patient
days include the day of admission and exclude the day of discharge;
except that, when admission and discharge occur on the same day, one
day of care shall be deemed to exist.
(6) "Medicare patient day" means a patient day for medicare
beneficiaries on a medicare Part A stay and a patient day for persons
who have opted for managed care coverage using their medicare benefit.
(7) "Nonexempt nursing facility" means a nursing facility that is
not exempt from the quality maintenance fee under RCW 74.46.091.
(8) "Nursing facility" has the same meaning as the term is defined
in RCW 18.51.010((; it)), except that facilities identified as
institutions for mental disease by the federal department of health and
human services and classified as "nursing homes" shall not be included
as nursing facilities for purposes of this chapter and are not subject
to the quality maintenance fee, subject to approval of this provision
by the federal department of health and human services. The term
"nursing facility" does not include a boarding home as defined in RCW
18.20.020 or an adult family home as defined in RCW 70.128.010.
(9) "Nursing facility operator" means a person who engages in the
business of operating a nursing facility or facilities within this
state.
(10) "Nursing facility services" means health-related services to
individuals who do not require hospital care, but whose mental or
physical condition requires services that are above the level of room
and board and can be made available only through institutional
facilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.091 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 16 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1st of each year, each nursing facility operator shall
file a report with the department of social and health services listing
the patient days and the gross income for the prior calendar year for
each nursing facility that he or she operates.
(2) By August 1, 2003, the department of social and health services
shall submit for approval to the federal department of health and human
services a request for a waiver pursuant to 42 C.F.R. 433.68. The
waiver shall identify the nursing facilities that the department
proposes to exempt from the quality maintenance fee. Those facilities
shall include at least:
(a) Nursing facilities operated by any agency of the state of
Washington;
(b) Nursing facilities operated by a public hospital district; and
(c) As many nursing facilities with no or disproportionately low
numbers of medicaid-funded residents as, within the judgment of the
department, may be exempted from the fee pursuant to 42 C.F.R. 433.68.
(3) By October 15, 2005, the department of social and health
services shall submit for approval to the federal department of health
and human services a waiver amendment pursuant to 42 C.F.R. 433.68.
The amendment shall identify nursing facilities identified as
institutions for mental disease as exempt from the quality maintenance
fee.
(4) The department of social and health services shall notify the
department of revenue and the nursing facility operator of the nursing
facilities that would be exempted from the quality maintenance fee
pursuant to the waiver request submitted to the federal department of
health and human services. The nursing facilities included in the
waiver request may withhold payment of the fee pending final action by
the federal government on the request for waiver.
(((4))) (5) If the request for waiver is approved, the department
of social and health services shall notify the department of revenue
and the nursing facility operator that no quality maintenance fee is
due from the facility. If the request for waiver is denied, nursing
facility operators who have withheld payment of the fee shall pay all
such fees as have been withheld. No interest or penalties shall be due
upon such withheld payments for the period during which final federal
action was pending.
(((5))) (6) The department of social and health services shall take
whatever action is necessary to continue the waiver from the federal
government.
(((6))) (7) The department of social and health services may adopt
such rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, as necessary to
provide for effective administration of this section and RCW 74.46.535.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply
retroactively to July 1, 2003, upon approval of the federal department
of health and human services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire if the
contingency in section 6, chapter 16, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.
occurs.

--- END ---