BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.021 and 2002 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state health care authority is created within
the executive branch. The authority shall have an administrator
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. The
administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The
administrator may employ up to seven staff members, who shall be exempt
from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are
necessary to administer this chapter. The administrator may delegate
any power or duty vested in him or her by this chapter, including
authority to make final decisions and enter final orders in hearings
conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The primary duties of the authority
shall be to: Administer state employees' insurance benefits and
retired or disabled school employees' insurance benefits; administer
the basic health plan pursuant to chapter 70.47 RCW; study state-purchased health care programs in order to maximize cost containment in
these programs while ensuring access to quality health care; and
implement state initiatives, joint purchasing strategies, and
techniques for efficient administration that have potential application
to all state-purchased health services. The authority's duties
include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To administer health care benefit programs for employees and
retired or disabled school employees as specifically authorized in RCW
41.05.065 and in accordance with the methods described in RCW
41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other provisions of this chapter;
(b) To analyze state-purchased health care programs and to explore
options for cost containment and delivery alternatives for those
programs that are consistent with the purposes of those programs,
including, but not limited to:
(i) Creation of economic incentives for the persons for whom the
state purchases health care to appropriately utilize and purchase
health care services, including the development of flexible benefit
plans to offset increases in individual financial responsibility;
(ii) Utilization of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems,
utilization review, and prospective payment methods, and that ensure
access to quality care, including assuring reasonable access to local
providers, especially for employees residing in rural areas;
(iii) Coordination of state agency efforts to purchase drugs
effectively as provided in RCW 70.14.050;
(iv) Development of recommendations and methods for purchasing
medical equipment and supporting services on a volume discount basis;
and
(v) Development of data systems to obtain utilization data from
state-purchased health care programs in order to identify cost centers,
utilization patterns, provider and hospital practice patterns, and
procedure costs, utilizing the information obtained pursuant to RCW
41.05.031;
(c) To analyze areas of public and private health care interaction;
(d) To provide information and technical and administrative
assistance to the board;
(e) To review and approve or deny applications from counties,
municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state to
provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to their
employees in accordance with the provisions of RCW 41.04.205, setting
the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined in RCW
41.05.050;
(f) ((To appoint a health care policy technical advisory committee
as required by RCW 41.05.150;
(g) To establish billing procedures and collect funds from school
districts and educational service districts under RCW 28A.400.400 in a
way that minimizes the administrative burden on districts;
(h))) To publish and distribute to nonparticipating school
districts and educational service districts by October 1st of each year
a description of health care benefit plans available through the
authority and the estimated cost if school districts and educational
service district employees were enrolled; ((and
(i))) (g) To promulgate and adopt rules consistent with this
chapter as described in RCW 41.05.160; and
(h) To coordinate the development and distribution by agencies
administering state purchased health care programs of comprehensive
information about health care directives under chapter 70.122 RCW,
durable power of attorney for health care decisions under chapters 7.70
and 11.94 RCW, and other matters that bear on the right of a person to
have honored his or her decisions regarding health care, including the
decision to have life-sustaining treatment withheld or withdrawn. The
information shall include a copy of the directive set forth in RCW
70.122.030 with instructions on its proper execution.
(2) On and after January 1, 1996, the public employees' benefits
board may implement strategies to promote managed competition among
employee health benefit plans. Strategies may include but are not
limited to:
(a) Standardizing the benefit package;
(b) Soliciting competitive bids for the benefit package;
(c) Limiting the state's contribution to a percent of the lowest
priced qualified plan within a geographical area;
(d) Monitoring the impact of the approach under this subsection
with regards to: Efficiencies in health service delivery, cost shifts
to subscribers, access to and choice of managed care plans statewide,
and quality of health services. The health care authority shall also
advise on the value of administering a benchmark employer-managed plan
to promote competition among managed care plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The authority shall provide to each person enrolled in the
basic health plan or a plan of the public employees' benefits board the
information developed under RCW 41.05.021(1)(h) on the right of a
person to have honored his or her decisions regarding health care. The
information shall be provided to each person upon enrollment, and
annually thereafter, as long as the person remains enrolled.
(2) After January 1, 2007, to be eligible for enrollment in the
basic health plan or a health benefit plan developed by the public
employees' benefits board, any person eighteen years of age or older
must execute a health care directive as provided in RCW 70.122.030, or
indicate to the authority that he or she does not wish to execute such
a directive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall provide to each recipient of medical care
services under this chapter the information developed under RCW
41.05.021(1)(h) on the right of a person to have honored his or her
decisions regarding health care. The information shall be provided to
each recipient upon enrollment, and annually thereafter, as long as the
person remains a recipient of medical care services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 72.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall provide to each person admitted to a state
veterans' home the information developed under RCW 41.05.021(1)(h) on
the right of a person to have honored his or her decisions regarding
health care. The information shall be provided to each person upon
admission, and annually thereafter, as long as the person remains a
resident of the home.
(2) After January 1, 2007, to be eligible for admission to a state
veterans' home, a person must execute a health care directive as
provided in RCW 70.122.030, or indicate to the department that he or
she does not wish to execute such a directive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall provide to each worker, upon the determination
that he or she is entitled to compensation under this title, the
information developed under RCW 41.05.021(1)(h) on the right of a
person to have honored his or her decisions regarding health care.

Sec. 6 RCW 72.10.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 17 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon entry into the correctional system, offenders shall
receive an initial medical examination. The department shall prepare
a health profile for each offender that includes at least the following
information: (a) An identification of the offender's serious medical
and dental needs; (b) an evaluation of the offender's capacity for work
and recreation; and (c) a financial assessment of the offender's
ability to pay for all or a portion of his or her health care services
from personal resources or private insurance.
(2) The department shall provide to each offender, upon entry into
the correctional system, and annually thereafter, the information
developed under RCW 41.05.021(1)(h) on the right of a person to have
honored his or her decisions regarding health care.
(3)(a) The department may develop and implement a plan for the
delivery of health care services and personal hygiene items to
offenders in the department's correctional facilities, at the
discretion of the secretary, and in conformity with federal law.
(b) To discourage unwarranted use of health care services caused by
unnecessary visits to health care providers, offenders shall
participate in the costs of their health care services by paying a
nominal amount of no less than three dollars per visit, as determined
by the secretary. Under the authority granted in RCW 72.01.050(2), the
secretary may authorize the superintendent to collect this amount
directly from an offender's institution account. All copayments
collected from offenders' institution accounts shall be deposited into
the general fund.
(c) Offenders are required to make copayments for initial health
care visits that are offender initiated and, by rule adopted by the
department, may be charged a copayment for subsequent visits related to
the medical condition which caused the initial visit. Offenders are
not required to pay for emergency treatment or for visits initiated by
health care staff or treatment of those conditions that constitute a
serious health care need.
(d) No offender may be refused any health care service because of
indigence.
(e) At no time shall the withdrawal of funds for the payment of a
medical service copayment result in reducing an offender's institution
account to an amount less than the level of indigency as defined in
chapter 72.09 RCW.
(((3)(a))) (4) The department shall report annually to the
legislature the following information for the fiscal year preceding the
report: (((i))) (a) The total number of health care visits made by
offenders; (((ii))) (b) the total number of copayments assessed;
(((iii))) (c) the total dollar amount of copayments collected; (((iv)))
(d) the total number of copayments not collected due to an offender's
indigency; and (((v))) (e) the total number of copayments not assessed
due to the serious or emergent nature of the health care treatment or
because the health care visit was not offender initiated.
(((b) The first report required under this section shall be
submitted not later than October 1, 1996, and shall include, at a
minimum, all available information collected through the second half of
fiscal year 1996. This subsection (3)(b) shall expire December 1,
1996.
(4))) (5)(a) The secretary shall adopt, by rule, a uniform policy
relating to the distribution and replenishment of personal hygiene
items for inmates incarcerated in all department institutions. The
policy shall provide for the initial distribution of adequate personal
hygiene items to inmates upon their arrival at an institution.
(b) The acquisition of replenishment personal hygiene items is the
responsibility of inmates, except that indigent inmates shall not be
denied adequate personal hygiene items based on their inability to pay
for them.
(c) The policy shall provide that the replenishment personal
hygiene items be distributed to inmates only in authorized quantities
and at intervals that reflect prudent use and customary wear and
consumption of the items.
(((5))) (6) The following become a debt and are subject to RCW
72.09.450:
(a) All copayments under subsection (((2))) (3) of this section
that are not collected when the visit occurs; and
(b) All charges for replenishment personal hygiene items that are
not collected when the item is distributed.

--- END ---