BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79.02 RCW
to read as follows:
The department is authorized to contract out the management of all
state trust lands. Land managed on a contract basis is subject to all
relevant state and federal forest laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The office of financial management and
the department of personnel must develop procedures and standards to
allow the department of natural resources to contract out the
management of state trust lands.
(2) The office of financial management and the department of
personnel must jointly submit a report to the legislature that contains
detailed proposed legislation that will allow the department of natural
resources to contract out the management of state trust lands. The
report to the legislature is due by January 1, 2006.
(3) The department of natural resources is required to fully
cooperate with the office of financial management and the department of
personnel in implementing the report required in subsection (2) of this
section and in any other aspects of creating a contracting out program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---