BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of natural resources and department of fish and
wildlife shall, not later than December 31, 2005, present a transition
plan for consolidating the natural resource investigators of the
department of natural resources with the law enforcement program of the
department of fish and wildlife to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives. The transition
plan must include:
(1) A review of the law enforcement authorities and functions
affected by the transfer;
(2) Procedures for integrating the department of natural resources'
natural resource investigators into the department of fish and
wildlife's law enforcement program;
(3) Procedures for integrating affected department of natural
resources' employees and full-time equivalent positions into the
department of fish and wildlife;
(4) Methods to ensure that the department of natural resources'
employees shall maintain their bargaining unit and existing
representation;
(5) Identification of training necessary to integrate affected
department of natural resources' employees into the department of fish
and wildlife;
(6) Recommendations for any funding necessary to carry out this
section;
(7) Recommendations for any additional legislation necessary to
carry out this section; and
(8) Recommendations for ensuring at least the same level of
enforcement presence on state trust lands as provided through the
department of natural resources' current enforcement program.

--- END ---