BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.020 and 1994 c 124 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following real and personal property shall be exempt from
taxation:
All lands, buildings, and personal property required for necessary
administration and maintenance, used, or to the extent used,
exclusively for public burying grounds or cemeteries without
discrimination as to race, color, national origin or ancestry;
All churches, personal property, and the ground, not exceeding
((five)) twenty acres in area, upon which a church of any nonprofit
recognized religious denomination is or shall be built, together with
a parsonage, convent, and buildings and improvements required for the
maintenance and safeguarding of such property. The area exempted shall
in any case include all ground covered by the church, parsonage,
convent, and buildings and improvements required for the maintenance
and safeguarding of such property and the structures and ground
necessary for street access, parking, light, and ventilation, but the
area of unoccupied ground exempted in such cases, in connection with
the church, parsonage, convent, and buildings and improvements required
for the maintenance and safeguarding of such property, shall not exceed
the equivalent of one ((hundred twenty by one hundred twenty feet)) and
one-third acres except where additional unoccupied land may be required
to conform with state or local codes, zoning, or licensing
requirements. The parsonage and convent need not be on land contiguous
to the church property. To be exempt the property must be wholly used
for church purposes: PROVIDED, That the loan or rental of property
otherwise exempt under this paragraph to a nonprofit organization,
association, or corporation, or school for use for an eleemosynary
activity shall not nullify the exemption provided in this paragraph if
the rental income, if any, is reasonable and is devoted solely to the
operation and maintenance of the property.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.36.030 and 1993 c 327 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following real and personal property shall be exempt from
taxation:
(1) Property owned by nonprofit organizations or associations,
organized and conducted for nonsectarian purposes, which shall be used
for character-building, benevolent, protective or rehabilitative social
services directed at persons of all ages. The sale of donated
merchandise shall not be considered a commercial use of the property
under this section if the proceeds are devoted to the furtherance of
the purposes of the selling organization or association as specified in
this paragraph.
(2) Property owned by any nonprofit ((church)) religious
organization, denomination, or group of ((churches)) religious
organizations, or ((an)) any organization or association, the
membership of which is comprised solely of ((churches)) nonprofit
religious organizations or their qualified representatives, which is
utilized as a camp facility if used for organized and supervised
recreational activities and ((church)) religious exercise purposes as
related to such camp facilities. The exemption provided by this
paragraph shall apply to a maximum of ((two)) four hundred acres of any
such camp as selected by the ((church)) religious organization,
including buildings and other improvements thereon.
(3) Property, including buildings and improvements required for the
maintenance and safeguarding of such property, owned by nonprofit
organizations or associations engaged in character building of boys and
girls under eighteen years of age, and used for such purposes and uses,
provided such purposes and uses are for the general public good:
PROVIDED, That if existing charters provide that organizations or
associations, which would otherwise qualify under the provisions of
this paragraph, serve boys and girls up to the age of twenty-one years,
then such organizations or associations shall be deemed qualified
pursuant to this section.
(4) Property owned by all organizations and societies of veterans
of any war of the United States, recognized as such by the department
of defense, which shall have national charters, and which shall have
for their general purposes and objects the preservation of the memories
and associations incident to their war service and the consecration of
the efforts of their members to mutual helpfulness and to patriotic and
community service to state and nation. To be exempt such property must
be used in such manner as may be reasonably necessary to carry out the
purposes and objects of such societies.
The use of the property for pecuniary gain or to promote business
activities, except as provided in this subsection (4), nullifies the
exemption otherwise available for the property for the assessment year.
The exemption is not nullified by:
(a) The collection of rent or donations if the amount is reasonable
and does not exceed maintenance and operation expenses.
(b) Fund-raising activities conducted by a nonprofit organization.
(c) The use of the property for pecuniary gain for periods of not
more than three days in a year.
(d) An inadvertent use of the property in a manner inconsistent
with the purpose for which exemption is granted, if the inadvertent use
is not part of a pattern of use. A pattern of use is presumed when an
inadvertent use is repeated in the same assessment year or in two or
more successive assessment years.
(5) Property owned by all corporations, incorporated under any act
of congress, whose principal purposes are to furnish volunteer aid to
members of the armed forces of the United States and also to carry on
a system of national and international relief and to apply the same in
mitigating the sufferings caused by pestilence, famine, fire, floods,
and other national calamities and to devise and carry on measures for
preventing the same.
(6) Property owned by nonprofit organizations exempt from federal
income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of
1954, as amended, that are guarantee agencies under the federal
guaranteed student loan program or that issue debt to provide or
acquire student loans.
(7) To be exempt under this section, the property must be used
exclusively for the purposes for which exemption is granted, except as
provided in RCW 84.36.805.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2006 and thereafter.

--- END ---