BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there is a
serious problem of increasing incidents of breast cancer in the United
States; and that virtually every known risk factor for breast cancer
involves elevated levels of estrogen.
(2) The legislature further finds that the first trimester of
pregnancy is a time of very high estrogen concentrations in a woman's
body, that abortion terminates pregnancy in an artificial manner, that
abortion before the first live birth has been linked to an increased
risk of breast cancer in over twenty published articles in reputable
journals, and that no cancer expert has denied that abortion may cause
breast cancer.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The secretary of health shall hold
hearings to compile and summarize research linking abortion to breast
cancer. This research shall be updated annually until 2010.
(2) This section expires January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 It is unlawful to perform an abortion on a
woman without advising her of research linking abortion to breast
cancer. The department of health summary of research under section 2
of this act shall be presumed to be sufficient information about this
research.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A minor cannot give informed consent to a
substantial cancer risk.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 It is unlawful for a person to perform an
abortion unless that person has sufficient malpractice insurance to
cover potential liability for reproductive cancers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 9.02 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, morals, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect immediately.

--- END ---