BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except in a medical emergency, or except as provided in this
section, if a pregnant woman is less than eighteen years of age and not
emancipated, or if she has been adjudged an incapacitated person, a
physician shall not perform an abortion upon her unless at least forty-eight hours before the abortion, in the case of a woman who is less
than eighteen years of age, he or she first notifies one of her
parents; or, in the case of a woman who is an incapacitated person, he
or she first notifies one of her guardians. In the case of a pregnancy
that is the result of incest where the father is a party to the
incestuous act, the physician need only notify the pregnant woman's
mother or guardian.
(2) If both parents have died or are otherwise unavailable to the
physician within at least twenty-four hours, notification of the
pregnant woman's guardian or guardians is sufficient. If the pregnant
woman's parents are divorced, notification of the parent having custody
is sufficient. If neither parent nor the guardian is available to the
physician within twenty-four hours, notification of any adult person
standing in loco parentis is sufficient.
(3) If the pregnant woman elects not to allow the notification of
either of her parents or of her guardian, the superior court in which
the applicant resides or in which the abortion is sought shall, upon
petition or motion, after an appropriate hearing, authorize a physician
to perform the abortion if the court determines that the pregnant woman
is mature and capable of giving informed consent to the proposed
abortion, and has, in fact, given such consent.
(4) If the court determines that the pregnant woman is not mature
and capable of giving informed consent or if the pregnant woman does
not claim to be mature and capable of giving informed consent, the
court shall determine whether the performance of an abortion upon her
would be in her best interests. If the court determines that the
performance of an abortion would be in the best interests of the woman,
it shall authorize a physician to perform the abortion.
(5) The pregnant woman may participate in proceedings in the court
on her own behalf and the court may appoint a guardian ad litem to
assist her. The court shall, however, advise her that she has a right
to court-appointed counsel, and shall provide her with such counsel
unless she wishes to appear with private counsel or has knowingly and
intelligently waived representation by counsel.
(6)(a) Court proceedings under this section are confidential and
shall be given such precedence over other pending matters as will
ensure that the court may reach a decision promptly and without delay
in order to serve the best interests of the pregnant woman. In no case
shall the court fail to rule within three business days of the date of
application. A court that conducts proceedings under this section
shall make in writing specific factual findings and legal conclusions
supporting its decision and shall, upon the initial filing of the
minor's petition for judicial authorization of an abortion, order a
sealed record of the petition, pleadings, submissions, transcripts,
exhibits, orders, evidence, and any other written material to be
maintained which shall include its own findings and conclusions.
(b) The application to the court shall be accompanied by a
nonnotarized verification stating that the information therein is true
and correct to the best of the applicant's knowledge, and the
application shall set forth the following facts:
(i) The initials of the pregnant woman;
(ii) The age of the pregnant woman;
(iii) The names and addresses of each parent, guardian or, if the
minor's parents are deceased and no guardian has been appointed, any
other person standing in loco parentis to the minor;
(iv) That the pregnant woman has been fully informed of the risks
and consequences of the abortion;
(v) Whether the pregnant woman is of sound mind and has sufficient
intellectual capacity to consent to the abortion;
(vi) A prayer for relief asking the court to either grant the
pregnant woman full capacity for the purpose of personal consent to the
abortion, or to give judicial consent to the abortion under subsection
(4) of this section based upon a finding that the abortion is in the
best interest of the pregnant woman;
(vii) That the pregnant woman is aware that any false statements
made in the application are punishable by law; and
(viii) The signature of the pregnant woman. If necessary to serve
the interest of justice, the family court shall refer the pregnant
woman to the appropriate personnel for assistance in preparing the
application.
(c) The name of the pregnant woman shall not be entered on any
docket that is subject to public inspection. All persons shall be
excluded from hearings under this section except the applicant and such
other persons whose presence is specifically requested by the applicant
or her guardian.
(d) At the hearing, the court shall hear evidence relating to the
emotional development, maturity, intellect, and understanding of the
pregnant woman, the fact and duration of her pregnancy, the nature,
possible consequences, and alternatives to the abortion, and any other
evidence that the court may find useful in determining whether the
pregnant woman should be granted full capacity for the purpose of
consenting to the abortion or whether the abortion is in the best
interest of the pregnant woman. The court shall also notify the
pregnant woman at the hearing that it must rule on her application
within three business days of the date of its filing and that, should
the court fail to rule in favor of her application within the allotted
time, she has the right to appeal to the superior court.
(7) Except in a medical emergency, no parent, guardian, or other
person standing in loco parentis shall coerce a minor or incapacitated
woman to undergo an abortion. Any minor or incapacitated woman who is
threatened with such coercion may apply to the superior court for
relief. The court shall provide the minor or incapacitated woman with
counsel, give the matter expedited consideration, and grant such relief
as may be necessary to prevent such coercion. Should a minor be denied
the financial support of her parents by reason of her refusal to
undergo abortion, she shall be considered emancipated for purposes of
eligibility for assistance benefits.
(8) No filing fees shall be required of any woman availing herself
of the procedures provided by this section. An expedited confidential
appeal shall be available to any pregnant woman whom the court fails to
grant an order authorizing an abortion within the time specified in
this section. Any court to which an appeal is taken under this section
shall give prompt and confidential attention thereto and shall rule
thereon within five business days of the filing of the appeal. The
supreme court may issue such rules as may further assure that the
process provided in this section is conducted in such a manner as will
ensure confidentiality and sufficient precedence over other pending
matters to ensure promptness of disposition.
(9) Any person who performs an abortion upon a woman who is an
unemancipated minor or incapacitated person to whom this section
applies either with knowledge that she is a minor or incapacitated
person to whom this section applies, or with reckless disregard or
negligence as to whether she is a minor or incapacitated person to whom
this section applies, and who intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly
fails to conform to any requirement of this section is guilty of
unprofessional conduct and his or her license for the practice of
medicine and surgery shall be suspended for a period of at least three
months. Failure to comply with the requirements of this section is
prima facie evidence of failure to obtain informed consent and of
interference with family relations in appropriate civil actions. The
law shall not be construed to preclude the award of exemplary damages
or damages for emotional distress even if unaccompanied by physical
complications in any appropriate civil action relevant to violations of
this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the
common law rights of parents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, morals, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect immediately.

--- END ---