BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.48.010 and 1971 ex.s. c 55 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) When any employee shall cease to work for an employer,
whether by discharge or by voluntary withdrawal, the wages due ((him on
account of his employment)) shall be paid to ((him at the end of the
established pay period: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That this paragraph)) the
employee within twenty-four hours of the cessation of such work at the
usual pay location of the employer.
(b) An employer that fails to pay wages as required by (a) of this
subsection is liable for one hundred dollars in liquidated damages for
each day for which the wages remain unpaid in addition to any other
available legal remedies.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply:
(a) When workers are engaged in an employment that normally
involves working for several employers in the same industry
interchangeably, and the several employers or some of them cooperate to
establish a plan for the weekly payment of wages at a central place or
places and in accordance with a unified schedule of paydays providing
for at least one payday each week; but this subsection shall not apply
to any such plan until ten days after notice of their intention to set
up such a plan shall have been given to the director of labor and
industries by the employers who cooperate to establish the plan; and
having once been established, no such plan can be abandoned except
after notice of their intention to abandon such plan has been given to
the director of labor and industries by the employers intending to
abandon the plan((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the duty to pay an employee
forthwith shall not apply)); or
(b) If the labor-management agreement under which the employee has
been employed provides otherwise.
(3) It shall be unlawful for any employer to withhold or divert any
portion of an employee's wages unless the deduction is:
(((1))) (a) Required by state or federal law; or
(((2))) (b) Specifically agreed upon orally or in writing by the
employee and employer; or
(((3))) (c) For medical, surgical or hospital care or service,
pursuant to any rule or regulation: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
deduction is openly, clearly and in due course recorded in the
employer's books and records.
((Paragraph three)) (4) Subsection (3) of this section shall not be
construed to affect the right of any employer or former employer to sue
upon or collect any debt owed to ((said)) the employer or former
employer by ((his)) any employee((s)) or former employee((s)).

--- END ---