BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.63A.125 and 1999 c 295 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a competitive process to solicit
proposals for and prioritize projects that assist nonprofit
organizations in acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating facilities
used for the delivery of nonresidential social services.
(2) The department shall establish a competitive process to
prioritize applications for the assistance as follows:
(a) The department shall conduct a statewide solicitation of
project applications from local governments, nonprofit organizations,
and other entities, as determined by the department. The department
shall evaluate and rank applications in consultation with a citizen
advisory committee using objective criteria. At a minimum, applicants
must demonstrate that the requested assistance will increase the
efficiency or quality of the social services it provides to citizens.
The evaluation and ranking process shall also include an examination of
existing assets that applicants may apply to projects. Grant
assistance under this section shall not exceed twenty-five percent of
the total cost of the project. The nonstate portion of the total
project cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired
solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions.
(b) The department shall submit a prioritized list of recommended
projects to the governor and the legislature in the department's
biennial capital budget request beginning with the 2001-2003 biennium
and thereafter. For the 1999-2001 biennium, the department shall
conduct a solicitation and ranking process, as described in (a) of this
subsection, for projects to be funded by appropriations provided for
this program in the 1999-2001 capital budget. The list shall include
a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding,
and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The
total amount of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial
project list shall not exceed ((four)) eight million dollars. ((The
department may provide an additional alternate project list which shall
not exceed five hundred thousand dollars.)) Except for the 1999-2001
biennium, the department shall not sign contracts or otherwise
financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature has
approved a specific list of projects.
(c) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the
department shall include provisions which require that capital
improvements shall be held by the grantee for a specified period of
time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities shall
be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found
to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee
shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant
plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington
general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of
authorization of the grant.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2013.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.63A.750 and 1999 c 295 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A competitive grant program to assist nonprofit organizations
in acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating performing arts, art
museums, and cultural facilities is created.
(2)(a) The department shall submit a list of recommended performing
arts, art museum projects, and cultural organization projects eligible
for funding to the governor and the legislature in the department's
biennial capital budget request beginning with the 2001-2003 biennium
and thereafter. The list, in priority order, shall include a
description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding,
and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The
total amount of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial
project list shall not exceed ((four)) eight million dollars. ((The
department may provide an additional alternate project list which shall
not exceed five hundred thousand dollars.))
(b) The department shall establish a competitive process to
prioritize applications for state assistance as follows:
(i) The department shall conduct a statewide solicitation of
project applications from nonprofit organizations, local governments,
and other entities, as determined by the department. The department
shall evaluate and rank applications in consultation with a citizen
advisory committee, including a representative from the state arts
commission, using objective criteria. The evaluation and ranking
process shall also consider local community support for projects and an
examination of existing assets that applicants may apply to projects.
(ii) The department may establish the amount of state grant
assistance for individual project applications but the amount shall not
exceed twenty percent of the estimated total capital cost or actual
cost of a project, whichever is less. The remaining portions of the
project capital cost shall be a match from nonstate sources. The
nonstate match may include cash, the value of real property when
acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind
contributions. The department is authorized to set matching
requirements for individual projects. State assistance may be used to
fund separate definable phases of a project if the project demonstrates
adequate progress and has secured the necessary match funding.
(iii) The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise
financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature has
approved a specific list of projects. In contracts for grants
authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions
requiring that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a
specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and
that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the
grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the
contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2013.

Sec. 3 RCW 27.34.330 and 1999 c 295 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state historical society shall establish a
competitive process to solicit proposals for and prioritize heritage
capital projects for potential funding in the state capital budget.
The society shall adopt rules governing project eligibility and
evaluation criteria. Application for funding of specific projects may
be made to the society by local governments, public development
authorities, nonprofit corporations, tribal governments, and other
entities, as determined by the society. The society, with the advice
of leaders in the heritage field, including but not limited to
representatives from the office of the secretary of state, the eastern
Washington state historical society, and the state office of
archaeology and historic preservation, shall establish and submit a
prioritized list of heritage capital projects to the governor and the
legislature in the society's biennial capital budget request. The list
shall include a description of each project, the amount of recommended
state funding, and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the
project. The total amount of recommended state funding for projects on
a biennial project list shall not exceed ((four)) eight million
dollars. ((The department may provide an additional alternate project
list which shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars.)) The
prioritized list shall be developed through open and public meetings
and the amount of state funding shall not exceed thirty-three percent
of the total cost of the project. The nonstate portion of the total
project cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired
solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions. The
department shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate
funds under this section until the legislature has approved a specific
list of projects. In contracts for grants authorized under this
section, the society shall include provisions requiring that capital
improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time
appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for
the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of
compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to
the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest
calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general
obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of
the grant.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2013.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.63A.135 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 7 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and
prioritize projects whose primary objective is to assist nonprofit
youth organizations in acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating
facilities used for the delivery of nonresidential services, excluding
outdoor athletic fields.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must establish a competitive process to prioritize applications for the
assistance as follows:
(a) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must conduct a statewide solicitation of project applications from
local governments, nonprofit organizations, and other entities, as
determined by the department of community, trade, and economic
development. The department of community, trade, and economic
development must evaluate and rank applications in consultation with a
citizen advisory committee using objective criteria. Projects must
have a major recreational component, and must have either an
educational or social service component. At a minimum, applicants must
demonstrate that the requested assistance will increase the efficiency
or quality of the services it provides to youth. The evaluation and
ranking process must also include an examination of existing assets
that applicants may apply to projects. Grant assistance under this
section may not exceed twenty-five percent of the total cost of the
project. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may include
cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the purpose
of the project, and in-kind contributions.
(b) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the governor
and the legislature in the department of community, trade, and economic
development's biennial capital budget request beginning with the 2005-2007 biennium and thereafter. The list must include a description of
each project, the amount of recommended state funding, and
documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The total
amount of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial project
list must not exceed ((two)) four million dollars. The department of
community, trade, and economic development may provide an additional
alternate project list that must not exceed five hundred thousand
dollars. The department of community, trade, and economic development
may not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds under
this section until the legislature has approved a specific list of
projects.
(c) In contracts for grants authorized under this section the
department of community, trade, and economic development must include
provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the
grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the
grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant.
If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the
contract, the grantee must repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 1999 c 295 s 4 (uncodified) is repealed.

--- END ---