BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
Under RCW 28A.150.260, the superintendent of public instruction
shall revise the definition of a full-time equivalent student to
include students who receive instruction through digital or online
programs. Digital or online programs mean electronically delivered
learning that occurs primarily away from the classroom. The
superintendent of public instruction has the authority to adopt rules
to implement the revised definition beginning with the 2005-2007
biennium. The rules shall include but not be limited to the following:
(1) Defining a full-time equivalent student under RCW 28A.150.260
or part-time student under RCW 28A.150.350 based upon the district's
estimated average weekly hours under subsection (8) of this section.
The rules shall require districts providing programs under this section
to nonresident students to obtain a release under RCW 28A.225.225 or
enter into an interdistrict agreement with the resident district, which
agreement addresses at a minimum the coordination of student counting
for state funding so that no student is counted for more than one full-time equivalent in the aggregate;
(2) Requiring the board of directors of a school district offering
a digital or online program to adopt and annually review written
policies for each program and program provider;
(3) Requiring each school district offering a digital or online
program to report annually to the superintendent of public instruction
on the types of programs and course offerings, and number of students
participating;
(4) Requiring documentation of the district of the student's
physical residence;
(5) Requiring that supervision, monitoring, assessment, and
evaluation of the digital or online program be provided by certificated
instructional staff;
(6) Requiring compliance with the classroom staffing ratios
comparable to that provided in the district's overall classroom
staffing ratio and requiring documentation of that compliance;
(7) Requiring a learning plan for each student receiving
instruction in a digital or online program. The rules shall allow
course syllabi and other additional information to be used to meet the
requirement for a learning plan;
(8) Requiring that, for appropriate digital and online programs,
full-time equivalency be based on the estimated weekly average hours of
learning activity identified in the learning plan as long as a student
is found, through monthly evaluation, to be making satisfactory
progress;
(9) Requiring that the district assess the educational progress of
enrolled students at least annually, using, for full-time students, the
state assessment for the student's grade level and using any other
annual assessments required by the school district. Part-time students
shall also be assessed at least annually. However, part-time students
who are either receiving home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200
RCW or who are enrolled in an approved private school under chapter
28A.195 RCW are not required to participate in the assessments required
under chapter 28A.655 RCW. The rules shall address how students who
reside outside the geographic service area of the school district are
to be assessed;
(10) Requiring that each student enrolled in the program have
direct personal contact with certificated instructional staff at least
weekly. Direct personal contact is for the purposes of instruction,
review of assignments, testing, evaluation of student progress, or
other learning activities. Direct personal contact may include the use
of telephone, e-mail, instant messaging, interactive video
communication, or other means of digital communication;
(11) Requiring any public schools whose primary purpose is to
provide digital or online learning programs to receive accreditation
through the state accreditation program or through the regional
accreditation program;
(12) Requiring state-funded public schools or public school
programs whose primary purpose is to provide digital or online learning
to offer only courses aligned with the state essential academic
learning requirements; and
(13) Requiring that a school district that provides one or more
digital courses to a student who is receiving home-based instruction
under chapter 28A.200 RCW shall provide the parent or guardian of the
student with a description of any difference between home-based
education and the enrollment option selected by the student. The
parent or guardian shall sign documentation attesting to his or her
understanding of the difference and the documentation shall be retained
by the district and made available for audit.

--- END ---