BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied, and there shall be collected as
provided by this chapter, an additional tax upon the sale, use,
consumption, handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes in an
amount equal to the rate of:
(a) Thirty mills per cigarette through June 30, 2007; and
(b) Forty mills per cigarette after June 30, 2007.
(2)(a) The money collected under subsection (1)(a) of this section
during any month shall be deposited by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month as follows:
(i) 22.1 percent into the health services account created in RCW
43.72.900;
(ii) 1.75 percent into the water quality account created in RCW
70.146.030;
(iii) 2.3 percent into the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account created in RCW 69.50.520;
(iv) 5.1 percent to the general fund; and
(v) The remainder into the student achievement fund created in RCW
43.135.045. If, however, the amounts deposited in the student
achievement fund under chapter 28A.505 RCW are sufficient to provide
the total allocations per full-time equivalent student in chapter
28A.505 RCW, the remainder of the money collected under subsection
(1)(a) of this section shall be transferred into the general fund. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall notify the
department if the amounts deposited in the student achievement fund
under chapter 28A.505 RCW are sufficient to provide the total
allocations per full-time equivalent student in chapter 28A.505 RCW.
(b) The money collected under subsection (1)(b) of this section
during any month shall be deposited by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month as follows:
(i) 25.3 percent into the health services account created in RCW
43.72.900;
(ii) 2.05 percent into the water quality account created in RCW
70.146.030 until June 30, 2021;
(iii) 2.65 percent into the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account created in RCW 69.50.520;
(iv) 5.8 percent to the general fund; and
(v) The remainder into the student achievement fund created in RCW
43.135.045. If, however, the amounts deposited in the student
achievement fund under chapter 28A.505 RCW are sufficient to provide
the total allocations per full-time equivalent student in chapter
28A.505 RCW, the remainder of the money collected under subsection
(1)(b) of this section shall be transferred into the general fund. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall notify the
department if the amounts deposited in the student achievement fund
under chapter 28A.505 RCW are sufficient to provide the total
allocations per full-time equivalent student in chapter 28A.505 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.50.520 and 2004 c 276 s 912 are each amended to
read as follows:
The violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in
the state treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8),
66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(9)(a), 82.08.150(5),
82.24.020(2), section 1(2) (a)(iii) and (b)(iii) of this act,
82.64.020, and section 420, chapter 271, Laws of 1989 shall be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for funding services and programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989
and chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess., including state incarceration
costs. Funds from the account may also be appropriated to reimburse
local governments for costs associated with implementing criminal
justice legislation including chapter 338, Laws of 1997. During the
2003-2005 biennium, funds from the account may also be used for costs
associated with providing grants to local governments in accordance
with chapter 338, Laws of 1997, funding drug offender treatment
services in accordance with RCW 70.96A.350, maintenance and operating
costs of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs jail
reporting system, maintenance and operating costs of the juvenile
rehabilitation administration's client activity tracking system, civil
indigent legal representation, multijurisdictional narcotics task
forces, and grants to community networks under chapter 70.190 RCW by
the family policy council.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.146.030 and 2004 c 277 s 909 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The water quality account is hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be used only in a manner
consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the account shall be
administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject to
legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
tax receipts as provided in RCW 82.24.027, section 1(2) (a)(ii) and
(b)(ii) of this act, 82.26.025, and 82.32.390, principal and interest
from the repayment of any loans granted pursuant to this chapter, and
any other moneys appropriated to the account by the legislature.
(2) The department may use or permit the use of any moneys in the
account to make grants or loans to public bodies, including grants to
public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where federal, local,
or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing basis, for water
pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes of
assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water
pollution control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments
made by a public body to a service provider under a service agreement
entered into pursuant to RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this
chapter and for related administrative expenses. For the period July
1, 2003, to June 30, 2005, moneys in the account may be used to process
applications received by the department that seek to make changes to or
transfer existing water rights, for water conveyance projects, and for
grants and technical assistance to public bodies for watershed planning
under chapter 90.82 RCW. No more than three percent of the moneys
deposited in the account may be used by the department to pay for the
administration of the grant and loan program authorized by this
chapter.
(3) Beginning with the biennium ending June 30, 1997, the
department shall present a biennial progress report on the use of
moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate committee on ways
and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.
The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31st of the odd-numbered year. The
report shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description,
and amount of the grant, loan, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---