BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Statistical data available from the
administrative office of the courts suggests that juvenile offender
case filings in King county have dropped at a faster rate than juvenile
offender case filings in other counties in the state. In order to
better inform the legislature in developing public policy to assist in
the reduction of all juvenile offender case filings throughout the
state, the legislature finds that it is important to study the factors
contributing to the differences in the filing rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall study the rates of juvenile offender case filings in
counties across the state and focus on factors that may contribute to
the difference in filing rates. The study shall contemplate data
compiled over the past ten years in at least the following areas:
(a) Referrals to the juvenile justice system;
(b) Arrest rates;
(c) Incarceration rates;
(d) Differences in risk assessment tools used over time and across
geographical areas;
(e) Rates at which moderate and high-risk juvenile offenders are
receiving delivery of programs which meet the Washington state
institute for public policy's effectiveness standards for juvenile
accountability programs, such as aggression replacement therapy,
functional family therapy, and multisystemic therapy;
(f) Recidivism rates;
(g) Implementation of local laws focusing on juvenile offenders;
(h) Funding levels and sources of funding for programs directed at
juvenile offenders;
(i) Demographic factors;
(j) Changes in the handling of cases involving juvenile offenders
after implementation of the Becca bills; and
(k) The effects of the establishment of juvenile drug courts and
treatment courts.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall report
its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2005.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2006.

--- END ---