BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.02 RCW
to read as follows:
Each hospital and facility where lawful induced abortions are
performed during the first, second, or third trimester of pregnancy
shall, on forms prescribed and supplied by the secretary of health,
report to the department of health during the following month the
number and dates of induced abortions performed during the previous
month, giving for each abortion the age of the patient, geographic
location of patient's residence, patient's previous pregnancy history,
the duration of the pregnancy, the method of abortion, any
complications, such as perforations, infections, and incomplete
evacuations, and the name of the physician or physicians performing or
participating in the abortion. A copy of the report shall be delivered
to the birth mother and, if available at the time, the biological
father. Reports must then be kept on file by the department of health
for two biennia.

--- END ---