BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.22.030 and 2004 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Underinsured motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle with respect
to the ownership, maintenance, or use of which either no bodily injury
or property damage liability bond or insurance policy applies at the
time of an accident, or with respect to which the sum of the limits of
liability under all bodily injury or property damage liability bonds
and insurance policies applicable to a covered person after an accident
is less than the applicable damages which the covered person is legally
entitled to recover.
(2) No new policy or renewal of an existing policy insuring against
loss resulting from liability imposed by law for bodily injury, death,
or property damage, suffered by any person arising out of the
ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle shall be issued with
respect to any motor vehicle registered or principally garaged in this
state unless coverage is provided therein or supplemental thereto for
the protection of persons insured thereunder who are legally entitled
to recover damages from owners or operators of underinsured motor
vehicles, hit-and-run motor vehicles, and phantom vehicles because of
bodily injury, death, or property damage, resulting therefrom, except
while operating or occupying a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, and
except while operating or occupying a motor vehicle owned or available
for the regular use by the named insured or any family member, and
which is not insured under the liability coverage of the policy. The
coverage required to be offered under this chapter is not applicable to
general liability policies, commonly known as umbrella policies, or
other policies which apply only as excess to the insurance directly
applicable to the vehicle insured.
(3) ((Except as to property damage,)) Coverage required under
subsection (2) of this section shall be in the same amount as ((the
insured's third party liability coverage unless the insured rejects all
or part of the coverage as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
Coverage for property damage need only be issued in conjunction with
coverage for bodily injury or death)) set forth in RCW 46.29.090.
Property damage coverage required under subsection (2) of this section
shall mean physical damage to the insured motor vehicle unless the
policy specifically provides coverage for the contents thereof or other
forms of property damage.
(4) ((A named insured or spouse may reject, in writing,
underinsured coverage for bodily injury or death, or property damage,
and the requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall
not apply. If a named insured or spouse has rejected underinsured
coverage, such coverage shall not be included in any supplemental or
renewal policy unless a named insured or spouse subsequently requests
such coverage in writing. The requirement of a written rejection under
this subsection shall apply only to the original issuance of policies
issued after July 24, 1983, and not to any renewal or replacement
policy.
(5))) The limit of liability under the policy coverage may be
defined as the maximum limits of liability for all damages resulting
from any one accident regardless of the number of covered persons,
claims made, or vehicles or premiums shown on the policy, or premiums
paid, or vehicles involved in an accident.
(((6) The policy may provide that if an injured person has other
similar insurance available to him under other policies, the total
limits of liability of all coverages shall not exceed the higher of the
applicable limits of the respective coverages.
(7))) (5)(a) The policy may provide for a deductible of not more
than three hundred dollars for payment for property damage when the
damage is caused by a hit-and-run driver or a phantom vehicle.
(b) In all other cases of underinsured property damage coverage,
the policy may provide for a deductible of not more than one hundred
dollars.
(((8))) (6) For the purposes of this chapter, a "phantom vehicle"
shall mean a motor vehicle which causes bodily injury, death, or
property damage to an insured and has no physical contact with the
insured or the vehicle which the insured is occupying at the time of
the accident if:
(a) The facts of the accident can be corroborated by competent
evidence other than the testimony of the insured or any person having
an underinsured motorist claim resulting from the accident; and
(b) The accident has been reported to the appropriate law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours of the accident.
(((9))) (7) An insurer who elects to write motorcycle or motor-driven cycle insurance in this state must provide information to
prospective insureds about the coverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Any insurer licensed within the state of Washington that provides
motor vehicle liability policies, as provided under chapter 46.30 RCW
or motor vehicle casualty insurance policies, as provided in RCW
48.22.030, must offer such insurance coverage to all automobiles, as
defined in RCW 48.22.005, including, but not limited to motorcycles,
motor-driven cycles, and mopeds. For the purpose of this section
motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, and moped are defined as provided in
chapter 46.04 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.22.085 and 2003 c 115 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) No new automobile liability insurance policy or renewal of
such an existing policy may be issued unless personal injury protection
coverage is ((offered as an optional coverage.
(2) A named insured may reject, in writing, personal injury
protection coverage and the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section shall not apply. If a named insured rejects personal injury
protection coverage:
(a) That rejection is valid and binding as to all levels of
coverage and on all persons who might have otherwise been insured under
such coverage; and
(b) The insurer is not required to include personal injury
protection coverage in any supplemental, renewal, or replacement policy
unless a named insured subsequently requests such coverage in writing))
included.

--- END ---