BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that free-standing
health clinics are an important component of the health care system in
Washington state. Many services formerly performed only in hospitals
are now performed in such clinics. This may provide Washington
residents with increased access to affordable services, but could be
detrimental to patient health and safety. Unlike many other states,
Washington does not license or otherwise regulate these clinics. It is
the intent of the legislature to determine whether licensure and
regulation of free-standing health clinics in Washington is
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of health shall study and
report on the need for the state to license and regulate free-standing
health clinics. The study shall consider:
(a) Trends in the number and type of procedures performed in
free-standing health clinics that at one time were exclusively
performed in hospitals;
(b) The extent to which the lack of state licensing and regulation
of free-standing health clinics impacts the health, safety, or welfare
of clinic patients;
(c) The potential statewide impact of licensing and regulation on
patient access to affordable care;
(d) The extent to which free-standing health clinics are subject to
licensure and regulation in other states, the nature of that
regulation, and evidence of its effect on patient safety and access to
affordable care; and
(e) Any other factors the department of health determines relevant
to the question of whether the state should license and regulate
free-standing health clinics.
(2) In conducting the study, the department of health shall consult
with all relevant parties and report its findings and recommendations
to the legislature by December 1, 2005.
(3) For purposes of this section, "free-standing health clinic"
means any facility not otherwise part of a licensed hospital where
advice, counseling, diagnosis, treatment, surgery, care, or services
relating to the preservation or maintenance of health are provided on
an outpatient basis for a period of less than twenty-four consecutive
hours to persons not residing or confined at such facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires December 31, 2005.

--- END ---