BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a person's right
to privacy with respect to his or her vote for an elective office is of
the highest importance, and it is the duty of the legislature to do
everything within the constitutional limitations of its power to
protect that privacy. A person's vote is a mark of identification that
shall not be altered, defaced, removed, covered, or destroyed by any
means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Ballot enhancement" is the process of adding or covering marks or
punches on an optical scan ballot to ensure that the electronic voting
equipment will tally the votes on the ballot in the manner intended by
the voter, or as directed by the canvassing board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 29A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Ballots may not be enhanced, as that term is defined in section
2 of this act. If a ballot is rejected by a tabulating machine during
the tallying or machine recount process, the ballot must be separated
from all other validly tabulated ballots and later considered by the
canvassing board. If the voter did not follow the rules of the voting
procedure provided for in the voting directions, the canvassing board
is prohibited from inferring intent and must reject the ballot as
invalid.
(2) A ballot may not be duplicated for any reason.

--- END ---