BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Asthma is a dangerous disease that is growing in prevalence in
Washington state. An estimated five hundred thousand residents of the
state suffer from asthma. Since 1995, asthma has claimed more than
five hundred lives, caused more than twenty-five thousand
hospitalizations with costs of more than one hundred twelve million
dollars, and resulted in seven million five hundred thousand missed
school days. School nurses have identified over four thousand children
with life-threatening asthma in the state's schools.
(2) While asthma is found among all populations, its prevalence
disproportionately affects low-income and minority populations.
Untreated asthma affects worker productivity and results in unnecessary
absences from work. In many cases, asthma triggers present in
substandard housing and poorly ventilated workplaces contribute
directly to asthma.
(3) Although research continues into the causes and cures for
asthma, national consensus has been reached on treatment guidelines.
People with asthma who are being treated in accordance with these
guidelines are far more likely to control the disease than those who
are not being treated and therefore are less likely to experience
debilitating or life-threatening asthma episodes, less likely to be
hospitalized, and less likely to need to curtail normal school or work
activities. With treatment, most people with asthma are able to live
normal, active lives.
(4) Up to one-third of the people with asthma have not had their
disease diagnosed. Among those with diagnosed asthma, thirty to fifty
percent are not receiving medicines that are needed to control the
disease, and approximately eighty percent of diagnosed asthmatics are
not getting yearly spirometry measurements that are a key element in
monitoring the disease.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction and the secretary of
the department of health shall develop a uniform policy for all school
districts providing for the in-service training for school staff on
symptoms, treatment, and monitoring of students with asthma and on the
additional observations that may be needed in different situations that
may arise during the school day and during school-sponsored events.
The policy shall include the standards and skills that must be in place
for in-service training of school staff.
(2) All school districts shall adopt policies regarding asthma
rescue procedures and asthma prevention policies for each school within
the district.
(3) All school districts must require that each public elementary
school and secondary school grant to any student in the school
authorization for the self-administration of medication to treat that
student's asthma or anaphylaxis, if:
(a) A health care practitioner prescribed the medication for use by
the student during school hours and instructed the student in the
correct and responsible use of the medication;
(b) The student has demonstrated to the health care practitioner,
or the practitioner's designee, and a professional registered nurse at
the school, the skill level necessary to use the medication and any
device that is necessary to administer the medication as prescribed;
(c) The health care practitioner formulates a written treatment
plan for managing asthma or anaphylaxis episodes of the student and for
medication use by the student during school hours; and
(d) The student's parent or guardian has completed and submitted to
the school any written documentation required by the school, including
the treatment plan formulated under (c) of this subsection and other
documents related to liability.
(4) An authorization granted under subsection (3) of this section
must allow the student involved to possess and use his or her
medication:
(a) While in school;
(b) While at a school-sponsored activity, such as a sporting event;
and
(c) In transit to or from school or school-sponsored activities.
(5) An authorization granted under subsection (3) of this section:
(a) Must be effective only for the same school and school year for
which it is granted; and
(b) Must be renewed by the parent or guardian each subsequent
school year in accordance with this subsection.
(6) School districts must require that backup medication, if
provided by a student's parent or guardian, be kept at a student's
school in a location to which the student has immediate access in the
event of an asthma or anaphylaxis emergency.
(7) School districts must require that information described in
subsection (3)(c) and (d) of this section be kept on file at the
student's school in a location easily accessible in the event of an
asthma or anaphylaxis emergency.
(8) Nothing in this section creates a cause of action or in any
other way increases or diminishes the liability of any person under any
other law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The authority shall coordinate among state agencies and health
plans delivering state purchased health services for including asthma
management, including development of individual asthma management
plans, among the disease management programs that are encouraged by the
authority.
(2) The administrator shall establish a common asthma registry
process for all providers of health care services purchased by the
state.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.05.013 and 2003 c 276 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The authority shall coordinate state agency efforts to develop
and implement uniform policies across state purchased health care
programs that will ensure prudent, cost-effective health services
purchasing, maximize efficiencies in administration of state purchased
health care programs, improve the quality of care provided through
state purchased health care programs, and reduce administrative burdens
on health care providers participating in state purchased health care
programs. The policies adopted should be based, to the extent
possible, upon the best available scientific and medical evidence and
shall endeavor to address:
(a) Methods of formal assessment, such as health technology
assessment. Consideration of the best available scientific evidence
does not preclude consideration of experimental or investigational
treatment or services under a clinical investigation approved by an
institutional review board;
(b) Monitoring of health outcomes, adverse events, quality, and
cost-effectiveness of health services;
(c) Development of a common definition of medical necessity; and
(d) Exploration of common strategies for disease management and
demand management programs, including asthma, diabetes, heart disease,
and similar common chronic diseases. Strategies to be explored include
individual asthma management plans.
(2) The administrator may invite health care provider
organizations, carriers, other health care purchasers, and consumers to
participate in efforts undertaken under this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section "best available scientific and
medical evidence" means the best available external clinical evidence
derived from systematic research.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of health shall collect data as authorized by RCW
43.70.050 regarding the prevalence of asthma, identify variations in
practices of treatment of asthma, identify populations with
disproportionate prevalence, and describe successful strategies for
diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of asthma.

--- END ---