BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature reaffirms that the purposes of the department of
labor and industries' retrospective rating program are to substantially
improve worker safety, accident prevention, and worker outcomes. The
legislature finds that certain aspects of the program are inconsistent
with these purposes. The size of a retrospective rating group, rather
than its safety record, can dictate the relative amount of the
incentive payment, significantly disadvantaging the smaller
retrospective rating groups.
The legislature recognizes the concerns expressed by employers and
employees regarding workers' compensation rates and recent increases in
those rates. Those concerns can be partially addressed by putting a
greater amount of a retrospective rating group's incentive payment into
the hands of its members, who can use such money to invest, create
jobs, foster economic growth, or by the group using such money to
improve worker safety.
For these reasons, the legislature declares that immediate reform
of the retrospective rating program is needed to achieve the purposes
of substantially improving worker safety, accident prevention, and
worker outcomes. The legislature finds that retrospective rating
groups granted the privilege of participating in the retrospective
rating program must agree to terms and conditions of program
participation that are reasonably related to achieving these purposes.
These terms and conditions shall include, but not be limited to,
requiring that funds be used for expenses directly related to
substantially improving worker safety, accident prevention, and worker
outcomes, and ensuring that employers in the retrospective rating
groups are substantially similar considering their business and the
services or activities performed by their employees.
The legislature declares that immediate changes are necessary to
ensure that retrospective rating groups focus on safety, and
consequently, to preserve the health and safety of Washington workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) With respect to any enrollment fees and other payments made on
or after the effective date of this section by the retrospective rating
group's members to the sponsoring entity solely to participate in the
retrospective rating group, a sponsoring entity must return to the
retrospective rating group's members any portion of the enrollment fees
and other payments not used to administer the retrospective rating
group's program or retained as reserves to meet any assessments made by
the department.
(2) Any portion of the enrollment fees and other payments not
returned to the retrospective rating group's members must be used to
administer the retrospective rating group's program or retained as
reserves to meet any assessments made by the department. Funds used to
administer the retrospective rating group's program may be used only to
pay for expenses directly related to improving worker safety, accident
prevention, and worker outcomes as specified in section 6 of this act,
and not for any other purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) With respect to incentive payments made on or after the
effective date of this section by the department to a sponsoring entity
to recognize substantial improvements in worker safety, accident
prevention, and worker outcomes, a sponsoring entity must return to the
retrospective rating group's members any portion of the incentive
payments not used to administer the retrospective rating group's
program or retained as reserves to meet any assessments made by the
department.
(2) Any portion of the incentive payments not returned to the
retrospective rating group's members must be used to administer the
retrospective rating group's program or retained as reserves to meet
any assessments made by the department. Funds used to administer the
retrospective rating group's program may be used only to pay for
expenses directly related to improving worker safety, accident
prevention, and worker outcomes as specified in section 6 of this act,
and not for any other purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) With respect to interest earned on or after the effective date
of this section on reserves maintained by the sponsoring entity to meet
any assessments made by the department, a sponsoring entity must return
to the retrospective rating group's members any portion of the interest
not used to administer the retrospective rating group's program or
retained as reserves to meet any assessments made by the department.
(2) Any portion of the interest not returned to the retrospective
rating group's members must be used to administer the retrospective
rating group's program or retained as reserves to meet any assessments
made by the department. Funds used to administer the retrospective
rating group's program may be used only to pay for expenses directly
related to improving worker safety, accident prevention, and worker
outcomes as specified in section 6 of this act, and not for any other
purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
If a retrospective rating group is disqualified or does not
reenroll in the program, the sponsoring entity must return to the
retrospective rating group's members any portion of reserves maintained
by the sponsoring entity that are not used to administer the
retrospective rating group's program as specified in section 6 of this
act or fully pay the retrospective rating group's final obligations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter, expenses directly and reasonably
related to improving worker safety, accident prevention, and worker
outcomes may include:
(1) Safety education and safety education activities;
(2) Risk management activities;
(3) Claims monitoring activities;
(4) Return-to-work program-related assistance;
(5) Overhead, marketing, and legal expenses directly and reasonably
related to the retrospective rating group's program; and
(6) Investment-related expenses for reserves retained to meet any
assessments made by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each sponsoring entity shall report annually to the department
in a form specified by the department on:
(a) Funds used to administer the retrospective rating group's
programs and retained as reserves to meet any assessments made by the
department; and
(b) Expenses directly related to improving worker safety, accident
prevention, and worker outcomes.
(2) The department shall periodically inspect and review records of
sponsoring entities to assure that the purposes of this chapter are
fulfilled.
(3) If the department has reasonable cause to believe that a
sponsoring entity has used or retained funds or incurred expenses in a
manner inconsistent with the purposes of this chapter, the state
auditor shall conduct an audit of the entity's compliance with this
chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 51.16.035 and 1999 c 7 s 8 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The department shall classify all occupations or industries in
accordance with their degree of hazard and fix therefor basic rates of
premium which shall be the lowest necessary to maintain actuarial
solvency of the accident and medical aid funds in accordance with
recognized insurance principles. The department shall formulate and
adopt rules and regulations governing the method of premium calculation
and collection and providing for a rating system consistent with
recognized principles of workers' compensation insurance which shall be
designed to stimulate and encourage accident prevention and to
facilitate collection. The department may annually, or at such other
times as it deems necessary to maintain solvency of the funds, readjust
rates in accordance with the rating system to become effective on such
dates as the department may designate.
(2) In providing a retrospective rating plan under RCW 51.18.010,
the department may consider each individual retrospective rating group
as a single employing entity for purposes of ((dividends or premium
discounts)) incentive payments to recognize improvements in worker
safety, accident prevention, and worker outcomes.

Sec. 9 RCW 51.18.010 and 1999 c 7 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The department shall offer a retrospective rating plan to
insure the workers' compensation obligations of employers and groups of
employers. The plan is to be made available to any employer or group
of employers who:
(a) Voluntarily elects to participate in the plan; and
(b) Meets the requirements of this chapter and rules adopted by the
department under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The retrospective rating plan shall be consistent with
recognized insurance principles and shall be administered according to
rules adopted by the department. Rules adopted under this section
shall encourage broad participation by qualified employers and sponsors
of retrospective rating groups.
(3) Each retrospective rating group approved by the department
under this chapter shall select a coverage period and may be renewed at
the end of each coverage period. For the purposes of this section,
"coverage period" means a twelve-month period provided by the
department by rule.
(4) After the effective date of this act, each retrospective rating
group shall, upon being initially approved or annually renewed by the
department, provide written notice to the department that it is
familiar with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted by
the department governing the operation of retrospective rating groups.
The department shall provide a form to be completed by the
retrospective rating group to complete such an approval or renewal, and
the form and notice shall contain the following: "Incentive payments
provided by the department shall be used solely for: (a) Safety
education and safety education activities; (b) risk management
activities; (c) claims monitoring activities; (d) return-to-work
program-related assistance; (e) overhead, marketing, and legal expenses
directly and reasonably related to the retrospective rating group's
program; and (f) investment-related expenses for reserves retained to
meet any assessments made by the department."

Sec. 10 RCW 51.18.020 and 1999 c 7 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Prior to allowing initial entrance into the state's retrospective
rating plan, the department shall review each proposed retrospective
rating group to ensure that the following criteria are met:
(1) The entity sponsoring the retrospective rating group must have
been in existence for at least four years;
(2) The entity sponsoring the retrospective rating group must exist
primarily for a purpose other than that of obtaining or offering
insurance coverage or insurance related services;
(3) The entity sponsoring the retrospective rating group must have
a written workplace safety and accident prevention plan in place for
the proposed retrospective rating group and must propose methods by
which the retrospective rating group will cooperate with department
claims management activities;
(4) All employers in the retrospective rating group must be members
of the sponsoring entity;
(5) All employers in the retrospective rating group must have an
industrial insurance account in good standing with the department;
(6) Fifty percent of the original employers in the retrospective
rating group must have been members of the sponsoring entity for one
year prior to the group's entrance into the retrospective rating plan;
(7)(a) With respect to any coverage period beginning before the
effective date of this section, the retrospective rating group must be
composed of:
(i) Employers who are substantially similar considering the
services or activities performed by the employees of those employers;
or
(ii) Employers allowed to continue in the retrospective rating
group under RCW 51.18.040(4)(a).
(b) With respect to any coverage period beginning on or after the
effective date of this section, the retrospective rating group must be
composed of:
(i) Employers who are substantially similar considering the
business of the employers and the services or activities performed by
the employees of those employers;
(ii) Employers allowed to continue in the retrospective rating
group under RCW 51.18.040(4)(a); or
(iii) Employers allowed to continue in the group under RCW
51.18.040(4)(a), but only for the coverage periods specified in RCW
51.18.040(4)(b)(i);
(8) The initial premium level for the retrospective rating group
must be at least one million five hundred thousand dollars and shall be
based on the standard premium of the proposed group members' most
current previous coverage period; and
(9) The formation and operation of the retrospective rating group
must seek to substantially improve workplace safety and accident
prevention for the employers in the group.

Sec. 11 RCW 51.18.040 and 1999 c 7 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) With respect to any coverage period beginning before the
effective date of this section, in order to ensure that all
retrospective rating groups are made up of employers who are
substantially similar, considering the services or activities performed
by the employees of those employers, the sponsoring entity of a
retrospective rating group shall select a single, broad industry or
business category for each retrospective rating group. Once an
industry or business category is selected, the department shall allow
all risk classifications reasonably related to that business or
industry category into that retrospective rating group.
(b) With respect to any coverage period beginning on or after the
effective date of this section, in order to ensure that all
retrospective rating groups are made up of employers who are
substantially similar, considering the business of the employers and
the services or activities performed by the employees of those
employers, the sponsoring entity of a retrospective rating group shall
select a single, broad industry or business category for each
retrospective rating group. Once an industry or business category is
selected, the department shall allow employers most similarly related
to that business or industry category into that retrospective rating
group.
(2) The following broad industry and business categories shall be
used by the sponsoring entity and the department in establishing
retrospective rating groups:
(a) Agriculture and related services;
(b) Automotive, truck and boat manufacturing, sales, repair, and
related services;
(c) Construction and related services;
(d) Distillation, chemical production, food, and related services;
(e) Facilities or property management, maintenance, and related
services;
(f) Government, utilities, schools, health care, and related
services;
(g) Health care, pharmaceutical, laboratories, and related
services;
(h) Logging, wood products manufacturing, and related services;
(i) Manufacturing, processing, mining, quarrying, and related
services;
(j) Retail stores, wholesale stores, professional services, and
related services;
(k) Temporary help and related services; and
(l) Transportation, recycling, warehousing, facility maintenance,
and related services.
(3) The industry and business categories in subsection (2) of this
section are not exclusive. In response to significant changes in
marketplace demographics or the discovery of unique business or
industry categories, the department may, by rule, include additional
broad industry or business category selections. The department may, by
rule, remove an industry covered within an industry or business
category in the event that the business or industry is no longer found
within this state.
(4) ((Given the broad nature of the industry and business
categories in subsection (2) of this section, the risk classification
or classifications assigned to an individual employer may appropriately
fall into multiple business or industry categories.
(5) In order to simplify administration and keep the administrative
costs associated with devising a different classification system for a
retrospective rating plan to a minimum, the state's retrospective
rating plan shall follow the same classification procedure established
by the department to assign workers' compensation insurance
classifications to an employer.
(6))) (a) With respect to any coverage period, employers who have
been a member of an existing, approved retrospective rating group prior
to July 25, 1999, may continue in that group even if they are not
substantially similar to the industry or business category selected
pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section.
((However, new)) (b)(i) With respect to any coverage period
beginning before January 1, 2007, employers who were proposed for
addition to a retrospective rating group on or after July 25, 1999, and
before the effective date of this section, and who have been a member
of a retrospective rating group before the effective date of this
section, must fall within the ((selected)) industry or business
category selected pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(ii) With respect to any coverage period beginning on or after
January 1, 2007, employers who were proposed for addition to a
retrospective rating group on or after July 25, 1999, and before the
effective date of this section, and who have been a member of a
retrospective rating group before the effective date of this section,
must fall within the industry or business category selected pursuant to
subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(c) With respect to any coverage period beginning on or after the
effective date of this section, employers who are proposed for addition
to a retrospective rating group on or after the effective date of this
section must fall within the industry or business category selected
pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section. If an employer does not
fall within the industry or business category selected by any
retrospective rating group, the department may approve addition of the
employer to a retrospective rating group that selected the most
similarly related industry or business category.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The director may adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---