BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Many high school students who wish to earn college credits are
unable to participate in the running start program because they live in
areas that do not have local colleges; and some students who would like
to earn college credits while in high school do not participate in
running start because they do not want to leave their high school
campus in order to do so.
(2) Some high schools are currently working with colleges to offer
dual credit courses on high school campuses to serve those students.
However, there is no established statewide program or funding provided,
so rules governing these programs vary and high school students pay
varying amounts to cover the colleges' costs of working with high
schools to offer the classes.
It is the intent of the legislature to establish the college in the
high school program as a statewide option for high school students.
High schools and colleges that wish to work together to offer this
option are encouraged to do so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, the state board for
community and technical colleges, and the higher education coordinating
board shall jointly develop and adopt rules governing the college in
the high school program. The rules shall be written to encourage the
maximum use of the program and shall not narrow or limit the enrollment
options.
(2) The college in the high school program shall provide that:
(a) Institutions of higher education participating in the program
are authorized to charge pupils an amount no more than seven percent of
the statewide annual average full-time equivalent high school per pupil
allocation under RCW 28A.150.260, excluding small school enhancements,
and applicable rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. Institutions of
higher education may not charge pupils more than three and one-half
percent of the statewide annual average full-time equivalent high
school per pupil allocation per pupil per course for the pupils whose
family incomes would qualify the student for a state need grant, as
determined by the higher education coordinating board under chapter
28B.92 RCW. For each program course, the superintendent of public
instruction shall distribute to school districts an amount calculated
as three and one-half percent of the statewide annual average full-time
equivalent high school per pupil allocation per pupil per course for
the pupils whose family incomes would qualify the student for a state
need grant, as determined by the higher education coordinating board
under chapter 28B.92 RCW. School districts shall transfer the program
course amount for these pupils to the appropriate in-state institution
of higher education to offset pupils' participation fees. The
institution of higher education shall not require any pupil to pay any
other fees.
(b) A school district shall grant high school credit to a pupil
enrolled in a program course if the pupil successfully completes the
course. The determination shall be made in writing before the pupil
enrolls in the course. The credits shall be applied toward graduation
requirements and subject area requirements. Evidence of the successful
completion of each program course shall be included in the pupil's
secondary school records and transcript.
(c) Eleventh and twelfth grade pupils or pupils who have not yet
received the credits required for the award of a high school diploma or
its equivalent and are eligible to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades
may participate in the college in the high school program.
Participating school districts and institutions of higher education
shall agree upon any additional criteria that may be established for
the award of any college or university credit awarded under program
courses.
(d) Participating school districts shall provide general
information about the college in the high school program to all pupils
in grades ten, eleven, and twelve and the parents and guardians of
those pupils.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Institution of higher education" means the state universities,
the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, the community
colleges, and the technical colleges.
(b) "Program course" means a college course offered in a high
school under the college in the high school program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall develop counseling
guidelines that ensure that pupils and parents understand that college
credits earned in high school dual credit programs count toward the
total number of credits allowed for financial aid.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.150.275 and 1995 c 77 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The basic education allocation, including applicable vocational
entitlements and special education program money, generated under this
chapter and under state appropriation acts by school districts for
students enrolled in a technical college program established by an
interlocal agreement under RCW 28B.50.533 shall be allocated in amounts
as determined by the superintendent of public instruction to the
serving college rather than to the school district, unless the college
chooses to continue to receive the allocations through the school
districts. This section does not apply to students enrolled in the
running start program established in RCW 28A.600.310 or the college in
the high school program established in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.225.290 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 207 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall prepare and
annually distribute an information booklet outlining parents' and
guardians' enrollment options for their children.
(2) Before the 1991-92 school year, the booklet shall be
distributed to all school districts by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction. School districts shall have a copy of the
information booklet available for public inspection at each school in
the district, at the district office, and in public libraries.
(3) The booklet shall include:
(a) Information about enrollment options and program opportunities,
including but not limited to programs in RCW 28A.225.220, 28A.185.040,
28A.225.200 through 28A.225.215, 28A.225.230 through 28A.225.250,
((28A.175.090)), 28A.340.010 through 28A.340.070 (small high school
cooperative projects), and 28A.335.160.
(b) Information about the running start - community college or
vocational-technical institute choice program under RCW 28A.600.300
through ((28A.600.395)) 28A.600.400 and about the college in the high
school program under section 2 of this act; and
(c) Information about the seventh and eighth grade choice program
under RCW 28A.230.090.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.600.160 and 1998 c 225 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any middle school, junior high school, or high school using
educational pathways shall ensure that all participating students will
continue to have access to the courses and instruction necessary to
meet admission requirements at baccalaureate institutions. Students
shall be allowed to enter the educational pathway of their choice.
Before accepting a student into an educational pathway, the school
shall inform the student's parent of the pathway chosen, the
opportunities available to the student through the pathway, and the
career objectives the student will have exposure to while pursuing the
pathway. Parents and students dissatisfied with the opportunities
available through the selected educational pathway shall be provided
with the opportunity to transfer the student to any other pathway
provided in the school. Schools may not develop educational pathways
that retain students in high school beyond the date they are eligible
to graduate, and may not require students who transfer between pathways
to complete pathway requirements beyond the date the student is
eligible to graduate. Educational pathways may include, but are not
limited to, programs such as work-based learning, school-to-work
transition, tech prep, vocational-technical education, running start,
college in the high school, and preparation for technical college,
community college, or university education.

--- END ---