BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall study and make recommendations to the legislature on
establishing a cost-effective program that would distribute unused
prescription drugs left over in licensed long-term care facilities to
low-income needy people and other Washington residents who cannot
afford their expensive medications. The report shall be provided to
the appropriate committees in the house and senate by December 1, 2006.
The study shall determine the quantity and type of unused
prescription drugs available in a typical year, methods to collect the
drugs, and procedures to distribute the drugs. This analysis shall
consider any liability issues associated with donation of unused
prescription drugs or provision of those drugs to patients, as well as
any costs associated with the donation, collection, and distribution of
unused prescription drugs. The analysis shall also consider the
impacts, if any, of the implementation of the medicare part D
prescription drug benefit on the collection of unused prescription
drugs from licensed long-term care facilities. The study shall also
examine criteria to be used in determining eligibility for individuals
to receive prescription drugs through this program.

--- END ---