BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.32A.086 and 1995 c 312 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever a law enforcement agency receives a report from a parent
that his or her child, or child over whom the parent has custody, is
missing or has without permission of the parent left the home or
residence lawfully prescribed for the child under circumstances where
the parent believes that the child is missing or has run away from the
home or the residence, the agency shall provide for placing information
identifying the child in files under RCW 43.43.510.
If a law enforcement officer has reasonable cause to believe that
a child is missing, has run away, or is otherwise absent from the
parent's home without consent, the officer shall make a good faith
effort to locate the child upon receipt of a report under this chapter
or chapter 13.60 or 43.43 RCW. A law enforcement officer acting in
good faith pursuant to the requirements of this section, and any entity
of local or state government employing the officer, may not be held
liable in any cause of action for civil damages based upon the
requirements of this section.

--- END ---