BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.12.265 and 2002 c 243 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 49.12.270
through 49.12.295 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Child" means a biological, adopted, or foster child, a
stepchild, a legal ward, or a child of a person standing in loco
parentis who is: (a) Under eighteen years of age; or (b) eighteen
years of age or older and incapable of self-care because of a mental or
physical disability.
(2) "Grandparent" means a parent of a parent of an employee.
(3) "Parent" means a biological or adoptive parent of an employee
or an individual who stood in loco parentis to an employee when the
employee was a child.
(4) "Parent-in-law" means a parent of the spouse of an employee.
(5) "Sick leave or other paid time off" means time allowed under
the terms of an appropriate collective bargaining agreement, disability
policy, or employer policy, as applicable, to an employee for illness,
vacation, and personal holiday. It does not include any leave benefit
granted by a short-term or long-term disability policy covered by the
employment retirement income security act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 18,
or by a third-party administered disability plan. Sick leave or other
paid time off shall include any self-administered short-term or long-term disability plan unless the employer maintains a separate bona fide
paid sick leave policy plan or practice.
(6) "Spouse" means a husband or wife, as the case may be.

--- END ---