BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.02 RCW
to read as follows:
Public funds shall not be used by state or local governments, or
any political subdivision or agency thereof, to pay or otherwise
reimburse, either directly or indirectly, any person, agency,
organization, or facility for the performance of any induced abortion.
Public funds may be used to pay for the performance of an induced
abortion necessary to prevent the death of either the pregnant woman or
her unborn child under circumstances where every reasonable effort is
made to preserve the life of each.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, morals, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect immediately.

--- END ---