BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds the following:
(a) Educational equity is integral to Article IX of the state
Constitution ratified October 1, 1889, which states:
(i) "It is the paramount duty of the state to make ample provision
for the education of all children residing within its borders, without
distinction or preference on account of race, color, caste, or sex."
(ii) "The legislature shall provide for a general and uniform
system of public schools."
(b) Educational equity is an approach to all aspects of education
that promotes and provides equitable support for all students to create
the best learning opportunities for each student.
(c) Educational equity is evident when all children in a school
receive the nurturing, guidance, and resources they need to reach their
fullest potential to achieve success in school and life.
(d) Educational equity, properly implemented, will ensure that the
unique needs and learning opportunities of each student and student
group are served and that achievement disproportionality is reduced by
increasing and supporting the conditions for best student performance.
(e) Educational equity attends to the state shift from a classroom
seat time-based system of education to a standards and performance-based education system where time, scheduling, and access are more
flexible and conducive to a more equitable educational system in order
to make the learning journey for each student more personal and
relevant.
(f) Educational equity is a viewpoint and belief through which
disproportionality can be significantly reduced when, in combination
with research-based and other strategies and planning for student
needs, student opportunities to learn occur on an academic calendar
year where allocated time and timely, coordinated supplemental learning
opportunities are balanced for continuous student success.
(g) Educational equity should respond to the fact that home
resources and community support may be more limited for some students
than others.
(h) Educational equity embodies the essence of diversity, which is
the breadth of difference that is the common character of society,
including the unique nature of each student.
(2) Building on the findings under subsection (1) of this section,
the following state policy on educational equity is established:
(a) Educational equity includes instruction that responds to the
diverse needs of students in order to maximize each student's
opportunity to reach his or her fullest potential to achieve success in
school and life as expressed in the goal of basic education under RCW
28A.150.210.
(b) Educational equity results in continuous student growth.
Learning and achievement is founded on meaningful relationships among
students, staff, parents, guardians, and community members so that each
student is nurtured, respected, and valued in school and through
school-related learning opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes a clear role for at least and not
limited to the following agencies to advance the state policy on
educational equity under section 1 of this act: The state board of
education and the superintendent of public instruction. The
legislature encourages these agencies to collaboratively, not
independently, establish and align potential goals, objectives, and
strategies in order to advance the state policy on educational equity
under section 1 of this act.
(2) The agencies in subsection (1) of this section, in their
respective efforts and in any partnership efforts to advance the state
policy on educational equity, shall make continuous effort to secure
the diverse representation or participation of students, staff, and
community members in reviewing existing state policies and requirements
that directly or indirectly impact educational equity.
(3) The state board of education and the superintendent of public
instruction are authorized to adopt rules to implement the state policy
on educational equity.
(4) The agencies in subsection (1) of this section are encouraged,
but not required, to periodically, preferably at least every two years,
submit separately or jointly, a report to one another and the
legislature. The report shall include a review and status of adopted
educational equity goals, objectives, and strategies to advance the
state policy on educational equity.

--- END ---