BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.305.100 and 1982 c 160 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state board of education annually shall ((annually)) elect a
president and vice president and other officers as the board may
determine. The superintendent of public instruction shall be an ex
officio member and the chief executive officer of the board. ((As such
ex officio member)) The superintendent shall have the right to vote
((only when there is a question before the board upon which no majority
opinion has been reached among the board members present and voting
thereon and the superintendent's vote is essential for action thereon))
on all matters before the board. The superintendent, as chief
executive officer of the board, shall furnish all necessary record
books and forms for its use, and shall represent the board in directing
the work of school inspection.

--- END ---