BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4311 and 2002 c 314 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public hospital that is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision, or a nonprofit hospital, or a nonprofit
community health center, or a network of nonprofit community health
centers, that qualifies as a health and social welfare organization as
defined in RCW 82.04.431, may deduct from the measure of tax amounts
received as compensation for health care services covered under the
federal medicare program authorized under Title XVIII of the federal
social security act; medical assistance, children's health, or other
program under chapter 74.09 RCW; or for the state of Washington basic
health plan under chapter 70.47 RCW. The deduction authorized by this
section does not apply to amounts received from patient copayments or
patient deductibles.
(2) As used in this section, "community health center" means a
federally qualified health center as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1396d as
existing on the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2005.

--- END ---