BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever the department secures land or interests in land by
eminent domain for a right of way in order to construct or improve a
state highway or other state transportation facility and the land is in
an area designated as agricultural land of long-term commercial
significance under RCW 36.70A.170, the department shall pay a farmland
mitigation fee to the county in which the land exists. The county
shall use the farmland mitigation fee to purchase development rights to
an equivalent amount of agricultural land of comparable or better soil
quality elsewhere in the respective county. The farmland mitigation
fee imposed under this section applies only to transportation projects
in a county administering a farmland preservation program that allows
for the purchase of development rights from willing sellers. The
respective county shall calculate the farmland mitigation fee in
conformance with the current values being paid by the county's farmland
preservation program.

--- END ---