BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.01.140 and 2003 c 370 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county auditor, if appointed by the director of licensing
shall carry out the provisions of this title relating to the licensing
of vehicles and the issuance of vehicle license number plates under the
direction and supervision of the director and may with the approval of
the director appoint assistants as special deputies and recommend
subagents to accept applications and collect fees for vehicle licenses
and transfers and to deliver vehicle license number plates.
(2) A county auditor appointed by the director may request that the
director appoint subagencies within the county.
(a) Upon authorization of the director, the auditor shall use an
open competitive process including, but not limited to, a written
business proposal and oral interview to determine the qualifications of
all interested applicants.
(b) A subagent may recommend a successor who is either the
subagent's sibling, spouse, or child, or a subagency employee, as long
as the recommended successor participates in the open, competitive
process used to select an applicant. In making successor
recommendation and appointment determinations, the following provisions
apply:
(i) If a subagency is held by a partnership or corporate entity,
the nomination must be submitted on behalf of, and agreed to by, all
partners or corporate officers.
(ii) No subagent may receive any direct or indirect compensation or
remuneration from any party or entity in recognition of a successor
nomination. A subagent may not receive any financial benefit from the
transfer or termination of an appointment.
(iii) (a) and (b) of this subsection are intended to assist in the
efficient transfer of appointments in order to minimize public
inconvenience. They do not create a proprietary or property interest
in the appointment.
(c) The auditor shall submit all proposals to the director, and
shall recommend the appointment of one or more subagents who have
applied through the open competitive process. The auditor shall
include in his or her recommendation to the director, not only the name
of the successor who is a relative or employee, if applicable and if
otherwise qualified, but also the name of one other applicant who is
qualified and was chosen through the open competitive process. The
director has final appointment authority.
(3)(a) A county auditor who is appointed as an agent by the
department shall enter into a standard contract provided by the
director, developed with the advice of the title and registration
advisory committee.
(b) A subagent appointed under subsection (2) of this section shall
enter into a standard contract with the county auditor, developed with
the advice of the title and registration advisory committee. The
director shall provide the standard contract to county auditors.
(c) The contracts provided for in (a) and (b) of this subsection
must contain at a minimum provisions that:
(i) Describe the responsibilities, and where applicable, the
liability, of each party relating to the service expectations and
levels, equipment to be supplied by the department, and equipment
maintenance;
(ii) Require the specific type of insurance or bonds so that the
state is protected against any loss of collected motor vehicle tax
revenues or loss of equipment;
(iii) Specify the amount of training that will be provided by the
state, the county auditor, or subagents;
(iv) Describe allowable costs that may be charged to vehicle
licensing activities as provided for in (d) of this subsection;
(v) Describe the causes and procedures for termination of the
contract, which may include mediation and binding arbitration.
(d) The department shall develop procedures that will standardize
and prescribe allowable costs that may be assigned to vehicle licensing
and vessel registration and title activities performed by county
auditors.
(e) The contracts may include any provision that the director deems
necessary to ensure acceptable service and the full collection of
vehicle and vessel tax revenues.
(f) The director may waive any provisions of the contract deemed
necessary in order to ensure that readily accessible service is
provided to the citizens of the state.
(4)(a) At any time any application is made to the director, the
county auditor, or other agent pursuant to any law dealing with
licenses, registration, or the right to operate any vehicle or vessel
upon the public highways or waters of this state, ((excluding
applicants already paying such fee under RCW 46.16.070 or 46.16.085,))
the applicant shall pay to the director, county auditor, or other agent
a fee of three dollars for each application in addition to any other
fees required by law.
(b) Counties that do not cover the expenses of vehicle licensing
and vessel registration and title activities may submit to the
department a request for cost-coverage moneys. The request must be
submitted on a form developed by the department. The department shall
develop procedures to verify whether a request is reasonable. Payment
shall be made on requests found to be allowable from the licensing
services account.
(c) Applicants for certificates of ownership, including applicants
paying fees under RCW 46.16.070 or 46.16.085, shall pay to the
director, county auditor, or other agent a fee of four dollars in
addition to any other fees required by law.
(d) The fees under (a) and (c) of this subsection, if paid to the
county auditor as agent of the director, or if paid to a subagent of
the county auditor, shall be paid to the county treasurer in the same
manner as other fees collected by the county auditor and credited to
the county current expense fund. If the fee is paid to another agent
of the director, the fee shall be used by the agent to defray his or
her expenses in handling the application.
(e) Applicants required to pay the three-dollar fee established
under (a) of this subsection, except those applicants required to be
licensed under RCW 46.16.070 and 46.16.085, must pay an additional
seventy-five cents, which must be collected and remitted to the state
treasurer and distributed as follows:
(i) Fifty cents must be deposited into the department of licensing
services account of the motor vehicle fund and must be used for agent
and subagent support, which is to include but not be limited to the
replacement of department-owned equipment in the possession of agents
and subagents.
(ii) Twenty-five cents must be deposited into the license plate
technology account created under RCW 46.16.685.
(5) A subagent shall collect a service fee of (a) eight dollars and
fifty cents for changes in a certificate of ownership, with or without
registration renewal, or verification of record and preparation of an
affidavit of lost title other than at the time of the title application
or transfer and (b) three dollars and fifty cents for registration
renewal only, issuing a transit permit, or any other service under this
section.
(6) If the fee is collected by the state patrol as agent for the
director, the fee so collected shall be certified to the state
treasurer and deposited to the credit of the state patrol highway
account. If the fee is collected by the department of transportation
as agent for the director, the fee shall be certified to the state
treasurer and deposited to the credit of the motor vehicle fund. All
such fees collected by the director or branches of his office shall be
certified to the state treasurer and deposited to the credit of the
highway safety fund.
(7) Any county revenues that exceed the cost of providing vehicle
licensing and vessel registration and title activities in a county,
calculated in accordance with the procedures in subsection (3)(d) of
this section, shall be expended as determined by the county legislative
authority during the process established by law for adoption of county
budgets.
(8) The director may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.0621 and 2003 c 1 s 2 and 2002 c 352 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(((1) License tab fees are required to be $30 per year for motor
vehicles, regardless of year, value, make, or model.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license tab fees" are
defined as the general fees paid annually for licensing motor vehicles
and trailers as defined in RCW 46.04.620 and 46.04.623, including cars,
sport utility vehicles, motorcycles, and motor homes. Trailers
licensed under RCW 46.16.068 or 46.16.085 and campers licensed under
RCW 46.16.505 are not required to pay license tab fees under this
section.)) (1) The annual vehicle licensing fee for motor vehicles and
trailers, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, shall
be based on the scale weight set forth in schedule B provided in RCW
46.16.070. The department shall rely on the vehicle empty scale
weights as provided by vehicle manufacturers, or other sources defined
by the department, to determine the weight of each vehicle. The
department shall adopt rules for determining weight for vehicles
without manufacturer empty scale weights.
(2) When the scale weight of a motor home is 6,667 pounds or
greater, the scale weight shall be multiplied by one hundred fifty
percent to determine the annual vehicle licensing fee.
(3) If the resultant weight according to this section is not listed
in RCW 46.16.070, it shall be increased to the next higher weight
pursuant to chapter 46.44 RCW.
(4) Trailers licensed under RCW 46.16.068 or 46.16.085 are not
required to pay annual fees under this section. Private use trailers
of two thousand pounds scale weight or less are subject to a vehicle
licensing fee of fifteen dollars. This fee shall not apply to trailers
held for rental to the public or used in any commercial or business
endeavor.
(5) Proceeds from the fees collected under this section shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 46.68.035.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.070 and 2003 c 361 s 201 and 2003 c 1 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In lieu of all other vehicle licensing fees, unless
specifically exempt, and in addition to the mileage fees prescribed for
buses and stages in RCW 46.16.125, there shall be paid and collected
annually for each truck, motor truck, truck tractor, road tractor,
tractor, bus, auto stage, or for hire vehicle with seating capacity of
more than six, based upon the declared combined gross weight or
declared gross weight under chapter 46.44 RCW, the following licensing
fees by ((such gross)) weight:

((DECLARED GROSS)) WEIGHT SCHEDULE A SCHEDULE B

4,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 30.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 30.00

6,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((30.00)) . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((30.00))

40.00 40.00

8,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((30.00)) . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((30.00))

50.00 50.00

10,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 62.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 62.00

12,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 79.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 79.00

14,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 90.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 90.00

16,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 102.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 102.00

18,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 154.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 154.00

20,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 171.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 171.00

22,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 185.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 185.00

24,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200.00

26,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 211.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 211.00

28,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 249.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 249.00

30,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 287.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 287.00

32,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 346.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 346.00

34,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 368.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 368.00

36,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 399.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 399.00

38,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 438.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 438.00

40,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 501.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 501.00

42,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 521.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 611.00

44,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 532.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 622.00

46,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 572.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 662.00

48,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 596.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 686.00

50,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 647.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 737.00

52,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 680.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 770.00

54,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 734.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 824.00

56,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 775.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 865.00

58,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 806.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 896.00

60,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 859.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 949.00

62,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 921.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,011.00

64,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 941.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,031.00

66,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,048.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,138.00

68,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,093.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,183.00

70,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,177.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,267.00

72,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,259.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,349.00

74,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,368.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,458.00

76,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,478.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,568.00

78,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,614.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,704.00

80,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,742.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,832.00

82,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,863.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,953.00

84,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,983.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,073.00

86,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,104.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,194.00

88,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,225.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,315.00

90,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,346.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,436.00

92,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,466.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,556.00

94,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,587.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,677.00

96,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,708.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,798.00

98,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,829.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,919.00

100,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,949.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,039.00

102,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,070.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,160.00

104,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,191.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,281.00

105,500 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,312.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,402.00

Schedule A less two dollars applies to vehicles either used
exclusively for hauling logs or that do not tow trailers. Schedule B
less two dollars applies to vehicles that tow trailers and are not
covered under Schedule A.
Every truck, motor truck, truck tractor, and tractor exceeding
6,000 pounds empty scale weight registered under chapter 46.16, 46.87,
or 46.88 RCW shall be licensed for not less than one hundred fifty
percent of its empty weight unless the amount would be in excess of the
legal limits prescribed for such a vehicle in RCW 46.44.041 or
46.44.042, in which event the vehicle shall be licensed for the maximum
weight authorized for such a vehicle or unless the vehicle is used only
for the purpose of transporting any well drilling machine, air
compressor, rock crusher, conveyor, hoist, donkey engine, cook house,
tool house, bunk house, or similar machine or structure attached to or
made a part of such vehicle.
The following provisions apply when increasing gross or combined
gross weight for a vehicle licensed under this section:
(a) The new license fee will be one-twelfth of the fee listed above
for the new gross weight, multiplied by the number of months remaining
in the period for which licensing fees have been paid, including the
month in which the new gross weight is effective.
(b) Upon surrender of the current certificate of registration or
cab card, the new licensing fees due shall be reduced by the amount of
the licensing fees previously paid for the same period for which new
fees are being charged.
(2) The proceeds from the fees collected under subsection (1) of
this section shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 46.68.035.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16.085 and 1991 c 163 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In lieu of all other licensing fees, an annual license fee of
((thirty-six)) thirty-four dollars shall be collected in addition to
the excise tax prescribed in chapter 82.44 RCW for: (1) Each trailer
and semitrailer ((not subject to the license fee under RCW 46.16.065 or
the capacity fees under RCW 46.16.080)); (2) every pole trailer. The
proceeds from this fee shall be distributed in accordance with RCW
46.68.035. This section does not pertain to travel trailers or
personal use trailers that are not used for commercial purposes or
owned by commercial enterprises.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.16.135 and 1986 c 18 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
The annual vehicle licensing fees as provided in RCW 46.16.070 for
any motor vehicle or combination of vehicles, except motor homes,
having a declared gross weight in excess of twelve thousand pounds may
be paid for any full registration month or months at one-twelfth of the
usual annual fee plus two dollars, this sum to be multiplied by the
number of full months for which the fees are paid if for less than a
full year. An additional fee of two dollars shall be collected each
time a license fee is paid.
Operation of a vehicle licensed under the provisions of this
section by any person upon the public highways after the expiration of
the monthly license is a traffic infraction, and in addition the person
shall be required to pay a license fee for the vehicle involved
covering an entire registration year's operation, less the fees for any
registration month or months of the registration year already paid.
If, within five days, no license fee for a full registration year has
been paid as required aforesaid, the Washington state patrol, county
sheriff, or city police shall impound such vehicle in such manner as
may be directed for such cases by the chief of the Washington state
patrol, until such requirement is met.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.68.030 and 2002 c 352 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except ((for proceeds from fees for vehicle licensing for vehicles
paying such fees under RCW 46.16.070 and 46.16.085, and)) as otherwise
provided for in chapter 46.16 RCW, all fees received by the director
for vehicle licenses under the provisions of chapter 46.16 RCW shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer, accompanied by a proper identifying
detailed report, and be deposited to the credit of the motor vehicle
((fund, except that the proceeds from the vehicle license fee and
renewal license fee shall be deposited by the state treasurer as
hereinafter provided. After July 1, 2002, $20.35 of each original or
renewal license fee must be deposited in the state patrol highway
account in the motor vehicle fund, hereby created. Vehicle license
fees, renewal license fees, and all other funds in the state patrol
highway account shall be for the sole use of the Washington state
patrol for highway activities of the Washington state patrol, subject
to proper appropriations and reappropriations therefor. $2.02 of each
original vehicle license fee and $0.93 of each renewal license fee
shall be deposited each biennium in the Puget Sound ferry operations
account. Any remaining amounts of vehicle license fees and renewal
license fees that are not distributed otherwise under this section must
be deposited in the motor vehicle fund)) account.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.68.035 and 2003 c 361 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
All proceeds from ((combined)) vehicle licensing fees received by
the director for vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.0621, 46.16.070, and
46.16.085 shall be forwarded to the state treasurer to be distributed
into accounts according to the following method:
(1) ((The sum of two dollars for each vehicle shall be deposited
into the multimodal transportation account, except that for each
vehicle registered by a county auditor or agent to a county auditor
pursuant to RCW 46.01.140, the sum of two dollars shall be credited to
the current county expense fund.
(2) The remainder shall be distributed as follows:
(a) 21.963 percent shall be deposited into the state patrol highway
account of the motor vehicle fund;
(b) 1.411)) 2.309 percent shall be deposited into the Puget Sound
ferry operations account of the motor vehicle fund;
(((c) 7.240)) (2) 3.269 percent shall be deposited into the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account); and
(((d))) (3) The remaining proceeds shall be deposited into the
motor vehicle fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 46.16.071 (Additional fees) and 1996 c
315 s 4 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act applies to vehicle registrations
that are due or become due on or after January 1, 2006.

--- END ---