BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
computer hardware, computer peripherals, or software, not otherwise
eligible for exemption under RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.08.975, used
primarily in the development, design, and engineering of commercial
airplanes or components of such airplanes, or to sales of or charges
made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing the
computer hardware, computer peripherals, or software. The exemption is
available only when the buyer provides the seller with an exemption
certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Commercial airplane" and "component" have the meanings given
in RCW 82.32.550.
(b) "Peripherals" includes keyboards, monitors, mouse devices, and
other accessories that operate outside of the computer, excluding
cables, conduit, wiring, and other similar property.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of computer hardware, computer peripherals, or software, not
otherwise eligible for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565 or 82.12.975,
used primarily in the development, design, and engineering of
commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, or to the use of
labor and services rendered in respect to installing the computer
hardware, computer peripherals, or software.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Commercial airplane" and "component" have the meanings given
in RCW 82.32.550.
(b) "Peripherals" includes keyboards, monitors, mouse devices, and
other accessories that operate outside of the computer, excluding
cables, conduit, wiring, and other similar property.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person for qualified preproduction development
expenditures occurring after the effective date of this section.
(2) The credit is equal to the amount of qualified preproduction
development expenditures of a person, multiplied by the rate of 1.5
percent.
(3) The credit shall be taken against taxes due for the same
calendar year in which the qualified preproduction development
expenditures are incurred. Credits may not be carried over. The
credit for each calendar year shall not exceed the amount of tax
otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year. Refunds may
not be granted in the place of a credit.
(4) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified preproduction development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified
preproduction development.
(5) Any person claiming the credit shall file an annual report in
a form prescribed by the department that shall include the amount of
the credit claimed, an estimate of the anticipated preproduction
development expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, an estimate of the taxable amount for the calendar year for
which the credit is claimed, and any additional information the
department may require.
(6) The following definitions apply throughout this section:
(a) "Aeronautics" means the study of flight and the science of
building and operating commercial aircraft.
(b) "Preproduction development" means research, design, and
engineering activities performed in relation to the development of a
product, product line, model, or model derivative, including prototype
development, testing, and certification. The term includes the
discovery of technological information, the translating of
technological information into new or improved products, processes,
techniques, formulas, or inventions, and the adaptation of existing
products and models into new products or new models, or derivatives of
products or models. The term does not include manufacturing activities
or other production-oriented activities. The term does not include
surveys and studies, social science and humanities research, market
research or testing, quality control, sale promotion and service,
computer software developed for internal use, and research in areas
such as improved style, taste, and seasonal design.
(c) "Qualified preproduction development" means preproduction
development performed within this state in the field of aeronautics.
(d) "Qualified preproduction development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined by the department, benefits,
supplies, and computer expenses, directly incurred in qualified
preproduction development by a person claiming the credit provided in
this section. The term does not include amounts paid to a person other
than a public educational or research institution to conduct qualified
preproduction development. The term does not include capital costs and
overhead, such as expenses for land, structures, or depreciable
property.
(e) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's tax
returns for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed, less any
taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under RCW 82.04.440.
(7) Credit may not be claimed for expenditures for which a credit
is claimed under RCW 82.04.4452 or 82.04.4461.
(8) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---