BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to set standards for
addressing the occupational safety and health of substantially career
fire department employees, and to specify performance measures
applicable to response time objectives for certain major services. The
legislature acknowledges the efforts of the international city/county
management association, the international association of fire chiefs,
and the national fire protection association for the organization and
deployment of resources for fire departments. The arrival of first
responders with automatic external defibrillator capability before the
onset of brain death, and the arrival of adequate fire suppression
resources before flash-over is a critical event during the mitigation
of an emergency, and is in the public's best interest. For these
reasons, this chapter contains performance measures, comparable to that
research, relating to the organization and deployment of fire
suppression operations, emergency medical operations, and special
operations by substantially career fire departments. This chapter does
not, and is not intended to, in any way modify or limit the authority
of the department of labor and industries to adopt rules under chapter
49.17 RCW applying to fire departments or otherwise addressing the
occupational safety and health of fire fighters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advanced life support" means functional provision of advanced
airway management, including intubation, advanced cardiac monitoring,
manual defibrillation, establishment and maintenance of intravenous
access, and drug therapy.
(2) "Aircraft rescue and fire fighting" means the fire fighting
actions taken to rescue persons and to control or extinguish fire
involving or adjacent to aircraft on the ground.
(3) "Brain death" as defined by the American heart association
means the irreversible death of brain cells that begins four to six
minutes after cardiac arrest.
(4) "Fire department" means a fire protection district, or a
county, city, or other municipal fire department responsible for fire
fighting actions, emergency medical services, and other special
operations in a specified geographic area. The district or the
department must be a substantially career fire department, and not a
substantially volunteer fire department.
(5) "Fire suppression" means the activities involved in controlling
and extinguishing fires.
(6) "First responder" means provision of initial assessment and
basic first-aid intervention, including cardiac pulmonary resuscitation
and automatic external defibrillator capability.
(7) "Flash-over" as defined by national institute of standards and
technology means when all combustibles in a room burst into flame and
the fire spreads rapidly.
(8) "Marine rescue and fire fighting" means the fire fighting
actions taken to prevent, control, or extinguish fire involved in or
adjacent to a marine vessel and the rescue actions for occupants using
normal and emergency routes for egress.
(9) "Response time" means the time immediately following the
turnout time that begins when units are en route to the emergency
incident and ends when units arrive at the scene.
(10) "Special operations" means those emergency incidents to which
the fire department responds that require specific and advanced
training and specialized tools and equipment.
(11) "Turnout time" means the time beginning when units acknowledge
notification of the emergency to the beginning point of response time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Every fire department shall maintain a
written statement or policy that establishes the following:
(a) The existence of a fire department;
(b) Services that the fire department is required to provide;
(c) The basic organizational structure of the fire department;
(d) The expected number of fire department employees; and
(e) Functions that fire department employees are expected to
perform.
(2) Every fire department shall include service delivery objectives
in the written statement or policy required under subsection (1) of
this section. These objectives shall include specific response time
objectives for the following major service components, if appropriate:
(a) Fire suppression;
(b) Emergency management services;
(c) Special operations;
(d) Aircraft rescue and fire fighting;
(e) Marine rescue and fire fighting; and
(f) Wild land fire fighting.
(3) Every fire department, in order to measure the ability to
arrive and begin mitigation operations before the critical events of
brain death or flash-over, shall establish time objectives for the
following measurements:
(a) Turnout time;
(b) Response time for the arrival of the first arriving engine
company at a fire suppression incident and response time for the
deployment of a full first alarm assignment at a fire suppression
incident;
(c) Response time for the arrival of a unit with first responder or
higher level capability at an emergency medical incident; and
(d) Response time for the arrival of an advanced life support unit
at an emergency medical incident, where this service is provided by the
fire department.
(4) Every fire department shall also establish a performance
objective of not less than ninety percent for the achievement of each
response time objective established under subsection (3) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Every fire department shall evaluate its
level of service and deployment delivery and response time objectives
on an annual basis. The evaluations shall be based on data relating to
level of service, deployment, and the achievement of each response time
objective in each geographic area within the jurisdiction of the fire
department.
(2) Beginning in 2007, every fire department shall issue an annual
written report which shall be based on the annual evaluations required
by subsection (1) of this section.
(a) The annual report shall define the geographic areas and
circumstances in which the requirements of this standard are not being
met.
(b) The annual report shall explain the predictable consequences of
any deficiencies and address the steps that are necessary to achieve
compliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

--- END ---