BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.40.191 and 1999 c 362 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A member may make the irrevocable election under this section no
later than ((six)) twelve months after attaining thirty years of
service. The election shall become effective at the beginning of the
calendar month following department receipt of employee notification.
(1) The sum of member contributions made for periods of service
after the effective date of the election plus seven and one-half
percent interest shall be paid to the member at retirement without a
reduction in the member's monthly retirement benefit as determined
under RCW 41.40.185.
(2) Upon retirement, the member's benefit shall be calculated using
only the compensation earnable credited prior to the effective date of
the member's election. Calculation of the member's average final
compensation shall include eligible cash outs of sick and annual leave
based on the member's salary and leave accumulations at the time of
retirement, except that the amount of a member's average final
compensation cannot be higher than if the member had not taken
advantage of the election offered under this section.
(3) Members who have already earned thirty years of service credit
prior to July 25, 1999, may participate in the election by notifying
the department in writing of their intention by December 31, 1999.
The department shall continue to collect employer contributions as
required in RCW 41.45.060.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.32.4986 and 1999 c 362 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A member may make the irrevocable election under this section no
later than ((six)) twelve months after attaining thirty years of
service. The election shall become effective at the beginning of the
calendar month following department receipt of employee notification.
(1) The sum of member contributions made for periods of service
after the effective date of the election plus seven and one-half
percent interest shall be paid to the member at retirement without a
reduction in the member's monthly retirement benefit as determined
under RCW 41.32.498.
(2) Upon retirement, the member's benefit shall be calculated using
only the earnable compensation credited prior to the effective date of
the member's election. Calculation of the member's average earnable
compensation shall include eligible cash outs of annual leave based on
the member's salary and leave accumulations at the time of retirement,
except that the amount of a member's average earnable compensation
cannot be higher than if the member had not taken advantage of the
election offered under this section.
(3) Members who have already earned thirty years of service credit
prior to July 25, 1999, may participate in the election by notifying
the department in writing of their intention by December 31, 1999.
The department shall continue to collect employer contributions as
required in RCW 41.45.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---