BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there is
increasing demand in all regions of the state for access to
baccalaureate education and that this lack of access creates hardships
for students, employers, and the entire state of Washington as it seeks
to create and sustain a highly skilled, globally competitive work
force. However, the current locations of the main and branch campuses
of the state's public four-year institutions of higher education
constitute a barrier to access for individuals who live or work some
distance from a campus. In many cases, it is not reasonable to expect
these individuals to relocate and not feasible for them to commute, yet
they seek advanced education in a learning environment with faculty
contact and direct instruction. Furthermore, graduates with applied
science and applied technology degrees in high demand-high skill fields
encounter barriers in accessing technically oriented baccalaureate
programs. Because they are more geographically dispersed and
accessible to a larger proportion of the state's population, community
and technical colleges are ideally positioned to provide convenient,
affordable access.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to permit, on a limited and
pilot basis, selected community and technical colleges to award
baccalaureate degrees. At the same time, the legislature reaffirms its
longstanding policy that the primary mission of a community college is
to serve as a two-year institution of higher education that offers
basic skills, academic transfer preparation, work force training, and
personal enrichment opportunities while the primary purpose of the
state's technical colleges is to respond to the work force needs of
employers and labor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The college board shall select three pilot community colleges
and one technical college to develop and offer programs of study
leading to an applied baccalaureate degree.
(2) Community and technical colleges may submit an application to
become a pilot college under this section. The college board shall
review the applications and select the pilot colleges using objective
criteria, including:
(a) A documented and demonstrated unmet need for baccalaureate
graduates in high demand occupational and technical fields;
(b) A demonstration that the college has the capacity to make a
long-term commitment of resources to build and sustain a high quality
program;
(c) That the college has or can readily engage faculty
appropriately qualified to develop and deliver a high quality
curriculum at the baccalaureate level; and
(d) That the college can demonstrate demand for the proposed
program from a sufficient number of students and employers within its
service area to make the program cost-effective and feasible for the
college to operate.
(3) A college selected as a pilot college under this section may
develop the curriculum for and design and deliver courses leading to an
applied baccalaureate degree that has been shown to be in high demand.
However, degree programs developed under this section are subject to
approval by the college board under RCW 28B.50.090 and by the higher
education coordinating board under RCW 28B.76.230 before a pilot
college may enroll students in upper-division courses. Upon the
graduation of each pilot college's first cohort group, the college
shall submit a comprehensive report to the state board for community
and technical colleges for subsequent dissemination to the legislature.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.15.069 and 2003 c 232 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The building fee for each academic year shall be a percentage
of total tuition fees. This percentage shall be calculated by the
higher education coordinating board and be based on the actual
percentage the building fee is of total tuition for each tuition
category in the 1994-95 academic year, rounded up to the nearest half
percent.
(2) The governing boards of each institution of higher education,
except for the technical colleges, shall charge to and collect from
each student a services and activities fee. A governing board may
increase the existing fee annually, consistent with budgeting
procedures set forth in RCW 28B.15.045, by a percentage not to exceed
the annual percentage increase in student tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students: PROVIDED, That such percentage increase shall
not apply to that portion of the services and activities fee previously
committed to the repayment of bonded debt. These rate adjustments may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. For the 2003-04 academic year, the
services and activities fee shall be based upon the resident
undergraduate services and activities fee in 2002-03. The services and
activities fee committee provided for in RCW 28B.15.045 may initiate a
request to the governing board for a fee increase.
(3) Tuition and services and activities fees consistent with
subsection (2) of this section shall be set by the state board for
community and technical colleges for community college summer school
students unless the community college charges fees in accordance with
RCW 28B.15.515.
(4) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, each governing
board of a community college may charge such fees for ungraded courses,
noncredit courses, community services courses, and self-supporting
courses as it, in its discretion, may determine, consistent with the
rules of the state board for community and technical colleges.
(5) The governing board of a pilot college offering an applied
baccalaureate degree program under section 2 of this act may charge
tuition and fees for upper-division courses at rates consistent with
rules adopted by the state board for community and technical colleges,
not to exceed tuition fee rates at the regional universities.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.50.020 and 1991 c 238 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the dramatically
increasing number of students requiring high standards of education
either as a part of the continuing higher education program or for
occupational education and training, or for adult basic skills and
literacy education, by creating a new, independent system of community
and technical colleges which will:
(1) Offer an open door to every citizen, regardless of his or her
academic background or experience, at a cost normally within his or her
economic means;
(2) Ensure that each college district shall offer thoroughly
comprehensive educational, training and service programs to meet the
needs of both the communities and students served by combining high
standards of excellence in academic transfer courses and on a limited
and pilot basis, upper division courses leading to an applied
baccalaureate degree; realistic and practical courses in occupational
education, both graded and ungraded; community services of an
educational, cultural, and recreational nature; and adult education,
including basic skills and general, family, and work force literacy
programs and services. However, college districts containing only
technical colleges shall maintain programs solely for occupational
education, basic skills, and literacy purposes, and, for as long as a
need exists, may continue those programs, activities, and services
offered by the technical colleges during the twelve-month period
preceding September 1, 1991;
(3) Provide for basic skills and literacy education, and
occupational education and technical training at technical colleges in
order to prepare students for careers in a competitive work force;
(4) Provide or coordinate related and supplemental instruction for
apprentices at community and technical colleges;
(5) Provide administration by state and local boards which will
avoid unnecessary duplication of facilities or programs; and which will
encourage efficiency in operation and creativity and imagination in
education, training and service to meet the needs of the community and
students;
(6) Allow for the growth, improvement, flexibility and modification
of the community and technical colleges and their education, training
and service programs as future needs occur; and
(7) Establish firmly that except on a limited and pilot basis as
provided in section 2 of this act, community colleges are, for purposes
of academic training, two year institutions, and are an independent,
unique, and vital section of our state's higher education system,
separate from both the common school system and other institutions of
higher learning, and never to be considered for conversion into four-year liberal arts colleges.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.50.030 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 33 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the
term:
(1) "System" shall mean the state system of community and technical
colleges, which shall be a system of higher education.
(2) "Board" shall mean the work force training and education
coordinating board.
(3) "College board" shall mean the state board for community and
technical colleges created by this chapter.
(4) "Director" shall mean the administrative director for the state
system of community and technical colleges.
(5) "District" shall mean any one of the community and technical
college districts created by this chapter.
(6) "Board of trustees" shall mean the local community and
technical college board of trustees established for each college
district within the state.
(7) "Occupational education" shall mean that education or training
that will prepare a student for employment that does not require a
baccalaureate degree.
(8) "K-12 system" shall mean the public school program including
kindergarten through the twelfth grade.
(9) "Common school board" shall mean a public school district board
of directors.
(10) "Community college" shall include those higher education
institutions that conduct education programs under RCW 28B.50.020.
(11) "Technical college" shall include those higher education
institutions with the sole mission of conducting occupational
education, basic skills, literacy programs, and offering on short
notice, when appropriate, programs that meet specific industry needs.
The programs of technical colleges shall include, but not be limited
to, continuous enrollment, competency-based instruction, industry-experienced faculty, curriculum integrating vocational and basic skills
education, and curriculum approved by representatives of employers and
labor. For purposes of this chapter, technical colleges shall include
Lake Washington Vocational-Technical Institute, Renton Vocational-Technical Institute, Bates Vocational-Technical Institute, Clover Park
Vocational Institute, and Bellingham Vocational-Technical Institute.
(12) "Adult education" shall mean all education or instruction,
including academic, vocational education or training, basic skills and
literacy training, and "occupational education" provided by public
educational institutions, including common school districts for persons
who are eighteen years of age and over or who hold a high school
diploma or certificate. However, "adult education" shall not include
academic education or instruction for persons under twenty-one years of
age who do not hold a high school degree or diploma and who are
attending a public high school for the sole purpose of obtaining a high
school diploma or certificate, nor shall "adult education" include
education or instruction provided by any four year public institution
of higher education.
(13) "Dislocated forest product worker" shall mean a forest
products worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of
termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in
the individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of
a diminishing demand for his or her skills in that occupation or
industry; or (ii) is self-employed and has been displaced from his or
her business because of the diminishing demand for the business'
services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation from
employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources
impact area.
(14) "Forest products worker" shall mean a worker in the forest
products industries affected by the reduction of forest fiber
enhancement, transportation, or production. The workers included
within this definition shall be determined by the employment security
department, but shall include workers employed in the industries
assigned the major group standard industrial classification codes "24"
and "26" and the industries involved in the harvesting and management
of logs, transportation of logs and wood products, processing of wood
products, and the manufacturing and distribution of wood processing and
logging equipment. The commissioner may adopt rules further
interpreting these definitions. For the purposes of this subsection,
"standard industrial classification code" means the code identified in
RCW 50.29.025(3).
(15) "Dislocated salmon fishing worker" means a finfish products
worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of
termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in
the individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of
a diminishing demand for his or her skills in that occupation or
industry; or (ii) is self-employed and has been displaced from his or
her business because of the diminishing demand for the business's
services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation from
employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources
impact area.
(16) "Salmon fishing worker" means a worker in the finfish industry
affected by 1994 or future salmon disasters. The workers included
within this definition shall be determined by the employment security
department, but shall include workers employed in the industries
involved in the commercial and recreational harvesting of finfish
including buying and processing finfish. The commissioner may adopt
rules further interpreting these definitions.
(17) "Rural natural resources impact area" means:
(a) A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial
census, that meets three of the five criteria set forth in subsection
(18) of this section;
(b) A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty
thousand in the 1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five
criteria as set forth in subsection (18) of this section; or
(c) A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census,
that is located in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five
criteria set forth in subsection (18) of this section.
(18) For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact
areas, the following criteria shall be considered:
(a) A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(b) A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(c) Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses
of one hundred positions or more;
(d) Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses
of one hundred positions or more; and
(e) An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state
average. The counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by
the employment security department for the most recent year for which
data is available. For the purposes of administration of programs
under this chapter, the United States post office five-digit zip code
delivery areas will be used to determine residence status for
eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition, a zip code
delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an urbanized
area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by zip
codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also
considered nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make
available a zip code listing of the areas to all agencies and
organizations providing services under this chapter.
(19) "Applied baccalaureate degree" means a baccalaureate degree
awarded by a college under section 2 of this act for successful
completion of a program of study that is:
(a) Specifically designed for individuals who hold an associate of
applied science degree, or its equivalent, in order to maximize
application of their technical course credits toward the baccalaureate
degree; and
(b) Based on a curriculum that incorporates both theoretical and
applied knowledge and skills in a specific technical field.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.50.140 and 2004 c 275 s 58 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each board of trustees:
(1) Shall operate all existing community and technical colleges in
its district;
(2) Shall create comprehensive programs of community and technical
college education and training and maintain an open-door policy in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 28B.50.090(3). However,
technical colleges, and college districts containing only technical
colleges, shall maintain programs solely for occupational education,
basic skills, and literacy purposes, except as provided for in the
pilot program in section 2 of this act. For as long as a need exists,
technical colleges may continue those programs, activities, and
services they offered during the twelve-month period preceding
September 1, 1991;
(3) Shall employ for a period to be fixed by the board a college
president for each community and technical college and, may appoint a
president for the district, and fix their duties and compensation,
which may include elements other than salary. Compensation under this
subsection shall not affect but may supplement retirement, health care,
and other benefits that are otherwise applicable to the presidents as
state employees. The board shall also employ for a period to be fixed
by the board members of the faculty and such other administrative
officers and other employees as may be necessary or appropriate and fix
their salaries and duties. Compensation and salary increases under
this subsection shall not exceed the amount or percentage established
for those purposes in the state appropriations act by the legislature
as allocated to the board of trustees by the state board for community
and technical colleges. The state board for community and technical
colleges shall adopt rules defining the permissible elements of
compensation under this subsection;
(4) May establish, under the approval and direction of the college
board, new facilities as community needs and interests demand.
However, the authority of boards of trustees to purchase or lease major
off-campus facilities shall be subject to the approval of the higher
education coordinating board pursuant to RCW 28B.76.230;
(5) May establish or lease, operate, equip and maintain
dormitories, food service facilities, bookstores and other self-supporting facilities connected with the operation of the community and
technical college;
(6) May, with the approval of the college board, borrow money and
issue and sell revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness for the
construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping with permanent
fixtures, demolition and major alteration of buildings or other capital
assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements,
improvements or appurtenances, for dormitories, food service
facilities, and other self-supporting facilities connected with the
operation of the community and technical college in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 28B.10.300 through 28B.10.330 where applicable;
(7) May establish fees and charges for the facilities authorized
hereunder, including reasonable rules ((and regulations)) for the
government thereof, not inconsistent with the rules ((and regulations))
of the college board; each board of trustees operating a community and
technical college may enter into agreements, subject to rules ((and
regulations)) of the college board, with owners of facilities to be
used for housing regarding the management, operation, and government of
such facilities, and any board entering into such an agreement may:
(a) Make rules ((and regulations)) for the government, management
and operation of such housing facilities deemed necessary or advisable;
and
(b) Employ necessary employees to govern, manage and operate the
same;
(8) May receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises and
bequests of real or personal property from private sources, as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the community and technical
college programs as specified by law and the regulations of the state
college board; sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or
the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to the terms
and conditions thereof; and adopt ((regulations)) rules to govern the
receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income
thereof;
(9) May establish and maintain night schools whenever in the
discretion of the board of trustees it is deemed advisable, and
authorize classrooms and other facilities to be used for summer or
night schools, or for public meetings and for any other uses consistent
with the use of such classrooms or facilities for community and
technical college purposes;
(10) May make rules ((and regulations)) for pedestrian and
vehicular traffic on property owned, operated, or maintained by the
district;
(11) Shall prescribe, with the assistance of the faculty, the
course of study in the various departments of the community and
technical college or colleges under its control, and publish such
catalogues and bulletins as may become necessary;
(12) May grant to every student, upon graduation or completion of
a course of study, a suitable diploma, ((nonbaccalaureate)) degree or
certificate. Technical colleges shall offer only ((nonbaccalaureate))
technical degrees under the rules of the state board for community and
technical colleges that are appropriate to their work force education
and training mission. The primary purpose of this degree is to lead
the individual directly to employment in a specific occupation.
Technical colleges may not offer transfer degrees. Only pilot colleges
under section 2 of this act may award applied baccalaureate degrees.
The board, upon recommendation of the faculty, may also confer honorary
associate of arts degrees upon persons other than graduates of the
community college, in recognition of their learning or devotion to
education, literature, art, or science. No degree may be conferred in
consideration of the payment of money or the donation of any kind of
property;
(13) Shall enforce the rules and regulations prescribed by the
state board for community and technical colleges for the government of
community and technical colleges, students and teachers, and promulgate
such rules ((and regulations)) and perform all other acts not
inconsistent with law or rules ((and regulations)) of the state board
for community and technical colleges as the board of trustees may in
its discretion deem necessary or appropriate to the administration of
college districts: PROVIDED, That such rules ((and regulations)) shall
include, but not be limited to, rules ((and regulations)) relating to
housing, scholarships, conduct at the various community and technical
college facilities, and discipline: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the board
of trustees may suspend or expel from community and technical colleges
students who refuse to obey any of the duly ((promulgated)) adopted
rules ((and regulations));
(14) May, by written order filed in its office, delegate to the
president or district president any of the powers and duties vested in
or imposed upon it by this chapter. Such delegated powers and duties
may be exercised in the name of the district board;
(15) May perform such other activities consistent with this chapter
and not in conflict with the directives of the college board;
(16) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, may offer
educational services on a contractual basis other than the tuition and
fee basis set forth in chapter 28B.15 RCW for a special fee to private
or governmental entities, consistent with rules ((and regulations))
adopted by the state board for community and technical colleges:
PROVIDED, That the whole of such special fee shall go to the college
district and be not less than the full instructional costs of such
services including any salary increases authorized by the legislature
for community and technical college employees during the term of the
agreement: PROVIDED FURTHER, That enrollments generated hereunder
shall not be counted toward the official enrollment level of the
college district for state funding purposes;
(17) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, may offer
educational services on a contractual basis, charging tuition and fees
as set forth in chapter 28B.15 RCW, counting such enrollments for state
funding purposes, and may additionally charge a special supplemental
fee when necessary to cover the full instructional costs of such
services: PROVIDED, That such contracts shall be subject to review by
the state board for community and technical colleges and to such rules
as the state board may adopt for that purpose in order to assure that
the sum of the supplemental fee and the normal state funding shall not
exceed the projected total cost of offering the educational service:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That enrollments generated by courses offered on the
basis of contracts requiring payment of a share of the normal costs of
the course will be discounted to the percentage provided by the
college;
(18) Shall be authorized to pay dues to any association of trustees
that may be formed by the various boards of trustees; such association
may expend any or all of such funds to submit biennially, or more often
if necessary, to the governor and to the legislature, the
recommendations of the association regarding changes which would affect
the efficiency of such association;
(19) May participate in higher education centers and consortia that
involve any four-year public or independent college or university:
PROVIDED, That new degree programs or off-campus programs offered by a
four-year public or independent college or university in collaboration
with a community or technical college are subject to approval by the
higher education coordinating board under RCW 28B.76.230; and
(20) Shall perform any other duties and responsibilities imposed by
law or rule ((and regulation)) of the state board.

--- END ---