BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.18.060 and 1999 c 363 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The fish and wildlife commission in consultation with the
department is authorized to determine which waters of the state are
appropriate for this use ((during the 1999 and 2000 calendar years)).
In making this determination, the commission shall seek geographic
distribution to assure opportunity to fishers statewide.
The commission in consultation with the department will determine
the maximum number of fish that may be planted into state waters so as
not to compete with the wild populations of fish species in the water
body.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 77.18.070 (Program costs to be covered
by revenue increase) and 1999 c 363 s 3 are each repealed.

--- END ---