BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the United States
military academy at West Point, Virginia, the naval academy in
Annapolis, Maryland, and the air force academy in Colorado Springs,
Colorado actively combat a history of prior discrimination and have
strong policies to admit a diverse student body. The military service
academies work to create a truly integrated officer corps. The
legislature finds that the standards that are appropriate for creating
diversity at these prestigious institutions are also appropriate for
entrance into our state's four-year institutions of higher education.
The standards that are good enough for selecting students who will be
called upon to give their lives for this nation should also apply when
selecting students who are simply starting their college careers.
These same policies that make our military strong will strengthen our
classrooms and campuses and provide for our short and long-term
economic effectiveness.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.76.290 and 1993 c 77 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall coordinate educational activities among all
segments of higher education taking into account the educational
programs, facilities, and other resources of both public and
independent two and four-year colleges and universities. The four-year
institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall coordinate information and activities with the board. The board
shall have the following additional responsibilities:
(1) Promote interinstitutional cooperation;
(2) Establish minimum admission standards for four-year
institutions, including a requirement that coursework in American sign
language or an American Indian language shall satisfy any requirement
for instruction in a language other than English that the board or the
institutions may establish as a general undergraduate admissions
requirement. In establishing minimum entrance standards, the board
shall include policies identical to those used by the United States
military academy to create a diverse student body;
(3) Establish transfer policies;
(4) Adopt rules implementing statutory residency requirements;
(5) Develop and administer reciprocity agreements with bordering
states and the province of British Columbia;
(6) Review and recommend compensation practices and levels for
administrative employees, exempt under chapter ((28B.16)) 41.06 RCW,
and faculty using comparative data from peer institutions;
(7) Monitor higher education activities for compliance with all
relevant state policies for higher education;
(8) Arbitrate disputes between and among four-year institutions or
between and among four-year institutions and community colleges at the
request of one or more of the institutions involved, or at the request
of the governor, or from a resolution adopted by the legislature. The
decision of the board shall be binding on the participants in the
dispute;
(9) Establish and implement a state system for collecting,
analyzing, and distributing information;
(10) Recommend to the governor and the legislature ways to remove
any economic incentives to use off-campus program funds for on-campus
activities; and
(11) Make recommendations to increase minority participation, and
monitor and report on the progress of minority participation in higher
education.

--- END ---