BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A task force on the administrative
organization, structure, and delivery of services to children and
families is created to determine the most appropriate and effective
administrative structure for delivery of social and health services to
children and families, including juvenile rehabilitation services. The
task force shall study how best to ensure that an administration has
defined lines of responsibility for delivering services to families and
children in need and the best means for the public to hold government
accountable for delivery of those services. The task force shall
compare the effectiveness of including children and families services
delivery within an umbrella agency, such as the current department of
social and health services, with establishing a separate department for
children and family services whose director reports directly to the
governor and is not under the administration of an umbrella agency.
The task force shall, as part of the comparison, examine the
administrative structures used in other states for the delivery of
services to children and families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The task force created in section 1 of
this act shall consist of the following members appointed by the
governor:
(a) The dean of the school of social work at the University of
Washington or an academic professor from a list recommended by the
dean;
(b) Two members of the senate, from names recommended by the chair
of the senate committee on human services and corrections, which must
include one member from the minority party;
(c) Two members of the house of representatives, from names
recommended by the chair of the committee on children and family
services, which must include one member from the minority party;
(d) An academic professor with expertise in the management of
public agencies, from a list of names recommended by the dean of the
University of Washington's Daniel J. Evans graduate school of public
administration;
(e) A juvenile court administrator, from a list of names
recommended by the juvenile court administrators' association;
(f) A family superior court judge, from a list of names recommended
by the superior court judges' association;
(g) A law enforcement officer with experience in working with child
protective services investigations, from a list of names recommended by
the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;
(h) The director of the office of public defense;
(i) The director of the office of the family and children's
ombudsman;
(j) A line worker from the department of social and health
services, juvenile rehabilitation administration's community
supervision and placement services, from a list of names recommended by
the federation of state employees;
(k) A line social worker from the department of social and health
services with a master's degree in social work and fifteen years'
experience in the public or private sector investigating child abuse or
neglect and referring families and children to alcohol and substance
abuse services, from a list of names recommended by the federation of
state employees;
(l) A private vendor of mental health services to families of
children and children in both in-home and out-of-home placements as a
result of abuse or neglect or for juvenile rehabilitation, from a list
of names recommended by the Washington state coalition of children's
residential services;
(m) The director of the department of social and health services,
children's administration, office of legislative affairs; and
(n) A representative of the governor's office.
(2) The dean of the school of social work at the University of
Washington or the academic professor appointed by the governor shall be
the chair of the task force.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The task force shall study and report
findings and recommendations on which administrative and service
delivery structures will best accomplish positive outcomes for children
and families and efficiencies in administration, including but not
limited to:
(a) Reducing the number of children at risk for abuse or neglect
and increasing the safety and well-being of children;
(b) Increasing the ability of families to care for their own
children and reducing the number of children in foster care;
(c) Increasing placement stability and permanency for children in
out-of-home care and reducing unsafe and inappropriate placements;
(d) Delivering appropriate and timely mental health services;
(e) Providing adequate and appropriate staff training and
education;
(f) Promoting foster parent recruitment, training, and retention;
(g) Reducing the frequency and duration of sibling separation;
(h) Delivering adequate and timely services to adolescents;
(i) Increasing responsibility and accountability for achieving
goals; and
(j) Improving any other measurable outcomes for children and
families.
(2) The task force shall study and report findings and
recommendations on the costs, benefits, savings, or reductions in
services of the various administrative and service delivery structures
described in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The first meeting of the task force shall be
no later than May 1, 2005, with subsequent meetings as needed. The
task force may consult with others as is needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The final report of the findings and
recommendations shall be provided to appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---