BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.06A.030 and 1996 c 131 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ombudsman shall perform the following duties:
(1) Provide information as appropriate on the rights and
responsibilities of individuals receiving family and children's
services, and on the procedures for providing these services;
(2) Investigate, upon his or her own initiative or upon receipt of
a complaint, an administrative act alleged to be contrary to law, rule,
or policy, imposed without an adequate statement of reason, or based on
irrelevant, immaterial, or erroneous grounds; however, the ombudsman
may decline to investigate any complaint as provided by rules adopted
under this chapter;
(3) Monitor the procedures as established, implemented, and
practiced by the department to carry out its responsibilities in
delivering family and children's services with a view toward
appropriate preservation of families and ensuring children's health and
safety;
(4) Review periodically the facilities and procedures of state
institutions serving children, and state-licensed facilities or
residences;
(5)(a) Investigate individual casework of randomly chosen caseload-carrying child protective services and child welfare services employees
of the department of social and health services throughout the state.
Casework reviewed must be from any currently open cases and cases
closed within the last year.
(i) Investigations must address employee compliance with the
following: (A) Employee training; (B) department policies and
procedures; (C) state and federal law; (D) safety and risk assessment;
and (E) case investigation.
(ii) Investigations must include caseload levels and access to
clerical support.
(b) Investigate supervisors of caseload-carrying child protective
services and child welfare services employees of the department for
compliance with: (i) Employee training requirements; (ii) department
policies and procedures; (iii) state and federal law; (iv) critical
thinking and clinical analysis; (v) availability to and communication
with staff; and (vi) accountability;
(6) Recommend changes in ((the)) agency policies or procedures for
addressing the needs of families and children;
(((6))) (7) Submit annually to the legislative children's oversight
committee and to the governor by November 1 a report analyzing the work
of the office including recommendations for changes in department
policy, state law, or funding;
(((7))) (8) Grant the legislative children's oversight committee
access to all relevant records in the possession of the ombudsman
unless prohibited by law; and
(((8))) (9) Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

--- END ---