BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.030 and 2003 c 227 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Abandoned" means when the child's parent, guardian, or other
custodian has expressed, either by statement or conduct, an intent to
forego, for an extended period, parental rights or responsibilities
despite an ability to exercise such rights and responsibilities. If
the court finds that the petitioner has exercised due diligence in
attempting to locate the parent, no contact between the child and the
child's parent, guardian, or other custodian for a period of three
months creates a rebuttable presumption of abandonment, even if there
is no expressed intent to abandon.
(2) "Child" and "juvenile" means any individual under the age of
eighteen years.
(3) "Current placement episode" means the period of time that
begins with the most recent date that the child was removed from the
home of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian for purposes of
placement in out-of-home care and continues until: (a) The child
returns home; (b) an adoption decree, a permanent custody order, or
guardianship order is entered; or (c) the dependency is dismissed,
whichever occurs first.
(4) "Dependency guardian" means the person, nonprofit corporation,
or Indian tribe appointed by the court pursuant to this chapter for the
limited purpose of assisting the court in the supervision of the
dependency.
(5) "Dependent child" means any child who:
(a) Has been abandoned;
(b) Is abused or neglected as defined in chapter 26.44 RCW by a
person legally responsible for the care of the child; or
(c) Has no parent, guardian, or custodian capable of adequately
caring for the child, such that the child is in circumstances which
constitute a danger of substantial damage to the child's psychological
or physical development.
(6) "Developmental disability" means a disability attributable to
mental retardation, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, autism, or another
neurological or other condition of an individual found by the secretary
to be closely related to mental retardation or to require treatment
similar to that required for individuals with mental retardation, which
disability originates before the individual attains age eighteen, which
has continued or can be expected to continue indefinitely, and which
constitutes a substantial handicap to the individual.
(7) "Guardian" means the person or agency that: (a) Has been
appointed as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding other than
a proceeding under this chapter; and (b) has the legal right to custody
of the child pursuant to such appointment. The term "guardian" shall
not include a "dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a proceeding
under this chapter.
(8) "Guardian ad litem" means a person, appointed by the court to
represent the best interests of a child in a proceeding under this
chapter, or in any matter which may be consolidated with a proceeding
under this chapter. A "court-appointed special advocate" appointed by
the court to be the guardian ad litem for the child, or to perform
substantially the same duties and functions as a guardian ad litem,
shall be deemed to be guardian ad litem for all purposes and uses of
this chapter.
(9) "Guardian ad litem program" means a court-authorized volunteer
program, which is or may be established by the superior court of the
county in which such proceeding is filed, to manage all aspects of
volunteer guardian ad litem representation for children alleged or
found to be dependent. Such management shall include but is not
limited to: Recruitment, screening, training, supervision, assignment,
and discharge of volunteers.
(10) "Indigent" means a person who, at any stage of a court
proceeding, is:
(a) Receiving one of the following types of public assistance:
Temporary assistance for needy families, general assistance, poverty-related veterans' benefits, food stamps or food stamp benefits
transferred electronically, refugee resettlement benefits, medicaid, or
supplemental security income; or
(b) Involuntarily committed to a public mental health facility; or
(c) Receiving an annual income, after taxes, of one hundred twenty-five percent or less of the federally established poverty level; or
(d) Unable to pay the anticipated cost of counsel for the matter
before the court because his or her available funds are insufficient to
pay any amount for the retention of counsel.
(11) "Out-of-home care" means placement in a foster family home or
group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or placement
in a home, other than that of the child's parent, guardian, or legal
custodian, not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.
(12) "Parent" means an individual who has established a parent-child relationship under RCW 26.26.101, unless the legal rights of that
person have been terminated by a judicial proceeding pursuant to this
chapter, chapter 26.33 RCW, or the equivalent laws of another state or
a federally recognized Indian tribe.
(13) "Preventive services" means preservation services, as defined
in chapter 74.14C RCW, and other reasonably available services,
including housing services, capable of preventing the need for out-of-home placement while protecting the child. Housing services may
include, but are not limited to, referrals to federal, state, local, or
private agencies or organizations, assistance with forms and
applications, or financial subsidies for housing.
(((13))) (14) "Shelter care" means temporary physical care in a
facility licensed pursuant to RCW 74.15.030 or in a home not required
to be licensed pursuant to RCW 74.15.030.
(((14))) (15) "Sibling" means a child's birth brother, birth
sister, adoptive brother, adoptive sister, half-brother, or half-sister, or as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's tribe
for an Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4).
(((15))) (16) "Social study" means a written evaluation of matters
relevant to the disposition of the case and shall contain the following
information:
(a) A statement of the specific harm or harms to the child that
intervention is designed to alleviate;
(b) A description of the specific services and activities, for both
the parents and child, that are needed in order to prevent serious harm
to the child; the reasons why such services and activities are likely
to be useful; the availability of any proposed services; and the
agency's overall plan for ensuring that the services will be delivered.
The description shall identify the services chosen and approved by the
parent;
(c) If removal is recommended, a full description of the reasons
why the child cannot be protected adequately in the home, including a
description of any previous efforts to work with the parents and the
child in the home; the in-home treatment programs that have been
considered and rejected; the preventive services that have been offered
or provided and have failed to prevent the need for out-of-home
placement, unless the health, safety, and welfare of the child cannot
be protected adequately in the home; and the parents' attitude toward
placement of the child;
(d) A statement of the likely harms the child will suffer as a
result of removal;
(e) A description of the steps that will be taken to minimize the
harm to the child that may result if separation occurs including an
assessment of the child's relationship and emotional bond with any
siblings, and the agency's plan to provide ongoing contact between the
child and the child's siblings if appropriate; and
(f) Behavior that will be expected before determination that
supervision of the family or placement is no longer necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "alleged father" means a man
who alleges himself to be, or is alleged to be by the mother or another
relative of a child subject to a petition filed under this chapter, the
genetic father or a possible genetic father of the child, but whose
parentage has not been established under RCW 26.26.101(2) or the
equivalent laws of another state or a federally recognized Indian
tribe.
(2) Whenever a parent-child relationship as defined in RCW
26.26.101(2) has not been established as to another person and a child
only has an alleged father, the alleged father shall receive notice of
the petition and shelter care hearing in a proceeding under this
chapter to the same extent as a parent. The court may provide counsel
to the alleged father if he appears in the proceeding or requests that
the court appoint him counsel upon a finding that the alleged father
believes he is or may be the genetic father of the child and is willing
to cooperate in establishing parentage and is financially unable to
obtain counsel because of indigency.
(3) The department of social and health services shall refer the
alleged father to a support enforcement agency as defined in RCW
26.26.011 for a determination of parentage. The department of social
and health services has no obligation to offer or provide remedial
services to the alleged father, and the court may not order the
department to do so, until parentage is legally established under RCW
26.26.101(2) or the equivalent laws of another state or a federally
recognized Indian tribe. The department of social and health services
may offer services to the alleged father on a voluntary basis while a
determination of parentage is pending.
(4) The department of social and health services has no obligation
to place a child with or provide visits to the alleged father or any
relatives of the alleged father, and the court may not order the
department to do so, until parentage is legally established under RCW
26.26.101(2) or the equivalent laws of another state or a federally
recognized Indian tribe. The department of social and health services
may recommend placement of a child with or visits to the alleged father
or relatives of the alleged father while a determination of parentage
is pending if such a placement or visitation is in the best interests
of the child.
(5) Upon a finding that the alleged father has failed to cooperate
with a referral to a support enforcement agency, the court, on its own
motion or the motion of a party, may order genetic testing of the
alleged father, child, or any other party to the proceeding pursuant to
RCW 26.26.405. An order for genetic testing is enforceable by
contempt.
(6) If the court finds that the department of social and health
services has made reasonable efforts to refer the alleged father to a
support enforcement agency and the alleged father has failed to submit
to genetic testing as ordered by the court within a reasonable period
of time, the court may on that basis adjudicate parentage contrary to
the position of the alleged father pursuant to RCW 26.26.575(2) and
find that the alleged father's failure to cooperate constitutes
aggravated circumstances pursuant to RCW 13.34.132.

--- END ---