BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Current extended conflicts in Iraq and
Afghanistan arising from the war on terrorism have affected the rights
and benefits of members of the military. Federal law changes designed
to protect members have not been implemented at the state level due to
language in state law that is outdated. Current state statute does not
adequately recognize the current military conflicts or the demands of
ongoing active service. Members of the military have not been able to
return to employment from active duty. The legislature intends to
authorize the department of retirement systems to comply with federal
laws including, but not limited to, the uniformed services employment
and reemployment rights act, the employee retirement income security
act, and the regulations of the internal revenue service, in
implementing benefits on behalf of retirement system members. The
legislature declares that immediate legislative action is necessary to
ensure military members promptly receive their benefits consistent with
federal law.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.04.005 and 2002 c 292 s 1 and 2002 c 27 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in RCW 41.04.005, 41.16.220, 41.20.050, 41.40.170, and
28B.15.380 "veteran" includes every person, who at the time he or she
seeks the benefits of RCW 41.04.005, 41.16.220, 41.20.050, 41.40.170,
or 28B.15.380 has received an honorable discharge, is actively serving
honorably, or received a discharge for physical reasons with an
honorable record and who meets at least one of the following criteria:
(a) The person has served between World War I and World War II or
during any period of war, as defined in subsection (2) of this section,
as either:
(i) A member in any branch of the armed forces of the United
States;
(ii) A member of the women's air forces service pilots;
(iii) A U.S. documented merchant mariner with service aboard an
oceangoing vessel operated by the war shipping administration, the
office of defense transportation, or their agents, from December 7,
1941, through December 31, 1946; or
(iv) A civil service crewmember with service aboard a U.S. army
transport service or U.S. naval transportation service vessel in
oceangoing service from December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946; or
(b) The person has received the armed forces expeditionary medal,
or marine corps and navy expeditionary medal, for opposed action on
foreign soil, for service:
(i) In any branch of the armed forces of the United States; or
(ii) As a member of the women's air forces service pilots.
(2) A "period of war" includes:
(a) World War I;
(b) World War II;
(c) The Korean conflict;
(d) The Vietnam era(([, which])), which means:
(i) The period beginning on February 28, 1961, and ending on May 7,
1975, in the case of a veteran who served in the Republic of Vietnam
during that period;
(ii) The period beginning August 5, 1964, and ending on May 7,
1975;
(e) The Persian Gulf War, which was the period beginning August 2,
1990, and ending on the date prescribed by presidential proclamation or
law;
(f) The period beginning on the date of any future declaration of
war by the congress and ending on the date prescribed by presidential
proclamation or concurrent resolution of the congress; and
(g) The following armed conflicts, if the participant was awarded
the respective campaign badge or medal: The crisis in Lebanon; the
invasion of Grenada; Panama, Operation Just Cause; Somalia, Operation
Restore Hope; Haiti, Operation Uphold Democracy; ((and)) Bosnia,
Operation Joint Endeavor; and operations within and outside of the
United States in support of the global war on terrorism including, but
not limited to, Operation Noble Eagle, Operation Enduring Freedom, and
Operation Iraqi Freedom.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.40.170 and 2002 c 27 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member who has served or shall serve on active federal
service in the military or naval forces of the United States and who
left or shall leave an employer to enter such service shall be deemed
to be on military leave of absence if he or she has resumed or shall
resume employment as an employee within one year from termination
thereof.
(2) If he or she has applied or shall apply for reinstatement of
employment, within one year from termination of the military service,
and is refused employment for reasons beyond his or her control, he or
she shall, upon resumption of service within ten years have such
service credited to him or her.
(3) In any event, after completing twenty-five years of creditable
service, any member may have service in the armed forces credited to
him or her as a member whether or not he or she left the employ of an
employer to enter the armed service: PROVIDED, That in no instance,
described in this section, shall military service in excess of five
years be credited: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each instance the
member must restore all withdrawn accumulated contributions, which
restoration must be completed within five years of membership service
following the first resumption of employment or complete twenty-five
years of creditable service: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section
will not apply to any individual, not a veteran within the meaning of
RCW 41.04.005.
(4)(a) A member, after completing twenty-five years of creditable
service, who would have otherwise become eligible for a retirement
benefit as defined under this chapter while serving honorably in the
armed forces as referenced in RCW 41.04.005, shall, upon application to
the department, be eligible to receive credit for this service without
returning to covered employment.
(b) Service credit granted under (a) of this subsection applies
only to veterans as defined in RCW 41.40.005 serving in the armed
forces on or after September 11, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act may be known and cited as the
public employment, military service, and retirement act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act applies retroactively to September
11, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---