BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the policy of this state to prohibit
all forms and means of gambling, except where carefully and
specifically authorized and regulated. With the advent of the internet
and other technologies and means of communication that were not
contemplated when either the gambling act was enacted in 1973, or the
lottery commission was created in 1982, it is appropriate for this
legislature to reaffirm the policy prohibiting gambling that exploits
such new technologies.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.46.240 and 1991 c 261 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whoever knowingly transmits or receives gambling information by
telephone, telegraph, radio, semaphore, the internet, or similar means,
or knowingly installs or maintains equipment for the transmission or
receipt of gambling information shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor
subject to the penalty set forth in RCW 9A.20.021: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That this section shall not apply to such information transmitted or
received or equipment installed or maintained relating to activities
authorized by this chapter or to any act or acts in furtherance thereof
when conducted in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and in
accordance with the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.70.040 and 1994 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall have the power, and it shall be its duty:
(1) To ((promulgate such)) adopt rules governing the establishment
and operation of a state lottery as it deems necessary and desirable in
order that such a lottery be initiated at the earliest feasible and
practicable time, and in order that such lottery produce the maximum
amount of net revenues for the state consonant with the dignity of the
state and the general welfare of the people. Such rules shall include,
but shall not be limited to, the following:
(a) The type of lottery to be conducted which may include the
selling of tickets or shares. The use of electronic or mechanical
devices or video terminals which allow for individual play against such
devices or terminals shall be prohibited. Approval of the legislature
shall be required before entering any agreement with other state
lotteries to conduct shared games;
(b) The price, or prices, of tickets or shares in the lottery;
(c) The numbers and sizes of the prizes on the winning tickets or
shares;
(d) The manner of selecting the winning tickets or shares;
(e) The manner and time of payment of prizes to the holder of
winning tickets or shares which, at the director's option, may be paid
in lump sum amounts or installments over a period of years;
(f) The frequency of the drawings or selections of winning tickets
or shares. Approval of the legislature is required before conducting
any on-line game in which the drawing or selection of winning tickets
occurs: (i) More frequently than once every twenty-four hours; or (ii)
in advance of the purchase of a ticket or share;
(g) Without limit as to number, the type or types of locations at
which tickets or shares may be sold;
(h) The method to be used in selling tickets or shares. If an
electronic or mechanical device is used to initiate a transaction to
purchase or sell tickets or shares, or to communicate any other means
of becoming eligible to win a prize, including authority to expend
credit or funds held on account, the transaction must be initiated by
or in the physical presence of the player using an electronic or
mechanical device that is (i) owned by, or leased to, and (ii) located
on the premises of a licensed sales agent or the state lottery;
(i) The licensing of agents to sell or distribute tickets or
shares, except that a person under the age of eighteen shall not be
licensed as an agent;
(j) The manner and amount of compensation, if any, to be paid
licensed sales agents necessary to provide for the adequate
availability of tickets or shares to prospective buyers and for the
convenience of the public;
(k) The apportionment of the total revenues accruing from the sale
of lottery tickets or shares and from all other sources among: (i) The
payment of prizes to the holders of winning tickets or shares, which
shall not be less than forty-five percent of the gross annual revenue
from such lottery, (ii) transfers to the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260, and (iii) transfer to the state's general
fund. Transfers to the state general fund shall be made in compliance
with RCW 43.01.050;
(l) Such other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and
economical operation and administration of the lottery and for the
convenience of the purchasers of tickets or shares and the holders of
winning tickets or shares.
(2) To ensure that in each place authorized to sell lottery tickets
or shares, on the back of the ticket or share, and in any advertising
or promotion there shall be conspicuously displayed an estimate of the
probability of purchasing a winning ticket.
(3) To amend, repeal, or supplement any such rules from time to
time as it deems necessary or desirable.
(4) To advise and make recommendations to the director for the
operation and administration of the lottery.

--- END ---