BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.640 and 2001 c 208 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person, other than a bona fide political party or a caucus
political committee, may make contributions to a candidate for a state
legislative office that in the aggregate exceed five hundred dollars or
to a candidate for a state office other than a state legislative office
that in the aggregate exceed one thousand dollars for each election in
which the candidate is on the ballot or appears as a write-in
candidate. Contributions made with respect to a primary may not be
made after the date of the primary. However, contributions to a
candidate or a candidate's authorized committee may be made with
respect to a primary until thirty days after the primary, subject to
the following limitations: (a) The candidate lost the primary; (b) the
candidate's authorized committee has insufficient funds to pay debts
outstanding as of the date of the primary; and (c) the contributions
may only be raised and spent to satisfy the outstanding debt.
Contributions made with respect to a general election may not be made
after the final day of the applicable election cycle.
(2) No person, other than a bona fide political party or a caucus
political committee, may make contributions to a state official against
whom recall charges have been filed, or to a political committee having
the expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall of the
state official, during a recall campaign that in the aggregate exceed
five hundred dollars if for a state legislative office or one thousand
dollars if for a state office other than a state legislative office.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, no bona fide
political party or caucus political committee may make contributions to
a candidate during an election cycle that in the aggregate exceed (i)
fifty cents multiplied by the number of eligible registered voters in
the jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected if the contributor
is a caucus political committee or the governing body of a state
organization, or (ii) twenty-five cents multiplied by the number of
registered voters in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is
elected if the contributor is a county central committee or a
legislative district committee.
(b) No candidate may accept contributions from a county central
committee or a legislative district committee during an election cycle
that when combined with contributions from other county central
committees or legislative district committees would in the aggregate
exceed twenty-five cents times the number of registered voters in the
jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, no bona fide
political party or caucus political committee may make contributions to
a state official against whom recall charges have been filed, or to a
political committee having the expectation of making expenditures in
support of the state official, during a recall campaign that in the
aggregate exceed (i) fifty cents multiplied by the number of eligible
registered voters in the jurisdiction entitled to recall the state
official if the contributor is a caucus political committee or the
governing body of a state organization, or (ii) twenty-five cents
multiplied by the number of registered voters in the jurisdiction from
which the candidate is elected if the contributor is a county central
committee or a legislative district committee.
(b) No state official against whom recall charges have been filed,
no authorized committee of the official, and no political committee
having the expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall
of a state official may accept contributions from a county central
committee or a legislative district committee during an election cycle
that when combined with contributions from other county central
committees or legislative district committees would in the aggregate
exceed twenty-five cents multiplied by the number of registered voters
in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected.
(5) For purposes of determining contribution limits under
subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the number of eligible
registered voters in a jurisdiction is the number at the time of the
most recent general election in the jurisdiction.
(6) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section, no
person other than an individual, bona fide political party, or caucus
political committee may make contributions reportable under this
chapter to a caucus political committee that in the aggregate exceed
five hundred dollars in a calendar year or to a bona fide political
party that in the aggregate exceed two thousand five hundred dollars in
a calendar year. This subsection does not apply to loans made in the
ordinary course of business.
(7) For the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, a
contribution to the authorized political committee of a candidate, or
of a state official against whom recall charges have been filed, is
considered to be a contribution to the candidate or state official.
(8) A contribution received within the twelve-month period after a
recall election concerning a state office is considered to be a
contribution during that recall campaign if the contribution is used to
pay a debt or obligation incurred to influence the outcome of that
recall campaign.
(9) The contributions allowed by subsection (2) of this section are
in addition to those allowed by subsection (1) of this section, and the
contributions allowed by subsection (4) of this section are in addition
to those allowed by subsection (3) of this section.
(10) RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790 apply to a special election
conducted to fill a vacancy in a state office. However, the
contributions made to a candidate or received by a candidate for a
primary or special election conducted to fill such a vacancy shall not
be counted toward any of the limitations that apply to the candidate or
to contributions made to the candidate for any other primary or
election.
(11) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this section, no
corporation or business entity not doing business in Washington state,
no labor union with fewer than ten members who reside in Washington
state, and no political committee that has not received contributions
of ten dollars or more from at least ten persons registered to vote in
Washington state during the preceding one hundred eighty days may make
contributions reportable under this chapter to a candidate, to a state
official against whom recall charges have been filed, or to a political
committee having the expectation of making expenditures in support of
the recall of the official. This subsection does not apply to loans
made in the ordinary course of business.
(12) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this section, no
county central committee or legislative district committee may make
contributions reportable under this chapter to a candidate, state
official against whom recall charges have been filed, or political
committee having the expectation of making expenditures in support of
the recall of a state official if the county central committee or
legislative district committee is outside of the jurisdiction entitled
to elect the candidate or recall the state official.
(13) No person may accept contributions that exceed the
contribution limitations provided in this section.
(14) The following contributions are exempt from the contribution
limits of this section:
(a) An expenditure or contribution earmarked for voter
registration, for absentee ballot information, for precinct caucuses,
for get-out-the-vote campaigns, for precinct judges or inspectors, for
sample ballots, or for ballot counting, all without promotion of or
political advertising for individual candidates; or
(b) An expenditure by a political committee for its own internal
organization or fund raising without direct association with individual
candidates.
(15) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this section, no
person who is not a registered voter in Washington state and no
corporation or other entity that is not doing business in Washington
state and not subject to enforcement oversight or regulation by the
gambling commission or the horse racing commission, and is engaged in
an activity that if conducted in Washington state would require a
license issued by either the gambling commission or the horse racing
commission, may make contributions that are reportable under this
chapter to any political committee with the expectation of making an
expenditure in support of or opposition to a ballot measure affecting
chapter 9.46, 67.16, or 67.70 RCW.

--- END ---