BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares that: (1) The
safety, health, and welfare of children and families of this state
would benefit by the establishment of a uniform registration and
disclosure system for all persons privately engaging in the business of
providing, for compensation, athletic coaching services to persons
under the age of eighteen; and (2) a parent's or guardian's right to
know of the criminal history background of any person providing or
offering to provide athletic coaching services to their child far
outweighs any right that the athletic coach may have to keep such
matters secret or private.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(3) "Youth athletic coaching" means the activity of providing to a
child or youth under the age of eighteen, to whom the person is not
related by blood or marriage, services for compensation relating to the
development of the child's or youth's athletic talents, skills, or
abilities.
(4) "Athletic" means a physical activity requiring or involving
stamina, agility, strength, knowledge of the activity's rules, and the
capability to perform movements or functions required under those
rules, and includes individual and organized or team sports or games.
(5) "Privately providing youth athletic coaching services" means
the performance of youth athletic coaching services through an
employment or business relationship other than where the provider
possesses a current teaching certificate pursuant to chapter 28A.410
RCW or is employed by a private or public school after completing a
criminal history background check as required by RCW 28A.195.080 or
28A.400.303.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) It is unlawful for any person to
advertise or offer to provide, engage in, conduct, or carry on the
business of privately providing youth athletic coaching services in
this state unless the person possesses a valid, unsuspended, and
unexpired certificate of registration issued by the department under
this chapter.
(2) A person who violates this section is guilty of (a) a gross
misdemeanor if the person has no criminal conviction appearing on any
criminal history background record as of the date of the violation; and
(b) a class C felony if the person has any criminal conviction for any
offense appearing on any criminal history background record as of the
date of the violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The director may require, by rule, any
information and documentation that reasonably relates to the need to
determine whether the applicant meets the criteria to be registered as
a youth athletic coach.
(2) An applicant must meet the following minimum requirements to
obtain a certificate of registration as a youth athletic coach:
(a) Be at least eighteen years of age;
(b) Be a citizen or resident alien of the United States;
(c) Have a place of business or residence located in the state;
(d) Submit a fully completed application on the form prescribed by
the director, including a set of the applicant's fingerprints that are
readable by the Washington state patrol criminal identification system
under RCW 10.97.030 and 10.97.050 and through the federal bureau of
investigation fingerprint check using a complete Washington state
criminal identification fingerprint card;
(e) Pay such nonrefundable fee as is required by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The Washington state patrol shall
forward the fingerprint cards submitted by applicants under this
chapter to the federal bureau of investigation for a national criminal
history records check.
(2) An application submitted under section 4 of this act shall not
be deemed complete until the fingerprint cards and a record report has
been received by the department from both the Washington state patrol
and the federal bureau of investigation fingerprint check systems.
(3) A record report received by the department pursuant to this act
shall be exempt from public inspection or disclosure under chapter
42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The director shall identify with a
unique registration number and issue a certificate of registration as
a youth athletic coach to each applicant within thirty days after
receiving the latter of the record report from the Washington state
patrol criminal identification system and the federal bureau of
investigation fingerprint check system. The certificate of
registration shall contain (a) as precise a representation as is
practicable of the record reports received by the department from both
the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation
fingerprint check systems; and (b) a statement substantially in the
form of section 7 of this act.
(2) Every advertisement by a registered youth athletic coach that
solicits or advertises for business as a private youth athletic coach
shall contain the name of the registrant, the address of record, the
registration number as they appear in the records of the director, and
a statement that a certified copy of the registrant's state and
nationwide criminal history background check is available for
inspection.
(3) A registered youth athletic coach shall, before entering into
a contract to provide youth athletic coaching services, deliver a
certified copy of the certificate of registration issued under this
section to (a) the parents or guardians of any child or youth for whom
the youth athletic coach offers to provide youth athletic coaching
services where the agreement to provide the services is between the
coach and the parents or guardians; or (b) the hiring officer of any
entity employing or retaining the coach to provide youth athletic
coaching services where the agreement to provide such services is
between the parent or guardian and the third party.
(4) The department may charge a reasonable fee, not to exceed ten
dollars, to create each certified copy of a certificate of registration
issued under this section.
(5) A certificate of registration issued under this chapter is
valid for two years from the date of issue, and is not transferable.
A certificate may be renewed with the same unique registration number
upon submission of an application as required under section 4 of this
act no sooner than ninety and no later than sixty days prior to the
expiration date of the current certificate of registration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The state of Washington and its employees
are not liable for defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, or any
other claim in connection with any lawful dissemination of information
released under this chapter. The lawful dissemination of information
under this chapter shall not be interpreted as (1) representing that
the subject of the inquiry has no criminal record or adverse civil or
administrative decisions; or (2) a determination that the subject of
the inquiry is suitable for involvement with a business or
organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Before entering into a contract with the
parent or guardian of a child or youth to provide youth athletic
coaching services to the child or youth, a youth athletic coach shall
provide written notice in a conspicuous form to the parents or
guardians that the parent or guardian has the right to verify the
accuracy of the certified copy of the certificate of registration that
the youth athletic coach is required to provide under section 6(3) of
this act.
(2) Before entering into a contract with the parent or guardian to
provide youth athletic coaching services to the child or youth of the
parent or guardian, an entity employing or retaining a youth athletic
coach to perform such services shall provide written notice in a
conspicuous form to the parents or guardians that the parent or
guardian has the right to verify the accuracy of the certified copy of
the certificate of registration that the youth athletic coach is
required to provide under section 6(3) of this act.
(3) A parent or guardian exercising the right to verify the
accuracy of the certified copy of the certificate shall submit a
certified copy of the certificate to the department. The department
shall compare the copy submitted to the records maintained by the
department and shall inform the requesting party whether or not the two
contain the same information. In the event the copy and the records do
not contain the same information, the nature of the difference shall
not be disclosed, but the department shall consider the discrepancy to
be a written complaint to the department charging a registered private
youth athletic coach with unprofessional conduct, as provided under
section 12 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1)(a) A person registered under this
chapter must notify the director within thirty days of any material
change in the information furnished or required to be furnished to the
director, including but not limited to the discovery of (i) any error
in the record report contained on the certificate of registration, or
(ii) arrest or conviction of the registrant for any criminal offense
occurring after the date of application.
(b) Upon receipt of such information from the registrant under (a)
of this subsection, the director shall investigate the accuracy of such
information, and may accept proof of a recent national crime
information center/III criminal background report or any national or
interstate criminal background report. If the director concludes the
report of the registrant is accurate, the director shall update the
records maintained by the department, assess a reasonable fee of not
less than fifty dollars, and, upon receipt of the required fee, issue
an amended certificate of registration to the registrant.
(2) The director shall suspend the registration of any person who
has been:
(a) Convicted of any criminal offense after the date of application
until the registrant notifies the director of such conviction and pays
the fee required by subsection (1) of this section;
(b) Certified by a lending agency and reported to the director for
nonpayment or default on a federally or state-guaranteed educational
loan or service-conditional scholarship. Prior to the suspension, the
agency must provide the person an opportunity for a brief adjudicative
proceeding under RCW 34.05.485 through 34.05.494 and issue a finding of
nonpayment or default on a federally or state-guaranteed educational
loan or service-conditional scholarship. The person's registration
shall not be reissued until the person provides the director a written
release issued by the lending agency stating that the person is making
payments on the loan in accordance with a repayment agreement approved
by the lending agency. If the person has continued to meet all other
requirements for registration during the suspension, reinstatement
shall be automatic upon receipt of the notice and payment of any
reinstatement fee the director may impose;
(c) Certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of
social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a
support order. If the person has continued to meet all other
requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the
registration shall be automatic upon the director's receipt of a
release issued by the department of social and health services stating
that the person is in compliance with the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The provisions of this chapter relating
to the registration of youth athletic coaches are exclusive. No
governmental subdivision of this state may enact any laws or rules
registering such purposes for regulatory purposes, except as provided
in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent a political
subdivision of this state from levying a business fee, business and
occupation tax, or other tax upon youth athletic coaches if such fees
or taxes are levied by the political subdivision on other types of
businesses within its boundaries.
(3) This section shall not be construed to prevent this state or a
political subdivision of this state from licensing for regulatory
purposes youth athletic coaches with respect to activities that are not
regulated under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The uniform regulation of business and
professions act, chapter 18.235 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of
registrations and the discipline of registrants under this chapter.
(2) In addition to those powers set forth in RCW 18.235.030, the
director has the authority to enter into an assurance of discontinuance
in lieu of issuing a statement of charges or conducting a hearing. The
assurance shall consist of a statement of the law in question and an
agreement to not violate the stated provision. The applicant or
registered youth athletic coach shall not be required to admit to any
violation of the law, and the assurance shall not be construed as such
an admission. Violation of an assurance under this subsection is
grounds for disciplinary action.
(3) In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW
18.235.130, the following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute
unprofessional conduct:
(a) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules
adopted under this chapter;
(b) Violating an order to cease and desist that is issued by the
director under this chapter;
(c) Misrepresenting or knowingly making a material misstatement or
omission in the application to register as a youth athletic coach;
(d) Misrepresenting or knowingly making a material misstatement or
omission in any physical or electronic material soliciting for business
as a youth athletic coach as required under section 6(2) of this act;
(e) Failing to conspicuously inform the parent or guardian of a
prospective client of the right to verify whether the certified copy of
the youth athletic coach's certificate of registration provided to them
was a true, accurate, and complete copy of the records maintained by
the department, as required under section 6(3) of this act;
(f) Failing to deliver a true, accurate, and complete certified
copy of the youth athletic coach's certificate of registration to
prospective clients as required under section 6(3) of this act;
(g) A finding in any (i) dependency action under RCW 13.34.040;
(ii) court in a domestic relations proceeding under Title 26 RCW; or
(iii) disciplinary board final decision that the registrant has
sexually assaulted or exploited a child or physically assaulted any
child.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Any person may submit a written complaint
to the department charging a registered youth athletic coach or
applicant with unprofessional conduct and specifying the grounds for
the charge. If the director determines that the complaint merits
investigation, or if the director has reason to believe, without a
formal complaint, that a registered youth athletic coach or applicant
may have engaged in unprofessional conduct, the director shall
investigate to determine if there has been unprofessional conduct. A
person who files a complaint under this section in good faith is immune
from suit in any civil action related to the filing or contents of the
complaint. When a statement of charges is issued against a registered
youth athletic coach or applicant under RCW 18.235.050, notice of this
action must be given to the registered youth athletic coach.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The director, in implementing and
administering the provisions of this chapter, shall act in accordance
with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.235.020 and 2002 c 86 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the director and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the businesses and
professions licensed under the chapters specified in this section.
This chapter does not apply to any business or profession not licensed
under the chapters specified in this section.
(2)(a) The director has authority under this chapter in relation to
the following businesses and professions:
(i) Auctioneers under chapter 18.11 RCW;
(ii) Bail bond agents under chapter 18.185 RCW;
(iii) Camping resorts' operators and salespersons under chapter
19.105 RCW;
(iv) Commercial telephone solicitors under chapter 19.158 RCW;
(v) Cosmetologists, barbers, manicurists, and estheticians under
chapter 18.16 RCW;
(vi) Court reporters under chapter 18.145 RCW;
(vii) Employment agencies under chapter 19.31 RCW;
(viii) For hire vehicle operators under chapter 46.72 RCW;
(ix) Limousines under chapter 46.72A RCW;
(x) Notaries public under chapter 42.44 RCW;
(xi) Private investigators under chapter 18.165 RCW;
(xii) Professional boxing, martial arts, and wrestling under
chapter 67.08 RCW;
(xiii) Real estate appraisers under chapter 18.140 RCW;
(xiv) Real estate brokers and salespersons under chapters 18.85 and
18.86 RCW;
(xv) Security guards under chapter 18.170 RCW;
(xvi) Sellers of travel under chapter 19.138 RCW;
(xvii) Timeshares and timeshare salespersons under chapter 64.36
RCW; ((and))
(xviii) Whitewater river outfitters under chapter 79A.60 RCW; and
(xix) Youth athletic coaches under chapter 19.-- RCW (sections 1
through 13 and 15 of this act).
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The state board of registration for architects established in
chapter 18.08 RCW;
(ii) The cemetery board established in chapter 68.05 RCW;
(iii) The Washington state collection agency board established in
chapter 19.16 RCW;
(iv) The state board of registration for professional engineers and
land surveyors established in chapter 18.43 RCW governing licenses
issued under chapters 18.43 and 18.210 RCW;
(v) The state board of funeral directors and embalmers established
in chapter 18.39 RCW;
(vi) The state board of registration for landscape architects
established in chapter 18.96 RCW; and
(vii) The state geologist licensing board established in chapter
18.220 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplinary authority may grant or deny licenses based on the
conditions and criteria established in this chapter and the chapters
specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter also governs
any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to denial of
licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the applicant's
compliance with an order entered under RCW 18.235.110 by the
disciplinary authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The youth athletic coach account is created
in the state treasury. All receipts from the registration fees and
other fees received by the department of licensing under this act must
be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used for the
purposes of administering the registration and disciplining of youth
athletic coaches as provided under this act.

Sec. 16 RCW 43.24.--- and 2005 c . . . (SB 5365) s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The business and professions account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from business or professional licenses,
registrations, certifications, renewals, examinations, or civil
penalties assessed and collected by the department from the following
chapters must be deposited into the account:
(a) Chapter 18.11 RCW, auctioneers;
(b) Chapter 18.16 RCW, cosmetologists, barbers, and manicurists;
(c) Chapter 18.96 RCW, landscape architects;
(d) Chapter 18.145 RCW, court reporters;
(e) Chapter 18.165 RCW, private investigators;
(f) Chapter 18.170 RCW, security guards;
(g) Chapter 18.185 RCW, bail bond agents;
(h) Chapter 19.16 RCW, collection agencies;
(i) Chapter 19.31 RCW, employment agencies;
(j) Chapter 19.105 RCW, camping resorts;
(k) Chapter 19.138 RCW, sellers of travel;
(l) Chapter 42.44 RCW, notaries public; ((and))
(m) Chapter 64.36 RCW, timeshares; and
(n) Chapter 19.-- RCW (sections 1 through 13 and 15 of this act),
youth athletic coaches.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenses incurred in
carrying out these business and professions licensing activities of the
department. Any residue in the account shall be accumulated and shall
not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium.
(2) The director shall biennially prepare a budget request based on
the anticipated costs of administering the business and professions
licensing activities listed in subsection (1) of this section, which
shall include the estimated income from these business and professions
fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2005, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Section 15 of this act is null and void if
Senate Bill No. 5365 becomes law by July 2, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Section 16 of this act is null and void if
Senate Bill No. 5365 fails to become law by July 2, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Sections 1 through 13 and 15 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Sections 1 through 13 and 15 of this act
take effect December 31, 2006.

--- END ---