BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Washington's increasing cougar and human populations, and
decreasing cougar habitat, create new management challenges;
(b) The Washington department of fish and wildlife, the agency with
authority over cougar control, acknowledges responding to over five
hundred complaints a year regarding urban sightings, attacks on
livestock and pets, and cougar confrontations with humans;
(c) A 1996 initiative limited the hunting of cougars and some other
species with the aid of bait or the use of hunting hound dogs, though
the initiative did allow the state to authorize the use of hounds to
control cougar populations for public safety; and
(d) The initiative has resulted in a reduction in the number of
cougar harvested during the cougar hunting season, and this has in turn
resulted in an increase in the number of cougar/human confrontations
and cougar attacks on livestock and pets.
(2) The legislature therefore intends to initiate a survey of
cougar populations and encounters to help the state and participating
county legislative authorities create a dangerous cougar management
program that minimizes cougar incidents and executes more timely and
effective actions when incidents threaten public safety or property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of fish and wildlife, in
full cooperation and collaboration with each county legislative
authority that elects to participate, shall complete a comprehensive
cougar survey of that county in order to assess and identify:
(a) The most current cougar population data in the county;
(b) The number of cougar encounters with humans, by type and
location, in the county;
(c) The number of livestock and pet depredations, by type and
location, in the county; and
(d) Actions taken through existing cougar depredation permits,
public safety cougar hunts, or other existing wildlife management tools
to deal with cougar incidents in the county.
(2) Using survey results and other pertinent data, the department
of fish and wildlife shall establish a dangerous cougar management and
incident response program for that county. The program shall be
designed to generate the data necessary to minimize cougar incidents
and execute more timely and effective actions when incidents threaten
public safety or property.
(3) The department of fish and wildlife must report survey results
for each participating county to the fish and wildlife commission and
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2005.
The report shall also recommend:
(a) Legislative or other changes needed to improve the dangerous
cougar management and incident response program;
(b) Methods to more effectively collect, share, and use incident
reporting data to minimize cougar incidents and inform future cougar
management decisions; and
(c) Legislative or other changes needed to foster more timely and
effective response actions to protect public safety and property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---