BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that forests
throughout the American west are suffering from the accumulation of
small-diameter wood materials to levels well in excess of what would be
found in natural forest ecosystems. This build-up of materials, which
lack any current market value, is in large part a result of vigorous
and successful forest fire suppression efforts over the last century
and represents a significant threat to forest health and ecosystem
function. In particular, the excess biomass accumulation causes a
heightened risk of catastrophic wildfires, decreases water availability
in downstream waterways, and increases the risk of large scale insect
outbreaks.
In partnership with government scientists, rural community
planners, and private industry, the University of Washington forest
systems and bioenergy program is developing technology tools that use
the abundant small-diameter wood materials as a cost-effective source
of bioenergy for hydrogen fuel cells, biofuels for cars and engines,
and other chemical applications. Research priorities include: (1)
Maximizing the conversion efficiency of wood to methanol; (2) analyzing
the economic, environmental, and social impacts of establishing
conversion systems at a variety of locations; and (3) establishing best
practices to ensure a sustainable harvest of forest materials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of forty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2006, from the general fund to the University of
Washington forest systems and bioenergy program for the purposes of
this act.

--- END ---