BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.120.020 and 2002 c 56 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the governing body of a regional transportation
investment district.
(2) "Department" means the Washington state department of
transportation.
(3) "Highway of statewide significance" means an existing or
proposed state route or federal interstate designated as a highway of
statewide significance by the transportation commission, its successor
entity, or the legislature.
(4) "Lead agency" means a public agency that by law can plan,
design, and build a transportation project and has been so designated
by the district.
(5) "Regional transportation investment district" or "district"
means a municipal corporation whose boundaries are coextensive with two
or more contiguous counties and that has been created by county
legislative authorities and a vote of the people under this chapter to
implement a regional transportation investment plan.
(6) "Regional transportation investment district planning
committee" or "planning committee" means the advisory committee created
under RCW 36.120.030 to create and propose to county legislative
authorities a regional transportation investment plan to develop,
finance, and construct transportation projects.
(7) "Regional transportation investment plan" or "plan" means a
plan to develop, construct, and finance a transportation project or
projects.
(8) "Transportation project" means:
(a) A capital improvement or improvements to a highway that has
been designated, in whole or in part, as a highway of statewide
significance, including an extension, that:
(i) Adds a lane or new lanes to an existing state or federal
highway; or
(ii) Repairs or replaces a lane or lanes damaged by an event
declared an emergency by the governor before January 1, 2002.
(b) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
highway of statewide significance, including an extension, and may
include the following associated multimodal capital improvements:
(i) Approaches to highways of statewide significance;
(ii) High-occupancy vehicle lanes;
(iii) Flyover ramps;
(iv) Park and ride lots;
(v) Bus pullouts;
(vi) Vans for vanpools;
(vii) Buses; and
(viii) Signalization, ramp metering, and other transportation
system management improvements.
(c) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
city street, county road, or existing highway or the creation of a new
highway that intersects with a highway of statewide significance, if
all of the following conditions are met:
(i) The project is included in a plan that makes highway
improvement projects that add capacity to a highway or highways of
statewide significance;
(ii) The secretary of transportation determines that the project
would better relieve traffic congestion than investing that same money
in adding capacity to a highway of statewide significance;
(iii) Matching money equal to one-third of the total cost of the
project is provided by local entities, including but not limited to a
metropolitan planning organization, county, city, port, or private
entity in which a county participating in a plan is located. Local
entities may use federal grants to meet this matching requirement;
(iv) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed ten percent of the revenues generated by the
district;
(v) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed one billion dollars; and
(vi) The specific projects are included within the plan and
submitted as part of the plan to a vote of the people.
(d) Operations, preservation, and maintenance are excluded from
this definition and may not be included in a regional transportation
investment plan. However, operations, preservation, and maintenance of
toll-related facilities where toll revenues have been pledged for the
payment of contracts is expressly authorized and may be included in a
regional transportation investment plan.
(9) "Weighted vote" means a vote that reflects the population each
board or planning committee member represents relative to the
population represented by the total membership of the board or planning
committee. Population will be determined using the federal 2000 census
or subsequent federal census data.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.120.050 and 2003 c 350 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A regional transportation investment district planning
committee may, as part of a regional transportation investment plan,
recommend the imposition of some or all of the following revenue
sources, which a regional transportation investment district may impose
upon approval of the voters as provided in this chapter:
(a) A regional sales and use tax, as specified in RCW 82.14.430, of
up to 0.5 percent of the selling price, in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used, in the case of a use tax, upon the
occurrence of any taxable event in the regional transportation
investment district;
(b) A local option vehicle license fee, as specified under RCW
82.80.100, of up to one hundred dollars per vehicle registered in the
district. As used in this subsection, "vehicle" means motor vehicle as
defined in RCW 46.04.320. Certain classes of vehicles, as defined
under chapter 46.04 RCW, may be exempted from this fee;
(c) A parking tax under RCW 82.80.030;
(d) A local motor vehicle excise tax under RCW 81.100.060 ((and)),
chapter 81.104 RCW, and section 6 of this act;
(e) A local option fuel tax under RCW 82.80.120;
(f) An employer excise tax under RCW 81.100.030; and
(g) Vehicle tolls on new or reconstructed facilities. Unless
otherwise specified by law or contract, the department shall administer
the collection of vehicle tolls on designated facilities, and the state
transportation commission, or its successor, shall be the tolling
authority.
(2) Taxes, fees, and tolls may not be imposed without an
affirmative vote of the majority of the voters within the boundaries of
the district voting on a ballot proposition as set forth in RCW
36.120.070. Revenues from these taxes and fees may be used only to
implement the plan as set forth in this chapter. A district may
contract with the state department of revenue or other appropriate
entities for administration and collection of any of the taxes or fees
authorized in this section.
(3) Existing statewide motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes,
at the distribution rates in effect on January 1, 2001, are not
intended to be altered by this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.120.070 and 2002 c 56 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
Two or more contiguous county legislative authorities, upon receipt
of the regional transportation investment plan under RCW 36.120.040,
may ((certify the plan to the ballot, including identification of the
tax options)) submit to the voters of the proposed district a single
ballot measure that approves formation of the district, approves the
regional transportation investment plan, and approves the revenue
sources necessary to ((fund)) finance the plan. ((County legislative
authorities)) The planning committee may draft ((a ballot title)) the
ballot measure on behalf of the county legislative authorities, and the
county legislative authorities may, give notice as required by law for
ballot measures, and perform other duties as required to ((put the plan
before)) submit to measure to the voters of the proposed district for
their approval or rejection ((as a single ballot measure that both
approves formation of the district and approves the plan)). Counties
may negotiate interlocal agreements necessary to implement the plan.
The electorate will be the voters voting within the boundaries of the
participating counties. A simple majority of the total persons voting
on the single ballot measure ((to approve the plan, establish the
district, and approve the taxes and fees)) is required for approval of
the measure.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.56.076 and 2002 c 56 s 403 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon approval of a majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, and only for the purposes authorized
in RCW 36.120.050(1)(((f))) (g), a regional transportation investment
district may ((impose)) authorize vehicle tolls on state routes where
improvements financed in whole or in part by a regional transportation
investment district add additional lanes to, or reconstruct lanes on,
a highway of statewide significance. The department shall administer
the collection of vehicle tolls authorized on designated facilities
unless otherwise specified in law or by contract, and the state
transportation commission, or its successor, shall be the tolling
authority.

Sec. 5 RCW 81.100.080 and 1990 c 43 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
Funds collected under RCW 81.100.030 or 81.100.060 and any
investment earnings accruing thereon shall be used by the county or the
regional transportation investment district in a manner consistent with
the regional transportation plan only for costs of collection, costs of
preparing, adopting, and enforcing agreements under RCW 81.100.030(3),
for construction of high occupancy vehicle lanes and related
facilities, mitigation of environmental concerns that result from
construction or use of high occupancy vehicle lanes and related
facilities, payment of principal and interest on bonds issued for the
purposes of this section, for high occupancy vehicle programs as
defined in RCW 81.100.020(5), and for commuter rail projects in
accordance with RCW 81.104.120. Except for funds raised by a regional
transportation investment district, no funds collected under RCW
81.100.030 or 81.100.060 after June 30, 2000, may be pledged for the
payment or security of the principal or interest on any bonds issued
for the purposes of this section. Not more than ten percent of the
funds may be used for transit agency high occupancy vehicle programs.
Priorities for construction of high occupancy vehicle lanes and
related facilities shall be as follows:
(1)(a) To accelerate construction of high occupancy vehicle lanes
on the interstate highway system, as well as related facilities;
(b) To finance or accelerate construction of high occupancy vehicle
lanes on the noninterstate state highway system, as well as related
facilities.
(2) To finance construction of high occupancy vehicle lanes on
local arterials, as well as related facilities.
Moneys received by an agency under this chapter shall be used in
addition to, and not as a substitute for, moneys currently used by the
agency for the purposes specified in this section.
Counties and regional transportation investment districts may
contract with cities or the state department of transportation for
construction of high occupancy vehicle lanes and related facilities,
and may issue general obligation bonds to fund such construction and
use funds received under this chapter to pay the principal and interest
on such bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A regional transportation investment district may, with voter
approval and as part of a regional transportation investment plan,
impose a local option surcharge of not more than three-tenths of one
percent of the value of vehicles registered to a person residing within
the district. The proceeds collected under this section shall be used
for transportation projects as defined in RCW 36.120.020. No surcharge
may be imposed on new vehicles, except that the surcharge shall apply
to the initial registration of a vehicle previously licensed in another
jurisdiction.
(2) An investment district imposing a tax under this section shall
contract, before the effective date of the resolution or ordinance
imposing a surcharge, administration and collection to the state
department of licensing, and department of revenue, as appropriate,
which shall deduct an amount, as provided by contract, for
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department. All
administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.32, and 82.44 RCW shall
insofar as they are applicable to motor vehicle excise taxes, be
applicable to surcharges imposed under this section.

--- END ---