BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Through the establishment of the state
interoperability executive committee, the legislature created the
authority to require all state agencies to have interoperable
communication systems. While the legislature intended to give the
committee the authority to mandate interoperable communication systems
among all state agencies, the legislature recognizes the autonomy of
local governments, and therefore understands that the pending
interoperable communication standards established by the committee, as
applied to local governments, are currently advisory rather than
mandatory.
While the pending interoperable communication standards established
by the committee are advisory to local governments, it is important
that local governments understand the importance of following the
direction set by the committee. To assist local governments to
understand this need and to motivate participation, the legislature is
establishing a local government interoperability communication system
pilot program. The legislature intends to limit the pilot program to
a county public safety agency that develops a funding partnership among
federal, state, and local government.
The legislature intends that the pilot program demonstrate to
local governments throughout the state of Washington the value of
implementing the pending interoperability standards being established
by the committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) On or before July 1, 2006, the state
interoperability executive committee, in consultation with the
information services board, shall award a five million dollar grant to
one county public safety agency. The agency shall be part of a county
with a population over four hundred thousand. The grant shall be
designed to assist a county public safety agency with developing a
communication system that is capable of interoperating with state
agencies, and other local governments.
(2) To be eligible for the grant, the county public safety agency
shall:
(a) By July 1, 2006, be awarded, or prove intent to be awarded, a
minimum of five million dollars from the federal government
specifically for the purpose of partnering with the state of Washington
to implement an interoperable communication system;
(b) Between July 1, 2004, and July 1, 2006, enact, by the vote of
the people, a countywide measure to fund public safety communication
equipment that raises a minimum of five million dollars;
(c) Agree that all communication equipment purchased by the public
agency, for the purposes of the pilot program, shall be digital
equipment that complies with P25 standards established by the
association of public safety communications officials, national
association of state telecommunication directors, and federal
government agencies, commonly referred to as "APCO/NASTD/FED"; and
(d) Comply with all current and future interoperability
communication standards adopted by the state interoperability executive
committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of
funding the grant under section 2 of this act, in an amount of at least
five million dollars, is not provided by appropriation to the state
interoperability executive committee on or before July 1, 2006, or if
a grant is not awarded under section 2 of this act on or before July 1,
2006, the local government interoperability communication system pilot
program is null and void.

--- END ---