BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.020 and 1985 c 366 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter unless the context indicates otherwise:
(1) "Public agency" means:
(a) Any state board, commission, committee, department, educational
institution, or other state agency, including the Washington state
health insurance pool established in chapter 48.41 RCW, which is
created by or pursuant to statute, other than courts and the
legislature;
(b) Any county, city, school district, special purpose district, or
other municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state of
Washington;
(c) Any subagency of a public agency which is created by or
pursuant to statute, ordinance, or other legislative act, including but
not limited to planning commissions, library or park boards,
commissions, and agencies;
(d) Any policy group whose membership includes representatives of
publicly owned utilities formed by or pursuant to the laws of this
state when meeting together as or on behalf of participants who have
contracted for the output of generating plants being planned or built
by an operating agency.
(2) "Governing body" means the multimember board, commission,
committee, council, or other policy or rule-making body of a public
agency, or any committee thereof when the committee acts on behalf of
the governing body, conducts hearings, or takes testimony or public
comment.
(3) "Action" means the transaction of the official business of a
public agency by a governing body including but not limited to receipt
of public testimony, deliberations, discussions, considerations,
reviews, evaluations, and final actions. "Final action" means a
collective positive or negative decision, or an actual vote by a
majority of the members of a governing body when sitting as a body or
entity, upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance.
(4) "Meeting" means meetings at which action is taken.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.41.060 and 2004 c 260 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall have the general powers and authority granted
under the laws of this state to insurance companies, health care
service contractors, and health maintenance organizations, licensed or
registered to offer or provide the kinds of health coverage defined
under this title. In addition thereto, the board shall:
(a) Designate or establish the standard health questionnaire to be
used under RCW 48.41.100 and 48.43.018, including the form and content
of the standard health questionnaire and the method of its application.
The questionnaire must provide for an objective evaluation of an
individual's health status by assigning a discreet measure, such as a
system of point scoring to each individual. The questionnaire must not
contain any questions related to pregnancy, and pregnancy shall not be
a basis for coverage by the pool. The questionnaire shall be designed
such that it is reasonably expected to identify the eight percent of
persons who are the most costly to treat who are under individual
coverage in health benefit plans, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, in
Washington state or are covered by the pool, if applied to all such
persons;
(b) Obtain from a member of the American academy of actuaries, who
is independent of the board, a certification that the standard health
questionnaire meets the requirements of (a) of this subsection;
(c) Approve the standard health questionnaire and any modifications
needed to comply with this chapter. The standard health questionnaire
shall be submitted to an actuary for certification, modified as
necessary, and approved at least every eighteen months. The
designation and approval of the standard health questionnaire by the
board shall not be subject to review and approval by the commissioner.
The standard health questionnaire or any modification thereto shall not
be used until ninety days after public notice of the approval of the
questionnaire or any modification thereto, except that the initial
standard health questionnaire approved for use by the board after March
23, 2000, may be used immediately following public notice of such
approval;
(d) In consultation with the insurance commissioner, establish
appropriate rates, rate schedules, rate adjustments, expense
allowances, claim reserve formulas and any other actuarial functions
appropriate to the operation of the pool. Rates shall not be
unreasonable in relation to the coverage provided, the risk experience,
and expenses of providing the coverage. Rates and rate schedules may
be adjusted for appropriate risk factors such as age and area variation
in claim costs and shall take into consideration appropriate risk
factors in accordance with established actuarial underwriting practices
consistent with Washington state individual plan rating requirements
under RCW 48.44.022 and 48.46.064;
(e) Assess members of the pool in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter, and make advance interim assessments as may be reasonable
and necessary for the organizational or interim operating expenses.
Any interim assessments will be credited as offsets against any regular
assessments due following the close of the year. Self-funded multiple
employer welfare arrangements are subject to assessment under this
subsection only in the event that assessments are not preempted by the
employee retirement income security act of 1974, as amended, 29 U.S.C.
Sec. 1001 et seq. The arrangements and the commissioner shall
initially request an advisory opinion from the United States department
of labor or obtain a declaratory ruling from a federal court on the
legality of imposing assessments on these arrangements before imposing
the assessment. If there has not been a final determination by the
United States department of labor or a federal court that the
assessments are not preempted by federal law, the assessments provided
for in this subsection become effective on March 1, 2005, or thirty
days following the issuance of a certificate of authority, whichever is
later. During the time period between March 1, 2005, or thirty days
following the issuance of a certificate of authority, whichever is
later, and the final determination by the United States department of
labor or a federal court, any assessments shall be deposited in an
interest bearing escrow account maintained by the [self-funded]
multiple employer welfare arrangement. Upon a final determination that
the assessments are not preempted by the employee retirement income
security act of 1974, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq., all
funds in the interest bearing escrow account shall be transferred to
the board;
(f) Issue policies of health coverage in accordance with the
requirements of this chapter;
(g) Establish procedures for the administration of the premium
discount provided under RCW 48.41.200(3)(a)(iii);
(h) Contract with the Washington state health care authority for
the administration of the premium discounts provided under RCW
48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii);
(i) Set a reasonable fee to be paid to an insurance agent licensed
in Washington state for submitting an acceptable application for
enrollment in the pool; and
(j) Provide certification to the commissioner when assessments will
exceed the threshold level established in RCW 48.41.037.
(2) In addition thereto, the board may:
(a) Enter into contracts as are necessary or proper to carry out
the provisions and purposes of this chapter including the authority,
with the approval of the commissioner, to enter into contracts with
similar pools of other states for the joint performance of common
administrative functions, or with persons or other organizations for
the performance of administrative functions;
(b) Sue or be sued, including taking any legal action as necessary
to avoid the payment of improper claims against the pool or the
coverage provided by or through the pool;
(c) Appoint appropriate legal, actuarial, and other committees as
necessary to provide technical assistance in the operation of the pool,
policy, and other contract design, and any other function within the
authority of the pool; and
(d) Conduct periodic audits to assure the general accuracy of the
financial data submitted to the pool, and the board shall cause the
pool to have an annual audit of its operations by an independent
certified public accountant.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require or
authorize the adoption of rules under chapter 34.05 RCW.

--- END ---