BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Washington state institute for public
policy:
(1) Shall examine who uses the law libraries located in Washington;
(2) Shall examine for what purpose they use the law libraries;
(3) Shall examine the types of fees that law libraries utilize;
(4) While studying these issues, may consult with other groups or
entities as necessary; and
(5) Shall deliver to the judiciary committees of the senate and
house of representatives, not later than December 31, 2005, a report of
the findings and conclusions, and any proposed legislation that may be
required to promote efficiency in law libraries.

--- END ---