BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.152 and 1994 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to extend its services and programs, the department
may charge reasonable fees for services and products provided in the
areas of financial assistance, housing, international trade, community
assistance, economic development, and other service delivery areas,
except as otherwise provided. These fees are not intended to exceed
the costs of providing the service or preparing and distributing the
product.
(2) In delivering export-related technical assistance, the
department shall charge fees for all services provided, beyond an
initial consultation, that result in overseas sales.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.330.155 and 1994 c 284 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The community and economic development fee account is created in
the state treasury. The department may create subaccounts as
necessary. The account consists of all receipts from fees charged by
the department under RCW 43.330.150((,)) and 43.330.152((, and
43.210.110)). Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
purposes of this chapter. Only the director or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. ((Expenditures from the
account may be spent only after appropriation.))

Sec. 3 RCW 43.330.156 and 1994 c 284 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The fees authorized under RCW 43.330.150((,)) and 43.330.152((,
70.95H.040, and 43.210.110)) shall be adopted by rule pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.23.037 and 1997 c 303 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may collect moneys to recover the reasonable costs
of publishing and disseminating informational materials by the
department. Materials may be disseminated in printed or electronic
format.
(2) In delivering export-related technical assistance, the
department shall charge fees for all services provided, beyond an
initial consultation, that result in overseas sales.
(3) All moneys collected shall be deposited in the agricultural
local fund or other appropriate fund administered by the director.

--- END ---