BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature intends to improve the
overall efforts to conserve and recover Puget Sound by enhancing
coordination and integration of the planning, budgeting, and program
activities of entities with responsibilities under the Puget Sound
recovery management plan. The goals of this act are to:
(a) Foster and improve overall coordination and implementation of
Puget Sound conservation and recovery efforts among all levels of
government and the private sector, in part through developing and
implementing the Puget Sound recovery management plan and biennial work
plans;
(b) Improve the coordination among federal, state, local, and
tribal agencies and initiatives in order to better set priorities,
adopt and implement work plans for protecting and restoring Puget
Sound, and allocate resources for these purposes;
(c) Adopt performance measures and improve accountability for
results and expenditures in plan implementation;
(d) Prepare a budget that is scaled to appropriate timelines for
achieving Puget Sound conservation, recovery, and prevention of further
degradation, and ensure that this budget is considered when adopting
state biennial budgets;
(e) Revitalize a Sound-wide planning and implementation framework
that integrates all state agency activities with other Puget Sound
protection and restoration activities;
(f) Increase citizen involvement and oversight; and
(g) Increase representation of nonstate agency interests and
organized Puget Sound restoration programs on the Puget Sound council.
(2) The legislature also finds that the counties, cities, and
special purpose units of local government have major responsibilities
regarding the management, protection, and cleanup of surface waters
draining to Puget Sound, and other land use planning, habitat
protection, infrastructure, and public health and safety
responsibilities that form the foundation for the comprehensive and
coordinated strategy set forth in the 2000 Puget Sound water quality
management plan. The Puget Sound water quality action team is
presently composed of ten state agency representatives and only two
local government representatives, and does not adequately reflect the
major responsibilities for water quality and habitat protection carried
out by local governments. Therefore it is the purpose of this act to
strengthen the local government membership on the Puget Sound water
quality action team, renamed the Puget Sound recovery partnership, and
to expand the assistance that the team provides to local governments
carrying out elements of the Puget Sound plan.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.71.005 and 1998 c 246 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Puget Sound and related inland marine waterways of Washington
state represent a unique and unparalleled resource. A rich and varied
range of marine organisms, comprising an interdependent, sensitive
communal ecosystem reside in these sheltered waters. Residents of this
region enjoy a way of life centered around the waters of Puget Sound,
featuring accessible recreational opportunities, world-class port
facilities and water transportation systems, harvest of marine food
resources, shoreline-oriented life styles, water-dependent industries,
tourism, irreplaceable aesthetics, and other activities, all of which
to some degree depend upon a clean and healthy marine resource;
(b) The Puget Sound ((water quality authority)) action team has
done an excellent job in developing a comprehensive plan to identify
actions to restore and protect the biological health and diversity of
Puget Sound;
(c) While much excellent work has been done around the Puget Sound
to protect and restore its resources, the scale of the efforts is not
yet commensurate with the scale of the challenges, and heightened and
improved efforts are needed if the long-term viability of Puget Sound
is to be ensured;
(d) The large number of federal, state, and local governmental
entities that ((now)) have management, infrastructure, and regulatory
programs and initiatives affecting the water quality of Puget Sound and
its habitats have diverse interests and limited jurisdictions that
((cannot adequately)) require coordination to address the cumulative,
wide-ranging impacts that contribute to the degradation of Puget Sound;
and
(((d))) (e) Coordination of ((the regulatory)) these programs and
initiatives, at the state, federal, and local levels, is best
accomplished through the development of an interagency mechanism((s)),
including representatives of local governments within the Puget Sound
basin, that allow these entities to transcend their diverse interests
and limited jurisdictions.
(2)(a) It is therefore the policy of the state of Washington to
coordinate the activities of state, federal, and local agencies by
establishing a partnership for Puget Sound with the following goals:
To protect and restore Puget Sound's water quality; to protect and
restore habitat for all native species in Puget Sound; and to protect
the biological resources of Puget Sound and recover species at risk.
The partnership shall develop and update as necessary the Puget Sound
recovery management plan, a comprehensive and inclusive plan for Puget
Sound that describes the problems and priority areas for action and
describes the roles and responsibilities of the various federal, state,
and local agencies in undertaking the necessary actions as provided in
section 4 of this act.
(b) To implement the plan, the partnership shall develop and
implement a biennial work plan that clearly delineates state and
((local)) other actions at the level of effort necessary to protect and
restore the biological health and diversity of Puget Sound. It is
further the policy of the state to implement that work plan and the
Puget Sound ((water quality)) recovery management plan to the maximum
extent possible. To further the policy of the state, ((a recovery))
any water quality cleanup plan, fish or wildlife recovery plan, or
other watershed health plan or plans developed under ((the)) federal
((endangered species act)), state, or local authority for a portion or
all of the Puget Sound shall be considered for inclusion into the Puget
Sound ((water quality)) recovery management plan.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.71.010 and 1996 c 138 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Action team" means the ((Puget Sound water quality action
team)) staff to the partnership.
(2) "Chair" means the chair of the partnership, who also serves as
the executive director of the staff of the action team.
(3) "Council" means the Puget Sound council created in RCW
90.71.030.
(4) "Partnership" means the Puget Sound recovery partnership
described in RCW 90.71.020.
(5) "Plan" or "Puget Sound recovery management plan" means the
((1994)) 2000 Puget Sound water quality management plan ((as it exists
June 30, 1996, and)) described in section 4 of this act, as
subsequently amended by the ((action team)) partnership.
(((5) "Support staff" means the staff to the action team.))
(6) "Puget Sound" means Puget Sound and related inland marine
waterways including all salt waters of the state of Washington inside
the international boundary line between Washington and British
Columbia, and lying east of the junction of the Pacific Ocean and the
Strait of Juan de Fuca.
(7) "Work plan" means the work plan and budget developed by the
action team and the partnership.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Puget Sound recovery management plan adopted by the
partnership shall be a comprehensive document that describes the
problems and priority areas for action to achieve the goals of the
maintenance and enhancement of Puget Sound water quality, protection
and restoration of habitat, and maintenance of Puget Sound's biological
resources. The plan shall provide a clear and compelling case
statement of the problems affecting Puget Sound's health and the
actions needed to conserve and recover Puget Sound. The plan shall
further describe the roles and responsibilities of the various federal,
state, and local agencies in undertaking the necessary actions. The
plan shall address all the waters of Puget Sound and related inland
marine waters, including portions of the Strait of Juan de Fuca and the
Strait of Georgia within the state, and, to the extent that they affect
water quality and habitat in Puget Sound, all waters flowing into Puget
Sound and related inland marine waters and adjacent lands. The
partnership may define specific geographic boundaries within which the
plan applies. The plan shall coordinate and incorporate existing
planning and research efforts and conservation and recovery initiatives
of state agencies and local government related to Puget Sound, and
shall avoid duplication of existing efforts. The plan shall:
(a) Be organized around the long-term goals for Puget Sound of
protecting and restoring Puget Sound's water quality; protecting and
restoring habitat for all native species in Puget Sound; and protecting
the biological resources of Puget Sound and recovering species at risk;
(b) Be organized by priority areas for attention and action;
(c) Provide detail on the strategies to be used to advance progress
in each priority area, set explicit objectives in each priority area,
and delineate clear and quantifiable measures of success;
(d) Include timelines for actions established by the Puget Sound
council as provided in subsection (2) of this section;
(e) Assign responsibilities for action in each of the priority
areas to federal, state, local, and tribal governments;
(f) Demonstrate a feasible pathway to success in each priority area
within a fifteen-year time frame; and
(g) Include by reference all related plans.
(2)(a) The council shall work with the partnership to incorporate
into the Puget Sound recovery management plan overall timeline goals
for accomplishing all elements of the plan. Except for conditions that
involve an extraordinary degradation or complexity in restoration, the
goals shall establish a restoration timeline of not more than fifteen
years from the effective date of this section.
(b) The council shall also work with the partnership to incorporate
into the plan timeline goals to achieve program and activity levels by
each state agency carrying out responsibilities under the plan
sufficient to maintain Puget Sound water quality and protect and
restore habitat, considering population increases, changes in land use
patterns, and other demographic and natural changes projected for the
Puget Sound region.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.71.020 and 1998 c 246 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The Puget Sound ((action team)) recovery partnership is
created. The ((action team)) partnership shall define, coordinate, and
implement the state's conservation and recovery agenda for Puget Sound.
The partnership shall consist of: The directors of the departments of
ecology; agriculture; natural resources; fish and wildlife; and
community, trade, and economic development; the ((secretaries))
secretary of the department((s)) of health ((and transportation; the
director of the parks and recreation commission; the director of the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation; the administrative
officer of the conservation commission designated in RCW 89.08.050; one
person)); the administrative officer of the conservation commission;
two people representing cities, appointed by the governor; one person
representing special purpose governments, appointed by the governor;
two people representing counties, appointed by the governor; ((one
person)) two people representing federally recognized tribes, appointed
by the governor; and the ((chair)) executive director of the action
team, who shall also serve as the chair of the partnership.
Gubernatorial appointees shall serve two-year terms. In making the
appointments for city, county, and special purpose government
representatives, the governor is encouraged to select individuals with
experience in local government and expertise in the areas of water
quality, habitat, growth management, public health, and transportation,
as they relate to conditions and activities affecting the water quality
and habitat of Puget Sound.
(b) The following ad hoc, nonvoting members shall serve on the
partnership: The secretary of the department of transportation, the
director of the parks and recreation commission, the director of the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation, and the chair of the
Puget Sound council.
(c) The ((action team)) partnership shall also ((include)) invite
the following ex officio nonvoting members, among others as deemed
appropriate in the future: The regional director of the United States
environmental protection agency; the regional administrator of the
national marine fisheries service; ((and)) the regional supervisor of
the United States fish and wildlife service; the Seattle district
commander of the United States army corps of engineers; the regional
administrator of the United States geological survey; the executive
director of the northwest straits commission; the chair of the Puget
Sound shared strategy; and the executive director of the Hood Canal
coordinating council.
(d) The members representing nongovernmental organizations, tribes,
cities ((and)), counties, and special purpose governments shall each be
reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(2) The ((action team)) partnership, operating under direction from
the chair and with administrative support from the action team, shall:
(a) Periodically update and amend the Puget Sound recovery
management plan, in consultation with and upon approval of the council;
(b) Prepare a Puget Sound work plan and budget ((for inclusion in
the governor's biennial budget)), in consultation with and upon
approval of the council;
(((b))) (c) Coordinate actions, programs, and initiatives across
and among the partner agencies to achieve the objectives of the plan;
(d) Coordinate monitoring and research programs ((as provided in
RCW 90.71.060));
(((c))) (e) Consult with local governments in implementing the
Puget Sound recovery management plan and biennial work plans, and
prioritize attention by the action team upon assisting local
governments in obtaining state and federal funding for carrying out
local government programs and in effectively coordinating local
government programs with those of neighboring local governments and
state and federal programs;
(f) Work ((under the direction of)) in cooperation with the
((action team)) partnership chair ((as provided in RCW 90.71.040));
(((d))) (g) Coordinate permitting requirements as necessary to
expedite permit issuance for any local watershed plan or habitat plan
developed pursuant to rules adopted under this chapter under chapter
90.82 or 77.85 RCW, or other comprehensive watershed plan developed to
address water quality or habitat protection or restoration;
(((e))) (h) Identify and resolve any policy or rule conflicts that
may exist between one or more agencies represented ((on the action
team)) in the partnership;
(((f) Periodically amend the Puget Sound management plan;
(g) Enter into, amend, and terminate contracts with individuals,
corporations, or research institutions for the purposes of this
chapter;
(h) Receive such gifts, grants, and endowments, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the action team.
The action team may expend the same or any income therefrom according
to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments;))
(i) Appoint advisory committees as needed to manage efforts on
particular issues in Puget Sound and to obtain information regarding
conservation efforts around Puget Sound;
(j) Promote extensive public participation, and otherwise seek to
broadly disseminate information concerning Puget Sound;
(((j))) (k) Receive and expend funding from other public agencies;
and
(((k) To reduce costs and improve efficiency, review by December 1,
1996, all requirements for reports and documentation from state
agencies and local governments specified in the plan for the purpose of
eliminating and consolidating reporting requirements; and))
(l) ((Beginning in December 1998, and every two years thereafter,))
Submit a biennial report to the appropriate policy ((and fiscal))
committees of the legislature that provides an update on the overall
health of Puget Sound and describes and evaluates the ((successes and
shortcomings of)) efforts and actions of the partnership in
implementing the current work plan ((relative to the priority problems
identified for each geographic area of Puget Sound)) and recommends
responsive actions needed to be taken by the legislature.
(3) ((By July 1, 1996, the action team shall begin developing its
initial work plan, which shall include the coordination of necessary
support staff)) The partnership may appoint from among its members an
executive committee to serve as an ongoing management team for the
collaborative work of the partnership.
(4) The ((action team)) partnership shall incorporate, to the
maximum extent possible, the recommendations of the Puget Sound council
regarding amendments to the Puget Sound management plan and the work
plan.
(5) All proceedings of the ((action team)) partnership are subject
to the open public meetings act under chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.71.030 and 1999 c 241 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established the Puget Sound council composed of
((eleven)) thirteen members. ((Seven)) Nine members shall be appointed
by the governor. In making these appointments, the governor shall
include representation from business, the environmental community,
agriculture, the shellfish industry, counties, cities, conservation
districts, and the tribes. Two members shall be members of the senate
selected by the president of the senate with one member selected from
each caucus in the senate, and two members shall be members of the
house of representatives selected by the speaker of the house of
representatives with one member selected from each caucus in the house
of representatives. The legislative members shall be nonvoting members
of the council. The executive director of the action team shall be an
ex officio, nonvoting member. Appointments to the council shall
reflect geographical balance and the diversity of population within the
Puget Sound basin. Members shall serve four-year terms. ((Of the
initial members appointed to the council, two shall serve for two
years, two shall serve for three years, and two shall serve for four
years. Thereafter members shall be appointed to four-year terms.))
Vacancies shall be filled by appointment in the same manner as the
original appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term of the
position being vacated. Nonlegislative members shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
Legislative members shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW 44.04.120.
(2) The council shall:
(a) Recommend to the ((action team)) partnership priorities,
projects, and activities for inclusion in the biennial work plan;
(b) Recommend to the ((action team)) partnership coordination of
work plan activities with other relevant activities, including but not
limited to, agencies' activities other than those funded through the
plan, ((local)) plan ((initiatives)) elements being implemented by
local governments, and governmental and nongovernmental watershed
restoration and protection activities; ((and))
(c) Recommend to the ((action team)) partnership proposed
amendments to the Puget Sound management plan; and
(d) Oversee the implementation of the elements of the work plan
that receive funding through appropriations by the legislature, monitor
progress of the partnership agencies in carrying out the work plan, and
produce an annual report to the legislature on progress.
(3) ((The chair of the action team shall convene the council at
least four times per year and shall jointly convene the council and the
action team at least two times per year)) The executive director of the
action team shall provide staff support of at least one full-time
equivalent to the council to meet these requirements. The council
shall select a chair from among its voting members who will convene the
council at least four times a year. Two of these meetings shall be
planned in conjunction with the chair of the partnership and shall
coincide with meetings of the partnership. The chair of the council
shall serve a two-year term, renewable for one term if selected by the
council.

Sec. 7 RCW 90.71.040 and 1996 c 138 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((By June 1, 1996,)) The governor shall appoint a person ((in
the governor's office)) to chair the partnership and serve as the
executive director of the action team. The chair shall serve at the
pleasure of the governor.
(2) The chair shall be responsible for:
(a) ((Organizing)) Providing administrative support to the council,
and working with the chair of the council to organize the development
of the council recommendations;
(b) ((Organizing)) Administering all the work of the partnership
described in RCW 90.71.020, including the development of the work plan
required under RCW 90.71.050;
(c) Presenting a work plan and budget ((recommendations)) to the
governor and the legislature;
(d) Overseeing the implementation of the elements of the work plan
that receive funding ((through appropriations)) by the legislature;
((and))
(e) ((Serving as chair of the council.)) Entering into, amending,
and terminating contracts and grants with individuals, corporations, or
research institutions for the purposes of this chapter; and
(f) Receiving such gifts, grants, and endowments, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of this chapter, and
making expenditures, including any income therefrom, according to the
terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.
(3) The chair of the ((action team)) partnership shall be a full-time employee responsible for the administration of all functions of
the partnership, the action team, and the council((, including)).
Responsibilities include hiring and terminating support staff, budget
preparation, contracting, managing grants, coordinating with the
governor, the legislature, and other state and local entities, and the
delegation of responsibilities as deemed appropriate. The salary of
the chair shall be fixed by the governor, subject to RCW 43.03.040.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.71.050 and 1998 c 246 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each biennium, the ((action team)) partnership shall prepare
a Puget Sound work plan and budget for inclusion in the governor's
biennial budget and for submission to the legislature. The work plan
shall ((prescribe)): (i) Describe the conservation and restoration
priorities in Puget Sound, and (ii) describe the necessary federal,
state, and local actions to maintain and enhance Puget Sound water
quality, ((including but not limited to, enhancement of recreational
opportunities, and restoration)) protect and restore important habitat,
and ensure the viability of a balanced population of indigenous
shellfish, fish, and wildlife. The work plan ((and budget)) shall
include specific actions and projects pertaining to salmon recovery
plans.
(b) In developing a work plan, the ((action team)) partnership
shall meet the following objectives:
(i) Use the plan elements of the Puget Sound management plan to
prioritize ((local and)) state actions necessary to restore and protect
the biological health and diversity of Puget Sound;
(ii) ((Consider the problems and priorities identified in local
plans)) Represent all activities of the state agencies that contribute
to Puget Sound conservation and recovery; and
(iii) Coordinate the work plan activities with other relevant
activities, including but not limited to, agencies' activities that
have not been funded through the plan, local plans, and governmental
and nongovernmental watershed restoration activities.
(((c) In developing a budget, the action team shall identify:
(i) The total funds to implement local projects originating from
the planning process developed for nonpoint pollution; and
(ii) The total funds to implement any other projects designed
primarily to restore salmon habitat.))
(2) In addition to the requirements identified under RCW
90.71.020(2)(((a))) (b), the work plan and budget shall:
(a) Identify and prioritize ((the local and)) state actions
necessary to address ((the)) Puget Sound's water quality problems ((in
the following locations:
(i) Area 1: Island and San Juan counties;
(ii) Area 2: Skagit and Whatcom counties;
(iii) Area 3: Clallam and Jefferson counties;
(iv) Area 4: Snohomish, King, and Pierce counties; and
(v) Area 5: Kitsap, Mason, and Thurston counties;
(b) Provide sufficient)), habitat protection and restoration, and
species recovery;
(b) Identify funding ((to characterize local watersheds, provide
technical assistance, and implement state responsibilities identified
in the work plan. The number and qualifications of staff assigned to
each region shall be determined by the types of problems identified
pursuant to (a) of this subsection)) needed to address high priority
problems;
(c) ((Provide sufficient)) Recommend actions to local governments;
(d) Identify funding ((to implement)) needs for implementation and
((coordinate)) coordination of the Puget Sound ambient monitoring plan
pursuant to RCW 90.71.060; and
(((d) Provide funds to assist local jurisdictions to implement
elements of the work plan assigned to local governments and to develop
and implement local plans;
(e) Provide sufficient funding to provide support staff for the
action team; and
(f))) (e) Describe any proposed amendments to the Puget Sound
management plan.
(3) The work plan shall be submitted to the governor by September
15th of each even-numbered year and to the appropriate policy ((and
fiscal)) committees of the legislature by December 20th of each even-numbered year.
(4) The work plan shall be implemented consistent with the
legislative provisos of the biennial appropriation acts.

Sec. 9 RCW 90.71.060 and 1996 c 138 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to other powers and duties specified in this chapter,
the action team and the partnership shall ensure implementation and
coordination of the Puget Sound ambient monitoring program established
in the Puget Sound management plan. The program shall include, at a
minimum:
(1) A research program, including but not limited to methods to
provide current research information to managers and scientists, and to
establish priorities based on the needs of the partnership members and
the action team;
(2) A monitoring program, including baselines, protocols,
guidelines, and quantifiable performance measures. In consultation
with state agencies, local and tribal governments, and other public and
private interests, the action team, working with the council, shall
develop and track quantifiable performance measures that can be used by
the governor and the legislature to assess the effectiveness over time
of programs and actions initiated under the plan to improve and protect
Puget Sound water quality, habitat, and biological resources. ((The
performance measures shall be developed by June 30, 1997.)) The
performance measures shall include, but not be limited to a methodology
to track the progress of: Fish and wildlife habitat; sites with
sediment contamination; wetlands; shellfish beds; and other key
indicators of Puget Sound's health. State agencies shall, and local
governments are encouraged to, assist the action team in the
development and tracking of these performance measures. The
performance measures may be limited to a selected geographic area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 90.71 RCW
to read as follows:
The council shall conduct a review of the partnership's biennial
work plan in October of each even-numbered year and shall include a
budget review and recommendation cover letter to the document when it
is presented to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature in December. This letter shall specify, among other items,
the council's recommendations on appropriate allocations among
priorities in the work plan, on the overall levels of funding proposed,
and on their adequacy in meeting the timelines established in section
4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 90.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) From moneys specifically appropriated to the partnership for
this purpose, the council shall make the final decision on the award of
grants for implementing programs or activities included within the
Puget Sound recovery management plan. This grant program, to be known
as the Puget Sound recovery grants program, shall be identified in the
council's biennial budget. The budget shall identify activities that
may be funded under the program and carried out by private, public
nonprofit, or governmental entities. The grants shall be awarded on a
competitive basis.
(2) It is the intent of this chapter that each biennial operating
appropriations act beginning with the 2005-07 biennium include funding
for this program in an amount of five million dollars or more.

Sec. 12 RCW 90.71.070 and 1996 c 138 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Local governments are ((required)) encouraged to implement
local elements of the biennial work plan ((subject to the availability
of appropriated funds or other funding sources)) and management plan.
(2) The council shall review the progress of work plan
implementation((. Where prescribed actions have not been accomplished
in accordance with the work plan, the)) and work cooperatively with
responsible ((agency shall submit to the council written explanations
for the shortfalls, together with proposed remedies)) local governments
and state agencies to address delays or shortfalls in plan
implementation.

Sec. 13 RCW 90.71.080 and 1996 c 138 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The chairs of the ((action team)) partnership and council shall
jointly hold public hearings to solicit public comment on the work
plan.

Sec. 14 RCW 90.71.100 and 2001 c 273 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The action team shall establish a shellfish - on-site sewage
grant program in Puget Sound and for Pacific and Grays Harbor counties.
The action team shall provide funds to local health jurisdictions to be
used as grants to individuals for improving their on-site sewage
systems. The grants may be provided only in areas that have the
potential to adversely affect water quality in commercial and
recreational shellfish growing areas. A recipient of a grant shall
enter into an agreement with the appropriate local health jurisdiction
to maintain the improved on-site sewage system according to
specifications required by the local health jurisdiction. The action
team shall work closely with local health jurisdictions and shall
endeavor to attain geographic equity between Willapa Bay and the Puget
Sound when making funds available under this program. For the purposes
of this subsection, "geographic equity" means issuing on-site sewage
grants at a level that matches the funds generated from the oyster
reserve lands in that area.
(2) In the Puget Sound, the action team shall give first priority
to areas that are:
(a) Identified as "areas of special concern" under WAC 246-272-01001; or
(b) Included within a shellfish protection district under chapter
90.72 RCW.
(3) In Grays Harbor and Pacific counties, the action team shall
give first priority to preventing the deterioration of water quality in
areas where commercial or recreational shellfish are grown.
(4) The action team and each participating local health
jurisdiction shall enter into a memorandum of understanding that will
establish an applicant income eligibility requirement for individual
grant applicants from within the jurisdiction and other mutually
agreeable terms and conditions of the grant program.
(5) The action team may recover the costs to administer this
program not to exceed ten percent of the shellfish - on-site sewage
grant program.
(((6) For the 2001-2003 biennium, the action team may use up to
fifty percent of the shellfish - on-site sewage grant program funds for
grants to local health jurisdictions to establish areas of special
concern under WAC 246-272-01001, or for operation and maintenance
programs therein, where commercial and recreational uses are present.))

Sec. 15 RCW 90.71.900 and 1996 c 138 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
This ((act)) chapter may be known and cited as the Puget Sound
((water quality protection)) recovery partnership act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 90.71 RCW
to read as follows:
All references to the chair of the action team or the action team
in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the chair
of the partnership, who is also the executive director of the action
team, when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

Sec. 17 RCW 28B.30.632 and 1990 c 289 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The sea grant and cooperative extension shall jointly
administer a program to provide field agents to work with local
governments, property owners, and the general public to increase the
propagation of shellfish, and to address Puget Sound water quality
problems within Kitsap, Mason, and Jefferson counties that may limit
shellfish propagation potential. The sea grant and cooperative
extension shall each make available the services of no less than two
agents within these counties for the purposes of this section.
(2) The responsibilities of the field agents shall include but not
be limited to the following:
(a) Provide technical assistance to property owners, marine
industry owners and operators, and others, regarding methods and
practices to address nonpoint and point sources of pollution of Puget
Sound;
(b) Provide technical assistance to address water quality problems
limiting opportunities for enhancing the recreational harvest of
shellfish;
(c) Provide technical assistance in the management and increased
production of shellfish to facility operators or to those interested in
establishing an operation;
(d) Assist local governments to develop and implement education and
public involvement activities related to Puget Sound water quality;
(e) Assist in coordinating local water quality programs with
region-wide and statewide programs;
(f) Provide information and assistance to local watershed
committees.
(3) The sea grant and cooperative extension shall mutually
coordinate their field agent activities to avoid duplicative efforts
and to ensure that the full range of responsibilities under RCW
28B.30.632 ((through 28B.30.636)) and 28B.30.634 are carried out. They
shall consult with the Puget Sound ((water quality authority)) recovery
partnership and ensure consistency with the authority's water quality
management plan.
(4) Recognizing the special expertise of both agencies, the sea
grant and cooperative extension shall cooperate to divide their
activities as follows:
(a) Sea grant shall have primary responsibility to address water
quality issues related to activities within Puget Sound, and to provide
assistance regarding the management and improvement of shellfish
production; and
(b) Cooperative extension shall have primary responsibility to
address upland and freshwater activities affecting Puget Sound water
quality and associated watersheds.

Sec. 18 RCW 43.63A.247 and 1994 c 264 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
The senior environmental corps is created within the department of
community, trade, and economic development. The departments of
agriculture, community, trade, and economic development, employment
security, ecology, fish and wildlife, health, and natural resources,
the parks and recreation commission, and the Puget Sound ((water
quality authority)) recovery partnership shall participate in the
administration and implementation of the corps and shall appoint
representatives to the council.

Sec. 19 RCW 70.118.090 and 1994 c 281 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department may not use funds appropriated to implement an
element of the Puget Sound ((water quality authority)) recovery
partnership work plan to conduct any activity required under chapter
281, Laws of 1994.

Sec. 20 RCW 70.146.070 and 1999 c 164 s 603 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When making grants or loans for water pollution control
facilities, the department shall consider the following:
(a) The protection of water quality and public health;
(b) The cost to residential ratepayers if they had to finance water
pollution control facilities without state assistance;
(c) Actions required under federal and state permits and compliance
orders;
(d) The level of local fiscal effort by residential ratepayers
since 1972 in financing water pollution control facilities;
(e) The extent to which the applicant county or city, or if the
applicant is another public body, the extent to which the county or
city in which the applicant public body is located, has established
programs to mitigate nonpoint pollution of the surface or subterranean
water sought to be protected by the water pollution control facility
named in the application for state assistance; and
(f) The recommendations of the Puget Sound ((action team)) recovery
partnership and any other board, council, commission, or group
established by the legislature or a state agency to study water
pollution control issues in the state.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 may not receive a grant or loan for water
pollution control facilities unless it has adopted a comprehensive
plan, including a capital facilities plan element, and development
regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not
require any county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to
adopt a comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting
or receiving a grant or loan under this chapter if such request is made
before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040.
A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 which has not
adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations within the
time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited from
receiving a grant or loan under this chapter if the comprehensive plan
and development regulations are adopted as required by RCW 36.70A.040
before submitting a request for a grant or loan.
(3) Whenever the department is considering awarding grants or loans
for public facilities to special districts requesting funding for a
proposed facility located in a county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040, it shall consider whether the county, city, or town
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the
proposed facility is located has adopted a comprehensive plan and
development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040.

Sec. 21 RCW 77.60.130 and 2000 c 149 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The aquatic nuisance species committee is created for the
purpose of fostering state, federal, tribal, and private cooperation on
aquatic nuisance species issues. The mission of the committee is to
minimize the unauthorized or accidental introduction of nonnative
aquatic species and give special emphasis to preventing the
introduction and spread of aquatic nuisance species. The term "aquatic
nuisance species" means a nonnative aquatic plant or animal species
that threatens the diversity or abundance of native species, the
ecological stability of infested waters, or commercial, agricultural,
or recreational activities dependent on such waters.
(2) The committee consists of representatives from each of the
following state agencies: Department of fish and wildlife, department
of ecology, department of agriculture, department of health, department
of natural resources, Puget Sound ((water quality action team))
recovery partnership, state patrol, state noxious weed control board,
and Washington sea grant program. The committee shall encourage and
solicit participation by: Federally recognized tribes of Washington,
federal agencies, Washington conservation organizations, environmental
groups, and representatives from industries that may either be affected
by the introduction of an aquatic nuisance species or that may serve as
a pathway for their introduction.
(3) The committee has the following duties:
(a) Periodically revise the state of Washington aquatic nuisance
species management plan, originally published in June 1998;
(b) Make recommendations to the legislature on statutory provisions
for classifying and regulating aquatic nuisance species;
(c) Recommend to the state noxious weed control board that a plant
be classified under the process designated by RCW 17.10.080 as an
aquatic noxious weed;
(d) Coordinate education, research, regulatory authorities,
monitoring and control programs, and participate in regional and
national efforts regarding aquatic nuisance species;
(e) Consult with representatives from industries and other
activities that may serve as a pathway for the introduction of aquatic
nuisance species to develop practical strategies that will minimize the
risk of new introductions; and
(f) Prepare a biennial report to the legislature with the first
report due by December 1, 2001, making recommendations for better
accomplishing the purposes of this chapter, and listing the
accomplishments of this chapter to date.
(4) The committee shall accomplish its duties through the authority
and cooperation of its member agencies. Implementation of all plans
and programs developed by the committee shall be through the member
agencies and other cooperating organizations.

Sec. 22 RCW 77.85.210 and 2001 c 298 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The monitoring oversight committee is hereby established. The
committee shall be comprised of the directors or their designated
representatives of:
(a) The salmon recovery office;
(b) The department of ecology;
(c) The department of fish and wildlife;
(d) The conservation commission;
(e) The Puget Sound ((action team)) recovery partnership;
(f) The department of natural resources;
(g) The department of transportation; and
(h) The interagency committee for outdoor recreation.
(2) The director of the salmon recovery office and the chair of the
salmon recovery funding board, or their designees, shall cochair the
committee. The cochairs shall convene the committee as necessary to
develop, for the consideration of the governor and legislature, a
comprehensive and coordinated monitoring strategy and action plan on
watershed health with a focus on salmon recovery. The committee shall
invite representation from the treaty tribes to participate in the
committee's efforts. In addition, the committee shall invite
participation by other state, local, and federal agencies and other
entities as appropriate. The committee shall address the monitoring
recommendations of the independent science panel provided under RCW
77.85.040(7) and of the joint legislative audit and review committee in
its report number 01-1 on investing in the environment.
(3) The independent science panel shall act as an advisor to the
monitoring oversight committee and shall review all work products
developed by the committee and make recommendations to the committee
cochairs.
(4) A legislative steering committee is created consisting of four
legislators. Two of the legislators shall be members of the house of
representatives, each representing different major political parties,
appointed by the co-speakers of the house of representatives. The
other two legislators shall be members of the senate, each representing
different major political parties, appointed by the president of the
senate. The monitoring oversight committee shall provide briefings to
the legislative steering committee on a quarterly basis on the progress
that the oversight committee is making on the development of the
coordinated monitoring strategy and action plan, and the establishment
of an adaptive management framework. The briefings shall include
information on how the monitoring strategy will be coordinated with
other government efforts, expected benefits and efficiencies that will
be achieved, recommended funding sources and funding levels that will
ensure stable sources of funding for monitoring, and the efforts and
cooperation provided by agencies to improve coordination of their
activities.
(5) The committee shall make recommendations to individual agencies
to improve coordination of monitoring activities.
(6) The committee shall:
(a) Define the monitoring goals, objectives, and questions that
must be addressed as part of a comprehensive statewide salmon recovery
monitoring and adaptive management framework;
(b) Identify and evaluate existing monitoring activities for
inclusion in the framework, while ensuring data consistency and
coordination and the filling of monitoring gaps;
(c) Recommend statistical designs appropriate to the objectives;
(d) Recommend performance measures appropriate to the objectives
and targeted to the appropriate geographical, temporal, and biological
scales;
(e) Recommend standardized monitoring protocols for salmon recovery
and watershed health;
(f) Recommend procedures to ensure quality assurance and quality
control of all relevant data;
(g) Recommend data transfer protocols to support easy access,
sharing, and coordination among different collectors and users;
(h) Recommend ways to integrate monitoring information into
decision making;
(i) Recommend organizational and governance structures for
oversight and implementation of the coordinated monitoring framework;
(j) Recommend stable sources of funding that will ensure the
continued operation and maintenance of the state's salmon recovery and
watershed health monitoring programs, once established; and
(k) Identify administrative actions that will be undertaken by
state agencies to implement elements of the coordinated monitoring
program.
(7) In developing the coordinated monitoring strategy, the
committee shall coordinate with other appropriate state, federal,
local, and tribal monitoring efforts, including but not limited to the
Northwest power planning council, the Northwest Indian fisheries
commission, the national marine fisheries service, and the United
States fish and wildlife service. The committee shall also consult
with watershed planning units under chapter 90.82 RCW, lead entities
under this chapter, professional organizations, and other appropriate
groups.
(8) The cochairs shall provide an interim report to the governor
and the members of the appropriate legislative committees by March 1,
2002, on the progress made in implementing this section. By December
1, 2002, the committee shall provide a monitoring strategy and action
plan to the governor, and the members of the appropriate legislative
committees for achieving a comprehensive watershed health monitoring
program with a focus on salmon recovery. The strategy and action plan
shall document the results of the committee's actions in addressing the
responsibilities described in subsection (6) of this section. In
addition, the monitoring strategy and action plan shall include an
assessment of existing state agency operations related to monitoring,
evaluation, and adaptive management of watershed health and salmon
recovery, and shall recommend any operational or statutory changes and
funding necessary to fully implement the enhanced coordination program
developed under this section. The plan shall make recommendations
based upon the goal of fully realizing an enhanced and coordinated
monitoring program by June 30, 2007.

Sec. 23 RCW 79.90.550 and 1987 c 259 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the department of natural resources
provides, manages, and monitors aquatic land disposal sites on state-owned aquatic lands for materials dredged from rivers, harbors, and
shipping lanes. These disposal sites are approved through a
cooperative planning process by the departments of natural resources
and ecology, the United States corps of engineers, and the United
States environmental protection agency in cooperation with the Puget
Sound ((water quality authority)) recovery partnership. These disposal
sites are essential to the commerce and well being of the citizens of
the state of Washington. Management and environmental monitoring of
these sites are necessary to protect environmental quality and to
assure appropriate use of state-owned aquatic lands. The creation of
an aquatic land dredged material disposal site account is a reasonable
means to enable and facilitate proper management and environmental
monitoring of these disposal sites.

Sec. 24 RCW 79A.60.510 and 1999 c 249 s 1506 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that the waters of Washington state provide
a unique and valuable recreational resource to large and growing
numbers of boaters. Proper stewardship of, and respect for, these
waters requires that, while enjoying them for their scenic and
recreational benefits, boaters must exercise care to assure that such
activities do not contribute to the despoliation of these waters, and
that watercraft be operated in a safe and responsible manner. The
legislature has specifically addressed the topic of access to clean and
safe waterways by requiring the 1987 boating safety study and by
establishing the Puget Sound ((action team)) recovery partnership.
The legislature finds that there is a need to educate Washington's
boating community about safe and responsible actions on our waters and
to increase the level and visibility of the enforcement of boating
laws. To address the incidence of fatalities and injuries due to
recreational boating on our state's waters, local and state efforts
directed towards safe boating must be stimulated. To provide for safe
waterways and public enjoyment, portions of the watercraft excise tax
and boat registration fees should be made available for boating safety
and other boating recreation purposes.
In recognition of the need for clean waterways, and in keeping with
the Puget Sound action team's water quality work plan, the legislature
finds that adequate opportunities for responsible disposal of boat
sewage must be made available. There is hereby established a five-year
initiative to install sewage pumpout or sewage dump stations at
appropriate marinas.
To assure the use of these sewage facilities, a boater
environmental education program must accompany the five-year initiative
and continue to educate boaters about boat wastes and aquatic
resources.
The legislature also finds that, in light of the increasing numbers
of boaters utilizing state waterways, a program to acquire and develop
sufficient waterway access facilities for boaters must be undertaken.
To support boating safety, environmental protection and education,
and public access to our waterways, the legislature declares that a
portion of the income from boating-related activities, as specified in
RCW 82.49.030 and 88.02.040, should support these efforts.

Sec. 25 RCW 79A.60.520 and 1999 c 249 s 1507 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission, in consultation with the departments of ecology,
fish and wildlife, natural resources, social and health services, and
the Puget Sound ((action team)) recovery partnership shall conduct a
literature search and analyze pertinent studies to identify areas which
are polluted or environmentally sensitive within the state's waters.
Based on this review the commission shall designate appropriate areas
as polluted or environmentally sensitive, for the purposes of chapter
393, Laws of 1989 only.

Sec. 26 RCW 90.48.260 and 2003 c 325 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of ecology is hereby designated as the State Water
Pollution Control Agency for all purposes of the federal clean water
act as it exists on February 4, 1987, and is hereby authorized to
participate fully in the programs of the act as well as to take all
action necessary to secure to the state the benefits and to meet the
requirements of that act. With regard to the national estuary program
established by section 320 of that act, the department shall exercise
its responsibility jointly with the Puget Sound ((water quality
authority)) recovery partnership. The department of ecology may
delegate its authority under this chapter, including its national
pollutant discharge elimination permit system authority and duties
regarding animal feeding operations and concentrated animal feeding
operations, to the department of agriculture through a memorandum of
understanding. Until any such delegation receives federal approval,
the department of agriculture's adoption or issuance of animal feeding
operation and concentrated animal feeding operation rules, permits,
programs, and directives pertaining to water quality shall be
accomplished after reaching agreement with the director of the
department of ecology. Adoption or issuance and implementation shall
be accomplished so that compliance with such animal feeding operation
and concentrated animal feeding operation rules, permits, programs, and
directives will achieve compliance with all federal and state water
pollution control laws. The powers granted herein include, among
others, and notwithstanding any other provisions of chapter 90.48 RCW
or otherwise, the following:
(1) Complete authority to establish and administer a comprehensive
state point source waste discharge or pollution discharge elimination
permit program which will enable the department to qualify for full
participation in any national waste discharge or pollution discharge
elimination permit system and will allow the department to be the sole
agency issuing permits required by such national system operating in
the state of Washington subject to the provisions of RCW 90.48.262(2).
Program elements authorized herein may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Effluent treatment and limitation requirements together with timing
requirements related thereto; (b) applicable receiving water quality
standards requirements; (c) requirements of standards of performance
for new sources; (d) pretreatment requirements; (e) termination and
modification of permits for cause; (f) requirements for public notices
and opportunities for public hearings; (g) appropriate relationships
with the secretary of the army in the administration of his
responsibilities which relate to anchorage and navigation, with the
administrator of the environmental protection agency in the performance
of his duties, and with other governmental officials under the federal
clean water act; (h) requirements for inspection, monitoring, entry,
and reporting; (i) enforcement of the program through penalties,
emergency powers, and criminal sanctions; (j) a continuing planning
process; and (k) user charges.
(2) The power to establish and administer state programs in a
manner which will insure the procurement of moneys, whether in the form
of grants, loans, or otherwise; to assist in the construction,
operation, and maintenance of various water pollution control
facilities and works; and the administering of various state water
pollution control management, regulatory, and enforcement programs.
(3) The power to develop and implement appropriate programs
pertaining to continuing planning processes, area-wide waste treatment
management plans, and basin planning.
The governor shall have authority to perform those actions required
of him or her by the federal clean water act.

--- END ---