BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Vision is the primary sense used in the learning process, and
accounts for eighty percent of our early learning.
(2) One in twenty preschoolers and one in four school-age children
have vision problems.
(3) Economically disadvantaged children have a proportionally
greater likelihood of having vision problems that can affect their
ability to learn.
(4) Often, vision problems in young children can be misinterpreted
as learning disabilities. Inability to concentrate, difficulty
reading, and other manifestations of poor vision can be taken for
attention deficit hyperactivity disorder, dyslexia, and other learning
disabilities.
(5) Vision is a complex process and a fundamental factor in the
learning process. Visual function can be described by three
interrelated areas: (a) Visual pathway integrity including eye health,
visual acuity, and refractive status; (b) visual efficiency including
accommodation, binocular vision, and eye movements; and (c) visual
information processing including identification and discrimination,
spatial awareness, and integration with other senses. Current
screening for visual acuity at distance only addresses a subset of
abilities in the first of these areas and is inadequate to accomplish
the requirements of RCW 28A.210.020.
It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that no child
receives remedial instruction because of an undiagnosed vision problem.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent shall require that any school-age child who has
been diagnosed with a learning disability, or is going to be placed in
an alternative learning environment because of a perceived reluctance
or inability to learn at a normal pace, have a complete vision exam.
At a minimum, the complete vision exam must include:
(1) Acuity and refraction testing to rule out a sight problem such
as amblyopia;
(2) Accommodative function testing to rule out accommodative
dysfunction including accommodative insufficiency and infacility;
(3) Motility testing to rule out strabismus, including significant
phoria;
(4) Vergence testing to rule out dysfunction and instability of eye
alignment;
(5) Eye movement accuracy testing to rule out a tracking problem;
and
(6) Ocular health exam including internal and external exam.

--- END ---