BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.121 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that postpartum depression is a serious
condition that affects women of all ages, economic status, and racial
and ethnic backgrounds. Postpartum depression includes a range of
physical and emotional changes that many mothers can have following the
birth of a child, which can be treated with medication and counseling.
If untreated, however, postpartum depression can lead to further
depression, self-destructive behavior, or even suicide, as well as
child abuse, neglect, or death of the infant or other siblings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.121 RCW
to read as follows:
The council shall conduct a proactive, public information and
communication outreach campaign concerning the significance, signs, and
treatment of postpartum depression.
The public information campaign may, within available funds,
include production and distribution of a brochure and communication by
electronic media, telephone hotlines, and existing parenting education
events funded by the council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of twenty-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general
fund to the children's trust fund for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2006, to carry out the purposes of this act.

--- END ---