BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.830 and 2003 c 105 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 43.43.830 through ((43.43.840))
43.43.845.
(1) "Applicant" means:
(a) Any prospective employee who will or may have unsupervised
access to children under sixteen years of age or developmentally
disabled persons or vulnerable adults during the course of his or her
employment or involvement with the business or organization;
(b) Any prospective volunteer who will have regularly scheduled
unsupervised access to children under sixteen years of age,
developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable adults during the
course of his or her employment or involvement with the business or
organization under circumstances where such access will or may involve
groups of (i) five or fewer children under twelve years of age, (ii)
three or fewer children between twelve and sixteen years of age, (iii)
developmentally disabled persons, or (iv) vulnerable adults;
(c) Any prospective adoptive parent, as defined in RCW 26.33.020;
or
(d) Any prospective custodian in a nonparental custody proceeding
under chapter 26.10 RCW.
(2) "Business or organization" means a business or organization
licensed in this state, any agency of the state, or other governmental
entity, that educates, trains, treats, supervises, houses, or provides
recreation to developmentally disabled persons, vulnerable adults, or
children under sixteen years of age, including but not limited to
public housing authorities, school districts, and educational service
districts.
(3) "Civil adjudication proceeding" ((means a specific court
finding of sexual abuse or exploitation or physical abuse in a
dependency action under RCW 13.34.040 or in a domestic relations action
under Title 26 RCW. In the case of vulnerable adults, civil
adjudication means a specific court finding of abuse or financial
exploitation in a protection proceeding under chapter 74.34 RCW. It
does not include administrative proceedings. The term "civil
adjudication" is further limited to court findings that identify as the
perpetrator of the abuse a named individual, over the age of eighteen
years, who was a party to the dependency or dissolution proceeding or
was a respondent in a protection proceeding in which the finding was
made and who contested the allegation of abuse or exploitation)) is a
judicial or administrative adjudicative proceeding that results in a
finding of, or upholds an agency finding of, domestic violence, abuse,
sexual abuse, neglect, or exploitation or financial exploitation of a
child or vulnerable adult under chapter 13.34, 26.44, or 74.34 RCW, or
rules adopted under chapter 18.51 RCW. "Civil adjudication proceeding"
also includes judicial or administrative orders that become final due
to the failure of the alleged perpetrator to timely exercise a right
afforded to him or her to administratively challenge findings made by
the department of social and health services or the department of
health under chapter 13.34, 26.44, or 74.34 RCW, or rules adopted under
chapter 18.51 RCW.
(4) "Conviction record" means "conviction record" information as
defined in RCW 10.97.030(((3))) and 10.97.050 relating to a crime
((against children or other persons)) committed by either an adult or
a juvenile. It does not include a conviction for an offense that has
been the subject of an expungement, pardon, annulment, certificate of
rehabilitation, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of the
rehabilitation of the person convicted, or a conviction that has been
the subject of a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based
on a finding of innocence. It does include convictions for offenses
for which the defendant received a deferred or suspended sentence,
unless the record has been expunged according to law.
(5) "Crime against children or other persons" means a conviction of
any of the following offenses: Aggravated murder; first or second
degree murder; first or second degree kidnaping; first, second, or
third degree assault; first, second, or third degree assault of a
child; first, second, or third degree rape; first, second, or third
degree rape of a child; first or second degree robbery; first degree
arson; first degree burglary; first or second degree manslaughter;
first or second degree extortion; indecent liberties; incest; vehicular
homicide; first degree promoting prostitution; communication with a
minor; unlawful imprisonment; simple assault; sexual exploitation of
minors; first or second degree criminal mistreatment; endangerment with
a controlled substance; child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020; first or second degree custodial interference; first or
second degree custodial sexual misconduct; malicious harassment; first,
second, or third degree child molestation; first or second degree
sexual misconduct with a minor; patronizing a juvenile prostitute;
child abandonment; promoting pornography; selling or distributing
erotic material to a minor; custodial assault; violation of child abuse
restraining order; child buying or selling; prostitution; felony
indecent exposure; criminal abandonment; or any of these crimes as they
may be renamed in the future.
(6) "Crimes relating to drugs" means a conviction of a crime to
manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to manufacture or
deliver a controlled substance.
(7) "Crimes relating to financial exploitation" means a conviction
for first, second, or third degree extortion; first, second, or third
degree theft; first or second degree robbery; forgery; or any of these
crimes as they may be renamed in the future.
(8) (("Disciplinary board final decision" means any final decision
issued by a disciplining authority under chapter 18.130 RCW or the
secretary of the department of health for the following businesses or
professions:
(a) Chiropractic;
(b) Dentistry;
(c) Dental hygiene;
(d) Massage;
(e) Midwifery;
(f) Naturopathy;
(g) Osteopathic medicine and surgery;
(h) Physical therapy;
(i) Physicians;
(j) Practical nursing;
(k) Registered nursing; and
(l) Psychology.
"Disciplinary board final decision," for real estate brokers and
salespersons, means any final decision issued by the director of the
department of licensing for real estate brokers and salespersons.
(9))) "Unsupervised" means not in the presence of:
(a) Another employee or volunteer from the same business or
organization as the applicant; or
(b) Any relative or guardian of any of the children or
developmentally disabled persons or vulnerable adults to which the
applicant has access during the course of his or her employment or
involvement with the business or organization.
(((10))) (9) "Vulnerable adult" means "vulnerable adult" as defined
in chapter 74.34 RCW, except that for the purposes of requesting and
receiving background checks pursuant to RCW 43.43.832, it shall also
include adults of any age who lack the functional, mental, or physical
ability to care for themselves.
(((11))) (10) "Financial exploitation" means ((the illegal or
improper use of a vulnerable adult or that adult's resources for
another person's profit or advantage)) "financial exploitation" as
defined in RCW 74.34.020.
(((12))) (11) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership,
association, corporation, or facility which receives, provides services
to, houses or otherwise cares for vulnerable adults.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.832 and 2000 c 87 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that businesses and organizations
providing services to children, developmentally disabled persons, and
vulnerable adults need adequate information to determine which
employees or licensees to hire or engage. The legislature further
finds that many developmentally disabled individuals and vulnerable
adults desire to hire their own employees directly and also need
adequate information to determine which employees or licensees to hire
or engage. Therefore, the Washington state patrol ((criminal))
identification ((system)) and criminal history section shall disclose,
upon the request of a business or organization as defined in RCW
43.43.830, a developmentally disabled person, or a vulnerable adult as
defined in RCW 43.43.830 or his or her guardian, an applicant's record
for convictions ((of offenses against children or other persons,
convictions for crimes relating to financial exploitation, but only if
the victim was a vulnerable adult, adjudications of child abuse in a
civil action, the issuance of a protection order against the respondent
under chapter 74.34 RCW, and disciplinary board final decisions and any
subsequent criminal charges associated with the conduct that is the
subject of the disciplinary board final decision)) as defined in
chapter 10.97 RCW.
(2) The legislature also finds that the state board of education
may request of the Washington state patrol criminal identification
system information regarding a certificate applicant's record for
convictions under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The legislature also finds that law enforcement agencies, the
office of the attorney general, prosecuting authorities, and the
department of social and health services may request this same
information to aid in the investigation and prosecution of child,
developmentally disabled person, and vulnerable adult abuse cases and
to protect children and adults from further incidents of abuse.
(4) The legislature further finds that the secretary of the
department of social and health services must ((consider)) establish
rules and set standards to require specific action when considering the
information listed in subsection (1) of this section, and when
considering additional information including but not limited to civil
adjudication proceedings as defined in RCW 43.43.830 and any out-of-state equivalent, in the following circumstances:
(a) When considering persons for state employment in positions
directly responsible for the supervision, care, or treatment of
children, vulnerable adults, or individuals with mental illness or
developmental disabilities;
(b) When considering persons for state positions involving
unsupervised access to vulnerable adults to conduct comprehensive
assessments, financial eligibility determinations, licensing and
certification activities, investigations, surveys, or case management;
or for state positions otherwise required by federal law to meet
employment standards;
(c) When licensing agencies or facilities with individuals in
positions directly responsible for the care, supervision, or treatment
of children, developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable adults,
including but not limited to agencies or facilities licensed under
chapter 74.15 or 18.51 RCW;
(d) When contracting with individuals or businesses or
organizations for the care, supervision, case management, or treatment
of children, developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable adults,
including but not limited to services contracted for under chapter
18.20, 18.48, 70.127, 70.128, 72.36, or 74.39A RCW or Title 71A RCW;
(e) When individual providers are paid by the state or providers
are paid by home care agencies to provide in-home services involving
unsupervised access to persons with physical, mental, or developmental
disabilities or mental illness, or to vulnerable adults as defined in
chapter 74.34 RCW, including but not limited to services provided under
chapter 74.39 or 74.39A RCW.
(5) Whenever a state conviction record check is required by state
law, persons may be employed or engaged as volunteers or independent
contractors on a conditional basis pending completion of the state
background investigation. Whenever a national criminal record check
through the federal bureau of investigation is required by state law,
a person may be employed or engaged as a volunteer or independent
contractor on a conditional basis pending completion of the national
check. The Washington personnel resources board shall adopt rules to
accomplish the purposes of this subsection as it applies to state
employees.
(6)(a) For purposes of facilitating timely access to criminal
background information and to reasonably minimize the number of
requests made under this section, recognizing that certain health care
providers change employment frequently, health care facilities may,
upon request from another health care facility, share copies of
completed criminal background inquiry information.
(b) Completed criminal background inquiry information may be shared
by a willing health care facility only if the following conditions are
satisfied: The licensed health care facility sharing the criminal
background inquiry information is reasonably known to be the person's
most recent employer, no more than twelve months has elapsed from the
date the person was last employed at a licensed health care facility to
the date of their current employment application, and the criminal
background information is no more than two years old.
(c) If criminal background inquiry information is shared, the
health care facility employing the subject of the inquiry must require
the applicant to sign a disclosure statement indicating that there has
been no conviction or finding as described in RCW 43.43.842 since the
completion date of the most recent criminal background inquiry.
(d) Any health care facility that knows or has reason to believe
that an applicant has or may have a disqualifying conviction or finding
as described in RCW 43.43.842, subsequent to the completion date of
their most recent criminal background inquiry, shall be prohibited from
relying on the applicant's previous employer's criminal background
inquiry information. A new criminal background inquiry shall be
requested pursuant to RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.842.
(e) Health care facilities that share criminal background inquiry
information shall be immune from any claim of defamation, invasion of
privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with any
dissemination of this information in accordance with this subsection.
(f) Health care facilities shall transmit and receive the criminal
background inquiry information in a manner that reasonably protects the
subject's rights to privacy and confidentiality.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection, "health care facility"
means a nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, a boarding home
licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, or an adult family home licensed
under chapter 70.128 RCW.
(7) If a federal bureau of investigation check is required in
addition to the state background check by the department of social and
health services, an applicant who is not disqualified based on the
results of the state background check shall be eligible for a one
hundred twenty day provisional approval to hire, pending the outcome of
the federal bureau of investigation check. The department may extend
the provisional approval until receipt of the federal bureau of
investigation check. If the federal bureau of investigation check
disqualifies an applicant, the department shall notify the requestor
that the provisional approval to hire is withdrawn and the applicant
may be terminated.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.43.834 and 1999 c 21 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A business or organization shall not make an inquiry to the
Washington state patrol under RCW 43.43.832 or an equivalent inquiry to
a federal law enforcement agency unless the business or organization
has notified the applicant who has been offered a position as an
employee or volunteer, that an inquiry may be made.
(2) A business or organization shall require each applicant to
disclose to the business or organization whether the applicant ((has
been)):
(a) Has been convicted of ((any)) a crime ((against children or
other persons));
(b) ((Convicted of crimes relating to financial exploitation if the
victim was a vulnerable adult)) Has had findings made against him or
her in any civil adjudicative proceeding as defined in RCW 43.43.830;
or
(c) ((Convicted of crimes related to drugs as defined in RCW
43.43.830;
(d) Found in any dependency action under RCW 13.34.040 to have
sexually assaulted or exploited any minor or to have physically abused
any minor;
(e) Found by a court in a domestic relations proceeding under Title
26 RCW to have sexually abused or exploited any minor or to have
physically abused any minor;
(f) Found in any disciplinary board final decision to have sexually
or physically abused or exploited any minor or developmentally disabled
person or to have abused or financially exploited any vulnerable adult;
or
(g) Found by a court in a protection proceeding under chapter 74.34
RCW, to have abused or financially exploited a vulnerable adult.
The disclosure shall be made in writing and signed by the applicant
and sworn under penalty of perjury. The disclosure sheet shall specify
all crimes against children or other persons and all crimes relating to
financial exploitation as defined in RCW 43.43.830 in which the victim
was a vulnerable adult)) Has both a conviction under (a) of this
subsection and findings made against him or her under (b) of this
subsection.
(3) The business or organization shall pay such reasonable fee for
the records check as the state patrol may require under RCW 43.43.838.
(4) The business or organization shall notify the applicant of the
state patrol's response within ten days after receipt by the business
or organization. The employer shall provide a copy of the response to
the applicant and shall notify the applicant of such availability.
(5) The business or organization shall use this record only in
making the initial employment or engagement decision. Further
dissemination or use of the record is prohibited, except as provided in
RCW 28A.320.155. A business or organization violating this subsection
is subject to a civil action for damages.
(6) An insurance company shall not require a business or
organization to request background information on any employee before
issuing a policy of insurance.
(7) The business and organization shall be immune from civil
liability for failure to request background information on an applicant
unless the failure to do so constitutes gross negligence.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.43.836 and 1987 c 486 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
An individual may contact the state patrol to ascertain whether
((that same)) an individual has a ((civil adjudication, disciplinary
board final decision, or)) conviction record. The state patrol shall
disclose such information, subject to the fee established under RCW
43.43.838.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.43.838 and 1995 c 29 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After January 1, 1988, and notwithstanding any provision of RCW
43.43.700 through 43.43.810 to the contrary, the state patrol shall
furnish a transcript of the conviction record((, disciplinary board
final decision and any subsequent criminal charges associated with the
conduct that is the subject of the disciplinary board final decision,
or civil adjudication record)) pertaining to any person for whom the
state patrol or the federal bureau of investigation has a record upon
the written request of:
(a) The subject of the inquiry;
(b) Any business or organization for the purpose of conducting
evaluations under RCW 43.43.832;
(c) The department of social and health services;
(d) Any law enforcement agency, prosecuting authority, or the
office of the attorney general; or
(e) The department of social and health services for the purpose of
meeting responsibilities set forth in chapter 74.15, 18.51, 18.20, or
72.23 RCW, or any later-enacted statute which purpose is to regulate or
license a facility which handles vulnerable adults. However, access to
conviction records pursuant to this subsection (1)(e) does not limit or
restrict the ability of the department to obtain additional information
regarding conviction records and pending charges as set forth in RCW
74.15.030(2)(b).
((After processing the request, if the conviction record,
disciplinary board final decision and any subsequent criminal charges
associated with the conduct that is the subject of the disciplinary
board final decision, or adjudication record shows no evidence of a
crime against children or other persons or, in the case of vulnerable
adults, no evidence of crimes relating to financial exploitation in
which the victim was a vulnerable adult, an identification declaring
the showing of no evidence shall be issued to the business or
organization by the state patrol and shall be issued within fourteen
working days of the request. The business or organization shall
provide a copy of the identification declaring the showing of no
evidence to the applicant. Possession of such identification shall
satisfy future record check requirements for the applicant for a two-year period unless the prospective employee is any current school
district employee who has applied for a position in another school
district.))
(2) The state patrol shall by rule establish fees for disseminating
records under this section to recipients identified in subsection
(1)(a) and (b) of this section. The state patrol shall also by rule
establish fees for disseminating records in the custody of the national
crime information center. The revenue from the fees shall cover, as
nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs to the state
patrol of disseminating the records: PROVIDED, That no fee shall be
charged to a nonprofit organization for the records check: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That in the case of record checks using fingerprints requested
by school districts and educational service districts, the state patrol
shall charge only for the incremental costs associated with checking
fingerprints in addition to name and date of birth. Record checks
requested by school districts and educational service districts using
only name and date of birth shall continue to be provided free of
charge.
(3) No employee of the state, employee of a business or
organization, or the business or organization is liable for defamation,
invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with
any lawful dissemination of information under RCW 43.43.830 through
43.43.840 or 43.43.760.
(4) Before July 26, 1987, the state patrol shall adopt rules and
forms to implement this section and to provide for security and privacy
of information disseminated under this section, giving first priority
to the criminal justice requirements of this chapter. The rules may
include requirements for users, audits of users, and other procedures
to prevent use of civil adjudication record information or criminal
history record information inconsistent with this chapter.
(5) Nothing in RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.840 shall authorize an
employer to make an inquiry not specifically authorized by this
chapter, or be construed to affect the policy of the state declared in
chapter 9.96A RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.43.840 and 1997 c 386 s 40 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) The supreme court shall by rule require the courts of the
state to notify the state patrol of any dependency action under RCW
13.34.040, domestic relations action under Title 26 RCW, or protection
action under chapter 74.34 RCW, in which the court makes specific
findings of physical abuse or sexual abuse or exploitation of a child
or abuse or financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult.
(2) The department of licensing shall notify the state patrol of
any disciplinary board final decision that includes specific findings
of physical abuse or sexual abuse or exploitation of a child or abuse
or financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult.
(3))) When a business or an organization terminates, fires,
dismisses, fails to renew the contract, or permits the resignation of
an employee because of crimes against children or other persons or
because of crimes relating to the financial exploitation of a
vulnerable adult, and if that employee is employed in a position
requiring a certificate or license issued by a licensing agency such as
the state board of education, the business or organization shall notify
the licensing agency of such termination of employment.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.43.845 and 1990 c 33 s 577 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon a guilty plea or conviction of a person of any felony
crime involving the physical neglect of a child under chapter 9A.42
RCW, the physical injury or death of a child under chapter 9A.32 or
9A.36 RCW (except motor vehicle violations under chapter 46.61 RCW),
sexual exploitation of a child under chapter 9.68A RCW, sexual offenses
under chapter 9A.44 RCW where a minor is the victim, promoting
prostitution of a minor under chapter 9A.88 RCW, or the sale or
purchase of a minor child under RCW 9A.64.030, the prosecuting attorney
shall determine whether the person holds a certificate or permit issued
under chapters 28A.405 and 28A.410 RCW or is employed by a school
district. If the person is employed by a school district or holds a
certificate or permit issued under chapters 28A.405 and 28A.410 RCW,
the prosecuting attorney shall notify the ((state patrol))
superintendent of public instruction of such guilty pleas or
convictions.
(2) ((When the state patrol receives information that a person who
has a certificate or permit issued under chapters 28A.405 and 28A.410
RCW or is employed by a school district has pled guilty to or been
convicted of one of the felony crimes under subsection (1) of this
section, the state patrol shall immediately transmit that information
to the superintendent of public instruction. It shall be the duty of))
The superintendent of public instruction ((to)) shall provide this
information to the state board of education and the school district
employing the individual who pled guilty or was convicted of the crimes
identified in subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 10.97.050 and 1990 c 3 s 129 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Conviction records may be disseminated without restriction.
(2) Any criminal history record information which pertains to an
incident for which a person is currently being processed by the
criminal justice system, including the entire period of correctional
supervision extending through final discharge from parole, when
applicable, may be disseminated without restriction except that it may
not be disseminated in response to a request for conviction records
under chapter 43.43 RCW.
(3) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated by a criminal justice agency to
another criminal justice agency for any purpose associated with the
administration of criminal justice, or in connection with the
employment of the subject of the record by a criminal justice or
juvenile justice agency. A criminal justice agency may respond to any
inquiry from another criminal justice agency without any obligation to
ascertain the purpose for which the information is to be used by the
agency making the inquiry.
(4) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated by a criminal justice agency to
implement a statute, ordinance, executive order, or a court rule,
decision, or order which expressly refers to records of arrest,
charges, or allegations of criminal conduct or other nonconviction data
and authorizes or directs that it be available or accessible for a
specific purpose.
(5) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated to individuals and agencies
pursuant to a contract with a criminal justice agency to provide
services related to the administration of criminal justice. Such
contract must specifically authorize access to criminal history record
information, but need not specifically state that access to
nonconviction data is included. The agreement must limit the use of
the criminal history record information to stated purposes and insure
the confidentiality and security of the information consistent with
state law and any applicable federal statutes and regulations.
(6) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated to individuals and agencies for
the express purpose of research, evaluative, or statistical activities
pursuant to an agreement with a criminal justice agency. Such
agreement must authorize the access to nonconviction data, limit the
use of that information which identifies specific individuals to
research, evaluative, or statistical purposes, and contain provisions
giving notice to the person or organization to which the records are
disseminated that the use of information obtained therefrom and further
dissemination of such information are subject to the provisions of this
chapter and applicable federal statutes and regulations, which shall be
cited with express reference to the penalties provided for a violation
thereof.
(7) Every criminal justice agency that maintains and disseminates
criminal history record information must maintain information
pertaining to every dissemination of criminal history record
information except a dissemination to the effect that the agency has no
record concerning an individual. Information pertaining to
disseminations shall include:
(a) An indication of to whom (agency or person) criminal history
record information was disseminated;
(b) The date on which the information was disseminated;
(c) The individual to whom the information relates; and
(d) A brief description of the information disseminated.
The information pertaining to dissemination required to be
maintained shall be retained for a period of not less than one year.
(8) In addition to the other provisions in this section allowing
dissemination of criminal history record information, RCW 4.24.550
governs dissemination of information concerning offenders who commit
sex offenses as defined by RCW 9.94A.030. Criminal justice agencies,
their employees, and officials shall be immune from civil liability for
dissemination on criminal history record information concerning sex
offenders as provided in RCW 4.24.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RCW 43.43.835 (Background checks -- Drug-related conviction information) and 1998 c 10 s 2 are each repealed.

--- END ---