BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.26.100 and 1991 c 343 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
A member upon retirement for service shall receive a monthly
retirement allowance computed according to his or her completed
creditable service credit years of service as follows: Five years but
under ten years, one-twelfth of one percent of his or her final average
salary for each month of service; ten years but under twenty years,
one-twelfth of one and one-half percent of his or her final average
salary for each month of service; and twenty years and over one-twelfth
of two percent of his or her final average salary for each month of
service: PROVIDED, That the recipient of a retirement allowance who
shall return to service as a law enforcement officer or fire fighter
shall be considered to have terminated his or her retirement status and
he or she shall immediately become a member of the retirement system
with the status of membership he or she had as of the date of
retirement. Retirement benefits shall be suspended during the period
of his or her return to service and he or she shall make contributions
and receive service credit. Such a member shall have the right to
again retire at any time and his or her retirement allowance shall be
recomputed, and paid, based upon additional service rendered and any
change in final average salary((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no retirement
allowance paid pursuant to this section shall exceed sixty percent of
final average salary, except as such allowance may be increased by
virtue of RCW 41.26.240, as now or hereafter amended)).

--- END ---