BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that small
technology-based firms are the source of approximately one-half of the
economy's major innovations and that it is in the interest of the state
to increase participation by Washington state small businesses in the
federal small business innovation research program by assisting them in
becoming small business innovation research program grant recipients.
The legislature further finds that many small business innovators
lack the grant-writing skills necessary to prepare a successful small
business innovation research program proposal, and the federal program
that funded grant-writing assistance has stopped operations. Nearly
fifty percent of small businesses trained under the federal program won
grants compared to less than ten percent of those that did not receive
training.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Small business innovation research program" means the program,
enacted pursuant to the small business innovation development act of
1982, P.L. 97-219, that provided funds to small businesses to conduct
innovative research having commercial application.
(b) "Small business" means a corporation, partnership, sole
proprietorship, or individual, operating a business for profit, with
two hundred fifty employees or fewer, including employees employed in
a subsidiary or affiliated corporation, that otherwise meets the
requirements of the federal small business innovation research program.
(3) The Washington technology center shall establish a small
business innovation research assistance program, including a proposal
review process, to train and assist Washington small businesses to win
phase I small business innovation research program awards.
(a) The Washington technology center shall give priority to
first-time small business innovation research program applicants, new
businesses, and firms with fewer than ten employees.
(b) The Washington technology center may charge a fee for this
service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of forty-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the department of
community, trade, and economic development for the purposes of section
1 of this act.

--- END ---