BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.70.020 and 1996 c 221 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director, under the supervision and direction of the advisory
committee, shall:
(1) Administer all criminal appellate indigent defense services;
(2) Submit a biennial budget for all costs related to state
appellate indigent defense;
(3) Establish administrative procedures, standards, and guidelines
for the program including a cost-efficient system that provides for
recovery of costs;
(4) Recommend criteria and standards for determining and verifying
indigency. In recommending criteria for determining indigency, the
director shall compile and review the indigency standards used by other
state agencies and shall periodically submit the compilation and report
to the legislature on the appropriateness and consistency of such
standards;
(5) Collect information regarding indigency cases funded by the
state and report annually to the legislature and the supreme court;
(6) Coordinate with the supreme court and the judges of each
division of the court of appeals to determine how attorney services
should be provided;
(7) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, oversee and monitor dependency and termination legal
representation for parents statewide. The goal shall be to enhance the
quality of legal representation in dependency and termination hearings.
To meet this goal, attorneys and agencies providing such representation
shall comply with the following, subject to appropriation of state
funds:
(a) Meet maximum caseload requirements for dependency and
termination cases, in accordance with standards published by the office
of public defense;
(b) Implement enhanced defense attorney practice standards
published by the office of public defense, including but not limited to
those related to reasonable case preparation and the delivery of
adequate client advice; and
(c) Use investigative and expert services in appropriate cases.
The office of public defense shall not provide direct
representation of clients.

--- END ---