BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.180 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 13 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) "Successor" means:
(a) Any person to whom a taxpayer quitting, selling out,
exchanging, or disposing of a business sells or otherwise conveys,
directly or indirectly, in bulk and not in the ordinary course of the
taxpayer's business, more than fifty percent of the fair market value
of either the (i) tangible assets or (ii) intangible assets of the
taxpayer; or
(b) A surviving corporation of a statutory merger.
(2) Any person obligated to fulfill the terms of a contract shall
be deemed a successor to any contractor defaulting in the performance
of any contract as to which such person is a surety or guarantor.
(3) For the purposes of this section, neither "tangible assets" nor
"intangible assets" includes any interest in real property.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.260 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 4 and 2003 2nd
sp.s. c 1 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Seafood products which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw
salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the value of the products manufactured, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) By canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits and vegetables, or selling at wholesale fresh fruits and
vegetables canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated by the
seller and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products ((canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated))
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who
transports in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state,
the seller shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by
the department and retain the statement as a business record;
(d) Dairy products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in
21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including byproducts
from the manufacturing of the dairy products such as whey and casein;
or selling the same to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course
of business the goods out of state; as to such persons the tax imposed
shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured or the gross
proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports in the ordinary
course of business goods out of this state, the seller shall annually
provide a statement in a form prescribed by the department and retain
the statement as a business record;
(e) Alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock, as those
terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol
fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock manufactured, multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. This subsection (1)(e) expires July 1,
2009; and
(f) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are defined
in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales, at retail or wholesale, of nuclear fuel assemblies
manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the assemblies multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing nuclear fuel assemblies, as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products manufactured multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the
gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied
by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter
82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to
the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or
foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to
such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees
imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3
percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(11) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
agent, insurance broker, or insurance solicitor licensed under chapter
48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to
such licensed activities shall be equal to the gross income of such
business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(12) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5
percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.
(13)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of
commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, manufactured by
that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the airplanes
or components multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (13), "commercial
airplane," "component," and "final assembly of a superefficient
airplane" have the meanings given in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (13) must report
as required under RCW 82.32.545.
(e) This subsection (13) does not apply after the earlier of: July
1, 2024; or December 31, 2007, if assembly of a superefficient airplane
does not begin by December 31, 2007, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.290 and 2004 c 174 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal
to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business
multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business
activity other than or in addition to ((those enumerated in RCW
82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250, 82.04.255, 82.04.260, 82.04.270,
82.04.298, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280, 82.04.2907, 82.04.272, 82.04.2906,
and 82.04.2908, and)) an activity taxed explicitly under another
section in this chapter or subsection (1) of this section; as to such
persons the amount of tax on account of such activities shall be equal
to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 1.5
percent.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section includes, among others, and
without limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to materials
used in the performance of such business passes to another by
accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged
in the business of rendering any type of service which does not
constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of
advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials
furnished to an agent by his principal or supplier to be used for
informational, educational and promotional purposes shall not be
considered a part of the agent's remuneration or commission and shall
not be subject to taxation under this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.2908 and 2004 c 174 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing room and ((domiciliary care)) authorized services to
residents of a boarding home licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross
income ((from such services)) of the business multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(2) If the persons described in subsection (1) of this section
receive income from sources other than those described in subsection
(1) of this section or provide services other than those named in
subsection (1) of this section, that income and those services are
subject to tax as otherwise provided in this chapter.
(3) (("Domiciliary care" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.20.020))
"Authorized services" means those services that a boarding home is
authorized under chapter 18.20 RCW to provide to its residents.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.04.4281 and 2002 c 150 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax:
(a) Amounts derived from investments;
(b) Amounts derived as dividends or distributions from (([the]))
the capital account by a parent from its subsidiary entities; and
(c) Amounts derived from interest on loans between subsidiary
entities and a parent entity or between subsidiaries of a common parent
entity, but only if the total investment and loan income is less than
five percent of gross receipts of the business annually.
(2) The following are not deductible under subsection (1)(a) of
this section:
(a) Amounts received from loans, except as provided in subsection
(1)(c) of this section, or the extension of credit to another,
revolving credit arrangements, installment sales, the acceptance of
payment over time for goods or services, or any of the foregoing that
have been transferred by the originator of the same to an affiliate of
the transferor; or
(b) Amounts received by a banking, lending, or security business.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply only to this section.
(a) "Banking business" means a person engaging in business as a
national or state-chartered bank, a mutual savings bank, a savings and
loan association, a trust company, an alien bank, a foreign bank, a
credit union, a stock savings bank, or a similar entity that is
chartered under Title 30, 31, 32, or 33 RCW, or organized under Title
12 U.S.C.
(b) "Lending business" means a person engaged in the business of
making secured or unsecured loans of money, or extending credit, and
(i) more than one-half of the person's gross income is earned from such
activities and (ii) more than one-half of the person's total
expenditures are incurred in support of such activities.
(c) The terms "loan" and "extension of credit" do not include
ownership of or trading in publicly traded debt instruments, or
substantially equivalent instruments offered in a private placement.
(d) "Security business" means a person, other than an issuer, who
is engaged in the business of effecting transactions in securities as
a broker, dealer, or broker-dealer, as those terms are defined in the
securities act of Washington, chapter 21.20 RCW, or the federal
securities act of 1933. "Security business" does not include any
company excluded from the definition of broker or dealer under the
federal investment company act of 1940 or any entity that is not an
investment company by reason of sections 3(c)(1) and 3(c)(3) through
3(c)(14) thereof.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.04.440 and 2004 c 174 s 5 and 2004 c 24 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in activities ((which)) that are ((within
the purview of the provisions of two or more of sections)) subject to
tax under two or more provisions of RCW 82.04.230 to 82.04.298,
inclusive, shall be taxable under each ((paragraph)) provision
applicable to ((the)) those activities ((engaged in)).
(2) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.2909(2), 82.04.250, 82.04.270,
or 82.04.260 (1)(c) or (d), (4), (5), or (13) with respect to selling
products in this state shall be allowed a credit against those taxes
for any (a) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the manufacturing
of products so sold in this state, and/or (b) extracting taxes paid
with respect to the extracting of products so sold in this state or
ingredients of products so sold in this state. Extracting taxes taken
as credit under subsection (3) of this section may also be taken under
this subsection, if otherwise allowable under this subsection. The
amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax liability arising under
this chapter with respect to the sale of those products.
(3) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.240 or 82.04.260(1)(b) shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with
respect to extracting the ingredients of the products so manufactured
in this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the manufacturing
of those products.
(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1),
or 82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), (6), or (13) with respect to extracting or
manufacturing products in this state shall be allowed a credit against
those taxes for any (i) gross receipts taxes paid to another state with
respect to the sales of the products so extracted or manufactured in
this state, (ii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the
manufacturing of products using ingredients so extracted in this state,
or (iii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to manufacturing
activities completed in another state for products so manufactured in
this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the extraction or
manufacturing of those products.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of
business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the
tax an income tax or value added tax; and
(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately
stated from the sales price.
(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the
United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of
such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign
country or political subdivision thereof.
(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and
includes (i) the taxes imposed in RCW 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1), and
82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), (6), and (13), and (ii) similar gross receipts
taxes paid to other states.
(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act
or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes the
tax imposed in RCW 82.04.230 and similar gross receipts taxes paid to
other states.
(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used
in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through
82.04.212, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of
describing taxes imposed by other states.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.04.4461 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person for qualified preproduction development
((spending)) expenditures occurring after December 1, 2003.
(b) Before July 1, 2005, any credits earned under this section must
be accrued and carried forward and may not be used until July 1, 2005.
These carryover credits may be used at any time thereafter, and may be
carried over until used. Refunds may not be granted in the place of a
credit.
(2) The credit is equal to the amount of qualified preproduction
development expenditures of a person, multiplied by the rate of 1.5
percent.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section the
credit shall be taken against taxes due for the same calendar year in
which the qualified preproduction development expenditures are
incurred. Credit earned on or after July 1, 2005, may not be carried
over. The credit for each calendar year shall not exceed the amount of
tax otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year. Refunds
may not be granted in the place of a credit.
(4) Any person claiming the credit shall file an ((affidavit))
annual report in a form prescribed by the department that shall include
the amount of the credit claimed, an estimate of the anticipated
preproduction development expenditures during the calendar year for
which the credit is claimed, an estimate of the taxable amount
((during)) for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed, and
such additional information as the department may prescribe.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Aeronautics" means the study of flight and the science of
building and operating commercial aircraft.
(b) "Person" means a person as defined in RCW 82.04.030, who is a
manufacturer or processor for hire of commercial airplanes, or
components of such airplanes, as those terms are defined in RCW
82.32.550.
(c) "Preproduction development" means research, design, and
engineering activities performed in relation to the development of a
product, product line, model, or model derivative, including prototype
development, testing, and certification. The term includes the
discovery of technological information, the translating of
technological information into new or improved products, processes,
techniques, formulas, or inventions, and the adaptation of existing
products and models into new products or new models, or derivatives of
products or models. The term does not include manufacturing activities
or other production-oriented activities, however the term does include
tool design and engineering design for the manufacturing process. The
term does not include surveys and studies, social science and
humanities research, market research or testing, quality control, sale
promotion and service, computer software developed for internal use,
and research in areas such as improved style, taste, and seasonal
design.
(d) (("Preproduction development spending" means qualified
preproduction development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified preproduction development.
(e))) "Qualified preproduction development" means preproduction
development performed within this state in the field of aeronautics.
(((f))) (e) "Qualified preproduction development expenditures"
means operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor
or a partner in a partnership as determined by the department,
benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly incurred in
qualified preproduction development by a person claiming the credit
provided in this section. The term does not include amounts paid to a
person, as defined in RCW 82.04.030, other than a public educational or
research institution to conduct qualified preproduction development.
The term does not include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses
for land, structures, or depreciable property.
(((g))) (f) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to
the tax imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
tax returns ((during)) for the calendar year ((in)) for which the
credit is claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is
allowed under RCW 82.04.440.
(6) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person taking the credit under this section must report as required
under RCW 82.32.545.
(7) Credit may not be claimed for expenditures for which a credit
is claimed under RCW 82.04.4452.
(8) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.04.530 and 2004 c 153 s 410 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter, a telephone business other than a
mobile telecommunications service provider must calculate gross
proceeds of ((retail)) sales in a manner consistent with the sourcing
rules provided in RCW 82.32.520. The department may adopt rules to
implement this section, including rules that provide a formulary method
of determining gross proceeds that reasonably approximates the taxable
activity of a telephone business.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.08.0266 and 1999 c 358 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales to
nonresidents of this state for use outside of this state of watercraft
requiring coast guard registration or registration by the state of
principal use according to the Federal Boating Act of 1958, even though
delivery be made within this state, but only when (1) the watercraft
will not be used within this state for more than forty-five days and
(2) an appropriate exemption certificate supported by identification
ascertaining residence as required by the department ((of revenue)) and
signed by the ((purchaser)) buyer or ((his)) the buyer's agent
establishing the fact that the ((purchaser)) buyer is a nonresident and
that the watercraft is for use outside of this state, a copy of which
shall be retained by the ((dealer)) seller.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.08.02665 and 1999 c 358 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
vessels to residents of foreign countries for use outside of this
state, even though delivery is made within this state, but only if
(((1))):
(a) The vessel will not be used within this state for more than
forty-five days; and
(((2))) (b) An appropriate exemption certificate supported by
identification as required by the department ((of revenue)) and signed
by the ((purchaser)) buyer or the ((purchaser's)) buyer's agent
establishes the fact that the ((purchaser)) buyer is a resident of a
foreign country and that the vessel is for use outside of this state.
A copy of the exemption certificate is to be retained by the ((dealer))
seller.
(2) As used in this section, "vessel" means every watercraft used
or capable of being used as a means of transportation on the water,
other than a seaplane.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.08.02745 and 1997 c 438 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to charges made
for labor and services rendered by any person in respect to the
constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing
buildings or other structures used as agricultural employee housing, or
to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or
component of the buildings or other structures during the course of the
constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving the buildings or
other structures((, but)). The exemption is available only if the
buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and
manner prescribed by the department ((by rule)).
(2) The exemption provided in this section for agricultural
employee housing provided to year-round employees of the agricultural
employer, only applies if that housing is built to the current building
code for single-family or multifamily dwellings according to the state
building code, chapter 19.27 RCW.
(3) Any agricultural employee housing built under this section
shall be used according to this section for at least five consecutive
years from the date the housing is approved for occupancy, or the full
amount of tax otherwise due shall be immediately due and payable
together with interest, but not penalties, from the date the housing is
approved for occupancy until the date of payment. If at any time
agricultural employee housing that is not located on agricultural land
ceases to be used in the manner specified in subsection (2) of this
section, the full amount of tax otherwise due shall be immediately due
and payable with interest, but not penalties, from the date the housing
ceases to be used as agricultural employee housing until the date of
payment.
(4) The exemption provided in this section shall not apply to
housing built for the occupancy of an employer, family members of an
employer, or persons owning stock or shares in a farm partnership or
corporation business.
(5) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02685:
(a) "Agricultural employee" or "employee" has the same meaning as
given in RCW 19.30.010;
(b) "Agricultural employer" or "employer" has the same meaning as
given in RCW 19.30.010; and
(c) "Agricultural employee housing" means all facilities provided
by an agricultural employer, housing authority, local government, state
or federal agency, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based
organization that is exempt from income tax under section 501(c) of the
internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)), or for-profit
provider of housing for housing agricultural employees on a year-round
or seasonal basis, including bathing, food handling, hand washing,
laundry, and toilet facilities, single-family and multifamily dwelling
units and dormitories, and includes labor camps under RCW ((70.54.110))
70.114A.110. "Agricultural employee housing" does not include housing
regularly provided on a commercial basis to the general public.
"Agricultural employee housing" does not include housing provided by a
housing authority unless at least eighty percent of the occupants are
agricultural employees whose adjusted income is less than fifty percent
of median family income, adjusted for household size, for the county
where the housing is provided.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.08.0283 and 2004 c 153 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of:
(a) Prosthetic devices prescribed, fitted, or furnished for an
individual by a person licensed under the laws of this state to
prescribe, fit, or furnish prosthetic devices, and the components of
prosthetic devices;
(b) Medicines of mineral, animal, and botanical origin prescribed,
administered, dispensed, or used in the treatment of an individual by
a person licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW; and
(c) Medically prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to,
oxygen concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid oxygen
systems, and gaseous, bottled oxygen systems prescribed for an
individual by a person licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW for
use in the medical treatment of that individual.
(2) In addition, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to the
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of any of the items
exempted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The exemption in subsection (1) of this section shall not apply
to sales of durable medical equipment or mobility enhancing equipment.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Prosthetic device" means a replacement, corrective, or
supportive device, including repair and replacement parts for a
prosthetic device, worn on or in the body to:
(i) Artificially replace a missing portion of the body;
(ii) Prevent or correct a physical deformity or malfunction; or
(iii) Support a weak or deformed portion of the body.
(b) "Durable medical equipment" means equipment, including repair
and replacement parts for durable medical equipment that:
(i) Can withstand repeated use;
(ii) Is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose;
(iii) Generally is not useful to a person in the absence of illness
or injury; and
(iv) ((Does not work)) Is not worn in or on the body.
(c) "Mobility enhancing equipment" means equipment, including
repair and replacement parts for mobility enhancing equipment that:
(i) Is primarily and customarily used to provide or increase the
ability to move from one place to another and that is appropriate for
use either in a home or a motor vehicle;
(ii) Is not generally used by persons with normal mobility; and
(iii) Does not include any motor vehicle or equipment on a motor
vehicle normally provided by a motor vehicle manufacturer.
(d) The terms "durable medical equipment" and "mobility enhancing
equipment" are mutually exclusive.

Sec. 13 RCW 82.08.945 and 2004 c 153 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of kidney
dialysis devices, and the components of such devices, including repair
and replacement parts, for human use pursuant to a prescription. In
addition, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to charges
made for labor and services rendered in respect to the repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving of kidney dialysis devices.

Sec. 14 RCW 82.12.0277 and 2004 c 153 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of:
(a) Prosthetic devices prescribed, fitted, or furnished for an
individual by a person licensed under the laws of this state to
prescribe, fit, or furnish prosthetic devices, and the components of
prosthetic devices;
(b) Medicines of mineral, animal, and botanical origin prescribed,
administered, dispensed, or used in the treatment of an individual by
a person licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW; and
(c) Medically prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to,
oxygen concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid oxygen
systems, and gaseous, bottled oxygen systems prescribed for an
individual by a person licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW for
use in the medical treatment of that individual.
(2) In addition, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in
respect to the use of labor and services rendered in respect to the
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of any of the items
exempted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The exemption provided by subsection (1) of this section shall
not apply to the use of durable medical equipment or mobility enhancing
equipment.
(4) "Prosthetic device," "durable medical equipment," and "mobility
enhancing equipment" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.08.0283.

Sec. 15 RCW 82.12.0284 and 2003 c 168 s 603 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of computers, computer components, computer accessories, or
computer software irrevocably donated to any public or private
nonprofit school or college, as defined under chapter 84.36 RCW, in
this state. For purposes of this section, "computer" ((has)) and
"computer software" have the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.

Sec. 16 RCW 82.12.035 and 2002 c 367 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A credit shall be allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter
upon the use of tangible personal property, or services taxable under
RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a), in the state of Washington in the
amount that the present user thereof or his or her bailor or donor has
paid a retail sales or use tax with respect to such property or
services to any other state of the United States, any political
subdivision thereof, the District of Columbia, and any foreign country
or political subdivision thereof, prior to the use of such property or
services in Washington.

Sec. 17 RCW 82.12.945 and 2004 c 153 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the use of kidney
dialysis devices, and the components of such devices, including repair
and replacement parts, for human use pursuant to a prescription. In
addition, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of labor and services rendered in respect to the repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving of kidney dialysis devices.

Sec. 18 RCW 82.14.055 and 2003 c 168 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this
section or any other statute, a local ((sales and use)) tax change
shall take effect (a) no sooner than seventy-five days after the
department receives notice of the change and (b) only on the first day
of January, April, July, or October.
(2) In the case of a local ((sales and use)) tax that is a credit
against the state sales tax or use tax, a local ((sales and use)) tax
change shall take effect (a) no sooner than thirty days after the
department receives notice of the change and (b) only on the first day
of a month.
(3)(a) A local ((sales and use)) tax rate increase imposed on
services applies to the first billing period starting on or after the
effective date of the increase.
(b) A local ((sales and use)) tax rate decrease imposed on services
applies to bills rendered on or after the effective date of the
decrease.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "services" means
retail services such as installing and constructing and retail services
such as telecommunications, but does not include services such as
tattooing.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Local government" means any city, town, county, or any other
municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or other political
subdivision authorized to impose taxes, fees, or charges.
(b) "Local ((sales and use)) tax change" means enactment or
revision, including changes resulting from referendum or annexation,
of:
(i) Local sales and use taxes under this chapter or any other
statute((, including changes resulting from referendum or annexation));
or
(ii) Any other tax, fee, or charge imposed by a local government
that the department is required to collect on behalf of the local
government, including any tax, fee, or charge imposed under this title
or Title 35, 36, or 67 RCW.

Sec. 19 RCW 82.14B.020 and 2002 c 341 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Emergency services communication system" means a multicounty,
countywide, or districtwide radio or landline communications network,
including an enhanced 911 telephone system, which provides rapid public
access for coordinated dispatching of services, personnel, equipment,
and facilities for police, fire, medical, or other emergency services.
(2) "Enhanced 911 telephone system" means a public telephone system
consisting of a network, data base, and on-premises equipment that is
accessed by dialing 911 and that enables reporting police, fire,
medical, or other emergency situations to a public safety answering
point. The system includes the capability to selectively route
incoming 911 calls to the appropriate public safety answering point
that operates in a defined 911 service area and the capability to
automatically display the name, address, and telephone number of
incoming 911 calls at the appropriate public safety answering point.
(3) "Switched access line" means the telephone service line which
connects a subscriber's main telephone(s) or equivalent main
telephone(s) to the local exchange company's switching office.
(4) "Local exchange company" has the meaning ascribed to it in RCW
80.04.010.
(5) "Radio access line" means the telephone number assigned to or
used by a subscriber for two-way local wireless voice service available
to the public for hire from a radio communications service company.
Radio access lines include, but are not limited to, radio-telephone
communications lines used in cellular telephone service, personal
communications services, and network radio access lines, or their
functional and competitive equivalent. Radio access lines do not
include lines that provide access to one-way signaling service, such as
paging service, or to communications channels suitable only for data
transmission, or to nonlocal radio access line service, such as
wireless roaming service, or to a private telecommunications system.
(6) "Radio communications service company" has the meaning ascribed
to it in RCW 80.04.010, except that it does not include radio paging
providers. It does include those persons or entities that provide
commercial mobile radio services, as defined by 47 U.S.C. Sec.
332(d)(1), and both facilities-based and nonfacilities-based resellers.
(7) "Private telecommunications system" has the meaning ascribed to
it in RCW 80.04.010.
(8) "Subscriber" means the retail purchaser of telephone service as
telephone service is defined in RCW 82.04.065(3).
(9) "Place of primary use" has the meaning ascribed to it in ((the
federal mobile telecommunications sourcing act, P.L. 106-252)) RCW
82.04.065.

Sec. 20 RCW 82.14B.030 and 2002 c 341 s 8 and 2002 c 67 s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county may impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of switched access lines in an
amount not exceeding fifty cents per month for each switched access
line. The amount of tax shall be uniform for each switched access
line. Each county shall provide notice of such tax to all local
exchange companies serving in the county at least sixty days in advance
of the date on which the first payment is due.
(2) The legislative authority of a county may also impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of radio access lines whose place of
primary use is located within the county in an amount not exceeding
fifty cents per month for each radio access line. The amount of tax
shall be uniform for each radio access line. ((The location of a radio
access line is the customer's place of primary use as defined in RCW
82.04.065.)) The county shall provide notice of such tax to all radio
communications service companies serving in the county at least sixty
days in advance of the date on which the first payment is due. Any
county imposing this tax shall include in its ordinance a refund
mechanism whereby the amount of any tax ordered to be refunded by the
judgment of a court of record, or as a result of the resolution of any
appeal therefrom, shall be refunded to the radio communications service
company or local exchange company that collected the tax, and those
companies shall reimburse the subscribers who paid the tax. The
ordinance shall further provide that to the extent the subscribers who
paid the tax cannot be identified or located, the tax paid by those
subscribers shall be returned to the county.
(3) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all switched
access lines in the state. The amount of tax shall not exceed twenty
cents per month for each switched access line. The tax shall be
uniform for each switched access line. The tax imposed under this
subsection shall be remitted to the department of revenue by local
exchange companies on a tax return provided by the department. Tax
proceeds shall be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911
account created in RCW 38.52.540.
(4) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all radio access
lines whose place of primary use is located within the state in an
amount of twenty cents per month for each radio access line. The tax
shall be uniform for each radio access line. The tax imposed under
this section shall be remitted to the department of revenue by radio
communications service companies, including those companies that resell
radio access lines, on a tax return provided by the department. Tax
proceeds shall be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911
account created in RCW 38.52.540. The tax imposed under this section
is not subject to the state sales and use tax or any local tax.
(5) By August 31st of each year the state enhanced 911 coordinator
shall recommend the level for the next year of the state enhanced 911
excise tax imposed by subsection (3) of this section, based on a
systematic cost and revenue analysis, to the utilities and
transportation commission. The commission shall by the following
October 31st determine the level of the state enhanced 911 excise tax
for the following year.

Sec. 21 RCW 82.19.010 and 1998 c 257 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) In addition to any other taxes, there is hereby levied and
there shall be collected by the department of revenue from every person
for the privilege of engaging within this state in business as a
manufacturer, as a wholesaler, or as a retailer, a litter tax equal to
the value of products listed in RCW 82.19.020, including byproducts,
manufactured within this state, multiplied by fifteen one-thousandths
of one percent in the case of manufacturers, and equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the products listed in RCW 82.19.020 that are sold
within this state multiplied by fifteen one-thousandths of one percent
in the case of wholesalers and retailers.
(((2) Beginning January 1999, and in January of every odd-numbered
year thereafter, the department shall submit to the appropriate
committees of the senate and the house of representatives a report on
compliance with the litter tax. The report shall address:
(a) The litter tax reported voluntarily and litter tax assessed
through enforcement; and
(b) Total litter tax revenues reported on an industry basis.
(3) Beginning January 1999, the frequency and time of collection of
the tax will be changed to coincide with the reporting periods by
payers of their business and occupation tax.))

Sec. 22 RCW 82.29A.130 and 1999 c 165 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following leasehold interests shall be exempt from taxes
imposed pursuant to RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040:
(1) All leasehold interests constituting a part of the operating
properties of any public utility which is assessed and taxed as a
public utility pursuant to chapter 84.12 RCW.
(2) All leasehold interests in facilities owned or used by a
school, college, or university which leasehold provides housing for
students and which is otherwise exempt from taxation under provisions
of RCW 84.36.010 and 84.36.050. The exemption provided by this
subsection does not apply to leasehold interests in any portion of
student housing facilities that is not used to provide housing for
students.
(3) All leasehold interests of subsidized housing where the fee
ownership of such property is vested in the government of the United
States, or the state of Washington or any political subdivision
thereof, but only if income qualification exists for such housing.
(4) All leasehold interests used for fair purposes of a nonprofit
fair association that sponsors or conducts a fair or fairs which
receive support from revenues collected pursuant to RCW 67.16.100 and
allocated by the director of the department of agriculture where the
fee ownership of such property is vested in the government of the
United States, the state of Washington or any of its political
subdivisions: PROVIDED, That this exemption shall not apply to the
leasehold interest of any sublessee of such nonprofit fair association
if such leasehold interest would be taxable if it were the primary
lease.
(5) All leasehold interests in any property of any public entity
used as a residence by an employee of that public entity who is
required as a condition of employment to live in the publicly owned
property.
(6) All leasehold interests held by enrolled Indians of lands owned
or held by any Indian or Indian tribe where the fee ownership of such
property is vested in or held in trust by the United States and which
are not subleased to other than to a lessee which would qualify
pursuant to this chapter, RCW 84.36.451 and 84.40.175.
(7) All leasehold interests in any real property of any Indian or
Indian tribe, band, or community that is held in trust by the United
States or is subject to a restriction against alienation imposed by the
United States: PROVIDED, That this exemption shall apply only where it
is determined that contract rent paid is greater than or equal to
ninety percent of fair market rental, to be determined by the
department of revenue using the same criteria used to establish taxable
rent in RCW 82.29A.020(2)(b).
(8) All leasehold interests for which annual taxable rent is less
than two hundred fifty dollars per year. For purposes of this
subsection leasehold interests held by the same lessee in contiguous
properties owned by the same lessor shall be deemed a single leasehold
interest.
(9) All leasehold interests which give use or possession of the
leased property for a continuous period of less than thirty days:
PROVIDED, That for purposes of this subsection, successive leases or
lease renewals giving substantially continuous use ((of)) or possession
of the same property to the same lessee shall be deemed a single
leasehold interest: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no leasehold interest shall
be deemed to give use or possession for a period of less than thirty
days solely by virtue of the reservation by the public lessor of the
right to use the property or to allow third parties to use the property
on an occasional, temporary basis.
(10) All leasehold interests under month-to-month leases in
residential units rented for residential purposes of the lessee pending
destruction or removal for the purpose of constructing a public highway
or building.
(11) All leasehold interests in any publicly owned real or personal
property to the extent such leasehold interests arises solely by virtue
of a contract for public improvements or work executed under the public
works statutes of this state or of the United States between the public
owner of the property and a contractor.
(12) All leasehold interests that give use or possession of state
adult correctional facilities for the purposes of operating
correctional industries under RCW 72.09.100.
(13) All leasehold interests used to provide organized and
supervised recreational activities for disabled persons of all ages in
a camp facility and for public recreational purposes by a nonprofit
organization, association, or corporation that would be exempt from
property tax under RCW 84.36.030(1) if it owned the property. If the
publicly owned property is used for any taxable purpose, the leasehold
excise taxes set forth in RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040 shall be
imposed and shall be apportioned accordingly.
(14) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas
of a baseball stadium with natural turf and a retractable roof or
canopy that is in a county with a population of over one million, that
has a seating capacity of over forty thousand, and that is constructed
on or after January 1, 1995. "Public or entertainment areas" include
ticket sales areas, ramps and stairs, lobbies and concourses, parking
areas, concession areas, restaurants, hospitality and stadium club
areas, kitchens or other work areas primarily servicing other public or
entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press and media areas,
control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales areas,
museum and exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage
areas, loading, staging, and servicing areas, seating areas and suites,
the playing field, and any other areas to which the public has access
or which are used for the production of the entertainment event or
other public usage, and any other personal property used for these
purposes. "Public or entertainment areas" does not include locker
rooms or private offices exclusively used by the lessee.
(15) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas
of a stadium and exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, that
is constructed on or after January 1, 1998. For the purposes of this
subsection, "public or entertainment areas" has the same meaning as in
subsection (14) of this section, and includes exhibition areas.
(16) All leasehold interests in public facilities district((s))
facilities, as ((provided)) described in ((chapter 36.100 or 35.57))
RCW 36.100.030(1) or 35.57.020(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 RCW 82.29A.150 (Cancellation of taxes
levied for collection in 1976) and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 61 s 17 are
each repealed.

Sec. 24 RCW 82.32.033 and 2004 c 253 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A promoter of a special event within the state of Washington
shall not permit a vendor to make or solicit retail sales of tangible
personal property or services at the special event unless the promoter
makes a good faith effort to obtain verification that the vendor has
obtained a certificate of registration from the department.
(2) A promoter of a special event shall:
(a) Keep, in addition to the records required under RCW 82.32.070,
a record of the dates and place of each special event, and the name,
address, and registration certificate number of each vendor permitted
to make or solicit retail sales of tangible personal property or
services at the special event. The record of the date and place of a
special event, and the name, address, and registration certificate
number of each vendor at the event shall be preserved for a period of
one year from the date of a special event; and
(b) Provide to the department, within twenty days of receipt of a
written request from the department, a list of vendors permitted to
make or solicit retail sales of tangible personal property or services.
The list shall be in a form and contain such information as the
department may require, and shall include the date and place of the
event, and the name, address, and registration certificate number of
each vendor.
(3) If a promoter fails to make a good faith effort to comply with
the provisions of this section, the promoter is liable for the
penalties provided in this subsection (3).
(a) If a promoter fails to make a good faith effort to comply with
the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the department shall
impose a penalty of one hundred dollars for each vendor permitted to
make or solicit retail sales of tangible personal property or services
at the special event.
(b) If a promoter fails to make a good faith effort to comply with
the provisions of subsection (2)(b) of this section, the department
shall impose a penalty of:
(i) Two hundred fifty dollars if the information requested is not
received by the department within twenty days of the department's
written request; and
(ii) One hundred dollars for each vendor for whom the information
as required by subsection (2)(b) of this section is not provided to the
department.
(4) The aggregate of penalties imposed under subsection (3) of this
section may not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars for a special
event if the promoter has not previously been penalized under this
section. Under no circumstances is a promoter liable for sales tax or
business and occupation tax not remitted to the department by a vendor
at a special event.
(5) The department shall notify a promoter by mail of any penalty
imposed under this section, and the penalty shall be due within thirty
days from the date of the notice. If any penalty imposed under this
section is not received by the department by the due date, there shall
be assessed interest on the unpaid amount beginning the day following
the due date until the penalty is paid in full. The rate of interest
shall be computed on a daily basis on the amount of outstanding penalty
at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate computed
shall be adjusted annually in the same manner as provided in RCW
82.32.050(1)(c).
(6) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Promoter" means a person who organizes, operates, or sponsors
a special event and who contracts with vendors for participation in the
special event.
(b) "Special event" means an entertainment, amusement,
recreational, educational, or marketing event, whether held on a
regular or irregular basis, at which more than one vendor makes or
solicits retail sales of tangible personal property or services. The
term includes, but is not limited to: Auto shows, recreational vehicle
shows, boat shows, home shows, garden shows, hunting and fishing shows,
stamp shows, comic book shows, sports memorabilia shows, craft shows,
art shows, antique shows, flea markets, exhibitions, festivals,
concerts, swap meets, bazaars, carnivals, athletic contests, circuses,
fairs, or other similar activities. "Special event" does not include
an event that is organized for the exclusive benefit of any nonprofit
organization as defined in RCW 82.04.3651. An event is organized for
the exclusive benefit of a nonprofit organization if all of the gross
proceeds of retail sales of all vendors at the event inure to the
benefit of the nonprofit organization on whose behalf the event is
being held. "Special event" does not include athletic contests that
involve competition between teams, when such competition consists of
more than five contests in a calendar year by at least one team at the
same facility or site.
(c) "Vendor" means a person who, at a special event, makes or
solicits retail sales of tangible personal property or services.
"Vendor" does not include any person who is not required to obtain a
certificate of registration with the department under RCW 82.32.030.
(7) "Good faith effort to comply" and "good faith effort to obtain"
may be shown by, but is not limited to, circumstances where a promoter:
(a) Includes a statement on all written contracts with its vendors
that a valid registration certificate number issued by the department
of revenue is required for participation in the special event and
requires vendors to indicate their registration certificate number on
these contracts; and
(b) Provides the department with a list of vendors and their
associated registration certificate numbers as provided in subsection
(2)(b) of this section.
(8) This section does not apply to:
(a) A special event whose promoter does not charge more than two
hundred dollars for a vendor to participate in a special event;
(b) A special event whose promoter charges a percentage of sales
instead of, or in addition to, a flat charge for a vendor to
participate in a special event if the promoter, in good faith, believes
that no vendor will pay more than two hundred dollars to participate in
the special event; or
(c) A person who does not organize, operate, or sponsor a special
event, but only provides a venue, supplies, furnishings, fixtures,
equipment, or services to a promoter of a special event.

Sec. 25 RCW 82.32.105 and 1998 c 304 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the department of revenue finds that the payment by a
taxpayer of a tax less than that properly due or the failure of a
taxpayer to pay any tax by the due date was the result of circumstances
beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department of revenue shall
waive or cancel any penalties imposed under this chapter with respect
to such tax.
(2) The department shall waive or cancel the penalty imposed under
RCW 82.32.090(1) when the circumstances under which the delinquency
occurred do not qualify for waiver or cancellation under subsection (1)
of this section if:
(a) The taxpayer requests the waiver for a tax return required to
be filed under RCW 82.32.045, 82.14B.061, 82.23B.020, 82.27.060,
82.29A.050, 82.72.050, or 84.33.086; and
(b) The taxpayer has timely filed and remitted payment on all tax
returns due for that tax program for a period of twenty-four months
immediately preceding the period covered by the return for which the
waiver is being requested.
(3) The department shall waive or cancel interest imposed under
this chapter if:
(a) The failure to timely pay the tax was the direct result of
written instructions given the taxpayer by the department; or
(b) The extension of a due date for payment of an assessment of
deficiency was not at the request of the taxpayer and was for the sole
convenience of the department.
(4) The department of revenue shall adopt rules for the waiver or
cancellation of penalties and interest imposed by this chapter.

Sec. 26 RCW 82.32.140 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 13 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Whenever any taxpayer quits business, or sells out, exchanges,
or otherwise disposes of more than fifty percent of the fair market
value of either its tangible or intangible assets, any tax payable
hereunder shall become immediately due and payable, and such taxpayer
shall, within ten days thereafter, make a return and pay the tax due.
For the purposes of this section, "tangible or intangible assets" do
not include any interest in real property.
(2) Any person who becomes a successor shall withhold from the
purchase price a sum sufficient to pay any tax due from the taxpayer
until such time as the taxpayer shall produce a receipt from the
department of revenue showing payment in full of any tax due or a
certificate that no tax is due. If any tax is not paid by the taxpayer
within ten days from the date of such sale, exchange, or disposal, the
successor shall become liable for the payment of the full amount of
tax. If the fair market value of the assets acquired by a successor is
less than fifty thousand dollars, the successor's liability for payment
of the unpaid tax is limited to the fair market value of the assets
acquired from the taxpayer. The burden of establishing the fair market
value of the assets acquired is on the successor.
(3) The payment of any tax by a successor shall, to the extent
thereof, be deemed a payment upon the purchase price; and if such
payment is greater in amount than the purchase price the amount of the
difference shall become a debt due the successor from the taxpayer.
(4) No successor shall be liable for any tax due from the person
from whom the successor has acquired ((a business or stock of goods))
more than fifty percent of the fair market value of either the person's
tangible or intangible assets if the successor gives written notice to
the department of revenue of such acquisition and no assessment is
issued by the department of revenue within six months of receipt of
such notice against the former operator of the business and a copy
thereof mailed to the successor.

Sec. 27 RCW 82.32.330 and 2000 c 173 s 1 and 2000 c 106 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Disclose" means to make known to any person in any manner
whatever a return or tax information;
(b) "Return" means a tax or information return or claim for refund
required by, or provided for or permitted under, the laws of this state
which is filed with the department of revenue by, on behalf of, or with
respect to a person, and any amendment or supplement thereto, including
supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are supplemental to,
or part of, the return so filed;
(c) "Tax information" means (i) a taxpayer's identity, (ii) the
nature, source, or amount of the taxpayer's income, payments, receipts,
deductions, exemptions, credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax
liability deficiencies, overassessments, or tax payments, whether taken
from the taxpayer's books and records or any other source, (iii)
whether the taxpayer's return was, is being, or will be examined or
subject to other investigation or processing, (iv) a part of a written
determination that is not designated as a precedent and disclosed
pursuant to RCW 82.32.410, or a background file document relating to a
written determination, and (v) other data received by, recorded by,
prepared by, furnished to, or collected by the department of revenue
with respect to the determination of the existence, or possible
existence, of liability, or the amount thereof, of a person under the
laws of this state for a tax, penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or
other imposition, or offense: PROVIDED, That data, material, or
documents that do not disclose information related to a specific or
identifiable taxpayer do not constitute tax information under this
section. Except as provided by RCW 82.32.410, nothing in this chapter
shall require any person possessing data, material, or documents made
confidential and privileged by this section to delete information from
such data, material, or documents so as to permit its disclosure;
(d) "State agency" means every Washington state office, department,
division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency;
(e) "Taxpayer identity" means the taxpayer's name, address,
telephone number, registration number, or any combination thereof, or
any other information disclosing the identity of the taxpayer; and
(f) "Department" means the department of revenue or its officer,
agent, employee, or representative.
(2) Returns and tax information shall be confidential and
privileged, and except as authorized by this section, neither the
department of revenue nor any other person may disclose any return or
tax information.
(3) The foregoing, however, shall not prohibit the department of
revenue from:
(a) Disclosing such return or tax information in a civil or
criminal judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:
(i) In respect of any tax imposed under the laws of this state if
the taxpayer or its officer or other person liable under Title 82 RCW
is a party in the proceeding; or
(ii) In which the taxpayer about whom such return or tax
information is sought and another state agency are adverse parties in
the proceeding;
(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the
director shall prescribe by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW, such return or tax information regarding a taxpayer to such
taxpayer or to such person or persons as that taxpayer may designate in
a request for, or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person,
at the taxpayer's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a
request for information or assistance made by the taxpayer to such
other person: PROVIDED, That tax information not received from the
taxpayer shall not be so disclosed if the director determines that such
disclosure would compromise any investigation or litigation by any
federal, state, or local government agency in connection with the civil
or criminal liability of the taxpayer or another person, or that such
disclosure would identify a confidential informant, or that such
disclosure is contrary to any agreement entered into by the department
that provides for the reciprocal exchange of information with other
government agencies which agreement requires confidentiality with
respect to such information unless such information is required to be
disclosed to the taxpayer by the order of any court;
(c) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been either issued or filed and remains outstanding for
a period of at least ten working days. The department shall not be
required to disclose any information under this subsection if a
taxpayer: (i) Has been issued a tax assessment; (ii) has been issued
a warrant that has not been filed; and (iii) has entered a deferred
payment arrangement with the department of revenue and is making
payments upon such deficiency that will fully satisfy the indebtedness
within twelve months;
(d) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been filed with a court of record and remains
outstanding;
(e) Publishing statistics so classified as to prevent the
identification of particular returns or reports or items thereof;
(f) Disclosing such return or tax information, for official
purposes only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state
agency, or to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing
with matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of
industry or the professions;
(g) Permitting the department of revenue's records to be audited
and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and
employees;
(h) Disclosing any such return or tax information to a peace
officer as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for
official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a
search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure
is for the purpose of criminal tax enforcement. A peace officer or
county prosecuting attorney who receives the return or tax information
may disclose that return or tax information only for use in the
investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the court
proceeding for which the return or tax information originally was
sought;
(i) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the proper
officer of the internal revenue service of the United States, the
Canadian government or provincial governments of Canada, or to the
proper officer of the tax department of any state or city or town or
county, for official purposes, but only if the statutes of the United
States, Canada or its provincial governments, or of such other state or
city or town or county, as the case may be, grants substantially
similar privileges to the proper officers of this state;
(j) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the Department
of Justice, the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms of the
Department of the Treasury, the Department of Defense, the Immigration
and Customs Enforcement and the Customs and Border Protection agencies
of the United States ((Customs Service)) Department of Homeland
Security, the Coast Guard of the United States, and the United States
Department of Transportation, or any authorized representative thereof,
for official purposes;
(k) Publishing or otherwise disclosing the text of a written
determination designated by the director as a precedent pursuant to RCW
82.32.410;
(l) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other tax
information, the taxpayer name, entity type, business address, mailing
address, revenue tax registration numbers, North American industry
classification system or standard industrial classification code of a
taxpayer, and the dates of opening and closing of business. This
subsection shall not be construed as giving authority to the department
to give, sell, or provide access to any list of taxpayers for any
commercial purpose;
(m) Disclosing such return or tax information that is also
maintained by another Washington state or local governmental agency as
a public record available for inspection and copying under the
provisions of chapter 42.17 RCW or is a document maintained by a court
of record not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;
(n) Disclosing such return or tax information to the United States
department of agriculture for the limited purpose of investigating food
stamp fraud by retailers;
(o) Disclosing to a financial institution, escrow company, or title
company, in connection with specific real property that is the subject
of a real estate transaction, current amounts due the department for a
filed tax warrant, judgment, or lien against the real property; or
(p) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted
liability as a successor under RCW 82.32.140 return or tax information
pertaining to the specific business of the taxpayer to which the person
has succeeded.
(4)(a) The department may disclose return or taxpayer information
to a person under investigation or during any court or administrative
proceeding against a person under investigation as provided in this
subsection (4). The disclosure must be in connection with the
department's official duties relating to an audit, collection activity,
or a civil or criminal investigation. The disclosure may occur only
when the person under investigation and the person in possession of
data, materials, or documents are parties to the return or tax
information to be disclosed. The department may disclose return or tax
information such as invoices, contracts, bills, statements, resale or
exemption certificates, or checks. However, the department may not
disclose general ledgers, sales or cash receipt journals, check
registers, accounts receivable/payable ledgers, general journals,
financial statements, expert's workpapers, income tax returns, state
tax returns, tax return workpapers, or other similar data, materials,
or documents.
(b) Before disclosure of any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4), the department shall, through written
correspondence, inform the person in possession of the data, materials,
or documents to be disclosed. The correspondence shall clearly
identify the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The
department may not disclose any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4) until the time period allowed in (c) of this
subsection has expired or until the court has ruled on any challenge
brought under (c) of this subsection.
(c) The person in possession of the data, materials, or documents
to be disclosed by the department has twenty days from the receipt of
the written request required under (b) of this subsection to petition
the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides for
injunctive relief. The court shall limit or deny the request of the
department if the court determines that:
(i) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure are
cumulative or duplicative, or are obtainable from some other source
that is more convenient, less burdensome, or less expensive;
(ii) The production of the data, materials, or documents sought
would be unduly burdensome or expensive, taking into account the needs
of the department, the amount in controversy, limitations on the
petitioner's resources, and the importance of the issues at stake; or
(iii) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure
contain trade secret information that, if disclosed, could harm the
petitioner.
(d) The department shall reimburse reasonable expenses for the
production of data, materials, or documents incurred by the person in
possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed.
(e) Requesting information under (b) of this subsection that may
indicate that a taxpayer is under investigation does not constitute a
disclosure of tax return or tax information under this section.
(5) Any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information
in the course of his or her employment with the department of revenue
and any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information as
provided under subsection (3)(f), (g), (h), (i), (j), or (n) of this
section, who discloses any such return or tax information to another
person not entitled to knowledge of such return or tax information
under the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If
the person guilty of such violation is an officer or employee of the
state, such person shall forfeit such office or employment and shall be
incapable of holding any public office or employment in this state for
a period of two years thereafter.

Sec. 28 RCW 82.32.520 and 2004 c 153 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for the defined telecommunications services listed in
this section, the sale of telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065
sold on a call-by-call basis shall be sourced to (a) each level of
taxing jurisdiction where the call originates and terminates in that
jurisdiction or (b) each level of taxing jurisdiction where the call
either originates or terminates and in which the service address is
also located.
(2) Except for the defined telecommunications services listed in
this section, a sale of telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065
sold on a basis other than a call-by-call basis, is sourced to the
customer's place of primary use.
(3) The sales of telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065 that
are listed in this section shall be sourced to each level of taxing
jurisdiction as follows:
(a) A sale of mobile telecommunications services, other than air-ground radiotelephone service and prepaid calling service, is sourced
to the customer's place of primary use as required by RCW 82.08.066.
(b) A sale of postpaid calling service is sourced to the
origination point of the telecommunications signal as first identified
by either (i) the seller's telecommunications system, or (ii)
information received by the seller from its service provider, where the
system used to transport such signals is not that of the seller.
(c) A sale of prepaid calling service is sourced as follows:
(i) When a prepaid calling service is received by the purchaser at
a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to that business
location;
(ii) When a prepaid calling service is not received by the
purchaser at a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to
the location where receipt by the purchaser or the purchaser's donee,
designated as such by the purchaser, occurs, including the location
indicated by instructions for delivery to the purchaser or donee, known
to the seller;
(iii) When (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection do not apply, the
sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the
purchaser that is available from the business records of the seller
that are maintained in the ordinary course of the seller's business
when use of this address does not constitute bad faith;
(iv) When (c)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection do not apply,
the sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the
purchaser obtained during the consummation of the sale, including the
address of a purchaser's payment instrument, if no other address is
available, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith;
(v) When (c)(i), (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this subsection do not
apply, including the circumstance where the seller is without
sufficient information to apply those provisions, then the location
shall be determined by the address from which tangible personal
property was shipped, from which the digital good or the computer
software delivered electronically was first available for transmission
by the seller, or from which the service defined as a retail sale under
RCW 82.04.050 was provided, disregarding for these purposes any
location that merely provided the digital transfer of the product sold;
(vi) In the case of a sale of mobile telecommunications service
that is a prepaid telecommunications service, (c)(v) of this subsection
shall include as an option the location associated with the mobile
telephone number.
(d) A sale of a private communication service is sourced as
follows:
(i) Service for a separate charge related to a customer channel
termination point is sourced to each level of jurisdiction in which
such customer channel termination point is located.
(ii) Service where all customer termination points are located
entirely within one jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction is sourced
in such jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination points
are located.
(iii) Service for segments of a channel between two customer
channel termination points located in different jurisdictions and which
segment of channel are separately charged is sourced fifty percent in
each level of jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination
points are located.
(iv) Service for segments of a channel located in more than one
jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction and which segments are not
separately billed is sourced in each jurisdiction based on the
percentage determined by dividing the number of customer channel
termination points in the jurisdiction by the total number of customer
channel termination points.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
chapter.
(a) "Air-ground radiotelephone service" means air-ground radio
service, as defined in 47 C.F.R. Sec. 22.99, as amended or renumbered
as of January 1, 2003, in which common carriers are authorized to offer
and provide radio telecommunications service for hire to subscribers in
aircraft.
(b) "Call-by-call basis" means any method of charging for
telecommunications services where the price is measured by individual
calls.
(c) "Communications channel" means a physical or virtual path of
communications over which signals are transmitted between or among
customer channel termination points.
(d) "Customer" means the person or entity that contracts with the
seller of telecommunications services. If the end user of
telecommunications services is not the contracting party, the end user
of the telecommunications service is the customer of the
telecommunications service. "Customer" does not include a reseller of
telecommunications service or for mobile telecommunications service of
a serving carrier under an agreement to serve the customer outside the
home service provider's licensed service area.
(e) "Customer channel termination point" means the location where
the customer either inputs or receives the communications.
(f) "End user" means the person who uses the telecommunications
service. In the case of an entity, the term end user means the
individual who uses the service on behalf of the entity.
(g) "Home service provider" means the same as that term is defined
in RCW 82.04.065.
(h) "Mobile telecommunications service" means the same as that term
is defined in RCW 82.04.065.
(i) "Place of primary use" means the street address representative
of where the customer's use of the telecommunications service primarily
occurs, which must be the residential street address or the primary
business street address of the customer. In the case of mobile
telecommunications services, "place of primary use" must be within the
licensed service area of the home service provider.
(j) "Postpaid calling service" means the telecommunications service
obtained by making a payment on a call-by-call basis either through the
use of a credit card or payment mechanism such as a bank card, travel
card, credit card, or debit card, or by charge made to ((which)) a
telephone number that is not associated with the origination or
termination of the telecommunications service. A postpaid calling
service includes a telecommunications service that would be a prepaid
calling service except it is not exclusively a telecommunications
service.
(k) "Prepaid calling service" means the right to access exclusively
telecommunications services, which must be paid for in advance and
which enables the origination of calls using an access number and/or
authorization code, whether manually or electronically dialed, and that
is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines
with use in a known amount.
(l) "Private communication service" means a telecommunications
service that entitles the customer to exclusive or priority use of a
communications channel or group of channels between or among
termination points, regardless of the manner in which such channel or
channels are connected, and includes switching capacity, extension
lines, stations, and any other associated services that are provided in
connection with the use of such channel or channels.
(m) "Service address" means:
(i) The location of the telecommunications equipment to which a
customer's call is charged and from which the call originates or
terminates, regardless of where the call is billed or paid;
(ii) If the location in (m)(i) of this subsection is not known, the
origination point of the signal of the telecommunications services
first identified by either the seller's telecommunications system or in
information received by the seller from its service provider, where the
system used to transport such signals is not that of the seller;
(iii) If the locations in (m)(i) and (ii) of this subsection are
not known, the location of the customer's place of primary use.

Sec. 29 RCW 82.32.555 and 2004 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a taxing jurisdiction does not subject some charges for
telephone services to taxation, but these charges are aggregated with
and not separately stated from charges that are subject to taxation,
then the charges for nontaxable telephone services may be subject to
taxation unless the telephone service ((or)) provider can reasonably
identify charges not subject to the tax, charge, or fee from its books
and records that are kept in the regular course of business and for
purposes other than merely allocating the sales price of an aggregated
charge to the individually aggregated items.

Sec. 30 RCW 82.45.150 and 1996 c 149 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
All of chapter 82.32 RCW, except RCW 82.32.030, 82.32.050,
82.32.140, 82.32.270, and 82.32.090 (1) and (((8))) (9), applies to the
tax imposed by this chapter, in addition to any other provisions of law
for the payment and enforcement of the tax imposed by this chapter.
The department of revenue shall by rule provide for the effective
administration of this chapter. The rules shall prescribe and furnish
a real estate excise tax affidavit form verified by both the seller and
the buyer, or agents of each, to be used by each county, or the
department, as the case may be, in the collection of the tax imposed by
this chapter, except that an affidavit given in connection with grant
of an easement or right of way to a gas, electrical, or
telecommunications company, as defined in RCW 80.04.010, or to a public
utility district or cooperative that distributes electricity, need be
verified only on behalf of the company, district, or cooperative. The
department of revenue shall annually conduct audits of transactions and
affidavits filed under this chapter.

Sec. 31 2004 c 153 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) If a court of competent jurisdiction enters a final judgment on
the merits that is based on federal or state law, is no longer subject
to appeal, and substantially limits or impairs the essential elements
of P.L. 106-252, 4 U.S.C. Secs. 116 through 126, or chapter 67, Laws of
2002, then chapter 67, Laws of 2002 is null and void in its entirety.
(2) If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
section 502, chapter 168, Laws of 2003 is null and void.
(3) If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
section 410, chapter 153, Laws of 2004 is null and void.
(4) If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
sections 8 and 20, chapter ... (this act), Laws of 2005 (sections 8 and
20 of this act) are null and void.

--- END ---