BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that under existing
landlord tenant laws, persons who are renting or leasing properties, as
well as their agencies and neighbors of the properties, do not have
means to immediately evict tenants involved in criminal actions.
The legislature further finds that with the absence of an immediate
legal means to remove disruptive tenants, the property owners, agents,
and neighbors suffer significant losses in the property and quiet
enjoyment of their residence. These losses continue when disruptive
tenants are allowed to remain on the premises pending court action,
under existing unlawful detainer law.
The legislature intends to protect property owners, agents, and
neighbors from further mental anguish, threats, physical harm, and
financial loss by providing for the immediate eviction of persons
committing criminal actions or unlawful civil disruptions based upon
the findings of fact and the legal conclusions of a court of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A landlord or neighbor petitioner, with supporting evidence and
documentation, may request a court having jurisdiction to authorize the
immediate eviction of a tenant, and may move for a restraining order or
permanent injunction against a tenant pursuant to chapter 7.40 RCW, if
the tenant has:
(a) Misbranded drugs by misleading representation under RCW
69.04.530;
(b) Possessed, manufactured, or delivered drugs in violation of the
uniform controlled substances act, chapter 69.50 RCW;
(c) Committed a violation involving methamphetamine under RCW
69.50.401 or 69.50.440;
(d) Committed arson, reckless burning, and/or malicious mischief
under chapter 9A.48 RCW;
(e) Committed acts of domestic violence as defined in RCW
26.50.010;
(f) Committed malicious placement of an explosive, malicious
explosion of a substance, and/or threatened to bomb or injure property
under RCW 70.74.270, 70.74.272, 70.74.275, 70.74.280, or 9.61.160;
(g) Committed a public disturbance under RCW 9A.84.010 or
9A.84.020;
(h) Committed assault under chapter 9A.36 RCW;
(i) Committed homicide as defined under RCW 9A.32.010; or
(j) Committed a felony sexual offense as defined under chapter
9A.44 RCW.
(2)(a) Following a request under subsection (1) of this section, a
court shall convene a hearing attended by the tenant and petitioner to
determine whether the tenant should be immediately removed from the
property, and in the case of a restraining order or permanent
injunction, whether the tenant should be allowed to return to the
property. The court may request attendance of a social services agency
for temporary relocation assistance. The court may issue a writ of
restitution for the eviction of the tenant.
(b) The judge presiding over the hearing under (a) of this
subsection must make an eviction determination based upon findings of
fact and conclusions of law that is supported by a preponderance of
evidence establishing that the tenant poses either a safety or health
threat to the tenant's neighbors, cotenants, landowner, landowner's
property, or to the public welfare which outweighs the tenant's
interest in remaining at the premises. In the event a health or safety
threat is found to exist, the tenant will not be entitled to return to
the premises except as provided in subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(c) Persons giving false statements or testimony may be prosecuted
by law under RCW 9.72.090 and 5.28.060.
(3)(a) Upon eviction, the tenant as well as all persons and animals
living with the tenant must be permanently removed from the premises,
except that a cotenant shall not be removed or evicted if:
(i) The cotenant is a victim of any of the criminal or civil
illegal activities under subsection (1) of this section that is the
basis for the proceeding; or
(ii) The cotenant did not know of and could not reasonably have
known of, or could not reasonably have prevented the commission of the
act that is the basis for the proceeding.
(b) Personal property must be retrieved within three days,
accompanied by a sheriff or sheriff's deputy. If the third day should
fall upon a weekend or holiday recognized by the court of jurisdiction,
the property is not required to be retrieved until the next business
day.
(4)(a) The eviction and writ of restitution must take place on the
same day signed by the court. If scheduling does not permit for issue
of the writ of eviction and writ of restitution the same day, the writs
must be served by noon the following day.
(b) To enforce the court-ordered eviction, the petitioner must be
accompanied by the sheriff.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to reduce the
requirements of the landlord or owner having to post a bond under RCW
59.12.090.
(6) A petitioner proceeding under this section must comply with the
service of notice requirements in RCW 59.12.040 and all requirements
concerning the complaint and summons under RCW 59.12.070.
(7) All requirements pertaining to unlawful detainer actions in
chapter 59.12 RCW are applicable to this section and RCW 59.18.130,
with the exceptions of RCW 59.12.100, 59.12.110, 59.12.130, 59.12.140,
59.12.150, 59.12.160, 59.12.170, 59.12.190, 59.12.210, and 59.12.220.
(8) A neighbor petitioner must comply with the same requirements
applicable to a landlord or owner under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 59.18.130 and 1998 c 276 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each tenant shall pay the rental amount at such times and in such
amounts as provided for in the rental agreement or as otherwise
provided by law and comply with all obligations imposed upon tenants by
applicable provisions of all municipal, county, and state codes,
statutes, ordinances, and regulations, and in addition shall:
(1) Keep that part of the premises which he or she occupies and
uses as clean and sanitary as the conditions of the premises permit;
(2) Properly dispose from his or her dwelling unit all rubbish,
garbage, and other organic or flammable waste, in a clean and sanitary
manner at reasonable and regular intervals, and assume all costs of
extermination and fumigation for infestation caused by the tenant;
(3) Properly use and operate all electrical, gas, heating, plumbing
and other fixtures and appliances supplied by the landlord;
(4) Not intentionally or negligently destroy, deface, damage,
impair, or remove any part of the structure or dwelling, with the
appurtenances thereto, including the facilities, equipment, furniture,
furnishings, and appliances, or permit any member of his or her family,
invitee, licensee, or any person acting under his or her control to do
so. Violations may be prosecuted under chapter 9A.48 RCW if the
destruction is intentional and malicious;
(5) Not permit a nuisance or common waste;
(6) Not engage in drug-related activity at the rental premises, or
allow a subtenant, sublessee, resident, or anyone else to engage in
drug-related activity at the rental premises with the knowledge or
consent of the tenant. "Drug-related activity" means that activity
which constitutes a violation of chapter 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW;
(7) Maintain the smoke detection device in accordance with the
manufacturer's recommendations, including the replacement of batteries
where required for the proper operation of the smoke detection device,
as required in RCW 48.48.140(3);
(8) Not engage in any activity at the rental premises that is:
(a) Imminently hazardous to the physical safety of other persons on
the premises; and
(b)(i) Entails physical assaults upon another person which result
in an arrest; or
(ii) Entails the unlawful use of a firearm or other deadly weapon
as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 which results in an arrest, including
threatening another tenant or the landlord with a firearm or other
deadly weapon under RCW 59.18.352. Nothing in this subsection (8)
shall authorize the termination of tenancy and eviction of the victim
of a physical assault or the victim of the use or threatened use of a
firearm or other deadly weapon;
(9) Not engage in any gang-related activity at the premises, as
defined in RCW 59.18.030, or allow another to engage in such activity
at the premises, that renders people in at least two or more dwelling
units or residences insecure in life or the use of property or that
injures or endangers the safety or health of people in at least two or
more dwelling units or residences. In determining whether a tenant is
engaged in gang-related activity, a court should consider the totality
of the circumstances, including factors such as whether there have been
a significant number of complaints to the landlord about the tenant's
activities at the property, damages done by the tenant to the property,
including the property of other tenants or neighbors, harassment or
threats made by the tenant to other tenants or neighbors that have been
reported to law enforcement agencies, any police incident reports
involving the tenant, and the tenant's criminal history; ((and))
(10) Upon termination and vacation, restore the premises to their
initial condition except for reasonable wear and tear or conditions
caused by failure of the landlord to comply with his or her obligations
under this chapter: PROVIDED, That the tenant shall not be charged for
normal cleaning if he or she has paid a nonrefundable cleaning fee; and
(11) Not engage in any prohibited activities, at the premises, as
provided in section 2(1) of this act. Section 2(3)(a) of this act
applies to this subsection.

Sec. 4 RCW 59.12.030 and 1998 c 276 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
A tenant of real property for a term less than life is guilty of
unlawful detainer either:
(1) When he or she holds over or continues in possession, in person
or by subtenant, of the property or any part thereof after the
expiration of the term for which it is let to him or her. When real
property is leased for a specified term or period by express or implied
contract, whether written or oral, the tenancy shall be terminated
without notice at the expiration of the specified term or period;
(2) When he or she, having leased property for an indefinite time
with monthly or other periodic rent reserved, continues in possession
thereof, in person or by subtenant, after the end of any such month or
period, when the landlord, more than twenty days prior to the end of
such month or period, has served notice (in manner in RCW 59.12.040
provided) requiring him or her to quit the premises at the expiration
of such month or period;
(3) When he or she continues in possession in person or by
subtenant after a default in the payment of rent, and after notice in
writing requiring in the alternative the payment of the rent or the
surrender of the detained premises, served (in manner in RCW 59.12.040
provided) in behalf of the person entitled to the rent upon the person
owing it, has remained uncomplied with for the period of three days
after service thereof. The notice may be served at any time after the
rent becomes due;
(4) When he or she continues in possession in person or by
subtenant after a neglect or failure to keep or perform any other
condition or covenant of the lease or agreement under which the
property is held, including any covenant not to assign or sublet, than
one for the payment of rent, and after notice in writing requiring in
the alternative the performance of such condition or covenant or the
surrender of the property, served (in manner in RCW 59.12.040 provided)
upon him or her, and if there is a subtenant in actual possession of
the premises, also upon such subtenant, shall remain uncomplied with
for ten days after service thereof. Within ten days after the service
of such notice the tenant, or any subtenant in actual occupation of the
premises, or any mortgagee of the term, or other person interested in
its continuance, may perform such condition or covenant and thereby
save the lease from such forfeiture;
(5) When he or she commits or permits waste upon the demised
premises, or when he or she sets up or carries on thereon any unlawful
business, or when he or she erects, suffers, permits, or maintains on
or about the premises any nuisance, and remains in possession after the
service (in manner in RCW 59.12.040 provided) upon him or her of three
days' notice to quit;
(6) A person who, without the permission of the owner and without
having color of title thereto, enters upon land of another and who
fails or refuses to remove therefrom after three days' notice, in
writing and served upon him or her in the manner provided in RCW
59.12.040. Such person may also be subject to the criminal provisions
of chapter 9A.52 RCW; ((or))
(7) When he or she commits or permits any gang-related activity at
the premises as prohibited by RCW 59.18.130; or
(8) When he or she commits or permits any of the prohibited
activities at the premises as provided in section 2(1) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
A writ of restitution must be issued as provided in section 2(4)(a)
of this act. The provisions of chapter 59.12 RCW, with the exception
of RCW 59.12.100 and 59.12.110, apply to this section.

--- END ---