BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the trust water
rights program is an important tool to meet the state's current and
future needs for water, both instream and out-of-stream. It is the
intent of this act to enhance the effectiveness of the trust water
rights program by clarifying and consolidating procedures for
establishing trust water rights.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.42.020 and 1991 c 347 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Impairment" means detriment or injury to existing rights as
that phrase is used in RCW 90.03.380(1).
(3) "Net water savings" means the amount of water that is
determined to be conserved and usable ((within)) from a specified
((stream reach or reaches)) water body for other purposes without
causing impairment ((or detriment)) to existing water rights ((existing
at the time that a water conservation project is undertaken, reducing
the ability to deliver water, or reducing the supply of water that
otherwise would have been available to other existing water uses)).
(((3))) (4) "Trust water program" means the program established
under this chapter under which the department holds or manages trust
water rights.
(5) "Trust water right" means any water right ((acquired))
transferred to or managed by the state under this chapter ((for
management in)) and the state's trust water rights program.
(((4) "Pilot planning areas" means the geographic areas designated
under RCW 90.54.045(2).
(5))) (6) "Water conservation project" means any project or program
that achieves physical or operational improvements that provide for
increased water use efficiency in existing systems of diversion,
conveyance, application, or use of water under water rights existing on
July 28, 1991.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to acquire or manage existing
water rights and to establish such water rights as trust water rights
as provided under this chapter. A trust water right may be established
on a temporary or permanent basis. A trust water right may be
established only from an existing water right or portion thereof, to
the extent the right has been applied to beneficial use, and only by
appropriate means other than condemnation.
(2) All trust water rights shall be held in trust by the department
under the trust water program and each trust water right shall be
managed for purposes for which the trust water right is transferred to
the trust water program. Trust water rights may be held, managed, or
authorized for use by the department for any beneficial use described
in RCW 90.54.020(1). Trust water rights also may be managed for
mitigation purposes, and for the reservation of water rights for future
needs as provided under RCW 90.54.050.
(3) The department shall manage trust water rights in accordance
with the terms under which the trust water right was established,
including any agreement between the parties executed at the time the
trust water right was established, or as subsequently modified by
mutual agreement of the parties.
(4) The department may make arrangements, including entry into
contracts with other persons or entities as appropriate, to ensure that
trust water rights established in accordance with this chapter can be
exercised to the fullest possible extent consistent with applicable
state laws.
(5) The department shall cooperate fully with the United States in
the implementation of this chapter. Trust water rights established
through expenditure of funds provided by the United States shall be
treated in the same manner as trust water rights established through
the expenditure of state funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To establish a permanent trust water right, the water right
must be conveyed to the state of Washington. Title to a water right
transferred to the trust water rights program on a temporary basis may
remain the property of the water right holder while managed by the
department in the trust water rights program, consistent with the terms
established by a donor under subsection (3) of this section and with
the terms of any mutual agreement between the water right holder and
the department developed under section 3(3) of this act. Upon
expiration of the period of time for which a temporary trust water
right is established, the water right holder may resume use of the
original water right with its original priority date, place of use,
purpose of use, and point of diversion or withdrawal.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection or RCW
90.03.380(4), RCW 90.03.380 applies to trust water right transfers
under this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 90.03.380, the department
shall establish expedited procedures for notice, opportunity for
comment, and review for proposals to establish temporary trust water
rights.
(3) If a water right holder chooses to donate all or a portion of
that water right to the trust water rights program to assist in
providing instream flows on a temporary or permanent basis, the
department may accept the donation on such terms as the water right
holder may prescribe as long as the donation satisfies the applicable
requirements of this chapter and other provisions of state law, and the
terms prescribed are relevant and material to protecting any interest
in the water right retained by the donor.
(4) Where the state establishes a trust water right from a portion
of an existing water right, only the portion of the right to be placed
in the trust water rights program is subject to this chapter.
(5) A trust water right established by the department through
funding for a water conservation project may be established only for
the period of time during which the conservation project is in effect.
Before the expenditure of state funds for a water conservation project,
the state and the water right holder must agree on the terms and
duration of the trust water right transfer as a result of the
conservation project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
No state funds may be expended to acquire trust water rights by the
state under this chapter unless specifically appropriated for this
purpose by the legislature. Before expending state or federal funds
for a trust water right, the department shall exercise appropriate due
diligence to ensure the validity and extent of the water right or
portion thereof for which the funds will be expended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
A water right conveyed to the trust water rights program as a
donation that is expressly conditioned to limit its use to instream
purposes must be managed by the department for public purposes to
ensure that it qualifies as a donation that is deductible for federal
income taxation purposes for the person conveying the water right.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
The water right relinquishment provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through
90.14.230 do not apply to a trust water right as of the date the trust
water right is established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a water right or portion thereof is proposed to be
transferred to the department as a trust water right by an irrigation
district, evidence of the district's authority to represent the water
right holders must be submitted to the department.
(2) If a water right is appurtenant to land located within an
irrigation district, the department may not establish a trust water
right without the approval of the board of directors of the irrigation
district.

Sec. 9 RCW 90.42.100 and 2003 c 144 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is hereby authorized to use the trust water
rights program in the Yakima river basin for water banking purposes.
(2) Water banking may be used for one or more of the following
purposes:
(a) To authorize the use of trust water rights to mitigate for
water resource impacts, future water supply needs, or any beneficial
use under chapter 90.03, 90.44, or 90.54 RCW, consistent with any terms
and conditions established by the transferor, except that return flows
from water rights authorized in whole or in part for any purpose shall
remain available as part of the Yakima basin's total water supply
available and to satisfy existing rights for other downstream uses and
users;
(b) To document transfers of water rights to and from the trust
water rights program; and
(c) To provide a source of water rights the department can make
available to third parties on a temporary or permanent basis for any
beneficial use under chapter 90.03, 90.44, or 90.54 RCW, including the
issuance of new water rights that, in combination with water rights
held in the trust water rights program for water banking purposes,
would not decrease total water supply available in the Yakima basin.
(3) The department shall not use water banking to:
(a) Cause detriment or injury to existing rights;
(b) Issue temporary water rights or portions thereof for new
potable uses requiring an adequate and reliable water supply under RCW
19.27.097;
(c) Administer federal project water rights, including federal
storage rights; or
(d) Allow carryover of stored water from one water year to another
water year.
(4) For purposes of this section and RCW 90.42.135, "total water
supply available" shall be defined as provided in the 1945 consent
decree between the United States and water users in the Yakima river
basin, and consistent with later interpretation by state and federal
courts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 90.38.005 (Findings -- Purpose) and 1989 c 429 s 1;
(2) RCW 90.38.010 (Definitions) and 1989 c 429 s 2;
(3) RCW 90.38.020 (Acquisition or donation of trust water rights)
and 2002 c 329 s 7, 2001 c 237 s 28, & 1989 c 429 s 3;
(4) RCW 90.38.030 (Water conservation projects -- Contracts for
financial assistance) and 1989 c 429 s 4;
(5) RCW 90.38.040 (Trust water rights program) and 2001 c 237 s 29,
1994 c 264 s 90, & 1989 c 429 s 5;
(6) RCW 90.38.050 (Rules) and 1989 c 429 s 6;
(7) RCW 90.38.900 (Existing policies not replaced) and 1989 c 429
s 7;
(8) RCW 90.38.901 (Transfer of rights between irrigation districts
not intended) and 1989 c 429 s 8;
(9) RCW 90.38.902 (Existing rights not impaired) and 1989 c 429 s
9;
(10) RCW 90.42.010 (Findings -- Intent) and 1998 c 245 s 173;
(11) RCW 90.42.030 (Contracts to finance water conservation
projects -- Public benefits -- Trust water rights) and 1993 c 98 s 2 & 1991
c 347 s 7;
(12) RCW 90.42.040 (Trust water rights program -- Water right
certificate -- Notice of creation or modification) and 2002 c 329 s 8,
2001 c 237 s 30, 1993 c 98 s 3, & 1991 c 347 s 8;
(13) RCW 90.42.050 (Guidelines governing trust water rights--Submission of guidelines to joint select committee) and 1991 c 347 s 9;
and
(14) RCW 90.42.080 (Trust water rights -- Acquisition, donation,
exercise, and transfer -- Appropriation required for expenditure of
funds) and 2002 c 329 s 9, 2001 c 237 s 31, 1993 c 98 s 4, & 1991 c 347
s 12.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---