BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I. DEFINITIONS
Sec. 101 RCW 82.32.020 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 13 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) The meaning attributed in chapters 82.01 through 82.27 RCW to
the words and phrases "tax year," "taxable year," "person," "company,"
"gross proceeds of sales," "gross income of the business," "business,"
"engaging in business," "successor," "gross operating revenue," "gross
income," "taxpayer," "retail sale," and "value of products" shall apply
equally to the provisions of this chapter.
(2) Unless the context requires otherwise, "agreement" means the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement.
(3) "Certified automated system" means software certified under the
agreement to calculate the tax imposed by each jurisdiction on a
transaction, determine the amount of tax to remit to the appropriate
state, and maintain a record of the transaction.
(4) "Certified service provider" means an agent certified under the
agreement to perform all of the seller's sales and use tax functions,
other than the seller's obligation to remit tax on its own purchases.
(5)(a) "Member state" means a state that:
(i) Has petitioned for membership in the agreement and submitted a
certificate of compliance; and
(ii) Prior to the effective date of the agreement, has been found
to be in substantial compliance with the requirements of the agreement
by an affirmative vote of three-fourths of the other petitioning
states; or
(iii) After the effective date of the agreement, has been found to
be in compliance with the agreement by a three-fourths vote of the
entire governing board of the agreement.
(b) Membership under (a)(ii) of this subsection is effective on the
first day of a calendar quarter at least sixty days after at least ten
states comprising at least twenty percent of the total population, as
determined by the 2000 federal census, of all states imposing a state
sales tax have petitioned for membership and have been found in
compliance with the agreement.
(c) Membership under (a)(iii) of this subsection is effective on
the state's proposed date of entry.
(6) "Model 1 seller" means a seller that has selected a certified
service provider as its agent to perform all the seller's sales and use
tax functions, other than the seller's obligation to remit tax on its
own purchases.
(7) "Model 2 seller" means a seller that has selected a certified
automated system to perform part of its sales and use tax functions,
but retains responsibility for remitting the tax.
(8) "Model 3 seller" means a seller that has sales in at least five
member states, has total annual sales revenue of at least five hundred
million dollars, has a proprietary system that calculates the amount of
tax due each jurisdiction, and has entered into a performance agreement
with the member states that establishes a tax performance standard for
the seller. As used in this subsection, a seller includes an
affiliated group of sellers using the same proprietary system.
(9) "Source" means the location in which the sale or use, of
tangible personal property or a service, subject to tax under chapter
82.08, 82.12, 82.14, or 82.14B RCW, is deemed to occur.

PART II. REGISTRATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A seller, by written agreement, may appoint a person to
represent the seller as its agent. The seller's agent has authority to
register the seller with the state. An agent may also be a certified
service provider, with authority to perform all the seller's sales and
use tax functions, except that the seller remains responsible for
remitting the tax on its own purchases.
(2) The seller or its agent must provide the state with a copy of
the written agreement upon request.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.32.030 and 1996 c 111 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
if any person engages in any business or performs any act upon which a
tax is imposed by the preceding chapters, he or she shall, under such
rules as the department of revenue shall prescribe, apply for and
obtain from the department a registration certificate. Such
registration certificate shall be personal and nontransferable and
shall be valid as long as the taxpayer continues in business and pays
the tax accrued to the state. In case business is transacted at two or
more separate places by one taxpayer, a separate registration
certificate for each place at which business is transacted with the
public shall be required. Each certificate shall be numbered and shall
show the name, residence, and place and character of business of the
taxpayer and such other information as the department of revenue deems
necessary and shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the place of
business for which it is issued. Where a place of business of the
taxpayer is changed, the taxpayer must return to the department the
existing certificate, and a new certificate will be issued for the new
place of business. No person required to be registered under this
section shall engage in any business taxable hereunder without first
being so registered. The department, by rule, may provide for the
issuance of certificates of registration to temporary places of
business.
(2) Unless the person is a dealer as defined in RCW 9.41.010,
registration under this section is not required if the following
conditions are met:
(a) A person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross
income of the business, from all business activities taxable under
chapter 82.04 RCW, is less than twelve thousand dollars per year;
(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities
taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than twelve thousand dollars
per year;
(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department
of revenue any other tax or fee which the department is authorized to
collect; and
(d) The person is not otherwise required to obtain a license
subject to the master application procedure provided in chapter 19.02
RCW.
(3) Persons who agree to collect and remit sales and use tax to the
department under the agreement, but are not required to register under
subsection (1) of this section, may register under subsection (1) of
this section or register through an on-line system authorized under the
agreement.

PART III. MONETARY ALLOWANCES AND VENDOR DISCOUNTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt by rule monetary allowances for
certified service providers, model 2 sellers, model 3 sellers, and
other sellers that are not model 1 or model 2 sellers. The department
may be guided by the provisions for monetary allowances adopted by the
governing board of the agreement to determine the amount of the
allowances and the conditions under which they are allowed. The
monetary allowance must be reasonable and provide adequate incentive
for certified service providers and sellers to collect and remit under
the agreement.
(2) For certified service providers, the monetary allowance may
include a base rate that applies to taxable transactions processed by
the certified service provider. Additionally, for a period not to
exceed twenty-four months following a seller's registration under RCW
82.32.030(3), the monetary allowance may include a percentage of tax
revenue generated by the seller.
(3) For model 2 sellers, the monetary allowance may include a base
rate or percentage of revenue generated by a seller registering under
RCW 82.32.030(3), but shall not exceed a period of twenty-four months.
(4) For model 3 sellers and all other sellers that are not model 1
sellers or model 2 sellers, the monetary allowance may include a
percentage of tax revenue generated by a seller registering under RCW
82.32.030(3), but shall not exceed a period of twenty-four months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department may adopt by rule vendor compensation for
sellers collecting and remitting sales and use taxes. The vendor
compensation may include a base rate or a percentage of tax revenue
collected by the seller, and may vary by type of seller. The
department may be guided by the findings of the cost of collection
study performed under the agreement, by cost of collection studies
performed by the department, and by vendor compensation provided by
other states, to determine reasonable vendor compensation for sellers
for the costs to collect and remit sales and use taxes.
(2) A seller shall not be entitled to vendor compensation while the
seller or its certified service provider, as defined in RCW 82.32.020,
receives a monetary allowance under section 301 of this act.

PART IV. AMNESTY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) No assessment for taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW, or related penalties or interest, may be made by the department
against a seller who:
(a) Within twelve months of the effective date of this state
becoming a member state of the agreement, registers to collect and
remit to the department the applicable taxes imposed under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW on sales made to buyers in this state in accordance
with the terms of the agreement, if the seller was not so registered in
this state in the twelve-month period preceding the effective date of
this state becoming a member state of the agreement; and
(b) Continues to be registered and continues to collect and remit
to the department the applicable taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW for a period of at least thirty-six months, absent the
seller's fraud or intentional misrepresentation of a material fact.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section preclude an
assessment for taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW for
sales made to buyers during the period the seller was not registered in
this state.
(3) The provisions of this section do not apply to any seller with
respect to:
(a) Any matter or matters for which the seller, before registering
to collect and remit the applicable taxes imposed under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW, received notice from the department of the commencement
of an audit and which audit is not yet finally resolved including any
related administrative and judicial processes;
(b) Taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW and collected
or remitted to the department by the seller; or
(c) That seller's liability for taxes imposed under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW in that seller's capacity as a buyer.
(4) The periods of limitation for making an assessment or
correction of an assessment prescribed in RCW 82.32.050(3) and
82.32.100(3) do not run during the thirty-six month period in
subsection (1)(b) of this section.

PART V. SOURCING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (5), (6), (7), and (8) of
this section, for purposes of collecting or paying sales or use taxes
to the appropriate jurisdictions, all sales at retail shall be sourced
in accordance with this subsection and subsections (2) through (4) of
this section.
(a) When tangible personal property or a service defined as a
retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 is received by the purchaser at a
business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to that business
location.
(b) When the tangible personal property or a service defined as a
retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 is not received by the purchaser at a
business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to the location
where receipt by the purchaser or the purchaser's donee, designated as
such by the purchaser, occurs, including the location indicated by
instructions for delivery to the purchaser or donee, known to the
seller.
(c) When (a) and (b) of this subsection do not apply, the sale is
sourced to the location indicated by an address for the purchaser that
is available from the business records of the seller that are
maintained in the ordinary course of the seller's business when use of
this address does not constitute bad faith.
(d) When (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection do not apply, the
sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the
purchaser obtained during the consummation of the sale, including the
address of a purchaser's payment instrument, if no other address is
available, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith.
(e) When (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection do not apply,
including the circumstance where the seller is without sufficient
information to apply those provisions, then the location shall be
determined by the address from which tangible personal property was
shipped, from which the digital good or the computer software delivered
electronically was first available for transmission by the seller, or
from which the service defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 was
provided, disregarding for these purposes any location that merely
provided the digital transfer of the product sold.
(2) The lease or rental of tangible personal property, other than
property identified in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, shall be
sourced as follows:
(a) For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic
payments, the first periodic payment is sourced the same as a retail
sale in accordance with subsection (1) of this section. Periodic
payments made subsequent to the first payment are sourced to the
primary property location for each period covered by the payment. The
primary property location shall be as indicated by an address for the
property provided by the lessee that is available to the lessor from
its records maintained in the ordinary course of business, when use of
this address does not constitute bad faith. The property location
shall not be altered by intermittent use at different locations, such
as use of business property that accompanies employees on business
trips and service calls.
(b) For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic
payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
(c) This subsection does not affect the imposition or computation
of sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump sum or
accelerated basis, or on the acquisition of property for lease.
(3) The lease or rental of motor vehicles, trailers, semitrailers,
or aircraft that do not qualify as transportation equipment shall be
sourced as follows:
(a) For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic
payments, each periodic payment is sourced to the primary property
location. The primary property location shall be as indicated by an
address for the property provided by the lessee that is available to
the lessor from its records maintained in the ordinary course of
business, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith. This
location shall not be altered by intermittent use at different
locations.
(b) For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic
payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
(c) This subsection does not affect the imposition or computation
of sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump sum or
accelerated basis, or on the acquisition of property for lease.
(4) The retail sale, including lease or rental, of transportation
equipment shall be sourced the same as a retail sale in accordance with
subsection (1) of this section.
(5) A purchaser that is a business and is not a holder of a direct
pay permit that knows at the time of purchase of a digital good,
computer software delivered electronically, or a service that the
digital good, computer software delivered electronically, or service
will be concurrently available for use in more than one jurisdiction
shall deliver to the seller in conjunction with its purchase a multiple
points of use exemption form disclosing this fact.
(a) Upon receipt of the multiple point of use exemption form, the
seller is relieved of all obligation to collect, pay, or remit the
applicable tax and the purchaser is obligated to collect, pay, or remit
the applicable tax.
(b) A purchaser delivering the multiple point of use exemption
form, or a direct pay permit in lieu of a multiple point of use
exemption form, may use any reasonable, but consistent and uniform,
method of apportionment that is supported by the purchaser's business
records as they exist at the time of the consummation of the sale.
(c) The multiple point of use exemption form shall remain in effect
for all future sales by the seller to the purchaser until it is revoked
in writing.
(6)(a) A purchaser of direct mail that is not a holder of a direct
pay permit shall provide to the seller in conjunction with the purchase
either a direct mail form or information that shows the jurisdictions
to which the direct mail is delivered to recipients.
(i) Upon receipt of the direct mail form, the seller is relieved of
all obligations to collect, pay, or remit the applicable tax and the
purchaser is obligated to pay or remit the applicable tax on a direct
pay basis. A direct mail form shall remain in effect for all future
sales of direct mail by the seller to the purchaser until it is revoked
in writing.
(ii) Upon receipt of information from the purchaser showing the
jurisdictions to which the direct mail is delivered to recipients, the
seller shall collect the tax according to the delivery information
provided by the purchaser. In the absence of bad faith, the seller is
relieved of any further obligation to collect tax on any transaction
where the seller has collected tax pursuant to the delivery information
provided by the purchaser.
(b) If the purchaser of direct mail does not have a direct pay
permit and does not provide the seller with either a direct mail form
or delivery information as required by (a) of this subsection, the
seller shall collect the tax according to subsection (1)(e) of this
section. This subsection does not limit a purchaser's obligation for
sales or use tax to any state to which the direct mail is delivered.
(c) If a purchaser of direct mail provides the seller with
documentation of direct pay authority, the purchaser is not required to
provide a direct mail form or delivery information to the seller.
(7) The following are sourced to the location at or from which
delivery is made to the consumer:
(a) A retail sale consisting of watercraft;
(b) A retail sale consisting of a modular home, manufactured home,
or mobile home; and
(c) A retail sale, excluding the lease and rental, consisting of a
motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or aircraft, that do not qualify
as transportation equipment.
(8) A retail sale consisting of the providing of telecommunications
services shall be sourced in accordance with RCW 82.32.520.
(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Delivered electronically" means delivered to the purchaser by
means other than tangible storage media.
(b) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed
by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or
to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the
direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed
directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal
property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct
mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed
material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed
material delivered to a single address.
(c) "Receive" and "receipt" means taking possession of tangible
personal property, making first use of services, or taking possession
or making first use of digital goods, whichever comes first. "Receive"
and "receipt" do not include possession by a shipping company on behalf
of the purchaser.
(d) "Transportation equipment" means any of the following:
(i) Locomotives and railcars that are used for the carriage of
persons or property in interstate commerce;
(ii) Trucks and truck-tractors with a gross vehicle weight rating
of 10,001 pounds or greater, trailers, semitrailers, or passenger buses
that are:
(A) Registered through the international registration plan; and
(B) Operated under authority of a carrier authorized and
certificated by the United States department of transportation or
another federal authority to engage in the carriage of persons or
property in interstate commerce;
(iii) Aircraft that are operated by air carriers authorized and
certificated by the United States department of transportation or
another federal or foreign authority to engage in the carriage of
persons or property in interstate or foreign commerce;
(iv) Containers designed for use on and component parts attached or
secured on the items described in (d)(i) through (iii) of this
subsection.
(10) In those instances where there is no obligation on the part of
a seller to collect or remit use tax, the use of tangible personal
property or of a service, subject to use tax, is sourced to the place
of first use. The definition of use in RCW 82.12.010 applies to this
subsection.

Sec. 502 RCW 82.14.020 and 2003 c 168 s 503 and 2003 c 168 s 502
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) ((A retail sale consisting solely of the sale of tangible
personal property shall be deemed to have occurred at the retail outlet
at or from which delivery is made to the consumer;
(2) A retail sale consisting essentially of the performance of
personal, business, or professional services shall be deemed to have
occurred at the place at which such services were primarily performed,
except that for the performance of a tow truck service, as defined in
RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed to have occurred at the
place of business of the operator of the tow truck service;
(3) A retail sale consisting of the rental of tangible personal
property shall be deemed to have occurred (a) in the case of a rental
involving periodic rental payments, at the place of primary use by the
lessee during the period covered by each payment, or (b) in all other
cases, at the place of first use by the lessee;
(4) A retail sale within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a
retail sale of taxable personal property to be installed by the seller
shall be deemed to have occurred at the place where the labor and
services involved were primarily performed;
(5)(a) A retail sale consisting of the providing to a consumer of
telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than a sale of
tangible personal property under subsection (1) of this section or a
rental of tangible personal property under subsection (3) of this
section or a sale of mobile telecommunications services, shall be
deemed to have occurred at the situs of the telephone or other
instrument through which the telephone service is rendered;
(b) A retail sale consisting of the providing of telecommunications
services shall be sourced in accordance with RCW 82.32.520;
(6) A retail sale of linen and uniform supply services is deemed to
occur as provided in RCW 82.08.0202;
(7))) "City" means a city or town;
(((8))) (2) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters
82.04, 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, insofar as
applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under authority of this chapter;
(((9))) (3) "Taxable event" shall mean any retail sale, or any use,
upon which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That the term shall not include a retail sale taxable pursuant to RCW
82.08.150, as now or hereafter amended;
(((10))) (4) "Treasurer or other legal depository" shall mean the
treasurer or legal depository of a county or city.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
Sales and use taxes imposed under this chapter shall be sourced in
accordance with section 501 of this act.

PART VI. CONFIDENTIALITY AND PRIVACY PROTECTIONS FOR
PERSONS USING CERTIFIED SERVICE PROVIDERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A fundamental precept of allowing the use of a certified
service provider is to preserve the privacy of consumers by protecting
their anonymity. With very limited exceptions, a certified service
provider shall perform its tax calculation, remittance, and reporting
functions without retaining the personally identifiable information of
consumers.
(2) The department of revenue shall provide public notification to
consumers, including purchasers claiming exemption from tax, of its
practices relating to the collection, use, and retention of personally
identifiable information.
(3) When personally identifiable information that has been
collected and retained is no longer required to ensure the validity of
exemptions from taxation by reason of the consumer's status or the
intended use of the goods or services purchased, the information shall
no longer be retained by the state of Washington.
(4) When personally identifiable information regarding an
individual is retained by or on behalf of the state of Washington, this
state shall provide reasonable access for the individual to his or her
own information and a right to correct any inaccurately recorded
information.
(5) If anyone other than a member state of the agreement, or other
than a person authorized by Washington law or the agreement, seeks to
discover personally identifiable information, the state of Washington
shall make a reasonable and timely effort to notify the individual of
the request.
(6) The provisions of this section may be enforced by petitioning
the superior court of Thurston county for injunctive relief.

PART VII. TAXABILITY MATRIX
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department of revenue shall complete a taxability matrix
maintained by the member states of the agreement in downloadable
format. The matrix contains terms defined in the agreement. The
department of revenue shall provide notice of changes in the taxability
of products or services listed in the matrix.
(2) Sellers and certified service providers are relieved from
liability to the state and to local jurisdictions for having charged or
collected the incorrect amount of sales or use tax if the error
resulted from reliance on erroneous information provided by the
department of revenue in the taxability matrix.

PART VIII. DELIVERY CHARGES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
When computing the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020, if a shipment
consists of taxable tangible personal property and nontaxable tangible
personal property, and delivery charges are included in the sales
price, the seller must collect and remit tax on the percentage of
delivery charges allocated to the taxable tangible property, but does
not have to collect and remit tax on the percentage allocated to exempt
tangible personal property. The seller may use either of the following
percentages to determine the taxable portion of the delivery charges:
(1) A percentage based on the total sales price of the taxable
tangible property compared to the total sales price of all tangible
personal property in the shipment; or
(2) A percentage based on the total weight of the taxable tangible
personal property compared to the total weight of all tangible personal
property in the shipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
When computing the tax levied by RCW 82.12.020, if a shipment
consists of taxable tangible personal property and nontaxable tangible
personal property, and delivery charges are included in the purchase
price, the consumer must remit tax or the retailer must collect and
remit tax on the percentage of delivery charges allocated to the
taxable personal property, but does not have to remit or collect and
remit tax on the percentage allocated to exempt tangible personal
property. The consumer or retailer may use either of the following
percentages to determine the taxable portion of the delivery charges:
(1) A percentage based on the total purchase price of the taxable
personal property compared to the total purchase price of all tangible
personal property in the shipment; or
(2) A percentage based on the total weight of the taxable tangible
personal property compared to the total weight of all tangible personal
property in the shipment.

PART IX. SALES AND USE TAX MITIGATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) Washington state's participation as a member state in the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement benefits the state, its local
taxing jurisdictions, and its retailing industry by increasing state
and local revenues, improving the state's business climate, and
simplifying the state's tax structure.
(2) Participation in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement
requires the adoption of the agreement's sourcing provisions, which
changes the location in which a retail sale of tangible personal
property occurs from the point of origin of delivery to the point of
destination of delivery.
(3) The streamlined sales and use tax agreement's sourcing
provisions will cause sales and use tax revenues to shift among local
taxing jurisdictions, causing some local taxing jurisdictions to suffer
significant revenue losses.
(4) Washington state's participation in the streamlined sales and
use tax agreement will generate new additional revenue that can be used
to assist local taxing jurisdictions.
(5) It is necessary for the preservation of the health, safety, and
support of the state government and its existing public institutions to
distribute the additional state revenue generated from Washington
state's participation in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement to
local taxing jurisdictions to mitigate the adverse effects of adopting
the agreement's sourcing provisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The streamlined sales and use tax agreement mitigation account
is created in the state treasury, and shall be used for mitigating
financial impacts related to the enactment of section 501 of this act.
Into this account shall be deposited an amount of state sales and use
taxes, as provided in section 904 of this act, representing a portion
of the amount that is expected to be received by the department from
sellers who, under the agreement, register to collect and remit to the
department state sales and use taxes and who are otherwise not required
to register under RCW 82.32.030(1).
(2)(a) Funds in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement
mitigation account shall be distributed without appropriation by the
state treasurer to cities, counties, transportation authorities,
regional transportation investment districts, and public facilities
districts in accordance with section 903 of this act.
(b) On June 30th of the fourth fiscal year after the effective date
of this section and each fiscal year thereafter, any funds that remain
in the account as of June 30th of each fiscal year shall be distributed
to the general fund. The fiscal year in which this section is
effective is the first fiscal year after the effective date of this
section.
(3) For purposes of this section and sections 903 and 904 of this
act, the following definitions apply:
(a) "State sales and use taxes" means the taxes imposed under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
(b) "Agreement" means the same as in RCW 82.58.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The state treasurer shall make distributions to eligible
sourcing counties, cities, transportation authorities, regional
transportation investment districts, and public facilities districts,
from the streamlined sales and use tax agreement mitigation account.
The state treasurer shall make the distributions as provided in this
section without appropriation.
(a) Funds in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement mitigation
account shall be distributed to eligible sourcing counties, cities,
transportation authorities, regional transportation investment
districts, and public facilities districts by the state treasurer as
directed by the department.
(b) Each fiscal year, eligible sourcing counties, cities,
transportation authorities, regional transportation investment
districts, and public facilities districts shall receive distributions
based on the actual local sales and tax reductions that result each
fiscal year from section 501 of this act. The department shall
determine the actual amount of local sales and use tax reductions of
eligible sourcing counties, cities, transportation authorities,
regional transportation investment districts, and public facilities
districts by comparing data pertaining to local sales and use tax
collections each fiscal year after the effective date of section 501 of
this act to data pertaining to local sales and use tax collections the
fiscal year before the effective date of this section. The department
may account and adjust for economic growth, annexations and
incorporations, and other unique circumstances affecting sales tax
collections in the department's analysis as necessary.
(c) Distributions shall be made on a quarterly basis and the first
distribution shall occur six calendar months after the effective date
of this section. However, if the department estimates that the local
sales and use tax collections of an eligible sourcing county, city,
transportation authority, regional transportation investment district,
or public facilities district will be reduced more than two percent
during the first fiscal year after the effective date of this section
due to section 501 of this act, the department may direct the state
treasurer to make monthly or prepayment distributions to the eligible
sourcing county, city, transportation authority, regional
transportation investment district, or public facilities district at
such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.14.060.
(d) If a distribution is made to an eligible sourcing county, city,
transportation authority, regional transportation investment district,
or public facilities district, and the department determines that the
amount distributed exceeded the actual local sales and use tax
reductions resulting from section 501 of this act, the excess amount
shall be deducted from any future distributions under this section for
twenty-four calendar months. The excess amount of any distribution
that remains after twenty-four calendar months shall be deducted from
any tax collected under the authority of this chapter for the eligible
sourcing county, city, transportation authority, regional
transportation investment district, or public facilities district, and
the deducted amounts shall be deposited in the streamlined sales and
use tax agreement mitigation account.
(e) If the amounts necessary to make the distributions under this
subsection exceed the amount of funds in the streamlined sales and use
tax agreement mitigation account, then the distributions under this
subsection shall be reduced ratably among the eligible sourcing
counties, cities, transportation authorities, regional transportation
investment districts, or public facilities districts.
(f) Determinations by the department of amounts to be distributed
by the state treasurer under this section are final and not appealable.
(2) For purposes of this section, "eligible sourcing counties,
cities, transportation authorities, regional transportation investment
districts, and public facilities districts" means those counties,
cities, transportation authorities, regional transportation investment
districts, and public facilities districts imposing a tax authorized
under this chapter, except public facilities districts imposing a tax
authorized under RCW 82.14.390, that have each experienced an actual
local sales and use tax reduction as a result of section 501 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) On the effective date of this section and on July 1st of each
year thereafter, an amount of sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW shall be deposited into the streamlined sales and use tax
agreement mitigation account created under section 902 of this act
equal to the product of (a) the amount, less five million seven hundred
thousand dollars, that is forecasted as of June 30, 2005, by the office
of the forecast council to be received by the department during fiscal
year 2006 pursuant to the enactment of chapter . . ., Laws of 2005
(this act) from sellers who, under the agreement, register to collect
and remit to the department state sales and use taxes and who are
otherwise not required to register under RCW 82.32.030(1) and (b) the
factor specified in subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) For the first three fiscal years after the effective date of
this section, the factor is equal to one. The fiscal year in which
this section is effective is the first fiscal year after the effective
date of this section.
(b) For the fourth fiscal year after the effective date of this
section, the factor is equal to nine-tenths.
(c) For the fifth fiscal year after the effective date of this
section, the factor is equal to eight-tenths.
(d) For the sixth fiscal year after the effective date of this
section, the factor is equal to seven-tenths.
(e) For the seventh fiscal year after the effective date of this
section, the factor is equal to six-tenths.
(f) For the eighth fiscal year after the effective date of this
section, the factor is equal to five-tenths.
(g) For the ninth fiscal year after the effective date of this
section, the factor is equal to four-tenths.
(h) For the tenth fiscal year after the effective date of this
section, the factor is equal to three-tenths.
(i) For the eleventh fiscal year after the effective date of this
section, the factor is equal to two-tenths.
(j) For the twelfth fiscal year after the effective date of this
section, the factor is equal to one-tenth.
(k) For the thirteenth fiscal year after the effective date of this
section, the factor is equal to zero.

Sec. 905 RCW 82.14.390 and 2002 c 363 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (((6))) (7) of this section,
the governing body of a public facilities district created before July
31, 2002, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that commences construction
of a new regional center, or improvement or rehabilitation of an
existing new regional center, before January 1, 2004, may impose a
sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the public facilities district. The rate of tax shall not
exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
(2)(a) The governing body of a public facilities district imposing
a sales and use tax under this section may increase the rate of tax up
to 0.037 percent if, within three fiscal years of the effective date of
this section, the department determines that, as a result of section
501 of this act, a public facilities district's sales and use tax
collections for fiscal years after the effective date of this section
have been reduced at least 0.50 percent from the fiscal year before the
effective date of this section. The fiscal year in which this section
is effective is the first fiscal year after the effective date of this
section.
(b) The department shall determine sales and use tax collection
reductions under this section as provided in section 903(1) of this
act. The department shall provide written notice of its determinations
to public facilities districts. Determinations by the department of a
public facilities district's sales and use tax collection reductions as
a result of section 501 of this act are final and not appealable.
(c) A public facilities district may increase its rate of tax after
it has received written notice from the department as provided in (b)
of this subsection. The increase in the rate of tax must be made in
0.001 percent increments and must be the least amount necessary to
mitigate the reduction in sales and use tax collections as a result of
section 501 of this act. The increase in the rate of tax is subject to
RCW 82.14.055.
(3) The tax imposed under subsections (1) and (2) of this section
shall be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be
collected or paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08
or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection
of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public
facilities district.
(((3))) (4) No tax may be collected under this section before
August 1, 2000. The tax imposed in this section shall expire when the
bonds issued for the construction of the regional center and related
parking facilities are retired, but not more than twenty-five years
after the tax is first collected.
(((4))) (5) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used
for the purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched with an
amount from other public or private sources equal to thirty-three
percent of the amount collected under this section, provided that
amounts generated from nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter
35.57 RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 36.100
RCW shall not constitute a public or private source. For the purpose
of this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited
to cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development
or improvement of the regional center, land that is donated and used
for the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind contributions
from public or private foundations, or amounts attributed to private
sector partners as part of a public and private partnership agreement
negotiated by the public facilities district.
(((5))) (6) The combined total tax levied under this section shall
not be greater than ((0.033)) 0.037 percent. If both a public
facilities district created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public
facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under
this section, the tax imposed by a public facilities district created
under chapter 35.57 RCW shall be credited against the tax imposed by a
public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.
(((6))) (7) A public facilities district created under chapter
36.100 RCW is not eligible to impose the tax under this section if the
legislative authority of the county where the public facilities
district is located has imposed a sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

PART X. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 (1) Sections 501 through 503, 901 through
905, and 1002 of this act take effect the later of July 1, 2006, or the
first day of April, July, or October at least six months after the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement takes effect. Section 401 of
this act takes effect when Washington becomes a member state of the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement.
(2) Section 302 of this act takes effect when:
(a) The United States congress grants individual states the
authority to impose sales and use tax collection duties on remote
sellers; or
(b) It is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a
judgment not subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use
tax collection duties on remote sellers.
(3) The department shall provide notice of the effective dates of
sections 302, 401, 501 through 503, 901 through 905, and 1002 of this
act to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed
appropriate by the department.
(4) The remainder of this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

Sec. 1002 2003 c 168 s 902 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) If a court of competent jurisdiction enters a final judgment on
the merits that is based on federal or state law, is no longer subject
to appeal, and substantially limits or impairs the essential elements
of P.L. 106-252, 4 U.S.C. Secs. 116 through 126, or chapter 67, Laws of
2002, then chapter 67, Laws of 2002 is null and void in its entirety,
except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) ((If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
section 502, chapter 168, Laws of 2003 is null and void)) Subsection
(1) of this section does not apply to section 7, chapter 67, Laws of
2002 on or after the date section 502 of this act takes effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003 Part headings used in this act are not
any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---