BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide access to legal education and to ensure equal access to the
justice system for the residents of the state of Washington. The
University of Washington law school is the only law school in the state
and one of only a few top ranked public law schools that does not
currently have a loan repayment assistance program in place for
graduates who enter public interest law. The nationwide decline in the
percentage of new lawyers choosing to enter public interest law fields,
from 5.4 percent to 2.9 percent in the last thirty years, can be
substantially attributed to dramatic increases in higher education debt
coupled with wide discrepancies between public and private salaries for
new lawyers. Today, more than three-quarters of all low-income
households in Washington experience at least one civil legal problem
each year. Low-income residents face more than eighty-five percent of
their legal problems without help from an attorney.
Therefore, the legislature finds that it is in the best interest of
the state to contribute funding to create a loan repayment assistance
program at the University of Washington law school. It is the intent
of the legislature in enacting this legislation to provide for the
partial or full repayment of educational loans of University of
Washington law school graduates who provide legal services in a public
service area of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means an individual who applies for assistance from
the University of Washington public service legal loan repayment
assistance program.
(2) "Eligible educational debt" includes school-approved
undergraduate, graduate, and law school loans owed to government and
commercial lending institutions or educational institutions.
Educational loans extended by a private individual or family are not
considered eligible educational debt for purposes of this chapter.
(3) "Eligible employment" means those areas of legal practice
determined by the joint administrators to serve the public interest,
including but not limited to providing legal assistance to low-income
persons through a nonprofit organization or legal services as an
employee of a local, state, or federal governmental entity.
(4) "Endowment" means the University of Washington public service
legal loan repayment assistance endowment created in section 7 of this
act and established at the University of Washington to support the
University of Washington public service legal loan repayment assistance
program.
(5) "Joint administrators" means the University of Washington
school of law's public interest law association board of directors and
the dean of the University of Washington school of law.
(6) "Licensed lawyer" means a lawyer licensed to practice law in
the state of Washington.
(7) "Participant" means a lawyer who is receiving loan repayment
assistance through the University of Washington public service legal
loan repayment assistance program.
(8) "Program" means the University of Washington public service
legal loan repayment assistance program.
(9) "Total income" includes income from sources identified by the
joint administrators as income.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The University of Washington public service
legal loan repayment assistance program is created at the University of
Washington. The program shall provide loan repayment assistance to
lawyers who graduated from the University of Washington school of law
and practice in public service positions, as defined by the joint
administrators of the program. The program shall provide loans to
participants for the purpose of repaying educational loans and, upon a
participant's completion of the required service obligation, shall
forgive the loans. The program shall be jointly administered by the
dean of the University of Washington school of law and the University
of Washington school of law's public interest law association board of
directors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The joint administrators shall adopt rules
necessary to implement this chapter. The rules shall establish:
(1) Eligibility criteria for participation in the program based
upon the following:
(a) The applicant's need, which shall be based on salary, total
income, and eligible educational debt as defined in section 2 of this
act;
(b) The applicant's eligible employment, as defined in section 2 of
this act;
(c) The applicant must be a member in good standing of the bar of
the state of Washington;
(2) Guidelines pertaining to:
(a) Maximum amount of annual assistance to be provided by the
endowment to each participant;
(b) Maximum amount of cumulative total assistance for program
participants;
(c) A procedure and schedule for the provision of program
assistance to participants;
(3) Any other rules necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Participants in the program who are awarded
loan repayment assistance shall receive amounts from the program for
the purpose of repaying both principal and interest on eligible
educational debt.
(1) Participants shall agree to meet the required service
obligation by providing legal services in eligible employment, as
defined by the joint administrators.
(2) Participants shall sign a promissory note setting forth their
obligation to the program to repay assistance loans that are not
subsequently forgiven.
(3) Participants shall agree to allow the joint administrators to
review loan records and to obtain information from lenders necessary to
verify eligibility and to determine assistance payment amounts.
(4) Payment of loan repayment assistance under this chapter shall
begin no later than ninety days after an individual becomes a
participant. Provided that there is sufficient funding in the
University of Washington public service legal loan repayment assistance
endowment, assistance payments shall be made quarterly to the
participant until eligible educational debt is repaid or until the
participant is no longer engaged in eligible employment, whichever
comes first.
(5) Assistance payments under the program shall cease on the date
that the participant discontinues eligible employment. The joint
administrators shall determine the amount owed to the program by
participants who serve less than the required service obligation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The program is intended to enhance, and
not to replace, existing loan repayment programs from other sources.
An applicant must first apply for any educational loan assistance from
his or her employer or other sources for which he or she may qualify.
Only if an applicant has received no loan repayment assistance, or only
partial assistance, from other sources, may he or she apply to the
program for assistance in repaying the balance of his or her eligible
educational debt.
(2) A participant shall contribute at least five percent of his or
her monthly salary toward the repayment of his or her loans. The exact
percentage obligation shall be determined by the joint administrators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The University of Washington public service
legal loan repayment assistance endowment shall be established by the
joint administrators at the University of Washington to fund the
University of Washington public service legal loan repayment assistance
program created in this chapter. Money in the endowment may be spent
without appropriation and only to fund the program and the
administration of the program.
(1) The joint administrators shall deposit in the endowment account
all money received for the program. The endowment account shall be
self-sustaining and consist of funds appropriated by the legislature
for the program and private contributions to the program.
(2) If the program's mission ever changes, all private
contributions in the endowment must be transferred to a nonprofit
organization with a mission similar to the program or returned to the
private donors.
(3) With the exception of the operating costs associated with the
management of the endowment, the endowment account shall be credited
with all investment income earned by the endowment account.
(4) In addition to any funds specifically appropriated for the
program, all moneys received from any other source such as
contributions or supplements for the program and any interest or income
earned shall be paid into the endowment.
(5) Money in the endowment account may be spent only for the
purposes of the program as specified in this chapter. Disbursements
from the endowment account shall be made only on the authorization of
the joint administrators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---