BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that science plays a
central role in delineating the functions of critical areas and
determining their value, in identifying and recommending strategies to
protect these functions and values, and in identifying the risks
associated with alternative approaches to their protection. Without a
substantive consideration of scientific information, local decision
makers cannot understand the risks associated with alternative policies
and regulations or determine whether their decisions result in real,
cost-effective protection.
The legislature also finds that not all critical areas must be
protected in the same manner or to the same degree, as long as there is
no net loss of the structure, value, and functions of the natural
systems to which the critical areas contribute.
The legislature intends to ensure that local governments are guided
by reliable scientific information when they adopt policies and
development regulations regarding critical areas. The legislature does
not intend to establish specific state or regional standards or
specific sources of scientific information.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.172 and 1995 c 347 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In designating critical areas and protecting the functions and
values of critical areas under this chapter, counties and cities shall
((include the best available science in developing)) adopt policies and
development regulations ((to protect the functions and values of
critical areas)) that contain the best available science. In addition,
counties and cities shall give special consideration to conservation or
protection measures necessary to preserve or enhance anadromous
fisheries.
(a) Counties and cities shall identify, collect, and assess the
available scientific information relevant to the critical areas within
their jurisdictions and determine which of that information constitutes
the best available science. Counties and cities may generate
scientific information through their own efforts or accept or solicit
scientific information from state and federal agencies, universities,
tribes, subject matter experts, and the public participation process.
(b) Counties and cities shall identify the specific critical areas
policies and regulations adopted and the sources of best available
science used in the decision-making process.
(2) If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts
is necessary or will be of substantial assistance in reaching its
decision, a growth management hearings board may retain scientific or
other expert advice to assist in reviewing a petition under RCW
36.70A.290 that involves critical areas.

--- END ---