BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Recent changes in criminal laws and enforcement have led to (i)
the imprisonment of increasing numbers of nonviolent offenders, (ii)
longer sentences, (iii) prison overcrowding, (iv) transfer of prisoners
to public and private prisons in other states, and (v) increasing
pressure to build and maintain new prisons in Washington, at great
expense to taxpayers, and at the sacrifice of other needed programs,
services, and projects;
(b) Prison overcrowding:
(i) Results in inefficient expenditures of public funds by
utilizing scarce resources on low-risk offenders, and insufficient
resources on high-risk offenders;
(ii) Results in unjust punishment for offenders and an unfair
environment for staff because of unsafe conditions within prisons;
(iii) Endangers the public by preventing the effective
concentration of criminal justice resources on high-risk offenders;
(iv) Limits the educational, vocational, and treatment
opportunities available to an offender and reduces the offender's
ability to improve, for the benefit of himself or herself, and for
community well-being and safety; and
(v) Increases the risk of reoffending in the community by
decreasing services within the prisons and in the community that can
reduce the risk of recidivism.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to:
(a) Focus resources on sex offenders and violent offenders who pose
the greatest risk to our communities, by reducing offender populations
when such populations exceed the maximum operational capacity of
facilities operated by the department of corrections; and
(b) Accomplish the reduction by releasing to community supervision
solely low-risk offenders who have been convicted of certain nonviolent
offenses and who are closest to the end of their sentences.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.88C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The caseload forecast council, in consultation with the
department of corrections, the sentencing guidelines commission, and
the indeterminate sentence review board, shall, by rule, establish a
methodology for determining the maximum statewide operating capacity
for correctional facilities operated by the department of corrections.
The methodology must take into account methods for increasing facility
capacity without making improvements or additions to infrastructure.
(2) For purposes of this section, "maximum statewide operating
capacity for correctional facilities operated by the department of
corrections" means the number of offenders that all of the correctional
facilities operated by the department of corrections can house at a
given time based on space, staff, existing programs, and services.
(3) The council shall complete the methodology and report it to the
legislature no later than December 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.88C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Using the methodology developed under section 2 of this act,
the caseload forecast council shall determine the maximum statewide
operating capacity for correctional facilities operated by the
department of corrections for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006,
and annually thereafter. The council shall report its determination of
the maximum operating capacity to the legislature and the sentencing
guidelines commission no later than July 8th. The report must include
a copy of the methodology developed under section 2 of this act and a
description of how the council used the methodology to make its
determination.
(2) If a caseload forecast prepared under RCW 43.88C.020 indicates
that the number of offenders incarcerated in correctional facilities
operated by the department of corrections will exceed the most recent
determination of the maximum statewide operating capacity for
correctional facilities operated by the department of corrections
determined under subsection (1) of this section, the council shall
notify the sentencing guidelines commission and the department of
corrections within seven days of adopting the forecast.
(3) The notification under subsection (2) of this section must
include:
(a) A copy of the council's most recent determination of the
maximum statewide operating capacity for correctional facilities
operated by the department of corrections;
(b) A copy of the forecast indicating that the capacity will be
exceeded; and
(c) The estimated number of offenders currently incarcerated by
which the offender population must be reduced in order for the capacity
not to be exceeded.
(4) The council's findings and determinations under this section
are not subject to appeal under chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of the notification from the caseload forecast
council under section 3(2) of this act, the sentencing guidelines
commission shall certify whether or not the information included in the
council's notification was correctly determined.
(2) The commission shall transmit a copy of its certification to
the department and the council within fourteen days of receipt of
notification from the council. The commission's certification decision
is not subject to appeal under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) If the commission certifies that the information included in
the council's notification was incorrectly determined, it shall inform
the council of its decision and the reasons therefor in writing within
fourteen days of receipt of notification from the council. The council
shall then review and may revise, if appropriate, the information in
the notification and shall resubmit it to the commission with an
explanation. Upon receipt of the resubmission by the council, the
commission has fourteen days to provide further comments, after which
the council shall adopt the final form of its findings and
determinations and shall promptly transmit them to the department of
corrections for utilization as provided in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall perform a risk assessment of every
offender who: (a) Was committed to a correctional facility operated by
the department for an offense that is not a violent offense, sex
offense, offense sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660, or crime against a
person as defined in this chapter, and (b) has a criminal history that
does not include a violent offense, sex offense, or crime against a
person as defined in this chapter. The department shall classify each
offender in one of at least four categories between highest and lowest
risk.
(2) Within fourteen days of the receipt of certification from the
commission under section 4(2) of this act, or final findings and
determinations under section 4(3) of this act, the department shall
develop a list of qualified offenders. The number of qualified
offenders on the list may not exceed the estimate developed by the
caseload forecast council under section 3(3)(c) of this act. If the
number of qualified offenders committed to correctional facilities
operated by the department exceeds the estimate, the department shall
give priority to those offenders in the lowest risk category whose
release dates are closest in time to the date the certification from
the commission under section 4(2) of this act was received.
(3) Within fourteen days of the development of the list of
qualified offenders under subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall release to community supervision the offenders on the
list in the priority provided in this section.
(4) For purposes of this act, "qualified offender" means an
offender:
(a) Committed to a correctional facility operated by the department
for an offense that is not a violent offense, sex offense, offense
sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660, or crime against a person as defined in
this chapter;
(b) Who has a criminal history that does not include a violent
offense, sex offense, or crime against a person as defined in this
chapter; and
(c) Who is classified under subsection (1) of this section in any
risk category other than the two highest categories.
(5) The classification of offenders under subsection (1) of this
section, the development of the list under subsection (2) of this
section, and the release of offenders under subsection (3) of this
section:
(a) Are not subject to appeal under chapter 34.05 RCW;
(b) Do not create a vested right to early release for any offender;
and
(c) May not be the basis for any civil or criminal action against
the state, the department, or any state employee.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department
shall provide community supervision of any offenders released under
this section until their normal release dates, including electronic
supervision as determined appropriate by the department.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.728 and 2004 c 176 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and
committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of
the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the
sentence except as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (2) of this
section, the term of the sentence of an offender committed to a
correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and promulgated by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction in which the offender is confined. The earned release
time shall be for good behavior and good performance, as determined by
the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency
shall not credit the offender with earned release credits in advance of
the offender actually earning the credits. Any program established
pursuant to this section shall allow an offender to earn early release
credits for presentence incarceration. If an offender is transferred
from a county jail to the department, the administrator of a county
jail facility shall certify to the department the amount of time spent
in custody at the facility and the amount of earned release time. An
offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after July 23,
1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good time credits
or earned release time for that portion of his or her sentence that
results from any deadly weapon enhancements.
(a) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In the
case of an offender convicted of a serious violent offense, or a sex
offense that is a class A felony, committed on or after July 1, 2003,
the aggregate earned release time may not exceed ten percent of the
sentence.
(b)(i) In the case of an offender who qualifies under (b)(ii) of
this subsection, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed fifty
percent of the sentence.
(ii) An offender is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time under this subsection (1)(b) if he or
she:
(A) Is classified in one of the two lowest risk categories under
(b)(iii) of this subsection;
(B) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
and
(C) Has no prior conviction for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor).
(iii) For purposes of determining an offender's eligibility under
this subsection (1)(b), the department shall perform a risk assessment
of every offender committed to a correctional facility operated by the
department who has no current or prior conviction for a sex offense, a
violent offense, a crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411,
a felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020, a
violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary), a violation of, or
an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.401 by
manufacture or delivery or possession with intent to deliver
methamphetamine, or a violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled
substance to a minor). The department must classify each assessed
offender in one of four risk categories between highest and lowest
risk.
(iv) The department shall recalculate the earned release time and
reschedule the expected release dates for each qualified offender under
this subsection (1)(b).
(v) This subsection (1)(b) applies retroactively to eligible
offenders serving terms of total confinement in a state correctional
facility as of July 1, 2003.
(vi) This subsection (1)(b) does not apply to offenders convicted
after July 1, 2010.
(c) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence;
(2)(a) A person convicted of a sex offense or an offense
categorized as a serious violent offense, assault in the second degree,
vehicular homicide, vehicular assault, assault of a child in the second
degree, any crime against persons where it is determined in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.602 that the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed before July 1, 2000, may become
eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the department, for
transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned release time
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(b) A person convicted of a sex offense, a violent offense, any
crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or a felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or after July 1, 2000, may
become eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the
department, for transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned
release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(c) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to
the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to
propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living
arrangement. All offenders with community placement or community
custody terms eligible for release to community custody status in lieu
of earned release shall provide an approved residence and living
arrangement prior to release to the community;
(d) The department may deny transfer to community custody status in
lieu of earned release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
if the department determines an offender's release plan, including
proposed residence location and living arrangements, may violate the
conditions of the sentence or conditions of supervision, place the
offender at risk to violate the conditions of the sentence, place the
offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk to victim safety or
community safety. The department's authority under this section is
independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence or statutory
provision regarding conditions for community custody or community
placement;
(e) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW
9.94A.670(4)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this
section;
(3) An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an
authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may
leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections
officer or officers;
(4)(a) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical
placement for an offender when all of the following conditions exist:
(i) The offender has a medical condition that is serious enough to
require costly care or treatment;
(ii) The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or
she is physically incapacitated due to age or the medical condition;
and
(iii) Granting the extraordinary medical placement will result in
a cost savings to the state.
(b) An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without
the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an
extraordinary medical placement.
(c) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all
offenders in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic
monitoring equipment interferes with the function of the offender's
medical equipment or results in the loss of funding for the offender's
medical care. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the
monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be
performed.
(d) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement
under this subsection at any time;
(5) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons
board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health
problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or
other extraordinary circumstances;
(6) No more than the final six months of the sentence may be served
in partial confinement designed to aid the offender in finding work and
reestablishing himself or herself in the community;
(7) The governor may pardon any offender;
(8) The department may release an offender from confinement any
time within ten days before a release date calculated under this
section; ((and))
(9) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to
completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as
provided in RCW 9.94A.870; and
(10) An offender may be released by the department under section 5
of this act. An offender released under this subsection shall be on
community custody status for the difference between the date of release
under section 5 of this act and the expiration of the offender's term
of confinement imposed by the court, subject to conditions imposed by
the department. For an offender released from custody imposed because
of a conviction for an offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, the
community custody must include affirmative conditions relating to drug
treatment.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an offender
sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as subject to a
mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not be released
from total confinement before the completion of the listed mandatory
minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless allowed
under RCW 9.94A.540, however persistent offenders are not eligible for
extraordinary medical placement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act shall be known as the responsible
reduction to capacity act of 2005.

--- END ---