BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of new
passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles,
which are exclusively powered by a clean alternative fuel.
(2) The seller must keep records necessary for the department to
verify eligibility under this section.
(3) As used in this section, "clean alternative fuel" means natural
gas, propane, hydrogen, or electricity, when used as a fuel in a motor
vehicle that meets the California motor vehicle emission standards in
Title 13 of the California code of regulations, effective January 1,
2005, and the rules of the Washington state department of ecology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of new
passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles,
which utilize hybrid technology and have a United States environmental
protection agency estimated highway gasoline mileage rating of at least
forty miles per gallon.
(2) The seller must keep records necessary for the department to
verify eligibility under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of new passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger
vehicles, which are exclusively powered by a clean alternative fuel.
(2) "Clean alternative fuel" has the same meaning as provided in
section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of new passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger
vehicles, which utilize hybrid technology and have a United States
environmental protection agency estimated highway gasoline mileage
rating of at least forty miles per gallon.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act expires January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If Senate Bill No. 5397 (2005) or House Bill
No. 1397 (2005) is not enacted into law, this act is null and void in
its entirety.

--- END ---