BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person whose application has been approved by the department
under this section may take a credit against tax imposed by this
chapter, subject to the limitations in this section. The credit under
this program is only available to persons with five hundred or fewer
employees in the state.
(2)(a) The credit under this section is equal to sixty percent of
the amount of qualifying costs made in rural counties, as defined in
RCW 82.14.370, or forty percent of the amount of qualifying costs made
in nonrural counties. A person shall not receive credit for more than
five thousand dollars for qualifying costs per employee per calendar
year. A person shall not receive total credits over two hundred fifty
thousand dollars per calendar year. A person may only receive credit
for amounts expended on job classes covered by the minimum wage
provisions of the federal fair labor standards act.
(b) As preconditions to approval by the department under subsection
(4) of this section, the person must:
(i) Have entered into a training contract with a qualified training
institution; and
(ii) Show that the training costs during the year for which a
credit is requested exceed the person's average annual training
expenditures over the past three years on the job classes covered by
the minimum wage provisions of the federal fair labor standards act.
(3) Training contracts must be for the training of at least five
employees. If an employer does not have five employees to train, the
person may coordinate with other employers who have identical training
needs to create groups to meet the five person threshold.
(4) Application for credits under this section shall be made to the
department in a form and manner as required by the department. The
application shall include a statement affirming the person's compliance
with this section. The department shall approve or deny application
for credits using the criteria under this section. The department
shall require the person receiving approval to keep records necessary
for the department to verify eligibility under this section. A person
shall apply for the credit after making an expenditure. Tax credit
applications shall not be approved for expenditures that occurred
before the effective date of this act.
(5) Tax credits are available on a first-come basis, with priority
based on the date and time the application is received by the
department. The total of credits granted under this section and
section 2 of this act shall be no more than ten million dollars per
biennium. The department shall keep a running total of all credits
approved. If the amount submitted for a credit will cause the cap to
be exceeded, the department shall give a partial approval of the
application, equal to the amount of remaining credit available for the
fiscal year.
(6) No person is eligible for tax credits under this section in
excess of the amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this
chapter. Approved credit may not be carried over to subsequent
calendar years. The credit must be claimed by the due date of the last
tax return for the calendar year in which the payment is made. Any
unused credit expires. Refunds shall not be given in place of credits.
(7) If a person has used a credit granted under this section
against tax due under chapter 82.16 RCW the person may not use the same
credit for tax due under this chapter.
(8) A person who takes credits under RCW 82.04.4333 may not take a
credit under this section for the same training.
(9) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Employer" means the same as "person";
(b) "Qualifying costs" means those employee training expenditures
which exceed the employer's average annual employee training
expenditures over the previous three calendar years and are direct
payments made under a contract with a qualified training institution
for formal technical or skill training, including work force and basic
skill training. The term includes amounts in the contract for costs of
instruction, materials, equipment, rental of class space, and overhead.
"Qualifying costs" do not include employee tuition reimbursements
unless the tuition reimbursement is specifically included in a contract
under subsection (2)(b) of this section;
(c) "Employee" means a person working in a job class covered by the
minimum wage provisions of the federal fair labor standards act;
(d) "Qualified training institution" means a public community or
technical college, or a private vocational school licensed by either
the work force training and education coordinating board or the higher
education coordinating board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax credit program under section 1 of this act is available to
persons for tax due under this chapter. If a person has used a credit
granted under this section against tax due under chapter 82.04 RCW, the
person may not use the same credit for tax due under this chapter. A
person who takes credits under RCW 82.04.4333 may not take a credit
under this section for the same training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---