BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.85.011 and 1994 c 249 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) A vibrant and growing small business sector is critical to
creating jobs in a dynamic economy;
(2) Administrative rules adopted by state agencies can have a
disproportionate impact on the state's small businesses because of the
size of those businesses((. This disproportionate impact reduces
competition, innovation, employment, and new employment opportunities,
and threatens the very existence of some small businesses));
(3) Fundamental changes needed in the regulatory and enforcement
culture of state agencies to make them more responsive to small
business can be made without compromising the statutory missions of the
agencies;
(4) When adopting rules to protect the health, safety, and economic
welfare of this state, state agencies shall seek to achieve statutory
goals as effectively and efficiently as possible without imposing
unnecessary burdens on small employers;
(5) Uniform regulatory and reporting requirements impose
unnecessary and disproportionately burdensome demands, including legal,
accounting, and consulting costs, upon small businesses with limited
resources;
(6) The failure to recognize differences in the scale and resources
of regulated businesses adversely affects competition in the
marketplace, discourages innovation, and restricts improvements in
productivity;
(7) Unnecessary rules create entry barriers in many industries and
discourage potential entrepreneurs from introducing beneficial products
and processes;
(8) The practice of treating all regulated businesses as equivalent
leads to inefficient use of regulatory agency resources, enforcement
problems, and actions inconsistent with the legislative intent of
health, safety, environmental, and economic welfare legislation;
(9) Alternative regulatory approaches that do not conflict with the
stated objective of applicable statutes are available to minimize the
significant economic impact of regulations on small businesses; and
(10) The process by which state rules are developed and adopted
must be reformed to require agencies to solicit the ideas and comments
of small businesses, to examine the impact of proposed and existing
regulations on these businesses, and to review the continued need for
existing regulations.
The legislature therefore enacts the Small Business Regulatory
((Fairness)) Flexibility Act with the intent of reducing the
disproportionate impact of state administrative rules on small
business.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.85.020 and 2003 c 166 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply through this chapter.
(1) "Small business" means ((any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that
is owned and operated independently from all other businesses, and that
has fifty or fewer employees)) a commercial retail service, industry
entity, or nonprofit corporation, including its affiliates, that:
(a) Is, if a commercial retail service or industry service,
independently owned and operated; and
(b) Employs fewer than one hundred full-time employees or has gross
annual sales or program service revenues of less than five million
dollars.
(2) "Small business economic impact statement" means a statement
meeting the requirements of RCW ((19.85.040 prepared by a state agency
pursuant to RCW)) 19.85.030.
(3) "Industry" means all of the businesses in this state in any one
four-digit standard industrial classification as published by the
United States department of commerce. However, if the use of a four-digit standard industrial classification would result in the release of
data that would violate state confidentiality laws, "industry" means
all businesses in a three-digit standard industrial classification.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.85.025 and 1997 c 409 s 212 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless an agency receives a written objection to the expedited
repeal of a rule, this chapter does not apply to a rule proposed for
expedited repeal pursuant to RCW ((34.05.354)) 34.05.353. If an agency
receives a written objection to expedited repeal of the rule, this
chapter applies to the rule-making proceeding.
(2) This chapter does not apply to a rule proposed for expedited
adoption under RCW ((34.05.230 (1) through (8))) 34.05.353, unless a
written objection is timely filed with the agency and the objection is
not withdrawn.
(3) This chapter does not apply to the adoption of a rule described
in RCW 34.05.310(4).
(4) An agency is not required to prepare a separate small business
economic impact statement ((under RCW 19.85.040)) if it prepared an
analysis under RCW 34.05.328 that meets the requirements of a small
business economic impact statement, and if the agency reduced the costs
imposed by the rule on small business to the extent required by RCW
19.85.030(3). The portion of the analysis that meets the requirements
of RCW ((19.85.040)) 19.85.030 shall be filed with the code reviser and
provided to any person requesting it in lieu of a separate small
business economic impact statement.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.85.030 and 2000 c 171 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((In the adoption of a rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, an agency
shall prepare a small business economic impact statement: (a) If the
proposed rule will impose more than minor costs on businesses in an
industry; or (b) if requested to do so by a majority vote of the joint
administrative rules review committee within forty-five days of
receiving the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320.
However, if the agency has completed the pilot rule process as defined
by RCW 34.05.313 before filing the notice of a proposed rule, the
agency is not required to prepare a small business economic impact
statement.
An agency shall prepare the small business economic impact
statement in accordance with RCW 19.85.040, and file it with the code
reviser along with the notice required under RCW 34.05.320. An agency
shall file a statement prepared at the request of the joint
administrative rules review committee with the code reviser upon its
completion before the adoption of the rule. An agency shall provide a
copy of the small business economic impact statement to any person
requesting it.
(2))) Before an agency submits to the joint administrative rules
review committee for review a rule that may have a significant adverse
impact on small businesses, the agency, if directed by the small
business regulatory review committee, shall prepare:
(a) An economic impact statement that includes the following:
(i) An identification and estimate of the number of small
businesses subject to the proposed rule;
(ii) The projected reporting, recordkeeping, and other
administrative costs required for compliance with the proposed
regulation, including the type of professional skills necessary for
preparation of the report or record;
(iii) A statement of the economic impact on small businesses; and
(iv) A description of less intrusive or less costly alternative
methods of achieving the purpose of the proposed rule;
(b) A regulatory flexibility analysis in which the agency, where
consistent with health, safety, and environmental and economic welfare,
shall consider using regulatory methods that accomplish the objectives
of applicable statutes while minimizing a significant adverse impact on
small businesses.
(2) The agency shall consider, without limitation, each of the
following methods of reducing the impact of the proposed rule on small
businesses:
(a) Establishment of less stringent compliance or reporting
requirements for small businesses;
(b) Establishment of less stringent schedules or deadlines for
compliance or reporting requirements for small businesses;
(c) Consolidation or simplification of compliance or reporting
requirements for small businesses;
(d) Establishment of performance standards for small businesses to
replace design or operational standards required in the proposed rule;
and
(e) Exemption of small businesses from all or a part of the
requirements contained in the proposed rule.
(3) Based upon the extent of disproportionate impact on small
business identified in the statement ((prepared under RCW 19.85.040)),
the agency shall, where legal and feasible in meeting the stated
objectives of the statutes upon which the rule is based, reduce the
costs imposed by the rule on small businesses. Methods to reduce the
costs on small businesses may include:
(a) Reducing, modifying, or eliminating substantive regulatory
requirements;
(b) Simplifying, reducing, or eliminating recordkeeping and
reporting requirements;
(c) Reducing the frequency of inspections;
(d) Delaying compliance timetables;
(e) Reducing or modifying fine schedules for noncompliance; or
(f) Any other mitigation techniques.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 19.85 RCW
to read as follows:
A small business that is adversely impacted or aggrieved in
connection with the adoption of a rule is entitled to judicial review
of agency compliance with the requirements of this chapter. A small
business may seek that review during the period beginning on the date
of final agency action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 19.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within five years of the effective date of this act, each
agency shall review all agency rules existing at the time of the
effective date of this act to determine whether to continue the rules
without change or amend or repeal them to minimize economic impact of
the rules on small businesses in a manner consistent with the stated
objective of applicable statutes. If the head of the agency determines
that completion of the review of existing rules is not feasible by the
established date, the agency shall publish in the state register a
statement certifying that determination.
(2) Rules that take effect on or after the effective date of this
act must be reviewed within five years of the publication of the final
rule in the state register and every five years after that to ensure
that they minimize economic impact on small businesses in a manner
consistent with the stated objectives of applicable statutes.
(3) In reviewing rules to minimize their economic impact on small
businesses, the agency shall consider the:
(a) Continued need for the rule;
(b) Nature of complaints or comments received concerning the rule
from the public;
(c) Complexity of the rule;
(d) Extent to which the rule overlaps, duplicates, or conflicts
with other federal, state, and local governmental rules; and
(e) Length of time since the rule has been evaluated or the degree
to which technology, economic conditions, or other factors have changed
in the area affected by the rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 19.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The small business regulatory review committee is established
within the department of community, trade, and economic development.
For purposes of this chapter, "committee" is the small business
regulatory review committee and "department" is the department of
community, trade, and economic development.
(2) The duties of the committee, in determining if a proposed
permanent rule has a significant adverse impact on small businesses,
are to:
(a) Direct the adopting agency to prepare the regulatory
flexibility analysis described in RCW 19.85.030 no later than the end
of the public comment period that follows the notice of the proposed
rule as provided in RCW 34.05.320;
(b) Request, at the committee's discretion, the office of financial
management to prepare a final assessment report of the proposed
permanent rule no later than the end of the public comment period that
follows the notice of the proposed rule. The committee may request a
final assessment report from the office of financial management only in
cases where the committee determines that information in addition to
the agency's economic impact is critical in the committee's
determination that a proposed permanent rule has a significant adverse
impact on small business. The office of financial management:
(i) Within the review and comment period, shall perform a final
assessment report of the rule on small businesses within sixty days of
a request for assessment by the committee, and the adopting agency has
sixty days to complete a regulatory flexibility analysis; and
(ii) May request additional information from the agency. The
sixty-day final assessment report deadline must be tolled until the
time that the office of financial management receives the requested
additional information; and
(c) Submit to the adopting agency, no later than thirty days after
receipt of the regulatory flexibility analysis prepared by the adopting
agency and, if requested by the committee, after receipt of the final
assessment report prepared by the office of financial management, a
written statement advising the agency that a proposed permanent rule
has a significant adverse impact on small business.
(3) This section does not limit the committee's ability to petition
a state agency to amend or repeal an existing rule.
(4) Staff support for the committee must be provided by the
department. The department shall act only as a coordinator for the
committee, and may not provide legal counsel for the committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 19.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The committee consists of eleven members, appointed as follows:
(a) Five members to be appointed by the governor;
(b) Three members to be appointed by the president pro tempore of
the senate; and
(c) Three members to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(2) In addition, the chair of the labor, commerce, research and
development committee of the senate and the chair of the commerce and
labor committee of the house of representatives, or their designees,
shall serve as nonvoting, ex officio members of the committee. During
the committee review process, the director, or a designee, of the
adopting agency shall be available at the request of the committee for
comment on the proposed rule.
(3) Appointments to the committee must be representative of a
variety of small businesses in this state. All appointed members must
be either current or former owners or officers of a small business.
(4) The initial appointments to the committee must be made within
sixty days from the effective date of this act. The department shall
provide the name and address of each appointee to the governor, the
president pro tempore of the senate, the speaker of the house of
representatives, the chair of the senate labor, commerce, research and
development committee, and the chair of the commerce and labor
committee of the house of representatives.
(5) Members initially appointed to the committee shall serve for
terms ending December 31, 2006. Thereafter, appointed members shall
serve two-year terms that expire on December 31st of the second year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 19.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The governor shall appoint the initial chair of the committee
from the appointed members for a term ending December 31, 2006, and
shall appoint subsequent chairs of the committee from the appointed
members for two-year terms that expire on December 31st of the second
year.
(2) The committee shall meet as determined by its chair.
(3) A majority of the voting members of the committee constitutes
a quorum to do business. The concurrence of a majority of the members
of the committee present and voting is necessary for an action of the
committee to be valid.
(4) An appointed committee member may not serve more than three
consecutive terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 19.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For adopted rules, the committee may file a written petition
with the agency that has adopted the rules opposing all or part of a
rule that has a significant adverse impact on small business.
(2) Within sixty days after the receipt of the petition, the agency
shall determine whether the impact statement or the public hearing
addressed the actual and significant impact on small business or if
conditions justifying the rule have changed. The agency shall submit
a written response of its determination to the committee within sixty
days after receipt of the petition. If the agency determines that the
petition merits the amendment or repeal of a rule, the agency may
initiate proceedings in accordance with the applicable requirements of
chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act.
(3) If the agency determines that the petition does not merit the
amendment or repeal of a rule, the committee promptly shall convene a
meeting for the purpose of determining whether to recommend that the
agency initiate proceedings to amend or repeal the rule in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act. The review must be based upon
the actual record presented to the agency. The committee shall base
its recommendation on any of the following reasons:
(a) The actual impact on small business was not reflected in, or
significantly exceeded, the economic impact statement formulated by the
office of financial management under section 7(2) of this act;
(b) The actual impact was not previously considered by the agency
in its economic impact statement formulated under RCW 19.85.030(1)(a)
or its regulatory flexibility analysis formulated under RCW
19.85.030(1)(b); or
(c) The technology, economic conditions, or other relevant factors
justifying the purpose for the rules have changed or no longer exist.
(4) If the committee recommends that an agency initiate rule-making
proceedings for a reason provided in subsection (3) of this section,
the committee shall submit to the speaker of the house of
representatives and the president pro tempore of the senate an
evaluation report and the agency's response as provided in subsection
(2) of this section. The legislature may take later action in response
to the evaluation report and the agency's response as the legislature
finds appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 19.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding another provision of law, an agency authorized
to assess administrative penalties or administrative fines upon a
business may waive or reduce an administrative penalty or
administrative fine for a violation of a rule by a small business if
the:
(a) Small business corrects the violation within thirty days or
less after receipt of a notice of violation or citation; or
(b) Violation was the result of an excusable misunderstanding of
the agency's interpretation of a rule.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if:
(a) A small business has been notified previously of the violation
of a rule by the agency under subsection (1) of this section and has
been given an opportunity to correct the violation on a previous
occasion;
(b) A small business fails to exercise good faith in complying with
the rule;
(c) A violation involves willful or criminal conduct;
(d) A violation results in imminent or adverse health, safety, or
environmental impact; or
(e) The penalty or fine is assessed under a federal law or rule,
for which a waiver or reduction is not authorized by the federal law or
rule.

Sec. 12 RCW 19.85.061 and 1995 c 403 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless so requested by a majority vote of the ((joint
administrative rules)) small business regulatory review committee under
((RCW 19.85.030)) section 7 of this act, an agency is not required to
comply with this chapter when adopting any rule solely for the purpose
of conformity or compliance, or both, with federal statute or
regulations. In lieu of the statement required under ((RCW 19.85.030))
section 7 of this act, the agency shall file a statement citing, with
specificity, the federal statute or regulation with which the rule is
being adopted to conform or comply, and describing the consequences to
the state if the rule is not adopted.

Sec. 13 RCW 34.05.320 and 2004 c 31 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At least twenty days before the rule-making hearing at which
the agency receives public comment regarding adoption of a rule, the
agency shall cause notice of the hearing to be published in the state
register. The publication constitutes the proposal of a rule. The
notice shall include all of the following:
(a) A title, a description of the rule's purpose, and any other
information which may be of assistance in identifying the rule or its
purpose;
(b) Citations of the statutory authority for adopting the rule and
the specific statute the rule is intended to implement;
(c) A short explanation of the rule, its purpose, and anticipated
effects, including in the case of a proposal that would modify existing
rules, a short description of the changes the proposal would make, and
a statement of the reasons supporting the proposed action;
(d) The agency personnel, with their office location and telephone
number, who are responsible for the drafting, implementation, and
enforcement of the rule;
(e) The name of the person or organization, whether private,
public, or governmental, proposing the rule;
(f) Agency comments or recommendations, if any, regarding statutory
language, implementation, enforcement, and fiscal matters pertaining to
the rule;
(g) Whether the rule is necessary as the result of federal law or
federal or state court action, and if so, a citation to such law or
court decision;
(h) When, where, and how persons may present their views on the
proposed rule;
(i) The date on which the agency intends to adopt the rule;
(j) A copy of the small business economic impact statement and the
regulatory flexibility analysis prepared under chapter 19.85 RCW, or an
explanation for why the agency did not prepare the statement or the
analysis;
(k) A statement indicating whether RCW 34.05.328 applies to the
rule adoption; and
(l) If RCW 34.05.328 does apply, a statement indicating that a copy
of the preliminary cost-benefit analysis described in RCW
34.05.328(1)(c) is available.
(2)(a) Upon filing notice of the proposed rule with the code
reviser, the adopting agency shall have copies of the notice on file
and available for public inspection. Except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, the agency shall forward three copies of the notice to the
rules review committee.
(b) A pilot of at least ten agencies, including the departments of
labor and industries, fish and wildlife, revenue, ecology, retirement
systems, and health, shall file the copies required under this
subsection, as well as under RCW 34.05.350 and 34.05.353, with the
rules review committee electronically for a period of four years from
June 10, 2004. The office of regulatory assistance shall negotiate the
details of the pilot among the agencies, the legislature, and the code
reviser.
(3) No later than three days after its publication in the state
register, the agency shall cause either a copy of the notice of
proposed rule adoption, or a summary of the information contained on
the notice, to be mailed to each person, city, and county that has made
a request to the agency for a mailed copy of such notices. An agency
may charge for the actual cost of providing a requesting party mailed
copies of these notices.
(4) In addition to the notice required by subsections (1) and (2)
of this section, an institution of higher education shall cause the
notice to be published in the campus or standard newspaper of the
institution at least seven days before the rule-making hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 19.85.040 (Small business economic impact statement--Purpose -- Contents) and 1995 c 403 s 403 & 1994 c 249 s 12; and
(2) RCW 19.85.050 (Agency plan for review of business rules--Scope -- Factors applicable to review -- Annual list) and 1989 c 175 s 74
& 1982 c 6 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act may be known and cited as the
"Small Business Regulatory Flexibility Act."

--- END ---