BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Citizens demand and deserve accountability of public programs
and activities. Public programs must continuously improve
accountability and performance reporting in order to increase public
trust.
(2) Washington state government agencies must continuously improve
their management and performance so citizens receive maximum value for
their tax dollars.
(3) The application of best practices in performance management has
improved results and accountability in many Washington state agencies
and other jurisdictions.
(4) All Washington state agencies must develop a performance-based
culture that can better demonstrate accountability and achievement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW
to read as follows:
As used in sections 3 and 4 of this act:
(1) "State agency" or "agency" means a state agency, department,
office, officer, board, commission, bureau, division, institution, or
institution of higher education, and all offices of executive branch
state government-elected officials.
(2) "Quality management, accountability, and performance system"
means a nationally recognized integrated, interdisciplinary system of
measures, tools, and reports used to improve the performance of a work
unit or organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each state agency shall, within available funds, develop and
implement a quality management, accountability, and performance system
to improve the public services it provides.
(2) Each agency shall ensure that managers and staff at all levels
are engaged in the system and shall provide managers and staff with the
training necessary for successful implementation.
(3) Each agency shall, within available funds, ensure that its
quality management, accountability, and performance system:
(a) Uses strategic business planning to establish goals,
objectives, and activities consistent with the priorities of
government, as provided in statute;
(b) Engages stakeholders and customers in establishing service
requirements and improving service delivery systems;
(c) Includes clear, relevant, and easy-to-understand measures for
each activity;
(d) Gathers, monitors, and analyzes activity data;
(e) Uses the data to evaluate the effectiveness of programs to
manage process performance, improve efficiency, and reduce costs;
(f) Establishes performance goals and expectations for employees
that reflect the organization's objectives; and provides for regular
assessments of employee performance;
(g) Uses activity measures to report progress toward agency
objectives to the agency director at least quarterly;
(h) Where performance is not meeting intended objectives, holds
regular problem-solving sessions to develop and implement a plan for
addressing gaps; and
(i) Allocates resources based on strategies to improve performance.
(4) Each agency shall conduct a yearly assessment of its quality
management, accountability, and performance system.
(5) State agencies whose chief executives are appointed by the
governor shall report to the governor on agency performance at least
quarterly.
(6) The governor shall report annually to citizens on the
performance of state agency programs. The governor's report shall
include:
(a) Progress made toward the priorities of government as a result
of agency activities; and
(b) Improvements in agency quality management systems, fiscal
efficiency, process efficiency, asset management, personnel management,
statutory and regulatory compliance, and management of technology
systems.
(7) Each state agency shall integrate efforts made under this
section with other management, accountability, and performance systems
undertaken under executive order or other authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW
to read as follows:
Starting no later than 2008, and at least once every three years
thereafter, each agency shall apply to the Washington state quality
award, or similar organization, for an independent assessment of its
quality management, accountability, and performance system. The
assessment shall evaluate the effectiveness of all elements of its
management, accountability, and performance system, including:
Leadership, strategic planning, customer focus, analysis and
information, employee performance management, and process improvement.
The purpose of the assessment is to recognize best practice and
identify improvement opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The senate and house of representatives shall each develop and
implement quality improvement programs as described under section 1 of
this act by June 30, 2005, and shall report the results of these
efforts to the leadership of each major political party caucus within
its respective house.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 2.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The supreme court is encouraged to develop and implement quality
improvement programs, as described under section 1 of this act, for the
judicial branch of government, by June 30, 2005, and shall report the
results of these efforts to the chief justice. The programs may be
implemented directly by the supreme court or may be delegated to the
administrator for the courts.

--- END ---