BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
improve the quality and effectiveness of services to families and
children. It is also the intent of the legislature to require
departmental employees investigating child abuse and neglect to advise
individuals subject to child abuse and neglect investigations of the
complaint or allegation made against them.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.44.030 and 2003 c 207 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner,
law enforcement officer, professional school personnel, registered or
licensed nurse, social service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist,
licensed or certified child care providers or their employees, employee
of the department, juvenile probation officer, placement and liaison
specialist, responsible living skills program staff, HOPE center staff,
or state family and children's ombudsman or any volunteer in the
ombudsman's office has reasonable cause to believe that a child has
suffered abuse or neglect, he or she shall report such incident, or
cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to
the department as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(b) The reporting requirement also applies to department of
corrections personnel who, in the course of their employment, observe
offenders or the children with whom the offenders are in contact. If,
as a result of observations or information received in the course of
his or her employment, any department of corrections personnel has
reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect,
he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.
(c) The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult who has
reasonable cause to believe that a child who resides with them, has
suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable of making a report. For
the purposes of this subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the
following: Any single act of abuse that causes physical trauma of
sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause death; any
single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep
bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than
one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep
bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or
unconsciousness.
(d) The report must be made at the first opportunity, but in no
case longer than forty-eight hours after there is reasonable cause to
believe that the child has suffered abuse or neglect. The report must
include the identity of the accused if known.
(2) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred
during childhood if it is discovered after the child has become an
adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to believe other children
are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the accused, the reporting
requirement of subsection (1) of this section does apply.
(3) Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe that a
child has suffered abuse or neglect may report such incident to the
proper law enforcement agency or to the department of social and health
services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(4) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law
enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received
by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written
report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within
five days thereafter.
(5) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means, or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in writing as provided
in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney for
appropriate action whenever the law enforcement agency's investigation
reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law enforcement
agency shall also notify the department of all reports received and the
law enforcement agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases,
where the child's welfare is endangered, the law enforcement agency
shall notify the department within twenty-four hours. In all other
cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within
seventy-two hours after a report is received by the law enforcement
agency.
(6) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under
subsection (5) of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the
victim requests, and the local office of the department, of the
decision to charge or decline to charge a crime, within five days of
making the decision.
(7) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under
this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with
designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child
protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under
this section if the department determines it is in the best interests
of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(8) Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed
under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical
opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and
that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if returned home,
the department shall file a dependency petition unless a second
licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such expert
medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate a
second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that
such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the
child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the
physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home
while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.
(9) Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (7)
of this section shall not further disseminate or release the
information except as authorized by state or federal statute.
Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(10) Upon receiving reports of alleged abuse or neglect, the
department or law enforcement agency may interview children. The
interviews may be conducted on school premises, at day-care facilities,
at the child's home, or at other suitable locations outside of the
presence of parents. Parental notification of the interview must occur
at the earliest possible point in the investigation that will not
jeopardize the safety or protection of the child or the course of the
investigation. The department or law enforcement agency must advise a
parent who is the subject of an abuse or neglect investigation of the
complaints and allegations against him or her at the initial contact
with that parent after he or she is identified as the subject,
consistent with the laws maintaining the confidentiality of persons
making complaints or allegations, unless such notice will jeopardize
the safety or protection of the child or the course of the
investigation. Prior to commencing the interview the department or law
enforcement agency shall determine whether the child wishes a third
party to be present for the interview and, if so, shall make reasonable
efforts to accommodate the child's wishes. Unless the child objects,
the department or law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts
to include a third party in any interview so long as the presence of
the third party will not jeopardize the course of the investigation.
(11) Upon receiving a report of alleged child abuse and neglect,
the department or investigating law enforcement agency shall have
access to all relevant records of the child in the possession of
mandated reporters and their employees.
(12) The department shall maintain investigation records and
conduct timely and periodic reviews of all cases constituting abuse and
neglect. The department shall maintain a log of screened-out
nonabusive cases.
(13) The department shall use a risk assessment process when
investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The
department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the
placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a
risk factor. The department shall, within funds appropriated for this
purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to persons who are
determined not to require further state intervention.
(14) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect the law
enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making the
report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is
involved in the reporting.
(15) The department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the
name, address, and telephone number of each person making a report of
abuse or neglect under this section. The department shall provide
assurances of appropriate confidentiality of the identification of
persons reporting under this section. If the department is unable to
learn the information required under this subsection, the department
shall only investigate cases in which: (a) The department believes
there is a serious threat of substantial harm to the child; (b) the
report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that has, or is
about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or (c) the department
has, after investigation, a report of abuse or neglect that has been
founded with regard to a member of the household within three years of
receipt of the referral.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.44.100 and 1998 c 314 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds parents and children subject to a child
abuse and neglect investigation often are not aware of their due
process rights when agencies are investigating complaints and
allegations of child abuse and neglect. The legislature reaffirms that
all citizens, including parents, shall be afforded due process, that
protection of children remains the priority of the legislature, and
that this protection includes protecting the family unit from
unnecessary disruption. To facilitate this goal, the legislature
wishes to ensure that parents and children subject to child abuse and
neglect investigations be advised in writing and orally, if feasible,
of the name of the investigator, who the investigator represents, and
the specific complaints or allegations made against them, consistent
with the laws protecting the rights of the person making the report,
unless such notice will jeopardize the safety or protection of the
child or the course of the investigation. They must also be advised of
their basic rights and other specific information as set forth in this
chapter, provided that nothing contained in this chapter shall cause
any delay in protective custody action.
(2) The department shall notify the alleged perpetrator of the
allegations of child abuse and neglect at the earliest possible point
in the investigation that will not jeopardize the safety and protection
of the child or the investigation process.
Whenever the department completes an investigation of a child abuse
or neglect report under chapter 26.44 RCW, the department shall notify
the alleged perpetrator of the report and the department's
investigative findings. The notice shall also advise the alleged
perpetrator that:
(a) A written response to the report may be provided to the
department and that such response will be filed in the record following
receipt by the department;
(b) Information in the department's record may be considered in
subsequent investigations or proceedings related to child protection or
child custody;
(c) Founded reports of child abuse and neglect may be considered in
determining whether the person is disqualified from being licensed to
provide child care, employed by a licensed child care agency, or
authorized by the department to care for children; and
(d) An alleged perpetrator named in a founded report of child abuse
or neglect has the right to seek review of the finding as provided in
this chapter.
(3) The notification required by this section shall be made by
certified mail, return receipt requested, to the person's last known
address.
(4) The duty of notification created by this section is subject to
the ability of the department to ascertain the location of the person
to be notified. The department shall exercise reasonable, good-faith
efforts to ascertain the location of persons entitled to notification
under this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.44.110 and 1985 c 183 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a child has been taken into custody by law enforcement pursuant
to RCW 26.44.050, the law enforcement agency shall leave a written
statement with a parent or in the residence of the parent if no parent
is present. The statement shall advise the parent of the complaints or
allegations made against them consistent with the laws protecting the
rights of the child and the person making the report and give the
reasons for the removal of the child from the home, the name of the law
enforcement investigator, who the investigator represents, and the
telephone number of the child protective services office in the
parent's jurisdiction.

Sec. 5 RCW 26.44.115 and 2000 c 122 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a child is taken into custody by child protective services
pursuant to a court order issued under RCW 13.34.062, the child
protective services worker shall take reasonable steps to advise the
parents immediately, regardless of the time of day, of the complaints
or allegations made against them consistent with the laws protecting
the rights of the person making the report, that the child has been
taken into custody, the reasons why the child was taken into custody,
and general information about the child's placement. The department
shall comply with RCW 13.34.060 when providing notice under this
section, unless such notice will jeopardize the safety or protection of
the child or the course of the investigation.

Sec. 6 RCW 13.34.062 and 2004 c 147 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The written notice of custody and rights required by RCW
13.34.060 shall be in substantially the following form:

"NOTICE

Your child has been placed in temporary custody under the
supervision of Child Protective Services (or other person or agency).
You have important legal rights and you must take steps to protect your
interests.
1. A court hearing will be held before a judge within 72 hours of
the time your child is taken into custody excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
and holidays. You should call the court at (insert appropriate
phone number here) for specific information about the date, time,
and location of the court hearing.
2. You have the right to know of the complaints or allegations made
against you consistent with the laws protecting the rights of the
person making the report.
3. You have the right to have a lawyer represent you at the
hearing. Your right to representation continues after the shelter care
hearing. You have the right to records the department intends to rely
upon. A lawyer can look at the files in your case, talk to child
protective services and other agencies, tell you about the law, help
you understand your rights, and help you at hearings. If you cannot
afford a lawyer, the court will appoint one to represent you. To get
a court-appointed lawyer you must contact: (explain local
procedure) .
((3.)) 4. At the hearing, you have the right to speak on your own
behalf, to introduce evidence, to examine witnesses, and to receive a
decision based solely on the evidence presented to the judge.
((4.)) 5. If your hearing occurs before a court commissioner, you
have the right to have the decision of the court commissioner reviewed
by a superior court judge. To obtain that review, you must, within ten
days after the entry of the decision of the court commissioner, file
with the court a motion for revision of the decision, as provided in
RCW 2.24.050.
You should be present at any shelter care hearing. If you do not
come, the judge will not hear what you have to say.
You may call the Child Protective Services' caseworker for more
information about your child. The caseworker's name and telephone
number are: (insert name and telephone number) .
((5.)) 6. You have a right to a case conference to develop a
written service agreement following the shelter care hearing. The
service agreement may not conflict with the court's order of shelter
care. You may request that a multidisciplinary team, family group
conference, or prognostic staffing be convened for your child's case.
You may participate in these processes with your counsel present."

Upon receipt of the written notice, the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian shall acknowledge such notice by signing a receipt prepared
by child protective services. If the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian does not sign the receipt, the reason for lack of a signature
shall be written on the receipt. The receipt shall be made a part of
the court's file in the dependency action.
If after making reasonable efforts to provide notification, child
protective services is unable to determine the whereabouts of the
parents, guardian, or legal custodian, the notice shall be delivered or
sent to the last known address of the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian.
(2) If child protective services is not required to give notice
under RCW 13.34.060(2) and subsection (1) of this section, the juvenile
court counselor assigned to the matter shall make all reasonable
efforts to advise the parents, guardian, or legal custodian of the time
and place of any shelter care hearing, request that they be present,
and inform them of their basic rights as provided in RCW 13.34.090.
(3) Reasonable efforts to advise and to give notice, as required in
RCW 13.34.060(2) and subsections (1) and (2) of this section, shall
include, at a minimum, investigation of the whereabouts of the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian. If such reasonable efforts are not
successful, or the parent, guardian, or legal custodian does not appear
at the shelter care hearing, the petitioner shall testify at the
hearing or state in a declaration:
(a) The efforts made to investigate the whereabouts of, and to
advise, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian; and
(b) Whether actual advice of rights was made, to whom it was made,
and how it was made, including the substance of any oral communication
or copies of written materials used.
(4) The court shall hear evidence regarding notice given to, and
efforts to notify, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian and shall
examine the need for shelter care. The court shall hear evidence
regarding the efforts made to place the child with a relative. The
court shall make an express finding as to whether the notice required
under RCW 13.34.060(2) and subsections (1) and (2) of this section was
given to the parent, guardian, or legal custodian. All parties have
the right to present testimony to the court regarding the need or lack
of need for shelter care. Hearsay evidence before the court regarding
the need or lack of need for shelter care must be supported by sworn
testimony, affidavit, or declaration of the person offering such
evidence.
(5)(a) A shelter care order issued pursuant to RCW 13.34.065 shall
include the requirement for a case conference as provided in RCW
13.34.067. However, if the parent is not present at the shelter care
hearing, or does not agree to the case conference, the court shall not
include the requirement for the case conference in the shelter care
order.
(b) If the court orders a case conference, the shelter care order
shall include notice to all parties and establish the date, time, and
location of the case conference which shall be no later than thirty
days prior to the fact-finding hearing.
(c) The court may order a conference or meeting as an alternative
to the case conference required under RCW 13.34.067 so long as the
conference or meeting ordered by the court meets all requirements under
RCW 13.34.067, including the requirement of a written agreement
specifying the services to be provided to the parent.
(6) A shelter care order issued pursuant to RCW 13.34.065 may be
amended at any time with notice and hearing thereon. The shelter care
decision of placement shall be modified only upon a showing of change
in circumstances. No child may be placed in shelter care for longer
than thirty days without an order, signed by the judge, authorizing
continued shelter care.
(7) Any parent, guardian, or legal custodian who for good cause is
unable to attend the initial shelter care hearing may request that a
subsequent shelter care hearing be scheduled. The request shall be
made to the clerk of the court where the petition is filed prior to the
initial shelter care hearing. Upon the request of the parent, the
court shall schedule the hearing within seventy-two hours of the
request, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. The clerk shall
notify all other parties of the hearing by any reasonable means.

--- END ---