BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.130 and 2002 c 320 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
shall be subject to continuing review and evaluation by the county or
city that adopted them. Except as otherwise provided, a county or city
shall take legislative action to review and, if needed, revise its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure the
plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter
according to the time periods specified in subsection (4) of this
section. Except as otherwise provided, a county or city not planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if needed, revise
its policies and development regulations regarding critical areas and
natural resource lands adopted according to this chapter to ensure
these policies and regulations comply with the requirements of this
chapter according to the time periods specified in subsection (4) of
this section. Legislative action means the adoption of a resolution or
ordinance following notice and a public hearing indicating at a
minimum, a finding that a review and evaluation has occurred and
identifying the revisions made, or that a revision was not needed and
the reasons therefore. The review and evaluation required by this
subsection may be combined with the review required by subsection (3)
of this section. The review and evaluation required by this subsection
shall include, but is not limited to, consideration of critical area
ordinances and, if planning under RCW 36.70A.040, an analysis of the
population allocated to a city or county from the most recent ten-year
population forecast by the office of financial management.
(b) Any amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan
shall conform to this chapter. Any amendment of or revision to
development regulations shall be consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan.
(2)(a) Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate
to the public a public participation program consistent with RCW
36.70A.035 and 36.70A.140 that identifies procedures and schedules
whereby updates, proposed amendments, or revisions of the comprehensive
plan are considered by the governing body of the county or city no more
frequently than once every year. "Updates" means to review and revise,
if needed, according to subsection (1) of this section, and the time
periods specified in subsection (4) of this section or in accordance
with subsections (5) through (7) of this section. Amendments may be
considered more frequently than once per year under the following
circumstances:
(i) The initial adoption of a subarea plan that does not modify the
comprehensive plan policies and designations applicable to the subarea;
(ii) The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under
the procedures set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW; and
(iii) The amendment of the capital facilities element of a
comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently with the adoption or
amendment of a county or city budget.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all
proposals shall be considered by the governing body concurrently so the
cumulative effect of the various proposals can be ascertained.
However, after appropriate public participation a county or city may
adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that conform
with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board
or with the court.
(3) Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW
36.70A.110 shall review, at least every ten years, its designated urban
growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both the
incorporated and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In
conjunction with this review by the county, each city located within an
urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within its
boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within
the county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions
of the urban growth areas. The county comprehensive plan designating
urban growth areas, and the densities permitted in the urban growth
areas by the comprehensive plans of the county and each city located
within the urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the
urban growth projected to occur in the county for the succeeding
twenty-year period. The review required by this subsection may be
combined with the review and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.
(4) The department shall establish a schedule for counties and
cities to take action to review and, if needed, revise their
comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and
regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter. Except as
provided in subsections (5) through (7) of this section, the schedule
established by the department shall provide for the reviews and
evaluations to be completed as follows:
(a) On or before December 1, 2004, and every seven years
thereafter, for Clallam, Clark, Jefferson, King, Kitsap, Pierce,
Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those
counties;
(b) On or before December 1, 2005, and every seven years
thereafter, for Cowlitz, Island, Lewis, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and
Skamania counties and the cities within those counties;
(c) On or before December 1, 2006, and every seven years
thereafter, for Benton, Chelan, Douglas, Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and
Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; and
(d) On or before December 1, 2007, and every seven years
thereafter, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield,
Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille,
Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and the cities
within those counties.
(5) If a county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 meets all of the
criteria in (a) through (e) of this subsection, its legislative body
may by resolution choose to forgo one update required by subsection (4)
of this section every fourteen years.
(a) The county has a population of less than fifty thousand two
years prior to the date it is required to conduct its review as
required in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) The county had its population increase by less than seventeen
percent in the ten years prior to the official population estimates
issued by the office of financial management more than two years prior
to the update deadline required under subsection (4) of this section;
(c) The department of community, trade, and economic development
determines that the county has revised its policies and development
regulations regarding critical areas and natural resource lands adopted
according to this chapter to comply with RCW 36.70A.060, 36.70A.170,
and 36.70A.172(1);
(d) The county has complied with any final decisions and orders
issued under RCW 36.70A.300(3)(b) finding the policies or development
regulations violate this chapter or the matter is on appeal as provided
in RCW 36.70A.300(5); and
(e) The review is the first required by subsection (4) of this
section or the county completed the prior review required by subsection
(4) of this section.
(6) If a city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 meets all of the
criteria in (a) through (g) of this subsection, its legislative body
may by resolution choose to forgo one update required by subsection (4)
of this section every fourteen years.
(a) The city has a population of less than five thousand two years
prior to the date it is required to conduct its review as specified in
subsection (4) of this section;
(b) The city had its population increase by less than seventeen
percent or one hundred people whichever is greater in terms of
population in the ten years prior to the official population estimates
issued by the office of financial management more than two years prior
to the update deadline required under subsection (4) of this section;
(c) The department of community, trade, and economic development
determines that the city has revised its policies and development
regulations regarding critical areas and natural resource lands adopted
according to this chapter to comply with RCW 36.70A.060, 36.70A.170,
and 36.70A.172(1);
(d) The city has complied with any final decisions and orders
issued under RCW 36.70A.300(3)(b) finding the policies or development
regulations violate this chapter or the matter is on appeal as provided
in RCW 36.70A.300(5);
(e) There are no proposals to expand the urban growth area in which
the city is located;
(f) RCW 36.70A.215 does not apply to the city; and
(g) The review is the first required by subsection (4) of this
section or the city completed the prior review required by subsection
(4) of this section.
(7) If a county or city not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 meets all
of the requirements of (a) through (c) of this subsection, its
legislative body may by resolution choose to forgo one update required
by subsection (4) of this section every fourteen years.
(a) The department of community, trade, and economic development
determines that the county or city has revised its policies and
development regulations regarding critical areas and natural resource
lands adopted according to this chapter to comply with RCW 36.70A.060,
36.70A.170, and 36.70A.172(1);
(b) The county or city has complied with any final decisions and
orders issued under RCW 36.70A.300(3)(b) finding the policies or
development regulations violate this chapter or the matter is on appeal
as provided in RCW 36.70A.300(5); and
(c) The review is the first required by subsection (4) of this
section or the county or city completed the prior review required by
subsection (4) of this section.
(8)(a) Nothing in this section precludes a county or city from
conducting the review and evaluation required by this section before
the time limits established in subsection (4) of this section.
Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be eligible
for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they
elect to do so.
(b) State agencies are encouraged to provide technical assistance
to the counties and cities in the review of critical area ordinances,
comprehensive plans, and development regulations.
(((6))) (9) A county or city subject to the time periods in
subsection (4)(a) of this section that, pursuant to an ordinance
adopted by the county or city establishing a schedule for periodic
review of its comprehensive plan and development regulations, has
conducted a review and evaluation of its comprehensive plan and
development regulations and, on or after January 1, 2001, has taken
action in response to that review and evaluation shall be deemed to
have conducted the first review required by subsection (4)(a) of this
section. Except as otherwise provided, subsequent review and
evaluation by the county or city of its comprehensive plan and
development regulations shall be conducted in accordance with the time
periods established under subsection (4)(a) of this section.
(((7))) (10) The requirements imposed on counties and cities under
this section shall be considered "requirements of this chapter" under
the terms of RCW 36.70A.040(1). Only those counties and cities in
compliance with the schedules in this section shall have the requisite
authority to receive grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees
from those accounts established in RCW 43.155.050 and 70.146.030. Only
those counties and cities in compliance with the schedules in this
section shall receive preference for grants or loans subject to the
provisions of RCW 43.17.250.

--- END ---