BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The health care authority shall design and
implement a centralized technology assessment pilot project to
strengthen the capacity of state health care agencies and others to
obtain and evaluate scientific evidence regarding evolving health care
procedures, services, and technology in support of appropriate coverage
and medical necessity decisions and criteria. A preliminary evaluation
of the project is due to the legislature by May 2007, with a final
evaluation by March 2008.

--- END ---