BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.267 and 2000 c 115 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a person issued an intermediate license is convicted of or found
to have committed a traffic offense described in chapter 46.61 RCW or
violated restrictions placed on an intermediate license under RCW
46.20.075:
(1) On the first such conviction or finding the department shall
mail the parent or guardian of the person a letter warning the person
of the provisions of this section;
(2) On the second such conviction or finding, the department shall
((suspend)) cancel the person's intermediate driver's license and the
person shall surrender it to the department. The person may apply for
a driver's instruction permit. The person may not reapply for a
driver's license for a period of six months or until the person reaches
eighteen years of age, whichever occurs first((, and)). The department
shall mail the parent or guardian of the person a notification of the
((suspension)) cancellation;
(3) On the third such conviction or finding, the department shall
suspend the person's intermediate driver's license until the person
reaches eighteen years of age, and mail the parent or guardian of the
person a notification of the suspension.
For the purposes of this section, a single ticket for one or more
traffic offenses constitutes a single traffic offense.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.055 and 2004 c 249 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Driver's instruction permit. The department may issue a
driver's instruction permit with or without a photograph to an
applicant who has successfully passed all parts of the examination
other than the driving test, provided the information required by RCW
46.20.091, paid a fee of fifteen dollars, and meets the following
requirements:
(a) Is at least fifteen and one-half years of age; or
(b) Is at least fifteen years of age and:
(i) Has submitted a proper application; and
(ii) Is enrolled in a traffic safety education program offered,
approved, and accredited by the superintendent of public instruction or
offered by a driver training school licensed and inspected by the
department of licensing under chapter 46.82 RCW, that includes practice
driving.
(2) Waiver of written examination for instruction permit. The
department may waive the written examination, if, at the time of
application, an applicant is enrolled in:
(a) A traffic safety education course as defined by RCW
28A.220.020(2); or
(b) A course of instruction offered by a licensed driver training
school as defined by RCW 46.82.280(1).
The department may require proof of registration in such a course
as it deems necessary.
(3) Effect of instruction permit. A person holding a driver's
instruction permit may drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle,
upon the public highways if:
(a) The person has immediate possession of the permit; and
(b) An approved instructor, or a licensed driver with at least five
years of driving experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.
However, if the person holding the driver's instruction permit
previously held an intermediate driver's license that was cancelled
under RCW 46.20.267, then a licensed driver with at least ten years of
driving experience must occupy the seat beside the driver.
(4) Term of instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is
valid for one year from the date of issue.
(a) The department may issue one additional one-year permit.
(b) The department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds
after an investigation that the permittee is diligently seeking to
improve driving proficiency.
(c) A person applying to renew an instruction permit must submit
the application to the department in person.

--- END ---