BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall, in consultation with local air pollution
control agencies, the state fire protection policy board, and the
department of health, develop a list, as guidance, of hazardous
materials commonly found in structures, that would pose a risk of a
carcinogenic, toxic, or any other adverse health or environmental
effect, if not removed from a structure before the structure's
intentional destruction as part of a fire fighter training exercise.
In developing the list, consideration shall be given to the quantity or
concentration of the materials generally found in such structures, and
may include such items as asphalt shingles, tar paper, insulation,
paints, chemicals, plastics, petroleum-based products, and carpeting or
other flooring materials.

Sec. 2 RCW 52.12.150 and 2000 c 199 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Without obtaining a permit issued under RCW 70.94.650, fire
protection district fire fighters may set fire to structures located
outside of urban growth areas in counties that plan under the
requirements of RCW 36.70A.040, and outside of any city with a
population of ten thousand or more in all other counties, for
instruction in methods of fire fighting, if all of the following
conditions are met:
(1) In consideration of prevailing air patterns, the fire is
unlikely to cause air pollution in areas of sensitivity downwind of the
proposed fire location;
(2) The fire is not located in an area that is declared to be in an
air pollution episode or any stage of an impaired air quality as
defined in RCW 70.94.715 and 70.94.473;
(3) Nuisance laws are applicable to the fire, including nuisances
related to the unreasonable interference with the enjoyment of life and
property and the depositing of particulate matter or ash on other
property;
(4) Notice of the fire is provided to the owners of property
adjoining the property on which the fire will occur, to other persons
who potentially will be impacted by the fire, and to additional persons
in a broader manner as specifically requested by the local air
pollution control agency or the department of ecology;
(5) Each structure that is proposed to be set on fire must be
identified specifically as a structure to be set on fire. Each other
structure on the same parcel of property that is not proposed to be set
on fire must be identified specifically as a structure not to be set on
fire; and
(6) Before setting a structure on fire, a good-faith inspection is
conducted by the fire agency or fire protection district conducting the
training fire to determine if: (a) Materials containing asbestos are
present((, the inspection is documented in writing and forwarded to the
appropriate local air authority or the department of ecology if there
is no local air authority, and asbestos that is found is)); or (b)
other hazardous materials, as identified under section 1 of this act,
are present. If any asbestos is found, or other hazardous materials in
a quantity or concentration that pose a significant or potential
adverse risk to human health or the environment are found, the material
must be removed as required by state and federal laws. The inspection
must be documented in writing and forwarded to the appropriate local
air authority or the department of ecology if there is no local air
authority.

--- END ---