BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.25.800 and 2003 c 126 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature ((recognizes)) finds that coordinated funding
efforts are needed to maintain, develop, and improve the state's
community outdoor athletic fields. Rapid population growth and
increased urbanization have caused a decline in suitable outdoor fields
for community athletic activities and has resulted in overcrowding and
deterioration of existing surfaces. Lack of adequate community outdoor
athletic fields directly affects the health and well-being of all
citizens of the state, reduces the state's economic viability, and
prevents Washington from maintaining and achieving the quality of life
that it deserves. Therefore, it is the policy of ((the)) all
appropriate state and ((its agencies)) local entities to maintain,
develop, fund, and improve youth or community athletic facilities,
including but not limited to community outdoor athletic fields.
(2) The legislature also finds that the supreme court, in King
County v. Central Puget Sound Growth Mgmt. Hearings Bd., 142 Wn.2d 543,
14 P.3d 133 (2000), held that lands designated as agricultural may not
be used for recreational facilities. Furthermore, the legislature
finds that this decision and the absence of an enacted legislative
response have illustrated the urgent need for a legislative remedy
addressing the growing and interrelated challenges of population
growth, the need for outdoor recreational facilities, and the
conservation of agricultural lands.
(3) In carrying out ((this)) the policy outlined in this section,
the legislature intends to promote the building of new community
outdoor athletic fields, the upgrading of existing community outdoor
athletic fields, and the maintenance of existing community outdoor
athletic fields across the state of Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.25.820 and 2003 c 126 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to available resources, the interagency committee for
outdoor recreation may:
(1) Prepare and update a strategic plan for the development,
maintenance, and improvement of community outdoor athletic fields in
the state. In the preparation of such plan, the interagency committee
for outdoor recreation may use available data from federal, state, and
local agencies having community outdoor athletic responsibilities, user
groups, private sector interests, and the general public. The plan may
include, but is not limited to:
(a) An inventory of current community outdoor athletic fields;
(b) A survey of land adjacent to or within counties or cities
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that is designated as reserved for
agricultural uses, but not currently being used for the commercial
production of food or other agricultural products, and may be suitable
for temporary use as an outdoor recreational field based on its
proximity to communities that are underserved by outdoor recreational
fields, its size, the use of neighboring properties, and the initial
willingness of the landowner to participate;
(c) A forecast of demand for these fields;
(((c))) (d) An identification and analysis of actual and potential
funding sources; and
(((d))) (e) Other information the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation deems appropriate to carry out the purposes of RCW
79A.25.800 through 79A.25.830;
(2) Determine the eligibility requirements for cities, counties,
and qualified nonprofit organizations to access funding from the youth
athletic facility account created in RCW 43.99N.060(4);
(3) Encourage and provide opportunities for interagency and
regional coordination and cooperative efforts between public agencies
and between public entities and nonprofit organizations involved in the
maintenance, development, and improvement of community outdoor athletic
fields; and
(4) Create and maintain data, studies, research, and other
information relating to community outdoor athletic fields in the state,
and to encourage the exchange of this information.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.060 and 1998 c 286 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040, and each city within such county, shall adopt development
regulations on or before September 1, 1991, to assure the conservation
of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated under
RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations adopted under this subsection may not
prohibit uses legally existing on any parcel prior to their adoption
and shall remain in effect until the county or city adopts development
regulations pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040. Such regulations shall assure
that the use of lands adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral
resource lands shall not interfere with the continued use, in the
accustomed manner and in accordance with best management practices, of
these designated lands for the production of food, agricultural
products, or timber, or for the extraction of minerals. Counties and
cities shall require that all plats, short plats, development permits,
and building permits issued for development activities on, or within
five hundred feet of, lands designated as agricultural lands, forest
lands, or mineral resource lands, contain a notice that the subject
property is within or near designated agricultural lands, forest lands,
or mineral resource lands on which a variety of commercial activities
may occur that are not compatible with residential development for
certain periods of limited duration. The notice for mineral resource
lands shall also inform that an application might be made for mining-related activities, including mining, extraction, washing, crushing,
stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and recycling of minerals.
(b)(i) The development regulations of a county or city planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 may permit agricultural lands designated pursuant
to RCW 36.70A.170 that are not being used for the commercial production
of food or other agricultural products to be used for recreational
activities, including, but not limited to, playing fields for sports
played on grass.
(ii) Counties and cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that permit
agricultural land to be used for recreational activities may not permit
permanent structures to be erected on the land, and may not permit more
than one percent of the designated agricultural land within the
jurisdiction as of June 1, 2004, to be used for recreational
activities, but may permit removable structures and playing fields
constructed before June 1, 2004, that support the use of the land for
recreational activities. The regulations may require the landowner to
submit to the legislative authority of the jurisdiction a plan
providing for the resumption of the commercial production of food or
other agricultural products on the land.
(2) Each county and city shall adopt development regulations that
protect critical areas that are required to be designated under RCW
36.70A.170. For counties and cities that are required or choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be
adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the
counties and cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on
or before March 1, 1992.
(3) Such counties and cities shall review these designations and
development regulations when adopting their comprehensive plans under
RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development regulations under RCW
36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and development regulations
to insure consistency.
(4) Forest land and agricultural land located within urban growth
areas shall not be designated by a county or city as forest land or
agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW
36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a program authorizing
transfer or purchase of development rights.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.177 and 2004 c 207 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county or a city may use a variety of innovative zoning
techniques in areas designated as agricultural lands of long-term
commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170. The innovative zoning
techniques should be designed to conserve agricultural lands and
encourage the agricultural economy. A county or city should encourage
nonagricultural uses to be limited to lands with poor soils or
otherwise not suitable for agricultural purposes.
(2) Innovative zoning techniques a county or city may consider
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Agricultural zoning, which limits the density of development
and restricts or prohibits nonfarm uses of agricultural land and may
allow accessory uses that support, promote, or sustain agricultural
operations and production, as provided in subsection (3) of this
section;
(b) Cluster zoning, which allows new development on one portion of
the land, leaving the remainder in agricultural or open space uses;
(c) Large lot zoning, which establishes as a minimum lot size the
amount of land necessary to achieve a successful farming practice;
(d) Quarter/quarter zoning, which permits one residential dwelling
on a one-acre minimum lot for each one-sixteenth of a section of land;
and
(e) Sliding scale zoning, which allows the number of lots for
single-family residential purposes with a minimum lot size of one acre
to increase inversely as the size of the total acreage increases.
(3)(a) Accessory uses allowed under subsection (2)(a) of this
section shall comply with the following:
(i) Accessory uses shall be located, designed, and operated so as
not to interfere with natural resource land uses and shall be accessory
to the growing of crops or raising of animals;
(ii) Accessory commercial or retail uses shall predominately
produce, store, or sell regionally produced agricultural products from
one or more producers, products derived from regional agricultural
production, agriculturally related experiences, or products produced
on-site. Accessory commercial and retail uses shall offer for sale
predominantly products or services produced on-site; and
(iii) Accessory uses may operate out of existing or new buildings
with parking and other supportive uses consistent with the size and
scale of existing agricultural buildings on the site but shall not
otherwise convert agricultural land to nonagricultural uses.
(b) Accessory uses may include compatible commercial or retail uses
including, but not limited to:
(i) Storage and refrigeration of regional agricultural products;
(ii) Production, sales, and marketing of value-added agricultural
products derived from regional sources;
(iii) Supplemental sources of on-farm income that support and
sustain on-farm agricultural operations and production;
(iv) Support services that facilitate the production, marketing,
and distribution of agricultural products; and
(v) Off-farm and on-farm sales and marketing of predominately
regional agricultural products and experiences, locally made art and
arts and crafts, and ancillary retail sales or service activities.
(4)(a) A county or city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may permit
agricultural lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170 that are not
being used for the commercial production of food or other agricultural
products to be used for recreational activities, including, but not
limited to, playing fields for sports played on grass.
(b) Counties and cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that permit
agricultural land to be used for recreational activities may not permit
permanent structures to be erected on the land, and may not permit more
than one percent of the designated agricultural land within the
jurisdiction as of June 1, 2004, to be used for recreational activities
but may permit removable structures and playing fields constructed
before June 1, 2004, that support the use of the land for recreational
activities. The regulations may require the landowner to submit to the
legislative authority of the jurisdiction a plan providing for the
resumption of the commercial production of food or other agricultural
products on the land.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.58.100 and 1997 c 369 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The master programs provided for in this chapter, when adopted
or approved by the department shall constitute use regulations for the
various shorelines of the state. In preparing the master programs, and
any amendments thereto, the department and local governments shall to
the extent feasible:
(a) Utilize a systematic interdisciplinary approach which will
insure the integrated use of the natural and social sciences and the
environmental design arts;
(b) Consult with and obtain the comments of any federal, state,
regional, or local agency having any special expertise with respect to
any environmental impact;
(c) Consider all plans, studies, surveys, inventories, and systems
of classification made or being made by federal, state, regional, or
local agencies, by private individuals, or by organizations dealing
with pertinent shorelines of the state;
(d) Conduct or support such further research, studies, surveys, and
interviews as are deemed necessary;
(e) Utilize all available information regarding hydrology,
geography, topography, ecology, economics, and other pertinent data;
(f) Employ, when feasible, all appropriate, modern scientific data
processing and computer techniques to store, index, analyze, and manage
the information gathered.
(2) The master programs shall include, when appropriate, the
following:
(a) An economic development element for the location and design of
industries, industrial projects of statewide significance,
transportation facilities, port facilities, tourist facilities,
commerce and other developments that are particularly dependent on
their location on or use of the shorelines of the state;
(b) A public access element making provision for public access to
publicly owned areas;
(c) A recreational element for the preservation and enlargement of
recreational opportunities, including but not limited to parks,
tidelands, beaches, and recreational areas;
(d) A circulation element consisting of the general location and
extent of existing and proposed major thoroughfares, transportation
routes, terminals, and other public utilities and facilities, all
correlated with the shoreline use element;
(e) A use element which considers the proposed general distribution
and general location and extent of the use on shorelines and adjacent
land areas for housing, business, industry, transportation,
agriculture, natural resources, recreation, education, public buildings
and grounds, and other categories of public and private uses of the
land;
(f) A conservation element for the preservation of natural
resources, including but not limited to scenic vistas, aesthetics, and
vital estuarine areas for fisheries and wildlife protection;
(g) An historic, cultural, scientific, and educational element for
the protection and restoration of buildings, sites, and areas having
historic, cultural, scientific, or educational values;
(h) An element that gives consideration to the statewide interest
in the prevention and minimization of flood damages; and
(i) Any other element deemed appropriate or necessary to effectuate
the policy of this chapter.
(3) The master programs shall include such map or maps, descriptive
text, diagrams and charts, or other descriptive material as are
necessary to provide for ease of understanding.
(4) Master programs will reflect that state-owned shorelines of the
state are particularly adapted to providing wilderness beaches,
ecological study areas, and other recreational activities for the
public and will give appropriate special consideration to same.
(5) Each master program shall contain provisions to allow for the
varying of the application of use regulations of the program, including
provisions for permits for conditional uses and variances, to insure
that strict implementation of a program will not create unnecessary
hardships or thwart the policy enumerated in RCW 90.58.020. Any such
varying shall be allowed only if extraordinary circumstances are shown
and the public interest suffers no substantial detrimental effect. The
concept of this subsection shall be incorporated in the rules adopted
by the department relating to the establishment of a permit system as
provided in RCW 90.58.140(3).
(6) Each master program shall contain standards governing the
protection of single family residences and appurtenant structures
against damage or loss due to shoreline erosion. The standards shall
govern the issuance of substantial development permits for shoreline
protection, including structural methods such as construction of
bulkheads, and nonstructural methods of protection. The standards
shall provide for methods which achieve effective and timely protection
against loss or damage to single family residences and appurtenant
structures due to shoreline erosion. The standards shall provide a
preference for permit issuance for measures to protect single family
residences occupied prior to January 1, 1992, where the proposed
measure is designed to minimize harm to the shoreline natural
environment.
(7)(a) Master programs may permit agricultural lands within
shorelines of the state that are not being used for the commercial
production of food or other agricultural products to be used for
recreational activities, including, but not limited to, playing fields
for sports played on grass.
(b) Master programs may not permit permanent structures to be
erected on the agricultural land, and may not permit more than one
percent of the agricultural land within the jurisdiction within
shorelines of the state as of June 1, 2004, to be used for recreational
activities, but may permit removable structures and playing fields
constructed before June 1, 2004, that support the use of the land for
recreational activities. Master programs may, however, require the
landowner to submit to the legislative authority of the jurisdiction a
plan providing for the resumption of the commercial production of food
or other agricultural products on the land.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (7), "agricultural land"
shall have the same meaning as defined in RCW 90.58.065(2)(d).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A study committee on outdoor recreation
shall consist of four members, as follows:
(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate.
(2) The study committee members shall, by an affirmative vote of at
least three members, select a chair from among its membership.
(3) The study committee shall consult with individuals from the
public and private sectors and other interested parties, as may be
appropriate, for technical advice and assistance and may ask such
individuals to establish advisory committees or work groups that report
to the study committee. Those with whom the study committee must
consult include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) Representatives from state agencies;
(b) Representatives from local governments;
(c) Representatives from agriculture;
(d) Representatives from environmental organizations; and
(e) Representatives from citizens' organizations.
(4) The study committee shall review relevant statutes,
legislation, rules, court decisions, and studies and make legislative
findings and recommendations related to recreational facility needs,
the conservation of agricultural lands, and the appropriate use of such
lands for recreational facilities.
(5) The study committee shall use staff from the house of
representatives office of program research, senate committee services,
and the department of community, trade, and economic development.
(6) The study committee shall report its findings and
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the house of
representatives and the senate by January 1, 2006.
(7) The task force expires January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
Removable structures and playing fields permitted in accordance
with the provisions of sections 3, 4, and 5, chapter . . ., Laws of
2005 (sections 3, 4, and 5 of this act) shall be considered in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW
to read as follows:
Removable structures and playing fields permitted in accordance
with the provisions of sections 3, 4, and 5, chapter . . ., Laws of
2005 (sections 3, 4, and 5 of this act) shall be considered in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---