BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the P'squosa
Indians, otherwise known as the Wenatchi band of Indians, have made a
significant effort to maintain their traditional tribal culture,
including the activity of taking salmon for ceremonial and subsistence
purposes. The legislature further finds that the Wenatchis have been
repeatedly promised in multiple agreements a fishery in their
aboriginal territory and that the establishment of such a fishery would
benefit the Wenatchi people. The legislature further finds that it is
important to recognize the cultural importance of salmon fishing to
only the Wenatchi Indians by authorizing these people a ceremonial and
subsistence fishery, while also preserving the state's ability to
conserve and manage the salmon resource.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall work with the Wenatchi members of the
Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation, as identified by the
Colville business council, to identify an area to take salmon for
ceremonial and subsistence purposes in either the Icicle river or
Wenatchee river. After identifying an area mutually acceptable to the
Wenatchi members and the department, the director shall establish an
annual permit system that will authorize fishing only during the
calendar year in which such permits are issued. The permit system
shall provide that permits must be issued to up to fifty Wenatchi
members of the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation as
identified by the Colville business council.
(2) This section shall not be construed to create a right to fish
for commercial purposes.

--- END ---