BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.48.540 and 2004 c 214 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, as resources allow, shall at the request of the
United States bureau of reclamation or federal reclamation project
irrigation districts cooperatively conduct a use attainability analysis
of water bodies located within the boundaries of the federal
reclamation project.
(2) If necessary because of the use attainability analysis
conducted under subsection (1) of this section, the department,
consistent with applicable federal water quality laws and regulations,
shall adopt rules designating uses for water bodies within the federal
reclamation project that support beneficial uses consistent with the
primary authorized project purposes of constructed storage and
conveyance facilities and other water transport systems and that
recognize the unique site-specific characteristics of the arid and
semiarid regions of the state of Washington where federal reclamation
projects are located. The rules shall also recognize the need to
deliver project irrigation water and to construct, operate, and
maintain project facilities.
(3) The rules adopted by the department shall support and protect
the federal reclamation project water supplies and provide for the need
to construct, operate, and maintain the federal reclamation project as
a system unimpaired by incompatible, nonagricultural aquatic uses. The
use attainability analysis conducted under subsection (1) of this
section and the resulting designated uses may be applied to all other
water bodies within the boundaries of the federal reclamation project
that have similar construction, operation, and maintenance
characteristics without the need to conduct separate use attainability
analysis to establish the designated uses of such water bodies.

--- END ---