BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the primary
goal underlying state and federal academic accountability systems is to
ensure all children are provided with an equal opportunity to obtain a
high-quality education. The legislature also finds that federal
accountability under the no child left behind act of 2001 is measured
by adequate yearly progress toward specified goals as demonstrated by
the number of students who meet or exceed the standard on the
Washington assessment of student learning. The legislature further
finds that failure to make adequate yearly progress is most apparent
with students of color and students from low-income households.
(2) The legislature recognizes that research from the office of the
superintendent of public instruction concludes that low-income and
minority students encounter fewer opportunities to learn, inadequate
instruction and support, and lower expectations from their schools and
teachers, and that schools are not sufficiently inclusive of all
cultures represented in the state's public schools. The legislature
also recognizes that the multiethnic think tank coordinated within the
office of the superintendent of public instruction has identified five
factors contributing to inequitable education: (a) The existing
cultural paradigm; (b) the biases of the testing instruments; (c)
socioeconomic disparities; (d) postsecondary education and work force
ramifications; and (e) insufficient data collection and reporting.
(3) The legislature further recognizes that the national
association of state boards of education reports that: (a)
Disproportionate numbers of students of color are placed in special
education and other lower-track programs; (b) students of color get a
lower-level curriculum; (c) most students do not receive a full
curriculum that presents a complete picture of diverse contributions to
the American way of life; (d) diverse learning styles are not addressed
in many schools; and (e) many schools do not encourage students to
engage in cultural inquiry based on shared values.
(4) The legislature finds that the academic achievement gap is the
result of many factors, including poverty, educational opportunity of
parents, recent immigration, family mobility, societal and
institutional bias, and the fact that English is not the primary
language in many homes. The legislature finds that in order to close
the achievement gap, the educational system will need to change how it
approaches learning and teaching through a greater understanding of the
impact of language, culture, race, and poverty on student achievement.
The legislature declares that closing the achievement gap will require
a comprehensive and coordinated approach designed to: (a) Create more
learning environments that are intolerant of racism and exclusion and
in which high expectations are held for all students; (b) develop
curricula and teaching practices that recognize the differences in
ethnicity, language, and culture; and (c) require that teacher training
and professional development programs include opportunities to learn
cultural responsiveness skills and effective instructional strategies
that are successful in raising the academic achievement of
traditionally underachieving students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint select committee on equitable
opportunity for all is created. The committee shall consist of two
members of each major caucus of the senate, representing the committees
on early learning, K-12 and higher education and on human services and
corrections, appointed by the president of the senate; and two members
of each major caucus of the house of representatives, representing the
committees on education and on juvenile justice and family law,
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. Every effort
shall be made to ensure that members of the joint select committee are
appointed by the effective date of this section.
(2) The joint select committee shall consult with the communities
of color stakeholders, the multiethnic think tank, the special
education coalition, and the Washington state association on
multicultural education, and may form one or more advisory committees
that may include, but need not be limited to, representation from the
Washington state commissions on African-American affairs, Asian Pacific
American affairs, and Hispanic affairs, and the governor's office of
Indian affairs. The committee shall determine what efforts, if any,
currently exist to implement the following action steps:
(a) Add a fifth Washington learning goal to ensure culturally
competent education;
(b) Infuse multicultural education goals into the existing four
Washington state learning goals;
(c) Integrate multicultural and technological learning objectives
in the Washington state essential academic learning requirements;
(d) Standardize the data collection, categorization, and reporting
of all ethnic groups, including the disaggregation of data sets into
discrete ethnic populations that provide the most accurate information
about student achievement;
(e) Recruit and retain racial and ethnic minority staff and
administration; and
(f) Require that professional development is culturally and
linguistically responsive for all staff, administration, and others.
(3) The joint select committee shall consult with the communities
of color stakeholders, the multiethnic think tank, the special
education coalition, and the Washington state association on
multicultural education, and may form one or more advisory committees
that may include, but need not be limited to, representation from the
Washington state commissions on African-American affairs, Asian Pacific
American affairs, and Hispanic affairs, and the governor's office of
Indian affairs.
(4) The joint select committee shall report its findings and
recommendations, including a reasonable timeline for implementation
that is prioritized based on existing efforts already under way and the
resources necessary to fully implement the action item, by September 1,
2006, to the senate committee on early learning, K-12 and higher
education and the house of representatives committee on education. The
report shall include a determination of the actions and resources
necessary to complete the action steps in this section, including
whether existing basic education moneys can be used and the amount of
additional funding needed.
(5) The joint select committee shall receive staffing support from
senate committee services and the office of program research.
(6) Legislative members of the joint select committee shall receive
per diem and travel under RCW 44.04.120.
(7) This section expires April 1, 2007.

--- END ---