BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.182.160 and 2001 c 217 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within thirty days of receipt of proof of the consumer's
identification and a copy of a filed police report evidencing the
consumer's claim to be a victim of a violation of RCW 9.35.020, a
consumer reporting agency shall permanently block reporting any
information the consumer identifies on his or her consumer report is a
result of a violation of RCW 9.35.020, so that the information cannot
be reported, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The
consumer reporting agency shall promptly notify the furnisher of the
information that a police report has been filed, that a block has been
requested, and the effective date of the block.
(2) A consumer reporting agency may decline to block or may rescind
any block of consumer information if, in the exercise of good faith and
reasonable judgment, the consumer reporting agency believes:
(a) The information was blocked due to a misrepresentation of fact
by the consumer relevant to the request to block under this section;
(b) The consumer agrees that the blocked information or portions of
the blocked information were blocked in error; or
(c) The consumer knowingly obtained possession of goods, services,
or moneys as a result of the blocked transaction or transactions or the
consumer should have known that he or she obtained possession of goods,
services, or moneys as a result of the blocked transaction or
transactions.
(3) If the block of information is declined or rescinded under this
section, the consumer shall be notified promptly in the same manner as
consumers are notified of the reinsertion of information pursuant to
section 611 of the fair credit reporting act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681I, as
amended. The prior presence of the blocked information in the consumer
reporting agency's file on the consumer is not evidence of whether the
consumer knew or should have known that he or she obtained possession
of any goods, services, or moneys.
(4) In order to facilitate the exercise of a consumer's right to
block information in his or her consumer report, all police and
sheriff's departments in Washington state shall provide police reports
or original incident reports at the request of any consumer claiming to
be a victim of a violation of RCW 9.35.020.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a law
enforcement agency to investigate incident reports claiming identity
theft.

--- END ---