BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.60.210 and 2003 c 111 s 1521 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the canvassing board finds, or it is brought to the
attention of the canvassing board by elections staff, a third party, or
other individual, that there is an apparent discrepancy or an
inconsistency in the returns of a primary or election, the board may
recanvass the ballots or voting devices in any precincts of the county.
The canvassing board shall conduct any necessary recanvass activity on
((or)), before, or after the last day to certify the primary or
election ((and)) in order to correct any error and document the
correction of any error that it finds.
In the event that the canvassing board recanvasses the ballots or
voting devices after it certifies the results under RCW 29A.60.190 for
the primary or general election, the certified results by the
canvassing board shall not be considered final. The canvassing board
has up to thirty days after the primary or general election to
recertify the results.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.60.190 and 2004 c 266 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 29A.60.210, the county canvassing
board shall complete the canvass and certify the results on the tenth
day after a special election or primary and on the fifteenth day after
a general election, the county canvassing board shall complete the
canvass and certify the results. Each absentee ballot that was
returned before the closing of the polls on the date of the primary or
election for which it was issued, and each absentee ballot with a
postmark on or before the date of the primary or election for which it
was issued and received on or before the date on which the primary or
election is certified, must be included in the canvass report.
(2) At the request of a caucus of the state legislature, the county
auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state and
legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house of representatives.

--- END ---