BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to clarify the law
on medical marijuana so the lawful use of this substance is not
impaired and medical practitioners are able to exercise their best
professional judgment in the delivery of medical treatment without fear
of state criminal prosecution. This act is also intended to provide
clarification to law enforcement and to all parties in the judicial
system.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.51A.010 and 1999 c 2 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Medical use of marijuana" means the production, possession, or
administration of marijuana, as defined in RCW 69.50.101(q), for the
exclusive benefit of a qualifying patient in the treatment of his or
her terminal or debilitating illness.
(2) "Primary caregiver" means a person who:
(a) Is eighteen years of age or older;
(b) ((Is responsible for the housing, health, or care of the
patient;
(c))) Has been designated in writing by a patient to perform the
duties of primary caregiver under this chapter;
(c) Has met the requirements set out in RCW 69.51A.040(4).
(3) "Qualifying patient" means a person who:
(a) Is a patient of a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or
18.57 RCW;
(b) Has been diagnosed by that physician as having a terminal or
debilitating medical condition;
(c) Is a resident of the state of Washington at the time of such
diagnosis;
(d) Has been advised by that physician about the risks and benefits
of the medical use of marijuana; and
(e) Has been advised by that physician that they may benefit from
the medical use of marijuana.
(4) "Terminal or debilitating medical condition" means:
(a) Cancer, human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), multiple sclerosis,
epilepsy or other seizure disorder, or spasticity disorders; or
(b) Intractable pain, limited for the purpose of this chapter to
mean pain unrelieved by standard medical treatments and medications; or
(c) Glaucoma, either acute or chronic, limited for the purpose of
this chapter to mean increased intraocular pressure unrelieved by
standard treatments and medications; or
(d) Any other medical condition duly approved by the Washington
state medical quality assurance ((board [commission])) commission as
directed in this chapter.
(5) "Valid documentation" means:
(a) A statement signed by a qualifying patient's physician, or a
copy of the qualifying patient's pertinent medical records((, which
states that, in the physician's professional opinion, the potential
benefits of the medical use of marijuana would likely outweigh the
health risks for a particular qualifying patient)) that includes the
following information:
(i) Name of the patient;
(ii) The patient's date of birth;
(iii) That the physician has:
(A) Diagnosed the patient with a terminal or debilitating medical
condition as defined in this section or as designated by the Washington
state medical quality assurance commission as directed in this chapter;
and
(B) Discussed the medical use of marijuana with the patient; and
(C) Determined that medical marijuana treatment offers potential
medical benefits for the patient;
(iv) The physician's:
(A) Signature;
(B) Telephone number;
(C) Washington state physician license number; and
(v) The date on which the documentation was recorded or issued; and
(b) Proof of identity such as a Washington state driver's license
or identicard, as defined in RCW 46.20.035.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.51A.030 and 1999 c 2 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW shall be
excepted from the state's criminal laws and shall not be penalized in
any manner, or denied any right or privilege, for:
(1) Advising a qualifying patient about the risks and benefits of
medical use of marijuana or that the qualifying patient may benefit
from the medical use of marijuana where such use is within a
professional standard of care or in the individual physician's medical
judgment; or
(2) Providing a qualifying patient with valid documentation, based
upon the physician's assessment of the qualifying patient's medical
history and current medical condition, that the ((potential benefits of
the medical use of marijuana would likely outweigh the health risks for
the)) medical use of marijuana may benefit a particular qualifying
patient.

Sec. 4 RCW 69.51A.040 and 1999 c 2 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If charged with a violation of state law relating to marijuana,
any qualifying patient who is engaged in the medical use of marijuana,
or any designated primary caregiver who assists a qualifying patient in
the medical use of marijuana, will be deemed to have established an
affirmative defense to such charges by proof of his or her compliance
with the requirements provided in this chapter. An individual seeking
to raise a defense provided in this chapter shall be permitted to
present any and all evidence or testimony related to such defense to
the finder of fact at trial. Any person meeting the requirements
appropriate to his or her status under this chapter shall be considered
to have engaged in activities permitted by this chapter and shall not
be penalized in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, for such
actions.
(2) The qualifying patient, if eighteen years of age or older,
shall:
(a) Meet all criteria for status as a qualifying patient;
(b) Possess no more marijuana than is necessary for the patient's
personal, medical use, not exceeding the amount necessary for a sixty-day supply; and
(c) Present his or her valid documentation to any law enforcement
official who questions the patient regarding his or her medical use of
marijuana.
(3) The qualifying patient, if under eighteen years of age, shall
comply with subsection (2)(a) and (c) of this section. However, any
possession under subsection (2)(b) of this section, as well as any
production, acquisition, and decision as to dosage and frequency of
use, shall be the responsibility of the parent or legal guardian of the
qualifying patient.
(4) The designated primary caregiver shall:
(a) Meet all criteria for status as a primary caregiver to a
qualifying patient;
(b) Possess, in combination with and as an agent for the qualifying
patient, no more marijuana than is necessary for ((the)) one patient's
personal, medical use, not exceeding the amount necessary for a sixty-day supply;
(c) Present a copy of the qualifying patient's valid documentation
required by this chapter, as well as evidence of designation to act as
primary caregiver by the patient, to any law enforcement official
requesting such information;
(d) Be prohibited from consuming marijuana obtained for the
personal, medical use of the patient for whom the individual is acting
as primary caregiver; and
(e) Be the primary caregiver to only one patient at any one time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 69.51A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a voluntary registration program
for the issuance of voluntary registry identification cards to any
otherwise qualified patient under RCW 69.51A.010 who wishes to obtain
a voluntary registry identification card.
(a) The department may establish a fee and has authority to
establish by rule such procedures as are necessary for the
administration of a voluntary registration program and issuance of a
voluntary registry identification card.
(b) The department shall create and maintain a list of the persons
who have voluntarily requested that they be issued registry
identification cards pursuant to this section. Except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, names and other identifying information
from the list established pursuant to this section shall be
confidential and not subject to public disclosure under any local,
state, or federal law.
(2) Names and other identifying information for the list
established pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may be released
to:
(a) Authorized employees of the department as necessary to perform
official duties of the department; and
(b) Authorized employees of state or local law enforcement
agencies, only as necessary to verify that a person is a lawful
possessor of a voluntary registry identification card.

--- END ---