BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If the parents of an unmarried minor child are divorced,
married but living apart, under a temporary order or judgment of
separate support, or if either or both parents are deceased, or if the
unmarried minor child was born out of wedlock and the child's paternity
has been adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction or the father
has signed an acknowledgment of paternity, and the parents do not
reside together, the grandparents of the minor child may be granted
reasonable visitation rights to the minor child during the child's
minority by the superior court upon a written finding that:
(a) Such visitation rights have been unreasonably denied or a
substantial relationship unreasonably interrupted between the
grandparents and child; and
(b) A grandparent relationship is in the best interest of the minor
child with due weight given to fit parental authority in decisions
about the health, safety, and welfare of the child.
(2) Adjudication of paternity or acknowledgment of paternity is not
required to proceed under this section if the maternal grandparents are
seeking visitation rights.
(3) No visitation rights shall be granted under this section if the
minor child has been adopted by a person other than a stepparent of the
child. Any visitation rights granted pursuant to this section prior to
the adoption of the minor child are terminated upon such adoption
without any further action of the court.
(4) A petition for grandparents' visitation authorized under this
section shall be filed in the county within the state of Washington
where the child resides.

--- END ---