BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that for many counties
the adoption of zoning maps and development regulations that identify
and protect agricultural resource lands of commercial significance is
problematic. Complexities arise from the growth management act and
rulings by the growth management hearings boards that do not allow
counties to consider other important factors when designating
agricultural resource lands of commercial significance. The
legislature intends to give counties flexibility in the establishment
of zoning maps and development regulations to assure there is a viable
agricultural industry in this state.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.030 and 1997 c 429 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adopt a comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new
comprehensive land use plan or to update an existing comprehensive land
use plan.
(2) "Agricultural land" means land primarily devoted to the
commercial production of horticultural, viticultural, floricultural,
dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal products or of berries, grain, hay,
straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not subject to the excise tax
imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish in upland
hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial
significance for agricultural production.
(3) "City" means any city or town, including a code city.
(4) "Comprehensive land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan"
means a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the
governing body of a county or city that is adopted pursuant to this
chapter.
(5) "Critical areas" include the following areas and ecosystems:
(a) Wetlands; (b) areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers
used for potable water; (c) fish and wildlife habitat conservation
areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; and (e) geologically hazardous
areas.
(6) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(7) "Development regulations" or "regulation" means the controls
placed on development or land use activities by a county or city,
including, but not limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas
ordinances, shoreline master programs, official controls, planned unit
development ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and binding site plan
ordinances together with any amendments thereto. A development
regulation does not include a decision to approve a project permit
application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though the decision may
be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body of
the county or city.
(8) "Forest land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for
long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically
and practically managed for such production, including Christmas trees
subject to the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through
84.33.140, and that has long-term commercial significance. In
determining whether forest land is primarily devoted to growing trees
for long-term commercial timber production on land that can be
economically and practically managed for such production, the following
factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban,
suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for
timber production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and
services conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.
(9) "Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that because of
their susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other
geological events, are not suited to the siting of commercial,
residential, or industrial development consistent with public health or
safety concerns.
(10) "Long-term commercial significance" includes consideration of:
A reasonable expectation of profitability in producing crops and/or
agricultural products that historically have been shown to be
commercially viable within the region or which can reasonably be
expected to be commercially viable within the region, the current and
projected needs of the industry to assure long-term viability, the
growing capacity, productivity, and soil composition of the land for
long-term commercial production, ((in)) consideration ((with)) for
legal access to sufficient water necessary for commercial viability,
the land's proximity to population areas, and the possibility of more
intense uses of the land.
(11) "Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic
substances.
(12) "Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways,
sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic
water systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational
facilities, and schools.
(13) "Public services" include fire protection and suppression, law
enforcement, public health, education, recreation, environmental
protection, and other governmental services.
(14) "Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and
development established by a county in the rural element of its
comprehensive plan:
(a) In which open space, the natural landscape, and vegetation
predominate over the built environment;
(b) That foster traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based
economies, and opportunities to both live and work in rural areas;
(c) That provide visual landscapes that are traditionally found in
rural areas and communities;
(d) That are compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and
for fish and wildlife habitat;
(e) That reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land
into sprawling, low-density development;
(f) That generally do not require the extension of urban
governmental services; and
(g) That are consistent with the protection of natural surface
water flows and ground water and surface water recharge and discharge
areas.
(15) "Rural development" refers to development outside the urban
growth area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource
lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can
consist of a variety of uses and residential densities, including
clustered residential development, at levels that are consistent with
the preservation of rural character and the requirements of the rural
element. Rural development does not refer to agriculture or forestry
activities that may be conducted in rural areas.
(16) "Rural governmental services" or "rural services" include
those public services and public facilities historically and typically
delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may include
domestic water systems, fire and police protection services,
transportation and public transit services, and other public utilities
associated with rural development and normally not associated with
urban areas. Rural services do not include storm or sanitary sewers,
except as otherwise authorized by RCW 36.70A.110(4).
(17) "Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of
land for the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable
surfaces to such a degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of
land for the production of food, other agricultural products, or fiber,
or the extraction of mineral resources, rural uses, rural development,
and natural resource lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A
pattern of more intensive rural development, as provided in RCW
36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread over
wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban governmental
services. "Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban
growth located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area
with urban growth on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.
(18) "Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a county
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.
(19) "Urban governmental services" or "urban services" include
those public services and public facilities at an intensity
historically and typically provided in cities, specifically including
storm and sanitary sewer systems, domestic water systems, street
cleaning services, fire and police protection services, public transit
services, and other public utilities associated with urban areas and
normally not associated with rural areas.
(20) "Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are inundated or
saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and duration
sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support,
a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and
similar areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands
intentionally created from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited
to, irrigation and drainage ditches, grass-lined swales, canals,
detention facilities, wastewater treatment facilities, farm ponds, and
landscape amenities, or those wetlands created after July 1, 1990, that
were unintentionally created as a result of the construction of a road,
street, or highway. Wetlands may include those artificial wetlands
intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to mitigate
conversion of wetlands.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.177 and 2004 c 207 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county or a city may use a variety of innovative zoning
techniques in areas designated as agricultural lands of long-term
commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170. The innovative zoning
techniques should be designed to conserve agricultural lands and
encourage the agricultural economy. A county or city should encourage
nonagricultural uses to be limited to lands with poor soils or
otherwise not suitable for agricultural purposes.
(2) Innovative zoning techniques a county or city may consider
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Agricultural zoning and development regulations, which
limit((s)) the density of development and ((restricts or prohibits
nonfarm uses of agricultural land and may allow accessory uses that
support, promote, or sustain)) support incidental nonfarm home-based
and similar small businesses to supplement on-farm income and sustain
family farm ownership, agricultural operations, and production, in
addition to those as provided in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Cluster zoning, which allows new development on one portion of
the land, leaving the remainder in agricultural or open space uses;
(c) Large lot zoning, which establishes as a minimum lot size the
amount of land necessary to achieve a successful farming practice;
(d) Quarter/quarter zoning, which permits one residential dwelling
on a one-acre minimum lot for each one-sixteenth of a section of land;
and
(e) Sliding scale zoning, which allows the number of lots for
single-family residential purposes with a minimum lot size of one acre
to increase inversely as the size of the total acreage increases.
(3)(a) Accessory uses allowed under subsection (2)(a) of this
section shall comply with the following:
(i) Accessory uses shall be located, designed, and operated so as
not to interfere with natural resource land uses and shall be accessory
to the growing of crops or raising of animals;
(ii) Accessory commercial or retail uses shall predominately
produce, store, or sell regionally produced agricultural products from
one or more producers, products derived from regional agricultural
production, agriculturally related experiences, or products produced
on-site. ((Accessory commercial and retail uses shall offer for sale
predominantly products or services produced on-site)) Development
regulations may also permit home-based or similar small nonfarm
businesses that supplement on-farm income to sustain family farm
ownership; and
(iii) Accessory uses may operate out of existing or new buildings
with parking and other supportive uses consistent with the size and
scale of existing agricultural buildings on the site but shall not
otherwise convert agricultural land to nonagricultural uses.
(b) Accessory uses may include compatible commercial or retail uses
including, but not limited to:
(i) Storage and refrigeration of regional agricultural products;
(ii) Production, sales, and marketing of value-added agricultural
products derived from regional sources;
(iii) Supplemental sources of on-farm income that support and
sustain on-farm agricultural operations and production;
(iv) Support services that facilitate the production, marketing,
and distribution of agricultural products; and
(v) Off-farm and on-farm sales and marketing of predominately
regional agricultural products and experiences, locally made art and
arts and crafts, and ancillary retail sales or service activities.

--- END ---