BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 27.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The legislative authority of a county comprising part of an
intercounty rural library district may, by resolution, submit a request
to the county auditor calling for an election to be held in the county
for the purpose of determining whether the county shall withdraw from
the library district. The adopted resolution shall request that the
election be held in the county at the next date provided in RCW
29A.04.330 but not fewer than forty-five days from the date of the
resolution.
(b)(i) A petition calling for a vote to determine whether a county
shall withdraw from an intercounty rural library district may be made
in writing and filed with the county legislative authority. The
petition must set forth reasons for requesting the election and must be
signed by qualified voters in the county equal in number to twenty
percent of the votes cast at the last general election. If such a
petition is received, the legislative authority shall immediately
transmit the petition to the county auditor. Upon receipt of the
petition, the auditor shall, within twenty-one days, certify the
sufficiency or insufficiency of the petition. If the petition is found
to contain a sufficient number of signatures, the petition, together
with a certificate of sufficiency attached thereto, shall be
transmitted to the legislative authority.
(ii) Upon receipt of the sufficient petition and certificate of
sufficiency, the legislative authority at its next meeting shall fix a
date for a public hearing on the matter to be held not fewer than two
weeks nor more than four weeks after the meeting fixing the date. Upon
the day fixed, the legislative authority shall determine whether to
adopt a resolution calling for an election to determine whether the
county shall withdraw from the library district.
(c) Elections conducted to determine whether the county shall
withdraw from the library district shall be held in accordance with
state general election laws.
(2) In accordance with the provisions of this section, if,
following the conduct of the election, a majority of the persons voting
on the proposition vote in favor of withdrawing the county from the
library district, the county shall cease to be a part of the
intercounty library district and the process of transferring library
district property, assets, and liabilities as provided for in section
2 of this act shall commence. The effective date of the withdrawal
shall be at the end of the day on December 31st in the year in which
the ballot proposition is approved.
(3) Following the effective date of the withdrawal, a rural library
district in the withdrawing county shall be deemed established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 27.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Following voter approval of a ballot proposition to withdraw a
county from an intercounty rural library district as provided for in
section 1 of this act, a pro rata portion of all property, assets, and
liabilities of the library district shall be transferred to the rural
library district of the withdrawing county established in section 1 of
this act. The proportional distribution of property, assets, and
liabilities mandated by this transfer shall be based upon the
population of the library district and the population of the
withdrawing county according to the most recent federal decennial
census.
(2) The withdrawal of a county from an intercounty rural library
district shall not exempt any property therein from taxation for the
purpose of paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the
library district existing at the time of the withdrawal.

Sec. 3 RCW 27.12.190 and 1982 c 123 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The management and control of a library shall be vested in a
board of either five or seven trustees as hereinafter in this section
provided. In cities and towns five trustees shall be appointed by the
mayor with the consent of the legislative body. In counties, rural
county library districts, and island library districts, five trustees
shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners. In a regional
library district a board of either five or seven trustees shall be
appointed by the joint action of the legislative bodies concerned. In
intercounty rural library districts a board of either five or seven
trustees shall be appointed by the joint action of the boards of county
commissioners of each of the counties included in a district.
(2) The first appointments for boards comprised of but five
trustees shall be for terms of one, two, three, four, and five years
respectively, and thereafter a trustee shall be appointed annually to
serve for five years. The first appointments for boards comprised of
seven trustees shall be for terms of one, two, three, four, five, six,
and seven years respectively, and thereafter a trustee shall be
appointed annually to serve for seven years. No person shall be
appointed to any board of trustees for more than two consecutive terms.
Vacancies shall be filled for unexpired terms as soon as possible in
the manner in which members of the board are regularly chosen.
(3) A library trustee shall not receive a salary or other
compensation for services as trustee, but necessary expenses actually
incurred shall be paid from the library funds.
(4) A library trustee in the case of a city or town may be removed
only by vote of the legislative body. A trustee of a county library,
a rural county library district library, or an island library district
library may be removed for just cause by the county commissioners after
a public hearing upon a written complaint stating the ground for
removal, which complaint, with a notice of the time and place of
hearing, shall have been served upon the trustee at least fifteen days
before the hearing. A trustee of an intercounty rural library district
may be removed by the joint action of the board of county commissioners
of the counties involved in the same manner as provided herein for the
removal of a trustee of a county library.
(5)(a) If, as of December 31, 2005, a county comprising part of an
intercounty rural library district has a population exceeding fifty
percent of the total district population, and if fewer than fifty
percent of the trustees of that intercounty rural library district are
residents of that county, the following applies:
(i) The votes of the trustees for the district, which shall be
equal in number to the number of trustees, shall be allocated to the
nearest one-tenth of one percent among the trustees of the counties
comprising the district in direct proportion to the population of each
county, excluding incorporated areas that are not part of the district,
as it relates to the population of the district; and
(ii) A board subject to this subsection (5) shall adopt procedures
for the proportional distribution of trustee votes, including
procedures ensuring that voting rights of trustees from the same county
are shared equally, and shall implement this subsection (5) by December
31, 2005.
(b) Population determinations made in accordance with this
subsection (5) shall be determined by the most recent federal decennial
census.
(c) The office of the secretary of state is responsible for
enforcing this subsection (5).

Sec. 4 RCW 27.12.355 and 1987 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, a rural county library district,
island library district, or intercounty rural library district may
withdraw areas from its boundaries, or reannex areas into the library
district that previously had been withdrawn from the library district
under this section.
(2) The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a)
Adoption of a resolution by the board of trustees requesting the
withdrawal and finding that, in the opinion of the board, inclusion of
this area within the library district will result in a reduction of the
district's tax levy rate under the provisions of RCW 84.52.010; and (b)
adoption of a resolution by the city or town council approving the
withdrawal, if the area is located within the city or town, or adoption
of a resolution by the county legislative authority of the county
within which the area is located approving the withdrawal, if the area
is located outside of a city or town. A withdrawal shall be effective
at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year
in which the resolutions are adopted, but for purposes of establishing
boundaries for property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be
established immediately upon the adoption of the second resolution.
The authority of an area to be withdrawn from a library district as
provided under this section is in addition, and not subject, to the
provisions of RCW 27.12.380, or sections 1 and 2 of this act.
The withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a library district
shall not exempt any property therein from taxation for the purpose of
paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the library district
existing at the time of the withdrawal.
(3) An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a
library district under this section may be reannexed into the library
district upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the board of trustees
proposing the reannexation; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the
city or town council approving the reannexation, if the area is located
within the city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the county
legislative authority of the county within which the area is located
approving the reannexation, if the area is located outside of a city or
town. The reannexation shall be effective at the end of the day on the
thirty-first day of December in the year in which the adoption of the
second resolution occurs, but for purposes of establishing boundaries
for property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established
immediately upon the adoption of the second resolution. Referendum
action on the proposed reannexation may be taken by the voters of the
area proposed to be reannexed if a petition calling for a referendum is
filed with the city or town council, or county legislative authority,
within a thirty-day period after the adoption of the second resolution,
which petition has been signed by registered voters of the area
proposed to be reannexed equal in number to ten percent of the total
number of the registered voters residing in that area.
If a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered
voters has been so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held
in abeyance and a ballot proposition to authorize the reannexation
shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the next special
election date specified in RCW ((29.13.020)) 29A.04.330 that occurs
forty-five or more days after the petitions have been validated.
Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the reannexation by a
simple majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---