BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to provide the
opportunity for the restoration and redevelopment of unfinished nuclear
power project sites for purposes of creating an electrical generating
energy park with sufficient water for that purpose.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.50.300 and 2000 c 243 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies only to unfinished nuclear power projects.
If a certificate holder stops construction of a nuclear energy facility
before completion, terminates the project or otherwise resolves not to
complete construction, never introduces or stores fuel for the energy
facility on the site, and never operates the energy facility as
designed to produce energy, the certificate holder may contract,
establish interlocal agreements, or use other formal means to effect
the transfer of site restoration responsibilities, which may include
economic development activities, to any political subdivision or
subdivisions of the state composed of elected officials. The
contracts, interlocal agreements, or other formal means of cooperation
may include, but are not limited to provisions effecting the transfer
or conveyance of interests in the site and energy facilities from the
certificate holder to other political subdivisions of the state,
including costs of maintenance and security, capital improvements, and
demolition and salvage of the unused energy facilities and
infrastructure.
(2) If a certificate holder transfers all or a portion of the site
to a political subdivision or subdivisions of the state composed of
elected officials and located in the same county as the site, the
council shall amend the site certification agreement to release those
portions of the site that it finds are no longer intended for the
development of an energy facility.
Immediately upon release of all or a portion of the site pursuant
to this section, all responsibilities for maintaining the public
welfare for portions of the site transferred, including but not limited
to health and safety, are transferred to the political subdivision or
subdivisions of the state. For sites located on federal land, all
responsibilities for maintaining the public welfare for all of the
site, including but not limited to health and safety, must be
transferred to the political subdivision or subdivisions of the state
irrespective of whether all or a portion of the site is released.
(3) If a certificate holder transfers all or a portion of the site
to, or for the purposes of creating an electrical generating energy
park, the council shall amend the site certification agreement to
release those portions of the site that are transferred. For all or a
portion of sites that have been transferred after January 1, 2005, the
following condition applies:
The department of ecology shall continue any authorization under
the site certification agreement for the use of water at an electrical
generating energy park in good standing and bearing the same date as
the issuance of the site certification agreement for an amount of water
up to fifteen cubic feet per second as requested by, and for use by,
the recipient of all or a portion of the site. The certificate holder
shall assign such authorization to the recipient of such site.
(4) The legislature finds that for all or a portion of sites that
have been transferred to a political subdivision or subdivisions of the
state prior to September 1, 1999, ensuring water for site restoration
including economic development, completed pursuant to this section can
best be accomplished by a transfer of existing surface water rights,
and that such a transfer is best accomplished administratively through
procedures set forth in existing statutes and rules. However, if a
transfer of water rights is not possible, the department of ecology
shall, within six months of the transfer of the site or portion thereof
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, create a trust water right
under chapter 90.42 RCW containing between ten and twenty cubic feet
per second for the benefit of the appropriate political subdivision or
subdivisions of the state. The trust water right shall be used in
fulfilling site restoration responsibilities, including economic
development. The trust water right shall be from existing valid water
rights within the basin where the site is located.
(((4))) (5) For purposes of this section, "political subdivision or
subdivisions of the state" means a city, town, county, public utility
district, port district, or joint operating agency.

--- END ---