BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.0237 and 1987 c 4 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Gambling," as used in this chapter, means staking or risking
something of value upon the outcome of a contest of chance or a future
contingent event not under the person's control or influence, upon an
agreement or understanding that the person or someone else will receive
something of value in the event of a certain outcome. Gambling does
not include fishing derbies as defined by this chapter, parimutuel
betting and handicapping contests as authorized by chapter 67.16 RCW,
bona fide business transactions valid under the law of contracts,
including, but not limited to, contracts for the purchase or sale at a
future date of securities or commodities, and agreements to compensate
for loss caused by the happening of chance, including, but not limited
to, contracts of indemnity or guarantee and life, health, or accident
insurance. In addition, a contest of chance which is specifically
excluded from the definition of lottery under this chapter shall not
constitute gambling.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 67.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Class 1 racing associations may conduct horse race handicapping
contests. The commission shall establish rules for the conduct of
handicapping contests involving the outcome of multiple horse races.

--- END ---