BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.210 and 2000 c 107 s 218 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall maintain and manage real or personal property
owned, leased, or held by the department and shall control the
construction of buildings, structures, and improvements in or on the
property. The director may adopt rules for the operation and
maintenance of the property.
The commission may authorize the director to sell, lease, convey,
or grant concessions upon real or personal property under the control
of the department. This includes the authority to sell timber, gravel,
sand, and other materials or products from real property held by the
department, and to sell or lease the department's real or personal
property or grant concessions or rights of way for roads or utilities
in the property. Oil and gas resources owned by the state which lie
below lands owned, leased, or held by the department shall be offered
for lease by the commissioner of public lands pursuant to chapter 79.14
RCW with the proceeds being deposited in the state wildlife fund:
PROVIDED, That the commissioner of public lands shall condition such
leases at the request of the department to protect wildlife and its
habitat.
If the commission determines that real or personal property held by
the department cannot be used advantageously by the department, the
director may dispose of that property if it is in the public interest.
Disposal of property held by the department to instrumentalities of the
United States for less than full market value is subject to legislative
approval.
If the state acquired real property with use limited to specific
purposes, the director may negotiate terms for the return of the
property to the donor or grantor. Other real property shall be sold to
the highest bidder at public auction. After appraisal, notice of the
auction shall be published at least once a week for two successive
weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the county where the
property is located at least twenty days prior to sale.
Proceeds from the sales shall be deposited in the state wildlife
fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.220 and 2000 c 107 s 219 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this title, the commission may make agreements to
obtain real or personal property or to transfer or convey property held
by the state to the United States or its agencies or instrumentalities,
units of local government of this state, public service companies, or
other persons, if in the judgment of the commission and the attorney
general the transfer and conveyance is consistent with public interest.
For purposes of this section, transfer or conveyance of property held
by the state to instrumentalities of the United States for less than
full market value is subject to legislative approval. For purposes of
this section, "local government" means any city, town, county, special
district, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation.
If the commission agrees to a transfer or conveyance under this
section or to a sale or return of real property under RCW 77.12.210,
the director shall certify, with the attorney general, to the governor
that the agreement has been made. The certification shall describe the
real property. The governor then may execute and the secretary of
state attest and deliver to the appropriate entity or person the
instrument necessary to fulfill the agreement.

--- END ---