BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.32.055 and 1987 c 187 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of homicide by abuse in the first degree if,
under circumstances manifesting an extreme indifference to human life,
the person causes the death of a child or person under sixteen years of
age, a developmentally disabled person, or a dependent adult, and the
person has previously engaged in a pattern or practice of assault or
torture of ((said)) the child, person under sixteen years of age,
developmentally disabled person, or dependent person.
(2) As used in this section, "dependent adult" means a person who,
because of physical or mental disability, or because of extreme
advanced age, is dependent upon another person to provide the basic
necessities of life.
(3) Homicide by abuse in the first degree is a class A felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A person is guilty of homicide by abuse
in the second degree when he or she assaults or physically abuses a
child under the age of seven years, and recklessly causes the death of
a child under the age of seven years.
(2) Homicide by abuse in the second degree is a class A felony.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2004 c 176 s 2 and 2004 c 94 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse 1 (RCW
9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Homicide by abuse 2 (section 2 of this
act)

Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit
conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW
9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of dependent person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW
9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting
Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW 48.17.063(3))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Abandonment of dependent person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---