BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.90.460 and 1984 c 221 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The management of state-owned aquatic lands shall preserve and
enhance water-dependent uses. Water-dependent uses shall be favored
over other uses in aquatic land planning and in resolving conflicts
between competing lease applications except that a use by a
governmental entity for a public benefit, including, but not limited to
public parks, uses for public recreation purposes, water-related public
safety uses, and governmentally owned public utility lines, shall have
top priority. In cases of conflict between water-dependent uses,
priority shall be given to uses which enhance renewable resources,
water-borne commerce, and the navigational and biological capacity of
the waters, and to statewide interests as distinguished from local
interests.
(2) Nonwater-dependent use of state-owned aquatic lands is a low-priority use providing minimal public benefits and shall not be
permitted to expand or be established in new areas except in
exceptional circumstances where it is compatible with water-dependent
uses occurring in or planned for the area.
(3) The department shall consider the natural values of state-owned
aquatic lands as wildlife habitat, natural area preserve,
representative ecosystem, or spawning area prior to issuing any initial
lease or authorizing any change in use. The department may withhold
from leasing lands which it finds to have significant natural values,
or may provide within any lease for the protection of such values.
(4) The power to lease state-owned aquatic lands is vested in the
department of natural resources, which has the authority to make leases
upon terms, conditions, and length of time in conformance with the
state Constitution and chapters 79.90 through 79.96 RCW.
(5) State-owned aquatic lands shall not be leased to persons or
organizations which discriminate on the basis of race, color, creed,
religion, sex, age, or physical or mental handicap.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.90.465 and 1984 c 221 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout chapters 79.90
through 79.96 RCW.
(1) "Water-dependent use" means a use which cannot logically exist
in any location but on the water. Examples include, but are not
limited to, water-borne commerce; terminal and transfer facilities;
ferry terminals; watercraft sales in conjunction with other water-dependent uses; watercraft construction, repair, and maintenance;
moorage and launching facilities; aquaculture; log booming; and public
fishing piers and parks.
(2) "Water-oriented use" means a use which historically has been
dependent on a waterfront location, but with existing technology could
be located away from the waterfront. Examples include, but are not
limited to, wood products manufacturing, watercraft sales, fish
processing, petroleum refining, sand and gravel processing, log
storage, and house boats. For the purposes of determining rent under
this chapter, water-oriented uses shall be classified as water-dependent uses if the activity either is conducted on state-owned
aquatic lands leased on October 1, 1984, or was actually conducted on
the state-owned aquatic lands for at least three years before October
1, 1984. If, after October 1, 1984, the activity is changed to a use
other than a water-dependent use, the activity shall be classified as
a nonwater-dependent use. If continuation of the existing use requires
leasing additional state-owned aquatic lands and is permitted under the
shoreline management act of 1971, chapter 90.58 RCW, the department may
allow reasonable expansion of the water-oriented use.
(3) "Nonwater-dependent use" means a use which can operate in a
location other than on the waterfront. Examples include, but are not
limited to, hotels, condominiums, apartments, restaurants, retail
stores, and warehouses not part of a marine terminal or transfer
facility.
(4) "Log storage" means the water storage of logs in rafts or
otherwise prepared for shipment in water-borne commerce, but does not
include the temporary holding of logs to be taken directly into a
vessel or processing facility.
(5) "Log booming" means placing logs into and taking them out of
the water, assembling and disassembling log rafts before or after their
movement in water-borne commerce, related handling and sorting
activities taking place in the water, and the temporary holding of logs
to be taken directly into a processing facility. "Log booming" does
not include the temporary holding of logs to be taken directly into a
vessel.
(6) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(7) "Port district" means a port district created under Title 53
RCW.
(8) The "real rate of return" means the average for the most recent
ten calendar years of the average rate of return on conventional real
property mortgages as reported by the federal home loan bank board or
any successor agency, minus the average inflation rate for the most
recent ten calendar years.
(9) The "inflation rate" for a given year is the percentage rate of
change in the previous calendar year's all commodity producer price
index of the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department
of commerce. If the index ceases to be published, the department shall
designate by rule a comparable substitute index.
(10) "Public utility lines" means pipes, conduits, and similar
facilities for distribution of water, electricity, natural gas,
telephone, other electronic communication, and sewers, including sewer
outfall lines.
(11) "Terminal" means a point of interchange between land and water
carriers, such as a pier, wharf, or group of such, equipped with
facilities for care and handling of cargo and/or passengers.
(12) "State-owned aquatic lands" means those aquatic lands and
waterways administered by the department of natural resources or
managed under RCW 79.90.475 by a port district. "State-owned aquatic
lands" does not include aquatic lands owned in fee by, or withdrawn for
the use of, state agencies other than the department of natural
resources.
(13) "Public recreation purposes" means water or shore-related
educational and recreational activities provided directly or indirectly
by a governmental agency, including, but not limited to, environmental
education, recreational boat maintenance and storage, berthing and
tours of historic boats, aquariums, marinas for recreational boats, and
boat launches.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.90.470 and 2002 c 152 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The use of state-owned aquatic lands for public utility lines
that exist on or before July 1, 2005, and that are owned by a
governmental entity shall be allowed to continue without charge and
without imposition of any new conditions. The use of state-owned
aquatic lands for public utility lines owned by a governmental entity
that are constructed after July 1, 2005, shall be granted by an
agreement, permit, or other instrument if the use is consistent with
the purposes of RCW 79.90.450 through 79.90.460 and does not obstruct
navigation or other public uses. The department may recover only its
reasonable direct administrative costs incurred in processing and
approving the request or application, and reviewing plans for
construction of public utility lines. For purposes of this section,
"direct administrative costs" means the cost of hours worked directly
on an application or request, based on salaries and benefits, plus
travel reimbursement and other actual out-of-pocket costs. Direct
administrative costs recovered by the department must be deposited into
the resource management cost account. ((Use for public parks or public
recreation purposes shall be granted without charge if the aquatic
lands and improvements are available to the general public on a first-come, first-served basis and are not managed to produce a profit for
the operator or a concessionaire. The department may lease state-owned
tidelands that are in front of state parks only with the approval of
the state parks and recreation commission. The department may lease
bedlands in front of state parks only after the department has
consulted with the state parks and recreation commission.))
(2) The use of state-owned aquatic lands for local public utility
lines owned by a nongovernmental entity will be granted by easement if
the use is consistent with the purpose of RCW 79.90.450 through
79.90.460 and does not obstruct navigation or other public uses. The
total charge for the easement will be determined under RCW 79.90.575.
(3) Nothing in this section limits the ability of the department to
obtain payment for commodity costs, such as lost revenue from renewable
resources, resulting from the granted use of state-owned aquatic lands
for public utility lines owned by a nongovernmental entity.
(4) Use of state-owned aquatic lands shall be granted without
charge when the primary use is for water-related public safety
operations, including, but not limited to fire boats and harbor
patrols.
(5) Use of state-owned aquatic lands shall be granted without
charge if the primary use is for a public park or public recreation
purposes and the state-owned aquatic lands and improvements are
available to the general public on a first-come, first-served basis and
are not managed to produce a profit for the governmental operator. The
use shall be granted without charge whether or not a concessionaire,
lessee, or contractor to the governmental operator makes a profit, and
whether or not the public is charged a fee.
(6) The department may lease state-owned tidelands that are in
front of state parks only with the approval of the state parks and
recreation commission. The department may lease bedlands in front of
state parks only after the department has consulted with the state
parks and recreation commission.
(7) When a use is granted under this section to a governmental
entity, the department shall not place conditions on the use that
address the same subjects as a permit or other authorization issued by
a state agency, including, but not limited to, permits for hydraulic
projects, discharge permits, and authorizations for sediment caps. The
governmental entity that is granted use of state-owned aquatic lands is
not required to indemnify the department except for damages resulting
from the governmental entity's own fault.

--- END ---