BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that federal rule, 40
C.F.R. Sec. 122.42, requires concentrated animal feeding operations
have as a part of their nutrient management plans a component that
ensures proper management of mortalities and that these plans be
developed and implemented by December 31, 2006. If this deadline is
not met, the operations may be subject to fines for failure to comply
with this requirement.
The legislature finds that currently there is no clear direction in
state policy as to what will be considered proper management. The
legislature finds that conflicts presently exist between statutes, the
administrative code, and agency policies. Further, the legislature
finds that one agency should be designated as having final authority in
the state to determine what measures constitute proper management of
mortalities. Rules that establish what constitutes proper management
need to be developed with sufficient lead time so that the requirements
can be incorporated into livestock nutrient management plans and be
implemented by the federally established deadline.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 16.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of agriculture shall develop rules to assure the
proper management of all nonemergency livestock carcass disposals in
the state to fulfill the requirement of 40 C.F.R. Sec. 122.42. The
department shall adopt these rules in consultation with the department
of ecology, the department of health, and other applicable regulatory
entities. The rule adopted under this section shall be the exclusive
state requirement to meet 40 C.F.R. Sec. 122.42(1)(ii). The department
shall adopt emergency rules to implement this section by August 30,
2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 16.68.020 (Duty to bury carcass of
diseased animal -- Dead animal presumed diseased) and 1949 c 100 s 2 are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act takes effect August
30, 2005.

--- END ---