BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a new
national emphasis on the development of mechanisms for tracking the
origin of the food supply for food safety and homeland security
purposes. Systems are being developed for the registration of
livestock premises and identification of livestock for disease trace-back and trace-forward purposes for protection of human and livestock
health. Further, there are requirements for increased reporting and
for preparation of detailed farm plans for livestock operations for
protection of state waters. The legislature finds that successful
implementation of each of these systems will require submission to
public agencies of significant information from livestock operations
that had previously been deemed to be solely private information.
The legislature also finds in many cases that livestock facilities
and the home are considered as an extension of each other for which
there is a clear expectation of the right to privacy. There are
concerns that information considered as confidential business
information can be obtained by competitors including, but not limited
to, acreage planted to various crops, current livestock numbers, feed
supplies, and price, yield, and production information. Information,
photographs, and maps of livestock operations including location of
points of access, water sources for livestock, milk storage facilities,
and feed storage facilities provided to government agencies for
legitimate purposes could also be detrimental to the security of the
food supply and to the livestock operation if provided to those who
intend to damage facilities or livestock, or by the accidental or
intentional introduction of deleterious substances or contagious
diseases to such operations.
Further, the differences between state public disclosure laws and
the federal freedom of information act has created difficulties in the
coordination between federal and state agencies on emergency disease
investigation and response efforts, and a better understanding of these
differences and the coordination of state and federal disclosure laws
is needed.
The legislature finds that while pursuing one set of public policy
objectives, care needs to be given to ensure that another set of public
policy objectives are not unduly compromised.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The task force on livestock information
security is created. The task force shall be comprised of eleven
members appointed as follows:
(a) Two members of the house of representatives, one from each
major caucus, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(b) Two members of the senate, one from each major caucus, to be
appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) Six members, to be appointed jointly by the speaker of the
house of representatives and the president of the senate, from
nominations submitted by the organizations representing the category of
member:
(i) Three members total, from the media, environmental interests,
and the public at large; and
(ii) Three members of the livestock industry; and
(d) The director of the department of agriculture or the director's
designee.
(2) The attorney general shall appoint an attorney with expertise
in federal and state privacy and disclosure laws to advise the task
force.
(3) The task force shall conduct a comprehensive review of the
information that is required to be furnished or held by state or local
governmental agencies. The task force shall develop recommendations,
including recommended legislation, that delineates the information
obtained from livestock operations that:
(a) Should be made available to the general public upon request;
(b) Should be made available to the public only upon a showing that
it would serve a legitimate public purpose;
(c) Should be retained as confidential because it is business
information; or
(d) Should be retained as confidential because its release would be
detrimental to the security of the food supply or the livestock
operation through potential damage of facilities or livestock, or the
accidental or intentional introduction of deleterious substances or
contagious diseases.
(4) The task force shall also evaluate whether to require:
Positive identification of the requestor; maintaining a record of those
who submitted the request; notification of the livestock operator of
the request for information about his or her operation; and a
determination of the purpose of the information request before its
release.
(5) The task force members shall elect a chair and determine its
operating procedures. The task force shall be jointly staffed by the
office of program research and senate committee services as determined
by their respective staff directors.
(6) By December 15, 2005, the task force shall provide an interim
report of its recommendations, including draft legislation to implement
the recommendations, regarding documents produced to implement the
livestock nutrient management program and coordination with federal
authorities on emergency disease investigation and response
information. By December 15, 2006, the task force shall provide a
final report of its recommendations, including draft legislation to
implement the recommendations, regarding documents produced to
implement the livestock disease trace-forward and trace-back system.
The reports shall be submitted to the chief clerk of the house of
representatives and the secretary of the senate.
(7) This section expires June 30, 2007.

--- END ---