BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
enable nursing facilities to protect the safety of vulnerable adults
and improve the quality of services provided while respecting
residents' privacy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.51 RCW
to read as follows:
An administrator of a nursing facility licensed under this chapter
may authorize the use of video equipment to monitor and observe,
through the use of video equipment, the perimeter, common areas,
recreational areas, walkways, and any other areas frequented by
residents, staff, and visitors of the nursing facility.

--- END ---