BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that agricultural
fairs and fairgrounds provide numerous economic and social benefits to
Washington state. The enhancements of tourism, promotion of local
commerce, rural economic development, disaster preparedness, and
opportunities for youth are all part of the multifaceted, year-round
fair industry.
Fairgrounds host a variety of commercial and social events year
round. They offer educational, cultural, and entertainment events,
promote youth development, and contribute to community cohesiveness.
Fairs and fairgrounds provide community groups with fund-raising
opportunities that, in turn, provide a variety of social benefits to
the community.
Participants and attendees contribute to the local economy through
purchase of food, lodging, and supplies. Fair operations also
contribute to the local economy through the purchase of equipment,
materials, supplies, advertising, hiring local labor, and numerous
other elements that are related to the operations of the fairgrounds.
The best interest of the state is achieved when we encourage all
venues that enhance economic and social viability. Our rural
communities gain from the benefits flowing from the fair industry. It
is the intent of the legislature to quantify the economic and social
impact of fairs on Washington state; to maintain funding mechanisms
that support the capital needs of fairs; and to assess options for new
capital funding sources to support fairs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Subject to the availability of funds
appropriated specifically for this purpose, the department of
agriculture shall contract for a study on the economic and social
impact of agricultural fairs on Washington state. This study shall
include, but is not limited to, developing information on (1) the
statewide and local impacts of fairs on employment, business income,
taxes resulting from fair activity, civic and charitable organizations,
youth development, and other business and social benefits, and (2)
needed capital improvements. The study shall seek assistance from the
department of community, trade, and economic development to quantify
the contribution by fairs and fairgrounds in attracting tourism to the
state. An advisory group, appointed by the board of the Washington
state fairs association, will help guide the study. The advisory group
will include, but is not limited to, a staff person with expertise in
economic analysis from the office of financial management, the house of
representatives, and the senate. The department shall submit the
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature no later than June 30, 2006.

--- END ---