BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.68.110 and 2003 c 361 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
Funds credited to the incorporated cities and towns of the state as
set forth in RCW 46.68.090(2)(g) shall be subject to deduction and
distribution as follows:
(1) One and one-half percent of such sums distributed under RCW
46.68.090(2)(g) shall be deducted monthly as such sums are credited and
set aside for the use of the department of transportation for the
supervision of work and expenditures of such incorporated cities and
towns on the city and town streets thereof, including the supervision
and administration of federal-aid programs for which the department of
transportation has responsibility: PROVIDED, That any moneys so
retained and not expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium
to the incorporated cities and towns in proportion to deductions herein
made;
(2) Thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent of such funds
distributed under RCW 46.68.090(2)(g) shall be deducted monthly, as
such funds accrue, and set aside for the use of the department of
transportation for the purpose of funding the cities' share of the
costs of highway jurisdiction studies and other studies. Any funds so
retained and not expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium
to the cities in proportion to the deductions made;
(3) One percent of such funds distributed under RCW 46.68.090(2)(g)
shall be deducted monthly, as such funds accrue, to be deposited in the
urban arterial trust account, to implement the city hardship assistance
program, as provided in RCW 47.26.164. However, any moneys so retained
and not required to carry out the program as of July 1st of each odd-numbered year thereafter, shall be provided within sixty days to the
treasurer and distributed in the manner prescribed in subsection
(((5))) (4) of this section;
(4) After making the deductions under subsections (1) through (3)
of this section and RCW 35.76.050((, 31.86 percent of the fuel tax
distributed to the cities and towns in RCW 46.68.090(2)(g) shall be
allocated to the incorporated cities and towns in the manner set forth
in subsection (5) of this section and subject to deductions in
subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, subject to RCW
35.76.050, to be used exclusively for: The construction, improvement,
chip sealing, seal-coating, and repair for arterial highways and city
streets as those terms are defined in RCW 46.04.030 and 46.04.120; the
maintenance of arterial highways and city streets for those cities with
a population of less than fifteen thousand; or the payment of any
municipal indebtedness which may be incurred in the construction,
improvement, chip sealing, seal-coating, and repair of arterial
highways and city streets; and
(5))), the balance remaining to the credit of incorporated cities
and towns after such deduction shall be apportioned monthly as such
funds accrue among the several cities and towns within the state
ratably on the basis of the population last determined by the office of
financial management.

--- END ---