BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The state community and technical colleges hold a significant
place in our higher education system by providing citizens with high
quality instruction;
(2) The retention of excellent college professors is an integral
part to the success of our community and technical college system;
(3) Our state's colleges and universities are dedicated to the free
and open discussion of ideas that encourages the plurality of opinions
that has been the hallmark of the concept of academic freedom;
(4) Nearly half of the courses offered by the two-year colleges are
currently taught by nontenure track, part-time faculty who lack the job
security and academic freedom safeguards normally associated with
tenure;
(5) Job security for experienced faculty has long been a hallmark
of high-quality higher education and results in a more stable work
force of professionals dedicated to serving their students; and
(6) Good business practice and faculty morale is best served by the
time-honored labor practice of rewarding professors for their
seniority, continuing education, and experience.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each community and technical college shall develop a new senior
faculty position for nontenure track, part-time professors to be
officially called associate faculty.
(2) Nontenure track faculty are eligible for associate faculty
status after having taught for nine quarters.
(3) At a minimum, associate faculty shall have the following
privileges conferred on them as a result of their seniority:
(a) The right of first refusal on available departmental courses up
to the equivalent of a full-time teaching load each year for fall,
winter, and spring quarters;
(b) The right to bump other nontenure track faculty in the event
the associate faculty member's course is canceled;
(c) The right to be paid thirty-three percent of their contract by
the college in the event there is no one with less seniority to bump
and the associate faculty member's class is canceled;
(d) Their names and qualifications appearing in the college's
biennial catalogs;
(e) The right to receive annual contracts with the equivalent of
full-time teaching loads; and
(f) Annual contracts presumed to be automatically renewable.
(4) Associate faculty status shall be revocable for probable cause,
as outlined in the procedures for terminating full-time tenure track
faculty. The associate faculty member may appeal the decision, at his
or her option, including the right to a hearing and standard grievance
procedures afforded to full-time faculty by contract; and
(5) All nontenure track faculty who have taught more than nine
quarters before June 30, 2005, shall automatically be conferred
associate faculty status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each community and technical college shall develop its
associate faculty positions by means of collective bargaining.
(2) Each community and technical college shall have its associate
faculty positions in place no later than September 30, 2006.

--- END ---