BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall recognize one nonprofit statewide student
association for the state's public four-year institutions. This
recognition shall include the annual review and approval of the bylaws
of the association.
(2) Each recognized campus student government association shall be
affiliated with the statewide student association. All students
enrolled on those campuses with recognized student government
organizations shall be members of the statewide student association,
unless they voluntarily choose not to be.
(3)(a) A statewide student association fee may be assessed upon all
students of the state's four-year institutions, subject to the approval
of the board.
(b) Students who voluntarily choose not to be members of the
statewide student association may not be assessed the fee.
(c) The assessment of the fee shall be subject to annual review and
approval by the board. The amount of the fee may not exceed one-quarter of one percent of resident undergraduate tuition.
(d) The fee shall be collected by the four-year institutions and
directly transferred at least semiannually to the statewide student
association. A percentage of fees collected may be retained by the
institutions to cover administrative costs, not to exceed five percent.
(4) The statewide student association shall submit an annual report
to the board and to the relevant committees of the legislature by
December 31st of each year. The report shall also be furnished to each
affiliated student government organization and upon request to any
member of the association. The report shall include a list of current
officers and employees, a legislative agenda, and a current budget.
The report shall also include the results of an annual audit conducted
by a certified public accountant or accounting firm. The report shall
be informational in nature and is not subject to approval.
(5) The statewide student association shall operate at the
direction of a board of directors. Officers of the board shall
represent the diversity of the four-year institutions, including
underrepresented groups and shall be elected from the membership of the
association. The process for election of members to the board of
directors and the duties encompassed in their roles shall be defined in
the bylaws of the association.
(6) The statewide student association shall carry out educational,
issue advocacy, and awareness activities in the interest of its
members.
(7) The fee shall not be used or authorized to be used for any
activity associated with local, state, or federal elections or the
election process, including but not limited to, activities associated
with the promotion or opposition to a candidate, an election related
issue with the intention of influencing an election, or a ballot
proposition.
(8) The statewide student association shall not be prevented from
lobbying government institutions in the interest of its members,
including but not limited to: The legislature, the governor and the
governor's staff, and other executive branch agencies, boards, and
commissions.
(9) The board shall adopt rules as may be necessary or appropriate
to implement this section.

--- END ---