BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that public
health programs are the first line of defense against threats of
bioterrorism and epidemics. The legislature also recognizes that
federal funding for protection against bioterrorism and other safety
measures is primarily for planning, not for implementation.
Furthermore, the legislature finds that poor nutrition contributes
to significant and expensive health problems in our society, including
obesity, tooth decay, cardiovascular disease, diabetes, and cancer.
The legislature recognizes the value of creating disincentives for
unhealthy behavior, including poor eating habits.
The state's public health system is an important resource for
protecting the population as well as promoting good nutrition and
helping to reduce the incidence of disease in the population. The
legislature recognizes that public health programs are not adequately
funded to carry out their job of protecting the public's health.
The legislature declares that paying for programs that will help
protect the public against disease and bioterrorism is a necessary and
worthy cause.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.0293 and 2004 c 153 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
food and food ingredients. "Food and food ingredients" means
substances, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or
dehydrated form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and
are consumed for their taste or nutritional value. "Food and food
ingredients" does not include:
(a) "Alcoholic beverages," which means beverages that are suitable
for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of
alcohol by volume; and
(b) "Tobacco," which means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe
tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco.
(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in
subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to prepared food, soft
drinks, candy, or dietary supplements.
(a) "Prepared food" means:
(i) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;
(ii) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller,
including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or
straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to
transport the food; or
(iii) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller
for sale as a single item, except:
(A) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the
seller; or
(B) Raw eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw
animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the
federal food and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of The
Food Code, published by the food and drug administration, as amended or
renumbered as of January 1, 2003, so as to prevent foodborne illness.
(b) "Prepared food" does not include the following food or food
ingredients, if the food or food ingredients are sold without eating
utensils provided by the seller:
(i) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American
industry classification system (NAICS) classification is manufacturing
in sector 311, except subsector 3118 (bakeries), as provided in the
"North American industry classification system -- United States, 2002";
(ii) Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single
item; or
(iii) Bakery items. The term "bakery items" includes bread, rolls,
buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, Danish, cakes,
tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, or tortillas.
(c) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural
or artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks do not include beverages that
contain: Milk or milk products; soy, rice, or similar milk
substitutes; or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice
by volume.
(d) "Candy" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural
or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts,
or other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or
pieces. Candy does not include any preparation containing flour nor
does it include any products that require refrigeration.
(e) "Dietary supplement" means any product, other than tobacco,
intended to supplement the diet that:
(i) Contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients:
(A) A vitamin;
(B) A mineral;
(C) An herb or other botanical;
(D) An amino acid;
(E) A dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by
increasing the total dietary intake; or
(F) A concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination
of any ingredient described in this subsection;
(ii) Is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel,
gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for ingestion in such form,
is not represented as conventional food and is not represented for use
as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and
(iii) Is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement,
identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label as
required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Sec. 101.36, as amended or renumbered as
of January 1, 2003.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section shall
apply to food and food ingredients that are furnished, prepared, or
served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the Older Americans Act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6); or
(b) That are provided to senior citizens, disabled persons, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under chapter
24.03 or 24.12 RCW.
(4)(a) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail
sale of food and food ingredients is subject to sales tax under RCW
82.08.020 if the food and food ingredients are sold through a vending
machine, and in this case the selling price for purposes of RCW
82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts.
(b) This subsection (4) does not apply to hot prepared food and
food ingredients, other than food and food ingredients which are heated
after they have been dispensed from the vending machine.
(c) For tax collected under this subsection (4), the requirements
that the tax be collected from the buyer and that the amount of tax be
stated as a separate item are waived.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.0293 and 2003 c 168 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of food and food ingredients for human consumption. "Food and
food ingredients" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.
(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in
subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to prepared food, soft
drinks, candy, or dietary supplements. "Prepared food," "soft drinks,"
"candy," and "dietary supplements" have the same meanings as in RCW
82.08.0293.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section shall
apply to food and food ingredients which are furnished, prepared, or
served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the Older Americans Act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6); or
(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, disabled persons, or
low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under
chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of revenue shall deposit twenty-five one-hundredths
of one percent of the revenues collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW into the county public health account in RCW 70.05.125.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect August 1, 2005.

--- END ---