BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that drug use among
pregnant women is a significant and growing concern statewide. The
legislature further finds that methadone, although an effective
alternative to other substance use treatments, can result in babies who
are exposed to methadone while in uteri being born addicted and facing
the painful effects of withdrawal.
It is the intent of the legislature to notify all pregnant mothers
who are receiving methadone treatment of the risks and benefits
methadone could have on their baby during pregnancy through birth and
to inform them of the potential need for the newborn baby to be taken
care of in a hospital setting or in a specialized supportive
environment designed specifically to address newborn addiction
problems.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.96A.090 and 1995 c 312 s 46 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules establishing standards for
approved treatment programs, the process for the review and inspection
program applying to the department for certification as an approved
treatment program, and fixing the fees to be charged by the department
for the required inspections. The standards may concern the health
standards to be met and standards of services and treatment to be
afforded patients.
(2) The department may suspend, revoke, limit, restrict, or modify
an approval, or refuse to grant approval, for failure to meet the
provisions of this chapter, or the standards adopted under this
chapter. RCW 43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial,
revocation, suspension, or modification and provides the right to an
adjudicative proceeding.
(3) No treatment program may advertise or represent itself as an
approved treatment program if approval has not been granted, has been
denied, suspended, revoked, or canceled.
(4) Certification as an approved treatment program is effective for
one calendar year from the date of issuance of the certificate. The
certification shall specify the types of services provided by the
approved treatment program that meet the standards adopted under this
chapter. Renewal of certification shall be made in accordance with
this section for initial approval and in accordance with the standards
set forth in rules adopted by the secretary.
(5) Approved treatment programs shall not provide alcoholism or
other drug addiction treatment services for which the approved
treatment program has not been certified. Approved treatment programs
may provide services for which approval has been sought and is pending,
if approval for the services has not been previously revoked or denied.
(6) The department periodically shall inspect approved public and
private treatment programs at reasonable times and in a reasonable
manner.
(7) The department shall maintain and periodically publish a
current list of approved treatment programs.
(8) Each approved treatment program shall file with the department
on request, data, statistics, schedules, and information the department
reasonably requires. An approved treatment program that without good
cause fails to furnish any data, statistics, schedules, or information
as requested, or files fraudulent returns thereof, may be removed from
the list of approved treatment programs, and its certification revoked
or suspended.
(9) The department shall use the data provided in subsection (8) of
this section to evaluate each program that admits children to inpatient
treatment upon application of their parents. The evaluation shall be
done at least once every twelve months. In addition, the department
shall randomly select and review the information on individual children
who are admitted on application of the child's parent for the purpose
of determining whether the child was appropriately placed into
treatment based on an objective evaluation of the child's condition and
the outcome of the child's treatment.
(10) Upon petition of the department and after a hearing held upon
reasonable notice to the facility, the superior court may issue a
warrant to an officer or employee of the department authorizing him or
her to enter and inspect at reasonable times, and examine the books and
accounts of, any approved public or private treatment program refusing
to consent to inspection or examination by the department or which the
department has reasonable cause to believe is operating in violation of
this chapter.
(11)(a) All approved opiate substitution treatment programs that
provide services to women who are pregnant are required to disseminate
up-to-date and accurate health education information to all their
pregnant clients concerning the possible addiction and health risks
that their opiate substitution treatment may have on their baby. All
pregnant clients must also be advised of the risks to both them and
their baby associated with not remaining on the opiate substitute
program. The information must be provided to these clients both
verbally and in writing. The health education information provided to
the pregnant clients must include referral options for the addicted
baby.
(b) The department shall adopt rules that require all opiate
treatment programs to educate all pregnant women in their program on
the benefits and risks of methadone treatment to their fetus before
they are provided these medications, as part of their addiction
treatment. The department shall meet the requirements under this
subsection within the appropriations provided for opiate treatment
programs. The department, working with treatment providers and medical
experts, shall develop and disseminate the educational materials to all
certified opiate treatment programs.

--- END ---