BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.32.245 and 1993 c 233 s 1 and 1993 c 198 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) No contract for the purchase of materials, equipment, or
supplies may be entered into by the county legislative authority or by
any elected or appointed officer of the county until after bids have
been submitted to the county. Bid specifications shall be in writing
and shall be filed with the clerk of the county legislative authority
for public inspection. An advertisement shall be published in the
official newspaper of the county stating the time and place where bids
will be opened, the time after which bids will not be received, the
materials, equipment, supplies, or services to be purchased, and that
the specifications may be seen at the office of the clerk of the county
legislative authority. The advertisement shall be published at least
once at least thirteen days prior to the last date upon which bids will
be received.
(2) The bids shall be in writing and filed with the clerk. The
bids shall be opened and read in public at the time and place named in
the advertisement. Contracts requiring competitive bidding under this
section may be awarded only to the lowest responsible bidder.
Immediately after the award is made, the bid quotations shall be
recorded and open to public inspection and shall be available by
telephone inquiry. Any or all bids may be rejected for good cause.
(3) For advertisement and formal sealed bidding to be dispensed
with as to purchases between ((two)) ten thousand ((five hundred)) and
((twenty-five)) fifty thousand dollars, the county legislative
authority must use the uniform process to award contracts as provided
in RCW 39.04.190. Advertisement and formal sealed bidding may be
dispensed with as to purchases of less than ((two)) ten thousand ((five
hundred)) dollars upon the order of the county legislative authority.
(4) This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as
defined in RCW 39.35A.020(((3))) (4), that are negotiated under chapter
39.35A RCW; or contracts and purchases for the printing of election
ballots, voting machine labels, and all other election material
containing the names of candidates and ballot titles.
(5) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the legislative
authority of any county from allowing for preferential purchase of
products made from recycled materials or products that may be recycled
or reused.
(6) This section does not apply to contracting for public defender
services by a county.

--- END ---