BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.932 and 1995 c 369 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is created the state fire protection policy board consisting
of ((eight)) nine members appointed by the governor:
(1) One representative of fire chiefs;
(2) One insurance industry representative;
(3) One representative of cities and towns;
(4) One representative of counties;
(5) One full-time, paid, career fire fighter;
(6) One volunteer fire fighter;
(7) One representative of fire commissioners; ((and))
(8) One representative of fire control programs of the department
of natural resources; and
(9) One representative of the state association of fire marshals.
In making the appointments required under subsections (1) through
(((7) [(8)])) (9) of this section, the governor shall (a) seek the
advice of and consult with organizations involved in fire protection;
and (b) ensure that racial minorities, women, and persons with
disabilities are represented.
The terms of the appointed members of the board shall be three
years and until a successor is appointed and qualified. However,
initial board members shall be appointed as follows: Three members to
terms of one year, three members to terms of two years, and ((four))
three members to terms of three years. In the case of a vacancy of a
member appointed under subsections (1) through (((7) [(8)])) (9) of
this section, the governor shall appoint a new representative to fill
the unexpired term of the member whose office has become vacant. A
vacancy shall occur whenever an appointed member ceases to be employed
in the occupation the member was appointed to represent. ((The members
of the board appointed pursuant to subsections (1) and (5) of this
section and holding office on July 1, 1995, shall serve the remainder
of their terms, and the reduction of the board required by section 15,
chapter 369, Laws of 1995, shall occur upon the expiration of their
terms.))
The appointed members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
The board shall select its own chairperson and shall meet at the
request of the governor or the chairperson and at least four times per
year.

--- END ---