BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.91.170 and 2003 c 53 s 52 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any person who has received notice that his or her behavior
is interfering with the use of a dog guide ((or)), service animal, or
search and rescue dog who continues with reckless disregard to
interfere with the use of a dog guide ((or)), service animal, or search
and rescue dog by obstructing, intimidating, or otherwise jeopardizing
the safety of the dog guide ((or)), service animal, or search and
rescue dog user or his or her dog ((guide)) or service animal is guilty
of a misdemeanor, except as provided in (b) of this subsection.
(b) A second or subsequent violation of this subsection is a gross
misdemeanor.
(2)(a) Any person who, with reckless disregard, allows his or her
dog to interfere with the use of a dog guide ((or)), service animal, or
search and rescue dog by obstructing, intimidating, or otherwise
jeopardizing the safety of the dog guide ((or)), service animal, or
search and rescue dog user or his or her dog ((guide)) or service
animal is guilty of a misdemeanor, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection.
(b) A second or subsequent violation of this subsection is a gross
misdemeanor.
(3) Any person who, with reckless disregard, injures, disables, or
causes the death of a dog guide ((or)), service animal, or search and
rescue dog is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(4) Any person who, with reckless disregard, allows his or her dog
to injure, disable, or cause the death of a dog guide ((or)), service
animal, or search and rescue dog is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(5) Any person who intentionally injures, disables, or causes the
death of a dog guide ((or)), service animal, or search and rescue dog
is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20
RCW.
(6) Any person who wrongfully obtains or exerts unauthorized
control over a dog guide ((or)), service animal, or search and rescue
dog with the intent to deprive the dog ((guide)) or service animal user
of his or her dog guide ((or)), service animal, or search and rescue
dog is guilty of theft in the first degree, RCW 9A.56.030.
(7)(a) In any case in which the defendant is convicted of a
violation of this section, he or she shall also be ordered to make full
restitution for all damages, including incidental and consequential
expenses incurred by the dog guide ((or)), service animal, or search
and rescue dog user and the dog ((guide)) or service animal which arise
out of or are related to the criminal offense.
(b) Restitution for a conviction under this section shall include,
but is not limited to:
(i) The value of the replacement of an incapacitated or deceased
dog ((guide)) or service animal, the training of a replacement dog
((guide)) or service animal, or retraining of the affected dog
((guide)) or service animal and all related veterinary and care
expenses; and
(ii) Medical expenses of the dog ((guide)) or service animal user,
training of the dog ((guide)) or service animal user, and compensation
for wages or earned income lost by the dog ((guide)) or service animal
user.
(8) Nothing in this section shall affect any civil remedies
available for violation of this section.
(9) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Dog guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of
guiding blind persons or a dog trained for the purpose of assisting
hearing impaired persons.
(b) "Service animal" means an animal that is trained for the
purposes of assisting or accommodating a disabled person's sensory,
mental, or physical disability.
(c) "Search and rescue dog" means a dog that is trained for the
purpose of search and rescue of persons lost or missing.
(d) "Notice" means a verbal or otherwise communicated warning
prescribing the behavior of another person and a request that the
person stop their behavior.
(((d))) (e) "Value" means the value to the dog guide ((or)),
service animal, or search and rescue dog user and does not refer to
cost or fair market value.

--- END ---