BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The cost of health care, along with the number of uninsured
persons, is continuing to rise;
(b) Many individuals are uninsured because employers are not given
adequate health insurance options that they and their employees can
afford; and
(c) The purchaser and recipient of health care should have more
control over the services and products they purchase.
(2) The legislature intends to provide employees with more options
in choosing a quality health care plan that meets their individual
needs.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.21.045 and 2004 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An insurer offering any health benefit plan to a small
employer, either directly or through an association or member-governed
group formed specifically for the purpose of purchasing health care,
may offer and actively market to the small employer a health benefit
plan featuring a limited schedule of covered health care services.
Nothing in this subsection shall preclude an insurer from offering, or
a small employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may
have more comprehensive benefits than those included in the product
offered under this subsection. An insurer offering a health benefit
plan under this subsection shall clearly disclose all covered benefits
to the small employer in a brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.21.130, 48.21.140, 48.21.141, 48.21.142,
48.21.144, 48.21.146, 48.21.160 through 48.21.197, 48.21.200,
48.21.220, 48.21.225, 48.21.230, 48.21.235, 48.21.240, 48.21.244,
48.21.250, 48.21.300, 48.21.310, or 48.21.320.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from
offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit plans with
benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under subsection
(1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts shall be
submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any plan
offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to the
benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs ((due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network)) for a plan. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(i) Except for small group health benefit plans that qualify as
insurance coverage combined with a health savings account as defined by
the United States internal revenue service, adjusted community rates
established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
small groups purchasing coverage. However, annual rate adjustments for
each small group health benefit plan may vary by up to plus or minus
((four)) eight percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool((, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal)) if certified by a member of the American academy of
actuaries, that: (i) The variation is a result of deductible leverage,
benefit design, claims cost trend for the plan, or provider network
characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period, the projected
weighted average of all small group benefit plans will have a revenue
neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool. Variations of
greater than eight percentage points are subject to review by the
commissioner, and must be approved or denied within thirty days of
submittal. A variation that is not denied within ((sixty)) thirty days
shall be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier
a detailed actuarial justification for any denial ((within thirty
days)) at the time of the denial.
(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of employees
to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of
those provided herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
an insurer in determining whether to provide coverage to a small
employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers applying
for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) An insurer shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) An insurer may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(6) An insurer must offer coverage to all eligible employees of a
small employer and their dependents. An insurer may not offer coverage
to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer group or
to only part of the group. An insurer may not modify a health plan
with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or dependent,
through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or exclude
coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions, or
services otherwise covered by the plan.
(7) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "small
employer," "adjusted community rate," and "wellness activities" mean
the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.44.023 and 2004 c 244 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A health care services contractor offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, may offer and actively market to the
small employer a health benefit plan featuring a limited schedule of
covered health care services. Nothing in this subsection shall
preclude a contractor from offering, or a small employer from
purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more comprehensive
benefits than those included in the product offered under this
subsection. A contractor offering a health benefit plan under this
subsection shall clearly disclose all covered benefits to the small
employer in a brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.44.225, 48.44.240, 48.44.245, 48.44.290,
48.44.300, 48.44.310, 48.44.320, 48.44.325, 48.44.330, 48.44.335,
48.44.340, 48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, 48.44.440, 48.44.450, and
48.44.460.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care service
contractor from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts
shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to
the benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The contractor shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The contractor shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs ((due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network)) for a plan. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(i) Except for small group health benefit plans that qualify as
insurance coverage combined with a health savings account as defined by
the United States internal revenue service, adjusted community rates
established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
groups purchasing coverage. However, annual rate adjustments for each
small group health benefit plan may vary by up to plus or minus
((four)) eight percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool((, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal)) if certified by a member of the American academy of
actuaries, that: (i) The variation is a result of deductible leverage,
benefit design, claims cost trend for the plan, or provider network
characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period, the projected
weighted average of all small group benefit plans will have a revenue
neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool. Variations of
greater than eight percentage points are subject to review by the
commissioner, and must be approved or denied within thirty days of
submittal. A variation that is not denied within ((sixty)) thirty days
shall be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier
a detailed actuarial justification for any denial ((within thirty
days)) at the time of the denial.
(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of employees
to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of
those provided herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
a contractor in determining whether to provide coverage to a small
employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers applying
for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A contractor shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A contractor may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(6) A contractor must offer coverage to all eligible employees of
a small employer and their dependents. A contractor may not offer
coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer
group or to only part of the group. A contractor may not modify a
health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee
or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.46.066 and 2004 c 244 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A health maintenance organization offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, may offer and actively market to the
small employer a health benefit plan featuring a limited schedule of
covered health care services. Nothing in this subsection shall
preclude a health maintenance organization from offering, or a small
employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more
comprehensive benefits than those included in the product offered under
this subsection. A health maintenance organization offering a health
benefit plan under this subsection shall clearly disclose all the
covered benefits to the small employer in a brochure filed with the
commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.46.275, 48.46.280, 48.46.285, 48.46.290,
48.46.350, 48.46.355, 48.46.375, 48.46.440, 48.46.480, 48.46.510,
48.46.520, and 48.46.530.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health maintenance
organization from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts
shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to
the benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs ((due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network)) for a plan. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(i) Except for small group health benefit plans that qualify as
insurance coverage combined with a health savings account as defined by
the United States internal revenue service, adjusted community rates
established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
groups purchasing coverage. However, annual rate adjustments for each
small group health benefit plan may vary by up to plus or minus
((four)) eight percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool((, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal)) if certified by a member of the American academy of
actuaries, that: (i) The variation is a result of deductible leverage,
benefit design, claims cost trend for the plan, or provider network
characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period, the projected
weighted average of all small group benefit plans will have a revenue
neutral effect on the health maintenance organization's small group
pool. Variations of greater than eight percentage points are subject
to review by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within
thirty days of submittal. A variation that is not denied within
((sixty)) thirty days shall be deemed approved. The commissioner must
provide to the carrier a detailed actuarial justification for any
denial ((within thirty days)) at the time of the denial.
(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of employees
to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of
those provided herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
a health maintenance organization in determining whether to provide
coverage to a small employer shall be applied uniformly among all small
employers applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A health maintenance organization shall not require a minimum
participation level greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A health maintenance organization may not increase any
requirement for minimum employee participation or modify any
requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small
employer at any time after the small employer has been accepted for
coverage.
(6) A health maintenance organization must offer coverage to all
eligible employees of a small employer and their dependents. A health
maintenance organization may not offer coverage to only certain
individuals or dependents in a small employer group or to only part of
the group. A health maintenance organization may not modify a health
plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or
dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.05.065 and 2003 c 158 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall study all matters connected with the provision
of health care coverage, life insurance, liability insurance,
accidental death and dismemberment insurance, and disability income
insurance or any of, or a combination of, the enumerated types of
insurance for employees and their dependents on the best basis possible
with relation both to the welfare of the employees and to the state.
However, liability insurance shall not be made available to dependents.
(2) The board shall develop employee benefit plans that include
comprehensive health care benefits for all employees. In developing
these plans, the board shall consider the following elements:
(a) Methods of maximizing cost containment while ensuring access to
quality health care;
(b) Development of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment and ensure access to quality care, including but not
limited to prepaid delivery systems and prospective payment methods;
(c) Wellness incentives that focus on proven strategies, such as
smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol
misuse, appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and
motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition
education;
(d) Utilization review procedures including, but not limited to a
cost-efficient method for prior authorization of services, hospital
inpatient length of stay review, requirements for use of outpatient
surgeries and second opinions for surgeries, review of invoices or
claims submitted by service providers, and performance audit of
providers;
(e) Effective coordination of benefits;
(f) Minimum standards for insuring entities; and
(g) Minimum scope and content of public employee benefit plans to
be offered to enrollees participating in the employee health benefit
plans. To maintain the comprehensive nature of employee health care
benefits, employee eligibility criteria related to the number of hours
worked and the benefits provided to employees shall be substantially
equivalent to the state employees' health benefits plan and eligibility
criteria in effect on January 1, 1993. Nothing in this subsection
(2)(g) shall prohibit changes or increases in employee point-of-service
payments or employee premium payments for benefits.
(3) The board shall design benefits and determine the terms and
conditions of employee participation and coverage, including
establishment of eligibility criteria. The same terms and conditions
of participation and coverage, including eligibility criteria, shall
apply to state employees and to school district employees and
educational service district employees.
(4) The board may authorize premium contributions for an employee
and the employee's dependents in a manner that encourages the use of
cost-efficient managed health care systems. The board shall require
participating school district and educational service district
employees to pay at least the same employee premiums by plan and family
size as state employees pay.
(5) The board shall develop a health savings account option for
employees that conforms to section 223, Part VII of subchapter B of
chapter 1 of the internal revenue code of 1986. The board shall comply
with all applicable federal standards related to the establishment of
health savings accounts.
(6) Employees shall choose participation in one of the health care
benefit plans developed by the board and may be permitted to waive
coverage under terms and conditions established by the board.
(((6))) (7) The board shall review plans proposed by insuring
entities that desire to offer property insurance and/or accident and
casualty insurance to state employees through payroll deduction. The
board may approve any such plan for payroll deduction by insuring
entities holding a valid certificate of authority in the state of
Washington and which the board determines to be in the best interests
of employees and the state. The board shall promulgate rules setting
forth criteria by which it shall evaluate the plans.
(((7))) (8) Before January 1, 1998, the public employees' benefits
board shall make available one or more fully insured long-term care
insurance plans that comply with the requirements of chapter 48.84 RCW.
Such programs shall be made available to eligible employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees as well as eligible dependents
which, for the purpose of this section, includes the parents of the
employee or retiree and the parents of the spouse of the employee or
retiree. Employees of local governments and employees of political
subdivisions not otherwise enrolled in the public employees' benefits
board sponsored medical programs may enroll under terms and conditions
established by the administrator, if it does not jeopardize the
financial viability of the public employees' benefits board's long-term
care offering.
(a) Participation of eligible employees or retired employees and
retired school employees in any long-term care insurance plan made
available by the public employees' benefits board is voluntary and
shall not be subject to binding arbitration under chapter 41.56 RCW.
Participation is subject to reasonable underwriting guidelines and
eligibility rules established by the public employees' benefits board
and the health care authority.
(b) The employee, retired employee, and retired school employee are
solely responsible for the payment of the premium rates developed by
the health care authority. The health care authority is authorized to
charge a reasonable administrative fee in addition to the premium
charged by the long-term care insurer, which shall include the health
care authority's cost of administration, marketing, and consumer
education materials prepared by the health care authority and the
office of the insurance commissioner.
(c) To the extent administratively possible, the state shall
establish an automatic payroll or pension deduction system for the
payment of the long-term care insurance premiums.
(d) The public employees' benefits board and the health care
authority shall establish a technical advisory committee to provide
advice in the development of the benefit design and establishment of
underwriting guidelines and eligibility rules. The committee shall
also advise the board and authority on effective and cost-effective
ways to market and distribute the long-term care product. The
technical advisory committee shall be comprised, at a minimum, of
representatives of the office of the insurance commissioner, providers
of long-term care services, licensed insurance agents with expertise in
long-term care insurance, employees, retired employees, retired school
employees, and other interested parties determined to be appropriate by
the board.
(e) The health care authority shall offer employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees the option of purchasing long-term care insurance through licensed agents or brokers appointed by the
long-term care insurer. The authority, in consultation with the public
employees' benefits board, shall establish marketing procedures and may
consider all premium components as a part of the contract negotiations
with the long-term care insurer.
(f) In developing the long-term care insurance benefit designs, the
public employees' benefits board shall include an alternative plan of
care benefit, including adult day services, as approved by the office
of the insurance commissioner.
(g) The health care authority, with the cooperation of the office
of the insurance commissioner, shall develop a consumer education
program for the eligible employees, retired employees, and retired
school employees designed to provide education on the potential need
for long-term care, methods of financing long-term care, and the
availability of long-term care insurance products including the
products offered by the board.
(h) By December 1998, the health care authority, in consultation
with the public employees' benefits board, shall submit a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature, including an analysis of the
marketing and distribution of the long-term care insurance provided
under this section.

--- END ---