BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the importance of
ongoing professional development and growth for teachers with the goal
of improving student achievement. It is the intent of the legislature
to ensure that professional certification is administered in such a way
as to ensure that the professional development and growth of individual
teachers is directly aligned to their current and future teaching
responsibilities as professional educators.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.410.210 and 2000 c 39 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington professional educator standards board shall:
(1) Serve as an advisory body to the superintendent of public
instruction and as the sole advisory body to the state board of
education on issues related to educator recruitment, hiring,
preparation, certification including high quality alternative routes to
certification, mentoring and support, professional growth, retention,
governance, prospective teacher pedagogy assessment, prospective
principal assessment, educator evaluation including but not limited to
peer evaluation, and revocation and suspension of licensure;
(2) Adopt rules to provide for the approval and disapproval of
programs leading to the professional certification of teachers. The
rules shall be written to allow the maximum program choice for
applicants and shall promote maximum efficiency for applicants in
attaining professional certification. All current and future programs
must comply with these rules and must receive initial approval based on
these rules. The rules shall:
(a) Not require professional certification for any certificated
teacher before the 2008-09 school year, not require professional
certification before the fifth year following the receipt of a
continuing employment contract for any individual teacher, not require
any teacher with national board certification to earn professional
certification, and allow any teacher currently enrolled in or
participating in a program leading to professional certification to
continue the program under administrative rules in place when the
teacher began the program;
(b) Provide criteria for the approval and disapproval of accredited
institutions of higher education within the state to offer a program
leading to professional certification. The rules shall be written to
encourage institutions of higher education to partner with local school
districts, consortia of school districts, or educational service
districts, as appropriate, to provide instruction for teachers seeking
professional certification;
(c) Encourage institutions of higher education to offer
professional certificate coursework as continuing education credit
hours. This shall not prevent an institution of higher education from
providing the option of including the professional certification
requirements as part of a master's degree program;
(d) Provide criteria for a liaison relationship between approved
programs and school districts in which applicants are employed;
(e) Identify a process for out-of-state certificated teachers not
yet certificated in Washington who have graduated from an accredited
institution of higher education and who hold a valid out-of-state
certificate to be granted reciprocity with a professional certificate.
The board shall consider in its process to grant reciprocity any
additional coursework or assessments needed by out-of-state teachers to
demonstrate skills commensurate with Washington requirements for
professional certification; and
(f) Identify an evaluation process of approved programs that
includes a review of the program coursework and applicant coursework
load requirements, linkages of programs to individual teacher
professional growth plans, linkages to school district and school
improvement plans, and, to the extent possible, linkages to school
district professional enrichment and growth programs for teachers,
where such programs are in place in school districts. The board shall
identify:
(i) A process for awarding conditional approval of a program that
shall include annual evaluations of the program until the program is
awarded full approval;
(ii) A three-year evaluation cycle once a program receives full
approval;
(iii) A method for investigating programs that have received
numerous complaints from students enrolled in the program and from
those recently completing the program; and
(iv) A method for using program completer satisfaction responses in
making the evaluation;
(3) Submit annual reports and recommendations, beginning December
1, 2000, to the governor, the education and fiscal committees of the
legislature, the state board of education, and the superintendent of
public instruction concerning duties and activities within the board's
advisory capacity. The Washington professional educator standards
board shall submit a separate report by December 1, 2000, to the
governor, the education and fiscal committees of the legislature, the
state board of education, and the superintendent of public instruction
providing recommendations for at least two high quality alternative
routes to teacher certification. In its deliberations, the board shall
consider at least one route that permits persons with substantial
subject matter expertise to achieve residency certification through an
on-the-job training program provided by a school district; and
(((3))) (4) Establish the prospective teacher assessment system for
basic skills and subject knowledge that shall be required to obtain
residency certification pursuant to RCW 28A.410.220 through
28A.410.240.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.305.130 and 2002 c 205 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the
state board of education shall:
(1) Approve or disapprove the program of courses leading to initial
teacher, school administrator, and school specialized personnel
certification offered by all institutions of higher education within
the state which may be accredited and whose graduates may become
entitled to receive such certification, except those programs leading
to professional certification.
(2) Conduct every five years a review of the program approval
standards, except those programs leading to professional certification,
including the minimum standards for teachers, administrators, and
educational staff associates, to reflect research findings and assure
continued improvement of preparation programs for teachers,
administrators, and educational staff associates.
(3) Investigate the character of the work required to be performed
as a condition of entrance to and graduation from any institution of
higher education in this state relative to such certification as
provided for in subsection (1) of this section, and prepare a list of
accredited institutions of higher education of this and other states
whose graduates may be awarded such certificates.
(4)(a) The state board of education shall adopt rules to allow a
teacher certification candidate to fulfill, in part, teacher
preparation program requirements through work experience as a
classified teacher's aide in a public school or private school meeting
the requirements of RCW 28A.195.010. The rules shall include, but are
not limited to, limitations based upon the recency of the teacher
preparation candidate's teacher aide work experience, and limitations
based on the amount of work experience that may apply toward teacher
preparation program requirements under this chapter.
(b) The state board of education shall require that at the time of
the individual's enrollment in a teacher preparation program, the
supervising teacher and the building principal shall jointly provide to
the teacher preparation program of the higher education institution at
which the teacher candidate is enrolled, a written assessment of the
performance of the teacher candidate. The assessment shall contain
such information as determined by the state board of education and
shall include: Evidence that at least fifty percent of the candidate's
work as a classified teacher's aide was involved in instructional
activities with children under the supervision of a certificated
teacher and that the candidate worked a minimum of six hundred thirty
hours for one school year; the type of work performed by the candidate;
and a recommendation of whether the candidate's work experience as a
classified teacher's aide should be substituted for teacher preparation
program requirements. In compliance with such rules as may be
established by the state board of education under this section, the
teacher preparation programs of the higher education institution where
the candidate is enrolled shall make the final determination as to what
teacher preparation program requirements may be fulfilled by teacher
aide work experience.
(5) Supervise the issuance of such certificates, except
professional certificates, as provided for in subsection (1) of this
section and specify the types and kinds of certificates necessary for
the several departments of the common schools by rule or regulation in
accordance with RCW 28A.410.010.
(6) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and
procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all
schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to the
provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a program
for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve: PROVIDED,
That no private school may be approved that operates a kindergarten
program only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no public or private schools
shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret
societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school
officials: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the state board may elect to require
all or certain classifications of the public schools to conduct and
participate in such preaccreditation examination and evaluation
processes as may now or hereafter be established by the board.
(7) Make rules and regulations governing the establishment in any
existing nonhigh school district of any secondary program or any new
grades in grades nine through twelve. Before any such program or any
new grades are established the district must obtain prior approval of
the state board.
(8) Prepare such outline of study for the common schools as the
board shall deem necessary, and prescribe such rules for the general
government of the common schools, as shall seek to secure regularity of
attendance, prevent truancy, secure efficiency, and promote the true
interest of the common schools.
(9) Continuously reevaluate courses and adopt and enforce
regulations within the common schools so as to meet the educational
needs of students and articulate with the institutions of higher
education and unify the work of the public school system.
(10) Carry out board powers and duties relating to the organization
and reorganization of school districts under chapter 28A.315 RCW
((28A.315.010 through 28A.315.680 and 28A.315.900)).
(11) Hear and decide appeals as otherwise provided by law.
The state board of education is given the authority to promulgate
information and rules dealing with the prevention of child abuse for
purposes of curriculum use in the common schools.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.410.090 and 2004 c 134 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any certificate or permit authorized under the provisions of
this chapter, chapter 28A.405 RCW, or rules promulgated thereunder may
be revoked or suspended by the authority authorized to grant the same
based upon a criminal records report authorized by law, or upon the
complaint of any school district superintendent, educational service
district superintendent, or private school administrator for
immorality, violation of written contract, unprofessional conduct,
intemperance, or crime against the law of the state.
If the superintendent of public instruction has reasonable cause to
believe that an alleged violation of this chapter or rules adopted
under it has occurred based on a written complaint alleging physical
abuse or sexual misconduct by a certificated school employee filed by
a parent or another person, but no complaint has been forwarded to the
superintendent by a school district superintendent, educational service
district superintendent, or private school administrator, and that a
school district superintendent, educational service district
superintendent, or private school administrator has sufficient notice
of the alleged violation and opportunity to file a complaint, the
superintendent of public instruction may cause an investigation to be
made of the alleged violation, together with such other matters that
may be disclosed in the course of the investigation related to
certificated personnel.
(2) A parent or another person may file a written complaint with
the superintendent of public instruction alleging physical abuse or
sexual misconduct by a certificated school employee if:
(a) The parent or other person has already filed a written
complaint with the educational service district superintendent
concerning that employee;
(b) The educational service district superintendent has not caused
an investigation of the allegations and has not forwarded the complaint
to the superintendent of public instruction for investigation; and
(c) The written complaint states the grounds and factual basis upon
which the parent or other person believes an investigation should be
conducted.
(3) Any such certificate or permit authorized under this chapter or
chapter 28A.405 RCW shall be revoked by the authority authorized to
grant the certificate upon a guilty plea or the conviction of any
felony crime involving the physical neglect of a child under chapter
9A.42 RCW, the physical injury or death of a child under chapter 9A.32
or 9A.36 RCW (excepting motor vehicle violations under chapter 46.61
RCW), sexual exploitation of a child under chapter 9.68A RCW, sexual
offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW where a minor is the victim, promoting
prostitution of a minor under chapter 9A.88 RCW, the sale or purchase
of a minor child under RCW 9A.64.030, or violation of similar laws of
another jurisdiction. The person whose certificate is in question
shall be given an opportunity to be heard. Mandatory permanent
revocation upon a guilty plea or the conviction of felony crimes
specified under this subsection shall apply to such convictions or
guilty pleas which occur after July 23, 1989. Revocation of any
certificate or permit authorized under this chapter or chapter 28A.405
RCW for a guilty plea or criminal conviction occurring prior to July
23, 1989, shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section.
(4)(a) Any such certificate or permit authorized under this chapter
or chapter 28A.405 RCW shall be suspended or revoked, according to the
provisions of this subsection, by the authority authorized to grant the
certificate upon a finding that an employee has engaged in an
unauthorized use of school equipment to intentionally access material
depicting sexually explicit conduct or has intentionally possessed on
school grounds any material depicting sexually explicit conduct; except
for material used in conjunction with established curriculum. A first
time violation of this subsection shall result in either suspension or
revocation of the employee's certificate or permit as determined by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction. A second violation
shall result in a mandatory revocation of the certificate or permit.
(b) In all cases under this subsection (4), the person whose
certificate is in question shall be given an opportunity to be heard
and has the right to appeal as established in RCW 28A.410.100.
Certificates or permits shall be suspended or revoked under this
subsection only if findings are made on or after the effective date of
this section. For the purposes of this subsection, "sexually explicit
conduct" has the same definition as provided in RCW 9.68A.011.

--- END ---