BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that physicians and
patients are not always aware of, and do not always have access to,
available information concerning human clinical trials involving
emerging drugs. Recent news stories have highlighted the problems
associated with certain antidepressant and arthritis drugs already
available by prescription, but the information concerning the clinical
trials of these drugs has not been made widely available by the United
States food and drug administration. It is the intent of the
legislature to require public institutions in this state that take part
in human clinical trials of drugs to release complete results of the
clinical trials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
under a new subchapter heading entitled "miscellaneous disclosure
requirements" to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "drugs" has the same meaning
as defined in 21 U.S.C. Sec. 321(g)(1) and (p) of the federal food,
drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.).
(2)(a) Any state-funded public institution in this state that takes
part in human clinical trials of drugs must post a summary of the
clinical trials, in a timely manner, on the institution's web site.
(b) The summary must be presented in a format normally acceptable
by academic journals for peer review. The summary must inform the
reader that the full contents of the study are available to the public
under the provisions of this chapter. A summary must include the
following information in its title: (i) "Official disclosure"; (ii)
the name of the drug; and (iii) the name of the state-funded public
institution.

--- END ---