BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature through
this act to create an exception to the "learned intermediary doctrine"
for prescription products advertised directly to consumers, and that
the state supreme court holding in Terhune v. A.H. Robins Co., and
subsequent cases, to the extent that they are inconsistent with this
intent, are no longer valid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 7.72 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Where a consumer has sought a prescription product in response
to an advertisement for that product, the manufacturer of that product,
who would otherwise be subject to liability under this chapter, is not
relieved of that liability solely because the manufacturer warned the
practitioner who prescribed the product of its proper use and attendant
dangers.
(2) For purposes of this section, "advertisement" means an
advertisement for the product placed by the manufacturer or the
manufacturer's agent in a journal, magazine, or newspaper, or on radio,
television, the internet, or telephone communication systems, where it
is generally intended that it will be read, watched, or listened to by
persons other than medical professionals.

--- END ---