BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.28.311 and 2000 c 238 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created an electrical board, consisting of
((fourteen)) fifteen members to be appointed by the governor with the
advice of the director of labor and industries as herein provided. It
shall be the purpose and function of the board to advise the director
on all matters pertaining to the enforcement of this chapter including,
but not limited to standards of electrical and telecommunications
installation, minimum inspection procedures, and the adoption of rules
pertaining to the electrical inspection division: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That no rules shall be amended or repealed until the electrical board
has first had an opportunity to consider any proposed amendments or
repeals and had an opportunity to make recommendations to the director
relative thereto. The members of the electrical board shall be
selected and appointed as follows: One member shall be an employee or
officer of a corporation or public agency generating or distributing
electric power; one member must be an employee or officer of a
facilities-based telecommunications service provider regulated by the
Washington state utilities and transportation commission; three members
shall be licensed electrical contractors: PROVIDED, That one of these
members may be a representative of a trade association in the
electrical industry; one member shall be a licensed telecommunications
contractor; one member shall be an employee, or officer, or
representative of a corporation or firm engaged in the business of
manufacturing or distributing electrical and telecommunications
materials, equipment, or devices; one member shall be a person with
knowledge of the electrical industry, not related to the electrical
industry, to represent the public; three members shall be certified
electricians; one member shall be a telecommunications worker; one
member shall be a licensed professional electrical engineer qualified
to do business in the state of Washington and designated as a
registered communications distribution designer; one member shall be a
certified electrician who is a representative of an industrial
manufacturer that employs plant electricians; and one nonvoting member
must be a building official from an incorporated city or town with an
electrical inspection program established under RCW 19.28.141. The
regular term of each member shall be four years: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
The original board shall be appointed on June 9, 1988, for the
following terms: The first term of the member representing a
corporation or public agency generating or distributing electric power
shall serve four years; two members representing licensed electrical
contractors shall serve three years; the member representing a
manufacturer or distributor of electrical equipment or devices shall
serve three years; the member representing the public and one member
representing licensed electrical contractors shall serve two years; the
three members selected as certified electricians shall serve for terms
of one, two, and three years, respectively; the member selected as the
licensed professional electrical engineer shall serve for one year. In
appointing the original board, the governor shall give due
consideration to the value of continuity in membership from predecessor
boards. Thereafter, the governor shall appoint or reappoint board
members for terms of four years and to fill vacancies created by the
completion of the terms of the original members. When new positions
are created, the governor may appoint the initial members to the new
positions to staggered terms of one to three years. The governor shall
also fill vacancies caused by death, resignation, or otherwise for the
unexpired term of such members by appointing their successors from the
same business classification. The same procedure shall be followed in
making such subsequent appointments as is provided for the original
appointments. The board, at this first meeting shall elect one of its
members to serve as chairman. Any person acting as the chief
electrical inspector shall serve as secretary of the board during his
or her tenure as chief state inspector. Meetings of the board shall be
held at least quarterly in accordance with a schedule established by
the board. Each member of the board shall receive compensation in
accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 which shall be
paid out of the electrical license fund, upon vouchers approved by the
director of labor and industries.

--- END ---