BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The governing board of a nonprofit organization, corporation,
or association may apply for deferral of taxes on the construction of
buildings, site preparation, and the acquisition of related machinery
and equipment for a historic automobile museum. Application shall be
made to the department of revenue in a form and manner prescribed by
the department of revenue. The application shall contain information
regarding the location of the historic automobile museum, estimated or
actual costs, time schedules for completion and operation, and other
information required by the department of revenue. The department of
revenue shall approve the application within sixty days if it meets the
requirements of this section.
(2) The department of revenue shall issue a sales and use tax
deferral certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due under
chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW related to the construction of the
historic automobile museum.
(3) The nonprofit organization, corporation, or association shall
begin paying the deferred taxes in the fifth year after the date
certified by the department of revenue as the date on which the
historic automobile museum is operationally complete. The first
payment is due on December 31st of the fifth calendar year after such
certified date, with subsequent annual payments due on December 31st of
the following nine years. Each payment shall equal ten percent of the
deferred tax.
(4) The department of revenue may authorize an accelerated
repayment schedule upon request of the nonprofit organization,
corporation, or association.
(5) Interest shall not be charged on any taxes deferred under this
section for the period of deferral, although all other penalties and
interest applicable to delinquent excise taxes may be assessed and
imposed for delinquent payments under this section. The debt for
deferred taxes is not extinguished by insolvency or other failure of
the nonprofit organization, corporation, or association.
(6) The repayment of deferred taxes and interest shall be deposited
into the general fund.
(7) Applications and any other information received by the
department of revenue under this section are not confidential and are
subject to disclosure. This chapter applies to the administration of
this section.

--- END ---