BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.44.040 and 1982 c 63 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be in the office of the state treasurer, a fund to
be known and designated as the "second injury fund", which shall be
used only for the purpose of defraying charges against it as provided
in RCW 51.16.120 and 51.32.250((, as now or hereafter amended. Said)).
The fund shall be administered by the director. The state treasurer
shall be the custodian of the second injury fund and shall be
authorized to disburse moneys from it only upon written order of the
director.
(2) Payments to the second injury fund from the accident fund shall
be made pursuant to rules ((and regulations promulgated)) adopted by
the director.
(3)(a) Assessments for the second injury fund shall be imposed on
self-insurers pursuant to rules ((and regulations promulgated by the
director to ensure that self-insurers shall pay to such fund)) adopted
by the director. In addition, the department shall experience rate the
amount assessed each self-insurer as long as the aggregate amount
assessed is in the proportion that the payments made from ((such)) the
fund on account of claims made against self-insurers bears to the total
sum of payments from ((such)) the fund. The experience rating factor
must provide equal weight to the ratio between expenditures made by the
second injury fund for claims of the self-insurer to the total
expenditures made by the second injury fund for claims of all self-insurers for the prior three fiscal years and the ratio of workers'
compensation claim payments under this title made by the self-insurer
to the total worker's compensation claim payments made by all self-insurers under this title for the prior three fiscal years. The
weighted average of these two ratios must be divided by the latter
ratio to arrive at the experience factor.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "expenditures made by the
second injury fund" mean the costs and charges described under RCW
51.32.250 and 51.16.120 (3) and (4), and the amounts assessed to the
second injury fund as described under RCW 51.16.120(1). Under no
circumstances does "expenditures made by the second injury fund"
include any subsequent payments, assessments, or adjustments for
pensions, where the applicable second injury fund entitlement was
established outside of the three fiscal years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to self-insurer assessments
for the industrial insurance second injury fund that are imposed on or
after July 1, 2009.

--- END ---