BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s. c
25 (uncodified) to read as follows:
The sum of three million six hundred twenty-seven thousand dollars
is appropriated for fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, from the state
public safety and education account to the department of labor and
industries for the additional costs incurred by the department in the
crime victims compensation program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s. c
25 (uncodified) to read as follows:
The sum of three million six hundred twenty-seven thousand dollars
is appropriated for fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, from the state
general fund to the state public safety and education account for the
additional costs incurred by the department of labor and industries in
the crime victims compensation program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---