BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.060 and 2002 c 52 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A child taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.050 or
26.44.050 shall be immediately placed in shelter care. A child taken
by a relative of the child in violation of RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070
shall be placed in shelter care only when permitted under RCW
13.34.055.
(a) Unless there is reasonable cause to believe that the health,
safety, or welfare of the child would be jeopardized or that the
efforts to reunite the parent and child will be hindered, priority
placement for a child in shelter care shall be with ((any)) a person
preferred by the parent, or if no preference is indicated by the
parent, any person as described in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a). The person
must be willing and available to care for the child and be able to meet
any special needs of the child. The person must be willing to
facilitate the child's visitation with siblings, if such visitation is
part of the supervising agency's plan or is ordered by the court. If
a child is not initially placed with a person preferred by the parent
or a relative pursuant to this section, the supervising agency shall
make an effort within available resources to place the child with a
person preferred by the parent or a relative on the next business day
after the child is taken into custody unless there is reasonable cause
to believe that the health, safety, or welfare of the child would be
jeopardized or that the efforts to reunite the parent and child will be
hindered. The supervising agency shall document its effort to place
the child with a person preferred by the parent or a relative pursuant
to this section. The person preferred by the parent must apply for a
foster care license within seventy-two hours, excluding weekends and
holidays, of the child's placement with the person preferred by the
parent. Nothing within this subsection (1)(a) establishes an
entitlement to services or a right to a particular placement.
(b) Whenever a child is taken into custody pursuant to this
section, the supervising agency may authorize evaluations of the
child's physical or emotional condition, routine medical and dental
examination and care, and all necessary emergency care. In no case may
a child who is taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.055, 13.34.050,
or 26.44.050 be detained in a secure detention facility. No child may
be held longer than seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and
holidays, after such child is taken into custody unless a court order
has been entered for continued shelter care. The child and his or her
parent, guardian, or custodian shall be informed that they have a right
to a shelter care hearing. The court shall hold a shelter care hearing
within seventy-two hours after the child is taken into custody,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. If a parent, guardian, or
legal custodian desires to waive the shelter care hearing, the court
shall determine, on the record and with the parties present, whether
such waiver is knowing and voluntary.
(2) Whenever a child is taken into custody by child protective
services pursuant to a court order issued under RCW 13.34.050 or when
child protective services is notified that a child has been taken into
custody pursuant to RCW 26.44.050 or 26.44.056, child protective
services shall make reasonable efforts to inform the parents, guardian,
or legal custodian of the fact that the child has been taken into
custody, the reasons why the child was taken into custody, and their
legal rights under this title as soon as possible and in no event shall
notice be provided more than twenty-four hours after the child has been
taken into custody or twenty-four hours after child protective services
has been notified that the child has been taken into custody. The
notice of custody and rights may be given by any means reasonably
certain of notifying the parents including, but not limited to,
written, telephone, or in person oral notification. If the initial
notification is provided by a means other than writing, child
protective services shall make reasonable efforts to also provide
written notification.
(3) The department and its employees shall be immune from civil
liability for damages arising out of the placement of children with
persons preferred by their parents unless it is shown that an employee
acted with gross negligence or bad faith.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.15.120 and 1995 c 311 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of social and health services may, at his or her
discretion, issue an initial license instead of a full license, to an
agency or facility for a period not to exceed six months, renewable for
a period not to exceed two years, to allow such agency or facility
reasonable time to become eligible for full license. An initial
license shall not be granted to any foster-family home except as
specified in this section. An initial license may be granted to a
foster-family home only if the following three conditions are met: (1)
The license is limited so that the licensee is authorized to provide
care only to a specific child or specific children; (2) the department
has determined that the licensee has a relationship with the child, and
the child is comfortable with the licensee, or that it would otherwise
be in the child's best interest to remain or be placed in the
licensee's home; ((and)) (3) the licensee passes background checks
conducted through the Washington state patrol and through the
department's system of checking histories of abuse and neglect as soon
as practicable, within a maximum of fifteen days of the child's
placement and, if the licensee has resided outside the state within the
last three years, a background check through the other jurisdictions
where the licensee has resided or through the federal bureau of
investigation within thirty days of the child's placement; and (4) the
initial license is issued for a period not to exceed ninety days.

Sec. 3 1999 c 17 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
The legislature has found that any intervention into the life of a
child is also an intervention in the life of the parent, guardian, or
legal custodian, and that the bond between child and parent is a
critical element of child development. The legislature now also finds
that children who cannot be with their parents, guardians, or legal
custodians are best cared for, whenever possible and appropriate by a
person preferred by the parent, or if no preference is indicated by the
parent, then by family members with whom they have a relationship.
This is particularly important when a child cannot be in the care of a
parent, guardian, or legal custodian as a result of a court
intervention.

Sec. 4 RCW 13.34.065 and 2001 c 332 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The juvenile court probation counselor shall submit a
recommendation to the court as to the further need for shelter care
unless the petition has been filed by the department, in which case the
recommendation shall be submitted by the department.
(2) The court shall release a child alleged to be dependent to the
care, custody, and control of the child's parent, guardian, or legal
custodian unless the court finds there is reasonable cause to believe
that:
(a) After consideration of the specific services that have been
provided, reasonable efforts have been made to prevent or eliminate the
need for removal of the child from the child's home and to make it
possible for the child to return home; and
(b)(i) The child has no parent, guardian, or legal custodian to
provide supervision and care for such child; or
(ii) The release of such child would present a serious threat of
substantial harm to such child; or
(iii) The parent, guardian, or custodian to whom the child could be
released has been charged with violating RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070.
If the court does not release the child to his or her parent,
guardian, or legal custodian, and the child was initially placed with
a person preferred by the parent or a relative pursuant to RCW
13.34.060(1), the court shall order continued placement with a person
preferred by the parent or a relative, unless there is reasonable cause
to believe the health, safety, or welfare of the child would be
jeopardized. If the child was not initially placed with a person
preferred by the parent or a relative, and the court does not release
the child to his or her parent, guardian, or legal custodian, the
supervising agency shall make reasonable efforts to locate a person
preferred by the parent or a relative pursuant to RCW 13.34.060(1). If
a person preferred by the parent or a relative is not available, the
court shall order continued shelter care or order placement with
another suitable person, and the court shall set forth its reasons for
the order. The court shall enter a finding as to whether RCW
13.34.060(2) and subsections (1) and (2) of this section have been
complied with. If actual notice was not given to the parent, guardian,
or legal custodian and the whereabouts of such person is known or can
be ascertained, the court shall order the supervising agency or the
department of social and health services to make reasonable efforts to
advise the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the status of the
case, including the date and time of any subsequent hearings, and their
rights under RCW 13.34.090. If, in the course of its investigation,
the department discovers that the person preferred by the parent is not
eligible for licensing, the department may place the child with any
person described in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a).
(3) An order releasing the child on any conditions specified in
this section may at any time be amended, with notice and hearing
thereon, so as to return the child to shelter care for failure of the
parties to conform to the conditions originally imposed.
The court shall consider whether nonconformance with any conditions
resulted from circumstances beyond the control of the parent and give
weight to that fact before ordering return of the child to shelter
care.
(4) If a child is returned home from shelter care a second time in
the case, or if the supervisor of the caseworker deems it necessary,
the multidisciplinary team may be reconvened.
(5) If a child is returned home from shelter care a second time in
the case a law enforcement officer must be present and file a report to
the department.

--- END ---