BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature affirms that parents have a
paramount right to raise their minor children. The legislature also
recognizes that this paramount right must be considered in conjunction
with a minor child's interest in maintaining the strong emotional bonds
with others that the child has developed and relies upon. Therefore,
the legislature intends to establish internally consistent and rigorous
standards that must be met for a nonparent to obtain visitation with a
minor child.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Applicant" means a nonparent who initiates a proceeding under
this statute.
(b) "Contact" includes all court-ordered arrangements by which a
nonparent is authorized to interact with a child other than custody,
conservatorship, guardianship, or joint or shared custody.
(c) "Harm" means that denial of contact results in substantial loss
and detriment to the child's physical, psychological, or emotional
well-being. The likelihood of harm must be beyond the normal short-term distress a child suffers due to a change in circumstances.
(d) "Nonparent" includes any person not legally recognized as a
parent whether or not related by blood or marriage.
(e) "Parent-like relationship" means a very significant
relationship, including significant financial support provided by the
nonparent for the child's basic needs during the relationship, between
a nonparent and a child in which the nonparent undertook
responsibilities and tasks commonly performed by parents and commonly
recognized as actions by someone in a parent-like relationship.
Excluded from this category are baby-sitters or other employed
caregivers.
(f) "Substantially interfered" means to have unreasonably and
greatly diminished the amount and quality of contact a nonparent has
had with the child. A reasonable reduction in the frequency or length
of contact previously enjoyed with the child is not a substantial
interference.
(2) A nonparent may initiate a court proceeding for contact with a
child by filing a verified application to obtain court-ordered contact
when all of the following criteria are satisfied:
(a) The applicant is an individual with a parent-like relationship
with the child. To satisfy this criterion, the applicant must show
that:
(i) His or her relationship with the child has been parent-like in
nature for a substantial period of time;
(ii) A parent or custodian of the child consented to or allowed the
formation and establishment of the relationship or the relationship was
formed as a result of the unavailability or inability of any legal
parent to perform caretaking functions; and
(iii) His or her relationship with the child is beneficial; and
(b) A parent or custodian has substantially interfered with the
applicant's relationship with the child and the applicant has
unsuccessfully attempted to resolve any disagreement with the parent or
custodian before going to court.
(3)(a)(i) The court shall treat standing as a threshold issue. The
applicant bears the burden of establishing standing. If the applicant
does not satisfy this burden, the proceeding shall be dismissed.
(ii) Upon a finding that the applicant has standing, the applicant
shall come forward with evidence to show that the child would very
likely suffer harm if contact were not awarded. If the applicant
presents evidence that could allow a reasonable fact finder to conclude
that the child would very likely suffer harm, the burden shifts to the
parent or custodian to present evidence why the decision to refuse
contact is reasonable and in the best interests of the child.
(b) The court shall order contact if it finds that the applicant
has satisfied the burden of showing by clear and convincing evidence
that:
(i) The child would very likely suffer harm if contact is not
awarded; and
(ii) The parent's or custodian's denial of contact was unreasonable
and not in the child's best interests.
(4) If the court dismisses the proceeding for lack of standing, the
court shall award reasonable and necessary costs and fees to the
prevailing party unless there is a compelling reason to do otherwise.
In all other cases, the court may award such costs and fees as it deems
appropriate.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.09.240 and 1996 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) Under section 2 of this act, a person other than a parent
may petition the court for visitation ((with a child at any time or may
intervene in a pending dissolution, legal separation, or modification
of parenting plan proceeding)) only during a pending dissolution or
legal separation, and prior to the entry of the order establishing the
initial permanent parenting plan under this chapter. ((A person other
than a parent may not petition for visitation under this section unless
the child's parent or parents have commenced an action under this
chapter.
(2) A petition for visitation with a child by a person other than
a parent must be filed in the county in which the child resides.
(3) A petition for visitation or a motion to intervene pursuant to
this section shall be dismissed unless the petitioner or intervenor can
demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that a significant
relationship exists with the child with whom visitation is sought. If
the petition or motion is dismissed for failure to establish the
existence of a significant relationship, the petitioner or intervenor
shall be ordered to pay reasonable attorney's fees and costs to the
parent, parents, other custodian, or representative of the child who
responds to this petition or motion.
(4) The court may order visitation between the petitioner or
intervenor and the child between whom a significant relationship exists
upon a finding supported by the evidence that the visitation is in the
child's best interests.
(5)(a) Visitation with a grandparent shall be presumed to be in the
child's best interests when a significant relationship has been shown
to exist. This presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of
evidence showing that visitation would endanger the child's physical,
mental, or emotional health.
(b) If the court finds that reasonable visitation by a grandparent
would be in the child's best interest except for hostilities that exist
between the grandparent and one or both of the parents or person with
whom the child lives, the court may set the matter for mediation under
RCW 26.09.015.
(6) The court may consider the following factors when making a
determination of the child's best interests:
(a) The strength of the relationship between the child and the
petitioner;
(b) The relationship between each of the child's parents or the
person with whom the child is residing and the petitioner;
(c) The nature and reason for either parent's objection to granting
the petitioner visitation;
(d) The effect that granting visitation will have on the
relationship between the child and the child's parents or the person
with whom the child is residing;
(e) The residential time sharing arrangements between the parents;
(f) The good faith of the petitioner;
(g) Any criminal history or history of physical, emotional, or
sexual abuse or neglect by the petitioner; and
(h) Any other factor relevant to the child's best interest.
(7) The restrictions of RCW 26.09.191 that apply to parents shall
be applied to a petitioner or intervenor who is not a parent. The
nature and extent of visitation, subject to these restrictions, is in
the discretion of the court.
(8) The court may order an investigation and report concerning the
proposed visitation or may appoint a guardian ad litem as provided in
RCW 26.09.220.
(9) Visitation granted pursuant to this section shall be
incorporated into the parenting plan for the child.
(10) The court may modify or terminate visitation rights granted
pursuant to this section in any subsequent modification action upon a
showing that the visitation is no longer in the best interest of the
child.))

Sec. 4 RCW 26.10.160 and 2004 c 38 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A parent not granted custody of the child is entitled to
reasonable visitation rights except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section.
(2)(a) Visitation with the child shall be limited if it is found
that the parent seeking visitation has engaged in any of the following
conduct: (i) Willful abandonment that continues for an extended period
of time or substantial refusal to perform parenting functions; (ii)
physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of a child; (iii) a
history of acts of domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or
an assault or sexual assault which causes grievous bodily harm or the
fear of such harm; or (iv) the parent has been convicted as an adult of
a sex offense under:
(A) RCW 9A.44.076 if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of
this subsection;
(B) RCW 9A.44.079 if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of
this subsection;
(C) RCW 9A.44.086 if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of
this subsection;
(D) RCW 9A.44.089;
(E) RCW 9A.44.093;
(F) RCW 9A.44.096;
(G) RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2) if, because of the difference in age
between the offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists
under (d) of this subsection;
(H) Chapter 9.68A RCW;
(I) Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses listed
in (a)(iv)(A) through (H) of this subsection;
(J) Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an
offense analogous to the offenses listed in (a)(iv)(A) through (H) of
this subsection.
This subsection (2)(a) shall not apply when (c) or (d) of this
subsection applies.
(b) The parent's visitation with the child shall be limited if it
is found that the parent resides with a person who has engaged in any
of the following conduct: (i) Physical, sexual, or a pattern of
emotional abuse of a child; (ii) a history of acts of domestic violence
as defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or an assault or sexual assault that
causes grievous bodily harm or the fear of such harm; or (iii) the
person has been convicted as an adult or as a juvenile has been
adjudicated of a sex offense under:
(A) RCW 9A.44.076 if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of
this subsection;
(B) RCW 9A.44.079 if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of
this subsection;
(C) RCW 9A.44.086 if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of
this subsection;
(D) RCW 9A.44.089;
(E) RCW 9A.44.093;
(F) RCW 9A.44.096;
(G) RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2) if, because of the difference in age
between the offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists
under (e) of this subsection;
(H) Chapter 9.68A RCW;
(I) Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses listed
in (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of this subsection;
(J) Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an
offense analogous to the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of
this subsection.
This subsection (2)(b) shall not apply when (c) or (e) of this
subsection applies.
(c) If a parent has been found to be a sexual predator under
chapter 71.09 RCW or under an analogous statute of any other
jurisdiction, the court shall restrain the parent from contact with a
child that would otherwise be allowed under this chapter. If a parent
resides with an adult or a juvenile who has been found to be a sexual
predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or under an analogous statute of any
other jurisdiction, the court shall restrain the parent from contact
with the parent's child except contact that occurs outside that
person's presence.
(d) There is a rebuttable presumption that a parent who has been
convicted as an adult of a sex offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of
this subsection poses a present danger to a child. Unless the parent
rebuts this presumption, the court shall restrain the parent from
contact with a child that would otherwise be allowed under this
chapter:
(i) RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2), provided that the person convicted
was at least five years older than the other person;
(ii) RCW 9A.44.073;
(iii) RCW 9A.44.076, provided that the person convicted was at
least eight years older than the victim;
(iv) RCW 9A.44.079, provided that the person convicted was at least
eight years older than the victim;
(v) RCW 9A.44.083;
(vi) RCW 9A.44.086, provided that the person convicted was at least
eight years older than the victim;
(vii) RCW 9A.44.100;
(viii) Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses
listed in (d)(i) through (vii) of this subsection;
(ix) Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an
offense analogous to the offenses listed in (d)(i) through (vii) of
this subsection.
(e) There is a rebuttable presumption that a parent who resides
with a person who, as an adult, has been convicted, or as a juvenile
has been adjudicated, of the sex offenses listed in (e)(i) through (ix)
of this subsection places a child at risk of abuse or harm when that
parent exercises visitation in the presence of the convicted or
adjudicated person. Unless the parent rebuts the presumption, the
court shall restrain the parent from contact with the parent's child
except for contact that occurs outside of the convicted or adjudicated
person's presence:
(i) RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2), provided that the person convicted
was at least five years older than the other person;
(ii) RCW 9A.44.073;
(iii) RCW 9A.44.076, provided that the person convicted was at
least eight years older than the victim;
(iv) RCW 9A.44.079, provided that the person convicted was at least
eight years older than the victim;
(v) RCW 9A.44.083;
(vi) RCW 9A.44.086, provided that the person convicted was at least
eight years older than the victim;
(vii) RCW 9A.44.100;
(viii) Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses
listed in (e)(i) through (vii) of this subsection;
(ix) Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an
offense analogous to the offenses listed in (e)(i) through (vii) of
this subsection.
(f) The presumption established in (d) of this subsection may be
rebutted only after a written finding that:
(i) If the child was not the victim of the sex offense committed by
the parent requesting visitation, (A) contact between the child and the
offending parent is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child,
and (B) the offending parent has successfully engaged in treatment for
sex offenders or is engaged in and making progress in such treatment,
if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment provider believes such
contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child; or
(ii) If the child was the victim of the sex offense committed by
the parent requesting visitation, (A) contact between the child and the
offending parent is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child,
(B) if the child is in or has been in therapy for victims of sexual
abuse, the child's counselor believes such contact between the child
and the offending parent is in the child's best interest, and (C) the
offending parent has successfully engaged in treatment for sex
offenders or is engaged in and making progress in such treatment, if
any was ordered by a court, and the treatment provider believes such
contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child.
(g) The presumption established in (e) of this subsection may be
rebutted only after a written finding that:
(i) If the child was not the victim of the sex offense committed by
the person who is residing with the parent requesting visitation, (A)
contact between the child and the parent residing with the convicted or
adjudicated person is appropriate and that parent is able to protect
the child in the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person, and
(B) the convicted or adjudicated person has successfully engaged in
treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and making progress in
such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment
provider believes such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk to
the child; or
(ii) If the child was the victim of the sex offense committed by
the person who is residing with the parent requesting visitation, (A)
contact between the child and the parent in the presence of the
convicted or adjudicated person is appropriate and poses minimal risk
to the child, (B) if the child is in or has been in therapy for victims
of sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes such contact between
the child and the parent residing with the convicted or adjudicated
person in the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is in the
child's best interest, and (C) the convicted or adjudicated person has
successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in
and making progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court,
and the treatment provider believes contact between the parent and
child in the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is
appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child.
(h) If the court finds that the parent has met the burden of
rebutting the presumption under (f) of this subsection, the court may
allow a parent who has been convicted as an adult of a sex offense
listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of this subsection to have visitation
with the child supervised by a neutral and independent adult and
pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such visitation. The
court shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between the child
and the parent unless the court finds, based on the evidence, that the
supervisor is willing and capable of protecting the child from harm.
The court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon finding,
based on the evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the
child or is no longer willing or capable of protecting the child.
(i) If the court finds that the parent has met the burden of
rebutting the presumption under (g) of this subsection, the court may
allow a parent residing with a person who has been adjudicated as a
juvenile of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through (ix) of this
subsection to have visitation with the child in the presence of the
person adjudicated as a juvenile, supervised by a neutral and
independent adult and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of
such visitation. The court shall not approve of a supervisor for
contact between the child and the parent unless the court finds, based
on the evidence, that the supervisor is willing and capable of
protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke court approval
of the supervisor upon finding, based on the evidence, that the
supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no longer willing or
capable of protecting the child.
(j) If the court finds that the parent has met the burden of
rebutting the presumption under (g) of this subsection, the court may
allow a parent residing with a person who, as an adult, has been
convicted of a sex offense listed in (e)(i) through (ix) of this
subsection to have visitation with the child in the presence of the
convicted person supervised by a neutral and independent adult and
pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such visitation. The
court shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between the child
and the parent unless the court finds, based on the evidence, that the
supervisor is willing and capable of protecting the child from harm.
The court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon finding,
based on the evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the
child or is no longer willing or capable of protecting the child.
(k) A court shall not order unsupervised contact between the
offending parent and a child of the offending parent who was sexually
abused by that parent. A court may order unsupervised contact between
the offending parent and a child who was not sexually abused by the
parent after the presumption under (d) of this subsection has been
rebutted and supervised visitation has occurred for at least two years
with no further arrests or convictions of sex offenses involving
children under chapter 9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter 9.68A RCW
and (i) the sex offense of the offending parent was not committed
against a child of the offending parent, and (ii) the court finds that
unsupervised contact between the child and the offending parent is
appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, after consideration of
the testimony of a state-certified therapist, mental health counselor,
or social worker with expertise in treating child sexual abuse victims
who has supervised at least one period of visitation between the parent
and the child, and after consideration of evidence of the offending
parent's compliance with community supervision requirements, if any.
If the offending parent was not ordered by a court to participate in
treatment for sex offenders, then the parent shall obtain a
psychosexual evaluation conducted by a certified sex offender treatment
provider or a certified affiliate sex offender treatment provider
indicating that the offender has the lowest likelihood of risk to
reoffend before the court grants unsupervised contact between the
parent and a child.
(l) A court may order unsupervised contact between the parent and
a child which may occur in the presence of a juvenile adjudicated of a
sex offense listed in (e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection who
resides with the parent after the presumption under (e) of this
subsection has been rebutted and supervised visitation has occurred for
at least two years during which time the adjudicated juvenile has had
no further arrests, adjudications, or convictions of sex offenses
involving children under chapter 9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter
9.68A RCW, and (i) the court finds that unsupervised contact between
the child and the parent that may occur in the presence of the
adjudicated juvenile is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the
child, after consideration of the testimony of a state-certified
therapist, mental health counselor, or social worker with expertise in
treatment of child sexual abuse victims who has supervised at least one
period of visitation between the parent and the child in the presence
of the adjudicated juvenile, and after consideration of evidence of the
adjudicated juvenile's compliance with community supervision or parole
requirements, if any. If the adjudicated juvenile was not ordered by
a court to participate in treatment for sex offenders, then the
adjudicated juvenile shall obtain a psychosexual evaluation conducted
by a certified sex offender treatment provider or a certified affiliate
sex offender treatment provider indicating that the adjudicated
juvenile has the lowest likelihood of risk to reoffend before the court
grants unsupervised contact between the parent and a child which may
occur in the presence of the adjudicated juvenile who is residing with
the parent.
(m)(i) The limitations imposed by the court under (a) or (b) of
this subsection shall be reasonably calculated to protect the child
from the physical, sexual, or emotional abuse or harm that could result
if the child has contact with the parent requesting visitation. If the
court expressly finds based on the evidence that limitations on
visitation with the child will not adequately protect the child from
the harm or abuse that could result if the child has contact with the
parent requesting visitation, the court shall restrain the person
seeking visitation from all contact with the child.
(ii) The court shall not enter an order under (a) of this
subsection allowing a parent to have contact with a child if the parent
has been found by clear and convincing evidence in a civil action or by
a preponderance of the evidence in a dependency action to have sexually
abused the child, except upon recommendation by an evaluator or
therapist for the child that the child is ready for contact with the
parent and will not be harmed by the contact. The court shall not
enter an order allowing a parent to have contact with the child in the
offender's presence if the parent resides with a person who has been
found by clear and convincing evidence in a civil action or by a
preponderance of the evidence in a dependency action to have sexually
abused a child, unless the court finds that the parent accepts that the
person engaged in the harmful conduct and the parent is willing to and
capable of protecting the child from harm from the person.
(iii) If the court limits visitation under (a) or (b) of this
subsection to require supervised contact between the child and the
parent, the court shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between
a child and a parent who has engaged in physical, sexual, or a pattern
of emotional abuse of the child unless the court finds based upon the
evidence that the supervisor accepts that the harmful conduct occurred
and is willing to and capable of protecting the child from harm. The
court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon finding, based
on the evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or
is no longer willing to or capable of protecting the child.
(n) If the court expressly finds based on the evidence that
contact between the parent and the child will not cause physical,
sexual, or emotional abuse or harm to the child and that the
probability that the parent's or other person's harmful or abusive
conduct will recur is so remote that it would not be in the child's
best interests to apply the limitations of (a), (b), and (m)(i) and
(iii) of this subsection, or if the court expressly finds that the
parent's conduct did not have an impact on the child, then the court
need not apply the limitations of (a), (b), and (m)(i) and (iii) of
this subsection. The weight given to the existence of a protection
order issued under chapter 26.50 RCW as to domestic violence is within
the discretion of the court. This subsection shall not apply when (c),
(d), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), (l), and (m)(ii) of this
subsection apply.
(3) ((Any person may petition the court for visitation rights at
any time including, but not limited to, custody proceedings. The court
may order visitation rights for any person when visitation may serve
the best interest of the child whether or not there has been any change
of circumstances.)) A person other than a parent may petition the court
for visitation with a child under sections 2 and 3 of this act only
during a pending dissolution or legal separation, and prior to the
entry of the order establishing the initial permanent parenting plan
under chapter 26.09 RCW.
(4) The court may modify an order granting or denying visitation
rights whenever modification would serve the best interests of the
child. Modification of a parent's visitation rights shall be subject
to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section, a parent's child means that
parent's natural child, adopted child, or stepchild.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---