BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.18.050 and 1999 c 363 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that it is beneficial to improve
opportunities for trout fishing in order to satisfy the public's demand
for recreational fishing during a time of declining opportunities to
catch anadromous salmon and steelhead trout.
Fish farmers can produce trout in a triploid genetic configuration
for the purpose of certifying that the fish are sterile and that they
cannot interbreed with wild trout. These fish are ideally suited to
planting into public lakes and ponds to provide immediate recreational
fishing at a reasonable cost. The fish continue to grow throughout
their life cycle and have the potential to grow to trophy size.
Planting of these catchable trout can provide increased angler
participation, increased fishing license sales, increased tourism
activities, and a boost to local economies.
The department of fish and wildlife is authorized to purchase these
privately produced fish to supplement existing department trout
hatchery production. The planting of these catchable trout in water
bodies with water quality sufficient to support fish life must not have
an adverse impact on the wild trout population.
The trout purchased by the department under this section are not
subject to the taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to privately
produced trout purchased by the department of fish and wildlife under
chapter 77.18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of privately produced trout purchased by the department of fish and
wildlife under chapter 77.18 RCW.

--- END ---