BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By December 30, 2005, the superintendent of public instruction
in collaboration with the Washington state school safety center
advisory committee, and in consultation with the criminal justice
training commission, shall develop a model policy and training
standards for school building administrators and other school security
personnel relative to the use of force and physical restraint in the
common schools. The superintendent of public instruction shall report
to the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the model
policy and training standards for school building administrators and
other school security personnel relative to the use of force and
physical restraint.
(2) By March 30, 2006, the model policy and training standards
developed under this section shall be made available to serve as
guidance to school districts and educational service districts and
shall be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
By June 1, 2006, the criminal justice training commission, in
cooperation with the superintendent of public instruction and the
Washington state school safety center advisory committee, shall develop
training materials in support of the model policy on the use of force
and physical restraint.
Training on use of force and physical restraint shall be included
in the current training provided by the criminal justice training
commission as approved by, and in cooperation with, the superintendent
of public instruction with the advice of the Washington state school
safety center advisory committee for school administrators and school
safety personnel.

--- END ---