BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the citizens of
Washington have long enjoyed the right to petition for a transfer of
territory between one school district and another and to have their
petition decided upon by a neutral body separate from either school
district. Recent legislation intended to encourage decisions about
school boundaries to be made at the local level by the affected school
boards was not intended to abrogate the right of citizens to have their
petition heard and decided by the educational service district regional
committee.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.315.195 and 2003 c 413 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A proposed change in school district organization by transfer
of territory from one school district to another may be initiated by a
petition in writing presented to the educational service district
superintendent:
(a) Signed by at least fifty percent plus one of the active
registered voters residing in the territory proposed to be transferred;
or
(b) Signed by a majority of the members of the board of directors
of one of the districts affected by a proposed transfer of territory.
(2) The petition shall state the name and number of each district
affected, describe the boundaries of the territory proposed to be
transferred, and state the reasons for desiring the change and the
number of children of school age, if any, residing in the territory.
(3) The educational service district superintendent shall not
complete any transfer of territory under this section that involves ten
percent or more of the common school student population of the entire
district from which the transfer is proposed, unless the educational
service district superintendent has first called and held a special
election of the voters of the entire school district from which the
transfer of territory is proposed. The purpose of the election is to
afford those voters an opportunity to approve or reject the proposed
transfer. A simple majority shall determine approval or rejection.
(4) The state board may establish rules limiting the frequency of
petitions that may be filed pertaining to territory included in whole
or in part in a previous petition.
(5) Upon receipt of the petition, the educational service district
superintendent shall notify in writing the affected districts that:
(a) Each school district board of directors, whether or not
initiating a proposed transfer of territory, is required to enter into
negotiations with the affected district or districts;
(b) In the case of a citizen-initiated petition, the affected
districts must negotiate on the entire proposed transfer of territory;
(c) The districts have ninety calendar days in which to agree to
the proposed transfer of territory;
(d) The districts may request and shall be granted by the
educational service district superintendent one thirty-day extension to
try to reach agreement; and
(e) Any district involved in the negotiations may at any time
during the ninety-day period notify the educational service district
superintendent in writing that agreement will not be possible.
(6) If the negotiating school boards cannot ((come to agreement
about)) agree to the proposed transfer of territory, the educational
service district superintendent, if requested by the affected
districts, shall appoint a mediator. The mediator has thirty days to
work with the affected school districts to see if an agreement can be
reached on the proposed transfer of territory.
(7) If the affected school districts cannot ((come to agreement
about)) agree to the proposed transfer of territory, and the districts
do not request the services of a mediator or the mediator was unable to
bring the districts to agreement, either district may file with the
educational service district superintendent a written request for a
hearing by the regional committee.
(8) If the affected school districts ((cannot come to agreement
about)) do not agree to the proposed transfer of territory initiated by
citizen petition, ((and the districts do not request the services of a
mediator or the mediator was unable to bring the districts to
agreement,)) the district in which the citizens who filed the petition
reside shall file on behalf of the citizen petitioners with the
educational service district superintendent a written request for a
hearing by the regional committee, unless a majority of the citizen
petitioners request otherwise.
(9) Upon receipt of a notice under subsection (7) or (8) of this
section, the educational service district superintendent shall notify
the chair of the regional committee in writing within ten days.
(10) Costs incurred by school districts under this section shall be
reimbursed by the state from such funds as are appropriated for this
purpose.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.315.015 and 1999 c 315 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the purpose of this chapter to:
(a) Incorporate into a single, comprehensive, school district
organization law all essential provisions governing:
(i) The formation and establishment of new school districts;
(ii) The alteration of the boundaries of existing districts; and
(iii) The adjustment of the assets and liabilities of school
districts when changes are made under this chapter; and
(b) Establish methods and procedures whereby changes in the school
district system may be brought about by the people concerned and
affected.
(2) It is the state's policy that decisions on proposed changes in
school district organization should be made, whenever possible, by
negotiated agreement between the affected school districts. If the
districts cannot agree to the proposed change, the decision shall be
made by the regional committees on school district organization, based
on the committees' best judgment, taking into consideration the
((following factors and)) factors under RCW 28A.315.205((:
(a) A balance of local petition requests and the needs of the
statewide community at large in a manner that advances the best
interest of public education in the affected school districts and
communities, the educational service district, and the state;
(b) Responsibly serving all of the affected citizens and students
by contributing to logical service boundaries and recognizing a
changing economic pattern within the educational service districts of
the state;
(c) Enhancing the educational opportunities of pupils in the
territory by reducing existing disparities among the affected school
districts' ability to provide operating and capital funds through an
equitable adjustment of the assets and liabilities of the affected
districts;
(d) Promoting a wiser use of public funds through improvement in
the school district system of the educational service districts and the
state; and
(e) Other criteria or considerations as may be established in rule
by the state board of education)).
(3) It is neither the intent nor purpose of this chapter to apply
to organizational changes and the procedure therefor relating to
capital fund aid by nonhigh school districts as provided for in chapter
28A.540 RCW.
(4) A hearing by the regional committee under this chapter on a
proposed transfer of territory by a citizen-initiated petition is a
quasi-judicial function.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.315.095 and 1999 c 315 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
The powers and duties of each regional committee are to:
(1) Hear and approve or disapprove proposals for changes in the
organization and extent of school districts in the educational service
districts when a hearing on a proposal has been requested under RCW
28A.315.195;
(2) Act on notices and proposals from the educational service
district under RCW 28A.315.225;
(3) Make an equitable adjustment of the property and other assets
and of the liabilities, including bonded indebtedness and excess tax
levies as otherwise authorized under this section, as to the old school
districts and the new district or districts, if any, involved in or
affected by a proposed change in the organization and extent of the
school districts;
(4) Make an equitable adjustment of the bonded indebtedness
outstanding against any of the old and new districts whenever in its
judgment such adjustment is advisable, as to all of the school
districts involved in or affected by any change heretofore or hereafter
effected;
(5) Provide that territory transferred from a school district by a
change in the organization and extent of school districts shall either
remain subject to, or be relieved of, any one or more excess tax levies
that are authorized for the school district under RCW 84.52.053 before
the effective date of the transfer of territory from the school
district;
(6) Provide that territory transferred to a school district by a
change in the organization and extent of school districts shall either
be made subject to, or be relieved of, any one or more excess tax
levies that are authorized for the school district under RCW 84.52.053
before the effective date of the transfer of territory to the school
district;
(7) Establish the date by which a committee-approved transfer of
territory shall take effect, which date must be not later than twelve
months after the transfer is approved;
(8) Hold and keep a record of a public hearing or public hearings
(a) on every proposal for the formation of a new school district or for
the transfer from one existing district to another of any territory in
which children of school age reside or for annexation of territory when
the conditions set forth in RCW ((28A.315.290 or 28A.315.320))
28A.315.225 prevail; and (b) on every proposal for adjustment of the
assets and of the liabilities of school districts provided for in this
chapter. Three members of the regional committee or two members of the
committee and the educational service district superintendent may be
designated by the committee to hold any public hearing that the
committee is required to hold. The regional committee shall cause
notice to be given, at least ten days prior to the date appointed for
any such hearing, in one or more newspapers of general circulation
within the geographical boundaries of the school districts affected by
the proposed change or adjustment. In addition notice may be given by
radio and television, or either thereof, when in the committee's
judgment the public interest will be served thereby; and
(9) Prepare and submit to the superintendent of public instruction
from time to time or, upon his or her request, reports and
recommendations respecting the urgency of need for school plant
facilities, the kind and extent of the facilities required, and the
development of improved local school administrative units and
attendance areas in the case of school districts that seek state
assistance in providing school plant facilities.

--- END ---