BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state of Washington recognizes that an
informed citizenry is indispensable to the proper functioning of a
democratic society. It is the basic right of citizens to know about
the activities of their government, to benefit from the information
developed at public expense, and to have permanent access to the
information published by state agencies.
The secretary of state through the state library must ensure
permanent public access to public state government publications,
regardless of the format, and prescribe the conditions for use of state
publications in depository libraries.

Sec. 2 RCW 27.04.045 and 2002 c 342 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state librarian shall be responsible and accountable for the
following functions:
(1) Establishing content-related standards for common formats and
agency indexes for state agency-produced information. In developing
these standards, the state librarian is encouraged to seek involvement
of, and comments from, public and private entities with an interest in
such standards;
(2) Managing and administering the state library;
(3) Exerting leadership in information access and the development
of library services;
(4) Acquiring library materials, equipment, and supplies by
purchase, exchange, gift, or otherwise; and, as appropriate, assisting
the legislature, other state agencies, and other libraries in the cost-effective purchase of information resources;
(5) Employing and terminating personnel in accordance with chapter
41.06 RCW as may be necessary to implement the purposes of this
chapter;
(6) Entering into agreements with other public or private entities
as a means of implementing the mission, goals, and objectives of the
state library and the entity with which it enters such agreements. In
agreements for services between the library and other state agencies,
the library may negotiate an exchange of services in lieu of monetary
reimbursement for the library's indirect or overhead costs, when such
an arrangement facilitates the delivery of library services;
(7) Maintaining a library at the state capitol grounds to
effectively provide library and information services to members of the
legislature, state officials, and state employees in connection with
their official duties;
(8) Serving as the depository for newspapers published in the state
of Washington thus providing a central location for a valuable
historical record for scholarly, personal, and commercial reference and
circulation;
(9) Promoting and facilitating electronic access to public
information and services, including providing, or providing for, a
service that identifies, describes, and provides location information
for government information through electronic means, and that assists
government agencies in making their information more readily available
to the public;
(10) Collecting and distributing copies of state publications, as
defined in RCW 40.06.010, prepared by any state agency for
distribution. The state library shall maintain the state publications
distribution center, as provided in chapter 40.06 RCW((. The office of
the secretary of state, on recommendation of the state librarian, may
provide by rule for deposit with the state library of up to three
copies of each publication)) to provide copies of materials that are
not available in electronic format to state depository libraries;
(11) Providing for the sale of library material in accordance with
RCW 27.12.305;
(12) Providing advisory services to state agencies regarding their
information needs;
(13) Providing for library and information service to residents and
staff of state-supported residential institutions;
(14) Providing for library and information services to persons
throughout the state who are blind and/or physically handicapped;
(15) Assisting individuals and groups such as libraries, library
boards, governing bodies, and citizens throughout the state toward the
establishment and development of library services;
(16) Making studies and surveys of library needs in order to
provide, expand, enlarge, and otherwise improve access to library
facilities and services throughout the state;
(17) Serving as an interlibrary loan, information, reference, and
referral resource for all libraries in the state. The state library
may charge lending fees to other libraries that charge the state
library for similar services. Money paid as fees shall be retained by
the state library as a recovery of costs; and
(18) Accepting and expending in accordance with the terms thereof
grants of federal, state, local, or private funds. For the purpose of
qualifying to receive such grants, the state librarian is authorized to
make applications and reports required by the grantor.

Sec. 3 RCW 40.06.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 232 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) (("Print" includes all forms of reproducing multiple copies,
with the exception of typewritten correspondence and interoffice
memoranda.
(2))) "Electronic repository" means a collection of publicly
accessible electronic publications stored in a secure digital
environment with redundant backup to preserve the collection.
(2) "Format" includes any media used in the publication of state
information including electronic, print, audio, visual, and microfilm.
(3) "State agency" includes every state office, officer,
department, division, bureau, board, commission and agency of the
state, and, where applicable, all subdivisions of each.
(((3))) (4) "State publication" means information published by
state agencies, regardless of format, intended for distribution to
state government or the public. Examples may include((s)) annual,
biennial, and special reports required by law, state agency
newsletters, periodicals, and magazines, ((books, pamphlets, leaflets,
and all other materials, other than news releases sent exclusively to
the news media, typewritten correspondence and interoffice memoranda,
issued in print by the state, the legislature, constitutional officers,
or any state department, committee, or other state agency supported
wholly or in part by state funds)) and other informational material
intended for general dissemination to state agencies, the public, or
the legislature.

Sec. 4 RCW 40.06.020 and 2002 c 342 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created as a division of the state library, and
under the direction of the state librarian, a state publications
distribution center. The center shall utilize the depository library
system to permit citizens economical and convenient access to state
publications, regardless of format. To this end the secretary of state
shall make such rules as may be deemed necessary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 40.06.030 and 1977 ex.s. c 232 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Every state agency shall promptly ((deposit copies of each of
its state publications with the state library in quantities as
certified by the state librarian as required to meet the needs of the
depository library system. Upon consent of the issuing state agency
such state publications as are printed by the public printer shall be
delivered directly to the center.
(2))) submit to the state library copies of published information
that are state publications.
(a) For state publications available only in print format, each
state agency shall deposit, at a minimum, two copies of each of its
publications with the state library. For the purposes of broad public
access, state agencies may deposit additional copies with the state
library for distribution to additional depository libraries.
(b) For state publications available only in electronic format,
each state agency shall deposit one copy of each of its publications
with the state library.
(c) For state publications available in both print and electronic
format, each state agency shall deposit two print copies and one
electronic copy of the publication with the state library.
(2) Annually, each state agency shall provide the state library
with a listing of all its publications made available to state
government and the public during the preceding year, including those
published in electronic form. The secretary of state shall, by rule,
establish the annual date by which state agencies must provide the list
of its publications to the state library.
(3) In the interest of economy and efficiency, the state librarian
may specifically or by general rule exempt a given state publication or
class of publications from the requirements of this section in full or
in part.
(4) Upon consent of the issuing state agency, such state
publications as are printed by the public printer shall be delivered
directly to the center.

Sec. 6 RCW 40.06.040 and 2002 c 342 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To provide economical public access to state publications, the
center may enter into depository contracts with any free public
library, The Evergreen State College, regional university, or state
university library, or, if needed, the library of any privately
incorporated college or university in this state. The requirements for
eligibility to contract as a depository library shall be established by
the secretary of state upon recommendations of the state librarian.
The standards shall include and take into consideration the type of
library, available housing and space for the publications, the number
and qualifications of personnel, and availability for public use. The
center may also contract with public, out-of-state libraries for the
exchange of state and other publications on a reciprocal basis. Any
state publication to be distributed to the public and the legislature
shall be mailed at the lowest available postal rate.
(2) The office of the secretary of state through the state
librarian shall preserve and make accessible state agency electronic
publications deposited with the state library through an electronic
repository.

Sec. 7 RCW 40.06.050 and 1963 c 233 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The center shall publish and distribute regularly a list of
available state publications, and may publish and distribute such other
descriptive ((printed)) matter as will facilitate the distribution of
and access to state publications.

--- END ---