BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.08.115 and 2003 c 111 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every registration assistant shall keep registration supplies at
his or her usual place of residence or usual place of business. A
person or organization collecting voter registration application forms
must transmit the forms to the secretary of state or a designee at
least once weekly. A person or organization collecting voter
registration application forms may not make a photocopy or any other
replication of the voter registration form unless authorized to do so
under the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.08.115 and 2004 c 267 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person or organization collecting voter registration application
forms must transmit the forms to the secretary of state or a designee
at least once weekly. A person or organization collecting voter
registration application forms may not make a photocopy or any other
replication of the voter registration form unless authorized to do so
under the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.08.210 and 2003 c 111 s 216 are each amended to
read as follows:
An applicant for voter registration shall complete an application
providing the following information concerning his or her
qualifications as a voter in this state:
(1) The address of the last former registration of the applicant as
a voter in the state;
(2) The applicant's full name;
(3) The applicant's date of birth;
(4) The address of the applicant's residence for voting purposes;
(5) The mailing address of the applicant if that address is not the
same as the address in subsection (4) of this section;
(6) The sex of the applicant;
(7) A declaration that the applicant is a citizen of the United
States;
(8) The applicant's signature; and
(9) Any other information that the secretary of state determines is
necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and prevent
duplicate or fraudulent voter registrations.
This information shall be recorded on a single registration form to
be prescribed by the secretary of state.
If the applicant fails to provide the information required for
voter registration, the auditor shall send the applicant a verification
notice. The auditor shall not register the applicant until the
required information is provided. If a verification notice is returned
as undeliverable or the applicant fails to respond to the notice within
forty-five days, the auditor shall not register the applicant to vote.
The following warning shall appear in a conspicuous place on the
voter registration form:

"If you knowingly provide false information on this voter
registration form or knowingly make a false declaration about your
qualifications for voter registration you will have committed a class
C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five years, or by
a fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both imprisonment and fine."

Voter registration applications purchased and printed after the
effective date of this section shall also contain the following warning
in a conspicuous place on the form:

"To ensure proper and timely processing of this voter registration
application, personally place the completed form in the mail or return
it directly to the county auditor or secretary of state. Unauthorized
duplication of voter registration forms is a class C felony punishable
up to five years and/or ten thousand dollars."

Voter registration forms already printed without the above warning
may be used until stocks have run out.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.08.220 and 2004 c 267 s 115 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall specify by rule the format of all
voter registration applications. These applications shall be
compatible with existing voter registration records. An applicant for
voter registration shall be required to complete only one application
and to provide the required information other than his or her signature
no more than one time. These applications shall also contain
information for the voter to transfer his or her registration.
Any application format specified by the secretary for use in
registering to vote in state and local elections shall satisfy the
requirements of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-31) and the Help America Vote Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-252) for
registering to vote in federal elections.
(2) All registration applications required under RCW 29A.08.210 and
29A.08.340 shall be produced and furnished by the secretary of state to
the county auditors and the department of licensing.
(3) No election official, including county auditors and their staff
or assistants, may mark or otherwise alter a blank voter registration
form with the purpose of identifying the individual or organization to
whom the forms were given.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 29A.84 RCW
to read as follows:
Any person who knowingly photocopies or otherwise duplicates a
completed voter registration form without authorization is guilty of a
class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021. This section does not
apply when the person duplicating the form is the same person listed on
the voter registration form.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 1 of this act expires January 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2006.

--- END ---