BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.20.030 and 1984 c 287 s 75 and 1984 c 243 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state board of health shall be composed of ((ten)) eleven
members. These shall be the secretary or the secretary's designee and
((nine)) ten other persons to be appointed by the governor, including
four persons experienced in matters of health and sanitation, an
elected city official who is a member of a local health board, an
elected county official who is a member of a local health board, a
local health officer, a health official from a federally recognized
tribe, and two persons representing the consumers of health care.
Before appointing the city official, the governor shall consider any
recommendations submitted by the association of Washington cities.
Before appointing the county official, the governor shall consider any
recommendations submitted by the Washington state association of
counties. Before appointing the local health officer, the governor
shall consider any recommendations submitted by the Washington state
association of local public health officials. Before appointing the
tribal representative, the governor shall consider any recommendations
submitted by tribes and tribal organizations. Before appointing one of
the two consumer representatives, the governor shall consider any
recommendations submitted by the state council on aging. The chairman
shall be selected by the governor from among the nine appointed
members. The department ((of social and health services)) health shall
provide necessary technical staff support to the board. The board may
employ an executive director and a confidential secretary, each of whom
shall be exempt from the provisions of the state civil service law,
chapter 41.06 RCW.
(2) Members of the board shall be compensated in accordance with
RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(3) For purposes of this section, "health official from a federally
recognized tribe" means a person holding an elected office in the
government of a federally recognized tribe or a person serving in an
official capacity within the health system of a federally recognized
tribe.

--- END ---