BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An agency shall grant leave without pay to any exempt or
nonexempt full-time permanent employee who requests such leave to serve
in the United States peace corps, participate in a program sponsored by
a humanitarian organization, or participate in a faith-based mission.
(2) The employee's participation in insurance, vacation, retirement
pay, or other benefits offered by the employer shall be governed by
rules and practices, existing at the time the leave is granted,
relating to leave without pay under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Upon the employee's return, the employee shall be restored,
without loss of seniority, to his or her previous position or an
equivalent one.
(4) The employee may not be dismissed from his or her position
without cause within one year after restoration.

--- END ---