BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to confine the
performance of nerve conduction tests to persons licensed under
chapters 18.71 and 18.57 RCW or delegated by persons licensed under
chapters 18.71 and 18.57 RCW. Interpretation of nerve conduction tests
and performance and interpretation of needle electromyography is
confined to persons licensed under chapters 18.71 and 18.57 RCW and no
others.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Only persons licensed under this chapter and chapter 18.57 RCW
shall be permitted to interpret nerve conduction tests or perform or
interpret needle electromyography.
(2) A physician may delegate the performance of nerve conduction
tests to a licensed or unlicensed individual who is otherwise qualified
by education, training, or experience if those tests and procedures are
conducted under the direct supervision of a physician licensed under
this chapter or chapter 18.57 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.57 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Only persons licensed under this chapter and chapter 18.71 RCW
shall be permitted to interpret nerve conduction tests or perform or
interpret needle electromyography.
(2) A physician may delegate the performance of nerve conduction
tests to a licensed or unlicensed individual who is otherwise qualified
by education, training, or experience if those tests and procedures are
conducted under the direct supervision of a physician licensed under
this chapter or chapter 18.71 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.71.030 and 1996 c 178 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to or interfere
in any way with the practice of religion or any kind of treatment by
prayer; nor shall anything in this chapter be construed to prohibit:
(1) The furnishing of medical assistance in cases of emergency
requiring immediate attention;
(2) The domestic administration of family remedies;
(3) The administration of oral medication of any nature to students
by public school district employees or private elementary or secondary
school employees as provided for in chapter 28A.210 RCW;
(4) Except as limited by section 2 of this act, the practice of
dentistry, osteopathic medicine and surgery, nursing, chiropractic,
podiatric medicine and surgery, optometry, naturopathy, or any other
healing art licensed under the methods or means permitted by such
license;
(5) The practice of medicine in this state by any commissioned
medical officer serving in the armed forces of the United States or
public health service or any medical officer on duty with the United
States veterans administration while such medical officer is engaged in
the performance of the duties prescribed for him or her by the laws and
regulations of the United States;
(6) The practice of medicine by any practitioner licensed by
another state or territory in which he or she resides, provided that
such practitioner shall not open an office or appoint a place of
meeting patients or receiving calls within this state;
(7) The practice of medicine by a person who is a regular student
in a school of medicine approved and accredited by the commission,
however, the performance of such services be only pursuant to a regular
course of instruction or assignments from his or her instructor, or
that such services are performed only under the supervision and control
of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter;
(8) The practice of medicine by a person serving a period of
postgraduate medical training in a program of clinical medical training
sponsored by a college or university in this state or by a hospital
accredited in this state, however, the performance of such services
shall be only pursuant to his or her duties as a trainee;
(9) The practice of medicine by a person who is regularly enrolled
in a physician assistant program approved by the commission, however,
the performance of such services shall be only pursuant to a regular
course of instruction in said program and such services are performed
only under the supervision and control of a person licensed pursuant to
this chapter;
(10) The practice of medicine by a licensed physician assistant
which practice is performed under the supervision and control of a
physician licensed pursuant to this chapter;
(11) The practice of medicine, in any part of this state which
shares a common border with Canada and which is surrounded on three
sides by water, by a physician licensed to practice medicine and
surgery in Canada or any province or territory thereof;
(12) The administration of nondental anesthesia by a dentist who
has completed a residency in anesthesiology at a school of medicine
approved by the commission, however, a dentist allowed to administer
nondental anesthesia shall do so only under authorization of the
patient's attending surgeon, obstetrician, or psychiatrist, and the
commission has jurisdiction to discipline a dentist practicing under
this exemption and enjoin or suspend such dentist from the practice of
nondental anesthesia according to this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW;
(13) Emergency lifesaving service rendered by a physician's trained
emergency medical service intermediate life support technician and
paramedic, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, if the emergency lifesaving
service is rendered under the responsible supervision and control of a
licensed physician;
(14) The provision of clean, intermittent bladder catheterization
for students by public school district employees or private school
employees as provided for in RCW 18.79.290 and 28A.210.280.

--- END ---