BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Washington traffic safety commission
shall conduct a study regarding the safety hazards, and potential
property damage, resulting from the failure to remove unused trailer
hitches from motor vehicles. At a minimum, the study must include the
estimated frequency at which motorists fail to remove trailer hitches
when not in use, the potential hazards this activity presents to
pedestrians, and the estimated cost of property damage that results
from protruding unused trailer hitches. Additionally, the study must
include the estimated degree to which law enforcement efforts are
directed at this issue. Finally, in conducting the study, the
commission shall consider the applicability of RCW 46.37.517,
prohibiting certain vehicle protrusions hazardous to pedestrians, and
whether, given the breadth of the statute, legislative recommendations
are in order. The commission shall submit results, including any
legislative recommendations, to the transportation committees of the
legislature by January 1, 2006.

--- END ---