BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a worker of a nongovernment employer is injured or
develops an occupational disease due to an exposure while assisting in
the life and rescue phase of an emergency, in response to a request for
assistance from a state or local government entity, including fire
service or law enforcement, the cost of benefits shall be reimbursed
from the disaster response account, RCW 38.52.105, to the appropriate
workers' compensation fund, or to the self-insured employer, as the
case may be. The cost of such injuries or occupational diseases shall
not be charged to the experience record of a state fund employer.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "life and rescue phase" means
the first seventy-two hours after the occurrence of a natural or man-made disaster in which a state or municipal entity, including fire
service or law enforcement, acknowledges or declares such a disaster
and requests assistance from the private sector in locating and
rescuing survivors. The initial life and rescue phase may be extended
for a finite period of time by declaration of the state or municipal
entity requesting assistance.

Sec. 2 RCW 38.52.105 and 2002 c 371 s 903 are each amended to
read as follows:
The disaster response account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys may be placed in the account from legislative appropriations and
transfers, federal appropriations, or any other lawful source. Moneys
in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for support of state agency and local
government disaster response and recovery efforts and to reimburse the
workers' compensation funds and self-insured employers under section 1
of this act. During the 2001-03 biennium, funds from the account may
also be used for costs associated with national security preparedness
activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---