BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the
transportation of farm goods is a vital component to the state's
economic stability, development, and prosperity. The legislature
further finds that the option of purchasing monthly and semiannual
gross weight permits provides a flexible solution to accommodate
transportation needs related to the transport of farm goods. It is
therefore the intent of the legislature to ensure that the monthly and
semiannual vehicle licensing permits fees accurately correspond to the
amount of permit time purchased for farm equipment.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.135 and 1986 c 18 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The annual vehicle licensing fees as provided in RCW
46.16.070 or 46.16.090 for any motor vehicle or combination of vehicles
having a declared gross weight in excess of twelve thousand pounds may
be paid for any full registration month or months, except as provided
in (b) of this subsection, at one-twelfth of the usual annual fee plus
two dollars, this sum to be multiplied by the number of full months for
which the fees are paid if for less than a full year. An additional
fee of two dollars shall be collected each time a license fee is paid.
(b) For the first month that vehicle license fees are paid pursuant
to this section based on the licensing fees under RCW 46.16.090, the
fee shall be reduced. The reduced amount shall equal one-twelfth of
the usual annual fee plus two dollars, the sum of which shall be
multiplied by a factor. The factor shall equal the number of days that
a motor vehicle or combination of vehicles is actually licensed under
this section during the first registration month divided by the total
number of days in the registration month.
(2) Operation of a vehicle licensed under the provisions of this
section by any person upon the public highways after the expiration of
the monthly license is a traffic infraction, and in addition the person
shall be required to pay a license fee for the vehicle involved
covering an entire registration year's operation, less the fees for any
registration month or months of the registration year already paid.
If, within five days, no license fee for a full registration year has
been paid as required aforesaid, the Washington state patrol, county
sheriff, or city police shall impound such vehicle in such manner as
may be directed for such cases by the chief of the Washington state
patrol, until such requirement is met.

--- END ---