BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
evaluate the feasibility of toll lanes, including high occupancy toll
lanes, for new and replacement vehicle capacity on Interstate 405,
state route 520, and the section of state route 99 known as the Alaskan
Way Viaduct. The Interstate 405 study shall examine both currently
funded and proposed projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A high occupancy toll lanes steering
committee is hereby established to coordinate the feasibility study
activity. Members of the high occupancy toll lanes steering committee
are to include regional planning organizations and stakeholder groups.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Funding shall be provided to obtain
independent expert consultancy services to conduct the toll lanes
feasibility studies. Evaluation criteria shall at a minimum include,
but not be limited to:
(a) Reduction in person and goods delay during peak periods,
defined as 6 to 9 a.m. and 3 to 7 p.m.;
(b) Revenue generation;
(c) Use of revenues generated for transit and trip reduction
programs;
(d) Ability of multioccupant vehicles to maintain forty-five miles
per hour minimum speed; and
(e) The ability to incorporate freight needs.
(2) Results of the feasibility study shall be delivered to the
house and senate transportation committees of the legislature and the
transportation commission not later than December 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added
to chapter 47.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect August 1, 2005, if
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by
bill or chapter number, is provided by June 30, 2005, in the
transportation appropriations act. If specific funding is not provided
by June 30, 2005, this act is null and void.

--- END ---