BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that as consumers'
prescription drug costs continue to rise, people across the state of
Washington are seeking opportunities to purchase lower cost
prescription drugs from Canada for their personal use. The state has
a strong interest in promoting the safe use of prescription drugs by
consumers in Washington state. To address this interest, the
legislature intends to license Canadian prescription drug wholesalers,
thereby providing licensed retail pharmacies the opportunity to
purchase prescription drugs from approved Canadian wholesalers and pass
those savings on to consumers, and providing consumers the opportunity
to purchase prescription drugs from a trusted community pharmacist who
is aware of all of their prescription drug needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall, in consultation with the department and the
health care authority, license Canadian prescription drug wholesalers
under RCW 18.64.046, thereby providing retail pharmacies licensed in
Washington state the opportunity to purchase prescription drugs from
approved Canadian wholesalers and pass those savings on to consumers.
(a) The board shall ensure the integrity of the prescription drug
products being distributed by:
(i) Requiring that prescription drugs purchased from Canadian
wholesalers originate only from approved manufacturing locations;
(ii) Routinely testing prescription drugs purchased from Canadian
wholesalers for safety;
(iii) Establishing safe labeling, tracking, and shipping procedures
for prescription drugs purchased from Canadian wholesalers; and
(iv) Closely monitoring compliance with RCW 18.64.046 and any rules
adopted by the board;
(b) Canadian prescription drug wholesalers must meet the
requirements of RCW 18.64.046 and any rules adopted by the board to
implement those requirements;
(c) The prescription drugs purchased from Canadian wholesalers must
be limited to those for which potential savings to consumers can be
demonstrated;
(d) To ensure that the program benefits those consumers without
insurance coverage for prescription drugs who are most in need of price
relief, prescription drug purchases from pharmacies will be limited to
those not eligible for reimbursement by third party insurance coverage,
whether public or private; and
(e) Savings associated with purchasing prescription drugs from
Canadian wholesalers will be passed on to consumers.
(2) By December 1, 2005, the board, in consultation with the
department and the health care authority, shall submit a detailed
implementation plan to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature that details the mechanisms that the board will use to
implement each component of this section.
(3) The board shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.64.046 and 2004 c 52 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The owner of each place of business which sells legend drugs
and nonprescription drugs, or nonprescription drugs at wholesale shall
pay a license fee to be determined by the secretary, and thereafter, on
or before a date to be determined by the secretary as provided in RCW
43.70.250 and 43.70.280, a like fee to be determined by the secretary,
for which the owner shall receive a license of location from the
department, which shall entitle such owner to either sell legend drugs
and nonprescription drugs or nonprescription drugs at wholesale at the
location specified for the period ending on a date to be determined by
the secretary, and each such owner shall at the time of payment of such
fee file with the department, on a blank therefor provided, a
declaration of ownership and location, which declaration of ownership
and location so filed as aforesaid shall be deemed presumptive evidence
of the ownership of such place of business mentioned therein. It shall
be the duty of the owner to notify immediately the department of any
change of location and ownership and to keep the license of location or
the renewal thereof properly exhibited in such place of business.
(2) Failure to conform with this section is a misdemeanor, and each
day that the failure continues is a separate offense.
(3) In event the license fee remains unpaid on the date due, no
renewal or new license shall be issued except upon compliance with
administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees
determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
(4) No wholesaler may sell any quantity of drug products containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these
products to persons within the state of Washington exceed five percent
of the wholesaler's total prior monthly sales of nonprescription drugs
to persons within the state in March through October. In November
through February, no wholesaler may sell any quantity of drug products
containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their
salts, isomers, or salts of isomers if the total monthly sales of these
products to persons within the state of Washington exceed ten percent
of the wholesaler's total prior monthly sales of nonprescription drugs
to persons within the state. For purposes of this section, monthly
sales means total dollars paid by buyers. The board may suspend or
revoke the license of any wholesaler that violates this section.
(5) The board may exempt a wholesaler from the limitations of
subsection (4) of this section if it finds that the wholesaler
distributes nonprescription drugs only through transactions between
divisions, subsidiaries, or related companies when the wholesaler and
the retailer are related by common ownership, and that neither the
wholesaler nor the retailer has a history of suspicious transactions in
precursor drugs as defined in RCW 69.43.035.
(6) The requirements for a license apply to all persons, in
Washington and outside of Washington, including those in Canadian
provinces, who sell both legend drugs and nonprescription drugs and to
those who sell only nonprescription drugs, at wholesale to pharmacies,
practitioners, and shopkeepers in Washington.
(7) No wholesaler may sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers, to any person in Washington other than a pharmacy licensed
under this chapter, a shopkeeper or itinerant vendor registered under
this chapter, or a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011. A
violation of this subsection is punishable as a class C felony
according to chapter 9A.20 RCW, and each sale in violation of this
subsection constitutes a separate offense.
(8) If the board is unable to develop a reciprocal licensing
agreement with Health Canada or an applicable Canadian province, the
board shall develop a process to license participating Canadian
wholesalers through on-site inspection and certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---