BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.332.010 and 2003 c 346 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office of the Washington state trade representative is
created in the office of the governor. ((The office)) A trade policy
professional shall serve the office as the state's official liaison
with foreign governments on trade matters. The state trade
representative shall be appointed by the governor with consent of the
senate.
(2) The office shall:
(a) Work with the department of community, trade, and economic
development, the department of agriculture, and other appropriate state
agencies, and within the agencies' existing resources, review and
analyze proposed and enacted international trade agreements and provide
an assessment of the impact of the proposed or enacted agreement on
Washington's businesses and firms;
(b) Provide input to the office of the United States trade
representative in the development of international trade, commodity,
and direct investment policies that reflect the concerns of the state
of Washington;
(c) Serve as liaison to the legislature on matters of trade policy
oversight including, but not limited to, updates to the legislature
regarding the status of trade negotiations, trade litigation, and the
impacts of trade policy on Washington state businesses;
(d) Work with the international trade division of the department of
community, trade, and economic development and the international
marketing program of the Washington state department of agriculture to
develop a statewide strategy designed to increase the export of
Washington goods and services, particularly goods and services from
small and medium-sized businesses; ((and))
(e) Promote the governor's trade efforts by initiating, organizing,
and coordinating state trade missions; and
(f) Conduct other activities the governor deems necessary to
promote international trade and foreign investment within the state.
(3) The office shall prepare and submit an annual report on its
activities under subsection (2) of this section to the governor and
appropriate committees of the legislature.
(4) For any period during which the position of state trade
representative is vacant, funds provided to the office of the governor
for that position shall revert to the general fund.

--- END ---