BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.52.350 and 1994 c 154 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The executive ethics board is created, composed of five
members, appointed by the governor as follows:
(a) One member shall be a classified service employee as defined in
chapter 41.06 RCW;
(b) One member shall be a state officer or state employee in an
exempt position;
(c) One member shall be a citizen selected from a list of three
names submitted by the attorney general;
(d) One member shall be a citizen selected from a list of three
names submitted by the state auditor; and
(e) One member shall be a citizen selected at large by the
governor.
(2) Except for ((initial members and)) members completing partial
terms, members shall serve ((a single)) five-year terms. No member may
serve more than two full terms.
(3) No more than three members may be identified with the same
political party.
(4) ((Terms of initial board members shall be staggered as follows:
One member shall be appointed to a one-year term; one member shall be
appointed to a two-year term; one member shall be appointed to a three-year term; one member shall be appointed to a four-year term; and one
member shall be appointed to a five-year term.
(5))) A vacancy on the board shall be filled in the same manner as
the original appointment.
(((6))) (5) Each member shall serve for the term of his or her
appointment and until his or her successor is appointed.
(((7))) (6) The members shall annually select a chair from among
themselves.
(((8))) (7) Staff shall be provided by the office of the attorney
general.

--- END ---