BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.020 and 2003 c 361 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each
retail sale in this state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the
selling price.
(2) There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax
on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection shall be
deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW
47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2006, there is levied and collected an
additional tax on each retail sale in this state equal to five one-hundredths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected under
this subsection shall be deposited in the state parks renovation and
maintenance account created in section 3 of this act. This subsection
(4) expires July 1, 2014.
(5) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020, and
snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(((5))) (6) The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to
successive retail sales of the same property.
(((6))) (7) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes
imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Use tax collected on the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(4) shall be
deposited in the state parks renovation and maintenance account created
in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The state parks renovation and maintenance account is created in
the state treasury. All receipts from RCW 82.08.020(4) must be
deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used for the
renovation and maintenance of existing state parks facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The secretary of state shall submit this act
to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the
next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

--- END ---