BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.70.430 and 2001 c 234 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to administer a Puget Sound crab pot buoy tag program,
the department may charge a fee to holders of a Dungeness crab -- Puget
Sound fishery license to reimburse the department for the production of
Puget Sound crab pot buoy tags and the administration of a Puget Sound
crab pot buoy tag program.
(2) In order to administer a Washington coastal Dungeness crab pot
buoy tag program, the department may charge a fee to holders of a
Dungeness crab -- coastal or a Dungeness crab coastal class B fishery
license to reimburse the department for the production of Washington
coastal crab pot buoy tags and the administration of a Washington
coastal crab pot buoy tag program.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.70.440 and 2001 c 234 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Puget Sound crab pot buoy tag account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All revenues from fees from RCW 77.70.430(1)
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from this account may
be used for the production of crab pot buoy tags and the administration
of a Puget Sound crab pot buoy tag program. Only the director or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW but
no appropriation is required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington coastal crab pot buoy tag account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All revenues from fees from RCW
77.70.430(2) must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from
this account may be used for the production of crab pot buoy tags and
the administration of a Washington coastal crab pot buoy tag program.
Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

--- END ---