BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.16.035 and 1999 c 7 s 8 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1)(a) The department shall classify all occupations or industries
in accordance with their degree of hazard and fix therefor basic rates
of premium which shall be:
(i) The lowest necessary to maintain actuarial solvency of the
accident and medical aid funds in accordance with recognized insurance
principles; and
(ii) Designed to attempt to reduce volatility in premiums, by
establishing rates of premium based upon historical rates of investment
return and other recognized insurance principles.
(b) The department shall, in consultation with the workers'
compensation advisory committee, adopt rules regarding the level of
assets needed to maintain actuarial solvency of the accident and
medical aid funds in accordance with this subsection. The department
and the workers' compensation advisory committee shall consider the
level of assets customarily used by private insurers offering workers'
compensation insurance in other states and other states' workers'
compensation funds.
(c) When the level of assets exceeds the amount required under the
rules, the department may temporarily reduce rates below the rates
fixed under this subsection, but only if: (i) Employers are notified
of the fixed rate, the temporary rate, the period over which the
temporary rate applies, and the reason for adopting a reduced rate; and
(ii) the appropriate committees of the legislature are notified of any
such proposed action at least sixty days before taking the action. The
department shall not provide dividends or other similar measures that
give refunds, rebates, or account credits, to employers or employees of
premiums paid or of surplus funds. Nothing in this act shall be
construed to affect the retrospective rating program under chapter
51.18 RCW.
(d) The department shall formulate and adopt rules ((and
regulations)) governing the method of premium calculation and
collection and providing for a rating system consistent with recognized
principles of workers' compensation insurance which shall be designed
to reduce premium volatility, to stimulate and encourage accident
prevention, and to facilitate collection. The department may annually,
or at such other times as it deems necessary to ((maintain solvency of
the funds)) achieve the objectives under (a) of this subsection,
readjust rates in accordance with the rating system to become effective
on such dates as the department may designate.
(2) In providing a retrospective rating plan under RCW 51.18.010,
the department may consider each individual retrospective rating group
as a single employing entity for purposes of dividends or premium
discounts.

--- END ---