BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the complexity of
land use permitting processes, when state and federal requirements and
permits are involved, presents coordination challenges to regulators,
project sponsors, interested parties, and other stakeholders. The
legislature also finds that simpler, better coordinated, and more
efficient land use permitting processes could better fulfill the intent
of state laws and local ordinances, promote economic development, and
also provide more certain environmental protections. The legislature
further finds that a review of the state and federal role in local land
use permitting processes is necessary for the legislature to be able to
originate and evaluate effective proposals for changes to permitting
processes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall review how requirements and processes administered by
state and federal agencies affect local land use permitting processes,
in respect to redundancy, uncertainty, and delay.
For this review, the joint legislative audit and review committee
may use a representative sample of local jurisdictions. The committee
may compile and use any existing reviews, studies, analyses, and
proposals regarding this subject that in the committee's judgment are
relevant and reliable. The committee may also conduct additional
investigations, as it deems necessary.
The joint legislative audit and review committee shall issue a
report by January 1, 2006, that identifies how requirements and
processes administered by state and federal agencies affect local land
use permitting processes in respect to redundancy, uncertainty, and
delay, and the ways in which this redundancy, uncertainty, and delay
are being and could be eliminated by local, state, or federal action.

--- END ---