BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.42.030 and 1989 c 193 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provision of RCW 82.42.020 imposing the payment of an excise
tax on each gallon of aircraft fuel sold, delivered or used in this
state shall not apply to aircraft fuel sold for export, nor to aircraft
fuel used for the following purposes: (1) ((The operation of aircraft
when such use is by any air carrier or supplemental air carrier
operating under a certificate of public convenience and necessity under
the provisions of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, Public Law 85-726,
as amended; (2))) The operation of aircraft for testing or experimental
purposes; (((3))) and (2) the operation of aircraft when such operation
is for the training of crews in Washington state for purchasers of
aircraft who are certified air carriers((; and (4) the operation of
aircraft in the operations of a local service commuter)): PROVIDED,
That the director's determination as to a particular activity for which
aircraft fuel is used as being an exemption under this section, or
otherwise, shall be final.
To claim an exemption on account of sales by a licensed distributor
of aircraft fuel for export, the purchaser shall obtain from the
selling distributor, and such selling distributor must furnish the
purchaser, an invoice giving such details of the sale for export as the
director may require, copies of which shall be furnished the department
and the entity of the state or foreign jurisdiction of destination
which is charged by the laws of that state or foreign jurisdiction with
the control or monitoring or both, of the sales or movement of aircraft
fuel in that state or foreign jurisdiction.

--- END ---