BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the
terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes
authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax
shall not exceed 0.017 percent of the selling price in the case of a
sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
(2) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the
terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes
authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax
shall not exceed 0.016 percent of the selling price in the case of a
sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
(3) The tax imposed under subsections (1) and (2) of this section
shall be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be
collected or paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08
or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection
of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.
(4) Money collected under this section shall only be used for the
purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds issued
for the construction, design, repair, or improvement of a single
viaduct that will cost more than one billion dollars or for the design,
repair, or improvement of the Lake Washington bridge described in RCW
47.56.282.
(5)(a) No tax shall be collected under subsection (1) of this
section until the sales and use tax in RCW 82.14.0485 expires.
(b) No tax shall be collected under subsection (2) of this section
until RCW 82.14.0494 expires.
(6) This section expires when the bonds issued for the
construction, design, repair, or improvement of a single viaduct that
will cost more than one billion dollars or for the construction,
design, repair, or improvement of the Lake Washington bridge described
in RCW 47.56.282 are retired.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more may impose a special sales and use tax upon the retail
sale or use within the county by restaurants, taverns, and bars of food
and beverages that are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW. The rate of the tax shall not exceed five-tenths of one
percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of
the article used in the case of a use tax. The tax imposed under this
subsection is in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and
shall not be credited against any other tax imposed upon the same
taxable event. As used in this section, "restaurant" does not include
grocery stores, mini-markets, or convenience stores.
(2) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more may impose a special sales and use tax upon retail car
rentals within the county that are taxable by the state under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of the tax shall not exceed two percent
of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or rental value of the
vehicle in the case of a use tax. The tax imposed under this
subsection is in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and
shall not be credited against any other tax imposed upon the same
taxable event.
(3) The revenue from the taxes imposed under this section shall be
used for the purpose of principal and interest payments on bonds,
issued for the construction, design, repair, or improvement of a single
viaduct that will cost more than one billion dollars or for the
construction, design, repair, or improvement of the Lake Washington
bridge described in RCW 47.56.282.
(4) No tax shall be collected under this section until the special
stadium sales and use tax in RCW 82.14.360 expires.
(5) This section expires when the bonds issued for the
construction, design, repair, or improvement of a single viaduct that
will cost more than one billion dollars or for the construction,
design, repair, or improvement of the Lake Washington bridge described
in RCW 47.56.282 are retired.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more may impose an excise tax on the sale of or charge made
for the furnishing of lodging that is subject to tax under chapter
82.08 RCW, except that no such tax may be levied on any premises having
fewer than forty lodging units.
(2) The rate of the tax shall not exceed two percent and the
proceeds of the tax shall only be used for the construction, design,
repair, or improvement of a single viaduct that will cost more than one
billion dollars or for the construction, design, repair, or improvement
of the Lake Washington bridge described in RCW 47.56.282. This excise
tax shall not be imposed until: (a) The county has approved a proposal
to construct, design, repair, or improve one or both of these projects;
and (b) a public facilities district within the county is no longer
imposing the lodging tax in RCW 36.100.040.
(3) A county shall not impose the tax authorized in this section
if, after the tax authorized in this section was imposed, the effective
combined rate of state and local excise taxes, including sales and use
taxes and excise taxes on lodging, imposed on the sale of or charge
made for furnishing of lodging in any jurisdiction in the county
exceeds eleven and one-half percent.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.100.040 and 2002 c 178 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public facilities district may impose an excise tax on the
sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is subject to
tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that no such tax may be levied on
any premises having fewer than forty lodging units. However, if a
public facilities district has not imposed such an excise tax prior to
December 31, 1995, the public facilities district may only impose the
excise tax if a ballot proposition authorizing the imposition of the
tax has been approved by a simple majority vote of voters of the public
facilities district voting on the proposition.
(2) The rate of the tax shall not exceed two percent and the
proceeds of the tax shall only be used for the acquisition, design,
construction, remodeling, maintenance, equipping, reequipping,
repairing, and operation of its public facilities. This excise tax
shall not be imposed until the district has approved the proposal to
acquire, design, and construct the public facilities.
(3) A public facilities district may not impose the tax authorized
in this section if, after the tax authorized in this section was
imposed, the effective combined rate of state and local excise taxes,
including sales and use taxes and excise taxes on lodging, imposed on
the sale of or charge made for furnishing of lodging in any
jurisdiction in the public facilities district exceeds eleven and one-half percent.
(4) A public facilities district within a county with a population
of one million or more shall not impose a tax under this section if the
tax in RCW 82.14.0485 has expired.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.38.010 and 1999 c 165 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any county may by ordinance enacted by its county legislative
authority, levy and fix a tax of not more than one cent on twenty cents
or fraction thereof to be paid for county purposes by persons who pay
an admission charge to any place, including a tax on persons who are
admitted free of charge or at reduced rates to any place for which
other persons pay a charge or a regular higher charge for the same or
similar privileges or accommodations; and require that one who receives
any admission charge to any place shall collect and remit the tax to
the county treasurer of the county: PROVIDED, No county shall impose
such tax on persons paying an admission to any activity of any
elementary or secondary school or any public facility of a public
facility district under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW for which a tax is
imposed under RCW 35.57.100 or 36.100.210.
(2) As used in this chapter, the term "admission charge" includes
a charge made for season tickets or subscriptions, a cover charge, or
a charge made for use of seats and tables, reserved or otherwise, and
other similar accommodations; a charge made for food and refreshments
in any place where any free entertainment, recreation, or amusement is
provided; a charge made for rental or use of equipment or facilities
for purpose of recreation or amusement, and where the rental of the
equipment or facilities is necessary to the enjoyment of a privilege
for which a general admission is charged, the combined charges shall be
considered as the admission charge. It shall also include any
automobile parking charge where the amount of such charge is determined
according to the number of passengers in any automobile.
(3) Subject to subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the tax
herein authorized shall not be exclusive and shall not prevent any city
or town within the taxing county, when authorized by law, from imposing
within its corporate limits a tax of the same or similar kind:
PROVIDED, That whenever the same or similar kind of tax is imposed by
any such city or town, no such tax shall be levied within the corporate
limits of such city or town by the county.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the legislative
authority of a county with a population of one million or more may
exclusively levy taxes on events in baseball stadiums constructed on or
after January 1, 1995, that are owned by a public facilities district
under chapter 36.100 RCW and that have seating capacities over forty
thousand at the rates of:
(a) Not more than one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof, to
be used for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by a county: (i) To construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485((. If the revenue from the tax exceeds the
amount needed for that purpose, the excess shall be placed in a
contingency fund which may only be used to pay unanticipated capital
costs on the baseball stadium, excluding any cost overruns on initial
construction)); or (ii) if the bonds issued for the construction of the
baseball stadium are retired, for the construction, design, repair, or
improvement of a single viaduct that will cost more than one billion
dollars or for the construction, design, repair, or improvement of the
Lake Washington bridge described in RCW 47.56.282; and
(b) Not more than one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof, to
be used for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by a county: (i) To construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485; or (ii) if the bonds issued for the
construction of the baseball stadium are retired, for the construction,
design, repair, or improvement of a single viaduct that will cost more
than one billion dollars or for the construction, design, repair, or
improvement of the Lake Washington bridge described in RCW 47.56.282.
((The tax imposed under this subsection (4)(b) shall expire when the
bonds issued for the construction of the baseball stadium are retired,
but not later than twenty years after the tax is first collected.))
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the legislative
authority of a county that has created a public stadium authority to
develop a stadium and exhibition center under RCW 36.102.050 may levy
and fix a tax on charges for admission to events in a stadium and
exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, constructed in the
county on or after January 1, 1998, that is owned by a public stadium
authority under chapter 36.102 RCW. The tax shall be exclusive and
shall preclude the city or town within which the stadium and exhibition
center is located from imposing a tax of the same or similar kind on
charges for admission to events in the stadium and exhibition center,
and shall preclude the imposition of a general county admissions tax on
charges for admission to events in the stadium and exhibition center.
For the purposes of this subsection, "charges for admission to events"
means only the actual admission charge, exclusive of taxes and service
charges and the value of any other benefit conferred by the admission.
The tax authorized under this subsection shall be at the rate of not
more than one cent on ten cents or fraction thereof. Revenues
collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the stadium and
exhibition center account under RCW 43.99N.060 until the bonds issued
under RCW 43.99N.020 for the construction of the stadium and exhibition
center are retired. After the bonds issued for the construction of the
stadium and exhibition center are retired, the tax authorized under
this section shall be used exclusively ((to fund repair, reequipping,
and capital improvement of the stadium and exhibition center)) for the
construction, design, repair, or improvement of a single viaduct that
will cost more than one billion dollars or for the construction,
design, repair, or improvement of the Lake Washington bridge described
in RCW 47.56.282. If the bonds issued for the construction of the
stadium and exhibition center are retired, but the county does not
provide for the construction, design, repair, or improvement of a
single viaduct that will cost more than one billion dollars or for the
construction, design, repair, or improvement of the Lake Washington
bridge described in RCW 47.56.282, the tax shall not be imposed. The
tax under this subsection may be levied upon the first use of any part
of the stadium and exhibition center but shall not be collected at any
facility already in operation as of July 17, 1997.

--- END ---