BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
under the subchapter heading "public records" to read as follows:
(1)(a) Any agency that owns or licenses computerized data that
includes personal information shall disclose any breach of the security
of the system following discovery or notification of the breach in the
security of the data to any resident of this state whose unencrypted
personal information was, or is reasonably believed to have been,
acquired by an unauthorized person. The disclosure shall be made in
the most expedient time possible and without unreasonable delay,
consistent with the legitimate needs of law enforcement, as provided in
subsection (3) of this section, or any measures necessary to determine
the scope of the breach and restore the reasonable integrity of the
data system.
(b) For purposes of this section, "agency" means the same as in RCW
42.17.020.
(2) Any agency that maintains computerized data that includes
personal information that the agency does not own shall notify the
owner or licensee of the information of any breach of the security of
the data immediately following discovery, if the personal information
was, or is reasonably believed to have been, acquired by an
unauthorized person.
(3) The notification required by this section may be delayed if a
law enforcement agency determines that the notification will impede a
criminal investigation. The notification required by this section
shall be made after the law enforcement agency determines that it will
not compromise the investigation.
(4) For purposes of this section, "breach of the security of the
system" means unauthorized acquisition of computerized data that
compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of personal
information maintained by the agency. Good faith acquisition of
personal information by an employee or agent of the agency for the
purposes of the agency is not a breach of the security of the system
when the personal information is not used or subject to further
unauthorized disclosure.
(5) For purposes of this section, "personal information" means an
individual's first name or first initial and last name in combination
with any one or more of the following data elements, when either the
name or the data elements are not encrypted:
(a) Social security number;
(b) Driver's license number or Washington identification card
number; or
(c) Account number or credit or debit card number, in combination
with any required security code, access code, or password that would
permit access to an individual's financial account.
(6) For purposes of this section, "personal information" does not
include publicly available information that is lawfully made available
to the general public from federal, state, or local government records.
(7) For purposes of this section and except under subsection (8) of
this section, notice may be provided by one of the following methods:
(a) Written notice;
(b) Electronic notice, if the notice provided is consistent with
the provisions regarding electronic records and signatures set forth in
15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001; or
(c) Substitute notice, if the agency demonstrates that the cost of
providing notice would exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or
that the affected class of subject persons to be notified exceeds five
hundred thousand, or the agency does not have sufficient contact
information. Substitute notice shall consist of all of the following:
(i) E-mail notice when the agency has an e-mail address for the
subject persons;
(ii) Conspicuous posting of the notice on the agency's web site
page, if the agency maintains one; and
(iii) Notification to major statewide media.
(8) An agency that maintains its own notification procedures as
part of an information security policy for the treatment of personal
information and is otherwise consistent with the timing requirements of
this section is in compliance with the notification requirements of
this section if it notifies subject persons in accordance with its
policies in the event of a breach of security of the system.
(9) Any waiver of the provisions of this section is contrary to
public policy, and is void and unenforceable.
(10)(a) Any customer injured by a violation of this section may
institute a civil action to recover damages.
(b) Any business that violates, proposes to violate, or has
violated this section may be enjoined.
(c) The rights and remedies available under this section are
cumulative to each other and to any other rights and remedies available
under law.
(d) An agency shall not be required to disclose a technical breach
of the security system that does not seem reasonably likely to subject
customers to a risk of criminal activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Any person or business that conducts
business in this state and that owns or licenses computerized data that
includes personal information shall disclose any breach of the security
of the system following discovery or notification of the breach in the
security of the data to any resident of this state whose unencrypted
personal information was, or is reasonably believed to have been,
acquired by an unauthorized person. The disclosure shall be made in
the most expedient time possible and without unreasonable delay,
consistent with the legitimate needs of law enforcement, as provided in
subsection (3) of this section, or any measures necessary to determine
the scope of the breach and restore the reasonable integrity of the
data system.
(2) Any person or business that maintains computerized data that
includes personal information that the person or business does not own
shall notify the owner or licensee of the information of any breach of
the security of the data immediately following discovery, if the
personal information was, or is reasonably believed to have been,
acquired by an unauthorized person.
(3) The notification required by this section may be delayed if a
law enforcement agency determines that the notification will impede a
criminal investigation. The notification required by this section
shall be made after the law enforcement agency determines that it will
not compromise the investigation.
(4) For purposes of this section, "breach of the security of the
system" means unauthorized acquisition of computerized data that
compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of personal
information maintained by the person or business. Good faith
acquisition of personal information by an employee or agent of the
person or business for the purposes of the person or business is not a
breach of the security of the system when the personal information is
not used or subject to further unauthorized disclosure.
(5) For purposes of this section, "personal information" means an
individual's first name or first initial and last name in combination
with any one or more of the following data elements, when either the
name or the data elements are not encrypted:
(a) Social security number;
(b) Driver's license number or Washington identification card
number; or
(c) Account number or credit or debit card number, in combination
with any required security code, access code, or password that would
permit access to an individual's financial account.
(6) For purposes of this section, "personal information" does not
include publicly available information that is lawfully made available
to the general public from federal, state, or local government records.
(7) For purposes of this section and except under subsection (8) of
this section, "notice" may be provided by one of the following methods:
(a) Written notice;
(b) Electronic notice, if the notice provided is consistent with
the provisions regarding electronic records and signatures set forth in
15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001; or
(c) Substitute notice, if the person or business demonstrates that
the cost of providing notice would exceed two hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or that the affected class of subject persons to be notified
exceeds five hundred thousand, or the person or business does not have
sufficient contact information. Substitute notice shall consist of all
of the following:
(i) E-mail notice when the person or business has an e-mail address
for the subject persons;
(ii) Conspicuous posting of the notice on the web site page of the
person or business, if the person or business maintains one; and
(iii) Notification to major statewide media.
(8) A person or business that maintains its own notification
procedures as part of an information security policy for the treatment
of personal information and is otherwise consistent with the timing
requirements of this section is in compliance with the notification
requirements of this section if the person or business notifies subject
persons in accordance with its policies in the event of a breach of
security of the system.
(9) Any waiver of the provisions of this section is contrary to
public policy, and is void and unenforceable.
(10)(a) Any customer injured by a violation of this section may
institute a civil action to recover damages.
(b) Any business that violates, proposes to violate, or has
violated this section may be enjoined.
(c) The rights and remedies available under this section are
cumulative to each other and to any other rights and remedies available
under law.
(d) A person or business under this section shall not be required
to disclose a technical breach of the security system that does not
seem reasonably likely to subject customers to a risk of criminal
activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---