BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.22.178 and 2002 c 294 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
surcharge of ten dollars per instrument shall be charged by the county
auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to any
other charge authorized by law. The ((auditor)) county may retain up
to five percent of these funds collected ((to administer)) solely for
the collection, administration, and local distribution of these funds.
Of the remaining funds, forty percent of the revenue generated through
this surcharge will be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer who
will deposit the funds into the Washington housing trust account. The
office of community development of the department of community, trade,
and economic development will develop guidelines for the use of these
funds to support building operation and maintenance costs of housing
projects or units within housing projects that are affordable to
extremely low-income persons with incomes at or below thirty percent of
the area median income, and that require a supplement to rent income to
cover ongoing operating expenses. ((Sixty percent of the revenue)) All
of the remaining funds generated by this surcharge will be retained by
the county and be deposited into a fund that must be used by the county
and its cities and towns for housing projects or units within housing
projects that are affordable to very low-income persons with incomes at
or below fifty percent of the area median income. The portion of the
surcharge retained by a county shall be allocated to very low-income
housing projects or units within such housing projects in the county
and the cities within a county according to an interlocal agreement
between the county and the cities within the county, consistent with
countywide and local housing needs and policies. The funds generated
with this surcharge shall not be used for construction of new housing
if at any time the vacancy rate for available low-income housing within
the county rises above ten percent. The vacancy rate for each county
shall be developed using the state low-income vacancy rate standard
developed under subsection (3) of this section. ((Permissible)) Uses
of these local funds are limited to:
(a) Acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of housing
projects or units within housing projects that are affordable to very
low-income persons with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area
median income;
(b) Supporting building operation and maintenance costs of housing
projects or units within housing projects ((built with)) eligible to
receive housing trust funds, that are affordable to very low-income
persons with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median
income, and that require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing
operating expenses;
(c) At least twenty percent of these local funds shall be used for
rental assistance vouchers ((for housing projects or units within
housing projects that are affordable to very low-income persons with
incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median income, to be
administered by a local public housing authority or other local
organization that has an existing rental assistance voucher program,
consistent with the United States department of housing and urban
development's section 8 rental assistance voucher program standards;
and)), as set forth in chapter 36.-- RCW (sections 2 through 5 of this
act);
(d) Supporting building operation and maintenance costs of housing
projects or units within housing projects eligible to receive, but not
built with, housing trust funds, that are affordable to very low-income
persons with incomes at or below thirty percent of the area median
income, and that require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing
operating expenses; and
(e) Operating costs for emergency shelters and licensed overnight
youth shelters.
(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.
(3) The real estate research center at Washington State University
shall develop a vacancy rate standard, including apartment, mobile,
manufactured, and single-family residential housing, for low-income
housing in the state as described in RCW 18.85.540(1)(i).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administering agency" means the agency designated by the
county to administer the Washington rental assistance program.
Organizations eligible for designation as an administering agency
include local community action agencies, local housing authorities, and
other local, nonprofit organizations with experience within the past
two years of operating tenant-based rental assistance programs.
(2) "Community action agency" means a nonprofit private or public
organization established under the economic opportunity act of 1964.
(3) "County" means a corporate body having the corporate powers set
forth in chapter 36.01 RCW. For the purposes of administering the
Washington rental assistance program, a county may be either
metropolitan or nonmetropolitan. Metropolitan counties are designated
by the federal office of management and budget and are included within
standard metropolitan statistical areas. Nonmetropolitan counties are
not included within standard metropolitan statistical areas.
(4) "Fair market rent" means the rent, including the cost of
utilities, except telephone, as established by the United States
department of housing and urban development for units of varying sizes,
as determined by number of bedrooms, that must be paid in the housing
market area to rent privately owned, existing, decent, safe, and
sanitary rental housing of a modest, nonluxury nature with suitable
amenities. The unit size utilized by the recipient will be determined
by existing local administrative practice.
(5) "Housing authority" means any of the public corporations
created by chapter 35.82 RCW.
(6) "Income" means money earned from work, including wages, tips,
gratuities, and income from the operation of a business, and money
received from other sources such as social security, supplemental
security income, worker's compensation, unemployment benefits, tribal
revenue sharing, dividends, interest, child support, alimony, friends,
and relatives. Support or maintenance furnished in cash or in kind by
any party, including rent or discounted rent, shall constitute income,
except as set forth in this subsection. "Income" does not include food
stamps, prescription drug discounts, medicare, medicare transitional
assistance, free food or clothing, and income earned by children under
eighteen.
(7) "Landlord" means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of a dwelling
unit or the property on which a dwelling unit or manufactured or mobile
home pad is located. "Landlord" also includes any person designated by
the owner, lessor, or sublessor as his or her representative.
(8) "Local preference" means the population, group, or subgroup
with defining characteristics identified by an administering agency,
through a public process, to receive priority service or accommodation.
Preferences may include, but are not limited to, victims of domestic
violence, individuals with terminal illness, and homeless families
participating in a program of community and therapeutic support.
(9) "Performance outcome assessment" means an assessment of an
organization's performance, including but not limited to measures of
productivity, effectiveness, quality, and timeliness. The counties
shall have authority and responsibility for conducting performance
outcome assessments.
(10) "Recipient" means any individual or household with a gross
annual income of less than forty percent of the annual median income of
the county of residence and who receives tenant-based rental assistance
under the Washington rental assistance program.
(11) "Rent reasonableness" means that the maximum contract rent for
any unit to be leased is (a) reasonable in relation to rents currently
being charged for comparable units in the private unassisted market;
and (b) not in excess of rents currently being charged for most of the
owner's comparable unassisted units.
(12) "Tenant" means any person who is entitled to occupy a dwelling
unit primarily for living or dwelling purposes under a rental
agreement.
(13) "Dwelling unit" means a structure or that part of a structure
which is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person or
by two or more persons maintaining a common household, including but
not limited to single-family residences, manufactured and mobile homes,
and units of multiplexes and apartment buildings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Washington rental assistance program
is established to provide tenant-based rental assistance in the form of
rental assistance vouchers, payable to the landlord, including vouchers
for first and last month's rent and security and other deposits, except
pet deposits, required of all other new tenants by a landlord, on
behalf of low-income single persons, families, or unrelated persons
living together:
(a) Whose income is at or below forty percent of the median income,
adjusted for household size, for the county of residence, as determined
by the federal department of housing and urban development; and
(b) Who are not receiving such assistance through a program
authorized by section 8 of the United States housing act of 1937, 42
U.S.C. Sec. 1437f or any other federal, state, or local rental
assistance program.
(2) A minimum of seventy percent of the dwelling units occupied by
Washington rental assistance program recipients shall be privately
owned units that are not operating under any program licensed by the
state of Washington.
(3) Emergency/short-term assistance may be used for rental
assistance up to three months to prevent eviction. Such assistance may
also be used for first and last month's rent or for security or utility
deposits to help the homeless obtain housing. Assistance for deposits
cannot exceed the amount of one month's rent or the usual and customary
charges charged other tenants for the same type of deposits, whichever
is less.
(4) Longer-term tenant-based rental assistance may be provided up
to a maximum term of two years, unless extended consistent with a local
preference. The amount of longer-term tenant-based rental assistance
shall be equal to fifty percent of the fair market value.
(5) Rental assistance available under this program may be used for
rent of a dwelling unit or a manufactured or mobile home pad.
(6) Rental assistance under this program is portable only within
the county in which the application for rental assistance was made and
approved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) In metropolitan counties, the county
department, division, or agency charged with community development
shall convene the providers of tenant-based rental assistance in the
jurisdiction, both emergency/short-term and longer-term tenant-based
rental assistance providers, to determine the administering agency for
the emergency/short-term program and for the tenant-based rental
assistance program. More than one entity may be selected to administer
different parts of the Washington rental assistance program, e.g., a
housing authority could be selected to operate the longer-term tenant-based rental assistance program and a community action agency could be
selected to administer the emergency/short-term program. In
nonmetropolitan counties, the housing authority will convene providers
for the purpose of determining the administering agency.
(2) Administering agencies must be selected in a timely manner with
disbursement of funds under this program beginning no later than
January 31, 2006.
(3) An administering agency may charge an administrative fee, which
fee is to be paid by the county from the five percent retained by the
county for collection, administration, and local distribution as set
forth in RCW 36.22.178.
(4) An administering agency shall:
(a) Verify that an applicant's income is at or below forty percent
of the median income, adjusted for household size, for the county as
determined by the federal department of housing and urban development;
(b) Verify that an applicant is not receiving assistance through a
program authorized by section 8 of the United States housing act of
1937, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1437f, or other federal, state, or local rental
assistance program;
(c) Determine the monthly rental assistance for each eligible
applicant which shall be based upon a formula of fifty percent of fair
market rent as published by the federal department of housing and urban
development based upon the bedroom size for the household and the
jurisdiction in which the dwelling unit is located;
(d) Ensure, through an inspection process that uses the inspection
criteria identified by the federal department of housing and urban
development in its housing quality standards, that dwellings for which
Washington rental assistance program moneys are used are decent, safe,
and sanitary. However, these inspections are not required for
emergency rental assistance;
(e) Ensure that an appropriate lease is executed between landlord
and tenant that complies with all of the terms of chapters 59.18 and
59.20 RCW and that the initial lease is for a term of at least six
months with month-to-month tenancy permissible thereafter;
(f) Ensure that a minimum of seventy percent of Washington rental
assistance program assistance is allocated to recipients residing
within privately owned dwelling units;
(g) Establish local preferences, if any, through a public process;
(h) Distribute rental assistance and implement any local
preferences; and
(i) Provide the county with annual financial reports that
separately account for Washington rental assistance program funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

--- END ---