BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.32.290 and 1963 c 4 s 36.32.290 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section:
(a) When the ((board of county commissioners)) legislative
authority of any county deems it essential to the public interest for
flood prevention purposes ((it)), the county may remove drifts, jams,
logs, debris, ((gravel,)) earth, stone or bars forming obstructions to
the stream, or other material from the beds, channels, and banks of
watercourses in any manner deemed expedient((, including the deposit
thereof)).
(b) The legislative authority of any county may remove gravel from
streams or other watercourses consistent with the terms of the
programmatic permit issued by the department of fish and wildlife under
section 5 of this act when the gravel removal is deemed by the county
legislative authority to be beneficial in reducing the impact of
potential flooding.
(2) The authority to remove materials from streams or under
watercourses under this chapter includes the authority to deposit the
removed materials on bars not forming obstructions to the stream, or on
subsidiary or high water channels of ((such)) the watercourses.
(3) The legislative authority of a county may only exercise the
authority granted under this section to remove gravel from streams or
other watercourses if the area of the county from which the gravel is
to be removed is not within the jurisdiction of an active diking
district organized under chapter 85.05 RCW or an active flood control
district organized under chapter 86.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 86.09 RCW
to read as follows:
A flood control district created under this chapter may, when it is
deemed by the board of directors of the flood control district to be
beneficial in reducing the impact of potential flooding, remove gravel
from a stream or other watercourse, or portion of a stream or other
watercourse, located within the flood control district consistent with
the terms of the programmatic permit issued by the department of fish
and wildlife under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 85.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Any diking districts created under this chapter may, when it is
deemed by the board of commissioners of the diking district to be
beneficial in reducing the impact of potential flooding, remove gravel
from a stream or other watercourse, or portion of a stream or other
watercourse, located within the diking district consistent with the
terms of the programmatic permit issued by the department of fish and
wildlife under section 5 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.90.150 and 2003 c 39 s 41 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a public agency removes gravel, rock, sand, silt or other
material directly, or under a public contract, from any aquatic lands
((is removed by any public agency or under public contract)) for
channel ((or)) improvement, harbor improvement, flood impact reduction,
or flood control, the use of ((such)) the material may be authorized by
the department ((of natural resources)) for a public purpose on:
(a) Land owned or leased by the state or any municipality, county,
or public corporation((: PROVIDED, That when no public land site is
available for deposit of such material, its deposit on)); or
(b) Private land, with the landowner's permission ((is authorized
and may be designated by the department of natural resources to be for
a public purpose)), if there is no public land available for deposit of
the material.
(2) Prior to removal and use of material under this section, the
state agency, municipality, county, or public corporation contemplating
or arranging ((such)) the removal or use shall first obtain written
permission from the department ((of natural resources)), except for
flood control districts removing gravel under section 2 of this act,
diking districts removing gravel under section 3 of this act, and
county legislative authorities removing gravel under RCW 36.32.290.
These public entities are not required to obtain permission from the
department to remove or use gravel from streams or other watercourses
for flood control or flood impact reduction purposes and are only
required to notify the department of their intent to do so.
(3) No payment of royalty shall be required for ((such)) gravel,
rock, sand, silt, or other material used for ((such)) a public purpose
under this section, but a charge will be made if ((such)) the material
is subsequently sold or used for some other purpose((: PROVIDED,
That)).
(4) The department may authorize ((such)) a public agency or
private landowner to dispose of ((such)) material removed under this
section without charge when necessary to implement disposal of
material.
(5) No charge shall be required for any use of the material
obtained under the provisions of this chapter when used solely on an
authorized site.
(6) No charge shall be required for any removal or use of the
material obtained under the provisions of this chapter if the material
is used for public purposes by local governments, including flood
control districts removing gravel under section 2 of this act, diking
districts removing gravel under section 3 of this act, and county
legislative authorities removing gravel under RCW 36.32.290. Public
purposes include, but are not limited to, flood control, flood impact
reduction, and the construction and maintenance of roads, dikes, and
levies.
(7) The department may not prohibit, penalize, or condition a flood
control district operating under section 2 of this act, a diking
district operating under section 3 of this act, or a county legislative
authority operating under RCW 36.32.290 when removing gravel from
streams or other watercourses for flood control or flood impact
reduction purposes.
(8) Nothing in this section shall repeal or modify the provisions
of RCW 77.55.100 or eliminate the necessity of obtaining a permit for
such removal from other state or federal agencies as otherwise required
by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Flood control districts, diking districts, and counties shall
not require written approval under this chapter for the removal of
gravel from streams or other watercourses when the gravel removal is
deemed by the county legislative authority, flood control district
board of directors, or diking district board of commissioners to be
beneficial in reducing the impact of potential flooding and when the
gravel removal operation is conducted under a programmatic permit
issued under this section.
(2) The department shall develop a programmatic permit for the
removal of gravel from watercourses by counties, diking districts, and
flood control districts by August 1, 2005. The permit developed under
this section remains valid for at least five years from its
implementation date, and may include the following requirements:
(a) Dates when the gravel removal may be conducted;
(b) Specifications as to where the gravel removal may be conducted;
(c) Requirements for notification to the department that gravel
removal will be conducted; and
(d) Specifications on allowable methods for removing gravel.

--- END ---