BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.45.060 and 2000 c 103 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property at
the rate of one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the selling
price. An amount equal to ((seven and seven-tenths)) six and one-tenth
percent of the proceeds of this tax to the state treasurer shall be
deposited in the public works assistance account created in RCW
43.155.050. An amount equal to one and six-tenths percent of the
proceeds of this tax to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the
city-county assistance account created in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The city-county assistance account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from real estate excise tax disbursements
provided under RCW 82.45.060 shall be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes
provided in this section.
(2) Funds deposited in the city-county assistance account shall be
distributed equally to the cities and counties.
(3)(a) Funds distributed to counties shall, to the extent possible,
increase the revenues received under RCW 82.14.030(1) by each county to
the greater of two hundred fifty thousand dollars or:
(i) For a county with an unincorporated population of one hundred
thousand or less, seventy percent of the statewide weighted average per
capita level of sales and use tax revenues collected under RCW
82.14.030(1) for the unincorporated areas of all counties imposing the
sales and use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) in the previous
calendar year; and
(ii) For a county with an unincorporated population of more than
one hundred thousand, sixty-five percent of the statewide weighted
average per capita level of sales and use tax revenues collected under
RCW 82.14.030(1) for the unincorporated areas of all counties imposing
the sales and use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) in the previous
calendar year.
(b) For each county with an unincorporated population of fifteen
thousand or less, the county shall receive the greater of the amount in
(a) of this subsection or the amount received in local government
assistance provided by section 716, chapter 276, Laws of 2004.
(c) For each county with an unincorporated population of more than
fifteen thousand and less than twenty-two thousand, the county shall
receive in calendar year 2006 and 2007 the greater of the amount
provided in (a) of this subsection or the amount received in local
government assistance provided by section 716, chapter 276, Laws of
2004.
(d) To the extent that revenues are insufficient to fund the
distributions under this subsection, the distributions of all counties
as otherwise determined under this subsection shall be ratably reduced.
(e) To the extent that revenues exceed the amounts needed to fund
the distributions under this subsection, the excess funds shall be
divided ratably based upon unincorporated population among those
counties receiving funds under this subsection and imposing the tax
collected under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate.
(4)(a) For each city with a population of five thousand or less
with a per capita assessed property value less than twice the statewide
average per capita assessed property value for all cities for the
calendar year previous to the certification under subsection (6) of
this section, the city shall receive the greater of the following three
amounts:
(i) An amount necessary to increase the revenues collected under
RCW 82.14.030(1) up to fifty-five percent of the statewide weighted
average per capita level of sales and use tax revenues collected under
RCW 82.14.030(1) for all cities imposing the sales and use tax
authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) in the previous calendar year.
(ii) The amount received in local government assistance provided
for fiscal year 2005 by section 721, chapter 25, Laws of 2003 1st sp.
sess.
(iii) For a city with a per capita assessed property value less
than fifty-five percent of the statewide average per capita assessed
property value for all cities, an amount determined by subtracting the
city's per capita assessed property value from fifty-five percent of
the statewide average per capita assessed property value, dividing that
amount by one thousand, and multiplying the result by the city's
population.
(b) For each city with a population of more than five thousand with
a per capita assessed property value less than the statewide average
per capita assessed property value for all cities for the calendar year
previous to the certification under subsection (6) of this section, the
city shall receive the greater of the following three amounts:
(i) An amount necessary to increase the revenues collected under
RCW 82.14.030(1) up to fifty percent of the statewide weighted average
per capita level of sales and use tax revenues collected under RCW
82.14.030(1) for all cities imposing the sales and use tax authorized
under RCW 82.14.030(1) in the previous calendar year.
(ii) For calendar year 2006 and 2007, the amount received in local
government assistance provided for fiscal year 2005 by section 721,
chapter 25, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.
(iii) For a city with a per capita assessed property value less
than fifty-five percent of the statewide average per capita assessed
property value for all cities, an amount determined by subtracting the
city's per capita assessed property value from fifty-five percent of
the statewide average per capita assessed property value, dividing that
amount by one thousand, and multiplying the result by the city's
population.
(c) No city may receive an amount greater than one hundred thousand
dollars a year under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) To the extent that revenues are insufficient to fund the
distributions under this subsection, the distributions of all cities as
otherwise determined under this subsection shall be ratably reduced.
(e) To the extent that revenues exceed the amounts needed to fund
the distributions under this subsection, the excess funds shall be
divided ratably based upon population among those cities receiving
funds under this subsection and imposing the tax collected under RCW
82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate.
(f) This subsection only applies to cities incorporated prior to
the effective date of this section.
(5) The two hundred fifty thousand dollar amount in subsection (3)
of this section and the one hundred thousand dollar amount in
subsection (4) of this section shall be increased each year beginning
in calendar year 2006 by inflation as defined in RCW 84.55.005, as
determined by the department of revenue.
(6) Distributions under subsections (3) and (4) of this section
shall be made quarterly beginning on October 1, 2005, based on
population as last determined by the office of financial management.
The department of revenue shall certify the amounts to be distributed
under this section to the state treasurer. The certification shall be
made by October 1, 2005, for the October 1, 2005, distribution and the
January 1, 2006, distribution, based on calendar year 2004 collections.
The certification shall be made by March 1, 2006, for distributions
beginning April 1, 2006, and by March 1st of every year thereafter.
The March 1st certification shall be used for distributions occurring
on April 1st, July 1st, and October 1st of the year of certification
and on January 1st of the year following certification.
(7) All distributions to local governments from the city-county
assistance account constitute increases in state distributions of
revenue to political subdivisions for purposes of state reimbursement
for the costs of new programs and increases in service levels under RCW
43.135.060, including any claims or litigation pending against the
state on or after January 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
During calendar year 2008, the joint legislative audit and review
committee shall review the distributions to cities and counties under
section 2 of this act to determine the extent to which the
distributions target the needs of cities and counties for which the
repeal of the motor vehicle excise tax had the greatest fiscal impact.
In conducting the study, the committee shall solicit input from the
cities and counties. The department of revenue and the state treasurer
shall provide the committee with any data within their purview that the
committee considers necessary to conduct the review. The committee
shall report to the legislature the results of its findings, and any
recommendations for changes to the distribution formulas under section
2 of this act, by December 31, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect August 1, 2005.

--- END ---