BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.26 RCW
to read as follows:
A credit is allowed to a retailer against the taxes imposed under
this chapter equal to the amount of taxes paid by the retailer under
this chapter on tobacco products that are transferred by the retailer
to a consumer outside this state for use outside this state. Credits
shall first be applied to tax liability of the retailer under this
chapter during the reporting period. Credits in excess of the tax
liability under this chapter in a reporting period may be carried
forward to future reporting periods for a maximum of one year.

--- END ---