BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of providing cost-efficient worker's compensation
coverage for agency in-home caregivers, the department shall assume
responsibility for providing worker's compensation coverage for
employees of nonprofit and proprietary agencies who provide in-home
personal care services pursuant to contracts with area agencies on
aging. The worker's compensation coverage shall be provided on the
same terms as the independent provider worker's compensation program.

--- END ---