BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The certification of animal massage
practitioners is in the interest of the public health, safety, and
welfare.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Certified animal massage practitioner" means an individual who
provides external manipulation or pressure of soft tissues by use of
the hands and/or body or device designed and limited to providing
massage. Animal massage may include techniques such as stroking,
percussions, compressions, friction, Swedish gymnastics or movements,
gliding, kneading, range of motion or stretching, and fascial or
connective tissue stretching, with or without the aid of superficial
heat, cold, water, lubricants, or salts. Animal massage does not
include diagnosis, prescription, or prognosis of conditions; attempts
to adjust or manipulate any articulations of the animal's body or spine
or mobilization of these articulations by the use of a thrusting force;
acupuncture involving the use of needles; or mechanical therapies that
are restricted to the field of veterinary medicine.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Any person not licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW may apply for certification as a small or large animal massage
practitioner upon completion of three hundred hours of training in
either large or small animal massage. Training must include animal
massage techniques, kinesiology, anatomy, physiology, behavior, first
aid care, and handling techniques.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Nothing in this chapter may be construed to
prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice of veterinary medicine by those who are in
compliance with chapter 18.92 RCW;
(2) The practice of animal massage by those who are in compliance
with chapter 18.108 RCW; and
(3) The practice of animal massage therapy by a person who is a
regular student in an educational program whose performance of services
is pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments from an
instructor and under the general supervision of the instructor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 In addition to any other authority provided
by law, the secretary has the authority to:
(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as required to implement
this chapter;
(2) Establish all certification and renewal fees in accordance with
RCW 43.70.250;
(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(4) Certify an applicant or deny certification based upon
unprofessional conduct or impairment governed by the uniform
disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;
(5) Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff
as needed to implement this chapter; and
(6) Maintain the official department record for all applicants and
persons with certifications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The secretary shall certify an applicant on
forms provided by the secretary. Each applicant shall pay a fee
determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The fee shall
accompany the application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The secretary shall establish by rule the
procedural requirements and fees for renewal of certification. Failure
to renew invalidates the certification and all privileges granted by
the certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130
RCW, governs the uncertified practice, the issuance and denial of
certification, and the discipline of persons certified under this
chapter. The secretary is the disciplining authority under this
chapter.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.130.040 and 2004 c 38 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(iii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iv) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(v) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(vi) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vii) Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
(viii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(ix) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(x) Persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(xi) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, marriage and
family therapists, and social workers under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xii) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xiii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiv) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xvi) Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter
18.205 RCW;
(xvii) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex
offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;
(xviii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xix) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xx) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;
(xxi) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
and
(xxii) Recreational therapists.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW; ((and))
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW; and
(xv) Animal massage practitioners certified under chapter 18.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 8 of this act).
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses
based on the conditions and criteria established in this chapter and
the chapters specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter
also governs any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to
denial of licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the
applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW 18.130.160
by the disciplining authority.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---