BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.04.245 and 1995 c 120 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the other provisions of this title, personal
services performed for, or for the benefit of, a third party pursuant
to a contract with a temporary services agency, ((employee leasing
agency,)) services referral agency, or other entity shall be deemed to
be employment for the temporary services agency, employee leasing
agency, services referral agency, or other entity when the agency is
responsible, under contract or in fact, for the payment of wages in
remuneration for the services performed.
The temporary services agency, staffing company, services referral
agency, or other such entity will be considered the employer as defined
in RCW 50.04.080 and the employing unit as defined in RCW 50.04.090.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Temporary services agency" or "staffing company" means an
individual or entity ((that is engaged in the business of furnishing
individuals to perform services on a part-time or temporary basis for
a third party.
(b) "Employee leasing agency" means an individual or entity that
for a fee places the employees of a client onto its payroll and leases
such employees back to the client)) other than a professional employer
organization, that hires its own employees and assigns them to a client
to support or supplement the client's work force on a temporary basis
for special work situations such as employee absences, temporary skill
shortages, seasonal workloads, and special assignments and projects.
(((c))) (b) "Services referral agency" means an individual or
entity that is engaged in the business of offering the services of an
individual to perform specific tasks for a third party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the other provisions of this title, personal
services performed for, or for the benefit of, a client employer
pursuant to a written contract with an employee leasing agency,
professional employer organization, or other similar entity shall be
deemed to be employment for the client employer for unemployment
insurance reporting purposes.
The client employer will be considered the employer as defined in
RCW 50.04.080 and the employing unit as defined in RCW 50.04.090.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter:
(a) "Employee leasing agency" means an individual or entity that
for a fee places the employees of a client onto its payroll and leases
such employees back to the client.
(b) "Professional employer organization" means an individual or
entity that provides employment administrative services, benefit
options and administration, and employer liability management and
services to a client employer.
(c) "Client employer" means an individual or entity that enters
into a professional services agreement with an employee leasing agency
or professional employer organization.
(d) "Professional employer services" means services provided by a
professional employer organization for a client pursuant to an
agreement that establishes a coemployment relationship for the
provision of payroll, benefits, and other human resource functions, or
the leasing of employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A common pay agent or common paymaster will not be considered
the employer as defined in RCW 50.04.080 or the employing unit as
defined in RCW 50.04.090.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter:
(a) A common pay agent is an independent third party who contracts
with, and represents, two or more employers; and who files a combined
tax report for those employers.
(b) A common paymaster is two or more employers in which one of the
employers has been designated to disburse wages to concurrently
employed individuals of any of the related companies.

Sec. 4 RCW 50.04.320 and 1998 c 162 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of payment of contributions, "wages" means the
remuneration paid by one employer during any calendar year to an
individual in its employment under this title or the unemployment
compensation law of any other state in the amount specified in RCW
50.24.010. If an employer (hereinafter referred to as a successor
employer) during any calendar year acquires substantially all or a
portion of the operating assets, and/or the employees of another
employer (hereinafter referred to as a predecessor employer) or
operating assets, and/or the employees, used in a separate unit of a
trade or business of a predecessor employer, and immediately after the
acquisition employs in the individual's trade or business an individual
who immediately before the acquisition was employed in the trade or
business of the predecessor employer, then, for the purposes of
determining the amount of remuneration paid by the successor employer
to the individual during the calendar year which is subject to
contributions, any remuneration paid to the individual by the
predecessor employer during that calendar year and before the
acquisition shall be considered as having been paid by the successor
employer.
(2) For the purpose of payment of benefits, "wages" means the
remuneration paid by one or more employers to an individual for
employment under this title during his base year: PROVIDED, That at
the request of a claimant, wages may be calculated on the basis of
remuneration payable. The department shall notify each claimant that
wages are calculated on the basis of remuneration paid, but at the
claimant's request a redetermination may be performed and based on
remuneration payable.
(3) For the purpose of payment of benefits and payment of
contributions, the term "wages" includes tips ((which are)) received
((after January 1, 1987,)) while performing services which constitute
employment, and which are reported to the employer for federal income
tax purposes.
(4)(a) "Remuneration" means all compensation paid for personal
services including commissions and bonuses and the cash value of all
compensation paid in any medium other than cash. The reasonable cash
value of compensation paid in any medium other than cash and the
reasonable value of gratuities shall be estimated and determined in
accordance with rules prescribed by the commissioner. Remuneration
does not include payments to members of a reserve component of the
armed forces of the United States, including the organized militia of
the state of Washington, for the performance of duty for periods not
exceeding seventy-two hours at a time.
(b) Previously accrued compensation, other than severance pay or
payments received pursuant to plant closure agreements, when assigned
to a specific period of time by virtue of a collective bargaining
agreement, individual employment contract, customary trade practice, or
request of the individual compensated, shall be considered remuneration
for the period to which it is assigned. Assignment clearly occurs when
the compensation serves to make the individual eligible for all regular
fringe benefits for the period to which the compensation is assigned.
(c) Settlements or other proceeds received by an individual as a
result of a negotiated settlement for termination of an individual
written employment contract prior to its expiration date shall be
considered remuneration. The proceeds shall be deemed assigned in the
same intervals and in the same amount for each interval as compensation
was allocated under the contract.
(d) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the provisions of
this subsection (4) pertaining to the assignment of previously accrued
compensation shall not apply to individuals subject to RCW 50.44.050.

Sec. 5 RCW 50.24.170 and 1945 c 35 s 105 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall prescribe regulations for the
establishment, maintenance, and dissolution of joint accounts by two or
more employers, and shall, in accordance with such regulations and upon
application by two or more employers to establish such account, or to
merge their several individual accounts in a joint account, maintain
such joint account as if it constituted a single employer's account.
(2) Joint accounts may not be established for individuals or
entities defined under section 2 or 3 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 50.29.062 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 18 are each amended
to read as follows:
Predecessor and successor employer contribution rates shall be
computed in the following manner:
(1) If the successor is an employer, as defined in RCW 50.04.080,
at the time of the transfer((,)):
(a) Its contribution rate shall remain unchanged for the remainder
of the rate year in which the transfer occurs.
((From and after)) (b) Beginning January 1st following the
transfer, the successor's contribution rate for each rate year shall be
based on ((its)) a combination of the following:
(i) The successor's experience with payrolls and benefits
((including the experience of the acquired business or portion of a
business from the date of transfer, as of the regular computation date
for that rate year)); and
(ii) Any experience assigned to the predecessor involved in the
transfer. If only a portion of the business was transferred, then the
experience attributable to the acquired portion is assigned to the
successor.
(c) If it is found that a substantial purpose of the transfer of
the business was to obtain a reduced array calculation factor rate,
then the experience rating accounts of the employers involved shall be
combined into a single account and assigned the higher of the
predecessor or successor array calculation factor rate effective as of
the date of the transfer.
(2) ((For transfers before January 1, 2005, the following applies))
If the successor is not an employer at the time of the transfer((.)),
the following applies:
(a) For transfers before January 1, 2005, except as provided in
(iii) of this subsection the successor shall pay contributions at the
lowest rate determined under either of the following:
(((a)))(i) ((For transfers before January 1, 1997, the contribution
rate of the rate class assigned to the predecessor employer at the time
of the transfer for the remainder of that rate year and continuing
until the successor qualifies for a different rate in its own right;
(ii) For transfers on or after January 1, 1997,)) The contribution
rate of the rate class assigned to the predecessor employer at the time
of the transfer for the remainder of that rate year. Any experience
relating to the assignment of that rate class attributable to the
predecessor is transferred to the successor. Beginning with the
January 1st following the transfer, the successor's contribution rate
shall be based on a combination of the transferred experience of the
acquired business and the successor's experience after the transfer; or
(((b))) (ii) The contribution rate equal to the average industry
rate as determined by the commissioner, but not less than one percent,
and continuing until the successor qualifies for a different rate in
its own right. Assignment of employers by the commissioner to
industrial classification, for purposes of this subsection, must be in
accordance with established classification practices found in the
(("Standard Industrial Classification Manual")) North American industry
classification system issued by the federal office of management and
budget to the ((third)) fourth digit provided in the ((standard
industrial classification code, or in the)) North American industry
classification code system.
(((3) For transfers before January 1, 2005, if the successor is not
an employer at the time of the transfer and)) (iii) If the successor
simultaneously acquires the business or a portion of the business of
two or more employers in different rate classes, its rate from the date
the transfer occurred until the end of that rate year and until it
qualifies in its own right for a new rate, shall be the highest rate
class applicable at the time of the acquisition to any predecessor
employer who is a party to the acquisition, but not less than one
percent.
(((4))) (b) For transfers on or after January 1, 2005, ((the
following applies if the successor is not an employer at the time of
the transfer:
(a))) except as provided in (((b))) (iii) of this subsection, the
successor shall pay contributions:
(i) At the contribution rate ((determined for)) assigned to the
predecessor employer at the time of the transfer for the remainder of
((the)) that rate year. Any experience attributable to the predecessor
relating to the assignment of the predecessor's rate class is
transferred to the successor. ((On and after)) Beginning January 1st
following the transfer, the successor's array calculation factor rate
shall be based on a combination of the transferred experience of the
acquired business and the successor's experience after the transfer if
qualified under RCW 50.29.010(6) by including the transferred
experience; or
(ii) At the contribution rate equal to the sum of the rates
determined by the commissioner under RCW 50.29.025(2) (c)(ii) and
(d)(ii), and 50.29.041, if applicable, and continuing until the
successor qualifies for a different rate in its own right.
(((b))) (iii) If there is a substantial continuity of ownership,
control, or management by the successor of the business of the
predecessor, the successor shall pay contributions at the contribution
rate determined for the predecessor employer at the time of the
transfer for the remainder of that rate year. Any experience
attributable to the predecessor relating to the assignment of the
predecessor's rate class is transferred to the successor. ((On and
after)) Beginning January 1st following the transfer, the successor's
array calculation factor rate shall be based on a combination of the
transferred experience of the acquired business and the successor's
experience after the transfer.
(((c))) (iv) If the successor simultaneously acquires the business
or a portion of the business of two or more employers with different
contribution rates, the successor's rate from the date the transfer
occurred until the end of that rate year and until it qualifies in its
own right for a new rate, shall be the sum of the rates determined by
the commissioner under RCW 50.29.025(2) (a) and (b), and 50.29.041,
applicable at the time of the acquisition, to the predecessor employer
who, among the parties to the acquisition, had the largest ((taxable))
total payroll in the completed calendar quarter immediately preceding
the date of transfer, but not less than the sum of the rates determined
by the commissioner under RCW 50.29.025(2) (c)(ii) and (d)(ii), and
50.29.041, if applicable.
(((5))) (c) The experience attributable to the predecessor employer
shall not be transferred if the successor employer is found to have
acquired the business solely or primarily for the purpose of obtaining
a lower array calculation factor rate. Instead, the new employer rate
will be assigned.
(3) The contribution rate on any payroll retained by a predecessor
employer shall remain unchanged for the remainder of the rate year in
which the transfer occurs.
(((6))) (4) In all cases, ((from and after)) beginning January 1st
following the transfer, the predecessor's contribution rate or((,
beginning January 1, 2005,)) the predecessor's array calculation factor
for each rate year shall be based on its experience with payrolls and
benefits as of the regular computation date for that rate year
((including)) excluding the experience of the ((acquired)) transferred
business or transferred portion of business ((up to the date of
transfer)) as that experience has transferred to the successor:
PROVIDED, That if all of the predecessor's business is transferred to
a successor or successors, the predecessor shall not be a qualified
employer until it satisfies the requirements of a "qualified employer"
as set forth in RCW 50.29.010.

Sec. 7 RCW 50.12.220 and 2004 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a))) If an employer fails to file ((in)) a timely ((and
complete manner a)) report as required by RCW 50.12.070, or the rules
adopted pursuant thereto, ((the employer shall be subject to a penalty
to be determined by the commissioner, but not to exceed two hundred
fifty dollars or ten percent of the quarterly contributions for each
such offense, whichever is less.
(b))) the employer is subject to a penalty of twenty-five dollars
per violation, unless the penalty is waived by the department.
(b) An employer who files an incomplete or incorrectly formatted
tax and wage report as required by RCW 50.12.070 shall receive a
warning letter for the first occurrence. For subsequent occurrences,
the employer is subject to a penalty as follows:
(i) When no contributions are due, the second occurrence is subject
to a seventy-five dollar penalty, the third occurrence is subject to a
one hundred fifty dollar penalty, and for the fourth occurrence and
thereafter, a penalty of two hundred fifty dollars will be assessed.
(ii) When contributions are due, the second occurrence is subject
to a penalty of ten percent of the quarterly contributions due, but not
less than seventy-five dollars, the third occurrence is subject to a
penalty of ten percent of the quarterly contributions due, but not less
than one hundred fifty dollars, and for the fourth occurrence and
thereafter, a penalty of two hundred fifty dollars will be assessed.
(2) If an employer knowingly misrepresents to the employment
security department the amount of his or her payroll upon which
contributions under this title are based, the employer shall be liable
to the state for up to ten times the amount of the difference in
contributions paid, if any, and the amount the employer should have
paid and for the reasonable expenses of auditing his or her books and
collecting such sums. Such liability may be enforced in the name of
the department.
(((c))) (3) If any part of a delinquency for which an assessment is
made under this title is due to an intent to evade the successorship
provisions of RCW 50.29.062, then for the calendar year in which the
commissioner makes the determination under this subsection, the
commissioner shall assign to the employer, and to any business found to
be promoting the evasion of such provisions, the contribution rate
determined for that calendar year under RCW 50.29.025, including the
solvency surcharge, if any, for rate class 20 or rate class 40, as
applicable, plus two percent. Such employer must also pay for the
reasonable expenses of auditing his or her books and collecting such
sums.
(a) If the person evading successorship provisions, or promoting
evasion of such provisions, is not an employer, such person shall be
subject to the penalties prescribed in RCW 50.36.020 as if they were an
employer, plus the reasonable expenses of auditing his or her books and
collecting such sums.
(b) For purposes of this section, the term "knowingly" means having
actual knowledge of or acting with deliberate ignorance or reckless
disregard for the prohibition involved and, includes, but is not
limited to, intent to evade, misrepresentation, or willful
nondisclosure.
(c) The commissioner shall establish procedures to enforce this
subsection.
(((2))) (4) If contributions are not paid on the date on which they
are due and payable as prescribed by the commissioner, there shall be
assessed a penalty of five percent of the amount of the contributions
for the first month or part thereof of delinquency; there shall be
assessed a total penalty of ten percent of the amount of the
contributions for the second month or part thereof of delinquency; and
there shall be assessed a total penalty of twenty percent of the amount
of the contributions for the third month or part thereof of
delinquency. No penalty so added shall be less than ten dollars.
These penalties are in addition to the interest charges assessed under
RCW 50.24.040.
(((3))) (5) Penalties shall not accrue on contributions from an
estate in the hands of a receiver, executor, administrator, trustee in
bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating officer
subsequent to the date when such receiver, executor, administrator,
trustee in bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating
officer qualifies as such, but contributions accruing with respect to
employment of persons by a receiver, executor, administrator, trustee
in bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating officer shall
become due and shall be subject to penalties in the same manner as
contributions due from other employers.
(((4))) (6) Where adequate information has been furnished to the
department and the department has failed to act or has advised the
employer of no liability or inability to decide the issue, penalties
shall be waived by the commissioner. Penalties may also be waived for
good cause if the commissioner determines that the failure to
((timely)) file timely and complete reports or pay contributions was
not due to the employer's fault.
(((5))) (7) Any decision to assess a penalty as provided by this
section shall be made by the chief administrative officer of the tax
branch or his or her designee.
(((6))) (8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny an
employer the right to appeal the assessment of any penalty. Such
appeal shall be made in the manner provided in RCW 50.32.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 50.12.220 is recodified as a new section
in chapter 50.36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 50.29 RCW
to read as follows:
The commissioner of the employment security department may adopt
such rules as are necessary to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---