BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Each department or agency of the state may adopt rules governing
the accumulation and use of sick leave for employees, expressly for the
establishment of a plan allowing participating employees to pool sick
leave and allowing any sick leave thus pooled to be used by any
participating employee who has used all of the sick leave that has been
personally accrued by him or her. Rules adopted by a department or
agency shall provide:
(1) That employees are eligible for participation in the sick leave
pool after one year of employment with the state or agency of the state
if the employee has accrued a minimum amount of unused sick leave, to
be established by rule;
(2) That participation in the sick leave pool shall, at all times,
be voluntary on the part of the employees;
(3) That any sick leave pooled shall be removed from the personally
accumulated sick leave balance of the employee contributing the leave;
(4) That any sick leave in the pool that is used by a participating
employee may be used only for the employee's personal illness,
accident, or injury;
(5) That a participating employee is not eligible to use sick leave
accumulated in the pool until all of his or her personally accrued
sick, annual, and compensatory leave has been used;
(6) A maximum number of days of sick leave in the pool that any one
employee may use;
(7) That a participating employee who uses sick leave from the pool
is not required to recontribute such sick leave to the pool, except as
otherwise provided in this section;
(8) That an employee who cancels his or her membership in the sick
leave pool is not eligible to withdraw the days of sick leave
contributed by that employee to the pool;
(9) That an employee who transfers from one position in state
government to another position in state government may transfer from
one pool to another if the eligibility criteria of the pools are
comparable and the administrators of the pools have agreed on a formula
for transfer of credits;
(10) That alleged abuse of the use of the sick leave pool shall be
investigated, and, on a finding of wrongdoing, the employee shall repay
all of the sick leave credits drawn from the sick leave pool and shall
be subject to such other disciplinary action as is determined by the
agency head;
(11) That sick leave credits may be drawn from the sick leave pool
by a part-time employee on a pro rata basis; and
(12) That each department or agency shall maintain accurate and
reliable records showing the amount of sick leave which has been
accumulated and is unused by employees, in accordance with guidelines
established by the department of personnel.

--- END ---