BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature that the public duty
doctrine as a whole is a doctrine of law which has had its source in
judicial precedent, and that the legislature does not intend to codify
the doctrine in its entirety. However, the legislature intends to
apply the doctrine specifically to those instances in which a
department of state government, or a cognate function of local
government, is alleged to be liable for its acts or omissions in the
supervision of certain specified third parties.
(2)(a) In any tort action filed against a governmental entity or
its past or present public officials for conduct in a governmental
capacity, no liability may be imposed unless the conduct breached a
duty owed to the injured person as an individual, rather than to the
public in general. Liability may only be imposed if the claim is based
upon an act or failure to act to prevent or diminish harmful
consequences of a condition or situation, whether created by acts or
omissions intentional or negligent in character, including the violent
or tortious conduct of a third person, and the plaintiff shows that the
condition or situation was substantially caused by the governmental
entity or any person acting on behalf of the governmental entity. This
subsection applies only with regard to a governmental entity that has
responsibility for a supervised person in the community charged with or
convicted of a crime and not in physical custody or confinement.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "supervised person" means
anyone in or on community supervision, community custody, community
placement, probation, pretrial supervision, or parole, including
juvenile offenders under the jurisdiction of the juvenile
rehabilitation administration of the department of social and health
services or any successor organization, and anyone subject to a
commitment order under chapter 10.77, 70.96A, 71.05, 71.09, or 71.34
RCW, and conditionally released or on a less restrictive alternative.

--- END ---