BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.07 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall adopt rules requiring any entity
that is required to file an annual report with the secretary of state,
including entities under Titles 23, 23B, 24, and 25 RCW, to disclose
any transfer in the controlling interest of the entity and any interest
in real property.
(2) This information shall be made available to the department of
revenue upon request for the purposes of tracking the transfer of the
controlling interest in real property and to determine when the real
estate excise tax is applicable in such cases.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "controlling interest" has
the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.45.033.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW
to read as follows:
An organization that fails to report a transfer of the controlling
interest in the organization under section 1 of this act to the
secretary of state and is later determined to be subject to real estate
excise taxes due to the transfer, shall be subject to the provisions of
RCW 82.45.100 as well as the evasion penalty in RCW 82.32.090(6).

--- END ---