BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.60.326 and 2003 c 374 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to maintain an adequate, fair, and economically sound
schedule of charges for the transportation of passengers, vehicles, and
commodities on the Washington state ferries, the department of
transportation each year shall conduct a full review of such charges.
(2) Prior to February 1st of each odd-numbered year the department
shall transmit to the transportation commission a report of its review
together with its recommendations for the revision of a schedule of
charges for the ensuing biennium. The commission on or before July 1st
of that year shall adopt as a rule, in the manner provided by the
Washington administrative procedure act, a schedule of charges for the
Washington state ferries for the ensuing biennium commencing July 1st.
The schedule may initially be adopted as an emergency rule if necessary
to take effect on, or as near as possible to, July 1st.
(3) The department in making its review and formulating
recommendations and the commission in adopting a schedule of charges
may consider any of the following factors:
(a) The amount of subsidy available to the ferry system for
maintenance and operation;
(b) The time and distance of ferry runs;
(c) The maintenance and operation costs for ferry runs with a
proper adjustment for higher costs of operating outmoded or less
efficient equipment;
(d) The efficient distribution of traffic between cross-sound
routes;
(e) The desirability of reasonable ((commutation)) rates for
persons using the ferry system to commute daily to work and other
frequent users who live in ferry-dependent communities;
(f) The effect of proposed fares in increasing walk-on and
vehicular passenger use;
(g) The effect of proposed fares in promoting all types of ferry
use during nonpeak periods;
(h) The estimated revenues that are projected to be earned by the
ferry system from commercial advertisements, parking, contracts,
leases, and other sources;
(i) Such other factors as prudent managers of a major ferry system
would consider.
(4) If at any time during the biennium it appears that projected
revenues from the Puget Sound ferry operations account and any other
operating subsidy available to the Washington state ferries will be
less than the projected total cost of maintenance and operation of the
Washington state ferries for the biennium, the department shall
forthwith undertake a review of its schedule of charges to ascertain
whether or not the schedule of charges should be revised. The
department shall, upon completion of its review report, submit its
recommendation to the transportation commission which may in its sound
discretion revise the schedule of charges as required to meet necessary
maintenance and operation expenditures of the ferry system for the
biennium or may defer action until the regular annual review and
revision of ferry charges as provided in subsection (2) of this
section.
(5) The provisions of RCW 47.60.330 relating to public
participation shall apply to the process of revising ferry tolls under
this section.
(6) Under RCW 43.135.055, the transportation commission may
increase ferry tolls included in the schedule of charges adopted under
this section by a percentage that exceeds the fiscal growth factor.
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section and chapter
81.28 RCW, and using sound business judgment, the chief executive
officer of the ferry system may authorize the use of promotional,
discounted, and special event fares to the general public and
commercial enterprises for the purpose of maximizing capacity use and
the revenues collected by the ferry system. The department shall
report to the transportation commission a summary of the promotional,
discounted, and special event fares offered during each fiscal year and
the financial results from these activities.

--- END ---