BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.56.250 and 1986 c 305 s 301 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Economic damages" means objectively verifiable monetary
losses, including medical expenses, loss of earnings, burial costs,
loss of use of property, cost of replacement or repair, cost of
obtaining substitute domestic services, loss of employment, and loss of
business or employment opportunities.
(b) "Noneconomic damages" means subjective, nonmonetary losses,
including((,)) but not limited to pain, suffering, inconvenience,
mental anguish, disability or disfigurement incurred by the injured
party, loss of ability to enjoy life, emotional distress, loss of
society and companionship, loss of consortium, injury to reputation and
humiliation, ((and)) destruction of the parent-child relationship, and
other nonpecuniary damages of any type.
(c) "Bodily injury" means physical injury, sickness, or disease,
including death.
(d) "Average annual wage" means the average annual wage in the
state of Washington as determined under RCW 50.04.355.
(2) In no action seeking damages for personal injury or death may
a claimant recover a judgment for noneconomic damages exceeding an
amount determined by multiplying 0.43 by the average annual wage and by
the life expectancy of the person incurring noneconomic damages, as the
life expectancy is determined by the life expectancy tables adopted by
the insurance commissioner. For purposes of determining the maximum
amount allowable for noneconomic damages, a claimant's life expectancy
shall not be less than fifteen years. The limitation contained in this
subsection applies to all claims for noneconomic damages made by a
claimant who incurred bodily injury. Claims for loss of consortium,
loss of society and companionship, destruction of the parent-child
relationship, and all other derivative claims asserted by persons who
did not sustain bodily injury are to be included within the limitation
on claims for noneconomic damages arising from the same bodily injury.
(3) If a case is tried to a jury, the jury shall not be informed of
the limitation contained in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In an action or arbitration for damages for injury or death
occurring as a result of health care, or arranging for the provision of
health care, whether brought under chapter 7.70 RCW, or under RCW
4.20.010, 4.20.020, 4.20.046, 4.20.060, 4.24.010, or 48.43.545(1), or
any combination thereof, the total amount of noneconomic damages may
not exceed one million dollars.
(2) The limitation on noneconomic damages contained in subsection
(1) of this section includes all noneconomic damages claimed by or on
behalf of the person whose injury or death occurred as a result of
health care or arranging for the provision of health care, as well as
all claims for loss of consortium, loss of society and companionship,
destruction of the parent-child relationship, and other derivative
claims asserted by or on behalf of others arising from the same injury
or death. If the jury's assessment of noneconomic damages exceeds the
limitation contained in subsection (1) of this section, nothing in RCW
4.44.450 precludes the court from entering a judgment that limits the
total amount of noneconomic damages to those limits provided in
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 4.56 RCW
to read as follows:
In the event that the Washington state supreme court or other court
of competent jurisdiction rules or affirms that section 2 of this act
is unconstitutional, then the prescribed cap on noneconomic damages
takes effect upon the ratification of a state constitutional amendment
that empowers the legislature to place limits on the amount of
noneconomic damages recoverable in any or all civil causes of action.

Sec. 4 RCW 7.70.070 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The court shall, in any action under this chapter, determine
the reasonableness of each party's attorneys' fees. The court shall
take into consideration the following:
(((1))) (a) The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty
of the questions involved, and the skill requisite to perform the legal
service properly;
(((2))) (b) The likelihood, if apparent to the client, that the
acceptance of the particular employment will preclude other employment
by the lawyer;
(((3))) (c) The fee customarily charged in the locality for similar
legal services;
(((4))) (d) The amount involved and the results obtained;
(((5))) (e) The time limitations imposed by the client or by the
circumstances;
(((6))) (f) The nature and length of the professional relationship
with the client;
(((7))) (g) The experience, reputation, and ability of the lawyer
or lawyers performing the services;
(((8))) (h) Whether the fee is fixed or contingent.
(2) In no event may the fee charged, whether fixed or contingent,
for representing a person in connection with an action for damages
against a health care provider based upon professional negligence
exceed ten thousand dollars per hour.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 4 of this act applies to all
agreements for attorneys' fees entered into or modified after the
effective date of this section.

--- END ---