BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The governing documents may not prohibit the outdoor display of
political yard signs by an owner or resident on the owner's or
resident's property before any primary or general election. The
governing documents may include reasonable rules and regulations
regarding the placement and manner of display of political yard signs.
(2) This section applies retroactively to any governing documents
in effect on the effective date of this section. Any provision in a
governing document in effect on the effective date of this section that
is inconsistent with this section is void and unenforceable.

--- END ---