BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
DEFINITIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Basketball lessee" means a lessee of a multipurpose public
arena that owns or controls, on the effective date of this act, a
national basketball association franchise and a women's national
basketball association franchise and that has provided at least twenty
million dollars to the capital costs of an existing multipurpose public
arena and related facilities, and generated at least seventy million
dollars in revenues from operations at the multipurpose public arena
for the public owner of the multipurpose public arena together with
related facilities.
(2) "Capital improvements" means designing, acquiring,
constructing, expanding, reconstructing, remodeling, altering,
equipping, reequipping, or repairing a multipurpose public arena.
(3) "Multipurpose public arena" means a multipurpose public arena
with a seating capacity of sixteen thousand or more leased to a
basketball lessee.
(4) "Stadium tax revenues" means: (a) After the earlier of the
date the bonds issued to finance construction of a baseball stadium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.0485 are retired or December 1, 2014, taxes
collected pursuant to RCW 82.14.0485 and 82.14.360; and (b) taxes
collected pursuant to RCW 67.28.180(3)(d)(i)(A).

PART II
FINANCING
Sec. 201 RCW 82.14.0485 and 1995 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 101 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the
terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes
authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax
shall not exceed 0.017 percent of the selling price in the case of a
sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.
(3) Until the date that is the earlier of the date the bonds issued
for the construction of a baseball stadium are retired or December 1,
2014, moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the
purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds issued
by a county to construct a baseball stadium. After the date that is
the earlier of the date the bonds issued for the construction of a
baseball stadium are retired or December 1, 2014, money collected under
this section shall be used for the purposes set forth in section 301 of
this act. After the earlier of the date the bonds issued for the
construction of a baseball stadium are retired or December 1, 2014, if
money collected under this section exceeds the amount needed for the
purposes set forth in section 301 of this act in any year, the excess
shall be used solely for early retirement of bonds described in section
301(1)(b) of this act.
(4) No tax may be collected under this section before January 1,
1996, and no tax may be collected under this section unless the taxes
under RCW 82.14.360 are being collected. The tax imposed in this
section shall expire ((when)) on the later of the following dates:
(a) The earlier of the date on which the bonds issued for the
construction of the baseball stadium are retired((, but not more than
twenty years after the tax is first collected)) or December 1, 2014; or
(b) The date on which all bonds described in section 301(1)(b) of
this act are retired.
(5) As used in this section, "baseball stadium" means a baseball
stadium with natural turf and a retractable roof or canopy, together
with associated parking facilities, constructed in the largest city in
a county with a population of one million or more.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.14.360 and 2000 c 103 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more may impose a special stadium sales and use tax upon the
retail sale or use within the county by restaurants, taverns, and bars
of food and beverages that are taxable by the state under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of the tax shall not exceed five-tenths
of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax. The tax imposed
under this subsection is in addition to any other taxes authorized by
law and shall not be credited against any other tax imposed upon the
same taxable event. As used in this section, "restaurant" does not
include grocery stores, mini-markets, or convenience stores.
(2) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more may impose a special stadium sales and use tax upon
retail car rentals within the county that are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of the tax shall not
exceed two percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or
rental value of the vehicle in the case of a use tax. The tax imposed
under this subsection is in addition to any other taxes authorized by
law and shall not be credited against any other tax imposed upon the
same taxable event.
(3) Until the date that is the earlier of the date on which bonds
issued for the construction of a baseball stadium are retired or
December 1, 2014, the revenue from the taxes imposed under this section
shall be used for the purpose of principal and interest payments on
bonds, issued by the county, to acquire, construct, own, remodel,
maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate a baseball stadium.
Revenues from the taxes authorized in this section may be used for
design and other preconstruction costs of the baseball stadium until
bonds are issued for the baseball stadium. The county shall issue
bonds, in an amount determined to be necessary by the public facilities
district, for the district to acquire, construct, own, and equip the
baseball stadium. The county shall have no obligation to issue bonds
in an amount greater than that which would be supported by the tax
revenues under this section, RCW 82.14.0485, and 36.38.010(4) (a) and
(b).
(4) Until the date that is the earlier of the date on which the
bonds issued for the construction of a baseball stadium are retired or
December 1, 2014, if the revenue from the taxes imposed under this
section exceeds the amount needed for such principal and interest
payments in any year, the excess shall be used solely:
(a) For early retirement of the bonds issued for the baseball
stadium; and
(b) If the revenue from the taxes imposed under this section
exceeds the amount needed for the purposes in (a) of this subsection in
any year, the excess shall be placed in a contingency fund which may
only be used to pay unanticipated capital costs on the baseball
stadium, excluding any cost overruns on initial construction.
(((4))) (5) The taxes authorized under this section shall not be
collected after June 30, 1997, unless the county executive has
certified to the department of revenue that a professional major league
baseball team has made a binding and legally enforceable contractual
commitment to:
(a) Play at least ninety percent of its home games in the stadium
for a period of time not shorter than the term of the bonds issued to
finance the initial construction of the stadium;
(b) Contribute forty-five million dollars toward the reasonably
necessary preconstruction costs including, but not limited to
architectural, engineering, environmental, and legal services, and the
cost of construction of the stadium, or to any associated public
purpose separate from bond-financed property, including without
limitation land acquisition, parking facilities, equipment,
infrastructure, or other similar costs associated with the project,
which contribution shall be made during a term not to exceed the term
of the bonds issued to finance the initial construction of the stadium.
If all or part of the contribution is made after the date of issuance
of the bonds, the team shall contribute an additional amount equal to
the accruing interest on the deferred portion of the contribution,
calculated at the interest rate on the bonds maturing in the year in
which the deferred contribution is made. No part of the contribution
may be made without the consent of the county until a public facilities
district is created under chapter 36.100 RCW to acquire, construct,
own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate a baseball
stadium. To the extent possible, contributions shall be structured in
a manner that would allow for the issuance of bonds to construct the
stadium that are exempt from federal income taxes; and
(c) Share a portion of the profits generated by the baseball team
from the operation of the professional franchise for a period of time
equal to the term of the bonds issued to finance the initial
construction of the stadium, after offsetting any losses incurred by
the baseball team after the effective date of chapter 14, Laws of 1995
1st sp. sess. Such profits and the portion to be shared shall be
defined by agreement between the public facilities district and the
baseball team. The shared profits shall be used to retire the bonds
issued to finance the initial construction of the stadium. If the
bonds are retired before the expiration of their term, the shared
profits shall be paid to the public facilities district.
(((5))) (6) After the earlier of the date the bonds issued for the
construction of a baseball stadium are retired or December 1, 2014,
money collected under this section shall be used for the purposes set
forth in section 301 of this act. After the earlier of the date the
bonds issued for the construction of a baseball stadium are retired or
December 1, 2014, if money collected under this section exceeds the
amount needed for the purposes set forth in section 301 of this act in
any year, the excess shall be used solely for early retirement of bonds
described in section 301(1)(b) of this act.
(7) No tax may be collected under this section before January 1,
1996. Before collecting the taxes under this section or issuing bonds
for a baseball stadium, the county shall create a public facilities
district under chapter 36.100 RCW to acquire, construct, own, remodel,
maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate a baseball stadium.
(((6))) (8) The county shall assemble such real property as the
district determines to be necessary as a site for the baseball stadium.
Property which is necessary for this purpose that is owned by the
county on October 17, 1995, shall be contributed to the district, and
property which is necessary for this purpose that is acquired by the
county on or after October 17, 1995, shall be conveyed to the district.
(((7))) (9) The proceeds of any bonds issued for ((the)) a baseball
stadium shall be provided to the public facilities district that owns
the baseball stadium.
(((8))) (10) As used in this section, "baseball stadium" means
"baseball stadium" as defined in RCW 82.14.0485.
(((9))) (11) The taxes imposed under this section shall expire
((when)) on the later of the following dates:
(a) The earlier of the date on which the bonds issued for the
construction of the baseball stadium are retired((, but not later than
twenty years after the taxes are first collected)) or December 1, 2014;
or
(b) The date on which all bonds described in section 301(1)(b) of
this act are retired.

Sec. 203 RCW 67.28.180 and 2002 c 178 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions set forth in subsections (2) and (3)
of this section, the legislative body of any county or any city, is
authorized to levy and collect a special excise tax of not to exceed
two percent on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging
that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW.
(2) Any levy authorized by this section shall be subject to the
following:
(a) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this
section shall contain, in addition to all other provisions required to
conform to this chapter, a provision allowing a credit against the
county tax for the full amount of any city tax imposed pursuant to this
section upon the same taxable event.
(b) In the event that any county has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, either pledged the tax
revenues for payment of principal and interest on city revenue or
general obligation bonds authorized and issued pursuant to RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160 or has authorized and issued revenue or
general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150
through 67.28.160, such county shall be exempt from the provisions of
(a) of this subsection, to the extent that the tax revenues are pledged
for payment of principal and interest on bonds issued at any time
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160:
PROVIDED, That so much of such pledged tax revenues, together with any
investment earnings thereon, not immediately necessary for actual
payment of principal and interest on such bonds may be used: (i) In
any county with a population of one million or more, for repayment
either of limited tax levy general obligation bonds or of any county
fund or account from which a loan was made, the proceeds from the bonds
or loan being used to pay for constructing, installing, improving, and
equipping stadium capital improvement projects, and to pay for any
engineering, planning, financial, legal and professional services
incident to the development of such stadium capital improvement
projects, regardless of the date the debt for such capital improvement
projects was or may be incurred; (ii) in any county with a population
of one million or more, for repayment or refinancing of bonded
indebtedness incurred prior to January 1, 1997, for any purpose
authorized by this section or relating to stadium repairs or
rehabilitation, including but not limited to the cost of settling legal
claims, reimbursing operating funds, interest payments on short-term
loans, and any other purpose for which such debt has been incurred if
the county has created a public stadium authority to develop a stadium
and exhibition center under RCW 36.102.030; or (iii) in other counties,
for county-owned facilities for agricultural promotion. A county is
exempt under this subsection in respect to city revenue or general
obligation bonds issued after April 1, 1991, only if such bonds mature
before January 1, 2013.
As used in this subsection (2)(b), "capital improvement projects"
may include, but not be limited to a stadium restaurant facility,
restroom facilities, artificial turf system, seating facilities,
parking facilities and scoreboard and information system adjacent to or
within a county owned stadium, together with equipment, utilities,
accessories and appurtenances necessary thereto. The stadium
restaurant authorized by this subsection (2)(b) shall be operated by a
private concessionaire under a contract with the county.
(c)(i) No city within a county exempt under subsection (2)(b) of
this section may levy the tax authorized by this section so long as
said county is so exempt.
(ii) If bonds have been issued under RCW 43.99N.020 and any
necessary property transfers have been made under RCW 36.102.100, no
city within a county with a population of one million or more may levy
the tax authorized by this section before January 1, 2021. After
January 1, 2021, no city within a county with a population of one
million or more may levy the tax authorized by this section so long as
any bonds described in section 301(1)(b) of this act are outstanding.
After all bonds described in section 301(1)(b) of this act are retired,
no city within a county with a population of one million or more may
levy the tax authorized by this section at a rate in excess of one
percent on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging
that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW thereafter.
(iii) However, in the event that any city in a county described in
(i) or (ii) of this subsection (2)(c) has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, authorized and issued
revenue or general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160, such city may levy the tax so long as the
tax revenues are pledged for payment of principal and interest on bonds
issued at any time pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through
67.28.160.
(3) Any levy authorized by this section by a county that has levied
the tax authorized by this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975,
either pledged the tax revenues for payment of principal and interest
on city revenue or general obligation bonds authorized and issued
pursuant to RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160 or has authorized and
issued revenue or general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions
of RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160 shall be subject to the following:
(a) Taxes collected under this section in any calendar year before
2013 in excess of five million three hundred thousand dollars shall
only be used as follows:
(i) Seventy-five percent from January 1, 1992, through December 31,
2000, and seventy percent from January 1, 2001, through December 31,
2012, for art museums, cultural museums, heritage museums, the arts,
and the performing arts. Moneys spent under this subsection (3)(a)(i)
shall be used for the purposes of this subsection (3)(a)(i) in all
parts of the county.
(ii) Twenty-five percent from January 1, 1992, through December 31,
2000, and thirty percent from January 1, 2001, through December 31,
2012, for the following purposes and in a manner reflecting the
following order of priority: Stadium purposes as authorized under
subsection (2)(b) of this section; acquisition of open space lands;
youth sports activities; and tourism promotion. If all or part of the
debt on the stadium is refinanced, all revenues under this subsection
(3)(a)(ii) shall be used to retire the debt.
(b) From January 1, 2013, through December 31, 2015, in a county
with a population of one million or more, all revenues under this
section shall be used to retire the debt on the stadium, or deposited
in the stadium and exhibition center account under RCW 43.99N.060 after
the debt on the stadium is retired.
(c) From January 1, 2016, through December 31, 2020, in a county
with a population of one million or more, all revenues under this
section shall be deposited in the stadium and exhibition center account
under RCW 43.99N.060.
(d) In a county with a population of one million or more, revenues
under this section shall be used as follows:
(i) From January 1, 2021, until all bonds described in section
301(1)(b) of this act are special excise tax revenues collected under
subsection (1) of this section by a county in an amount not to exceed
two percent on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging
that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW shall be used for the
following purposes:
(A) Fifty percent of the revenues shall be used for the purposes
set forth in section 301(1)(b) of this act or for the early retirement
of such bonds; and
(B) Fifty percent of the revenues shall be used for art museums,
cultural museums, heritage museums, the arts, and the performing arts
in all parts of the county;
(ii) After the bonds described in section 301(1)(b) of this act are
retired, special excise tax revenues collected under subsection (1) of
this section by a county in an amount not to exceed one percent on the
sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is subject to
tax under chapter 82.08 RCW shall continue to be used for art museums,
cultural museums, heritage museums, the arts, and the performing arts
in all parts of the county.
(e) At least seventy percent of moneys spent under (a)(i) of this
subsection for the period January 1, 1992, through December 31, 2000,
shall be used only for the purchase, design, construction, and
remodeling of performing arts, visual arts, heritage, and cultural
facilities, and for the purchase of fixed assets that will benefit art,
heritage, and cultural organizations. For purposes of this subsection,
fixed assets are tangible objects such as machinery and other equipment
intended to be held or used for ten years or more. Moneys received
under this subsection (3)(((d))) (e) may be used for payment of
principal and interest on bonds issued for capital projects.
Qualifying organizations receiving moneys under this subsection
(3)(((d))) (e) must be financially stable and have at least the
following:
(i) A legally constituted and working board of directors;
(ii) A record of artistic, heritage, or cultural accomplishments;
(iii) Been in existence and operating for at least two years;
(iv) Demonstrated ability to maintain net current liabilities at
less than thirty percent of general operating expenses;
(v) Demonstrated ability to sustain operational capacity subsequent
to completion of projects or purchase of machinery and equipment; and
(vi) Evidence that there has been independent financial review of
the organization.
(((e))) (f) At least forty percent of the revenues distributed
pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection for the period January 1, 2001,
through December 31, 2012, shall be deposited in an account and shall
be used to establish an endowment. Principal in the account shall
remain permanent and irreducible. The earnings from investments of
balances in the account may only be used for the purposes of (a)(i) of
this subsection.
(((f))) (g) School districts and schools shall not receive revenues
distributed pursuant to (a)(i) or (d) of this subsection.
(((g))) (h) Moneys distributed to art museums, cultural museums,
heritage museums, the arts, and the performing arts, and moneys
distributed for tourism promotion shall be in addition to and may not
be used to replace or supplant any other funding by the legislative
body of the county.
(((h))) (i) As used in this section, "tourism promotion" includes
activities intended to attract visitors for overnight stays, arts,
heritage, and cultural events, and recreational, professional, and
amateur sports events. Moneys allocated to tourism promotion in a
class AA county shall be allocated to nonprofit organizations formed
for the express purpose of tourism promotion in the county. Such
organizations shall use moneys from the taxes to promote events in all
parts of the class AA county.
(((i))) (j) No taxes collected under this section may be used for
the operation or maintenance of a public stadium that is financed
directly or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged.
Expenditures for operation or maintenance include all expenditures
other than expenditures that directly result in new fixed assets or
that directly increase the capacity, life span, or operating economy of
existing fixed assets.
(((j))) (k) No ad valorem property taxes may be used for debt
service on bonds issued for a public stadium that is financed by bonds
to which the tax is pledged, unless the taxes collected under this
section are or are projected to be insufficient to meet debt service
requirements on such bonds.
(((k))) (l) If a substantial part of the operation and management
of a public stadium that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds to
which the tax is pledged is performed by a nonpublic entity or if a
public stadium is sold that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds
to which the tax is pledged, any bonds to which the tax is pledged
shall be retired. This subsection (3)(((k))) (l) does not apply in
respect to a public stadium under chapter 36.102 RCW transferred to,
owned by, or constructed by a public facilities district under chapter
36.100 RCW ((or)), a stadium and exhibition center, or a multipurpose
public arena as defined in section 101 of this act.
(((l))) (m) The county shall not lease a public stadium that is
financed directly or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged
to, or authorize the use of the public stadium by, a professional major
league sports franchise unless the sports franchise gives the right of
first refusal to purchase the sports franchise, upon its sale, to local
government. This subsection (3)(((l))) (m) does not apply to contracts
in existence on April 1, 1986, or to contracts with a basketball lessee
to lease a multipurpose public arena as defined in section 101 of this
act.
If a court of competent jurisdiction declares any provision of this
subsection (3) invalid, then that invalid provision shall be null and
void and the remainder of this section is not affected.

Sec. 204 RCW 35.21.280 and 2002 c 363 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every city and town may levy and fix a tax of not more than one
cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof to be paid by the person who
pays an admission charge to any place((: PROVIDED,)). However, no
city or town shall impose such tax on persons paying an admission to
any activity of any elementary or secondary school or any public
facility of a public facility district under chapter 35.57 or 36.100
RCW for which a tax is imposed under RCW 35.57.100 or 36.100.210,
except the city or town may impose a tax on persons paying an admission
to any activity of such public facility if the city or town uses the
admission tax revenue it collects on the admission charges to that
public facility for the construction, operation, maintenance, repair,
replacement, or enhancement of that public facility or to develop,
support, operate, or enhance programs in that public facility. Also,
except as provided in section 205 of this act, no city or town shall
impose such tax on persons paying an admission to any activity at a
multipurpose public arena as defined in section 101 of this act.
(2) Tax authorization under this section includes a tax on persons
who are admitted free of charge or at reduced rates to any place for
which other persons pay a charge or a regular higher charge for the
same privileges or accommodations. A city that is located in a county
with a population of one million or more may not levy a tax on events
in stadia constructed on or after January 1, 1995, that are owned by a
public facilities district under chapter 36.100 RCW and that have
seating capacities over forty thousand or, except as provided in
section 205 of this act, on events at a multipurpose public arena as
defined in section 101 of this act. The city or town may require
anyone who receives payment for an admission charge to collect and
remit the tax to the city or town.
(3) The term "admission charge" includes:
(a) A charge made for season tickets or subscriptions;
(b) A cover charge, or a charge made for use of seats and tables
reserved or otherwise, and other similar accommodations;
(c) A charge made for food and refreshment in any place where free
entertainment, recreation or amusement is provided;
(d) A charge made for rental or use of equipment or facilities for
purposes of recreation or amusement; if the rental of the equipment or
facilities is necessary to the enjoyment of a privilege for which a
general admission is charged, the combined charges shall be considered
as the admission charge;
(e) Automobile parking charges if the amount of the charge is
determined according to the number of passengers in the automobile.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 (1) A city may levy and fix a tax of not
more than one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof to be paid by
any person who pays an admission charge to a multipurpose public arena
as defined in section 101 of this act. This includes a tax on persons
who are admitted free of charge or at reduced rates to the multipurpose
public arena if other persons pay a charge or a regular higher charge
for the same privileges or accommodations.
(2) The tax collected under this section shall be used exclusively
either: (a) For the purpose of paying the principal and interest on
all or a portion of the bonds described in section 301(1)(b) of this
act; or (b) to fund capital improvements defined in section 101 of this
act and major maintenance to the multipurpose public arena and related
facilities.
(3) The term "admission charge" has the meaning set forth in RCW
35.21.280.

Sec. 206 RCW 82.29A.130 and 1999 c 165 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following leasehold interests shall be exempt from taxes
imposed pursuant to RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040:
(1) All leasehold interests constituting a part of the operating
properties of any public utility which is assessed and taxed as a
public utility pursuant to chapter 84.12 RCW.
(2) All leasehold interests in facilities owned or used by a
school, college or university which leasehold provides housing for
students and which is otherwise exempt from taxation under provisions
of RCW 84.36.010 and 84.36.050.
(3) All leasehold interests of subsidized housing where the fee
ownership of such property is vested in the government of the United
States, or the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof
but only if income qualification exists for such housing.
(4) All leasehold interests used for fair purposes of a nonprofit
fair association that sponsors or conducts a fair or fairs which
receive support from revenues collected pursuant to RCW 67.16.100 and
allocated by the director of the department of agriculture where the
fee ownership of such property is vested in the government of the
United States, the state of Washington or any of its political
subdivisions: PROVIDED, That this exemption shall not apply to the
leasehold interest of any sublessee of such nonprofit fair association
if such leasehold interest would be taxable if it were the primary
lease.
(5) All leasehold interests in any property of any public entity
used as a residence by an employee of that public entity who is
required as a condition of employment to live in the publicly owned
property.
(6) All leasehold interests held by enrolled Indians of lands owned
or held by any Indian or Indian tribe where the fee ownership of such
property is vested in or held in trust by the United States and which
are not subleased to other than to a lessee which would qualify
pursuant to this chapter, RCW 84.36.451 and 84.40.175.
(7) All leasehold interests in any real property of any Indian or
Indian tribe, band, or community that is held in trust by the United
States or is subject to a restriction against alienation imposed by the
United States: PROVIDED, That this exemption shall apply only where it
is determined that contract rent paid is greater than or equal to
ninety percent of fair market rental, to be determined by the
department of revenue using the same criteria used to establish taxable
rent in RCW 82.29A.020(2)(b).
(8) All leasehold interests for which annual taxable rent is less
than two hundred fifty dollars per year. For purposes of this
subsection leasehold interests held by the same lessee in contiguous
properties owned by the same lessor shall be deemed a single leasehold
interest.
(9) All leasehold interests which give use or possession of the
leased property for a continuous period of less than thirty days:
PROVIDED, That for purposes of this subsection, successive leases or
lease renewals giving substantially continuous use of possession of the
same property to the same lessee shall be deemed a single leasehold
interest: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no leasehold interest shall be deemed
to give use or possession for a period of less than thirty days solely
by virtue of the reservation by the public lessor of the right to use
the property or to allow third parties to use the property on an
occasional, temporary basis.
(10) All leasehold interests under month-to-month leases in
residential units rented for residential purposes of the lessee pending
destruction or removal for the purpose of constructing a public highway
or building.
(11) All leasehold interests in any publicly owned real or personal
property to the extent such leasehold interests arises solely by virtue
of a contract for public improvements or work executed under the public
works statutes of this state or of the United States between the public
owner of the property and a contractor.
(12) All leasehold interests that give use or possession of state
adult correctional facilities for the purposes of operating
correctional industries under RCW 72.09.100.
(13) All leasehold interests used to provide organized and
supervised recreational activities for disabled persons of all ages in
a camp facility and for public recreational purposes by a nonprofit
organization, association, or corporation that would be exempt from
property tax under RCW 84.36.030(1) if it owned the property. If the
publicly owned property is used for any taxable purpose, the leasehold
excise taxes set forth in RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040 shall be
imposed and shall be apportioned accordingly.
(14) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas
of a baseball stadium with natural turf and a retractable roof or
canopy that is in a county with a population of over one million, that
has a seating capacity of over forty thousand, and that is constructed
on or after January 1, 1995. "Public or entertainment areas" include
ticket sales areas, ramps and stairs, lobbies and concourses, parking
areas, concession areas, restaurants, hospitality and stadium club
areas, kitchens or other work areas primarily servicing other public or
entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press and media areas,
control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales areas,
museum and exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage
areas, loading, staging, and servicing areas, seating areas and suites,
the playing field, and any other areas to which the public has access
or which are used for the production of the entertainment event or
other public usage, and any other personal property used for these
purposes. "Public or entertainment areas" does not include locker
rooms or private offices exclusively used by the lessee.
(15) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas
of a stadium and exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, that
is constructed on or after January 1, 1998. For the purposes of this
subsection, "public or entertainment areas" has the same meaning as in
subsection (14) of this section, and includes exhibition areas.
(16) All leasehold interests in public facilities districts, as
provided in chapter 36.100 or 35.57 RCW.
(17) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas
of a multipurpose public arena defined in section 101 of this act. For
the purposes of this subsection, "public or entertainment areas" has
the same meaning as in subsection (14) of this section and includes
exhibition areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 Capital improvements as defined in section
101 of this act are exempt from state and local sales and use taxes due
under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW.

PART III
FLOW OF FUNDS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 (1) Stadium tax revenues as defined in
section 101 of this act shall only be used for the following purposes
in the following order of priority:
(a) Four million dollars in stadium tax revenues collected in any
calendar year between and including 2013 and 2020 shall be used for art
museums, cultural museums, heritage museums, the arts, and the
performing arts in all parts of the county distributing such revenue
pursuant to RCW 67.28.180(3)(a).
(b) Upon certification by a city that owns a multipurpose public
arena that a basketball lessee has entered into a lease for a
multipurpose public arena that meets the requirements set forth in
section 302(3) of this act, stadium tax revenues collected in any
calendar year and remaining after application under (a) of this
subsection, shall be transferred to the city that owns such
multipurpose public arena and used as follows:
(i) To pay scheduled principal and interest on bonds or refunding
bonds issued in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed sixty
million dollars to finance or refinance costs, or to reimburse the city
for the payment of costs, of the first phase of capital improvements
defined in section 101 of this act including costs of issuance and
costs associated with interim financing pending issuance of the bonds;
and
(ii) To pay scheduled principal and interest on bonds or refunding
bonds issued in an aggregate principal amount necessary to finance or
refinance: (A) Costs of the second phase of capital improvements
defined in section 101 of this act in an amount not to exceed two
hundred five million dollars in 2006 dollars adjusted for inflation
annually thereafter using the ENR 20-city construction cost index; (B)
costs of issuing the bonds; and (C) costs associated with interim
financing pending issuance of the bonds.
(2) A city that owns a multipurpose public arena shall pledge
stadium tax revenues to the repayment of bonds described in subsection
(1)(b)(ii) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 (1) A city that owns a multipurpose public
arena, after consulting with the basketball lessee, shall have the
authority to determine the overall scope and components of any capital
improvements defined in section 101 of this act, to approve the design
and specifications of such capital improvements, and to approve the
budget for such capital improvements.
(2) A city that owns a multipurpose public arena shall enter into
a development agreement with the basketball lessee under which the
basketball lessee undertakes and controls capital improvements defined
in section 101 of this act consistent with subsection (1) of this
section. Under the development agreement and subject to subsection (1)
of this section, the basketball lessee shall, subject to city approval,
determine project design, specifications, and budget. In addition, the
basketball lessee shall determine procurement procedures, and shall
select and engage an architect or architects, other professional
service providers, and a contractor or contractors for the capital
improvements, provided that any contracts for such capital improvements
shall be subject to the prevailing wage requirements of chapter 39.12
RCW and any contracts for capital improvements shall be subject to the
goals, if any, established by the city for women and minority business
participation. The basketball lessee shall, to the extent feasible,
hire local residents in connection with such capital improvements.
Under the development agreement, the basketball lessee shall assume
responsibility for any cost overruns in connection with capital
improvements financed with the proceeds of the bonds described in
section 301(1)(b)(ii) of this act. The total public contribution to
paying the cost of such capital improvements shall be limited to the
bonds described in section 301(1)(b)(ii) of this act.
(3) In consideration for the city's agreement to issue the bonds
described in section 301(1)(b)(ii) of this act, the basketball lessee
shall enter into a new sole master tenant lease agreement for the
multipurpose public arena, together with related facilities, that
includes without limitation the following terms:
(a) The term of the lease shall be not less than twenty years.
(b) The basketball lessee shall assume responsibility for
marketing, operation, and routine maintenance of the multipurpose
public arena at no cost to the city that owns the multipurpose public
arena.
(c) The lessee shall have the authority to sublease and enter into
use, license, and concession agreements with various lessees, users,
licensees, or concessionaires of the multipurpose public arena. The
basketball lessee shall have the right to retain all basketball and
nonbasketball revenues derived from the operation of the multipurpose
public arena, including revenues from any sublease, use, license and
concession agreements, revenues from concessions, ticket sales, suite
rentals, suite and seat licenses, advertising, parking, signage,
intellectual property rights, and naming rights, subject to section 304
of this act.
(d) The basketball lessee shall be required to use its good faith
best efforts to maintain the use profile of the multipurpose public
arena as a multipurpose facility.
(e) The basketball lessee shall provide for the national basketball
association team owned or controlled by the basketball lessee on the
effective date of this act to play not less than ninety percent of the
team's home regular season and all of its home playoff basketball games
in the multipurpose public arena for not less than twenty years,
subject to applicable league rules.
(f) The basketball lessee shall use its good faith best efforts to
retain the women's national basketball association team owned or
controlled by the basketball lessee on the effective date of this act
as a user of the multipurpose public arena playing not less than ninety
percent of the team's home regular season and all of its home playoff
basketball games in the multipurpose public arena for not less than
twenty years, subject to applicable league rules.
(g) Subject to the terms of the lease, the city is authorized to
sell permanent seat licenses to the multipurpose public arena and the
basketball lessee may act as sales agent for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A city that owns a multipurpose public
arena and a basketball lessee shall enter into an agreement regarding
capital improvements as defined in section 101 of this act. The
agreement shall address, but shall not be limited to:
(1) Expedited permit processing for the design and construction of
the capital improvements;
(2) Expedited environmental review processing;
(3) Expedited processing of requests for street, right of way, and
easement vacations necessary for the capital improvements; and
(4) Other items needed for the design and construction of the
capital improvements.
Nothing in this section limits a city's police power authority
consistent with applicable law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 A basketball lessee shall have the
authority to enter into one or more agreements to sell the right to
name all or a portion of the multipurpose public arena, subject to any
existing naming rights agreements with respect to the multipurpose
public arena. Any sale of the right to name all or a portion of the
multipurpose public arena shall be subject to the reasonable approval
of the city.

PART IV
PUBLIC WORKS PROVISIONS
Sec. 401 RCW 39.04.010 and 2000 c 138 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The term state shall include the state of Washington and all
departments, supervisors, commissioners and agencies thereof.
The term municipality shall include every city, county, town,
district or other public agency thereof which is authorized by law to
require the execution of public work, except drainage districts, diking
districts, diking and drainage improvement districts, drainage
improvement districts, diking improvement districts, consolidated
diking and drainage improvement districts, consolidated drainage
improvement districts, consolidated diking improvement districts,
irrigation districts or any such other districts as shall from time to
time be authorized by law for the reclamation or development of waste
or undeveloped lands.
The term public work shall include all work, construction,
alteration, repair, or improvement other than ordinary maintenance,
executed at the cost of the state or of any municipality, or which is
by law a lien or charge on any property therein. All public works,
including maintenance when performed by contract shall comply with the
provisions of RCW 39.12.020. The term does not include work,
construction, alteration, repair, or improvement performed under
contracts entered into under RCW 36.102.060(4) or under development
agreements entered into under RCW 36.102.060(7) or leases entered into
under RCW 36.102.060(8). The term does not include work, construction,
alteration, repair, or improvement to a multipurpose public arena and
related facilities undertaken and controlled by a basketball lessee
pursuant to a development agreement authorized pursuant to section
302(2) of this act or a lease authorized pursuant to section 302(3) of
this act or services procured by the basketball lessee in connection
with any such work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement.
The term contract shall mean a contract in writing for the
execution of public work for a fixed or determinable amount duly
awarded after advertisement and competitive bid. However, a contract
which is awarded from a small works roster need not be advertised.

PART V
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 Sections 101, 205, 207, and 301 through
304 of this act are each added to chapter 35.21 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 The provisions of this act shall be
liberally construed to effect the policies and purposes of this act.

--- END ---