BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The Washington national guard has a proud tradition of military
service with thousands of Washington residents having answered the call
of the nation and served in the national guard;
(b) There have been instances in which the dependents of members of
the Washington national guard have been left without adequate financial
resources when a national guard member has been killed while on active
duty;
(c) Members of the Washington national guard are now being asked to
serve extended periods of active duty in combat areas;
(d) Members of the Washington national guard are eligible for life
insurance policies with limits up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars
through the federal service members' group life insurance program; and
(e) Members of the Washington national guard provide Washington and
its citizens valuable benefits through their service inside this state
and through their recently extended periods of active duty in combat
areas outside of Washington, and in exchange for these extended periods
of active duty they should receive assistance with their premiums for
the federal service members' group life insurance program.
(2) The purpose of creating and funding the national guard life
insurance reimbursement account is to provide a benefit to members of
the Washington national guard in exchange for and in recognition of
their assumption of extended periods of active duty in combat areas, in
addition to their increased contributions to the safety and welfare of
the citizens of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 38.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington national guard life insurance reimbursement
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts
from appropriations, gifts, grants, donations, and bequests to the fund
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for reimbursing eligible members of the Washington
national guard for premiums paid for benefits under the service
members' group life insurance program under 38 U.S.C. Sec. 1965 et seq.
as amended. Only the adjutant general or a designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.
(2) The state military department shall adopt rules necessary to
determine eligibility for reimbursement from the account and to
implement a reimbursement program.
(3) This section does not alter, amend, or change the eligibility
or applicability of the service members' group life insurance program
pursuant to 38 U.S.C. Sec. 1965 et seq., as amended, or any rights,
responsibilities, or benefits thereunder.
(4) This section applies to premiums paid on or after the effective
date of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2004 c 246 s 8 and 2004 c 58 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future
teachers conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative
account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion
account, the produce railcar pool account, the rural rehabilitation
account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic
facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse
racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the
Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, ((and))
the Washington horse racing commission operating account (earnings from
the Washington horse racing commission operating account must be
credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund
account), and the Washington national guard life insurance
reimbursement account. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---