BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.996 and 2004 c 229 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To the extent that funds are appropriated, the department of
transportation shall administer a performance-based grant program for
private employers, public agencies, nonprofit organizations,
developers, and property managers who provide financial incentives for
ride sharing in vehicles carrying two or more persons, for using public
transportation, for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized
commuting, including telework, before July 1, 2013, to their own or
other employees.
(2) The amount of the grant will be determined based on the value
to the transportation system of the vehicle trips reduced. The commute
trip reduction task force shall develop an award rate giving priority
to applications achieving the greatest reduction in trips and commute
miles per public dollar requested and considering the following
criteria: The local cost of providing new highway capacity, congestion
levels, sustainability of trips reduced, and geographic distribution.
(3) No private employer, public agency, nonprofit organization,
developer, or property manager is eligible for grants under this
section in excess of one hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal year.
(4) The commute trip reduction task force shall develop an
application process that may award grants for cost-effective projects
of up to five years in length.
(5) The total of grants provided under this section may not exceed
seven hundred fifty thousand dollars in any fiscal year. However, this
subsection does not apply during the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium.
(((5))) (6) The department of transportation shall report to the
department of revenue by the 15th day of each month the aggregate
monetary amount of grants provided under this section in the prior
month and the identity of the recipients of those grants.
(((6))) (7) The source of funds for this grant program is the
multimodal transportation account.
(((7))) (8) This section expires January 1, 2014.

--- END ---