BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the presence
of a diverse learning environment helps students acquire the skills
needed to live and work successfully in our increasingly diverse
society. The United States supreme court and the Washington supreme
court have recognized the benefits of such educational diversity in a
student body as a compelling state interest as long as the means
employed to promote diversity are within narrowly tailored guidelines
that ensure that individuals are not unduly impacted. To ensure the
highest quality of education is provided at our universities and
colleges, they must have the ability to engage in a comprehensive
review of each applicant that includes all the positive qualities and
experiences an applicant possesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The boards of regents and boards of trustees
at research and comprehensive higher education institutions are
encouraged to establish policies on diversity in admissions and to
conduct comprehensive reviews of every application for admission.

--- END ---