BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Citizens demand and deserve accountability of public programs.
Public programs must continuously improve in quality, efficiency, and
effectiveness in order to increase public trust;
(2) Washington state government and other entities that receive tax
dollars must continuously improve the way they operate and deliver
services so citizens receive maximum value for their tax dollars; and
(3) Fair, independent, professional performance audits of state
agencies by the state auditor are essential to improving the efficiency
and effectiveness of government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of sections 3 through 6 of this act:
(1) "Board" means the citizen accountability advisory board created
in section 4 of this act.
(2) "Performance audit" means an objective and systematic
assessment of a state agency or agencies or any of their programs,
functions, or activities by an independent auditor in order to help
improve agency efficiency, effectiveness, and accountability.
Performance audits include economy and efficiency audits and program
audits.
(3) "State agency" or "agency" means a state agency, department,
office, officer, board, commission, bureau, division, institution, or
institution of higher education. "State agency" includes all elective
offices in the executive branch state government. This includes state
agencies and programs as well as those programs and activities that
cross agency lines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The state auditor may conduct performance audits under the
provisions of sections 1 through 7, 9, and 10 of this act. The state
auditor may contract for performance audits as he or she may determine.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A citizen accountability advisory board is created to provide
advice to the state auditor on performance audits of state government.
(2) The board shall consist of eight members as follows:
(a) One member shall be selected by the state auditor;
(b) One member shall be selected by the chair of the joint
legislative audit and review committee;
(c) One member shall be selected by the director of the office of
financial management;
(d) Four of the members shall be selected by the governor as
follows: Each major caucus of the house of representatives and the
senate shall submit a list of three names. The lists may not include
the names of members of the legislature. The governor shall select a
person from each list provided by each caucus; and
(e) One member shall be selected by the governor.
(3) The board shall elect a chair.
(4) Appointees shall be individuals who have a basic understanding
of state government operations with knowledge and expertise in
performance management, quality management, strategic planning,
performance assessments, or closely related fields.
(5) Members shall serve for terms of four years, with the terms
expiring on June 30th on the fourth year of the term. However, in the
case of the initial members, two members shall serve four-year terms,
two members shall serve three-year terms, and one member shall serve a
two-year term, with each of the terms expiring on June 30th of the
applicable year. Appointees may be reappointed to serve more than one
term.
(6) The state auditor's office shall provide staff assistance to
the board.
(7) The board shall meet at least once a quarter and may hold
additional meetings at the call of the chair or by a majority vote of
the members of the board. Meetings are subject to chapter 42.30 RCW.
(8) The members of the board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.220 and reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall establish an annual assessment and performance
grading program. The program shall consist of conducting annual
performance assessments and grading state agency performance.
Assessments shall be implemented on a phased-in schedule. Initial
areas to be assessed shall include quality management, productivity and
fiscal efficiency, program effectiveness, contract management and
oversight, internal audit, internal and external customer satisfaction,
statutory and regulatory compliance, and technology systems and on-line
services. As part of this program, the board shall:
(1) Consult with and seek input from elected officials, state
employees, and professionals with a background in performance
management for establishing the grading standards. In developing the
criteria, the board shall consider already developed best practices and
audit criteria used by government or nongovernment organizations.
Before the assessment, the agencies shall be given the criteria for the
assessment and the standards for grading;
(2) Contract or partner with public or private entities that have
expertise in public sector reviews and/or technical expertise in
individual assessment areas to perform the assessments and grading of
all state agencies. The board may contract or partner with more than
one entity for different assessment areas; and
(3) Submit the results of the assessment and grading program to the
governor, the office of financial management, appropriate legislative
committees, and the public by December 15th of each year. The results
of the annual assessments and performance grading shall be posted on
the internet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state auditor shall establish criteria and protocols for
performance audits. Agencies shall be audited using criteria that
include generally accepted government auditing standards as well as
legislative mandates and performance objectives established by state
agencies. Mandates include, but are not limited to, agency strategies,
timelines, program objectives, and mission and goals as required in RCW
43.88.090.
(2) Using the criteria developed in subsection (1) of this section,
the state auditor shall complete a statewide performance review as a
preliminary to a work plan for conducting performance audits. The
state auditor shall develop a schedule and common methodology for
conducting these performance audits.
(3) In developing the work plan, the state auditor shall consider
input from the board, citizens, state employees, state managers, the
joint legislative audit and review committee, public officials, and
others. The work plan may include a list of agencies, programs, or
systems to be audited on a timeline decided by the state auditor based
on a number of factors including risk, importance, and citizen
concerns. All audits shall be designed to be completed within a six-month period.
(4) Before adopting the final work plan, the state auditor shall
consult with the legislative auditor and other appropriate oversight
and audit entities to coordinate work plans and avoid duplication of
effort in their planned performance audits of state government. The
state auditor shall defer to the joint legislative audit and review
committee work plan if a similar audit is included on both work plans
for auditing.
(5) In conducting the audits, agency front-line employees and
internal auditors should be involved. The audits may include:
(a) Identification of programs and services that can be eliminated,
reduced, consolidated, or enhanced;
(b) Identification of funding sources to the state agency, to
programs, and to services that can be eliminated, reduced,
consolidated, or enhanced;
(c) Analysis of gaps and overlaps in programs and services and
recommendations for improving, dropping, blending, or separating
functions to correct gaps or overlaps;
(d) Analysis and recommendations for pooling information technology
systems used within the state agency, and evaluation of information
processing and telecommunications policy, organization, and management;
(e) Analysis of the roles and functions of the state agency, its
programs, and its services and their compliance with statutory
authority and recommendations for eliminating or changing those roles
and functions and ensuring compliance with statutory authority;
(f) Recommendations for eliminating or changing statutes, rules,
and policy directives as may be necessary to ensure that the agency
carry out reasonably and properly those functions vested in the agency
by statute;
(g) Verification of the reliability and validity of agency
performance data, self-assessments, and performance measurement systems
as required under RCW 43.88.090;
(h) Identification of potential cost savings in the state agency,
its programs, and its services;
(i) Identification and recognition of best practices;
(j) Evaluation of planning, budgeting, and program evaluation
policies and practices;
(k) Evaluation of personnel systems operation and management;
(l) Evaluation of state purchasing operations and management
policies and practices; and
(m) Evaluation of organizational structure and staffing levels,
particularly in terms of the ratio of managers and supervisors to
nonmanagement personnel.
(6) The state auditor's performance audit work plan shall be
updated at least annually.
(7) The state auditor must provide the preliminary performance
audit reports to the audited state agency for comment. The auditor
also may seek input on the preliminary report from other appropriate
officials. Comments must be received within thirty days after receipt
of the preliminary performance audit report unless a different time
period is approved by the state auditor. The final performance audit
report shall include the objectives, scope, and methodology; the audit
results, including findings and recommendations; the agency's response
and conclusions; and identification of best practices.
(8) The state auditor shall provide final performance audit reports
to the citizens of Washington, the governor, the board, the joint
legislative audit and review committee, the appropriate legislative
committees, and other appropriate officials. Final performance audit
reports shall be posted on the internet.
(9) The state auditor may conduct performance audits for
transportation-related agencies as defined under RCW 44.75.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The audited agency is responsible for follow-up and corrective
action on all performance audit findings and recommendations. The
audited agency's plan for addressing each audit finding and
recommendation shall be included in the final audit report. The plan
shall provide the name of the contact person responsible for each
action, the action planned, and the anticipated completion date. If
the audited agency does not agree with the audit findings and
recommendations or believes action is not required, then the action
plan shall include an explanation and specific reasons.
The office of financial management shall require periodic progress
reports from the audited agency until all resolution has occurred. The
office of financial management is responsible for achieving audit
resolution. The office of financial management shall annually report
by December 31st the status of performance audit resolution to the
appropriate legislative committees and the state auditor. The
legislature shall consider the performance audit results in connection
with the state budget process.
The auditor may request status reports on specific audits or
findings.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.88.160 and 2002 c 260 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
This section sets forth the major fiscal duties and
responsibilities of officers and agencies of the executive branch. The
regulations issued by the governor pursuant to this chapter shall
provide for a comprehensive, orderly basis for fiscal management and
control, including efficient accounting and reporting therefor, for the
executive branch of the state government and may include, in addition,
such requirements as will generally promote more efficient public
management in the state.
(1) Governor; director of financial management. The governor,
through the director of financial management, shall devise and
supervise a modern and complete accounting system for each agency to
the end that all revenues, expenditures, receipts, disbursements,
resources, and obligations of the state shall be properly and
systematically accounted for. The accounting system shall include the
development of accurate, timely records and reports of all financial
affairs of the state. The system shall also provide for central
accounts in the office of financial management at the level of detail
deemed necessary by the director to perform central financial
management. The director of financial management shall adopt and
periodically update an accounting procedures manual. Any agency
maintaining its own accounting and reporting system shall comply with
the updated accounting procedures manual and the rules of the director
adopted under this chapter. An agency may receive a waiver from
complying with this requirement if the waiver is approved by the
director. Waivers expire at the end of the fiscal biennium for which
they are granted. The director shall forward notice of waivers granted
to the appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The director of
financial management may require such financial, statistical, and other
reports as the director deems necessary from all agencies covering any
period.
(2) Except as provided in chapter 43.88C RCW, the director of
financial management is responsible for quarterly reporting of primary
operating budget drivers such as applicable workloads, caseload
estimates, and appropriate unit cost data. These reports shall be
transmitted to the legislative fiscal committees or by electronic means
to the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.
Quarterly reports shall include actual monthly data and the variance
between actual and estimated data to date. The reports shall also
include estimates of these items for the remainder of the budget
period.
(3) The director of financial management shall report at least
annually to the appropriate legislative committees regarding the status
of all appropriated capital projects, including transportation
projects, showing significant cost overruns or underruns. If funds are
shifted from one project to another, the office of financial management
shall also reflect this in the annual variance report. Once a project
is complete, the report shall provide a final summary showing estimated
start and completion dates of each project phase compared to actual
dates, estimated costs of each project phase compared to actual costs,
and whether or not there are any outstanding liabilities or unsettled
claims at the time of completion.
(4) In addition, the director of financial management, as agent of
the governor, shall:
(a) Develop and maintain a system of internal controls and internal
audits comprising methods and procedures to be adopted by each agency
that will safeguard its assets, check the accuracy and reliability of
its accounting data, promote operational efficiency, and encourage
adherence to prescribed managerial policies for accounting and
financial controls. The system developed by the director shall include
criteria for determining the scope and comprehensiveness of internal
controls required by classes of agencies, depending on the level of
resources at risk.
Each agency head or authorized designee shall be assigned the
responsibility and authority for establishing and maintaining internal
audits following the standards of internal auditing of the institute of
internal auditors;
(b) Make surveys and analyses of agencies with the object of
determining better methods and increased effectiveness in the use of
manpower and materials; and the director shall authorize expenditures
for employee training to the end that the state may benefit from
training facilities made available to state employees;
(c) Establish policies for allowing the contracting of child care
services;
(d) Report to the governor with regard to duplication of effort or
lack of coordination among agencies;
(e) Review any pay and classification plans, and changes
thereunder, developed by any agency for their fiscal impact: PROVIDED,
That none of the provisions of this subsection shall affect merit
systems of personnel management now existing or hereafter established
by statute relating to the fixing of qualifications requirements for
recruitment, appointment, or promotion of employees of any agency. The
director shall advise and confer with agencies including appropriate
standing committees of the legislature as may be designated by the
speaker of the house and the president of the senate regarding the
fiscal impact of such plans and may amend or alter the plans, except
that for the following agencies no amendment or alteration of the plans
may be made without the approval of the agency concerned: Agencies
headed by elective officials;
(f) Fix the number and classes of positions or authorized employee
years of employment for each agency and during the fiscal period amend
the determinations previously fixed by the director except that the
director shall not be empowered to fix the number or the classes for
the following: Agencies headed by elective officials;
(g) Adopt rules to effectuate provisions contained in (a) through
(f) of this subsection.
(5) The treasurer shall:
(a) Receive, keep, and disburse all public funds of the state not
expressly required by law to be received, kept, and disbursed by some
other persons: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not apply to those
public funds of the institutions of higher learning which are not
subject to appropriation;
(b) Receive, disburse, or transfer public funds under the
treasurer's supervision or custody;
(c) Keep a correct and current account of all moneys received and
disbursed by the treasurer, classified by fund or account;
(d) Coordinate agencies' acceptance and use of credit cards and
other payment methods, if the agencies have received authorization
under RCW 43.41.180;
(e) Perform such other duties as may be required by law or by
regulations issued pursuant to this law.
It shall be unlawful for the treasurer to disburse public funds in
the treasury except upon forms or by alternative means duly prescribed
by the director of financial management. These forms or alternative
means shall provide for authentication and certification by the agency
head or the agency head's designee that the services have been rendered
or the materials have been furnished; or, in the case of loans or
grants, that the loans or grants are authorized by law; or, in the case
of payments for periodic maintenance services to be performed on state
owned equipment, that a written contract for such periodic maintenance
services is currently in effect; and the treasurer shall not be liable
under the treasurer's surety bond for erroneous or improper payments so
made. When services are lawfully paid for in advance of full
performance by any private individual or business entity other than
equipment maintenance providers or as provided for by RCW 42.24.035,
such individual or entity other than central stores rendering such
services shall make a cash deposit or furnish surety bond coverage to
the state as shall be fixed in an amount by law, or if not fixed by
law, then in such amounts as shall be fixed by the director of the
department of general administration but in no case shall such required
cash deposit or surety bond be less than an amount which will fully
indemnify the state against any and all losses on account of breach of
promise to fully perform such services. No payments shall be made in
advance for any equipment maintenance services to be performed more
than twelve months after such payment. Any such bond so furnished
shall be conditioned that the person, firm or corporation receiving the
advance payment will apply it toward performance of the contract. The
responsibility for recovery of erroneous or improper payments made
under this section shall lie with the agency head or the agency head's
designee in accordance with regulations issued pursuant to this
chapter. Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit a public
body to advance funds to a private service provider pursuant to a grant
or loan before services have been rendered or material furnished.
(6) The state auditor shall:
(a) Report to the legislature the results of current post audits
that have been made of the financial transactions of each agency; to
this end the auditor may, in the auditor's discretion, examine the
books and accounts of any agency, official, or employee charged with
the receipt, custody, or safekeeping of public funds. Where feasible
in conducting examinations, the auditor shall utilize data and findings
from the internal control system prescribed by the office of financial
management. The current post audit of each agency may include a
section on recommendations to the legislature as provided in (c) of
this subsection.
(b) Give information to the legislature, whenever required, upon
any subject relating to the financial affairs of the state.
(c) Make the auditor's official report on or before the thirty-first of December which precedes the meeting of the legislature. The
report shall be for the last complete fiscal period and shall include
determinations as to whether agencies, in making expenditures, complied
with the laws of this state. ((The state auditor is authorized to
perform or participate in performance verifications and performance
audits as expressly authorized by the legislature in the omnibus
biennial appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan
approved by the joint legislative audit and review committee. The
state auditor, upon completing an audit for legal and financial
compliance under chapter 43.09 RCW or a performance verification, may
report to the joint legislative audit and review committee or other
appropriate committees of the legislature, in a manner prescribed by
the joint legislative audit and review committee, on facts relating to
the management or performance of governmental programs where such facts
are discovered incidental to the legal and financial audit or
performance verification. The auditor may make such a report to a
legislative committee only if the auditor has determined that the
agency has been given an opportunity and has failed to resolve the
management or performance issues raised by the auditor. If the auditor
makes a report to a legislative committee, the agency may submit to the
committee a response to the report. This subsection (6) shall not be
construed to authorize the auditor to allocate other than de minimis
resources to performance audits except as expressly authorized in the
appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan. The results
of a performance audit conducted by the state auditor that has been
requested by the joint legislative audit and review committee must only
be transmitted to the joint legislative audit and review committee.))
(d) Be empowered to take exception to specific expenditures that
have been incurred by any agency or to take exception to other
practices related in any way to the agency's financial transactions and
to cause such exceptions to be made a matter of public record,
including disclosure to the agency concerned and to the director of
financial management. It shall be the duty of the director of
financial management to cause corrective action to be taken within six
months, such action to include, as appropriate, the withholding of
funds as provided in RCW 43.88.110. The director of financial
management shall annually report by December 31st the status of audit
resolution to the appropriate committees of the legislature, the state
auditor, and the attorney general. The director of financial
management shall include in the audit resolution report actions taken
as a result of an audit including, but not limited to, types of
personnel actions, costs and types of litigation, and value of recouped
goods or services.
(e) Promptly report any irregularities to the attorney general.
(f) Investigate improper governmental activity under chapter 42.40
RCW.
(7) The joint legislative audit and review committee may:
(a) Make post audits of the financial transactions of any agency
and management surveys and program reviews as provided for in chapter
44.28 RCW as well as performance audits and program evaluations. To
this end the joint committee may in its discretion examine the books,
accounts, and other records of any agency, official, or employee.
(b) Give information to the legislature or any legislative
committee whenever required upon any subject relating to the
performance and management of state agencies.
(c) Make a report to the legislature which shall include at least
the following:
(i) Determinations as to the extent to which agencies in making
expenditures have complied with the will of the legislature and in this
connection, may take exception to specific expenditures or financial
practices of any agencies; and
(ii) Such plans as it deems expedient for the support of the
state's credit, for lessening expenditures, for promoting frugality and
economy in agency affairs, and generally for an improved level of
fiscal management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Each biennium the legislature shall appropriate an amount equal to
two one-hundredths of one percent of the total general fund state
appropriation in that biennium's omnibus operating appropriations act
for purposes of the performance audits conducted by the state auditor
as authorized by sections 2 through 7 and 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
If the legislative authority of a local jurisdiction requests a
performance audit of programs under its jurisdiction, the state auditor
has the discretion to conduct such a review under separate contract and
funded by local funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of the administrator for the courts is encouraged to
conduct performance audits of courts under the authority of the supreme
court, in conformity with criteria and methods developed by the board
for judicial administration that have been approved by the supreme
court. In developing criteria and methods for conducting performance
audits, the board for judicial administration is encouraged to consider
quality improvement programs, audits, and scoring. The judicial branch
is encouraged to submit the results of these efforts to the chief
justice of the supreme court or his or her designee, and with any other
applicable boards or committees established under the authority of the
supreme court to oversee government accountability.

--- END ---