BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of trail
grooming services to the Washington state parks and recreation
commission. For the purposes of this section, "trail grooming" means
the activity of snow compacting, snow redistribution, or snow removal
on state-owned trails.

--- END ---