BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the citizens of
the state benefit from a state expenditure limit that ensures that the
state budget operates with stability and predictability, while
encouraging the establishment of budget priorities and a periodic
review of state programs and the delivery of state services. A state
expenditure limit can prevent budgeting crises that can occur because
of increased spending levels during periods of revenue surplus followed
by drastic reductions in state services in lean years. The citizens of
the state are best served by an expenditure limit that keeps pace with
the growth in the state's economy yet ensures budget discipline and
taxpayer protection. For these reasons, the legislature finds that
modifications to the state expenditure limit, after ten years of
experience following the initial implementation of Initiative Measure
No. 601, will recognize the economic productivity of the state's
economy and better balance the needs of the citizens for essential
government services with the obligation of the legislature for strict
spending accountability and protection of its taxpayers.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.135.035 and 2001 c 3 s 8 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s
2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) ((After July 1, 1995,)) (a) Any action or combination of
actions by the legislature that raises state revenue ((or requires
revenue-neutral tax shifts may be taken only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each house, and then only if state expenditures in any
fiscal year, including the new revenue, will not exceed the state
expenditure limits established under this chapter.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section)) to the general fund and will result in expenditures in excess
of the state expenditure limit((, then the action of the legislature))
shall not take effect until approved by a vote of the people at a
November general election. The ((office of financial management))
state expenditure limit committee shall adjust the state expenditure
limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the voters under
this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of revenue
generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be
adjusted downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
inflation and population increases?"

(((3))) (2)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon
declaration of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four
months by a law approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the
legislature and signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the
nature of the emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that
require immediate government action to alleviate human suffering and
provide humanitarian assistance. The state expenditure limit may be
exceeded for no more than twenty-four months following the declaration
of the emergency and only for the purposes contained in the emergency
declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(((4))) (3) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted
from the state general fund on or after January 1, 1993, to another
source of funding, or if moneys are transferred from the state general
fund to another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee,
acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure
limit to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a
transfer of money from the state general fund to another fund or
account includes any state legislative action taken ((after July 1,
2000,)) that has the effect of reducing revenues from a particular
source, where such revenues would otherwise be deposited into the state
general fund, while increasing the revenues from that particular source
to another state or local government account. This subsection does not
apply to the dedication or use of lottery revenues under RCW
67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW 84.52.068, in support of
education or education expenditures.
(((5))) (4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted
to the state general fund on or after January 1, 2000, from another
source of funding, or if moneys are transferred to the state general
fund from another fund or account, the state expenditure limit
committee, acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall increase the
state expenditure limit to reflect the shift.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.135.03901 and 2002 c 290 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
RCW 43.135.035(((4))) (3) does not apply to the transfers
established in RCW 70.96A.350.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.135.080 and 1998 c 321 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Initiative Measure No. 601 (chapter 43.135 RCW, as amended by
chapter 321, Laws of 1998 and the amendatory changes enacted by section
6, chapter 2, Laws of 1994) is hereby reenacted and reaffirmed. The
legislature also adopts chapter 321, Laws of 1998 to continue the
general fund revenue and expenditure limitations contained in this
chapter 43.135 RCW after this one-time transfer of funds.
(2) RCW 43.135.035(((4))) (3) does not apply to sections 5 through
13, chapter 321, Laws of 1998.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.32.470 and 2002 c 56 s 407 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax imposed and collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW, less any credits allowed under chapter 82.14 RCW, on initial
construction for a transportation project to be constructed under
chapter 36.120 RCW, must be transferred to the transportation project
to defray costs or pay debt service on that transportation project. In
the case of a toll project, this transfer or credit must be used to
lower the overall cost of the project and thereby the corresponding
tolls.
(2) This transaction is exempt from the requirements in RCW
43.135.035(((4))) (3).
(3) Government entities constructing transportation projects under
chapter 36.120 RCW shall report to the department the amount of state
sales or use tax covered under this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.135.010 and 1994 c 2 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The people of the state of Washington hereby find and declare:
(1) The continuing increases in our state tax burden and the
corresponding growth of state government is contrary to the interest of
the people of the state of Washington.
(2) It is necessary to limit the rate of growth of state government
while assuring adequate funding of essential services, including basic
education as defined by the legislature.
(3) The current budgetary system in the state of Washington lacks
stability. The system encourages crisis budgeting and results in
cutbacks during lean years and overspending during surplus years.
(4) It is therefore the intent of this chapter to:
(a) Establish a limit on state expenditures that will assure that
the growth rate of state expenditures does not exceed ninety percent of
the growth rate ((of inflation and state population)) in Washington
personal income;
(b) Assure that local governments are provided funds adequate to
render those services deemed essential by their citizens;
(c) Assure that the state does not impose responsibility on local
governments for new programs or increased levels of service under
existing programs unless the costs thereof are paid by the state;
(d) Provide for adjustment of the limit when costs of a program are
transferred between the state and another political entity;
(e) Establish a procedure for exceeding this limit in emergency
situations;
(f) Provide for voter approval of tax increases; and
(g) Avoid overfunding and underfunding state programs by providing
stability, consistency, and long-range planning.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.135.025 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The state shall not expend from the general fund and related
funds during any fiscal year state moneys in excess of the state
expenditure limit established under this chapter.
(2) Except pursuant to a declaration of emergency under RCW
43.135.035 or pursuant to an appropriation under RCW 43.135.045(4)(b),
the state treasurer shall not issue or redeem any check, warrant, or
voucher that will result in a state general fund or related fund
expenditure for any fiscal year in excess of the state expenditure
limit established under this chapter. A violation of this subsection
constitutes a violation of RCW 43.88.290 and shall subject the state
treasurer to the penalties provided in RCW 43.88.300.
(3) The state expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the
previous fiscal year's state expenditure limit increased by a
percentage rate that equals the fiscal growth factor.
(4) For purposes of computing the state expenditure limit for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, ((1995)) 2007, the phrase "the previous
fiscal year's state expenditure limit" means the total state
expenditures from the state general fund and related funds, not
including federal funds, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, ((1989))
2006, plus the fiscal growth factor. ((This calculation is then
computed for the state expenditure limit for fiscal years 1992, 1993,
1994, and 1995, and as required under RCW 43.135.035(4).))
(5) A state expenditure limit committee is established for the
purpose of determining and adjusting the state expenditure limit as
provided in this chapter. The members of the state expenditure limit
committee are the director of financial management, the attorney
general or the attorney general's designee, and the chairs and ranking
minority members of the senate committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committee on appropriations. All actions of
the state expenditure limit committee taken pursuant to this chapter
require an affirmative vote of at least ((three)) four members.
(6) Each November, the state expenditure limit committee shall
adjust the expenditure limit for the preceding fiscal year based on
((actual expenditures and)) known changes in the fiscal growth factor
and then project an expenditure limit for the next two fiscal years.
If, by November 30th, the state expenditure limit committee has not
adopted the expenditure limit adjustment and projected expenditure
limit as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the attorney
general or his or her designee shall adjust or project the expenditure
limit, as necessary.
(7) "Fiscal growth factor" means ninety percent of the average of
the sum of ((inflation and population change)) the growth in Washington
personal income for each of the prior three fiscal years.
(8) (("Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for the United States for each fiscal year as published by the
federal bureau of labor statistics.
(9) "Population change" means the percentage change in state
population for each fiscal year as reported by the office of financial
management.)) "General fund" means the state general fund.
(9) "Related fund" means the health services account, violence
reduction and drug enforcement account, public safety and education
account, water quality account, or student achievement fund.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.135.035 and 2005 c . . . s 2 (section 2 of this
act) are each amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Any action or combination of actions by the legislature that
raises state revenue to the general fund or related funds and will
result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure limit shall
not take effect until approved by a vote of the people at a November
general election. The state expenditure limit committee shall adjust
the state expenditure limit by the amount of additional revenue
approved by the voters under this section. This adjustment shall not
exceed the amount of revenue generated by the legislative action during
the first full fiscal year in which it is in effect. The state
expenditure limit shall be adjusted downward upon expiration or repeal
of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
((inflation and population increases)) personal income growth?"

(2)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and
signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the nature of the
emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require immediate
government action to alleviate human suffering and provide humanitarian
assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no more
than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(3) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund ((on or after January 1, 1993,)) or a related
fund to another source of funding, or if moneys are transferred from
the state general fund or a related fund to another fund or account,
the state expenditure limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW
43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure limit to reflect the
shift. For the purposes of this section, a transfer of money from the
state general fund or a related fund to another fund or account
includes any state legislative action taken that has the effect of
reducing revenues from a particular source, where such revenues would
otherwise be deposited into the state general fund or a related fund,
while increasing the revenues from that particular source to another
state or local government account. This subsection does not apply to
the dedication or use of lottery revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3) or
property taxes under RCW 84.52.068, in support of education or
education expenditures.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function ((is)) and the
ongoing revenue necessary to fund the program or function are shifted
to the state general fund or a related fund on or after January 1,
((2000, from another source of funding, or if moneys are transferred to
the state general fund from another fund or account)) 2007, the state
expenditure limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5),
shall increase the state expenditure limit to reflect the shift.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Sections 1 through 5 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.
(2) Sections 6 through 8 of this act take effect July 1, 2007.

--- END ---