BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.281 and 2003 c 295 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The select committee on pension policy has the following powers and
duties:
(1) Study pension issues, develop pension policies for public
employees in state retirement systems, and make recommendations to the
legislature;
(2) Study the financial condition of the state pension systems,
develop funding policies, and make recommendations to the legislature;
(3) Consult with the chair and vice-chair on appointing members to
the state actuary appointment committee upon the convening of the state
actuary appointment committee established under RCW 44.44.013; and
(4) Receive the results of the actuarial audits of the actuarial
valuations and experience studies administered by the pension funding
council pursuant to RCW 41.45.110. The select committee on pension
policy shall study and make recommendations on changes to ((assumptions
or)) contribution rates to the pension funding council prior to
adoption of changes under RCW ((41.45.030, 41.45.035, or 41.45.060))
41.45.054.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.45.030 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning April 1, 2004, and every four years thereafter, the
state actuary shall ((submit to the council)) publish information
regarding the economic experience and financial condition of each state
retirement system. ((The council shall review this and such other
information as it may require.
(2) By May 31, 2004, and every four years thereafter, the council,
by affirmative vote of four councilmembers, may adopt changes to the
long-term economic assumptions established in RCW 41.45.035. Any
changes adopted by the council shall be subject to revision by the
legislature.
The council shall consult with the economic and revenue forecast
supervisor and the executive director of the state investment board,
and shall consider long-term historical averages, in reviewing possible
changes to the economic assumptions.
(3))) (2) The assumptions and the asset value smoothing technique
established in RCW 41.45.035, as modified in the future by the
((council or)) legislature, shall be used by the state actuary in
conducting all actuarial studies of the state retirement systems,
including actuarial fiscal notes under RCW 44.44.040. The assumptions
shall also be used for the administration of benefits under the
retirement plans listed in RCW 41.45.020, pursuant to timelines and
conditions established by department rules.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.45.035 and 2004 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2001, the following long-term economic
assumptions shall be used by the state actuary for the purposes of RCW
41.45.030:
(a) The growth in inflation assumption shall be 3.5 percent;
(b) The growth in salaries assumption, exclusive of merit or
longevity increases, shall be 4.5 percent;
(c) The investment rate of return assumption shall be 8 percent;
((and))
(d) The growth in system membership assumption shall be 1.25
percent for the public employees' retirement system, the school
employees' retirement system, and the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system. The assumption shall be .90 percent
for the teachers' retirement system; and
(e) The state actuary shall periodically review the appropriateness
of the assumptions in this section and recommend changes to the
legislature as necessary.
(2)(a) Beginning with actuarial studies done after July 1, 2003,
changes to plan asset values that vary from the long-term investment
rate of return assumption shall be recognized in the actuarial value of
assets over a period that varies up to eight years depending on the
magnitude of the deviation of each year's investment rate of return
relative to the long-term rate of return assumption. Beginning with
actuarial studies performed after July 1, 2004, the actuarial value of
assets shall not be greater than one hundred thirty percent of the
market value of assets as of the valuation date or less than seventy
percent of the market value of assets as of the valuation date.
((Beginning April 1, 2004, the council, by affirmative vote of four
councilmembers, may adopt changes to this asset value smoothing
technique. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature.))
(b) The state actuary shall periodically review the appropriateness
of the asset smoothing method in this section and recommend changes to
the legislature as necessary.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.45.060 and 2003 c 294 s 10 and 2003 c 92 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state actuary shall provide actuarial valuation results
based on the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing technique
included in RCW 41.45.035 ((or adopted by the council under RCW
41.45.030 or 41.45.035)).
(2) Not later than September 30, 2002, and every two years
thereafter, consistent with the actuarial valuation report audited
pursuant to RCW 41.45.110 and based on the economic assumptions and
asset value smoothing technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted
under RCW 41.45.030 or 41.45.035, the council shall adopt ((and may
make changes to)):
(a) A basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1;
(b) Basic employer contribution rates for the public employees'
retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, and the Washington
state patrol retirement system to be used in the ensuing biennial
period; and
(c) A basic employer contribution rate for the school employees'
retirement system for funding both that system and the public
employees' retirement system plan 1.
The contribution rates adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature.
(3) The employer and state contribution rates adopted by the
council shall be the level percentages of pay that are needed:
(a) To fully amortize the total costs of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
1 not later than June 30, 2024; and
(b) To also continue to fully fund the public employees' retirement
system plans 2 and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3,
and the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3 in accordance
with RCW 41.45.061, 41.45.067, and this section.
(4) The aggregate actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate
a combined plan 2 and 3 employer contribution rate and a Washington
state patrol retirement system contribution rate.
(5) The council shall immediately notify the directors of the
office of financial management and department of retirement systems of
the state and employer contribution rates adopted. The rates shall be
effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative
modifications.
(6) The director of the department of retirement systems shall
collect the rates ((established in RCW 41.45.053 through June 30, 2003.
Thereafter, the director shall collect those rates)) adopted by the
council. The rates established ((in RCW 41.45.053, or)) by the
council((,)) shall be subject to revision by the ((council))
legislature.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.45.060 and 2004 c 242 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state actuary shall provide actuarial valuation results
based on the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing technique
included in RCW 41.45.035 ((or adopted by the council under RCW
41.45.030 or 41.45.035)).
(2) Not later than September 30, 2002, and every two years
thereafter, consistent with the actuarial valuation report audited
pursuant to RCW 41.45.110 and based on the economic assumptions and
asset value smoothing technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted
under RCW 41.45.030 or 41.45.035, the council shall adopt ((and may
make changes to)):
(a) A basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1;
(b) Basic employer contribution rates for the public employees'
retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, and the Washington
state patrol retirement system to be used in the ensuing biennial
period; and
(c) A basic employer contribution rate for the school employees'
retirement system and the public safety employees' retirement system
for funding both those systems and the public employees' retirement
system plan 1.
The contribution rates adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature.
(3) The employer and state contribution rates adopted by the
council shall be the level percentages of pay that are needed:
(a) To fully amortize the total costs of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
1 not later than June 30, 2024; and
(b) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2
and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the public safety
employees' retirement system plan 2, and the school employees'
retirement system plans 2 and 3 in accordance with RCW 41.45.061,
41.45.067, and this section.
(4) The aggregate actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate
a combined plan 2 and 3 employer contribution rate and a Washington
state patrol retirement system contribution rate.
(5) The council shall immediately notify the directors of the
office of financial management and department of retirement systems of
the state and employer contribution rates adopted. The rates shall be
effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative
modifications.
(6) The director shall collect those rates adopted by the council.
The rates established in RCW 41.45.054, or by the council, shall be
subject to revision by the legislature.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.45.100 and 1998 c 283 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The pension funding council is hereby created. The council
consists of the:
(a) Director of the department of retirement systems;
(b) Director of the office of financial management;
(c) Chair and ranking minority member of the house of
representatives appropriations committee; and
(d) Chair and ranking minority member of the senate ways and means
committee.
The council may select officers as the members deem necessary.
(2) The pension funding council shall ((adopt changes to economic
assumptions and contribution rates)) act by an affirmative vote of at
least four members.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.45.120 and 1998 c 283 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A pension funding work group is hereby created. The work group
shall consist of one staff member selected by the executive head or
chairperson of each of the following agencies or committees:
(a) Department of retirement systems;
(b) Office of financial management;
(c) State investment board;
(d) Ways and means committee of the senate;
(e) Appropriations committee of the house of representatives; and
(f) Economic and revenue forecast council.
(2) The state actuary shall make available to the work group
information related to ((economic assumptions and)) contribution rates.
(3) The pension funding work group shall provide support to the
pension funding council. Meetings of the pension funding work group
may be called by any member of the group for the purpose of assisting
the pension funding council, reviewing actuarial valuations of the
state retirement systems, ((reviewing economic assumptions,)) or for
any other purpose which may assist the pension funding council.
(4) Recommendations from both affected employee and employer groups
will be actively sought during the work group process. The work group
shall conduct an open public meeting on these recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 4 of this act expires July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

--- END ---