BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.020 and 1994 c 124 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following real and personal property shall be exempt from
taxation:
(1) All lands, buildings, and personal property required for
necessary administration and maintenance, used, or to the extent used,
exclusively for public burying grounds or cemeteries without
discrimination as to race, color, national origin or ancestry;
(2) All churches, personal property, and the ground, not exceeding
five acres in area, upon which a church of any nonprofit recognized
religious denomination is or shall be built, together with a parsonage,
convent, and buildings and improvements required for the maintenance
and safeguarding of such property. The area exempted shall in any case
include all ground covered by the church, parsonage, convent, and
buildings and improvements required for the maintenance and
safeguarding of such property and the structures and ground necessary
for street access, parking, light, and ventilation, but the area of
unoccupied ground exempted in such cases, in connection with church,
parsonage, convent, and buildings and improvements required for the
maintenance and safeguarding of such property, shall not exceed the
equivalent of one hundred twenty by one hundred twenty feet except
where additional unoccupied land may be required to conform with state
or local codes, zoning, or licensing requirements. The parsonage and
convent need not be on land contiguous to the church property. To be
exempt the property must be wholly used for church purposes: PROVIDED,
That:
(a) The loan or rental of property otherwise exempt under this
paragraph to a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation, or
school for use for an eleemosynary activity shall not nullify the
exemption provided in this paragraph if the rental income, if any, is
reasonable and is devoted solely to the operation and maintenance of
the property; or
(b) The use of the property for the preparation of photographic
directories for the benefit of the church organization and its members,
including the sale of portraits and related products to church members
in conjunction with the production of the directories, shall not
nullify the exemption provided in this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2006 and thereafter.

--- END ---