BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The department or self-insurer will reimburse approved travel
expenses incurred by a worker. Upon prior authorization by the
department, travel expenses will be approved by the department and
repaid to the worker if a worker must travel more than ten miles from
the worker's home to the nearest point for adequate treatment, and the
worker incurs travel expenses.

--- END ---