BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I--INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that:
(1) Transportation is a central component to the economic
development and prosperity of Washington state. An effective
transportation system is fundamental to business development, job
growth, and economic security. It is therefore in the public's
interest to efficiently and safely facilitate the movement of people
and freight along Washington state's transportation corridors.
(2) The state's transportation needs are substantial and immediate.
The Blue Ribbon Commission on Transportation recognized these needs in
its December 2000 recommendation for immediate action to solve the
state's transportation crisis.
(3) Current sources of revenue do not adequately address the
state's transportation needs. The cost of construction, maintenance,
operation, and preservation of the state's transportation corridors
continues to increase, while the revenue from the state's motor vehicle
fuel tax remains constant.
(4) Investments into the state's transportation infrastructure must
keep pace with the state's growth. Therefore, the legislature intends
to increase the motor vehicle fuel tax by one cent each year over the
next twenty years.
(5) Projects funded by both state and local contributions best
maximizes state and regional investments. Joint participation on the
state and regional level is required in order to successfully complete
significant transportation improvement projects in a timely and
efficient manner.
(6) Accountability and efficiency are critical elements in the
allocation and expenditure of state funds. The transportation
commission is uniquely situated to oversee the progress of
transportation improvements and report back to the legislature.

PART II--TRANSPORTATION PROJECT AND IMPROVEMENT FUNDING
Sec. 201 RCW 82.36.025 and 2003 c 361 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A motor vehicle fuel tax rate of twenty-three cents per gallon
applies to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative motor fuel
tax rate of five cents per gallon applies to the sale, distribution, or
use of motor vehicle fuel. This subsection (2) expires when the bonds
issued for transportation 2003 projects are retired.
(3) The motor vehicle fuel tax rate that applies to the sale,
distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel shall be increased by one
cent per gallon every July 1st from July 1, 2005, through July 1, 2009.
The annual fuel tax rate increase under this subsection shall be
additional and cumulative to the fuel tax rates under subsections (1)
and (2) of this section and any prior annual fuel tax rate increases
under this subsection.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.38.030 and 2003 c 361 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and imposed upon special fuel users a
tax at the rate of twenty-three cents per gallon of special fuel, or
each one hundred cubic feet of compressed natural gas, measured at
standard pressure and temperature.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of five cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic
feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel users. This subsection
(2) expires when the bonds issued for transportation 2003 projects are
retired.
(3) The special fuel tax rate imposed upon special fuel users shall
be increased by one cent per gallon of special fuel, or each one
hundred cubic feet of compressed natural gas, every July 1st from July
1, 2005, through July 1, 2009. The annual fuel tax rate increase under
this subsection shall be additional and cumulative to the fuel tax
rates under subsections (1) and (2) of this section and any prior
annual fuel tax rate increases under this subsection.
(4) Taxes are imposed when:
(a) Special fuel is removed in this state from a terminal if the
special fuel is removed at the rack unless the removal is to a licensed
exporter for direct delivery to a destination outside of the state, or
the removal is to a special fuel distributor for direct delivery to an
international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320;
(b) Special fuel is removed in this state from a refinery if either
of the following applies:
(i) The removal is by bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of
the special fuel immediately before the removal is not a licensee; or
(ii) The removal is at the refinery rack unless the removal is to
a licensed exporter for direct delivery to a destination outside of the
state, or the removal is to a special fuel distributor for direct
delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW
82.38.320;
(c) Special fuel enters into this state for sale, consumption, use,
or storage if either of the following applies:
(i) The entry is by bulk transfer and the importer is not a
licensee; or
(ii) The entry is not by bulk transfer;
(d) Special fuel is sold or removed in this state to an unlicensed
entity unless there was a prior taxable removal, entry, or sale of the
special fuel;
(e) Blended special fuel is removed or sold in this state by the
blender of the fuel. The number of gallons of blended special fuel
subject to tax is the difference between the total number of gallons of
blended special fuel removed or sold and the number of gallons of
previously taxed special fuel used to produce the blended special fuel;
(f) Dyed special fuel is used on a highway, as authorized by the
internal revenue code, unless the use is exempt from the special fuel
tax;
(g) Dyed special fuel is held for sale, sold, used, or is intended
to be used in violation of this chapter;
(h) Special fuel purchased by an international fuel tax agreement
licensee under RCW 82.38.320 is used on a highway; and
(i) Special fuel is sold by a licensed special fuel supplier to a
special fuel distributor, special fuel importer, or special fuel
blender and the special fuel is not removed from the bulk transfer-terminal system.
(((4))) (5) The tax imposed by this chapter, if required to be
collected by the licensee, is held in trust by the licensee until paid
to the department, and a licensee who appropriates or converts the tax
collected to his or her own use or to any use other than the payment of
the tax to the extent that the money required to be collected is not
available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is
guilty of a felony, or gross misdemeanor in accordance with the theft
and anticipatory provisions of Title 9A RCW. A person, partnership,
corporation, or corporate officer who fails to collect the tax imposed
by this section, or who has collected the tax and fails to pay it to
the department in the manner prescribed by this chapter, is personally
liable to the state for the amount of the tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 46.68
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2005, and every July 1st thereafter, the state
treasurer shall deposit into the joint state and local transportation
account created in section 302 of this act, an amount equal to one and
three-quarters percent of the average, annual amount of retired motor
vehicle fuel tax debt from the preceding three fiscal years. In
calculating the above amount, Referendum 49, special category C, Tacoma
Narrows bridge, nickel account, and transportation improvement board
bonds shall not be included.

PART III--DISTRIBUTION OF REVENUE
Sec. 301 RCW 46.68.090 and 2003 c 361 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle
fund from the motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax shall be
first expended for purposes enumerated in (a) and (b) of this
subsection. The remaining net tax amount shall be distributed monthly
by the state treasurer in accordance with subsections (2), (3), and (4)
of this section.
(a) For payment of refunds of motor vehicle fuel tax and special
fuel tax that has been paid and is refundable as provided by law;
(b) For payment of amounts to be expended pursuant to
appropriations for the administrative expenses of the offices of state
treasurer, state auditor, and the department of licensing of the state
of Washington in the administration of the motor vehicle fuel tax and
the special fuel tax, which sums shall be distributed monthly.
(2) All of the remaining net tax amount collected under RCW
82.36.025(1) and 82.38.030(1) shall be distributed as set forth in (a)
through (j) of this subsection.
(a) For distribution to the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
44.387 percent to be expended for highway purposes of the state as
defined in RCW 46.68.130;
(b) For distribution to the special category C account, hereby
created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount equal to 3.2609 percent to
be expended for special category C projects. Special category C
projects are category C projects that, due to high cost only, will
require bond financing to complete construction.
The following criteria, listed in order of priority, shall be used
in determining which special category C projects have the highest
priority:
(i) Accident experience;
(ii) Fatal accident experience;
(iii) Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable
speeds without undue congestion; and
(iv) Continuity of development of the highway transportation
network.
Moneys deposited in the special category C account in the motor
vehicle fund may be used for payment of debt service on bonds the
proceeds of which are used to finance special category C projects under
this subsection (2)(b);
(c) For distribution to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3283 percent;
(d) For distribution to the Puget Sound capital construction
account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3726 percent;
(e) For distribution to the urban arterial trust account in the
motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 7.5597 percent;
(f) For distribution to the transportation improvement account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 5.6739 percent and expended
in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;
(g) For distribution to the cities and towns from the motor vehicle
fund an amount equal to 10.6961 percent in accordance with RCW
46.68.110;
(h) For distribution to the counties from the motor vehicle fund an
amount equal to 19.2287 percent: (i) Out of which there shall be
distributed from time to time, as directed by the department of
transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out the
provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to
the county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW
47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed
monthly as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW
46.68.120;
(i) For distribution to the county arterial preservation account,
hereby created in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 1.9565
percent. These funds shall be distributed by the county road
administration board to counties in proportions corresponding to the
number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each
county and shall be used for improvements to sustain the structural,
safety, and operational integrity of county arterials. The county road
administration board shall adopt reasonable rules and develop policies
to implement this program and to assure that a pavement management
system is used;
(j) For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in the
motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.5363 percent and expended in
accordance with RCW 36.79.020.
(3) One hundred percent of the net tax amount collected under RCW
82.36.025(2) and 82.38.030(2) shall be distributed to the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account).
(4)(a) 52.3488 percent of the net tax amount collected under RCW
82.36.025(3) and 82.38.030(3) shall be distributed to the joint state
and local transportation account created in section 302 of this act.
The remaining net tax amount shall be distributed according to
subsection (2)(e) through (j) of this section.
(b) The state treasurer shall transfer annually the following
amounts from the following accounts into the joint state and local
transportation account:
(i) $4,759,397 from the urban arterial trust account;
(ii) $3,572,145 from the transportation improvement account;
(iii) $6,733,996 from the motor vehicle fund dedicated to cities
and towns;
(iv) $12,105,907 from the motor vehicle fund dedicated to counties;
(v) $1,231,763 from the county arterial preservation account;
(vi) $1,596,791 from the rural arterial trust account.
(5) Nothing in this section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so
as to violate any terms or conditions contained in any highway
construction bond issues now or hereafter authorized by statute and
whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid from any excise
taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 46.68
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) The joint state and local transportation account is hereby
created in the motor vehicle fund. Money in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may only be
used for expenditures, including the repayment of principal and
interest on bonds issued, for the following projects:
(i) Alaskan Way viaduct--$2,000,000,000;
(ii) State route 520 bridge replacement--$1,500,000,000;
(iii) State route 405 corridor improvements--$500,000,000;
(iv) State route 395 north Spokane--$600,000,000;
(v) The Columbia river crossing-Vancouver--$500,000,000;
(vi) Projects approved by a transportation benefit district created
pursuant to Senate Bill No. 5177 (2005) and submitted to and adopted by
the legislature as eligible for expenditures from this account;
(vii) Projects approved by the regional transportation investment
district and submitted to and adopted by the legislature as eligible
for expenditures from this account.
(b) Expenditures from the account on a project must not exceed the
expenditure amount listed by the project name, or fifty percent of the
project, whichever is less.
(2) Funding will be made available from the joint state and local
transportation account based on the account cash flow and in the
priority order of the projects listed above, once matching funds have
been secured by the local jurisdictions. However, if matching funds
for priority projects are not secured by local jurisdictions by the end
of 2005, other eligible projects under this section with secured local
matching funds may take priority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to chapter 47.56
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Tolls may be imposed on any projects or improvements approved
and funded in accordance with section 302 of this act.
(2) The Washington state transportation commission has the
authority to authorize tolls on any projects approved by the commission
and funded by taxes in the manner provided in section 302 of this act.

PART IV--ACCOUNTABILITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 46.68
RCW to read as follows:
Accountability and effectiveness are important aspects of setting
tax policy. In order to make policy choices regarding the best use of
limited state resources, the legislature and the public need
information on state tax expenditures for transportation projects and
improvements. Therefore, the Washington state transportation
commission is required to report to the transportation committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2009, December 1, 2014, December 1,
2019, and December 1, 2023. The report shall include but not be
limited to the following information:
(1) A detailed description of the transportation projects and
improvements funded by the fuel taxes authorized in this act, and
related information, including, but not limited to:
(a) The name and location of transportation projects and
improvements;
(b) The projected cost of projects and improvements;
(c) Actual expenditures as of November 1, 2009, regarding projects
and improvements;
(d) A comparison of projected costs versus actual costs, as of
November 1, 2009, regarding projects and improvements;
(e) A description of the funding framework for projects and
improvements, specifically identifying and detailing contributions by
local governments and the federal government;
(f) An estimate of the number of vehicles that use or will use
completed projects or improvements.
(2) An assessment of the efficiency with which state fuel tax
dollars are being spent on transportation projects and improvements,
and any recommendations for the more effective use of these tax
dollars.
(3) A recommendation to the legislature as to whether an additional
five-cent fuel tax, increased over five years, should be authorized by
the legislature.

PART V--INTEREST EARNINGS
Sec. 501 RCW 43.84.092 and 2003 c 361 s 602, 2003 c 324 s 1, 2003
c 150 s 2, and 2003 c 48 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, the
emergency reserve fund, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the joint state and local transportation
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 502 RCW 43.84.092 and 2004 c 242 s 60 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, the
emergency reserve fund, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the joint state and local transportation
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

PART VI--MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 Part headings used in this act are not
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005, except for section 502 of this act which takes effect
July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 Section 501 of this act expires July 1,
2006.

--- END ---