BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that returns on
the investment of retirement plan assets are volatile, and market
volatility is reflected in variations in the funded status of the state
retirement plans over time. The legislature also recognizes that the
long-term liability in the plans 1 of the public employees' retirement
system and the teachers' retirement system remains independent from
short-term investment returns in the market. The legislature seeks to
avoid contribution rate volatility that may unfairly benefit or burden
particular groups of taxpayers with disproportionate responsibilities
for retiring the unfunded liability in the plans 1. Therefore, it is
the intent of the legislature to provide for the systematic payment of
the plans 1 unfunded liability in a manner that promotes contribution
rate adequacy and stability for the affected systems over time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There shall be no suspension of those portions of the basic
state and employer contribution rates that are necessary to pay for the
unfunded actuarial accrued liability for plan 1 of the public
employees' retirement system for the following periods: From July 1,
2005, through June 30, 2009, for the public employees' retirement
system; from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2009, for the public safety
employees' retirement system; and from September 1, 2005, through
August 31, 2009, for the school employees' retirement system.
(2) There shall be no suspension of those portions of the basic
state and employer contribution rates that are necessary to pay for the
unfunded actuarial accrued liability for plan 1 of the teachers'
retirement system for the period beginning September 1, 2005, and
ending August 31, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2009, a minimum 2.75 percent contribution is
established as part of the basic state and employer contribution rate
for the public employees' retirement system, to be used for the sole
purpose of amortizing the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the
public employees' retirement system plan 1. This minimum contribution
rate shall remain effective until the actuarial value of assets equals
one hundred twenty-five percent of the actuarial accrued liability or
June 30, 2024, whichever comes first.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2009, a minimum 2.75 percent contribution is
established as part of the basic state and employer contribution rate
for the public safety employees' retirement system, to be used for the
sole purpose of amortizing the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in
the public employees' retirement system plan 1. This minimum
contribution rate shall remain effective until the actuarial value of
assets equals one hundred twenty-five percent of the actuarial accrued
liability for the public employees' retirement system plan 1 or June
30, 2024, whichever comes first.
(3) Beginning September 1, 2009, a minimum 2.75 percent
contribution is established as part of the basic state and employer
contribution rate for the school employees' retirement system, to be
used for the sole purpose of amortizing the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1. This
minimum contribution rate shall remain effective until the actuarial
value of assets equals one hundred twenty-five percent of the actuarial
accrued liability for the public employees' retirement system plan 1 or
June 30, 2024, whichever comes first.
(4) Beginning September 1, 2009, a minimum 5.75 percent
contribution is established as part of the basic state and employer
contribution rate for the teachers' retirement system, to be used for
the sole purpose of amortizing the unfunded actuarial accrued liability
in the teachers' retirement system plan 1. This minimum contribution
rate shall remain effective until the actuarial value of assets equals
one hundred twenty-five percent of the actuarial accrued liability for
the teachers' retirement system plan 1 or June 30, 2024, whichever
comes first.
(5) The minimum contribution rates for amortizing the unfunded
liability in the plans 1 may exceed, but shall not drop below those
specified in this section. Upon completion of each biennial actuarial
valuation, the state actuary shall review the appropriateness of the
minimum contribution rates and recommend to the legislature any
adjustments as may be needed due to material changes in benefits or
actuarial assumptions, methods, or experience.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1,
2009.

--- END ---