BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.83B.410 and 1989 c 171 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the issuance of an order under RCW 43.83B.405, the department
of ecology is empowered to:
(1)(a) Authorize emergency withdrawal of public surface and ground
waters, including dead storage within reservoirs, on a temporary basis
and authorize associated physical works, including authorization for
retrofitting of domestic wells to maintain agricultural irrigation
purposes, which may be either temporary or permanent. The termination
date for the authority to make such an emergency withdrawal may not be
later than the termination date of the order issued under RCW
43.83B.405 under which the power to authorize the withdrawal is
established. The department of ecology may issue such withdrawal
authorization when, after investigation and after providing appropriate
federal, state, and local governmental bodies an opportunity to
comment, the following are found:
(i) The waters proposed for withdrawal are to be used for a
beneficial use involving a previously established activity or purpose;
(ii) The previously established activity or purpose was furnished
water through rights applicable to the use of a public body of water
that cannot be exercised due to the lack of water arising from natural
drought conditions; and
(iii) The proposed withdrawal will not reduce flows or levels below
essential minimums necessary (A) to assure the maintenance of fisheries
requirements, and (B) to protect federal and state interests including,
among others, power generation, navigation, and existing water rights;
(b) All withdrawal authorizations issued under this section shall
contain provisions that allow for termination of withdrawals, in whole
or in part, whenever withdrawals will conflict with flows and levels as
provided in (a)(iii) of this subsection. Domestic and irrigation uses
of public surface and ground waters shall be given priority in
determining "beneficial uses." As to water withdrawal and associated
works authorized under this subsection, the requirements of chapter
43.21C RCW and public bidding requirements as otherwise provided by law
are waived and inapplicable. All state and local agencies with
authority to issue permits or other authorizations for such works
shall, to the extent possible, expedite the processing of the permits
or authorizations in keeping with the emergency nature of the requests
and shall provide a decision to the applicant within fifteen calendar
days of the date of application. All state departments or other
agencies having jurisdiction over state or other public lands, if such
lands are necessary to effectuate the withdrawal authorizations issued
under this subsection, shall provide short-term easements or other
appropriate property interest upon the payment of the fair market
value. This mandate shall not apply to any lands of the state that are
reserved for a special purpose or use that cannot properly be carried
out if the property interest were conveyed;
(2) Approve a temporary change in purpose, place of use, or point
of diversion, consistent with existing state policy allowing transfer
or lease of waters between willing parties, as provided for in RCW
90.03.380, 90.03.390, and 90.44.100. However, compliance with any
requirements of (a) notice of newspaper publication of these sections
or (b) the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, is not
required when such changes are necessary to respond to drought
conditions as determined by the department of ecology. An approval of
a temporary change of a water right as authorized under this subsection
is not admissible as evidence in either supporting or contesting the
validity of water claims in State of Washington, Department of Ecology
v. Acquavella, Yakima county superior court number 77-2-01484-5 or any
similar proceeding where the existence of a water right is at issue.
(3) Employ additional persons for specified terms of time,
consistent with the term of a drought condition, as are necessary to
ensure the successful performance of the activities associated with
implementing the emergency drought program of this chapter.
(4) Revise the drought contingency plan previously developed by the
department; and
(5) Acquire needed emergency drought-related equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---