BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.23A.020 and 1991 c 4 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A tax is imposed on the privilege of possession of petroleum
products in this state. The rate of the tax shall be ((fifty one-hundredths of one)) five and eight-tenths percent multiplied by the
wholesale value of the petroleum product.
(2) ((Moneys collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the
pollution liability insurance program trust account under RCW
70.148.020.
(3))) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the tax imposed in this chapter.
The tax due dates, reporting periods, and return requirements
applicable to chapter 82.04 RCW apply equally to the tax imposed in
this chapter.
(((4))) (3) Until June 1, 2007, within thirty days after the end of
each calendar quarter the department shall determine the "quarterly
balance," which shall be the cash balance in the pollution liability
insurance program trust account as of the last day of that calendar
quarter, after excluding the reserves determined for that quarter under
RCW 70.148.020 (2) and (3). Balance determinations by the department
under this section are final and shall not be used to challenge the
validity of any tax imposed under this section. ((For each subsequent
calendar quarter, tax shall be imposed under this section during the
entire calendar quarter unless:
(a) Tax was imposed under this section during the immediately
preceding calendar quarter, and))
(4) Until June 1, 2007, taxes collected under this chapter shall be
deposited as follows:
(a) If the most recent quarterly balance for the pollution
liability insurance program trust account, as determined under
subsection (3) of this section, is more than fifteen million dollars,
tax collections shall be deposited into the multimodal transportation
account; or
(b) ((Tax was not imposed under this section during the immediately
preceding calendar quarter, and)) If the most recent quarterly balance
for the pollution liability insurance program trust account, as
determined under subsection (3) of this section, is ((more)) less than
seven million five hundred thousand dollars, tax collections shall be
deposited into the pollution liability insurance program trust account.
(4) After May 31, 2007, all taxes collected under this chapter
shall be deposited into the multimodal transportation account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 82.23A.902 (Expiration date -- 1996 c 88)
and 2000 c 16 s 3 & 1996 c 88 s 3 are each repealed.

--- END ---