BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.120.020 and 2002 c 56 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the governing body of a regional transportation
investment district.
(2) "Department" means the Washington state department of
transportation.
(3) "Highway of statewide significance" means an existing or
proposed state route or federal interstate designated as a highway of
statewide significance by the transportation commission, its successor
entity, or the legislature.
(4) "Lead agency" means a public agency that by law can plan,
design, and build a transportation project and has been so designated
by the district.
(5) "Regional transportation investment district" or "district"
means a municipal corporation whose boundaries are coextensive with two
or more contiguous counties and that has been created by county
legislative authorities and a vote of the people under this chapter to
implement a regional transportation investment plan.
(6) "Regional transportation investment district planning
committee" or "planning committee" means the advisory committee created
under RCW 36.120.030 to create and propose to county legislative
authorities a regional transportation investment plan to develop,
finance, and construct transportation projects.
(7) "Regional transportation investment plan" or "plan" means a
plan to develop, construct, and finance a transportation project or
projects.
(8) "Transportation project" means:
(a) A capital improvement or improvements to a highway that has
been designated, in whole or in part, as a highway of statewide
significance, including an extension, that:
(i) Adds a lane or new lanes to an existing state or federal
highway; or
(ii) Repairs or replaces a lane or lanes damaged by an event
declared an emergency by the governor before January 1, 2002.
(b) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
highway of statewide significance, including an extension, and may
include the following associated multimodal capital improvements:
(i) Approaches to highways of statewide significance;
(ii) High-occupancy vehicle lanes;
(iii) Flyover ramps;
(iv) Park and ride lots;
(v) Bus pullouts;
(vi) Vans for vanpools;
(vii) Buses; and
(viii) Signalization, ramp metering, and other transportation
system management improvements.
(c) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
city street, county road, or existing highway or the creation of a new
highway that intersects with a highway of statewide significance, if
all of the following conditions are met:
(i) The project is included in a plan that makes highway
improvement projects that add capacity to a highway or highways of
statewide significance;
(ii) The secretary of transportation determines that the project
would better relieve traffic congestion than investing that same money
in adding capacity to a highway of statewide significance;
(iii) Matching money equal to one-third of the total cost of the
project is provided by local entities, including but not limited to a
metropolitan planning organization, county, city, port, or private
entity in which a county participating in a plan is located. Local
entities may use federal grants to meet this matching requirement;
(iv) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed ten percent of the revenues generated by the
district;
(v) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed one billion dollars; and
(vi) The specific projects are included within the plan and
submitted as part of the plan to a vote of the people.
(d) Operations, preservation, and maintenance are excluded from
this definition and may not be included in a regional transportation
investment plan. However, operations, preservation, and maintenance of
toll-related facilities where toll revenues have been pledged for the
payment of contracts is expressly authorized and may be included in a
regional transportation investment plan.
(9) "Weighted vote" means a vote that reflects the population each
board or planning committee member represents relative to the
population represented by the total membership of the board or planning
committee. Population will be determined using the federal 2000 census
or subsequent federal census data.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.120.050 and 2003 c 350 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A regional transportation investment district planning
committee may, as part of a regional transportation investment plan,
recommend the imposition of some or all of the following revenue
sources, which a regional transportation investment district may impose
upon approval of the voters as provided in this chapter:
(a) A regional sales and use tax, as specified in RCW 82.14.430, of
up to 0.5 percent of the selling price, in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used, in the case of a use tax, upon the
occurrence of any taxable event in the regional transportation
investment district;
(b) A local option vehicle license fee, as specified under RCW
82.80.100, of up to one hundred dollars per vehicle registered in the
district. As used in this subsection, "vehicle" means motor vehicle as
defined in RCW 46.04.320. Certain classes of vehicles, as defined
under chapter 46.04 RCW, may be exempted from this fee;
(c) A parking tax under RCW 82.80.030;
(d) A local motor vehicle excise tax under RCW 81.100.060 and
((chapter 81.104 RCW)) section 6 of this act;
(e) A local option fuel tax under RCW 82.80.120;
(f) An employer excise tax under RCW 81.100.030; and
(g) Vehicle tolls on new or reconstructed facilities. Unless
otherwise specified by law or contract, the department shall administer
the collection of vehicle tolls on designated facilities, and the state
transportation commission, or its successor, shall be the tolling
authority.
(2) Taxes, fees, and tolls may not be imposed without an
affirmative vote of the majority of the voters within the boundaries of
the district voting on a ballot proposition as set forth in RCW
36.120.070. Revenues from these taxes and fees may be used only to
implement the plan as set forth in this chapter. A district may
contract with the state department of revenue or other appropriate
entities for administration and collection of any of the taxes or fees
authorized in this section.
(3) Existing statewide motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes,
at the distribution rates in effect on January 1, 2001, are not
intended to be altered by this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.120.070 and 2002 c 56 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) For consideration at the 2005 general election, each of the
county legislative authorities participating in a planning committee in
April 2004 shall submit to the voters of the proposed district the
regional transportation investment plan, including the projects and
revenue sources, adopted by the planning committee executive board on
April 29, 2004, including any modifications adopted prior to July 1,
2005. The counties shall follow the ballot measure and election
procedures provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(b)(i) The ballot measure submitted to the voters under (a) of this
subsection must include a local option surcharge of not more than
three-tenths of one percent of the value of vehicles registered to a
person residing within the district. If the ballot measure is approved
by the voters, the regional transportation investment district shall
impose the surcharge and submit that portion of the revenue generated
within a regional transit authority's boundaries to the regional
transit authority. The regional transit authority shall first use the
revenue to support the completion of a light rail transit system as
identified in the first phase of the authority's regional high capacity
transportation system investments. Any excess revenues may then be
used by the regional transit authority solely for the purpose of
providing high capacity transportation service. That portion of the
revenue generated outside a regional transit authority's boundaries
shall remain with the district and may be used for transportation
projects as defined in this chapter.
(ii) No surcharge may be imposed on new vehicles, except that the
surcharge shall apply to the initial registration of a vehicle
previously licensed in another jurisdiction.
(iii) A district imposing a surcharge under this section shall
contract, before the effective date of the resolution or ordinance
imposing a surcharge, for the administration and collection of the
surcharge by the state department of licensing, and department of
revenue, as appropriate, which may deduct an amount, as provided by
contract, for administration and collection expenses. All
administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.32, and 82.44 RCW
shall, insofar as they are applicable to motor vehicle excise taxes, be
applicable to surcharges imposed under this section. For the purposes
of determining the value of a vehicle, the district shall use the
uniform statewide vehicle depreciation schedule, if then in existence,
or, in the alternative, shall use the depreciation schedule applicable
to the motor vehicle excise tax imposed by a regional transit
authority.
(2) Subject to subsection (1) of this section, two or more
contiguous county legislative authorities, upon receipt of the regional
transportation investment plan under RCW 36.120.040, may ((certify the
plan to the ballot, including identification of the tax options))
submit to the voters of the proposed district a single ballot measure
that approves formation of the district, approves the regional
transportation investment plan, and approves the revenue sources
necessary to ((fund)) finance the plan. ((County legislative
authorities)) The planning committee may draft ((a ballot title,)) the
ballot measure on behalf of the county legislative authorities, and the
county legislative authorities may give notice as required by law for
ballot measures, and perform other duties as required to ((put the plan
before)) submit the measure to the voters of the proposed district for
their approval or rejection ((as a single ballot measure that both
approves formation of the district and approves the plan)). Counties
may negotiate interlocal agreements necessary to implement the plan.
The electorate will be the voters voting within the boundaries of the
participating counties. A simple majority of the total persons voting
on the single ballot measure ((to approve the plan, establish the
district, and approve the taxes and fees)) is required for approval of
the measure.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.56.076 and 2002 c 56 s 403 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon approval of a majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, and only for the purposes authorized
in RCW 36.120.050(1)(((f))) (g), a regional transportation investment
district may ((impose)) authorize vehicle tolls on state routes where
improvements financed in whole or in part by a regional transportation
investment district add additional lanes to, or reconstruct lanes on,
a highway of statewide significance. The department shall administer
the collection of vehicle tolls authorized on designated facilities
unless otherwise specified in law or by contract, and the state
transportation commission, or its successor, shall be the tolling
authority.

Sec. 5 RCW 81.100.080 and 1990 c 43 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
Funds collected under RCW 81.100.030 or 81.100.060 and any
investment earnings accruing thereon shall be used by the county or the
regional transportation investment district in a manner consistent with
the regional transportation plan only for costs of collection, costs of
preparing, adopting, and enforcing agreements under RCW 81.100.030(3),
for construction of high occupancy vehicle lanes and related
facilities, mitigation of environmental concerns that result from
construction or use of high occupancy vehicle lanes and related
facilities, payment of principal and interest on bonds issued for the
purposes of this section, for high occupancy vehicle programs as
defined in RCW 81.100.020(5), and for commuter rail projects in
accordance with RCW 81.104.120. Except for funds raised by a regional
transportation investment district, no funds collected under RCW
81.100.030 or 81.100.060 after June 30, 2000, may be pledged for the
payment or security of the principal or interest on any bonds issued
for the purposes of this section. Not more than ten percent of the
funds may be used for transit agency high occupancy vehicle programs.
Priorities for construction of high occupancy vehicle lanes and
related facilities shall be as follows:
(1)(a) To accelerate construction of high occupancy vehicle lanes
on the interstate highway system, as well as related facilities;
(b) To finance or accelerate construction of high occupancy vehicle
lanes on the noninterstate state highway system, as well as related
facilities.
(2) To finance construction of high occupancy vehicle lanes on
local arterials, as well as related facilities.
Moneys received by an agency under this chapter shall be used in
addition to, and not as a substitute for, moneys currently used by the
agency for the purposes specified in this section.
Counties and regional transportation investment districts may
contract with cities or the state department of transportation for
construction of high occupancy vehicle lanes and related facilities,
and may issue general obligation bonds to fund such construction and
use funds received under this chapter to pay the principal and interest
on such bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A regional transportation investment district may, with voter
approval and as part of a regional transportation investment plan,
impose a local option surcharge of not more than two-tenths of one
percent of the value of vehicles registered to a person residing within
the district. The proceeds collected under this section shall be used
for transportation projects as defined in RCW 36.120.020. No surcharge
may be imposed on new vehicles, except that the surcharge shall apply
to the initial registration of a vehicle previously licensed in another
jurisdiction.
(2) An investment district imposing a tax under this section shall
contract, before the effective date of the resolution or ordinance
imposing a surcharge, for the administration and collection of the
surcharge by the state department of licensing, and department of
revenue, as appropriate, which may deduct an amount, as provided by
contract, for administration and collection expenses. All
administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.32, and 82.44 RCW
shall, insofar as they are applicable to motor vehicle excise taxes, be
applicable to surcharges imposed under this section. For the purposes
of determining the value of a vehicle, the district shall use the
uniform statewide vehicle depreciation schedule, if then in existence,
or, in the alternative, shall use the depreciation schedule applicable
to the motor vehicle excise tax imposed by a regional transit
authority.

Sec. 7 RCW 35.95A.070 and 2002 c 248 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every authority has the power to:
(((1))) (a) Levy excess levies upon the property included within
the authority area, in the manner prescribed by Article VII, section 2
of the state Constitution and by RCW 84.52.052 for operating funds,
capital outlay funds, and cumulative reserve funds;
(((2))) (b) Issue general obligation bonds, not to exceed an
amount, together with any outstanding nonvoter-approved general
obligation indebtedness equal to one and one-half percent of the value
of the taxable property within the authority area, as the term "value
of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015. An authority may
additionally issue general obligation bonds, together with outstanding
voter-approved and nonvoter-approved general obligation indebtedness,
equal to two and one-half percent of the value of the taxable property
within the authority area, as the term "value of the taxable property"
is defined in RCW 39.36.015, when the bonds are approved by three-fifths of the qualified electors of the authority at a general or
special election called for that purpose and may provide for the
retirement thereof by levies in excess of dollar rate limitations in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.52.056. These elections will
be held as provided in RCW 39.36.050;
(((3))) (c) Issue revenue bonds payable from any revenues other
than taxes levied by the authority, and to pledge those revenues for
the repayment of the bonds. Proceeds of revenue bonds may only be
expended for the costs of public monorail transportation facilities,
for financing costs, and for capitalized interest during construction
plus six months thereafter. The bonds and warrants will be issued and
sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.
(2) No bonds issued by an authority are obligations of any city,
county, or the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof
other than the authority, and the bonds will so state, unless the
legislative authority of any city or county or the legislature
expressly authorizes particular bonds to be either guaranteed by or
obligations of its respective city or county or of the state.
(3) An authority may not issue bonds under this section unless and
until voters have approved the formation of a regional transportation
investment district that includes the authority within the district
area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The governor shall appoint, from a
designated list of nominees submitted by each major party caucus of the
legislature, a regional transportation governance commission. Each
major party caucus of the legislature shall submit two names to the
governor for possible appointment. The governor shall then appoint
from the list of eight names five members to serve on the commission;
however, at least four of the appointments must represent a different
caucus. The commission shall elect a chair, and may adopt rules and
procedures necessary for its orderly operation. In addition, the
secretary of transportation or the secretary's designee shall serve as
a nonvoting member. Appointees must be citizen members, who do not
hold public office. Appointees must include experts from the private
and public sectors, including academia, with demonstrated expertise in
innovation, structural reorganization, and private or public agency
decision making and must also include experts in fields such as
municipal law, public administration, intergovernmental relationships,
and transportation planning, construction, operations, and risk
management.
(2) The commission shall evaluate transportation governance in the
central Puget Sound area under the jurisdiction of the Puget Sound
regional council. This evaluation must include an assessment of the
current roles of regional transportation agencies including regional
transportation and metropolitan planning organizations, the regional
transit authority, regional transportation investment districts, county
and municipal agencies operating transit services, and cities and
counties and other public agencies providing transportation services or
facilities. The commission shall assess and develop recommendations
for what steps should be taken to:
(a) Consolidate governance among agencies including changes in
institutional powers, structures, and relationships and governance
needed to improve accountability for transportation decisions, while
enhancing the regional focus for transportation decisions and
maintaining equity among citizens in the region;
(b) Improve coordination in the planning of transportation
investments and services;
(c) Improve investment strategies;
(d) Coordinate transportation planning and investments with adopted
land use policies within the region;
(e) Enhance efficiency and coordination in the delivery of services
provided;
(f) Adjust boundaries for agencies or functions within the region
to address existing and future transportation and land use issues; and
(g) Improve coordination between regional investments and federal
funds, and state funding including those administered by the
transportation improvement board, the county road administration board,
and the freight mobility strategic investment board.
(3) The commission shall make public its preliminary findings and
recommendations by November 15, 2005, and shall provide at least
fifteen days for public comment. The commission shall then adopt its
findings and recommendations and submit them to the legislature by
January 1, 2006.
(4) The commission shall conduct public meetings to assure active
public participation in the development of the recommendations.
(5) The department of transportation shall provide staff support to
the commission and, upon request of the commission, contract with other
parties for staff support to the commission.

--- END ---