BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A budget is hereby adopted and, subject
to the provisions set forth in the following sections, the several
amounts specified in parts I through VIII of this act, or so much
thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated,
are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries,
wages, and other expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and
for other specified purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1,
2005, and ending June 30, 2007, except as otherwise provided, out of
the several funds of the state hereinafter named.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2006" or "FY 2006" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2006.
(b) "Fiscal year 2007" or "FY 2007" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007.
(c) "FTE" means full time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.
Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion
of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose which is
unnecessary to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,150,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,372,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,522,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE SENATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,473,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,301,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,774,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW
COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,874,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,870,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,744,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
condition and limitation: $100,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided solely for consultant
costs related to the study of regional jail facilities required by
Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental disorders treatment). If Senate Bill No.
5763 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,677,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,829,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,506,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,902,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS
COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,089,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,107,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,196,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,975,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,209,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,184,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES. In order to achieve
operating efficiencies within the financial resources available to the
legislative branch, the executive rules committee of the house of
representatives and the facilities and operations committee of the
senate by joint action may transfer funds among the house of
representatives, senate, joint legislative audit and review committee,
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
legislative transportation committee, office of the state actuary,
joint legislative systems committee, and statute law committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,836,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,991,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,827,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,972,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,971,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,943,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,332,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,590,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,922,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,025,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,063,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,088,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,904,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,048,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,879,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,199,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $119,030,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for court-appointed special
advocates in dependency matters. The administrator for the courts,
after consulting with the association of juvenile court administrators
and the association of court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad
litem programs, shall distribute the funds to volunteer court-appointed
special advocate/guardian ad litem programs. The distribution of
funding shall be based on the number of children who need volunteer
court-appointed special advocate representation and shall be equally
accessible to all volunteer court-appointed special advocate/guardian
ad litem programs. The administrator for the courts shall not retain
more than six percent of total funding to cover administrative or any
other agency costs.
(2) $3,000,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for school district petitions to
juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and
28A.225.035. The office of the administrator for the courts shall
develop an interagency agreement with the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to allocate the funding provided in this
subsection. Allocation of this money to school districts shall be
based on the number of petitions filed.
(3) $13,224,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to county juvenile
court administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children
in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The office of the
administrator for the courts shall not retain any portion of these
funds to cover administrative costs. The office of the administrator
for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators,
shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula
shall neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition
processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average
per-petition processing costs.
(4) The distributions made under subsection (3) of this section and
distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made
pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate
reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of
service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.
(5) Each fiscal year during the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate
ways and means committee no later than 60 days after a fiscal year
ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for
the purpose of distributing funds.
(6) $7,231,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to local governments
to pay for district and certain municipal court judges' salaries
pursuant to Senate Bill No. 5454 (court operations). If Senate Bill
No. 5454 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,985,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,368,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,734,000
Public Benefit Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,740,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,827,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $51,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for the office of public defense's
costs in implementing chapter 303, Laws of 1999 (court funding).
(2) Amounts provided from the public safety and education account
appropriation in this section include funding for investigative
services in death penalty personal restraint petitions.
(3) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to contract with the Washington
defender association to continue services previously funded from the
federal drug control and system improvement formula grant through the
department of community, trade, and economic development.
(4) $740,000 of the public benefit account--state appropriation is
provided solely for training and technical assistance for trial-level
criminal indigent defense. If Senate Bill No. 5287 (social card games)
is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(5) $4,000,000 of the public benefit account--state appropriation
is provided solely for a criminal indigent defense pilot program. If
Senate Bill No. 5287 (social card games) is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(a) The goal of the pilot program shall be to enhance the quality
of legal representation of indigent criminal defendants charged with
felony or misdemeanor offenses. To meet this goal, the pilot program
shall include the following components:
(i) Effective implementation of indigency screening of all
defendants represented by appointed counsel;
(ii) Implementation of enhanced defense attorney practice standards
consistent with the Washington state bar association standards as
currently written or revised, including but not limited to those
related to reasonable case preparation and the delivery of adequate
client advice; and
(iii) Use of investigative and expert services in appropriate
cases.
(b) The director shall contract for an independent evaluation of
the pilot program benefits and costs. An interim evaluation shall be
submitted to the chief justice of the supreme court, the governor, and
the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than January 1, 2006.
A final evaluation shall be submitted to the chief justice of the
supreme court, the governor, and the fiscal committees of the
legislature no later than December 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,474,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,928,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,112,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $508,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,372,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,112,000 of the water quality account appropriation and
$1,150,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided
solely for the Puget Sound water quality action team to implement the
Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan action items PSAT-01 through
PSAT-06.
(2) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $200,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for one-time corrective actions to address Hood canal's
dissolved oxygen problems, the Puget Sound conservation and recovery
plan action item PSAT-07.
(3) The Puget Sound water quality action team shall make
recommendations to improve, change, or eliminate monitoring activities
that impact performance measures related to salmon recovery and
watershed health. The Puget Sound water quality action team shall
coordinate with the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health
and consult with the office of financial management in determining the
scope and contents of this report.
In preparing these recommendations, the Puget Sound water quality
action team shall prepare a report detailing all new activity and
updating all previously identified activity within the comprehensive
monitoring strategy with a focus on salmon recovery and watershed
health related monitoring activity within the agency. At a minimum,
the report shall include sufficient detail identifying the specific
salmon recovery and watershed health monitoring activity being
performed and include: Precise costs by fund source, a narrative
stating why it is required, when the activity started, the frequency of
data collection, and geographic location of data being collected.
Furthermore, the agency shall also provide sufficient detail that
describes the purpose of each monitoring activity, who uses the
information, how often it is accessed, where the information is stored,
and the current status and cost, by fund source, of the data storage
systems housing each monitoring activity identified within the agency.
The Puget Sound water quality action team shall provide a status
report summarizing progress to the governor's forum on monitoring and
watershed health and the office of financial management by March 1,
2006. A final report to the governor's forum on monitoring and
watershed health, the office of financial management, and legislative
fiscal committees is due no later than September 1, 2006.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate
Bill No. 5385 (invasive species council). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $115,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $115,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate
Bill No. 5278 (ocean policy review commission). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(6) $508,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5432 (oil
spill advisory council). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $715,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $726,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,441,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,947,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,942,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,889,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,749,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,807,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,025,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,023,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,773,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,993,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $109,370,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,296,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2) $1,999,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,403,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the verification of initiative
and referendum petitions, maintenance of related voter registration
records, and the publication and distribution of the voters and
candidates pamphlet.
(3) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $118,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for legal advertising of state
measures under RCW 29.27.072.
(4)(a) $1,944,004 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $1,986,772 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2005-07 biennium. The funding level
for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in
this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise
contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind,
in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The
office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once
all criteria in (a) and (b) of this subsection have been satisfactorily
documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $273,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $284,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $557,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office shall assist the department of
personnel on providing the government-to-government training sessions
for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The
training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal
issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the
training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the
participants of each session. The department of personnel shall be
responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training,
including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN-PACIFIC-AMERICAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $233,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $234,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $467,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 FOR THE STATE TREASURER
State Treasurer's Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,666,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 FOR THE STATE AUDITOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $731,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $727,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,168,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,626,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Audits of school districts by the division of municipal
corporations shall include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a)
Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience and education of the
district's certified instructional staff, as reported to the
superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.
(2) $731,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $727,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for staff and related costs to
verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for
state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state
funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state
funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is
not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits;
and to assist the state special education safety net committee when
requested.
(3) The office shall report to the office of financial management
and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature detailed
information on risk-based auditing, its theory, and its application for
the audits performed on Washington state government. The report shall
include an explanation of how the office identifies, measures, and
prioritizes risk, the manner in which the office uses these factors in
the planning and execution of the audits of Washington state
government, and the methods and procedures used in the conduct of the
risk-based audits themselves. The report is due no later than December
1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES
FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $202,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $335,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124 FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,172,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,052,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,927,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,239,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,298,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,267,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $199,225,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125 FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $712,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $695,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,407,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,916,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,548,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,457,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,161,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,113,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,814,000
Tourism Development and Promotion Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $213,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,108,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,808,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,359,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,198,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $236,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,567,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,881,000
Homeless Families Service Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $601,000
Public Benefit Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $455,586,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
technology center for work essential to the mission of the Washington
technology center and conducted in partnership with universities. The
center shall not pay any increased indirect rate nor increases in other
indirect charges above the absolute amount paid during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium.
(2) $61,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $62,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item CTED-01.
(3) $5,902,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for the justice assistance grant program, to be
distributed in state fiscal year 2006 as follows:
(a) $2,064,000 to local units of government to continue
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;
(b) $330,000 to the department to continue the drug prosecution
assistance program in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task
forces;
(c) $675,000 to the Washington state patrol for coordination,
investigative, and supervisory support to the multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces and for methamphetamine education and response;
(d) $20,000 to the department for tribal law enforcement;
(e) $345,000 to the department to continue domestic violence legal
advocacy;
(f) $60,000 to the department for community-based advocacy services
to victims of violent crime, other than sexual assault and domestic
violence;
(g) $351,000 to the department of social and health services,
division of alcohol and substance abuse, for juvenile drug courts in
eastern and western Washington;
(h) $626,000 to the department of social and health services,
juvenile rehabilitation administration, to continue youth violence
prevention and intervention projects;
(i) $97,000 to the department to continue evaluation of this grant
program;
(j) $290,000 to the office of financial management for criminal
history records improvement;
(k) $580,000 to the department for required grant administration,
monitoring, and reporting on justice assistance grant programs; and
(l) $464,000 to the department for distribution to small
municipalities.
These amounts represent the maximum justice assistance grant
expenditure authority for each program. No program may expend justice
assistance grant funds in excess of the amounts provided in this
subsection. If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this
subsection become available, whether from prior or current fiscal year
distributions, the department shall hold these moneys in reserve and
may not expend them without specific appropriation. These moneys shall
be carried forward and applied to the pool of moneys available for
appropriation for programs and projects in the succeeding fiscal year.
As part of its budget request for the succeeding year, the department
shall estimate and request authority to spend any justice assistance
grant funds.
(4) $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to fund domestic violence legal
advocacy, in recognition of reduced federal grant funding.
(5) $205,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $205,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for grants to Washington Columbia
River Gorge counties to implement their responsibilities under the
national scenic area management plan. Of this amount, $390,000 is
provided for Skamania county and $20,000 is provided for Clark county.
(6) $29,178,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $29,606,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for providing early childhood
education assistance. Of these amounts, $2,616,000 in each fiscal year
may be used solely to increase the number of children receiving
education, and $263,000 in fiscal year 2006 and $692,000 in fiscal year
2007 are provided solely for a targeted vendor rate increase.
(7) Repayments of outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600,
the mortgage and rental assistance program, shall be remitted to the
department, including any current revolving account balances. The
department shall contract with a lender or contract collection agent to
act as a collection agent of the state. The lender or contract
collection agent shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and
deposit them into an interest-bearing account. The funds collected
shall be remitted to the department quarterly. Interest earned in the
account may be retained by the lender or contract collection agent, and
shall be considered a fee for processing payments on behalf of the
state. Repayments of loans granted under this chapter shall be made to
the lender or contract collection agent as long as the loan is
outstanding, notwithstanding the repeal of the chapter.
(8) $1,288,000 of the Washington housing trust account--state
appropriation shall lapse if neither House Bill No. 1074 nor Senate
Bill No. 5108 are enacted by June 30, 2005.
(9) $236,000 of the public works assistance account--state
appropriation is provided solely for technical assistance to
municipalities through the small communities initiative.
(10) $625,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $625,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for food banks to obtain and
distribute additional nutritious food; purchase equipment to transport
and store perishable products; provide training and written information
on obesity to tribal and food bank workers and food bank clients; and
collaborate with other agencies and experts on nutrition and obesity
for services at food banks and tribal voucher programs.
(11) $1,154,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely for the community mobilization
program to provide grants and training to community organizations.
(12) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the community services block grant
program to replace federal funding in order to prevent the closure of
community action agencies as a result of loss of federal funding. To
the extent that federal funding is provided for this purpose, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to HistoryLink for producing
noncommercial, public information on state and local history.
(14) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to Women's Hearth.
(15) $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a contract with a food
distribution program for communities in the southwestern portion of the
state and for workers impacted by timber and salmon fishing closures
and reductions. The department may not charge administrative overhead
of expenses to the funds provided in this subsection.
(16) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the center for advanced
manufacturing to assist and serve incubating manufacturing companies.
(17) $3,000,000 of the public benefit account--state appropriation
is provided solely to increase grant funding for civil legal
representation of indigent persons under RCW 43.08.260. If Senate Bill
No. 5287 (social card games) is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $1,000,000 of the public benefit account--state appropriation
is provided solely to fund the Pierce county alliance's methamphetamine
family services treatment program and safe streets of Tacoma's
methamphetamine prevention service. If Senate Bill No. 5287 (social
card games) is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $50,500 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
solely for work with the northwest food processors association on the
food processing cluster development project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127 FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST
COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $568,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $503,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,071,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 128 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,259,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,539,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,510,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,779,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the public works assistance account appropriation
is provided solely for an inventory and evaluation of the most
effective way to organize the state public infrastructure programs and
funds. The inventory shall identify: The public infrastructure state
programs and funds and the purposes each serve; how the program or fund
is implemented; the types of public infrastructure projects supported
by the program or fund; the dollar amount of the projects funded,
annual loan amounts, outstanding loans, and repayments by each program
or fund; and the geographic distribution of projects supported by a
program or fund. Where applicable, the inventory shall identify
overlaps or gaps in types of public infrastructure projects supported
through state programs or funds. The evaluation shall develop
recommendations to have the most efficient and effective programs that
fund: Economic development and job growth; repairing failing systems;
expanding systems to handle growth; geographic diversity; the type of
systems; and environmental improvements. The inventory and evaluation
shall be delivered to the governor and the appropriate committees of
the legislature by September 1, 2005.
(2)(a) $182,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for a study of residential services for
persons with developmental disabilities to identify a preferred
continuum of developmental disabilities residential services and
develop recommendations regarding steps to be undertaken to transition
to the preferred system within four years. The study shall make
recommendations by October 1, 2005, regarding the number and
proportions of different types of residential services that should be
available or developed in different regions of the state and how
current resources for residential services may be best allocated to
meet the needs of as many clients as possible, taking client acuity and
geography into consideration. By January 1, 2006, recommendations
shall be complete regarding suggested steps and timeline for
transitioning, within maintenance level funding, the current
residential service system to the preferred residential service system
within four years.
(b) The study shall be overseen by an advisory group consisting of
thirteen members including one representative each of the governor's
office, the office of financial management or the department of social
and health services, and the Washington state developmental
disabilities council, appointed by the governor; two representatives of
labor, appointed by the governor; one representative of community
residential care providers, appointed by the governor; one
representative of residents of residential habilitation centers and
their families; one representative of individuals served in community
residential programs and their families, appointed by the governor; one
individual with a developmental disability who is or has been a
resident in a residential habilitation center and who is being or has
been served in a community residential program, appointed by the
governor; and two members of the house of representatives appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives, one of whom shall be a
member of the majority caucus and one of whom shall be a member of the
minority caucus, and two members of the senate appointed by the
president of the senate, one of whom shall be a member of the majority
caucus and one of whom shall be a member of the minority caucus. The
governor shall appoint the chairperson. Legislative members of the
advisory group shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are entitled to be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. The department of social and health services, the
developmental disabilities council, the office of financial management,
the house of representatives office of program research, and senate
committee services shall provide staff support.
(c) The advisory group may contract for specialized outside
professional services to assist in completing the survey, analysis, and
plan development work described in subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(3) $163,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $127,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5442 or Second Substitute House Bill No. 1220 (long-term care financing task force). If neither bill is enacted by June
30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $870,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $871,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate
Bill No. 5441 (education finance study). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) The office of financial management shall work with the
department of social and health services and legislative fiscal
committee staff, with data provided by the caseload forecast council
and the updated juvenile rehabilitation master plan, to determine at
what point closure or consolidation of Green Hill training school or
Maple Lane training school will be necessary based on declining
population, and to develop a plan for potential closure or
consolidation with other department of social and health services
facilities. The plan shall include, but not be limited to,
recommendations for operating and capital budget decisions, including
capital investments needed to facilitate closure or consolidation and
provide the necessary range of services in the juvenile rehabilitation
system if a facility is closed. The office of financial management
shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature not later than
October 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129 FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,417,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,082,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,610,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,692,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall coordinate with the
governor's office of Indian affairs on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal
government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal
historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal
governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through
a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department
shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the
training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the
training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 131 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY
Lottery Administrative Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,343,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section may not
be expended by the Washington state lottery to investigate, evaluate,
develop, implement, or otherwise support any game that allows or
requires a player to become eligible for a prize or to otherwise play
any portion of the game by using either (1) the internet; or (2) any
interactive device or terminal involving electronic, digital, or video
representations of pull-tabs, bingo, poker or other cards, dice,
roulette, keno, or other games of chance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 132 FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $236,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $243,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $479,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133 FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $235,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $236,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $471,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 134 FOR THE PERSONNEL APPEALS BOARD
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,006,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 135 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS -- OPERATIONS
Dependent Care Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $406,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,708,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,114,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $16,000 of the department of retirement
systems expense account appropriation is provided solely to implement
Senate Bill No. 5522 (purchasing service credit). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 136 FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD
State Investment Board Expense Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,719,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 137 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,930,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,143,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,446,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,706,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: By December 15, 2005, the department of
revenue shall report to the health care and fiscal committees of the
legislature on options for providing financial incentives for private
practice physicians to serve uninsured patients, and those subsidized
by state-sponsored low-income health care programs. The report shall
be developed in consultation with the department of health, the
department of social and health services, and the health care
authority, and shall include an assessment of the relative costs and
effectiveness of strategies including, but not limited to, tax credits
and payment rate increases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 138 FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,182,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,532,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 139 FOR THE MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL
County Research Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $787,000
City and Town Research Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,134,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,921,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 140 FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S
BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OMWBE Enterprises Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,094,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $180,000 of the OMWBE enterprises account
appropriation is provided for management of private sector grants and
coordination of support services to small businesses in the state. It
is the intent of the legislature that this amount be funded from new
grant revenues and business fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 141 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $243,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $228,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,634,000
General Administration Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,651,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,756,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 142 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
SERVICES
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,552,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143 FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $655,000
Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,023,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,678,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office of the insurance commissioner
shall perform an evaluation of the feasibility of subscription air
ambulance service pursuant to the provisions of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5736.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144 FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
Certified Public Accountants' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,931,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 145 FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $282,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the death investigation
account appropriation is provided solely for providing financial
assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations.
The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding
these funds for multiple death investigations involving an
unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving
multiple jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 146 FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION
Horse Racing Commission Operating Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,878,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 147 FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,528,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,521,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,832,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $149,810,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,691,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) As authorized under RCW 66.16.010, the liquor control board
shall add an equivalent surcharge of $0.42 per liter on all retail
sales of spirits, excluding licensee, military and tribal sales,
effective no later than July 1, 2005. The intent of this surcharge is
to generate additional revenues for the state general fund in the
2005-07 biennium.
(2) $154,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the lease of state vehicles from the department
of general administration's motor pool.
(3) $2,228,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for costs associated with the installation of a wide
area network that connects all of the state liquor stores and the
liquor control board headquarters.
(4) $186,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for an alcohol education staff coordinator and
associated alcohol educational resources targeted toward middle school
and high school students.
(5) $2,261,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for replacement of essential computer equipment,
improvement of security measures, and improvement to the core
information technology infrastructure.
(6) $2,800,000 of the liquor control board construction and
maintenance account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
certificate of participation to fund the expansion of the liquor
distribution center.
(7) $3,233,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for upgrades to material handling system and
warehouse management system software and equipment, and associated
staff to increase the liquor distribution center's shipping capacity.
(8) $2,746,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for additional state liquor store and retail
business analysis staff. The additional liquor store staff will be
deployed to those stores with the greatest potential for increased
customer satisfaction and revenue growth. The liquor control board,
using the new retail business analysis staff and, if needed, an
independent consultant, will analyze the impact of additional staff on
customer satisfaction and revenue growth and make recommendations that
will increase the effectiveness and efficiency of all the liquor
control board's retail-related activities. Using best practices and
benchmarks from comparable retail organizations, the analysis will
evaluate and make recommendations, at a minimum, on the following
issues: Optimal staffing levels and store locations and numbers of
stores (both state liquor stores and contract liquor stores); options
for an improved retail organizational structure; strategies to increase
the retail decision-making capacity; and resources required for
enhanced internal organizational support of the retail activities. In
support of this evaluation, a survey shall be employed to gauge
customer satisfaction with state and contract liquor store services.
A written evaluation with recommendations shall be submitted to the
governor and the legislative fiscal committees by October 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 148 FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION
Public Service Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,787,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,827,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,476,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,090,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 149 FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS
Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'
Administrative Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 150 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,017,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,970,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,137,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,705,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,144,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,008,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $302,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,687,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,052,000
Military Department Rental and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $378,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $268,400,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,277,000 of the disaster response account -- state
appropriation and $11,008,000 of the disaster response account -- federal
appropriation may be spent only on disasters declared by the governor
and with the approval of the office of financial management. The
military department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2005-07 biennium based on current revenue and
expenditure patterns.
(2) $6,687,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account -- state
appropriation and $29,052,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account -- federal appropriation are provided solely for response and recovery
costs associated with the February 28, 2001, earthquake. The military
department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing earthquake
recovery costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b)
incremental changes from the previous estimate; (c) actual
expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining costs to be paid; and
(e) estimates of future payments by biennium. This information shall
be displayed by fund, by type of assistance, and by amount paid on
behalf of state agencies or local organizations. The military
department shall also submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the Nisqually earthquake account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2005-07 biennium based on current revenue and
expenditure patterns.
(3) $127,586,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee;
(b) This amount shall not be allotted until a spending plan is
reviewed by the governor's domestic security advisory group and
approved by the office of financial management;
(c) The department shall submit a quarterly report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; incremental changes from the
previous estimate, planned and actual homeland security expenditures by
the state and local governments with this federal funding; and matching
or accompanying state or local expenditures; and
(d) The department shall submit a report by December 1st of each
year to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing homeland security revenues and expenditures for
the previous fiscal year by county and legislative district.
(4) $867,000 of the disaster response account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the Cowlitz county 911 communications center for
the purpose of purchasing or reimbursing the purchase of interoperable
radio communication technology to improve disaster response in the
Mount St. Helens area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 151 FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,572,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,574,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,704,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 152 FOR THE GROWTH PLANNING HEARINGS BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,558,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,550,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,108,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $9,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the
Western Board to relocate. If the Western Board does not relocate by
June 30, 2006, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 153 FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
State Convention and Trade Center Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,512,000
State Convention and Trade Center Operating
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,983,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 154 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY &
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $549,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,446,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,559,000

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES. (1) Appropriations made in this act to the department of
social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by
this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include
transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly
provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other
than that purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3) The department is authorized to develop an integrated health
care program designed to slow the progression of illness and disability
and better manage Medicaid expenditures for the aged and disabled
population. Under this Washington medicaid integration partnership
(WMIP) the department may combine and transfer such Medicaid funds
appropriated under sections 204, 206, 208, and 209 of this act as may
be necessary to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP program
enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily
enrollment of 6,000 persons during the 2005-2007 biennium. The amount
of funding assigned to the pilot projects from each program may not
exceed the average per capita cost assumed in this act for individuals
covered by that program, actuarially adjusted for the health condition
of persons enrolled in the pilot, times the number of clients enrolled
in the pilot. In implementing the WMIP pilot projects, the department
may: (a) Withhold from calculations of "available resources" as set
forth in RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the capitated rate for
individuals enrolled in the pilots; and (b) employ capitation financing
and risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration with health care service
contractors licensed by the office of the insurance commissioner and
qualified to participate in both the medicaid and medicare programs.
The department shall conduct an evaluation of the WMIP, measuring
changes in participant health outcomes, changes in patterns of service
utilization, participant satisfaction, participant access to services,
and the state fiscal impact.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $241,346,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $248,038,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,111,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,871,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,515,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $926,281,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,271,000 of the fiscal year 2006 general fund--state
appropriation, $2,271,000 of the fiscal year 2007 general fund--state
appropriation, and $1,584,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the category of services titled
"intensive family preservation services."
(2) $701,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2006
appropriation and $701,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2007
appropriation are provided to contract for the operation of one
pediatric interim care facility. The facility shall provide
residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three
months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current
foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The
department shall not require case management as a condition of the
contract.
(3) $375,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2006
appropriation, $375,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2007
appropriation, and $322,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the
training, consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster,
and adoptive parents of children through age three in need of special
care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers, except that each
program may serve up to three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs, preference
shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing
pediatric interim care program.
(4) $325,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $325,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the state association of
children's advocacy centers. Funds will be distributed annually as
follows: (a) Children's advocacy centers that meet the national
children's alliance accreditation standards for full membership, and
are members in good standing, will be eligible to receive up to $30,000
per center for operations, or for expansion of services; (b)
communities in the process of establishing a center will be eligible to
receive up to $10,000 per county or multi-county services area. A 50
percent match will be required of each center receiving state funding.
In addition, the state association of children's advocacy centers will
receive up to $50,000 to provide training and technical assistance.
(5) $50,000 of the fiscal year 2006 general fund--state
appropriation and $50,000 of the fiscal year 2007 general fund--state
appropriation are provided solely for a street youth program in
Spokane.
(6) $1,382,000 of the fiscal year 2006 general fund--state
appropriation, $2,502,000 of the fiscal year 2007 general fund--state
appropriation, and $1,664,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided for reforms to the child protective services
and child welfare services programs, including 30-day face-to-face
contact for children in out-of-home care, improved timeliness of child
protective services investigations, and an enhanced in-home child
welfare services program. The department shall report December 1st of
each year on the status of the hiring of new staff, implementation
status, and outcomes of the reform.
(7) $572,000 of the fiscal year 2006 general fund--state
appropriation, $572,000 of the fiscal year 2007 general fund--state
appropriation, and $1,144,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5763
(mental disorders treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) The providers for the 31 HOPE beds shall be paid a $1,000 base
payment per bed per month, and reimbursed for the remainder of the bed
cost only when the beds are occupied.
(9) Within funding provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures. The
department shall adjust adoption support benefits to account for the
availability of the new federal adoption support tax credit for special
needs children. The department shall report annually by October 1st to
the appropriate committees of the legislature on the specific efforts
taken to contain costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,078,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,693,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,122,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,098,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,453,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,528,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,972,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $695,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation is provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $6,065,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts
provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county
impacts associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
and shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $1,204,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,204,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $5,262,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation are provided solely to implement
community juvenile accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws
of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection
may be used solely for community juvenile accountability grants,
administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the
grants.
(4) $2,544,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely to implement alcohol and
substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders.
(5) For the purposes of a pilot project, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall provide a block grant, rather than
categorical funding, for consolidated juvenile services, community
juvenile accountability act grants, the chemically dependent
disposition alternative, and the special sex offender disposition
alternative to the Pierce county juvenile court. To evaluate the
effect of decategorizing funding for youth services, the juvenile court
shall do the following:
(a) Develop intermediate client outcomes according to the risk
assessment tool (RAT) currently used by juvenile courts and in
coordination with the juvenile rehabilitation administration;
(b) Track the number of youth participating in each type of
service, intermediate outcomes, and the incidence of recidivism within
twenty-four months of completion of services;
(c) Track similar data as in (b) of this subsection with an
appropriate comparison group, selected in coordination with the
juvenile rehabilitation administration and the family policy council;
(d) Document the process for managing block grant funds on a
quarterly basis, and provide this report to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the family policy council; and
(e) Provide a process evaluation to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the family policy council by June 20, 2006, and a
concluding report by June 30, 2007. The court shall develop this
evaluation in consultation with the juvenile rehabilitation
administration, the family policy council, and the Washington state
institute for public policy.
(6) $245,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $491,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to reimburse counties for local
juvenile disposition alternatives implemented pursuant to Senate Bill
No. 5502 (juvenile sentencing) and Senate Bill No. 5719 (community
commitment). The juvenile rehabilitation administration, in
consultation with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an
equitable distribution formula for the funding provided in this
subsection, and negotiate contracts that would avoid the cost of a
youth kept in the community costing more than serving the youth in a
juvenile rehabilitation institution and parole program on an average
daily population basis. The juvenile rehabilitation administration may
adjust the funding level provided in this subsection in the event that
utilization rates of the disposition alternatives are lower than the
level anticipated by the total appropriation to the juvenile
rehabilitation administration in this section. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall report to the appropriate policy
and fiscal committees of the legislature on the use of the disposition
alternatives and revocations by December 1, 2006. If either bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,099,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $271,948,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $336,768,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,970,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $872,785,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $77,600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $77,600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for persons and services not
covered by the medicaid program. The department shall distribute these
funds among the regional support networks according to a formula that,
consistent with RCW 74.24.035(13), assures continuation of previous
levels of service in each regional support network area for persons in
the following priority order: (i) Acutely mentally ill children and
adults, including crisis and commitment services and inpatient
treatment; (ii) chronically mentally ill adults and severely
emotionally disturbed children, including personal and residential
care; and (iii) seriously disturbed children and adults.
(b) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(c) Within funds appropriated in this subsection, the department
shall contract with the Clark county regional support network for
development and operation of a project demonstrating collaborative
methods for providing intensive mental health services in the school
setting for severely emotionally disturbed children who are medicaid
eligible. Project services are to be delivered by teachers and
teaching assistants who qualify as, or who are under the supervision
of, mental health professionals meeting the requirements of chapter
275-57 WAC. The department shall increase medicaid payments to the
regional support network by the amount necessary to cover the necessary
and allowable costs of the demonstration, not to exceed the upper
payment limit specified for the regional support network in the
department's medicaid waiver agreement with the federal government
after meeting all other medicaid spending requirements assumed in this
subsection. The regional support network shall provide the required
nonfederal share of the increased medicaid payment provided for
operation of this project.
(d) $3,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to establish a base community
psychiatric hospitalization payment rate of $400 per indigent patient
day and $550 per medicaid patient day at hospitals that accept
commitments under the involuntary treatment act. The department shall
allocate these funds among the regional support networks to reflect
projected expenditures at the enhanced payment level by hospital and
region.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,637,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,212,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,610,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,165,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $382,624,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The mental health program at Western state hospital shall
continue to use labor provided by the Tacoma prerelease program of the
department of corrections.
(b) The state mental hospitals may use funds appropriated in this
subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(c) $3,950,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to operate at least one more
forensic ward at western state hospital than was operational in
December 2005, and to employ professional staff in addition to those
assigned in December 2005 to conduct outpatient evaluations of
competency to stand trial.
(d) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood on September 1 of each year for police services provided by
the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.

(3) CIVIL COMMITMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,837,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,383,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,220,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $567,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $915,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,167,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,649,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $178,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $221,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to develop
and to train community mental health staff in the use of the integrated
chemical dependency/mental health screening and assessment system and
tool required by Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental disorders treatment). If
Senate Bill No. 5763 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, these amounts
shall lapse.

(5) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,553,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,431,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,529,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,513,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $125,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006, $125,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and $164,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the institute for public
policy to continue the longitudinal analysis directed in chapter 334,
Laws of 2001 (mental health performance audit), and, to the extent
funds are available within these amounts, to build upon the evaluation
of the impacts of chapter 214, Laws of 1999 (mentally ill offenders).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $298,685,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $311,177,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $503,915,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $904,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,114,681,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $213,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $422,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $600,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase wages for workers employed by agency home
care providers. The amounts in this subsection also include the funds
needed for the employer share of unemployment and social security taxes
on the amount of the increase.
(b) The entire health services account appropriation and $904,000
of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for
health care benefits for agency home care workers who are employed
through state contracts for at least twenty hours a week. Home care
agencies may obtain coverage either through the basic health plan or
through an alternative plan that provides substantially equivalent
benefits.
(c) Any new funding for family support and high school transition
along with a portion of existing funding for these programs shall be
provided as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental
payments for persons with developmental disabilities in families with
taxable incomes at or below 150 percent of median family income.
Individuals receiving family support or high school transition payments
shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510
due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.
(d) The department may transfer funding provided in this subsection
to meet the purposes of subsection (2) of this section to the extent
that fewer residents of residential habilitation centers choose to move
to community placements than was assumed in this appropriation.
(e) $822,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $719,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $1,540,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims and meeting
the terms of the settlement agreement in the consolidated lawsuits,
Boyle v. Braddock, United States District Court Western District of
Washington at Tacoma, Cause No. C01-5687 FDB and The Arc of Washington
v. Quasim, et al., United States District Court Western District of
Washington at Tacoma, Cause No. C-99-5577 FDB, covering waiver
services. The expenditure of these amounts is contingent on the
approval of the parties' settlement agreement by the federal district
court and the issuance of a court order staying all waiver claims in
both cases until at least April 1, 2008.
(f) $549,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,593,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $2,142,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for community residential and support
services. Funding in this subsection shall be prioritized for (i)
residents of residential habilitation centers who are able to be
adequately cared for in community settings and who choose to live in
those community settings; (ii) clients without residential services who
are at immediate risk of institutionalization or in crisis; (iii)
children who are aging out of other state services; and (iv) current
home and community-based waiver program clients who have been assessed
as having an immediate need for increased services. The department
shall ensure that the average cost per day for all program services
other than start-up costs shall not exceed $300. In order to maximize
the number of clients served and ensure the cost-effectiveness of the
waiver programs, the department will strive to limit new client
placement expenditures to 90 percent of the budgeted daily rate. If
this can be accomplished, additional clients may be served with excess
funds provided the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not
exceed the amounts estimated. The department shall electronically
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, within 45 days
following each fiscal year quarter, the number of persons served with
these additional community services, where they were residing, what
kinds of services they were receiving prior to placement, and the
actual expenditures for all community services to support these
clients.
(g) $356,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,012,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $1,368,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for expanded community services for
persons with developmental disabilities who also have community
protection issues. Funding in this subsection shall be prioritized for
(i) clients being diverted or discharged from the state psychiatric
hospitals; (ii) clients participating in the dangerous mentally ill
offender program; (iii) clients participating in the community
protection program; and (iv) mental health crisis diversion
outplacements. The department shall ensure that the average cost per
day for all program services other than start-up costs shall not exceed
$300. In order to maximize the number of clients served and ensure the
cost-effectiveness of the waiver programs, the department will strive
to limit new client placement expenditures to 90 percent of the
budgeted daily rate. If this can be accomplished, additional clients
may be served with excess funds if the total projected carry-forward
expenditures do not exceed the amounts estimated. The department shall
implement the four new waiver programs such that decisions about
enrollment levels and the amount, duration, and scope of services
maintain expenditures within appropriations. The department shall
electronically report to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
within 45 days following each fiscal year quarter, the number of
persons served with these additional community services, where they
were residing, what kinds of services they were receiving prior to
placement, and the actual expenditures for all community services to
support these clients.
(h) $698,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,537,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $745,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are to be provided solely for employment and day
services. Priority consideration for this new funding shall be young
adults with developmental disabilities living with their family who
need employment opportunities and assistance after high school
graduation. Services shall be provided proportionately between waiver
and nonwaiver clients.
(i) The department shall provide a status report on the
implementation and operation of the four home and community-based
waivers. The department shall electronically report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature, within 45 days following each fiscal
year quarter through June 30, 2007, the following information for each
home and community-based waiver: Total projected state and federal
fiscal year expenditures, year-to-date actual expenditures compared to
projected expenditures, year-to-date unduplicated clients compared to
projected clients, actual average per capita costs compared to
projected per capita costs, number of transfers between waivers, amount
of emergency funds spent to date compared to projected emergency costs,
state and federal funds transferred from the medicaid personal care
program to the four home and community-based waiver programs, and the
year-to-date number of new clients added to a waiver program.
(j) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $2,000,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided for implementation of the administrative
rate standardization. These amounts are in addition to any vendor rate
increase adopted by the legislature.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,974,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,569,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,996,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,992,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $305,531,000

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,236,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,556,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,062,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,854,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $300,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation fiscal year 2006 is provided solely for the purposes of
meeting the terms of the settlement agreement in regards to the award
of attorneys fees in the consolidated lawsuits, Boyle v. Braddock,
United States District Court Western District of Washington at Tacoma,
Cause No. C01-5687 FDB and The Arc of Washington v. Quasim, et al.,
United States District Court Western District of Washington at Tacoma,
Cause No. C-99-5577 FDB, covering waiver services. The expenditure of
these amounts is contingent on the approval of the parties' settlement
agreement by the federal district court and the issuance of a court
order staying all waiver claims in both cases until at least April 1,
2008. The total settlement costs shall not exceed the amount provided
in this subsection.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,597,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,605,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $603,658,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $622,812,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,264,263,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,788,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,888,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,514,409,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire health services account appropriation, $610,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006, $610,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and
$5,552,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for health care benefits for agency home care workers who are
employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours a week.
Home care agencies may obtain coverage either through the basic health
plan or through an alternative plan that provides substantially
equivalent benefits.
(2) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $149.03 for
fiscal year 2006 and shall not exceed $153.83 for fiscal year 2007.
(3) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue certificates of capital authorization that result in up to $16
million of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in
fiscal year 2006; up to $16 million of increased asset value completed
and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2007; and up to $16 million of
increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year
2008.
(4) Adult day health services shall not be considered a duplication
of services for persons receiving care in long-term care settings
licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW.
(5) In accordance with chapter 74.39 RCW, the department may
implement two medicaid waiver programs for persons who do not qualify
for such services as categorically needy, subject to federal approval
and the following conditions and limitations:
(a) One waiver program shall include coverage of care in community
residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver shall not exceed 600
persons at any time.
(b) The second waiver program shall include coverage of in-home
care. Enrollment in this second waiver shall not exceed 200 persons at
any time.
(c) The department shall identify the number of medically needy
nursing home residents, and enrollment and expenditures on each of the
two medically needy waivers, on monthly management reports.
(d) If it is necessary to establish a waiting list for either
waiver because the budgeted number of enrollment opportunities has been
reached, the department shall track how the long-term care needs of
applicants assigned to the waiting list are met.
(6) $1,413,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $2,887,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $4,305,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase compensation for workers
employed by agency home care providers. The amounts in this subsection
also include the funds needed for the employer share of unemployment
and social security taxes on the amount of the increase.
(7) $1,786,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,814,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
chore services program.
(8) The department shall establish waiting lists to the extent
necessary to assure that annual expenditures on the community options
program entry systems (COPES) program do not exceed appropriated
levels. In establishing and managing any such waiting list, the
department shall assure priority access to persons with the greatest
unmet needs, as determined by department assessment processes.
(9) $550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $125,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for a pilot project under which the long-term care
program will partner with a mental health regional support network to
provide integrated care through a nursing home-licensed facility that
specializes in caring for people with chronic mental illness. Under
the partnership, the regional support network shall provide funding for
basic residential care and supervision, and pilot project funds shall
pay for nursing and other specialized services.
(10) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the senior farmer's market
nutrition program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $477,660,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $487,401,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,238,360,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,466,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,234,887,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $273,333,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006, $273,333,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007, and $1,020,292,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst
program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the
department shall:
(a) Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are
designed to achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW
74.08A.410. Valid outcome measures of job retention and wage
progression shall be developed and reported quarterly to appropriate
fiscal and policy committees of the legislature for families who leave
assistance, measured after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months. The
department shall also report the percentage of families who have
returned to temporary assistance for needy families after 12 months, 24
months, and 36 months; and
(b) Submit a report by October 1, 2005, to the fiscal committees of
the legislature containing a spending plan for the WorkFirst program.
The plan shall identify how spending levels in the 2005-2007 biennium
will be adjusted to stay within available federal grant levels and the
appropriated state-fund levels.
(2) $75,833,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $74,358,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for cash assistance and other
services to recipients in the general assistance--unemployable program.
Within these amounts, the department may expend funds for services that
assist recipients to reduce their dependence on public assistance,
provided that expenditures for these services and cash assistance do
not exceed the funds provided.
(3) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $10,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a subsidy rate increase for
child care providers. Of this amount, $500,000 per year shall be
targeted for child care providers in urban areas of region 1.
(4) $277,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for school readiness assistance
activities.
(5)(a) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006, and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement a
child care career and wage ladder program. The child care career and
wage ladder shall provide increased wages for child care workers based
on their work experience, level of responsibility, and education. To
the extent practicable within available funds, the program shall be
modeled after the child care career and wage ladder program in place
from 2000 to 2003. Licensed child care centers may be eligible only if
they meet the following criteria: (i) At least ten percent of child
care slots are dedicated to children whose care is subsidized by the
state, local government, or any political subdivision; (ii) they agree
to adopt the child care career and wage ladder, which, at a minimum,
shall be at the same pay schedule as existed in the previous child care
career and wage ladder pilot project; and (iii) they meet further
program standards as established by rule. Since available funds may
not be sufficient to allow all qualifying child care centers to
participate, the department shall develop a system for prioritizing
child care centers interested in adopting the child care career and
wage ladder.
(b) Child care centers meeting the criteria established in this
subsection (5) that are located in the urban areas of the department of
social and health services region one shall receive a minimum of
fifteen percent of funds allocated through the child care career and
wage ladder, and of these centers, child care centers that are
participating in the department's Spokane tiered reimbursement pilot
project shall have first priority for child care career and wage ladder
funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,546,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,114,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,385,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $626,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,500,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,988,000
Problem Gambling Treatment Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,080,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $304,739,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $966,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $966,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the parent child assistance
program. The department shall contract with the University of
Washington and community-based providers in Spokane and Yakima for the
provision of this program. For all contractors, indirect charges for
administering the program shall not exceed ten percent of the total
contract amount.
(2) The department shall expand services in southwestern Washington
to pregnant and parenting women, including additional residential
capacity and expanding the parent-child assistance program.
(3) $10,391,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $19,991,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $16,017,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for expansion of chemical dependency
treatment to medicaid-eligible adults and youth under 200 percent of
federal poverty level, as required by Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental
disorders treatment). If Senate Bill No. 5763 is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $2,160,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $4,522,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for pilot programs as required by
Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental disorders treatment). If Senate Bill No.
5763 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $159,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $140,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $161,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for development of the integrated chemical
dependency/mental health screening and assessment tool required by
Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental disorders treatment), and associated
training and quality assurance. If Senate Bill No. 5763 is not enacted
by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $465,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,224,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, $1,592,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation, and $846,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation are provided solely for vendor rate
adjustments for residential treatment providers. To the extent that a
portion of this funding is sufficient to maintain sufficient
residential treatment capacity, remaining amounts may then be used to
provide vendor rate adjustments to other types of providers as
prioritized by the department in order to maintain or increase
treatment capacity.
(7) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for vendor rate adjustments for
residential treatment providers to expand capacity for chemical
dependency services as required under Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental
disorders treatment). If Senate Bill No. 5763 is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $1,500,000 of the problem gambling treatment account
appropriation is provided solely for the program established in RCW
43.20A.890. If legislation creating the account is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,474,131,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,585,376,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,022,745,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $639,715,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,738,967,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, $6,000,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental
payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The
public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the
required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the
payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules.
It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental
to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated
and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the
legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall
not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues
retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments.
(2) $1,660,000 of the health services account appropriation,
$4,361,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation, $1,350,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006, and
$1,351,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2007 are provided solely for grants to rural hospitals. The department
shall distribute the funds under a formula that provides a relatively
larger share of the available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a
disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients
and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the extent
allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(3) $22,081,000 of the health services account appropriation and
$20,714,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided
solely for grants to nonrural hospitals. The department shall
distribute the funds under a formula that provides a relatively larger
share of the available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a
disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients
and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the extent
allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(4) In response to the federal directive to eliminate
intergovernmental transfer transactions effective June 30, 2005, the
department is directed to implement the inpatient hospital certified
public expenditures program for the 2005-07 biennium. The program
shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated
by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals.
Hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain (a) one hundred
percent of the federal portion of each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by the medical assistance administration; and (b)
one hundred percent of the federal portion of the maximum
disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal
regulations. Medicaid fee-for-service claim amounts shall be
established by applying the department's ratio of costs to charges
payment methodology. The department shall provide participating
hospitals with the information needed by the hospital to certify the
public expenditures required to qualify for the federal portions of
both the medicaid inpatient fee-for-service payments and the
disproportionate share hospital payments. The legislature intends that
hospitals in the program receive no less in combined state and federal
payments than they would have received under the methodology that was
in place during fiscal year 2005. The department shall therefore make
additional grant payments, not to exceed the amounts provided in this
subsection, to hospitals whose total payments under the program would
otherwise be less than the total state and federal payments they would
have received under the methodology in effect during fiscal year 2005.
$37,034,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2006, $37,552,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, $8,300,000 of the emergency medical services and trauma care
systems trust account--state appropriation, and $45,450,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for new state
grant and upper payment limit programs for the participating hospitals.
(5) $3,972,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $3,990,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $63,279,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
a replacement system for the existing medicaid management information
system.
(6) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $225,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to contract for an independent
analysis of the medical assistance administration's current system for
establishing hospital inpatient payment rates, and for recommendations
on a new or updated system. The department shall submit an interim
report of study findings by December 1, 2005, and a final report by
November 15, 2006. The interim report shall include a comparison of
the strengths and weaknesses of the current rate-setting system
relative to those used by other state, federal, and private payers.
The final report shall include recommendations on the design and
implementation of a new or updated system that will promote equity
among hospitals, access to quality care for patients, and cost-control
and efficiency for taxpayers. The study should make use of complete
and current cost data from a wide variety of hospitals, recognize
unique aspects of hospital service delivery structures and medicaid
payment systems in Washington, and provide opportunities for comment
and participation by key interest groups in the identification and
assessment of alternatives.
(7) Payment rates for hospital inpatient and outpatient services
shall be increased by an average of 1.2 percent effective September 1,
2005, and by an average of an additional 1.7 percent effective
September 1, 2006. The increases shall be provided only on the portion
of a hospital's rate that excludes medical education and outlier costs,
and shall be allocated so that hospitals with lower costs of care
(excluding medical education and outlier costs) receive larger
percentage increases than those with higher costs of care. The
increases shall be allocated in three percentage increments, with the
lowest-cost hospitals receiving the largest percentage rate increase,
highest-cost hospitals receiving the smallest percentage increase, and
medium-cost hospitals receiving the average of the highest and the
lowest percentage rate increase. Increases shall not be provided to
those hospitals that are certified as critical access. Sufficient
funds are appropriated in this section for Healthy Options contractors
to increase hospital payment rates commensurate with the increases in
fee-for-service payment rates.
(8) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the department shall
provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if
eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.
(9) The medical assistance program may use funds appropriated in
this section to purchase medical equipment and supplies through third-party purchasing groups when it is cost-effective to do so.
(10) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for
Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of
the state's health care system.
(11) By October 1, 2005, the department shall recommend to the
governor and legislature at least two pilot project designs which seem
likely to reduce avoidable emergency room utilization at no net cost to
the state within the projects' first eighteen months of operation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,110,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,432,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,051,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $440,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,786,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,819,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The division of vocational rehabilitation
shall maintain support for existing clubhouse programs at the 2003-2005
level.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,356,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,922,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,785,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $810,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,452,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,358,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,683,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild
project through the governor's juvenile justice advisory committee.
(2) $2,452,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation and $2,358,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account--state appropriation are provided solely for the
family policy council.
(3) $3,195,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $639,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $3,833,000 of the general--fund federal appropriation
are provided solely to implement the 2005-07 homecare worker collective
bargaining agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,381,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,380,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,103,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $137,864,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,723,000
State Health Care Authority Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,756,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $459,376,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $484,026,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within funds appropriated in this section and sections 205 and
206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to provide an
enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents licensed under
chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care programs.
Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents and home care
workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty
level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at the
minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(2) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals which are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
which choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(3) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
(i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or
(ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those
persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment
security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all
enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll
records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document
their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot
be obtained to document their current income at least once every six
months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by
noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation,
amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United
States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil
penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as
provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(4) $24,108,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
is provided solely for funding for health care services provided
through local community clinics.
(5) $316,000 of the health services account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5064 (electronic
medical records). If Senate Bill No. 5064 is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $391,000 of the health services account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5471 (drug
purchasing consortium). If Senate Bill No. 5471 is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,484,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,457,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,872,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,813,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The commission shall submit a report by
December 1st of each year to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees detailing any changes in existing federal
revenues for the remainder of the current fiscal year and changes in
projections of federal revenue for the upcoming fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE
APPEALS
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,135,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,134,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,289,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,240,000 of accident account--state
appropriation and $1,240,000 of medical aid account--state
appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5789 (expanding the role of self-insurers in the workers'
compensation system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amounts provided shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,433,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Public Benefit Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,191,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $150,000 of the public benefit account--state appropriation is
provided solely to expand training for prosecuting attorneys. If
Senate Bill No. 5287 (social card games) is not enacted by June 30,
2005, then the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) During the 2005-2007 biennium, the criminal justice training
commission is authorized to raise existing fees charged for firearms
certification for bail bond recovery agents in excess of the fiscal
growth factor established by Initiative Measure No. 601, if necessary,
to meet the actual costs of conducting the certification program and
the appropriation levels in this section.
(3) $250,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs to experiment with the use of cognitive
recognition technologies in law enforcement and pretrial environments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,898,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,814,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,503,000
Public Safety and Education Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $782,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,183,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,732,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,571,000
Family Leave Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,107,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $199,312,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,616,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $197,918,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,180,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,560,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,089,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $522,293,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall delay the costs associated with
implementation of phase II of its indirect cost allocation plan for the
public works administration account until July 1, 2007.
(2) $700,000 of accident account--state appropriation and $699,000
of medical aid account--state appropriation are provided solely to
implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5237 (mandatory electronic data
reporting for workers' compensation self-insurers). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(3) $15,107,000 of family leave account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5069 (family leave insurance). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $114,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $88,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5773 (homeowner protections). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $48,000 of electrical license account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5307 (amusement rides).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $158,000 of accident account--state appropriation and $158,000
of medical aid account--state appropriation are provided solely to
implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5614 (annual audits of the state
industrial insurance fund). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $12,000 of accident account--state appropriation and $12,000 of
medical aid account--state appropriation are provided solely to
implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5992 (modifying self-insurer
assessments under the second injury fund). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $1,664,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,665,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, $23,502,000 of the public safety and education
account--state appropriation, and $10,000,000 of the public safety and
education account--federal appropriation are provided solely for the
crime victims' compensation program, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Reimbursement shall be provided throughout the 2005-2007
biennium for full reimbursement of sexual assault forensic exams at
workers' compensation rates; and
(b) In accordance with RCW 7.68.015, it is the policy of the state
that the department of labor and industries operate the crime victims'
compensation program within the amounts provided for this program in
this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW
BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,060,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,055,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,873,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,807,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,690,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $70,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for
implementation of Senate Bill No. 5539 (veterans conservation corps).
If Senate Bill No. 5539 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, these amounts
shall lapse.

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,750,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,730,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $318,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,943,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,741,000

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,210,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,435,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,799,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,454,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,898,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,408,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,576,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,034,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,018,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,142,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,741,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,484,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,661,000
Hospital Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,553,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,644,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,567,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,838,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,969,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,083,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,502,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,756,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,752,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,806,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,306,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $266,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,915,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,621,000
Public Benefit Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $864,578,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department or any successor agency is authorized to raise
existing fees charged for the clandestine drug lab program, the
drinking water program, radioactive materials license fees, X-ray
facility registration fees, shellfish commercial paralytic shellfish
poisoning fees, the water recreation program, the wastewater management
program, and the midwifery program, in excess of the fiscal growth
factor established by Initiative Measure No. 601, if necessary, to meet
the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in
this section.
(2) $1,713,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2006
appropriation, $1,713,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2007
appropriation, and $676,000 of the general fund--local appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound
conservation and recovery plan and agency action items, DOH-01, DOH-02,
DOH-03, and DOH-04.
(3) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive,
and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not
anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require
expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated
unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services
authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(4) $383,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $317,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $676,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation are provided solely to assist counties in marine areas
complete on-site sewage system management plans and electronic data
bases to inventory on-site sewage systems.
(5) $200,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for a grant to the central nursing resource center
established pursuant to Senate Bill No. 5599 (nursing resource center),
including reasonable department costs for administration of the grant.
The amount provided in this subsection shall be from that portion of
the health professions account attributable to the nursing licensing
program under chapter 18.79 RCW. The grant shall be awarded by
September 1, 2005, to a not-for-profit central nursing resource center.
The center awarded the grant must meet the criteria specified in Senate
Bill No. 5599, and the grant must be used for the purposes specified
therein. If Senate Bill No. 5599 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $79,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $79,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to enhance the department's
capacity to identify and track the incidence and costs of hepatitis C
infection.
(7) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to develop and implement best practices in
preventative health care for children. The department and the kids get
care program of public health - Seattle and King county will work in
collaboration with local health care agencies to disseminate strategic
interventions that are focused on evidence-based best practices for
improving health outcomes in children and saving health-care costs.
(8) $1,000,000 of the public benefit account appropriation is
provided solely to expand the breast and cervical cancer screening
program. If Senate Bill No. 5287 (taxation of social card rooms) is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,271,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,077,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,656,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,030,000

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,512,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $525,934,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,422,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,984,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,042,852,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) For the acquisition of properties and facilities, the
department of corrections is authorized to enter into financial
contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the purposes
indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.
This authority applies to the following: Lease-develop with the option
to purchase or lease-purchase work release beds in facilities
throughout the state for $8,561,000.
(b) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as recovery
of costs.
(c) The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership
program at the Washington corrections center for women at a level at
least equal to that provided in the 1995-97 biennium.
(d) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(e) During the 2005-07 biennium, when contracts are established or
renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to
inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,398,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,632,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,989,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $176,019,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall accomplish personnel
reductions with the least possible impact on correctional custody
staff, community custody staff, and correctional industries. For the
purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff means employees
responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,298,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $728,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,026,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $110,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for
transfer to the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts
provided only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and
technical assistance associated with advising cities and counties in
developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient
offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,565,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,564,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,129,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE
BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,872,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,897,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,080,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,929,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $846,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $835,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,681,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $257,246,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,964,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $202,817,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,629,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,830,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $529,523,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,087,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from funds made available to
the state by section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed Act).
These funds are provided to replace obsolete information technology
infrastructure.
(2) $12,734,556 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from funds made available to
the state by section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed Act).
These funds are authorized for state choice administrative functions.
The department shall submit recommendations by September 1, 2007, to
the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees for options reducing the costs of the state choice
administrative functions for the 2007-2009 biennium. If these options
require any statutory changes, the department shall submit agency
request legislation to the appropriate legislative policy committees
and fiscal committees by December 15, 2007.
(3) $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No.
5551 (studying the minimum wage). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) The appropriations in this section provide funding to implement
House Bill No. 2255 (making adjustments to improve benefit equity in
the unemployment insurance system).
(5) $9,016,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from funds made available to
the state by section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed Act).
These funds are authorized to provide fraud detection and collection,
employer outreach, correction clearinghouse activities, and labor
market information.

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $466,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $469,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $845,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,780,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,964,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,756,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,286,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,225,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,531,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,042,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,531,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,789,000
State Drought Preparedness Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $157,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving
Account (Water Supply Facilities) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $342,000
Vessel Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,876,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $637,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,400,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $357,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,053,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,244,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,089,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,969,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,794,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $815,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,963,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,103,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,255,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,507,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,519,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,078,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $393,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,913,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $379,992,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,526,196 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $2,526,195 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, $366,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation,
$2,581,000 of the state toxics account -- state appropriation, $540,806
of the water quality account -- state appropriation, $3,748,220 of the
water quality permit account -- state appropriation, and $705,000 of the
oil spill prevention account are provided solely for the implementation
of the Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action
items DOE-01, DOE-02, DOE-04, DOE-06, DOE-07, DOE-08, and DOE-09.
(2) $4,054,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is
provided solely for methamphetamine lab clean-up activities.
(3) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the Puget Sound conservation and
recovery plan action item UW-02 through a contract with the University
of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(4) $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for shoreline grants to local
governments to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6012 (shoreline
management), chapter 262, Laws of 2003.
(5) Fees approved by the department of ecology in the 2005-07
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(6) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to support water measurement and
water storage components of the Columbia River Initiative Program.
(7) $661,000 of the state and local improvements revolving
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill
No. 1939 or Senate Bill No. 5831 (well construction fees). If neither
bill is enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(8) The department shall make recommendations to improve, change,
or eliminate monitoring activities that impact performance measures
related to salmon recovery and watershed health. The department shall
coordinate with the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health
and consult with the office of financial management in determining the
scope and contents of this report.
In preparing these recommendations, the department shall prepare a
report detailing all new activity and updating all previously
identified activity within the comprehensive monitoring strategy with
a focus on salmon recovery and watershed health related monitoring
activity within the agency. At minimum, the report shall include
sufficient detail identifying the specific salmon recovery and
watershed health monitoring activity being performed and include:
Precise costs by fund source, a narrative stating why it is required,
when the activity started, the frequency of data collection, and
geographic location of data being collected. Furthermore, the agency
shall also provide sufficient detail that describes the purpose of each
monitoring activity, who uses the information, how often it is
accessed, where the information is stored, and the current status and
cost, by fund source, of the data storage systems housing each
monitoring activity identified within the agency.
The department shall provide a status report summarizing progress
to the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health and the
office of financial management by March 1, 2006. A final report to the
governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health, the office of
financial management, and legislative fiscal committees is due no later
than September 1, 2006.
(9) $462,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, and $462,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5431 (on-site sewage/marine areas). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(10) $509,000 of the freshwater aquatic algae control account--state is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5699
(aquatic invasive species). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $153,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, and $144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5278 (ocean policy review commission). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(12) $261,000 of the state toxic control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5515 (brominated flame retardants). From within these
funds, the department shall determine expenditures related to
persistent bioaccumulative toxins (PBTs) by fund source and fiscal year
over the past six fiscal years and report these findings to the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature. The report shall
also estimate the need for future funding related to PBTs and recommend
possible reductions in lower priority agency programs sufficient to pay
for the needed funding for PBTs. If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $200,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract with the state
conservation commission to provide statewide coordination and support
for coordinated resource management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,389,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,212,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,697,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,092,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $189,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,797,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $340,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,811,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,893,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in
the 2005-07 biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor
under RCW 43.135.055.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $191,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound
conservation and recovery plan and agency action item PRC-02.
(4) $59,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $26,000 of the parks renewal and
stewardship account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are
provided solely to develop a plan for public education and tourist
orientation and interpretation at selected state park sites along the
route of the ice age floods from Spokane to the Pacific ocean.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,410,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,341,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $254,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Firearms Range Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,006,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $809,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,694,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $16,025,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the forest and fish agreement
rules. These funds will be passed through to the department of natural
resources and the department of fish and wildlife.
(2) The committee shall make recommendations to improve, change, or
eliminate monitoring activities that impact performance measures
related to salmon recovery and watershed health. The committee shall
coordinate with the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health
and consult with the office of financial management in determining the
scope and contents of this report.
In preparing these recommendations, the committee shall prepare a
report detailing all new activity and updating all previously
identified activity within the comprehensive monitoring strategy with
a focus on salmon recovery and watershed health related monitoring
activity within the agency. At minimum, the report shall include
sufficient detail identifying the specific salmon recovery and
watershed health monitoring activity being performed and include:
Precise costs by fund source, a narrative stating why it is required,
when the activity started, the frequency of data collection, and
geographic location of data being collected. Furthermore, the agency
shall also provide sufficient detail that describes the purpose of each
monitoring activity, who uses the information, how often it is
accessed, where the information is stored, and the current status and
cost, by fund source, of the data storage systems housing each
monitoring activity identified within the agency.
The committee shall provide a status report summarizing progress to
the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health and the office
of financial management by March 1, 2006. A final report to the
governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health, the office of
financial management, and legislative fiscal committees is due no later
than September 1, 2006.
(3) During the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, any county that purchased
land before 1978 for off-road vehicle sports park recreation pursuant
to 1972 ex.s. c 153 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 34 may discharge its
contractual obligations for state-funded capital improvements on those
lands if it sells on the open market not later than June 30, 2007, at
the highest price achievable, all such lands and related facilities and
equipment. After deducting reasonable expenses for the cost of sale,
all remaining funds will be deposited within thirty days of closing to
the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account in the
office of the state treasurer. Any funds derived from such sale shall
be used solely for the benefit of motorized off-road vehicle recreation
programs and facilities in areas west of the crest of the Cascade
Mountains with preference for developing a new off-road vehicle sports
park, and with the review and advice of the nonhighway and off-road
vehicle activities advisory committee.
(4) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the biodiversity strategy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,040,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,033,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,073,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,379,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,387,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,019,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,785,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $197,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $197,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action item CC-01.
(2) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1462
or Senate Bill No. 5010, relating to funding for conservation
districts. If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) The commission shall make recommendations to improve, change,
or eliminate monitoring activities that impact performance measures
related to salmon recovery and watershed health. The commission shall
coordinate with the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health
and consult with the office of financial management in determining the
scope and contents of this report.
In preparing these recommendations, the commission shall prepare a
report detailing all new activity and updating all previously
identified activity within the comprehensive monitoring strategy with
a focus on salmon recovery and watershed health related monitoring
activity within the agency. At minimum, the report shall include
sufficient detail identifying the specific salmon recovery and
watershed health monitoring activity being performed and include:
Precise costs by fund source, a narrative stating why it is required,
when the activity started, the frequency of data collection, and
geographic location of data being collected. Furthermore, the agency
shall also provide sufficient detail that describes the purpose of each
monitoring activity, who uses the information, how often it is
accessed, where the information is stored, and the current status and
cost, by fund source, of the data storage systems housing each
monitoring activity identified within the agency.
The commission shall provide a status report summarizing progress
to the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health and the
office of financial management by March 1, 2006. A final report to the
governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health, the office of
financial management, and legislative fiscal committees is due no later
than September 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,030,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,012,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,359,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,329,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $387,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,710,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,481,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,839,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,371,000
Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,250,000
Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,296,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,119,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,799,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $458,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery
Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,754,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,010,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $411,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $294,166,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,556,714 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,556,713 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action items DFW-01 through DFW-06, DFW-08 through DFW-12, and DFW-16.
(2) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(3) The department shall support the activities of the aquatic
nuisance species coordination committee to foster state, federal,
tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues.
The committee shall strive to prevent the introduction of nonnative
aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species that are
introduced.
(4) The department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to
protection of fish habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and
steelhead. Within the amount provided for the agency, the department
shall provide support to the department of health to enforce state
shellfish harvest laws.
(5) $180,000 of the wildlife account -- state appropriation is
provided solely to test deer and elk for chronic wasting disease and to
document the extent of swan lead poisoning. Of this amount, $65,000 is
provided solely to document the extent of swan lead poisoning and to
begin environmental cleanup.
(6) The department shall provide quarterly status reports to the
office of financial management regarding the replacement of the
Washington interactive licensing system and the implementation of the
hydraulic permit management system.
(7) Prior to the department entering into any agreement relating to
the disposal, sale, lease, or transfer of property identified within
the 2003 legislatively authorized report "Thurston county property
functions, operations & valuations analysis," the department shall
notify the director of financial management and the chairs of the
senate committee on ways and means, the house of representatives
committee on appropriations, and the house of representatives capital
budget committee.
(8) The department shall prepare a report detailing the hydraulic
permit approval program applications and project types. The department
shall coordinate with the office of financial management in determining
the contents of the report. At minimum, the report shall include
permits by applicant (name, state, local, federal, tribal entity,
etc.), project type (pamphlet, minor, medium, major, extension,
revision, etc.) and project location (county and water resource
inventory area). The department shall submit the report to the office
of financial management and legislative fiscal committees no later than
September 1, 2006.
(9) $1,900,000 of the state wildlife account--state is provided
solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5234 (expanding hunter access to
private lands). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) The department shall make recommendations to improve, change,
or eliminate monitoring activities that impact performance measures
related to salmon recovery and watershed health. The department shall
coordinate with the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health
and consult with the office of financial management in determining the
scope and contents of this report.
In preparing these recommendations, the department shall prepare a
report detailing all new activity and updating all previously
identified activity within the comprehensive monitoring strategy with
a focus on salmon recovery and watershed health related monitoring
activity within the agency. At minimum, the report shall include
sufficient detail identifying the specific salmon recovery and
watershed health monitoring activity being performed and include:
Precise costs by fund source, a narrative stating why it is required,
when the activity started, the frequency of data collection, and
geographic location of data being collected. Furthermore, the agency
shall also provide sufficient detail that describes the purpose of each
monitoring activity, who uses the information, how often it is
accessed, where the information is stored, and the current status and
cost, by fund source, of the data storage systems housing each
monitoring activity identified within the agency.
The department shall provide a status report summarizing progress
to the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health and the
office of financial management by March 1, 2006. A final report to the
governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health, the office of
financial management, and legislative fiscal committees is due no later
than September 1, 2006.
(11) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for a grant to the grizzly bear outreach
project to disseminate accurate information about grizzly bears and the
grizzly bear recovery process in the north Cascades mountains.
(12) $375,000 of the freshwater aquatic algae control account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $375,000 of the freshwater
aquatic algae control account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007
are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5699 (preventing and
controlling aquatic invasive species and algae). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subjection shall
lapse.
(13) $703,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to purchase six purse seine and three gill
net licenses to meet the provisions of the United States/Canada salmon
treaty.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,643,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,135,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,073,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,257,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,909,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,796,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,301,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,226,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,542,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,791,000
Disaster Response Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,554,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $647,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,155,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $540,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,132,000
Agricultural College Trust Management
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,903,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $268,638,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $1,652,050 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action items DNR-01 and
DNR-02.
(2) $953,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $950,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(3) $10,700,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $16,570,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $4,000,000 of the disaster response account -- state appropriation are provided solely for emergency fire suppression.
Of these amounts, up to $250,000 may be expended for staff and other
necessary resources to design and implement a fire data-collection
system that includes financial- and performance-management information
for fires over 10 acres in size.
None of the general fund and disaster response account amounts
provided in this subsection may be used to fund agency indirect and
administrative expenses. Agency indirect and administrative costs
shall be allocated among the agency's remaining accounts and
appropriations.
(4) $582,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for spartina control.
(5) Fees approved by the board of natural resources in the 2005-07
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(6) $9,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,000,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of settling
all claims in U.S., et al. v. State of Washington, et al.
Subproceeding No. 89-3 (Shellfish), United States District Court for
the Western District of Washington at Seattle, Case No. C70-9213. The
expenditure of this appropriation is contingent on the release of all
claims in this subproceeding. In the event that the federal government
does not appropriate $22,000,000 for this purpose by June 30, 2006, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $2,155,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to meet its obligations with the
U.S. environmental protection agency for the clean-up of Commencement
Bay and other sites.
(8) The department shall make recommendations to improve, change,
or eliminate monitoring activities that impact performance measures
related to salmon recovery and watershed health. The department shall
coordinate with the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health
and consult with the office of financial management in determining the
scope and contents of this report.
In preparing these recommendations, the department shall prepare a
report detailing all new activity and updating all previously
identified activity within the comprehensive monitoring strategy with
a focus on salmon recovery and watershed health related monitoring
activity within the agency. At minimum, the report shall include
sufficient detail identifying the specific salmon recovery and
watershed health monitoring activity being performed and include:
Precise costs by fund source, a narrative stating why it is required,
when the activity started, the frequency of data collection, and
geographic location of data being collected. Furthermore, the agency
shall also provide sufficient detail that describes the purpose of each
monitoring activity, who uses the information, how often it is
accessed, where the information is stored, and the current status and
cost, by fund source, of the data storage systems housing each
monitoring activity identified within the agency.
The department shall provide a status report summarizing progress
to the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health and the
office of financial management by March 1, 2006. A final report to the
governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health, the office of
financial management, and legislative fiscal committees is due no later
than September 1, 2006.
(9) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department
shall provide to the department of transportation and the appropriate
committees of the legislature a list of state lands within one mile of
interstate 5 and interstate 90. The report shall be submitted by
December 1, 2005.
(10) The department shall not develop the Gull Harbor facility
without first submitting a master plan to the appropriate committees of
the legislature. The plan shall ensure continued public access to the
waterfront. The plan shall also examine alternative locations to the
Gull Harbor site that would colocate marine equipment for all state
agencies needing water access in Thurston county. The report shall be
submitted by December 1, 2006.
(11) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $500,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation are provided solely for a report on the future of
Washington forests. The purpose of the report is to examine economic,
recreational, and environmental trends influencing the forest products
industry and secondary manufacturing sectors in Washington state. The
department shall contract with the University of Washington college of
forestry resources. The college shall consult with the University of
Washington economics department for the section on investment returns
from granted lands. The report shall contain the following parts:
(a) An update of the 1992 timber supply study for Washington state
that was conducted by the University of Washington. The update may be
accomplished by reviewing the most recent similar data available in
existing reports, examining a sample of the original 1992 study sample
of lands, and through other existing data sources that may reveal
relevant trends and changes since 1992.
(b) An independent assessment of the economic contribution of the
forest products industry, and secondary manufacturing sectors, to the
state. This assessment will also examine some of the macroeconomic
trends likely to affect the industry in the future.
(c) A comparison of the competitive position of Washington's forest
products industry globally, and with other leading forest products
states, or regions, of the United States. This evaluation should
compare the relative tax burden for growing and harvesting timber
between the states or regions and the relative cost of adhering to
regulations, and identify the competitive advantages of each state or
region.
(d) An assessment of the trends and dynamics that commercial and
residential development play in the conversion of the state's forests
to nonforestry uses. The assessment will involve gathering relevant
data, reviewing that data, and analyzing the relationship between
development and the conversion of forest land uses.
(e) Recommendations on: (i) Policy changes that would enhance the
competitive position of Washington's forest products industry in
Washington state; (ii) policy changes that would, to the extent
possible, ensure that a productive forest land base continues to be
managed for forest products, recreation, and environmental and other
public benefits into the future; and (iii) policy changes that would
enhance the recreational opportunities on working forest lands in the
state.
(f) Based on the information derived from (a) through (d) of this
subsection, an assessment of the expected rate of return from state
granted lands. This section of the reports shall also review reports
prepared by the department over the past ten years that describe the
investment returns from granted lands. The review of these previous
reports shall compare and critique the methodology and indicators used
to report investment returns. The review shall recommend appropriate
measures of investment returns from granted lands.
(g) Analyze and recommend policies and programs to assist Cascade
foothills area landowners and communities in developing and
implementing innovative approaches to retaining traditional forestry
while at the same time accommodating new uses that strengthen the
economic and natural benefits from forest lands. For the purposes of
this section, the Cascade foothills area generally encompasses the
nonurbanized lands within the Cascade mountain range and drainages
lying between three hundred and three thousand feet above mean sea
level, and located within Whatcom, Skagit, Snohomish, King, Pierce,
Thurston, and Lewis counties.
(12) $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to compensate the forest board
trust for a portion of the lease to the Crescent television improvement
district consistent with RCW 79.13.520.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,880,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,649,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,280,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $410,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,968,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $949,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,367,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $238,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,741,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $37,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $37,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action item WSDA-01.
(2) Fees and assessments approved by the department in the 2005-07
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(3) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department, in
addition to the authority provided in RCW 17.26.007, may enter into
agreements with federal agencies to eradicate spartina from private
lands that may provide a source of reinfestation to public lands.
(4) $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for an economic impact study of
fairs in the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY
REINSURANCE PROGRAM

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $849,000

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,532,000
Architects' License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $717,000
Cemetery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,096,000
Real Estate Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,362,000
Master License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,343,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,851,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000
Real Estate Appraiser Commission
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,326,000
Business and Professions Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,927,000
Real Estate Research Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $301,000
Funeral Directors and Embalmers
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $523,000
Geologists' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,317,000

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In accordance with RCW 43.24.086, it is
the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of each
professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. For
each licensing program covered by RCW 43.24.086, the department shall
set fees at levels sufficient to fully cover the cost of administering
the licensing program, including any costs associated with policy
enhancements funded in the 2005-07 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, during the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the department may
increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the increases
are necessary to fully fund the costs of the licensing programs.
(2) $14,000 of the professional engineers' account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5117
(land surveyors). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $180,000 of the real estate appraiser commission account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5274
(real estate appraisers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $7,927,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation is subject to enactment of Substitute House Bill No. 1394
(business and professions account). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the appropriations out of this account shall be made from the
general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,519,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,589,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,269,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $582,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,791,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,346,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $572,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,790,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,123,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,476,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Fingerprint Identification
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,120,000
DNA Data Base Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,208,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $200,000 of the fire service training
account--state appropriation is provided solely for two FTE's in the
office of state fire marshal to exclusively review K-12 construction
documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the state
building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide these
services only to those districts that are located in counties without
qualified review capabilities.

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION

(1) STATE AGENCY OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,815,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,303,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,522,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,640,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $10,621,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $10,513,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Within the
amounts provided in this subsection, the superintendent shall recognize
the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have
demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning
requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award. The
students selected for the award must demonstrate understanding through
completion of at least one of the classroom-based civics assessment
models developed by the superintendent of public instruction, and
through leadership in the civic life of their communities. The
superintendent shall select two students from eastern Washington and
two students from western Washington to receive the award, and shall
notify the governor and legislature of the names of the recipients.
(b) $428,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $428,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities.
(c) $509,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $504,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the Washington professional educator standards board. Within the
amounts provided in this subsection, the Washington professional
educator standards board shall pursue the implementation of recent
study recommendations including: (i) Revision of teacher mathematics
endorsement competencies and alignment of teacher tests to the updated
competencies; and (ii) development of mathematics specialist
endorsement. Sufficient funding is provided in this subsection to
accomplish the additional responsibilities of the professional
educators standards board under Substitute Senate Bill No. 5732
(education governance).
(d) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for maintenance and operation of a backup
to the apportionment system, which includes the processes that collect
school district budget and expenditure information, staffing
characteristics, and the student enrollments that drive the funding
process.
(e) $779,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $780,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for development and implementation
of a core student record system.
(f) $78,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $78,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to provide direct services and
support to schools around an integrated, interdisciplinary approach to
instruction in conservation, natural resources, sustainability, and
human adaptation to the environment. Specific integration efforts will
focus on science, math, and the social sciences. Integration between
basic education and career and technical education, particularly
agricultural and natural sciences education, is to be a major element.

(2) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,935,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,818,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,465,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,218,000

The appropriations in this subsection are provided solely for the
statewide programs specified in this subsection and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) A maximum of $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $2,541,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
a corps of nurses located at educational service districts, as
determined by the superintendent of public instruction, to be
dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to
students, health education, and training for school staff.
(ii) A maximum of $96,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $96,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for the school
safety center in the office of the superintendent of public instruction
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(A) The safety center shall: Disseminate successful models of
school safety plans and cooperative efforts; provide assistance to
schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan; select models of
cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as an
information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state;
coordinate activities relating to school safety; review and approve
manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training; and
develop and maintain a school safety information web site.
(B) The school safety center advisory committee shall develop a
training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all
school safety personnel.
(iii) A maximum of $100,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $100,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
a school safety training program provided by the criminal justice
training commission. The commission, in collaboration with the school
safety center advisory committee, shall provide the school safety
training for all school administrators and school safety personnel,
including school safety personnel hired after the effective date of
this section.
(iv) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
solely for the safety center advisory committee to develop and
distribute a pamphlet to promote internet safety for children,
particularly in grades seven through twelve. The pamphlet shall be
posted on the superintendent of public instruction's web site. To the
extent possible, the pamphlet shall be distributed in schools
throughout the state and in other areas accessible to youth, including
but not limited to libraries and community centers.
(v) $11,600,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for safe and drug free schools and communities grants for drug
and violence prevention activities and strategies.
(b) TECHNOLOGY
A maximum of $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for K-20
telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to
prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization
of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the
network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced
technical support for the network.
(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $787,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $799,000 of
the fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided solely for the special
services pilot projects. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall allocate these funds to the district or districts
participating in the pilot program according to the provisions of RCW
28A.630.015.
(ii) A maximum of $549,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $549,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for alternative
certification routes. Funds may be used by the professional educator
standards board to continue existing alternative-route grant programs
and to create new alternative-route programs in regions of the state
with service shortages.
(iii) A maximum of $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for operation of
the Cispus environmental learning center.
(iv) A maximum of $612,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $612,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for in-service
training and educational programs conducted by the Pacific Science
Center.
(v) A maximum of $540,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $540,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for the
Washington state leadership assistance for science education reform
(LASER) regional partnership coordinated at the Pacific Science Center.
(vi) A maximum of $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided to support
vocational student leadership organizations.
(vii) A maximum of $146,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $146,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
the Washington civil liberties education program.
(viii) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for developing and disseminating
curriculum and other materials documenting women's role in World War
II.
(ix) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers
scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support community
involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer
mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.
(x) $383,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $294,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5349 (dyslexia pilot programs).
If the bill is not enacted before June 30, 2005, the amounts provided
in this subsection shall lapse.
(xi) $1,521,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for the advanced placement fee program to increase
opportunities for low-income students and under-represented populations
to participate in advanced placement courses and to increase the
capacity of schools to provide advanced placement courses to students.
(xii) $8,292,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for comprehensive school reform demonstration projects to
provide grants to low-income schools for improving student achievement
through adoption and implementation of research-based curricula and
instructional programs.
(xiii) $19,587,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for 21st century learning center grants, providing after-school and inter-session activities for students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,188,076,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,227,953,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,416,029,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2005-06 and
2006-07 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (d) through (f) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (d)
and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (c) through
(f) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii) 49 certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-3;
(iii) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 4-12; and
(iv) An additional 4.2 certificated instructional staff units for
grades K-3 and an additional 7.2 certificated instructional staff units
for grade 4. Any funds allocated for the additional certificated units
provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be considered as basic
education funding;
(A) Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of
the amount required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established
under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the district
documents an actual ratio in grades K-4 equal to or greater than 53.2
certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent
students. For any school district documenting a lower certificated
instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff ratio
achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;
(B) Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per
one thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate
up to 1.3 of the 53.2 funding ratio to employ additional classified
instructional assistants assigned to basic education classrooms in
grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a district's staff ratio under
this section, funds used by the district to employ additional
classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual
certificated instructional staff ratio. Additional classified
instructional assistants, for the purposes of this subsection, shall be
determined using the 1989-90 school year as the base year;
(C) Any district maintaining a ratio in grades K-4 equal to or
greater than 53.2 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students may use allocations generated under this
subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of that required to maintain the
minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ
additional basic education certificated instructional staff or
classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated
under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) shall only be expended to reduce class
size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated instructional
funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants;
(b) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(c)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(B) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08
certificated administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent
vocational students;
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and
(iii) Indirect cost charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic
education and vocational enhancement allocations of state funds;
(d) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(e) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(f) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(g) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(h) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2005-06 and 2006-07
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(d) through (h) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each three certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
sixty average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
11.22 percent in the 2005-06 school year and 11.22 percent in the 2006-07 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 14.84 percent in the
2005-06 school year and 14.84 percent in the 2006-07 school year for
classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d)
through (h) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$9,112 per certificated staff unit in the 2005-06 school year and a
maximum of $9,285 per certificated staff unit in the 2006-07 school
year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $22,377 per certificated
staff unit in the 2005-06 school year and a maximum of $22,802 per
certificated staff unit in the 2006-07 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $17,362 per certificated
staff unit in the 2005-06 school year and a maximum of $17,692 per
certificated staff unit in the 2006-07 school year.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $531.09 for the 2005-06 and
2006-07 school years per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely
for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall
be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio
between the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and
the number of actual basic education certificated instructional staff
reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of $7,622,000
outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2006 and 2007
as follows:
(a) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $513,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2006
and a maximum of $523,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2007;
(b) For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of
$2,035,000 may be expended for the 2006 fiscal year and a maximum of
$2,035,000 for the 2007 fiscal year;
(c) A maximum of $365,000 may be expended for school district
emergencies;
(d) A maximum of $485,000 each fiscal year may be expended for
programs providing skills training for secondary students who are
enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at
a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in
those programs; and
(e) $394,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $787,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5717 (skills centers). If the bill is not
enacted before June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse. The funding provided in this subsection shall be used as
an incentive to encourage school districts to increase enrollment in
vocational skills centers. Up to $500 for each full-time equivalent
student may be proportionally distributed to a school district or
school districts increasing skills centers enrollment above the levels
in the 2004-05 school year. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop criteria for awarding incentive grants
pursuant to this subsection. The total amount allocated pursuant to
this subsection shall be limited to $1,181,000 for the 2005-07
biennium.
(10) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student is 5.2 percent from the 2004-05 school year to the
2005-06 school year and 3.4 percent from the 2005-06 school year to the
2006-07 school year.
(11) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION. (1) The following
calculations determine the salaries used in the general fund
allocations for certificated instructional, certificated
administrative, and classified staff units under section 502 of this
act:
(a) Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units
shall be determined for each district by multiplying the district's
certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 12E
by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated
instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP Document
1Sb; and
(b) Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units
and classified staff units for each district shall be based on the
district's certificated administrative and classified salary allocation
amounts shown on LEAP Document 12E.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "LEAP Document 1Sb" means the computerized tabulation
establishing staff mix factors for certificated instructional staff
according to education and years of experience, as developed by the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on March
28, 2005, at 10:00 hours; and
(b) "LEAP Document 12E" means the computerized tabulation of 2005-06 and 2006-07 school year salary allocations for certificated
administrative staff and classified staff and derived and total base
salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed by the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on March
28, 2005, at 10:15 hours.
(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors shall be applied to salary
adjustments at a rate of 10.58 percent for school year 2005-06 and
10.58 percent for school year 2006-07 for certificated staff and for
classified staff 11.34 percent for school year 2005-06 and 11.34
percent for the 2006-07 school year.
(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary
allocation schedules for certificated instructional staff are
established for basic education salary allocations:

K-12 Salary Allocation Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2005-06 School Year

Years of MA+90

Service
BA
BA+15
BA+30
BA+45
BA+90
BA+135
MA
MA+45
or PHD

0 30,383 31,204 32,054 32,906 35,640 37,401 36,426 39,161 40,924

1 30,792 31,624 32,485 33,375 36,137 37,889 36,831 39,594 41,345

2 31,181 32,022 32,892 33,850 36,605 38,375 37,239 39,994 41,764

3 31,583 32,431 33,311 34,299 37,049 38,861 37,626 40,373 42,187

4 31,977 32,862 33,747 34,770 37,536 39,361 38,031 40,796 42,623

5 32,384 33,273 34,167 35,247 38,002 39,864 38,442 41,199 43,061

6 32,802 33,672 34,596 35,729 38,472 40,344 38,864 41,607 43,478

7 33,536 34,420 35,356 36,551 39,334 41,258 39,655 42,437 44,362

8 34,612 35,543 36,502 37,796 40,616 42,611 40,899 43,720 45,714

9 36,707 37,713 39,054 41,940 44,002 42,156 45,044 47,106

10 38,938 40,376 43,301 45,432 43,479 46,405 48,535

11 41,737 44,726 46,900 44,840 47,830 50,003

12 43,055 46,189 48,428 46,255 49,292 51,532

13 47,688 49,993 47,720 50,791 53,096

14 49,194 51,618 49,227 52,396 54,721

15 50,474 52,961 50,507 53,758 56,144

16 or more 51,483 54,019 51,517 54,833 57,266

K-12 Salary Allocation Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2006-07 School Year

Years of MA+90

Service
BA
BA+15
BA+30
BA+45
BA+90
BA+135
MA
MA+45
or PHD

0 30,900 31,735 32,599 33,466 36,247 38,038 37,046 39,827 41,620

1 31,316 32,162 33,038 33,942 36,752 38,534 37,458 40,268 42,048

2 31,712 32,566 33,451 34,426 37,228 39,028 37,873 40,674 42,475

3 32,121 32,983 33,878 34,883 37,679 39,523 38,266 41,060 42,905

4 32,521 33,421 34,321 35,362 38,174 40,031 38,678 41,491 43,348

5 32,935 33,840 34,748 35,846 38,649 40,543 39,097 41,900 43,794

6 33,360 34,245 35,185 36,337 39,127 41,031 39,526 42,315 44,218

7 34,107 35,005 35,957 37,173 40,003 41,960 40,330 43,159 45,116

8 35,201 36,148 37,123 38,439 41,307 43,336 41,594 44,464 46,492

9 37,332 38,355 39,718 42,654 44,751 42,873 45,810 47,908

10 39,601 41,063 44,038 46,205 44,219 47,194 49,361

11 42,448 45,487 47,698 45,603 48,644 50,853

12 43,788 46,975 49,252 47,042 50,131 52,409

13 48,499 50,844 48,532 51,655 54,000

14 50,031 52,496 50,065 53,287 55,652

15 51,333 53,862 51,366 54,673 57,099

16 or more 52,359 54,938 52,393 55,766 58,241

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer
to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate
degree.
(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before
the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be
counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection,
the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:
(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and
(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.
(b) "MA" means a masters degree.
(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.
(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-
service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and
28A.415.023.
(6) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by
any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine
compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and
LEAP documents referenced in this act, or any replacement schedules and
documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(7) The certificated instructional staff base salary specified for
each district in LEAP Document 12E and the salary schedules in
subsection (4)(a) of this section include two learning improvement
days. A school district is eligible for the learning improvement day
funds only if the learning improvement days have been added to the 180-day contract year. If fewer days are added, the additional learning
improvement allocation shall be adjusted accordingly. The additional
days shall be limited to specific activities identified in the state
required school improvement plan related to improving student learning
that are consistent with education reform implementation, and shall not
be considered part of basic education. The principal in each school
shall assure that the days are used to provide the necessary school-wide, all staff professional development that is tied directly to the
school improvement plan. The school principal and the district
superintendent shall maintain documentation as to their approval of
these activities. The length of a learning improvement day shall not
be less than the length of a full day under the base contract. The
superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that school districts
adhere to the intent and purposes of this subsection.
(8) The salary allocation schedules established in this section are
for allocation purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2)
and subsection (7) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,714,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,776,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,195,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,685,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $135,006,000 is provided for a cost of living adjustment of 1.2
percent effective September 1, 2005, and another 1.7 percent effective
September 1, 2006, for state formula staff units. The appropriations
include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at rates of
10.58 percent for the 2005-06 school year and 10.58 percent for the
2006-07 school year for certificated staff and 11.34 percent for the
2005-06 school year and 11.34 percent for the 2006-07 school year for
classified staff.
(a) The appropriations in this section include the increased
portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant
state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Increases for
general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary
allocation schedules and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of this
act. Increases for special education result from increases in each
district's basic education allocation per student. Increases for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
502 and 503 of this act.
(b) The appropriations in this section provide cost of living and
incremental fringe benefit allocations based on formula adjustments as
follows:

School Year

2005-06 2006-07

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.28 $0.67

Highly Capable (per formula student) $2.96 $7.21

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $7.94 $19.32

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $3.97 $9.66

(c) The appropriations in this section include $251,000 for fiscal
year 2006 and $676,000 for fiscal year 2007 for salary increase
adjustments for substitute teachers.
(2) $135,679,000 is provided for adjustments to insurance benefit
allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is
$582.47 per month for the 2005-06 and 2006-07 school years. The
appropriations in this section provide for a rate increase to $631.98
per month for the 2005-06 school year and $685.70 per month for the
2006-07 school year. The adjustments to health insurance benefit
allocations are at the following rates:

School Year

2005-06 2006-07

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.45 $0.94

Highly Capable (per formula student) $3.02 $6.36

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $8.01 $16.71

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $6.30 $13.13

(3) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $243,160,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $248,599,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $491,759,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) A maximum of $796,000 of this fiscal year 2006 appropriation
and a maximum of $812,000 of the fiscal year 2007 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(3) $5,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $5,000 of the
fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided solely for the
transportation of students enrolled in "choice" programs.
Transportation shall be limited to low-income students who are
transferring to "choice" programs solely for educational reasons.
(4) Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on
reimbursement rates of $41.56 per weighted mile in the 2005-06 school
year and $41.80 per weighted mile in the 2006-07 school year exclusive
of salary and benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act.
Allocations for transportation of students transported more than one
radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as determined by
superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based
on the number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five
living within one radius mile of their assigned school multiplied by
the per mile reimbursement rate for the school year multiplied by 1.29.
(5) For busses purchased between July 1, 2005, and June 30, 2007,
the office of superintendent of public instruction shall provide
reimbursement funding to a school district only after the
superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was
purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or
a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote
based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195. The competitive specifications shall meet
federal motor vehicle safety standards, minimum state specifications as
established by rule by the superintendent, and supported options as
determined by the superintendent in consultation with the regional
transportation coordinators of the educational service districts.
(6) Beginning with the 2005-06 school year, the superintendent of
public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district
buses on the five-year average of prices in the appropriate category of
bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation
payment shall be based on the current state price. The superintendent
may include a weighting or other adjustment factor in the averaging
formula to ease the transition from the current-price depreciation
system to the average depreciation system. Prior to making any
depreciation payment in the 2005-06 school year, the superintendent
shall notify the office of financial management and the fiscal
committees of the legislature of the specific depreciation formula to
be used. The replacement cost shall be based on the lowest quote in
the appropriate bus category for that school year.
(7) In addition to the allocations for transportation of students
in subsection (4) of this section, school districts shall be allocated
$0.17 per weighted mile in the 2005-06 school year and $0.17 per
weighted mile in the 2006-07 school year exclusive of salary and
benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act. For the
purposes of this subsection, the weighted miles will be calculated
based on the actual reported amounts for the 2004-05 school year. The
total amount allocated pursuant to this subsection shall be limited to
$1,534,000 for the 2005-07 biennium.
(8) A maximum of $50,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation may
be expended for software programming costs associated with the
implementation of subsection (6) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $287,403,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,603,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for state matching money for federal
child nutrition programs.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the 2007 fiscal year appropriation are
provided for summer food programs for children in low-income areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $456,306,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $464,586,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $435,453,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,356,345,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall use the
excess cost methodology developed and implemented for the 2001-02
school year using the S-275 personnel reporting system and all related
accounting requirements to ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The S-275 and accounting changes in effect since the 2001-02
school year shall supercede any prior excess cost methodologies and
shall be required of all school districts.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state
and federal funds to school districts based on two categories: The
optional birth through age two program for special education eligible
developmentally delayed infants and toddlers, and the mandatory special
education program for special education eligible students ages three to
twenty-one. A "special education eligible student" means a student
receiving specially designed instruction in accordance with a properly
formulated individualized education program.
(5)(a) For the 2005-06 and 2006-07 school years, the superintendent
shall make allocations to each district based on the sum of:
(i) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of
developmentally delayed infants and toddlers ages birth through two,
multiplied by the district's average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(ii) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment multiplied by the funded enrollment percent
determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, multiplied by
the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district shall be
based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment" means the resident enrollment including students enrolled
through choice (RCW 28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts
(RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding students residing in another district
enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program (RCW
28A.225.250).
(b) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding the birth through age
two enrollment, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
Each district's general fund -- state funded special education
enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment
percent or 12.7 percent.
(7) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with subsection
(6)(b) of this section, and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather
than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student
shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units.
(8) To the extent necessary, $18,945,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation and $28,698,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided for safety net awards for districts with
demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts
provided in subsection (5) of this section. If safety net awards
exceed the amount appropriated in this subsection (8), the
superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds
necessary to meet this need. Safety net funds shall be awarded by the
state safety net oversight committee subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special
education exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas.
In the determination of need, the committee shall also consider
additional available revenues from federal sources. Differences in
program costs attributable to district philosophy, service delivery
choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for safety
net awards.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(d) Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of
potential medicaid eligible students billed as calculated by the
superintendent in accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 1999.
(e) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(10) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff from the office of superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor who shall be nonvoting
members of the committee; and
(c) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.
(11) A maximum of $100,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation shall be expended to create a special education ombudsman
program within the office of superintendent of public instruction. The
purpose of the program is to provide support to parents, guardians,
educators, and students with disabilities. The program will provide
information to help families and educators understand state laws,
rules, and regulations, and access training and support, technical
information services, and mediation services. The ombudsman program
will provide data, information, and appropriate recommendations to the
office of superintendent of public instruction, school districts,
educational service districts, state need projects, and the parent and
teacher information center.
(12) The superintendent of public instruction, consistent with the
new federal IDEA reauthorization, shall continue to educate schools on
how to implement a birth-to-three program and the cost effectiveness
and learning benefits of early intervention.
(13) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund -- state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(14) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for projects to provide special education students with
appropriate job and independent living skills, including work
experience where possible, to facilitate their successful transition
out of the public school system. The funds provided by this subsection
shall be from federal discretionary grants.
(15) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(16) A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation may be expended by the superintendent for projects
related to use of inclusion strategies by school districts for
provision of special education services.
(17) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund -- state funds allocated under
this program; however, carry over funds shall be expended in the
special education program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,702,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,702,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,404,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish
financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction
and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).
(2) The educational service districts, at the request of the state
board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.310.340, may
receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct
school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education
rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $179,038,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,051,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $370,089,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,115,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,620,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,735,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $219,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $219,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to maintain at least one
certificated instructional staff and related support services at an
institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support
one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish
the educational program. The following types of institutions are
included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, and programs for
juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,871,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,905,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,776,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for school district programs for highly capable
students shall be distributed at a maximum rate of $347.95 per funded
student for the 2005-06 school year and $347.95 per funded student for
the 2006-07 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded students
shall be a maximum of two percent of each district's full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
(3) $170,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $170,000 of
the fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided for the centrum program
at Fort Worden state park.
(4) $90,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $90,000 of
the fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided for the Washington
destination imagination network and future problem-solving programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR MISCELLANEOUS PURPOSES UNDER THE ELEMENTARY AND
SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT AND THE NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,084,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,995,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,255,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,264,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $193,514,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) ASSESSMENT
$20,030,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $16,272,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $16,111,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
the Washington assessments of student learning (WASL), including
development and implementation of retake assessments for high school
students who are not successful in one or more content areas of the
WASL and development of alternative assessments or appeals procedures
to implement the certificate of academic achievement. Within these
amounts, the superintendent of public instruction shall contract for
the early return of 10th grade student WASL results, on or around June
10th of each year.
(2) PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT
(a) $548,000 of the fiscal year 2006 general fund -- state
appropriation and $548,000 of the fiscal year 2007 general fund -- state
appropriation are provided solely for training of paraprofessional
classroom assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom
assistants as provided in RCW 28A.415.310.
(b) $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for mentor teacher assistance,
including state support activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and
28A.415.260, and for a mentor academy. Up to $200,000 of the amount in
this subsection may be used each fiscal year to operate a mentor
academy to help districts provide effective training for peer mentors.
Funds for the teacher assistance program shall be allocated to school
districts based on the number of first year beginning teachers.
(c) $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.
(d) $977,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,008,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a salary bonus for teachers
who attain certification by the national board for professional
teaching standards subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(i) Teachers who attain certification by the national board during
the 2005-06 school year or the 2006-07 school year shall receive a one-time bonus not to exceed $3,500.
(ii) The one-time bonus shall be paid in a lump sum amount and
shall not be included in the definition of "earnable compensation"
under RCW 41.32.010(10).
(e) $90,399,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high quality teachers
and principals under Title II of the no child left behind act.
(3) SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT
(a) $313,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $313,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a principal support program.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction may contract
with an independent organization to administer the program. The
program shall include: (i) Development of an individualized
professional growth plan for a new principal or principal candidate;
and (ii) participation of a mentor principal who works over a period of
between one and three years with the new principal or principal
candidate to help him or her build the skills identified as critical to
the success of the professional growth plan. Within the amounts
provided, $50,000 per year shall be used to support additional
participation of secondary principals.
(b) $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for focused assistance. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct
educational audits of low-performing schools and enter into performance
agreements between school districts and the office to implement the
recommendations of the audit and the community. Each educational audit
shall include recommendations for best practices and ways to address
identified needs and shall be presented to the community in a public
meeting to seek input on ways to implement the audit and its
recommendations.
(c) $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the mathematics helping corps
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(i) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical
mathematics assistance statewide, the superintendent of public
instruction shall employ mathematics school improvement specialists to
provide assistance to schools and districts. The specialists shall be
hired by and work under the direction of a statewide school improvement
coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall not be
permanent employees of the superintendent of public instruction.
(ii) The school improvement specialists shall provide the
following:
(A) Assistance to schools to disaggregate student performance data
and develop improvement plans based on those data;
(B) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their
performance on the Washington assessment of student learning and other
assessments emphasizing the performance on the mathematics assessments;
(C) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the
essential academic learning requirements emphasizing the academic
learning requirements for mathematics, the Washington assessment of
student learning, and meets the needs of diverse learners;
(D) Assistance in the identification and implementation of
research-based instructional practices in mathematics;
(E) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional
strategies and classroom-based assessment for mathematics;
(F) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community
involvement programs emphasizing mathematics; and
(G) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to
improve student mathematics learning.
(d) $16,758,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for the reading first program under Title I of the no child
left behind act.
(e) A maximum of $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for summer
accountability institutes offered by the superintendent of public
instruction. The institutes shall provide school district staff with
training in the analysis of student assessment data, information
regarding successful district and school teaching models, research on
curriculum and instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve
instruction in reading, mathematics, language arts, social studies,
including civics, and guidance and counseling. The superintendent of
public instruction shall emphasize issues of high school reform and
mathematics instruction when offering summer institute programs
supported by funds provided in this subsection.
(f) $515,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $515,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for the evaluation of reading and
mathematics textbooks, other instructional materials, and diagnostic
tools to determine the extent to which they are aligned with the state
standards. A scorecard of the analysis shall be made available to
school districts. The superintendent shall also develop and
disseminate information on essential components of comprehensive,
school-based math and reading programs and shall develop and
disseminate grade level expectations for reading and math which shall
include professional development modules and web-based materials.
(4) STUDENT SUPPORTS
(a) $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the meals for kids program
under RCW 28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155.
(b) $3,594,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,594,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for grants to school districts to
provide a continuum of care for children and families to help children
become ready to learn. Grant proposals from school districts shall
contain local plans designed collaboratively with community service
providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area in which
the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible.
Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,794,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,290,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,561,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $168,645,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $759.62 per
eligible bilingual student in the 2005-06 school year and $759.62 in
the 2006-07 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
provided in section 504 of this act.
(3) The superintendent may withhold up to 1.5 percent of the school
year allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section,
and adjust the per eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this
section accordingly, solely for the central provision of assessments as
provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2).
(4) $70,000 of the amounts appropriated in this section are
provided solely to develop a system for the tracking of current and
former transitional bilingual program students.
(5) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for migrant education under Title I Part C and English
language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III
of the elementary and secondary education act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,958,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,282,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $343,227,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $491,467,000

(1) The general fund--state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) Each general fund--state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(b) Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall
be allocated at maximum rates of $458.93 per funded unit for the
2005-06 school year and $459.84 per funded unit for the 2006-07 school
year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided under section
504 of this act.
(c) For purposes of this section, "test results" refers to the
district results from the 2004-05 school year for a norm-referenced
test administered in the specified grade level. The norm-referenced
test results used for the third and sixth grade calculations shall be
consistent with the third and sixth grade tests required under RCW
28A.230.190 and 28A.230.193.
(d) A school district's general fund--state funded units for the
2005-06 and 2006-07 school years shall be the sum of the following:
(i) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-6,
multiplied by the 5-year average 4th grade lowest quartile test results
as adjusted for funding purposes in the school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.512. As the 3rd grade test becomes available, it
shall be phased into the 5-year average on a 1-year lag;
(ii) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 7-9,
multiplied by the 5-year average 8th grade lowest quartile test results
as adjusted for funding purposes in the school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.512. As the 6th grade test becomes available, it
shall be phased into the 5-year average for these grades on a 1-year
lag;
(iii) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades
10-11 multiplied by the 5-year average 11th grade lowest quartile test
results, multiplied by 0.512. As the 9th grade test becomes available,
it shall be phased into the 5-year average for these grades on a 1-year
lag;
(iv) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12
times the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in
grades K-12 eligible for free or reduced price lunch in the prior
school year multiplied by 18.0 percent;
(v) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free and
reduced price lunch exceeded the state average, subtract the state
average percentage of students eligible for free and reduced price
lunch from the district's percentage and multiply the result by the
district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the
current school year multiplied by 25.5 percent; and
(vi) Increases in a school district's allocation above the 2004-05
school year level shall be given first consideration for use in
secondary schools.
(e) In addition to amounts allocated in (b) and (d) of this
subsection, an additional amount shall be allocated to a school
district for each school year in which the district's allocation is
less than the amount the district received for the general fund--state
learning assistance program allocation in the 2004-05 school year. The
amount of the allocation in this section shall be sufficient to
maintain the 2004-05 school year allocation.
(2) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(3) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund -- state funds allocated under this
program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning
assistance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM
Student Achievement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $629,356,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for school district student achievement programs shall
be allocated at a maximum rate of $300.00 per FTE student for the 2005-06 school year and $375.00 per FTE student for the 2006-07 school year.
For the purposes of this section and in accordance with RCW 84.52.068,
FTE student refers to the annual average full-time equivalent
enrollment of the school district in grades kindergarten through twelve
for the prior school year.
(2) The appropriation is allocated for the following uses as
specified in RCW 28A.505.210:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school; or
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection (2).
(3) $138,238,000 of the student achievement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill
No. 6096 (generating new tax revenue for education funding). If the
bill is not enacted before June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute the
school year allocation according to the monthly apportionment schedule
defined in RCW 28A.510.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517 K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR
ADJUSTMENTS. State general fund and state student achievement fund
appropriations provided to the superintendent of public instruction for
state entitlement programs in the public schools in this part V of this
act may be expended as needed by the superintendent for adjustments to
apportionment for prior fiscal periods. Recoveries of state general
fund moneys from school districts and educational service districts for
a prior fiscal period shall be made as reductions in apportionment
payments for the current fiscal period and shall be shown as prior year
adjustments on apportionment reports for the current period. Such
recoveries shall not be treated as revenues to the state, but as a
reduction in the amount expended against the appropriation for the
current fiscal period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 518 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION. Appropriations made in this act to the office of
superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 The appropriations in sections 603 through
609 of this act are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(1) "Institutions" means the institutions of higher education
receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act.
(2)(a) The salary increases provided or referenced in this
subsection and described in sections 938 through 968 of this act shall
be the only allowable salary increases provided at institutions of
higher education, excluding increases associated with normally
occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and professional
staff retention, and excluding increases associated with employees
under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the provisions
of RCW 28B.16.015 and 28B.50.874(1).
(b) For employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.16.015 and 28B.50.874(1), salary
increases will be in accordance with the applicable collective
bargaining agreement. However, an increase shall not be provided to
any classified employee whose salary is above the approved salary range
maximum for the class to which the employee's position is allocated.
(c) Each institution of higher education receiving appropriations
for salary increases under sections 604 through 609 of this act may
provide additional salary increases from other sources to instructional
and research faculty, exempt professional staff, teaching and research
assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and
all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW
28B.16.015. Any additional salary increase granted under the authority
of this subsection (2)(c) shall not be included in an institution's
salary base for future state funding. It is the intent of the
legislature that general fund -- state support for an institution shall
not increase during the current or any future biennium as a result of
any salary increases authorized under this subsection (2)(c).
(d) The legislature, the office of financial management, and other
state agencies need consistent and accurate personnel data from
institutions of higher education for policy planning purposes.
Institutions of higher education shall report personnel data to the
department of personnel for inclusion in the department's data
warehouse. Uniform reporting procedures shall be established by the
department of personnel for use by the reporting institutions,
including provisions for common job classifications and common
definitions of full-time equivalent staff. Annual contract amounts,
number of contract months, and funding sources shall be consistently
reported for employees under contract.
(3) The tuition fees, as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW, charged to
full-time students at the state's institutions of higher education for
the 2005-06 and 2006-07 academic years, other than the summer term,
shall be adjusted by the governing boards of the state universities,
regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state board
for community and technical colleges. Tuition fees may be increased in
excess of the fiscal growth factor.
For the 2005-06 academic year, the governing boards of the state
universities may implement an increase no greater than seven percent
over tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate students
for the 2004-05 academic year. The governing boards of the regional
universities and The Evergreen State College may implement an increase
no greater than six percent over tuition fees charged to full-time
resident undergraduate students for the 2004-05 academic year. The
state board for community and technical colleges may implement an
increase no greater than five percent over tuition fees charged to
full-time resident students for the 2004-05 academic year.
For the 2006-07 academic year, the governing boards of the state
universities may implement an increase no greater than seven percent
over tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate students
for the 2005-06 academic year. The governing boards of the regional
universities and The Evergreen State College may implement an increase
no greater than six percent over tuition fees charged to full-time
resident undergraduate students for the 2005-06 academic year. The
state board for community and technical colleges may implement an
increase no greater than five percent over tuition fees charged to
full-time resident students for the 2005-06 academic year.
(4) For the 2005-07 biennium, the state board for community and
technical colleges may increase tuition fees differentially based on
student credit hour load at their discretion.
(5) For the 2005-07 biennium, the governing boards and the state
board may adjust full-time operating fees for factors that may include
time of day and day of week, as well as delivery method and campus, to
encourage full use of the state's educational facilities and resources.
(6) Technical colleges may increase their building fee in excess of
the fiscal growth factor until parity is reached with the community
colleges.
(7) In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW
28B.15.910, the governing boards and the state board may waive all or
a portion of operating fees for any student. State general fund
appropriations shall not be provided to replace tuition and fee revenue
foregone as a result of waivers granted under this subsection.
(8) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, institutions of higher education
receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act are
authorized to increase summer term tuition in excess of the fiscal
growth factor during the 2005-07 biennium. Tuition levels increased
pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed the per credit hour rate
calculated from the academic year tuition levels adopted under this
act.
(9) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, community and technical colleges
are authorized to increase services and activities fee charges in
excess of the fiscal growth factor during the 2005-2007 biennium. The
services and activities fee charges increased pursuant to this
subsection shall not exceed the maximum level authorized by the state
board for community and technical colleges.
(10) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the governing boards of the state
universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College
are authorized to increase application fees in excess of the fiscal
growth factor during the 2005-2007 biennium. The application fee
levels increased pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed fifty
dollars per application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 (1) The appropriations in sections 603
through 609 of this act provide state general fund support for full-time equivalent student enrollments at each institution of higher
education. Listed below are the annual full-time equivalent student
enrollments by institutions assumed in this act.

2005-06
Annual
Average 2006-07
Annual
Average

University of Washington

Main campus 33,165 33,473

Bothell branch 1,337 1,409

Tacoma branch 1,744 1,944

Washington State University

Main campus 18,773 19,034

Tri-Cities branch 720 765

Vancouver branch 1,428 1,628

Central Washington University 8,313 8,627

Eastern Washington University 8,638 9,007

The Evergreen State College 4,044 4,155

Western Washington University 11,509 11,629

State Board for Community and Technical Colleges 130,915 132,976

(2) For the state universities, the number of full-time equivalent
student enrollments enumerated in this section for the branch campuses
are the minimum required enrollment levels for those campuses. At the
start of an academic year, the governing board of a state university
may transfer full-time equivalent student enrollments from the main
campus to one or more branch campus. Intent notice shall be provided
to the office of financial management and reassignment of funded
enrollment is contingent upon satisfying data needs of the forecast
division who is responsible to track and monitor state-supported
college enrollment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $573,379,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $585,545,000
Administrative Contingency Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,950,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,170,874,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The technical colleges may increase tuition and fees in excess
of the fiscal growth factor to conform with the percentage increase in
community college operating fees.
(2) $540,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $540,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the displaced homemakers
program.
(3) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for higher education student child
care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(4) $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely as special funds for training and
related support services, including financial aid, as specified in
chapter 226, Laws of 1993 (employment and training for unemployed
workers). Funding is provided to support up to 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in each fiscal year.
(5) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for basic skills education at
community and technical colleges and community-based providers. These
funds may be used to align or integrate adult basic education and
English as a second language courses with vocational training.
(6) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 938 through 968 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding by $324 during the 2005-2007 biennium. This
increase in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition
revenues that will be generated and retained by the community and
technical colleges as a result of the tuition increases that are
authorized in section 601 of this act. Given these increases in core
funding, the state board for community and technical colleges shall, by
June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward achieving the
following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Increase the number of academic students who are eligible to
transfer to baccalaureate institutions;
(b) Increase the number of students prepared for work; and
(c) Increase the number of basic skills students who demonstrate
substantive skill gain.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the state board and the office of financial
management and shall be determined based on the per student funding
level assumed in this act.
The state board for community and technical colleges shall provide
a summary of the progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section to the governor and the appropriate fiscal
and policy committees of the legislature prior to November 1, 2006.
(7) $7,172,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $14,343,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided to increase budgeted enrollments by 1,572
student FTEs in academic year 2006 and an additional 1,572 student FTEs
in academic year 2007. $2,904,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006, $5,816,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and $3,000,000 of the
administrative contingency account--state appropriation are provided
solely to increase enrollments by 488 student FTEs in academic year
2006 and an additional 489 student FTEs in academic year 2007 in high
demand fields as measured by both student and employer demand. The
state board for community and technical colleges shall track
enrollments, graduation rates, and job placement for each program that
receives high-demand enrollments using data provided by each recipient
institution. The board shall report on these outcomes on November 1st
of each fiscal year to the office of financial management and the
fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature. The
enrollment increases provided in this section shall be limited to new
students only and may not be used to pay for students currently
enrolled by the institutions.
(8) $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to increase salaries and related
benefits for part-time faculty. The board shall report by January 30,
2006, to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
and policy committees of the legislature on (a) the distribution of
state funds, and (b) wage adjustments for part-time faculty.
(9) $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for faculty salary increments and
associated benefits and may be used in combination with salary and
benefit savings from faculty turnover to provide salary increments and
associated benefits for faculty who qualify through professional
development and training. To the extent general salary increase
funding is used to pay faculty increments, the general salary increase
shall be reduced by the same amount.
(10) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to establish the southwest
Washington allied health and human services educational consortium at
Washington State University-Vancouver, Clark College, and Lower
Columbia College. Clark College shall serve as the fiscal agent of the
consortium. The consortium shall define the regional education and
training priorities for the health and human services industry,
reporting to the state legislature recommendations for meeting the
growth needs of southwest Washington.
(11) $8,950,000 of the administrative contingency account--state
appropriation is provided solely for administration and customized
training contracts through the job skills program, which shall be made
available broadly and not to the exclusion of private nonprofit
baccalaureate degree granting institutions or vocational arts career
schools operating in Washington state who partner with a firm,
hospital, group, or industry association concerned with commerce,
trade, manufacturing, or the provision of services to train current or
prospective employees. The state board shall make an annual report by
January 1 of each fiscal year to the governor and appropriate policy
and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding the implementation
of this section listing the scope of grant awards, the distribution of
funds by educational sector and region of the state, and the successful
partnerships supported by these state funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $334,345,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $338,534,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,217,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,153,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $685,549,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $165,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $165,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item UW-01.
(2) $300,000 of the general fund -- private/local appropriation is
provided solely for shellfish biotoxin monitoring as specified in
chapter 263, Laws of 2003 (SSB 6073, shellfish license fee).
(3) $3,190,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $6,380,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy for 616 new
enrollments at the Seattle campus, 400 new enrollments at the Tacoma
campus, and 144 new enrollments at the Bothell campus. The amounts
provided in this subsection are contingent upon the university
accepting applicants for transfer from Washington community and
technical colleges who meet the admission requirements of the
university in numbers consistent with the proportionality agreements
for specific campuses between the university and the state board for
community and technical colleges. The enrollment increases provided in
this section shall be limited to new students only and may not be used
to pay for students currently enrolled by the university.
(4) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 938 through 968 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding by $585 during the 2005-2007 biennium. This
increase in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition
revenues that will be generated and retained by the university as a
result of the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of
this act. Given these increases in core funding, the University of
Washington shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward
achieving the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that are ranked in the top twenty
nationally;
(e) Sustain the quality of its research programs as measured by the
national ranking for federal research grants received; and
(f) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before October 1, 2006, the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating board
shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to the
governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to November 1, 2006.
(5) $2,430,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to support research in life science
fields.
(6) $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to maintain the autism center at
the University of Washington-Tacoma campus. The facility will continue
to function as a satellite facility to the autism center at the
University of Washington medical center in Seattle and provide clinical
service and professional training.
(7) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to assist the transition of University of
Washington-Tacoma from a branch campus serving upper-division students,
to a four-year campus serving freshmen, sophomores, and upper-division
students. Funds may be used to develop curricula, recruit new faculty,
and expand student services. Consistent with the recommendations of
the higher education coordinating board, UW-Tacoma may begin enrolling
lower-division students beginning in fiscal year 2008.
(8) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the Olympic natural resources
center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,316,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $211,293,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $419,609,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $210,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $210,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item WSU-01.
(2) $2,783,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $5,566,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy for 522 new
enrollments at the Pullman campus, 400 new enrollments at the Vancouver
campus, and 90 new enrollments at the Tri-Cities campus. The amounts
provided in this subsection are contingent upon the university
accepting applicants for transfer from Washington community and
technical colleges who meet the admission requirements of the
university in numbers consistent with the proportionality agreements
for specific campuses between the university and the state board for
community and technical colleges. The enrollment increases provided in
this section shall be limited to new students only and may not be used
to pay for students currently enrolled by the university.
(3) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 938 through 968 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding by $726 during the 2005-2007 biennium. This
increase in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition
revenues that will be generated and retained by the university as a
result of the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of
this act. Given these increases in core funding, Washington State
University shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward
achieving the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that are ranked in the top twenty
nationally;
(e) Sustain the quality of its research programs as measured by the
national ranking for federal research grants received; and
(f) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before October 1, 2006 the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating board
shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to the
governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to November 1, 2006.
(4) $1,014,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,014,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to expand the entering class of
veterinary medicine students by 16 resident student FTEs each academic
year during the 2005-2007 biennium.
(5) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to conduct research on
alternatives for controlling ghost shrimp in Willapa bay.
(6) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to assist the transition of Washington
State University-Vancouver from a branch campus serving only upper-division students, to a four-year campus serving freshmen, sophomores,
and upper-division students. Funds may be used to develop curricula,
recruit new faculty, and expand student services. Consistent with the
recommendations of the higher education coordinating board, WSU-Vancouver may begin enrolling lower-division students beginning in
fiscal year 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,373,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,382,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,755,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,030,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $4,059,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy for 738 new
enrollments. The amounts provided in this subsection are contingent
upon the university accepting applicants for transfer from Washington
community and technical colleges who meet the admission requirements of
the university in numbers consistent with the proportionality
agreements for specific campuses between the university and the state
board for community and technical colleges. The enrollment increases
provided in this section shall be limited to new students only and may
not be used to pay for students currently enrolled by the university.
(2) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 938 through 968 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding by $480 during the 2005-2007 biennium. This
increase in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition
revenues that will be generated and retained by the university as a
result of the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of
this act. Given these increases in core funding, Eastern Washington
University shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward
achieving the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that receive national accreditation;
and
(e) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before October 1, 2006, the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating board
shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to the
governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to November 1, 2006.
(3) $212,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $213,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the northeast autism center to
provide community based approaches to assisting children and adults
with autism spectrum disorder and to include the establishment of a
preschool at Eastern Washington University to serve children identified
with autism spectrum disorder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,855,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,425,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,280,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,727,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,454,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy for 628 new
enrollments. The amounts provided in this subsection are contingent
upon the university accepting applicants for transfer from Washington
community and technical colleges who meet the admission requirements of
the university in numbers consistent with the proportionality
agreements for specific campuses between the university and the state
board for community and technical colleges. The enrollment increases
provided in this section shall be limited to new students only and may
not be used to pay for students currently enrolled by the university.
(2) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 938 through 968 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding by $499 during the 2005-2007 biennium. This
increase in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition
revenues that will be generated and retained by the university as a
result of the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of
this act. Given these increases in core funding, Central Washington
University shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward
achieving the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that receive national accreditation;
and
(e) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before October 1, 2006, the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating board
shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to the
governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to November 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,868,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,919,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,787,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $611,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,221,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy for 222 new
enrollments. The amounts provided in this subsection are contingent
upon the college accepting applicants for transfer from Washington
community and technical colleges who meet the admission requirements of
the college in numbers consistent with the proportionality agreements
for specific campuses between the college and the state board for
community and technical colleges. The enrollment increases provided in
this section shall be limited to new students and may not be used to
pay for students currently enrolled by the institution.
(2) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 938 through 968 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding by $482 during the 2005-2007 biennium. This
increase in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition
revenues that will be generated and retained by the college as a result
of the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of this
act. Given these increases in core funding, The Evergreen State
College shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward
achieving the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that receive national accreditation;
(e) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before October 1, 2006, the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating board
shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to the
governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to November 1, 2006.
(3) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy to conduct an examination of educational outcome of
immigrant students. The examination shall include, but is not limited
to, a review of the following: The current educational performance and
graduation rates of immigrant students; the qualifications and
capabilities of teachers and paraprofessional to teach students from
diverse backgrounds for whom English may be a second language; the use
of technology, such as distance learning, in the transitional bilingual
program and other instruction provided to immigrant students; and
potential changes that would result in more effective instruction and
cost-effectiveness. The office of superintendent of public instruction
shall provide technical assistance and needed data to assist in the
institute's examination. The institute shall provide a report of its
findings to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature
by January 1, 2006.
(4) $265,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $316,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to conduct studies of integrated treatment pilot
projects, mental health clubhouses, and the net present value of
prevention and intervention programs, as required by Senate Bill No.
5763 (mental disorders). If Senate Bill No. 5763 is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, then the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(5) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy to study the minimum wage and the issues referred to in
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5551. The institute shall report its
finding to the governor and the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2005. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5551 is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,342,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,857,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $121,199,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $980,400 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $980,400 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the operations of the North
Snohomish, Island, Skagit (NSIS) higher education consortium.
(2) $660,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,320,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy for 240 new
enrollments. The amounts provided in this subsection are contingent
upon the university accepting applicants for transfer from Washington
community and technical colleges who meet the admission requirements of
the university in numbers consistent with the proportionality
agreements for specific campuses between the university and the state
board for community and technical colleges. The enrollment increases
provided in this section shall be limited to new students only, and may
not be used to pay for students currently enrolled by the university.
(3) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 938 through 968 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding by $486 during the 2005-2007 biennium. This
increase in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition
revenues that will be generated and retained by the university as a
result of the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of
this act. Given these increases in core funding, Western Washington
University shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward
achieving the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that receive national accreditation;
and
(e) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before October 1, 2006, the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating board
shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to the
governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to November 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD -- POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,688,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,669,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,314,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,671,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $300,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $300,000 of the general fund--
state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to develop
college readiness standards for English and science.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD -- FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,163,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $218,015,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,060,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $438,238,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $273,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $273,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the western interstate
commission for higher education.
(2) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for higher education student child
care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(3) $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the benefit of students who
participate in college assistance migrant programs (CAMP) operating in
Washington state. To ensure timely state aid, the board may establish
a date after which no additional grants would be available for the
2005-06 and 2006-07 academic years. The board shall disperse grants in
equal amounts to eligible post-secondary institutions so that state
money in all cases supplements federal CAMP awards.
(4) $172,163,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $188,044,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the state
need grant program. After April 1st of each fiscal year, up to one
percent of the annual appropriation for the state need grant program
may be transferred to the state work study program.
(5) $17,942,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $19,070,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the state work study program.
After April 1st of each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual
appropriation for the state work study program may be transferred to
the state need grant program. In addition to the administrative
allowance in subsection (11) of this section, four percent of the
general fund -- state amount in this subsection may be expended for state
work study program administration.
(6) $2,867,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,867,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for educational opportunity grants
pursuant to chapter 233, Laws of 2003 (ESB 5676). The board may
deposit sufficient funds from its appropriation into the state
education trust fund as established in RCW 28B.10.821 to provide a one-year renewal of the grant for each new recipient of the educational
opportunity grant award.
(7) $2,384,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,549,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement the Washington
scholars program. Any Washington scholars program moneys not awarded
by April 1st of each year may be transferred by the board to the
Washington award for vocational excellence.
(8) $794,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $846,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement Washington award for
vocational excellence program. Any Washington award for vocational
program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred
by the board to the Washington scholars program.
(9) $246,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $246,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for community scholarship matching
grants of $2,000 each and up to a total of $46,000 per year in grants
for nonprofit community organizations to administer the scholarship
matching grants. To be eligible for the matching grant, a nonprofit
community organization organized under section 501(c)(3) of the
internal revenue code must demonstrate that it has raised $2,000 in new
moneys for college scholarships after the effective date of this
section. An organization may receive more than one $2,000 matching
grant and preference shall be given to organizations affiliated with
Scholarship America.
(10) Subject to state need grant service requirements pursuant to
chapter 28B.119 RCW, $8,620,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 is provided solely for the
Washington promise scholarship program. The Washington promise
scholarship program is terminated following fiscal year 2006. No
Washington promise scholarship awards may be offered to students beyond
the graduating high school class of 2004.
(11) $2,820,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,820,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for financial aid administration,
in addition to the four percent cost allowance provision for state work
study under subsection (5) of this section. These funds are provided
to administer all the financial aid and grant programs assigned to the
board by the legislature and administered by the agency. To the extent
the executive director finds the agency will not require the full sum
provided in this subsection, a portion may be transferred to supplement
financial grants-in-aid to eligible clients after notifying the board
and the office of financial management of the intended transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612 FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,219,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,215,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,875,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,309,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613 FOR THE SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH
AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,554,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,568,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,122,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,304,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,311,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000
Public Benefit Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,115,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $200,000 of the public benefit account--state appropriation is provided solely for increased funding of quality
art programs in the state. If Senate Bill No. 5287 (taxation of social
card rooms) is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,334,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,651,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,985,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5707
(women's history consortium). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $262,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to coordinate and fund programs related to
the Lewis and Clark bicentennial commemoration.
(3) $155,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for reimbursement of costs incurred by the
Pacific county sheriff's office resulting from Lewis and Clark
bicentennial commemoration events.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for reimbursement of costs incurred by
local law enforcement resulting from Lewis and Clark bicentennial
commemoration events scheduled in the cities of Clarkston, Dayton,
Kennewick, Stevenson, Toppenish, and Vancouver.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 616 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,539,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,562,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,101,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,036,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,018,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,335,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,389,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,279,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,256,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $232,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,767,000

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $654,444,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $708,119,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,924,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $139,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,215,000
Debt-limit General Fund Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,113,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,583,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,374,537,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
deposit into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account. The
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 shall be deposited in the debt-limit
general fund bond retirement account by June 30, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES
State Convention and Trade Center
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,411,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,111,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,111,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,633,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,588,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,743,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,844,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $183,175,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
deposit into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
State Building Construction Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,080,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,259,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

The sum of $4,000,000 is appropriated from the disaster response
account for the purpose of making allocations to the Washington state
patrol for fire mobilizations costs or to the department of natural
resources for fire suppression costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- EMERGENCY FUND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are for
the governor's emergency fund for the critically necessary work of any
agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- SEX OFFENDER SENTENCING IMPACT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $792,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $837,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
distribution to counties to pay for the costs of implementing chapter
176, Laws of 2004, which makes amendments to the special sex offender
sentencing alternative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- SMALL AGENCY INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY POOL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
deposit into the data processing revolving account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- CAPITOL BUILDING CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
deposit in the capitol building construction account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT -- COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall distribute the
appropriations to the following counties and health districts in the
amounts designated:

Health District FY 2006
FY 2007 FY 2005-07
Biennium

Adams County Health District $30,951 $30,951 $61,902

Asotin County Health District $67,714 $67,714 $135,428

Benton-Franklin Health District $1,165,612 $1,165,612 $2,331,224

Chelan-Douglas Health District $184,761 $184,761 $369,522

Clallam County Health and Human Services Department $141,752 $141,752 $283,504

Southwest Washington Health District $1,084,473 $1,084,473 $2,168,946

Columbia County Health District $40,529 $40,529 $81,058

Cowlitz County Health Department $278,560 $278,560 $557,120

Garfield County Health District $15,028 $15,028 $30,056

Grant County Health District $118,595 $118,595 $237,191

Grays Harbor Health Department $183,870 183,870 $367,740

Island County Health Department $91,892 $91,892 $183,784

Jefferson County Health and Human Services $85,782 $85,782 $171,564

Seattle-King County Department of Public Health $9,531,747 $9,531,747 $19,063,494

Bremerton-Kitsap County Health District $554,669 $554,669 $1,109,338

Kittitas County Health Department $92,499 $92,499 $184,998

Klickitat County Health Department $62,402 $62,402 $124,804

Lewis County Health Department $105,801 $105,801 $211,602

Lincoln County Health Department $29,705 $29,705 $59,410

Mason County Department of Health Services $95,988 $95,988 $191,976

Okanogan County Health District $63,458 $63,458 $126,916

Pacific County Health Department $77,427 $77,427 $154,854

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department $2,820,590 $2,820,590 $5,641,180

San Juan County Health and Community Services $37,531 $37,531 $75,062

Skagit County Health Department $223,927 $223,927 $447,854

Snohomish Health District $2,258,207 $2,258,207 $4,516,414

Spokane County Health District $2,101,429 $2,101,429 $4,202,858

Northeast Tri-County Health District $110,454 $110,454 $220,908

Thurston County Health Department $600,419 $600,419 $1,200,838

Wahkiakum County Health Department $13,773 $13,772 $27,545

Walla Walla County-City Health Department $172,062 $172,062 $344,124

Whatcom County Health Department $855,863 $855,863 $1,711,726

Whitman County Health Department $78,733 $78,733 $157,466

Yakima Health District $623,797
$623,797 $1,247,594

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS $24,000,000 $24,000,000 $48,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 BELATED CLAIMS. The agencies and
institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act,
upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of
supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior
fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS -- CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS. The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis beginning July 1,
2005, consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the
judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly
basis consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.
(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system:
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,400,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,400,000

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial
retirement system:
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

(3) There is appropriated for contributions to the judges
retirement system:
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,550,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,550,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,100,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for deposit in the education technology revolving
account for the purpose of covering ongoing operational and equipment
replacement costs incurred by the K-20 educational network program in
providing telecommunication services to network participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 FOR THE GOVERNOR--LIFE SCIENCES DISCOVERY
FUND AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for a grant to the life sciences discovery fund
authority to be used in accordance with Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1623 or Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581. If
neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2005, the appropriation in this
section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 STRATEGIC PURCHASING STRATEGY. (1) The
office of financial management shall work with the appropriate state
agencies to generate savings of $50,000,000, of which $25,000,000 shall
be from the state general fund, that can arise from a strategic
purchasing strategy. From appropriations in this act, the office of
financial management shall reduce general fund--state allotments by $8
million for fiscal year 2006 and by $17 million for fiscal year 2007 to
reflect the savings from the strategic purchasing strategy. The
allotment reductions shall be placed in unallotted status and remain
unexpended.
(2) The department of general administration, with the assistance
of the department of information services and the department of
printing and in consultation with the office of financial management,
shall conduct an analysis of the state's purchasing processes to
identify the most reasonable strategy of attaining a statewide savings
target of $50,000,000 without affecting direct program activities. The
analysis shall identify savings by agency and fund that will result
from the implementation of a strategic purchasing strategy. The
results of this analysis shall then be provided to the director of
financial management by October 1, 2005, so the director may use it as
the basis to achieve the savings identified in subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Before the purchase of goods and services, all state agencies
and higher education institutions shall first consider the utilization
of current or existing master contracts. All state agencies and higher
education institutions shall strive to use master contracts when that
use is consistent with the agency's requirements and purchase is
financially cost effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The director of financial management shall
distribute the appropriation to the following county in the amounts
designated for extraordinary criminal justice costs:
Grant . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717 DOUBLE-FILLED PERSONNEL POSITIONS. From
appropriations in this act, the director of financial management shall
reduce general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year 2006 by
$1,333,000 and general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year 2007
by $2,667,000 to reflect the elimination of double-filled personnel
positions in which two or more persons occupy the same position in the
state personnel system. The allotment reductions shall be placed in
unallotted status and remain unexpended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718 INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2006. The sum of
one hundred million dollars or so much thereof as may be available on
June 30, 2006, from the total amount of unspent fiscal year 2006 state
general fund appropriations is appropriated for the purposes of RCW
43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five
million dollars, is appropriated to the education savings account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719 INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2007. The sum of
one hundred million dollars or so much thereof as may be available on
June 30, 2007, from the total amount of unspent fiscal year 2007 state
general fund appropriations is appropriated for the purposes of RCW
43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five
million dollars, is appropriated to the education savings account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720 NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE SALARY COST OF
LIVING ADJUSTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,794,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,988,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,188,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $682,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,461,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,113,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the purposes set forth in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section, appropriations in this section are provided solely
for a 3.2% increase effective July 1, 2005, for all classified
employees, except those represented by a collective bargaining unit
under the personnel system reform act of 2002, and except the
certificated employees covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure
No. 732. Also included are employees in the Washington management
service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the personnel
resources board or the director of personnel, as applicable.
(2) The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a 3.2% salary
increase effective July 1, 2005, for general government, legislative,
and judicial employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum
salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected
officials.
(3) Appropriations in this section are provided for a 1.6% salary
increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, for all
classified employees, except those represented by a collective
bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act of 2002, and
except the certificated employees covered by the provisions of
Initiative Measure No. 732. Also included are employees in the
Washington management service, and exempt employees under the
jurisdiction of the personnel resources board or the director of
personnel, as applicable. The appropriations are also sufficient to
fund a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30,
2007, for general government, legislative, and judicial employees
exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by
the commission on salaries for elected officials.
(4)(a) No salary increase may be paid under this section to any
person whose salary has been Y-rated pursuant to rules adopted by the
personnel resources board or the director of personnel, as applicable.
(b) The average salary increases paid under this section to agency
officials whose maximum salaries are established by the committee on
agency official salaries shall not exceed the average increases
provided under subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in LEAP document 2005-33
dated March 28, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 721 NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE SALARY SURVEY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,169,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,412,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,737,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $314,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,455,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,087,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For state employees, except those
represented by a bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act
of 2002, funding is provided for implementation of the department of
personnel's 2002 salary survey, for job classes more than 25% below
market rates.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in LEAP document 2005-78Z
dated March 28, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 722 CLASSIFICATION REVISIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $566,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,144,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $608,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,571,000

The appropriations in this section, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, shall be expended solely for the purposes designated in this
section and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
Funding is provided for partial implementation of classification
consolidation and revisions under the personnel system reform act of
2002. Groups 2 and 3 of the department of personnel's initial class
consolidation plan are affected.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-8Q
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 723 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS.
Provisions of the collective bargaining agreements contained in
sections 723 through 730 are described in general terms. Only major
economic terms are included in the descriptions. These descriptions do
not contain the complete contents of the agreements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 724 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,730,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,698,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,902,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,233,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,670,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,233,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the Washington
federation of state employees under the personnel system reform act of
2002. For employees covered under this agreement, funding is provided
for a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also
provided for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30,
2007, and for implementation of the department of personnel 2002 salary
survey for classes more than 25% below market rates.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in LEAP document 2005-780
dated March 28, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 725 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WPEA
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,859,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,750,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $647,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,362,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,692,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the Washington
public employees association under the personnel system reform act of
2002. For employees covered under this agreement, funding is provided
for a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also
provided for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30,
2007, and for implementation of the department of personnel 2002 salary
survey for classes more than 25% below market rates.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in LEAP document 2005-781
dated March 28, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 726 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UFCW
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,138,000
The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the united food
and commercial workers under the personnel system reform act of 2002.
For employees covered under this agreement, funding is provided for a
3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided
for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-83
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 727 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--TEAMSTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,325,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,613,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,941,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the brotherhood
of teamsters under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For
employees covered under this agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2%
salary increase effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for
a 2.9% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for
implementation of the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for
classes more than 25% below market rates.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-82
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 728 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--COALITION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $701,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $926,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,239,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,177,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the coalition
under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered
under this agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of
the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than
25% below market rates.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in LEAP document 2005-786
dated March 28, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 729 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--IFPTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $241,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the international
federation of professional and technical engineers local 17 under the
personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this
agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase effective
July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase effective
July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of the
department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than 25%
below market rates.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in LEAP document 2005-784
dated March 28, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 730 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--SEIU-1199
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,656,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,260,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,574,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $188,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,678,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the service
employees international union, local 1199 NW under the personnel system
reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement,
funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005.
Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006,
until June 30, 2007, for implementation of the department of personnel
2002 salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rates, and
for adjustments to the salary grid.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-85
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 731 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($17,004,000)
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($17,516,000)
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($12,534,000)
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($1,260,000)
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($17,188,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($65,502,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding in this section is provided solely
for funding agency pension changes as set forth in Senate Bill No.
6101. The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the change in funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in: LEAP document 2005-37
dated March 21, 2005; LEAP document 2005-38 dated March 21, 2005; and
LEAP document 2005-36 dated March 28, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 732 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS IN BARGAINED AGREEMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,705,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,403,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,182,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,347,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,907,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the health
insurance collective bargaining agreement reached between the governor
and the health insurance coalition under the personnel system reform
act of 2002 as per the specifications in section 943 of this act. The
office of financial management shall update agency appropriations
schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this section, as
identified by agency and account in LEAP document 2005-35 dated March
28, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 733 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS FOR NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,753,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,001,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,302,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,216,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,450,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for state employee
health insurance benefits for nonrepresented state employees as per the
specifications in section 943 of this act. The office of financial
management shall update agency appropriations schedules to reflect the
addition of the funding in this section, as identified by agency and
account in LEAP document 2005-34 dated March 28, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 734 INSURANCE BENEFITS. The legislature
finds that the trend in the rate of medical expense inflation is
downward and projects an 8.5% rate of inflation for the 2005-07 fiscal
biennium. The funds provided in sections 504, 732, and 733 of this act
are anticipated to be sufficient to hold the average employee share of
medical insurance premiums to no more than 12% of costs under this 8.5%
inflation assumption. If the actual growth in employee medical
insurance costs is greater than 8.5%, the legislature intends to
appropriate additional funds to cover the cost of inflation, up to a
maximum of 11%, in order to maintain the average employee share of
medical premiums at no more than 12% for school district employees and
for state employees represented by a collective bargaining unit under
the personnel system reform act of 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 735 STATE EMPLOYEE INSURANCE BENEFIT
RESERVE. $20,000,000 in the public employees' and retirees' insurance
account shall be held in reserve and may be expended only to the extent
that the annual rate of employee health insurance premium inflation is
greater than 8.5%, shall be used only to fund health benefits for
school district employees and state employees represented by a
collective bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act of
2002, and shall not be used to expand benefits or to reduce the average
employee share of medical insurance premium costs to less than 12%.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 736 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--PENSION CONTRIBUTION ADJUSTMENTS FOR THE PUBLIC SAFETY EMPLOYEES'
RETIREMENT SYSTEM
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000
Special Account Retirement Contribution Increase
Revolving Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($3,900,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to make
adjustments to agency appropriations to reflect the costs associated
with the entry of employees into the public safety employees'
retirement system as created by chapter 242, Laws of 2004.
(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and
accounts, the state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys
from each dedicated fund or account to the special account retirement
contribution increase revolving account in accordance with schedules
provided by the office of financial management.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,577,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,422,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,457,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety and
education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,430,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly
funded autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,969,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation
for harbor improvement revenue
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for
distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,110,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,914,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,104,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for
liquor excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,413,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for
liquor profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,186,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $330,427,000
The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE COUNTY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,913,400
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2005-07 biennium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties
for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving
penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,275,600
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2005-07 biennium to all
cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially
decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and
that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in
which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not
limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties);
chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998
(deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license
suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations);
chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215,
Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FEDERAL REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing
fees distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,632,000
General Fund Appropriation for federal flood
control funds distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,000
Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal
forest reserve fund distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,200,000
The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS. For
transfers in this section to the state general fund, pursuant to RCW
43.135.035(5), the state expenditure limit shall be increased by the
amount of the transfer. The increase shall occur in the fiscal year in
which the transfer occurs.

State Convention and Trade Center Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$5,150,000 for fiscal year 2006 and $5,150,000
for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000
General Fund--State Account:
For transfer to the tourism development
and promotion account, $150,000 for fiscal
year 2006 and $150,000 for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Financial Services Regulation Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $778,000 for
fiscal year 2006 and $779,000 for fiscal
year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,557,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For
transfer to the drinking water
assistance account, $8,400,000 for fiscal
year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,400,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer
to the health services account, in an
amount not to exceed the actual balance
of the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $185,823,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $45,000,000 for fiscal
year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
tobacco prevention and control account . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,366,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
water quality account . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,885,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
violence reduction and drug enforcement
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,932,000
Public Employees' and Retirees' Insurance Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$40,000,000 for fiscal year 2006 and
$45,000,000 for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,000,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$2,000,000 for fiscal year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Secretary of State's Revolving Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $250,000
for fiscal year 2006 and $250,000 for
fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account: For transfer to the state general fund,
$7,500,000 for fiscal year 2006 and $7,500,000
for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $5,500,000 for fiscal
year 2006 and $5,000,000 for fiscal year
2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,500,000
State Toxics Control Account For transfer to
the state general fund, $3,600,000 for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,600,000 for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,200,000
General Fund: For transfer to the water quality
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,137,000
Water Quality Account: For transfer to the
water pollution control revolving account . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,534,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance repayment
account, an amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control
Account: For transfer to the state general
fund, $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2006 and
$1,000,000 for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to
the public facility construction loan revolving
account, $4,500,000 for fiscal year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Student Achievement Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $87,300,000 for
fiscal year 2006 and $77,900,000 for fiscal
year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,200,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account: For transfer to
the disaster response account, $3,000,000 for
fiscal year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
General Fund: For transfer to the public safety
and education account, $10,000,000 for fiscal
year 2006 and $10,000,000 for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
General Fund: For transfer to the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account,
$3,000,000 for fiscal year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Natural Resources Equipment Revolving Fund: For
transfer to the state general fund for fiscal
year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 806 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS. For
transfers in this section to the state general fund, pursuant to RCW
43.135.035(5), the state expenditure limit shall be increased by the
amount of the transfer. The increase shall occur in the fiscal year in
which the transfer occurs. The transfers are subject to the enactment
of Senate Bill No. 5391. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005,
the transfers shall not be made.

Public Employees' and Retirees' Insurance Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$5,000,000 for fiscal year 2006 and $12,000,000
for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS. The
appropriations contained in this act are maximum expenditure
authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys disbursed from the
treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be recorded as
loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes. To
the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding
appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed
from the treasury during the 2003-05 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies
shall comply with the following requirements regarding information
systems projects when specifically directed to do so by this act.
(1) Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology
shall be made in the context of its information technology portfolio.
"Information technology portfolio" means a strategic management
approach in which the relationships between agency missions and
information technology investments can be seen and understood, such
that: Technology efforts are linked to agency objectives and business
plans; the impact of new investments on existing infrastructure and
business functions are assessed and understood before implementation;
and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative statewide infrastructure.
(2) Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in
making decisions on matters related to the following:
(a) System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;
(b) Setting goals and objectives for using information technology
in meeting legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;
(c) Assessment of overall information processing performance,
resources, and capabilities;
(d) Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for
the operation of any new systems developed using external resources;
and
(e) Progress toward enabling electronic access to public
information.
(3) Each project will be planned and designed to take optimal
advantage of Internet technologies and protocols. Agencies shall
ensure that the project is in compliance with the architecture,
infrastructure, principles, policies, and standards of digital
government as maintained by the information services board.
(4) The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information
technology projects at the direction of the information services board
and in accordance with published department of information services
policies and guidelines. At a minimum, such studies shall include a
statement of: (a) The purpose or impetus for change; (b) the business
value to the agency, including an examination and evaluation of
benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a comprehensive risk assessment
based on the proposed project's impact on both citizens and state
operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing nothing; (d)
the impact on agency and statewide information infrastructure; and (e)
the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.
(5) The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for
each project. The plan or plans shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of each project. The plan(s) shall include, but
is not limited to, the following elements: A description of the
problem or opportunity that the information technology project is
intended to address; a statement of project objectives and assumptions;
a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to be
accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for
the phased approach shall be such that the business case justification
for a project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or
adds measurable value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business
functions within each development cycle.
(6) The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for
information technology projects. Consistent with the direction of the
information services board and the published policies and guidelines of
the department of information services, the quality assurance plan
shall address all factors critical to successful completion of the
project and successful integration with the agency and state
information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality assurance
plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The
quality assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements
for each phase of a project.
(7) A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and
quality assurance plan shall be provided to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and
legislative fiscal committees. The plans and studies shall demonstrate
a sound business case that justifies the investment of taxpayer funds
on any new project, an assessment of the impact of the proposed system
on the existing information technology infrastructure, the disciplined
use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging of
private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval
of the relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan by the department of information services and the office
of financial management.
(8) Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the
department of information services, the office of financial management,
and legislative fiscal committees at intervals specified in the
project's quality assurance plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 BUSINESS CONTINUITY AND DISASTER
RECOVERY. State agencies shall comply with the business continuity and
disaster recovery policies, guidelines, and statements of direction
developed by the department of information services and the information
services board in consultation with state agencies. To ensure that
agency business continuity and disaster recovery activities identify
the primary risks across state agencies, account for dependencies
between agencies, capitalize on economies of scale, and avoid
unnecessary duplication of costs and efforts, state agencies shall
receive the prior approval of the department of information services
before implementing business continuity and disaster recovery
strategies and expending funds for business continuity activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS. The department
of information services shall act as lead agency in coordinating video
telecommunications services for state agencies. As lead agency, the
department shall develop standards and common specifications for leased
and purchased telecommunications equipment and assist state agencies in
developing a video telecommunications expenditure plan. No agency may
spend any portion of any appropriation in this act for new video
telecommunication equipment, new video telecommunication transmission,
or new video telecommunication programming, or for expanding current
video telecommunication systems without first complying with chapter
43.105 RCW, including but not limited to, RCW 43.105.041(2), and
without first submitting a video telecommunications expenditure plan,
in accordance with the policies of the department of information
services, for review and assessment by the department of information
services under RCW 43.105.052. Prior to any such expenditure by a
public school, a video telecommunications expenditure plan shall be
approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall submit the plans to the
department of information services in a form prescribed by the
department. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications in public schools
by providing educational information to local school districts and
shall assist local school districts and educational service districts
in telecommunications planning and curriculum development. Prior to
any such expenditure by a public institution of postsecondary
education, a telecommunications expenditure plan shall be approved by
the higher education coordinating board. The higher education
coordinating board shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications
for instruction and instructional support in postsecondary education,
including the review and approval of instructional telecommunications
course offerings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 PROGRAM COST SHIFTS. Any program costs
or moneys in this act that are shifted to the general fund from another
fund or account require an adjustment to the expenditure limit under
RCW 43.135.035(5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS. Whenever
allocations are made from the governor's emergency fund appropriation
to an agency that is financed in whole or in part by other than general
fund moneys, the director of financial management may direct the
repayment of such allocated amount to the general fund from any balance
in the fund or funds which finance the agency. No appropriation shall
be necessary to effect such repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS. In addition
to the amounts appropriated in this act for revenues for distribution,
state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2, and bond retirement and interest including
ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on
registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also
appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for
these purposes under any statutory formula or under chapters 39.94 and
39.96 RCW or any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 BOND EXPENSES. In addition to such other
appropriations as are made by this act, there is hereby appropriated to
the state finance committee from legally available bond proceeds in the
applicable construction or building funds and accounts such amounts as
are necessary to pay the expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the subject bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 VOLUNTARY SEPARATION INCENTIVES. As a
management tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of
resources, while improving employee productivity and morale, agencies
may offer voluntary separation and/or downshifting incentives and
options according to procedures and guidelines established by the
department of personnel and the department of retirement systems in
consultation with the office of financial management. The options may
include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for: Voluntary
resignation and retirement, voluntary leave-without-pay, voluntary
workweek or work hour reduction, voluntary downward movement, or
temporary separation for development purposes. No employee shall have
a contractual right to a financial incentive offered pursuant to this
section. Agencies shall report on the outcomes of their plans, and
offers shall be reviewed and monitored jointly by the department of
personnel and the department of retirement systems, for reporting to
the office of financial management by December 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910 VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT INCENTIVES. It is
the intent of the legislature that agencies may implement a voluntary
retirement incentive program that is cost neutral or results in cost
savings provided that such a program is approved by the director of
retirement systems and the office of financial management. Agencies
participating in this authorization are required to submit a report by
June 30, 2007, to the legislature and the office of financial
management on the outcome of their approved retirement incentive
program. The report should include information on the details of the
program including resulting service delivery changes, agency
efficiencies, the cost of the retirement incentive per participant, the
total cost to the state, and the projected or actual net dollar savings
over the 2005-07 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911 AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR MOTOR VEHICLES.
The use of hybrid motor vehicles reduces air contaminants, greenhouse
gas emissions and reliance on imported sources of petroleum. To foster
the use of hybrid motor vehicles, beginning July 1, 2005, before the
purchase or lease of a motor vehicle, state agencies should first
consider the feasibility of hybrid motor vehicles. State agencies
should strive to purchase or lease a hybrid motor vehicle when the use
of such vehicle is consistent with and can accomplish the agency's
mission and when the purchase is financially reasonable. The financial
assessment should include savings accruing from reduced fuel purchases
over the life of the vehicle. Agencies shall report on their purchases
of hybrid vehicles in their biennial sustainability plans as required
under executive order 02-03.

Sec. 912 RCW 28A.160.195 and 2004 c 276 s 904 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the regional transportation coordinators of the educational service
districts, shall establish a minimum number of school bus categories
considering the capacity and type of vehicles required by school
districts in Washington. The superintendent, in consultation with the
regional transportation coordinators of the educational service
districts, shall establish competitive specifications for each category
of school bus. The categories shall be developed to produce minimum
long-range operating costs, including costs of equipment and all costs
in operating the vehicles. The categories, for purposes of comparative
studies, will be at a minimum the same as those in the beginning of the
1994-95 school year. The competitive specifications shall meet federal
motor vehicle safety standards, minimum state specifications as
established by rule by the superintendent, and supported options as
determined by the superintendent in consultation with the regional
transportation coordinators of the educational service districts. In
fiscal ((year 2005)) years 2006 and 2007, the superintendent may
solicit and accept price quotes for a rear-engine category school bus
that shall be reimbursed at the price of the corresponding front engine
category.
(2) After establishing school bus categories and competitive
specifications, the superintendent of public instruction shall solicit
competitive price quotes from school bus dealers to be in effect for
one year and shall (a) except in fiscal ((year 2005)) years 2006 and
2007, establish a list of the lowest competitive price quotes obtained
under this subsection, and (b) in fiscal ((year 2005)) years 2006 and
2007, establish a list of all accepted price quotes in each category
obtained under this subsection.
(3) The superintendent shall base the level of reimbursement to
school districts and educational service districts for school buses on
the lowest quote in each category.
(4) Notwithstanding RCW 28A.335.190, school districts and
educational service districts may purchase at the quoted price directly
from the dealer who is providing the lowest competitive price quote on
the list established under subsection (2) of this section and in fiscal
((year 2005)) years 2006 and 2007 from any dealer on the list
established under subsection (2)(b) of this section. School districts
and educational service districts may make their own selections for
school buses, but shall be reimbursed at the rates determined under
subsection (3) of this section and RCW 28A.160.200. District-selected
options shall not be reimbursed by the state. For the ((2003-05))
2005-2007 fiscal biennium, school districts and educational service
districts shall be reimbursed for buses purchased only through a
lowest-price competitive bid process conducted pursuant to RCW
28A.335.190 or through the state bid process established by this
section.
(5) This section does not prohibit school districts or educational
service districts from conducting their own competitive bid process.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW to implement this section.

Sec. 913 RCW 28A.305.210 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 911 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The state board of education, by rule or regulation, may
require the assistance of educational service district boards and/or
superintendents in the performance of any duty, authority, or power
imposed upon or granted to the state board of education by law, upon
such terms and conditions as the state board of education shall
establish. Such authority to assist the state board of education shall
be limited to the service function of information collection and
dissemination and the attestment to the accuracy and completeness of
submitted information.
(2) During the ((2003-05)) 2005-2007 biennium, educational service
districts may, at the request of the state board of education, receive
and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct school
accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education rules,
and submit to the state board of education postsite visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

Sec. 914 RCW 28A.500.030 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 912 are each
amended to read as follows:
Allocation of state matching funds to eligible districts for local
effort assistance shall be determined as follows:
(1) Funds raised by the district through maintenance and operation
levies shall be matched with state funds using the following ratio of
state funds to levy funds:
(a) The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate
and the statewide average twelve percent levy rate; to
(b) The statewide average twelve percent levy rate.
(2) The maximum amount of state matching funds for districts
eligible for local effort assistance shall be the district's twelve
percent levy amount, multiplied by the following percentage:
(a) The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate
and the statewide average twelve percent levy rate; divided by
(b) The district's twelve percent levy rate.
(3) Calendar year 2003 allocations and maximum eligibility under
this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.99.
(4) From January 1, 2004, to ((June 30,)) December 31, 2005,
allocations and maximum eligibility under this chapter shall be
multiplied by 0.937.

Sec. 915 RCW 41.05.050 and 2003 c 158 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every department, division, or separate agency of state
government, and such county, municipal, school district, educational
service district, or other political subdivisions as are covered by
this chapter, shall provide contributions to insurance and health care
plans for its employees and their dependents, the content of such plans
to be determined by the authority. Contributions, paid by the county,
the municipality, or other political subdivision for their employees,
shall include an amount determined by the authority to pay such
administrative expenses of the authority as are necessary to administer
the plans for employees of those groups, except as provided in
subsection (4) of this section.
(2) If the authority at any time determines that the participation
of a county, municipal, or other political subdivision covered under
this chapter adversely impacts insurance rates for state employees, the
authority shall implement limitations on the participation of
additional county, municipal, or other political subdivisions.
(3) The contributions of any department, division, or separate
agency of the state government, and such county, municipal, or other
political subdivisions as are covered by this chapter, shall be set by
the authority, subject to the approval of the governor for availability
of funds as specifically appropriated by the legislature for that
purpose. Insurance and health care contributions for ferry employees
shall be governed by RCW 47.64.270.
(4)(a) Beginning September 1, 2003, the authority shall collect
from each participating school district and educational service
district an amount equal to the composite rate charged to state
agencies, plus an amount equal to the employee premiums by plan and
family size as would be charged to state employees, for groups of
district employees enrolled in authority plans as of January 1, 2003.
However, during the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the authority shall
collect from each participating school district and educational service
district an amount equal to the insurance benefit allocations provided
in section 504 of this act, plus any additional funding provided by the
legislature for school employee health benefits, plus an amount equal
to the employee premiums by plan and family size as would be charged to
state employees, for groups of district employees enrolled in authority
plans as of July 1, 2005.
(b) For all groups of district employees enrolling in authority
plans for the first time after September 1, 2003, the authority shall
collect from each participating school district an amount equal to the
composite rate charged to state agencies, plus an amount equal to the
employee premiums by plan and by family size as would be charged to
state employees, only if the authority determines that this method of
billing the districts will not result in a material difference between
revenues from districts and expenditures made by the authority on
behalf of districts and their employees.
(c) If the authority determines at any time that the conditions in
(b) of this subsection cannot be met, the authority shall offer
enrollment to additional groups of district employees on a tiered rate
structure until such time as the authority determines there would be no
material difference between revenues and expenditures under a composite
rate structure for all district employees enrolled in authority plans.
(d) The authority may charge districts a one-time set-up fee for
employee groups enrolling in authority plans for the first time.
(e) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "District" means school district and educational service
district; and
(ii) "Tiered rates" means the amounts the authority must pay to
insuring entities by plan and by family size.
(f) Notwithstanding this subsection and RCW 41.05.065(3), the
authority may allow districts enrolled on a tiered rate structure prior
to September 1, 2002, to continue participation based on the same rate
structure and under the same conditions and eligibility criteria.
(5) The authority shall transmit a recommendation for the amount of
the employer contribution to the governor and the director of financial
management for inclusion in the proposed budgets submitted to the
legislature.

Sec. 916 RCW 41.05.120 and 1994 c 153 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The public employees' and retirees' insurance account is hereby
established in the custody of the state treasurer, to be used by the
administrator for the deposit of contributions, the remittance paid by
school districts and educational service districts ((under RCW
28A.400.400)), reserves, dividends, and refunds, and for payment of
premiums for employee and retiree insurance benefit contracts and
subsidy amounts provided under RCW 41.05.085. Moneys from the account
shall be disbursed by the state treasurer by warrants on vouchers duly
authorized by the administrator.
(2) The state treasurer and the state investment board may invest
moneys in the public employees' and retirees' insurance account. All
such investments shall be in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 or
43.84.150, whichever is applicable. The administrator shall determine
whether the state treasurer or the state investment board or both shall
invest moneys in the public employees' insurance account.
(3) During the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the public employees' and retirees' insurance account
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 917 RCW 41.50.110 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 914 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this
section, all expenses of the administration of the department, the
expenses of administration of the retirement systems, and the expenses
of the administration of the office of the state actuary created in
chapters 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.34, 41.35, 43.43, and
44.44 RCW shall be paid from the department of retirement systems
expense fund.
(2) In order to reimburse the department of retirement systems
expense fund on an equitable basis the department shall ascertain and
report to each employer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010,
41.35.010, or 41.40.010, the sum necessary to defray its proportional
share of the entire expense of the administration of the retirement
system that the employer participates in during the ensuing biennium or
fiscal year whichever may be required. Such sum is to be computed in
an amount directly proportional to the estimated entire expense of the
administration as the ratio of monthly salaries of the employer's
members bears to the total salaries of all members in the entire
system. It shall then be the duty of all such employers to include in
their budgets or otherwise provide the amounts so required.
(3) The department shall compute and bill each employer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, at the end of
each month for the amount due for that month to the department of
retirement systems expense fund and the same shall be paid as are its
other obligations. Such computation as to each employer shall be made
on a percentage rate of salary established by the department. However,
the department may at its discretion establish a system of billing
based upon calendar year quarters in which event the said billing shall
be at the end of each such quarter.
(4) The director may adjust the expense fund contribution rate for
each system at any time when necessary to reflect unanticipated costs
or savings in administering the department.
(5) An employer who fails to submit timely and accurate reports to
the department may be assessed an additional fee related to the
increased costs incurred by the department in processing the deficient
reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in the
retirement system expense fund.
(a) Every six months the department shall determine the amount of
an employer's fee by reviewing the timeliness and accuracy of the
reports submitted by the employer in the preceding six months. If
those reports were not both timely and accurate the department may
prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.
(b) An additional fee assessed by the department under this
subsection shall not exceed fifty percent of the standard fee.
(c) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.
(6) Expenses other than those under RCW 41.34.060(3) shall be paid
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(7) During the ((2003-)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the department of retirement systems' expense fund to
the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
of the fund.

Sec. 918 RCW 41.50.110 and 2004 c 242 s 46 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this
section, all expenses of the administration of the department, the
expenses of administration of the retirement systems, and the expenses
of the administration of the office of the state actuary created in
chapters 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.34, 41.35, 41.37, 43.43,
and 44.44 RCW shall be paid from the department of retirement systems
expense fund.
(2) In order to reimburse the department of retirement systems
expense fund on an equitable basis the department shall ascertain and
report to each employer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010,
41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, the sum necessary to defray its
proportional share of the entire expense of the administration of the
retirement system that the employer participates in during the ensuing
biennium or fiscal year whichever may be required. Such sum is to be
computed in an amount directly proportional to the estimated entire
expense of the administration as the ratio of monthly salaries of the
employer's members bears to the total salaries of all members in the
entire system. It shall then be the duty of all such employers to
include in their budgets or otherwise provide the amounts so required.
(3) The department shall compute and bill each employer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, at the
end of each month for the amount due for that month to the department
of retirement systems expense fund and the same shall be paid as are
its other obligations. Such computation as to each employer shall be
made on a percentage rate of salary established by the department.
However, the department may at its discretion establish a system of
billing based upon calendar year quarters in which event the said
billing shall be at the end of each such quarter.
(4) The director may adjust the expense fund contribution rate for
each system at any time when necessary to reflect unanticipated costs
or savings in administering the department.
(5) An employer who fails to submit timely and accurate reports to
the department may be assessed an additional fee related to the
increased costs incurred by the department in processing the deficient
reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in the
retirement system expense fund.
(a) Every six months the department shall determine the amount of
an employer's fee by reviewing the timeliness and accuracy of the
reports submitted by the employer in the preceding six months. If
those reports were not both timely and accurate the department may
prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.
(b) An additional fee assessed by the department under this
subsection shall not exceed fifty percent of the standard fee.
(c) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.
(6) Expenses other than those under RCW 41.34.060(3) shall be paid
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(7) During the ((2003-)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the department of retirement systems' expense fund to
the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
of the fund.

Sec. 919 RCW 43.07.130 and 1994 c 211 s 1311 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created within the state treasury a revolving fund, to be
known as the "secretary of state's revolving fund," which shall be used
by the office of the secretary of state to defray the costs of
printing, reprinting, or distributing printed matter authorized by law
to be issued by the office of the secretary of state, and any other
cost of carrying out the functions of the secretary of state under
Title 23B RCW, or chapters 18.100, 23.86, 23.90, 24.03, 24.06, 24.12,
24.20, 24.24, 24.28, 24.36, 25.15, or 25.10 RCW.
The secretary of state is hereby authorized to charge a fee for
such publications in an amount which will compensate for the costs of
printing, reprinting, and distributing such printed matter. Fees
recovered by the secretary of state under RCW 43.07.120(2), 23B.01.220
(1)(e), (6) and (7), 23B.18.050, 24.03.410, 24.06.455, or 46.64.040,
and such other moneys as are expressly designated for deposit in the
secretary of state's revolving fund shall be placed in the secretary of
state's revolving fund.
During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the secretary of state's revolving fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 920 RCW 43.08.190 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 916 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury to be
known as the "state treasurer's service fund". Such fund shall be used
solely for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the operation
and administration of the state treasurer's office.
Moneys shall be allocated monthly and placed in the state
treasurer's service fund equivalent to a maximum of one percent of the
trust and treasury average daily cash balances from the earnings
generated under the authority of RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.080 other
than earnings generated from investment of balances in funds and
accounts specified in RCW ((43.79.040)) 43.79A.040 or 43.84.092(4)(b).
The allocation shall precede the distribution of the remaining earnings
as prescribed under RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.092. The state treasurer
shall establish a uniform allocation rate based on the appropriations
for the treasurer's office.
During the ((2003-)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state treasurer's service fund to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 921 RCW 43.08.250 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 918 are each
amended to read as follows:
The money received by the state treasurer from fees, fines,
forfeitures, penalties, reimbursements or assessments by any court
organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, or chapter 2.08 RCW, shall be
deposited in the public safety and education account which is hereby
created in the state treasury. The legislature shall appropriate the
funds in the account to promote traffic safety education, highway
safety, criminal justice training, crime victims' compensation,
judicial education, the judicial information system, civil
representation of indigent persons, winter recreation parking, drug
court operations, and state game programs. During the fiscal biennium
ending June 30, ((2005)) 2007, the legislature may appropriate moneys
from the public safety and education account for purposes of appellate
indigent defense and other operations of the office of public defense,
the criminal litigation unit of the attorney general's office, the
treatment alternatives to street crimes program, crime victims advocacy
programs, justice information network telecommunication planning,
treatment for supplemental security income clients, sexual assault
treatment, operations of the office of administrator for the courts,
security in the common schools, alternative school start-up grants,
programs for disruptive students, criminal justice data collection,
Washington state patrol criminal justice activities, drug court
operations, unified family courts, local court backlog assistance,
financial assistance to local jurisdictions for extraordinary costs
incurred in the adjudication of criminal cases, domestic violence
treatment and related services, the department of corrections' costs in
implementing chapter 196, Laws of 1999, reimbursement of local
governments for costs associated with implementing criminal and civil
justice legislation, the replacement of the department of corrections'
offender-based tracking system, secure and semi-secure crisis
residential centers, HOPE beds, the family policy council and community
public health and safety networks, the street youth program, public
notification about registered sex offenders, and narcotics or
methamphetamine-related enforcement, education, training, and drug and
alcohol treatment services.

Sec. 922 RCW 43.10.180 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 917 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The attorney general shall keep such records as are necessary
to facilitate proper allocation of costs to funds and agencies served
and the director of financial management shall prescribe appropriate
accounting procedures to accurately allocate costs to funds and
agencies served. Billings shall be adjusted in line with actual costs
incurred at intervals not to exceed six months.
(2) During the ((2003-05)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, all expenses
for administration of the office of the attorney general shall be
allocated to and paid from the legal services revolving fund in
accordance with accounting procedures prescribed by the director of
financial management.

Sec. 923 RCW 43.43.944 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 919 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The fire service training account is hereby established in the
state treasury. The fund shall consist of:
(a) All fees received by the Washington state patrol for fire
service training;
(b) All grants and bequests accepted by the Washington state patrol
under RCW 43.43.940; and
(c) Twenty percent of all moneys received by the state on fire
insurance premiums.
(2) Moneys in the account may be appropriated only for fire service
training. During the ((2003-2005)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may appropriate funds from this account for school fire
prevention activities within the Washington state patrol.

Sec. 924 RCW 43.70.320 and 1993 c 492 s 411 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created in the state treasury an account to be known
as the health professions account. All fees received by the department
for health professions licenses, registration, certifications,
renewals, or examinations and the civil penalties assessed and
collected by the department under RCW 18.130.190 shall be forwarded to
the state treasurer who shall credit such moneys to the health
professions account.
(2) All expenses incurred in carrying out the health professions
licensing activities of the department shall be paid from the account
as authorized by legislative appropriation. Any residue in the account
shall be accumulated and shall not revert to the general fund at the
end of the biennium.
(3) The secretary shall biennially prepare a budget request based
on the anticipated costs of administering the health professions
licensing activities of the department which shall include the
estimated income from health professions fees.
(4) During the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate moneys in the health professions account for the purpose of
grants to a central nursing resource center.

Sec. 925 RCW 43.72.900 and 2003 c 259 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The health services account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Subject
to the transfers described in subsection (3) of this section, moneys in
the account may be expended only for maintaining and expanding health
services access for low-income residents, maintaining and expanding the
public health system, maintaining and improving the capacity of the
health care system, containing health care costs, and the regulation,
planning, and administering of the health care system.
(2) Funds deposited into the health services account under RCW
82.24.028 and 82.26.028 shall be used solely as follows:
(a) Five million dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July
1, 2002, and five million dollars for the state fiscal year beginning
July 1, 2003, shall be appropriated by the legislature for programs
that effectively improve the health of low-income persons, including
efforts to reduce diseases and illnesses that harm low-income persons.
The department of health shall submit a report to the legislature on
March 1, 2002, evaluating the cost-effectiveness of programs that
improve the health of low-income persons and address diseases and
illnesses that disproportionately affect low-income persons, and making
recommendations to the legislature on which of these programs could
most effectively utilize the funds appropriated under this subsection.
(b) Ten percent of the funds deposited into the health services
account under RCW 82.24.028 and 82.26.028 remaining after the
appropriation under (a) of this subsection shall be transferred no less
frequently than annually by the treasurer to the tobacco prevention and
control account established by RCW 43.79.480. The funds transferred
shall be used exclusively for implementation of the Washington state
tobacco prevention and control plan and shall be used only to
supplement, and not supplant, funds in the tobacco prevention and
control account as of January 1, 2001, however, these funds may be used
to replace funds appropriated by the legislature for further
implementation of the Washington state tobacco prevention and control
plan for the biennium beginning July 1, 2001. For each state fiscal
year beginning on and after July 1, 2002, the legislature shall
appropriate no less than twenty-six million two hundred forty thousand
dollars from the tobacco prevention and control account for
implementation of the Washington state tobacco prevention and control
plan.
(c) Because of its demonstrated effectiveness in improving the
health of low-income persons and addressing illnesses and diseases that
harm low-income persons, the remainder of the funds deposited into the
health services account under RCW 82.24.028 and 82.26.028 shall be
appropriated solely for Washington basic health plan enrollment as
provided in chapter 70.47 RCW. Funds appropriated under this
subsection may be used to support outreach and enrollment activities
only to the extent necessary to achieve the enrollment goals described
in this section.
(3) Prior to expenditure for the purposes described in subsection
(2) of this section, funds deposited into the health services account
under RCW 82.24.028 and 82.26.028 shall first be transferred to the
following accounts to ensure the continued availability of previously
dedicated revenues for certain existing programs:
(a) To the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520, two million two hundred forty-nine thousand five hundred
dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2001, four million
two hundred forty-eight thousand dollars for the state fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2002, seven million seven hundred eighty-nine
thousand dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2003, six million
nine hundred thirty-two thousand dollars for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2005, and six million nine hundred thirty-two thousand dollars
for each biennium thereafter, as required by RCW 82.24.020(2);
(b) To the health services account under this section, nine million
seventy-seven thousand dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July
1, 2001, seventeen million one hundred eighty-eight thousand dollars
for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002, thirty-one million
seven hundred fifty-five thousand dollars for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2003, twenty-eight million six hundred twenty-two thousand
dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2005, and twenty-eight
million six hundred twenty-two thousand dollars for each biennium
thereafter, as required by RCW 82.24.020(3); and
(c) To the water quality account under RCW 70.146.030, two million
two hundred three thousand five hundred dollars for the state fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2001, four million two hundred forty-four
thousand dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002,
eight million one hundred eighty-two thousand dollars for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2003, seven million eight hundred eighty-five
thousand dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2005, and seven
million eight hundred eighty-five thousand dollars for each biennium
thereafter, as required by RCW 82.24.027(2)(a).
During the ((2001-2003)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the health services account such amounts as reflect
the excess fund balance of the account to the state general fund.

Sec. 926 RCW 43.320.110 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 921 and 2003 c
288 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
There is created a local fund known as the "financial services
regulation fund" which shall consist of all moneys received by the
divisions of the department of financial institutions, except for the
division of securities which shall deposit thirteen percent of all
moneys received, except as provided in RCW 43.320.115, and which shall
be used for the purchase of supplies and necessary equipment; the
payment of salaries, wages, and utilities; the establishment of
reserves; and other incidental costs required for the proper regulation
of individuals and entities subject to regulation by the department.
The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the fund. Disbursements
from the fund shall be on authorization of the director of financial
institutions or the director's designee. In order to maintain an
effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be subject in
all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to
permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.
During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the financial services regulation fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 927 RCW 50.20.190 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 26 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) An individual who is paid any amount as benefits under this
title to which he or she is not entitled shall, unless otherwise
relieved pursuant to this section, be liable for repayment of the
amount overpaid. The department shall issue an overpayment assessment
setting forth the reasons for and the amount of the overpayment. The
amount assessed, to the extent not collected, may be deducted from any
future benefits payable to the individual: PROVIDED, That in the
absence of a back pay award, a settlement affecting the allowance of
benefits, fraud, misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure, every
determination of liability shall be mailed or personally served not
later than two years after the close of or final payment made on the
individual's applicable benefit year for which the purported
overpayment was made, whichever is later, unless the merits of the
claim are subjected to administrative or judicial review in which event
the period for serving the determination of liability shall be extended
to allow service of the determination of liability during the six-month
period following the final decision affecting the claim.
(2) The commissioner may waive an overpayment if the commissioner
finds that the overpayment was not the result of fraud,
misrepresentation, willful nondisclosure, or fault attributable to the
individual and that the recovery thereof would be against equity and
good conscience: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the overpayment so waived
shall be charged against the individual's applicable entitlement for
the eligibility period containing the weeks to which the overpayment
was attributed as though such benefits had been properly paid.
(3) Any assessment herein provided shall constitute a determination
of liability from which an appeal may be had in the same manner and to
the same extent as provided for appeals relating to determinations in
respect to claims for benefits: PROVIDED, That an appeal from any
determination covering overpayment only shall be deemed to be an appeal
from the determination which was the basis for establishing the
overpayment unless the merits involved in the issue set forth in such
determination have already been heard and passed upon by the appeal
tribunal. If no such appeal is taken to the appeal tribunal by the
individual within thirty days of the delivery of the notice of
determination of liability, or within thirty days of the mailing of the
notice of determination, whichever is the earlier, the determination of
liability shall be deemed conclusive and final. Whenever any such
notice of determination of liability becomes conclusive and final, the
commissioner, upon giving at least twenty days notice by certified mail
return receipt requested to the individual's last known address of the
intended action, may file with the superior court clerk of any county
within the state a warrant in the amount of the notice of determination
of liability plus a filing fee under RCW 36.18.012(10). The clerk of
the county where the warrant is filed shall immediately designate a
superior court cause number for the warrant, and the clerk shall cause
to be entered in the judgment docket under the superior court cause
number assigned to the warrant, the name of the person(s) mentioned in
the warrant, the amount of the notice of determination of liability,
and the date when the warrant was filed. The amount of the warrant as
docketed shall become a lien upon the title to, and any interest in,
all real and personal property of the person(s) against whom the
warrant is issued, the same as a judgment in a civil case duly docketed
in the office of such clerk. A warrant so docketed shall be sufficient
to support the issuance of writs of execution and writs of garnishment
in favor of the state in the manner provided by law for a civil
judgment. A copy of the warrant shall be mailed to the person(s)
mentioned in the warrant by certified mail to the person's last known
address within five days of its filing with the clerk.
(4) On request of any agency which administers an employment
security law of another state, the United States, or a foreign
government and which has found in accordance with the provisions of
such law that a claimant is liable to repay benefits received under
such law, the commissioner may collect the amount of such benefits from
the claimant to be refunded to the agency. In any case in which under
this section a claimant is liable to repay any amount to the agency of
another state, the United States, or a foreign government, such amounts
may be collected without interest by civil action in the name of the
commissioner acting as agent for such agency if the other state, the
United States, or the foreign government extends such collection rights
to the employment security department of the state of Washington, and
provided that the court costs be paid by the governmental agency
benefiting from such collection.
(5) Any employer who is a party to a back pay award or settlement
due to loss of wages shall, within thirty days of the award or
settlement, report to the department the amount of the award or
settlement, the name and social security number of the recipient of the
award or settlement, and the period for which it is awarded. When an
individual has been awarded or receives back pay, for benefit purposes
the amount of the back pay shall constitute wages paid in the period
for which it was awarded. For contribution purposes, the back pay
award or settlement shall constitute wages paid in the period in which
it was actually paid. The following requirements shall also apply:
(a) The employer shall reduce the amount of the back pay award or
settlement by an amount determined by the department based upon the
amount of unemployment benefits received by the recipient of the award
or settlement during the period for which the back pay award or
settlement was awarded;
(b) The employer shall pay to the unemployment compensation fund,
in a manner specified by the commissioner, an amount equal to the
amount of such reduction;
(c) The employer shall also pay to the department any taxes due for
unemployment insurance purposes on the entire amount of the back pay
award or settlement notwithstanding any reduction made pursuant to (a)
of this subsection;
(d) If the employer fails to reduce the amount of the back pay
award or settlement as required in (a) of this subsection, the
department shall issue an overpayment assessment against the recipient
of the award or settlement in the amount that the back pay award or
settlement should have been reduced; and
(e) If the employer fails to pay to the department an amount equal
to the reduction as required in (b) of this subsection, the department
shall issue an assessment of liability against the employer which shall
be collected pursuant to the procedures for collection of assessments
provided herein and in RCW 50.24.110.
(6) When an individual fails to repay an overpayment assessment
that is due and fails to arrange for satisfactory repayment terms, the
commissioner shall impose an interest penalty of one percent per month
of the outstanding balance. Interest shall accrue immediately on
overpayments assessed pursuant to RCW 50.20.070 and shall be imposed
when the assessment becomes final. For any other overpayment, interest
shall accrue when the individual has missed two or more of the
individual's monthly payments either partially or in full. The
interest penalty shall be used, first, to fully fund either social
security number cross-match audits or other more effective activities
that ensure that individuals are entitled to all amounts of benefits
that they are paid ((and)), second, to fund other detection and
recovery of overpayment and collection activities and, third, during
the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, to the cost of the job skills program and
one-time funding associated with expanding curricula and enrollment in
high-demand fields by the community and technical colleges as
appropriated by the legislature.

Sec. 928 RCW 50.16.010 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 23 and 2003 1st
sp.s. c 25 s 925 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be maintained as special funds, separate and apart
from all public moneys or funds of this state an unemployment
compensation fund, an administrative contingency fund, and a federal
interest payment fund, which shall be administered by the commissioner
exclusively for the purposes of this title, and to which RCW 43.01.050
shall not be applicable.
(2)(a) The unemployment compensation fund shall consist of:
(i) All contributions collected under RCW 50.24.010 and payments in
lieu of contributions collected pursuant to the provisions of this
title;
(ii) Any property or securities acquired through the use of moneys
belonging to the fund;
(iii) All earnings of such property or securities;
(iv) Any moneys received from the federal unemployment account in
the unemployment trust fund in accordance with Title XII of the social
security act, as amended;
(v) All money recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund;
(vi) All money credited to this state's account in the unemployment
trust fund pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as
amended;
(vii) All money received from the federal government as
reimbursement pursuant to section 204 of the federal-state extended
compensation act of 1970 (84 Stat. 708-712; 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3304); and
(viii) All moneys received for the fund from any other source.
(b) All moneys in the unemployment compensation fund shall be
commingled and undivided.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the
administrative contingency fund shall consist of:
(i) All interest on delinquent contributions collected pursuant to
this title;
(ii) All fines and penalties collected pursuant to the provisions
of this title;
(iii) All sums recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund; and
(iv) Revenue received under RCW 50.24.014.
(b) All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or
assessed by a district court because of the violation of this title or
rules adopted under this title shall be remitted as provided in chapter
3.62 RCW.
(c) Moneys available in the administrative contingency fund, other
than money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a),
shall be expended upon the direction of the commissioner, with the
approval of the governor, whenever it appears to him or her that such
expenditure is necessary solely for:
(i) The proper administration of this title and no federal funds
are available for the specific purpose to which such expenditure is to
be made, provided, the moneys are not substituted for appropriations
from federal funds which, in the absence of such moneys, would be made
available.
(ii) The proper administration of this title for which purpose
appropriations from federal funds have been requested but not yet
received, provided, the administrative contingency fund will be
reimbursed upon receipt of the requested federal appropriation.
(iii) The proper administration of this title for which compliance
and audit issues have been identified that establish federal claims
requiring the expenditure of state resources in resolution. Claims
must be resolved in the following priority: First priority is to
provide services to eligible participants within the state; second
priority is to provide substitute services or program support; and last
priority is the direct payment of funds to the federal government.
(d) During the ((2003-2005)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the cost of
the job skills program and ((the alliance for corporate education at))
one-time funding associated with expanding curricula and enrollment in
high-demand fields by the community and technical colleges as
appropriated by the legislature.
Money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a) may
only be expended, after appropriation, for the purposes specified in
this section and RCW 50.62.010, 50.62.020, 50.62.030, 50.24.014,
50.44.053, and 50.22.010.

Sec. 929 RCW 66.16.010 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 928 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be established at such places throughout the state
as the liquor control board, constituted under this title, shall deem
advisable, stores to be known as "state liquor stores," for the sale of
liquor in accordance with the provisions of this title and the
regulations: PROVIDED, That the prices of all liquor shall be fixed by
the board from time to time so that the net annual revenue received by
the board therefrom shall not exceed thirty-five percent. Effective no
later than ((September 1, 2003)) July 1, 2005, the liquor control board
shall add an equivalent surcharge of $0.42 per liter on all retail
sales of spirits, excluding licensee, military, and tribal sales. The
intent of this surcharge is to raise (($14,000,000 in additional))
revenue for the general fund-state ((revenue)) for the ((2003-))2005-2007 biennium. ((To the extent that a lesser surcharge is sufficient
to raise $14,000,000, the board may reduce the amount of the
surcharge.)) The board shall remove the surcharge ((once it generates
$14,000,000, but no later than)) June 30, ((2005)) 2007.
(2) The liquor control board may, from time to time, fix the
special price at which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to physicians and
dentists and institutions regularly conducted as hospitals, for use or
consumption only in such hospitals; and may also fix the special price
at which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to schools, colleges and
universities within the state for use for scientific purposes.
Regularly conducted hospitals may have right to purchase pure ethyl
alcohol on a federal permit.
(3) The liquor control board may also fix the special price at
which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to any department, branch or
institution of the state of Washington, federal government, or to any
person engaged in a manufacturing or industrial business or in
scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use therein.
(4) The liquor control board may also fix a special price at which
pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to any private individual, and shall
make regulations governing such sale of alcohol to private individuals
as shall promote, as nearly as may be, the minimum purchase of such
alcohol by such persons.

Sec. 930 RCW 67.40.040 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 929 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW
67.40.030, proceeds of the taxes imposed under RCW 67.40.090 and
67.40.130, and all other moneys received by the state convention and
trade center from any public or private source which are intended to
fund the acquisition, design, construction, expansion, exterior cleanup
and repair of the Eagles building, conversion of various retail and
other space to meeting rooms, purchase of the land and building known
as the McKay Parcel, development of low-income housing, or renovation
of the center, and those expenditures authorized under RCW 67.40.170
shall be deposited in the state convention and trade center account
hereby created in the state treasury and in such subaccounts as are
deemed appropriate by the directors of the corporation.
(2) Moneys in the account, including unanticipated revenues under
RCW 43.79.270, shall be used exclusively for the following purposes in
the following priority:
(a) For reimbursement of the state general fund under RCW
67.40.060;
(b) After appropriation by statute:
(i) For payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030;
(ii) For expenditures authorized in RCW 67.40.170;
(iii) For acquisition, design, and construction of the state
convention and trade center; and
(iv) For reimbursement of any expenditures from the state general
fund in support of the state convention and trade center; and
(c) For transfer to the state convention and trade center
operations account.
(3) The corporation shall identify with specificity those
facilities of the state convention and trade center that are to be
financed with proceeds of general obligation bonds, the interest on
which is intended to be excluded from gross income for federal income
tax purposes. The corporation shall not permit the extent or manner of
private business use of those bond-financed facilities to be
inconsistent with treatment of such bonds as governmental bonds under
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(4) In order to ensure consistent treatment of bonds authorized
under RCW 67.40.030 with applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, and notwithstanding RCW 43.84.092, investment
earnings on bond proceeds deposited in the state convention and trade
center account in the state treasury shall be retained in the account,
and shall be expended by the corporation for the purposes authorized
under chapter 386, Laws of 1995 and in a manner consistent with
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(5) During the ((2003-)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the state convention and trade center account to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the account.

Sec. 931 RCW 69.50.520 and 2004 c 276 s 912 are each amended to
read as follows:
The violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in
the state treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8),
66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(9)(a), 82.08.150(5),
82.24.020(2), 82.64.020, and section 420, chapter 271, Laws of 1989
shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for funding services and programs under chapter 271, Laws
of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess., including state
incarceration costs. Funds from the account may also be appropriated
to reimburse local governments for costs associated with implementing
criminal justice legislation including chapter 338, Laws of 1997.
During the ((2003-2005)) 2005-2007 biennium, funds from the account may
also be used for costs associated with providing grants to local
governments in accordance with chapter 338, Laws of 1997, funding drug
offender treatment services in accordance with RCW 70.96A.350,
maintenance and operating costs of the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs jail reporting system, maintenance and
operating costs of the juvenile rehabilitation administration's client
activity tracking system, civil indigent legal representation,
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces, and grants to community
networks under chapter 70.190 RCW by the family policy council.

Sec. 932 RCW 70.93.180 and 1998 c 257 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created an account within the state treasury to
be known as the "waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account". Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account shall be used as follows:
(a) Fifty percent to the department of ecology, for use by the
departments of ecology, natural resources, revenue, transportation, and
corrections, and the parks and recreation commission, for use in litter
collection programs, to be distributed under RCW 70.93.220. The amount
to the department of ecology shall also be used for a central
coordination function for litter control efforts statewide, for the
biennial litter survey under RCW 70.93.200(8), and for statewide public
awareness programs under RCW 70.93.200(7). The amount to the
department shall also be used to defray the costs of administering the
funding, coordination, and oversight of local government programs for
waste reduction, litter control, and recycling, so that local
governments can apply one hundred percent of their funding to achieving
program goals. The amount to the department of revenue shall be used
to enforce compliance with the litter tax imposed in chapter 82.19 RCW;
(b) Twenty percent to the department for local government funding
programs for waste reduction, litter control, and recycling activities
by cities and counties under RCW 70.93.250, to be administered by the
department of ecology; and
(c) Thirty percent to the department of ecology for waste reduction
and recycling efforts.
(2) All taxes imposed in RCW 82.19.010 and fines and bail
forfeitures collected or received pursuant to this chapter shall be
deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account
and used for the programs under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Not less than five percent and no more than ten percent of the
amount appropriated into the waste reduction, recycling, and litter
control account every biennium shall be reserved for capital needs,
including the purchase of vehicles for transporting crews and for
collecting litter and solid waste. Capital funds shall be distributed
among state agencies and local governments according to the same
criteria provided in RCW 70.93.220 for the remainder of the funds, so
that the most effective waste reduction, litter control, and recycling
programs receive the most funding. The intent of this subsection is to
provide funds for the purchase of equipment that will enable the
department to account for the greatest return on investment in terms of
reaching a zero litter goal.
(4) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the account.

Sec. 933 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 933 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship; and
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the top two hazardous waste
management priorities of RCW 70.105.150.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority: (i) Remedial
actions; (ii) hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105
RCW; (iii) solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW; (iv) funds for a program to assist in the
assessment and cleanup of sites of methamphetamine production, but not
to be used for the initial containment of such sites, consistent with
the responsibilities and intent of RCW 69.50.511; and (v) cleanup and
disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or derelict vessels
that pose a threat to human health or the environment. For purposes of
this subsection (3)(a)(v), "abandoned or derelict vessels" means
vessels that have little or no value and either have no identified
owner or have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean
up and dispose of the vessel. Funds for plans and programs shall be
allocated consistent with the priorities and matching requirements
established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW. During
the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be used
for the following activities: Conducting a study of whether dioxins
occur in fertilizers, soil amendments, and soils; reviewing
applications for registration of fertilizers; and conducting a study of
plant uptake of metals. During the ((2003-05)) 2005-2007 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the local toxics control
account to the state toxics control account such amounts as specified
in the omnibus operating budget bill for methamphetamine lab cleanup.
During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be
used for grants to local governments to retrofit public sector diesel
equipment and for storm water planning and implementation activities.
(b) Funds may also be appropriated to the department of health to
implement programs to reduce testing requirements under the federal
safe drinking water act for public water systems. The department of
health shall reimburse the account from fees assessed under RCW
70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) One percent of the moneys deposited into the state and local
toxics control accounts shall be allocated only for public
participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations
in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases
of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and
hazardous waste management priorities. However, during the 1999-2001
fiscal biennium, funding may not be granted to entities engaged in
lobbying activities, and applicants may not be awarded grants if their
cumulative grant awards under this section exceed two hundred thousand
dollars. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be
renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from
either account which are not expended at the close of any biennium
shall revert to the state toxics control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(8) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state toxics control account to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 934 RCW 70.146.030 and 2004 c 277 s 909 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The water quality account is hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be used only in a manner
consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the account shall be
administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject to
legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
tax receipts as provided in RCW 82.24.027, 82.26.025, and 82.32.390,
principal and interest from the repayment of any loans granted pursuant
to this chapter, and any other moneys appropriated to the account by
the legislature.
(2) The department may use or permit the use of any moneys in the
account to make grants or loans to public bodies, including grants to
public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where federal, local,
or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing basis, for water
pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes of
assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water
pollution control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments
made by a public body to a service provider under a service agreement
entered into pursuant to RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this
chapter and for related administrative expenses. For the period July
1, ((2003)) 2005, to June 30, ((2005)) 2007, moneys in the account may
be used to process applications received by the department that seek to
make changes to or transfer existing water rights, for water conveyance
projects, and for grants and technical assistance to public bodies for
watershed planning under chapter 90.82 RCW. No more than three percent
of the moneys deposited in the account may be used by the department to
pay for the administration of the grant and loan program authorized by
this chapter.
(3) Beginning with the biennium ending June 30, 1997, the
department shall present a biennial progress report on the use of
moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate committee on ways
and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.
The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31 of the odd-numbered year. The
report shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description,
and amount of the grant, loan, or both.

Sec. 935 RCW 70.146.080 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 935 are each
amended to read as follows:
Within thirty days after June 30, 1987, and within thirty days
after each succeeding fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer shall
determine the tax receipts deposited into the water quality account for
the preceding fiscal year. If the tax receipts deposited into the
account in each of the fiscal years 1988 and 1989 are less than forty
million dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer sufficient moneys
from general state revenues into the water quality account to bring the
total receipts in each fiscal year up to forty million dollars.
For the biennium ending June 30, 1991, if the tax receipts
deposited into the water quality account and the earnings on investment
of balances credited to the account are less than ninety million
dollars, the treasurer shall transfer sufficient moneys from general
state revenues into the water quality account to bring the total
revenue up to ninety million dollars. The determination and transfer
shall be made by July 31, 1991.
For fiscal year 1992 and for fiscal years 1995 and 1996 and
thereafter, if the tax receipts deposited into the water quality
account for each fiscal year are less than forty-five million dollars,
the treasurer shall transfer sufficient moneys from general state
revenues into the water quality account to bring the total revenue up
to forty-five million dollars. However, during the ((2003-05)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may specify the transfer of a
different amount in the operating budget bill. Determinations and
transfers shall be made by July 31 for the preceding fiscal year.

Sec. 936 RCW 70.148.020 and 1999 c 73 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The pollution liability insurance program trust account is
established in the custody of the state treasurer. All funds
appropriated for this chapter and all premiums collected for
reinsurance shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter
including payment of costs of administering the pollution liability
insurance and underground storage tank community assistance programs.
Expenditures for payment of administrative and operating costs of the
agency are subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW
and may be made only after appropriation by statute. No appropriation
is required for other expenditures from the account.
(2) Each calendar quarter, the director shall report to the
insurance commissioner the loss and surplus reserves required for the
calendar quarter. The director shall notify the department of revenue
of this amount by the fifteenth day of each calendar quarter.
(3) Each calendar quarter the director shall determine the amount
of reserves necessary to fund commitments made to provide financial
assistance under RCW 70.148.130 to the extent that the financial
assistance reserves do not jeopardize the operations and liabilities of
the pollution liability insurance program. The director shall notify
the department of revenue of this amount by the fifteenth day of each
calendar quarter. The director may immediately establish an initial
financial assistance reserve of five million dollars from available
revenues. The director may not expend more than fifteen million
dollars for the financial assistance program.
(4) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the pollution liability insurance program trust account
to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance of the account.
(5) This section expires June 1, ((2001 [2007])) 2007.

Sec. 937 RCW 72.11.040 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 936 are each
amended to read as follows:
The cost of supervision fund is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from assessments made under RCW 9.94A.780 and
72.04A.120 shall be deposited into the fund. Expenditures from the
fund may be used only to support the collection of legal financial
obligations. During the ((2003-2005)) 2005-2007 biennium, funds from
the account may also be used for costs associated with the department's
supervision of the offenders in the community. Only the secretary of
the department of corrections or the secretary's designee may authorize
expenditures from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
for expenditures.

Sec. 938 RCW 74.09.5225 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Payments for recipients eligible for medical assistance
programs under this chapter for services provided by hospitals,
regardless of the beneficiary's managed care enrollment status, shall
be made based on allowable costs incurred during the year, when
services are provided by a rural hospital certified by the health care
financing administration as a critical access hospital. Any additional
payments made by the medical assistance administration for the healthy
options program shall be no more than the additional amounts per
service paid under this section for other medical assistance programs.
(2) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, a moratorium shall be
placed on additional hospitals participating in the medical assistance
program under chapter 74.09 RCW as described in subsection (1) of this
section. However, rural hospitals that applied for certification to
the centers for medicare and medicaid services prior to January 1,
2005, but have not yet completed the process or have not yet been
approved for certification, remain eligible for medical assistance
reimbursement.

Sec. 939 RCW 74.46.431 and 2004 c 276 s 913 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 1999, nursing facility medicaid payment rate
allocations shall be facility-specific and shall have seven components:
Direct care, therapy care, support services, operations, property,
financing allowance, and variable return. The department shall
establish and adjust each of these components, as provided in this
section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing
facility in this state.
(2) All component rate allocations for essential community
providers as defined in this chapter shall be based upon a minimum
facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed beds, regardless
of how many beds are set up or in use. For all facilities other than
essential community providers, effective July 1, 2001, component rate
allocations in direct care, therapy care, support services, variable
return, operations, property, and financing allowance shall continue to
be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of
licensed beds. For all facilities other than essential community
providers, effective July 1, 2002, the component rate allocations in
operations, property, and financing allowance shall be based upon a
minimum facility occupancy of ninety percent of licensed beds,
regardless of how many beds are set up or in use.
(3) Information and data sources used in determining medicaid
payment rate allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report
periods, resident assessment instrument formats, resident assessment
methodologies, and resident classification and case mix weighting
methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to time as
determined by the department.
(4)(a) Direct care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, direct care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2005, direct care component rate allocations. Unless the legislature
provides otherwise in the biennial appropriations act, adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will continue to be used for July 1, 2005, and
later direct care component rate allocations.
(b) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1996 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(c) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1999 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(5)(a) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, therapy care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2005, therapy care component rate allocations. Unless the legislature
provides otherwise in the biennial appropriations act, adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will continue to be used for July 1, 2005, and
later therapy care component rate allocations.
(b) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(6)(a) Support services component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October
1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July
1, 2001, through June 30, 2005, support services component rate
allocations. Unless the legislature provides otherwise in the biennial
appropriations act, adjusted cost report data from 1999 will continue
to be used for July 1, 2005, and later support services component rate
allocations.
(b) Support services component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(7)(a) Operations component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, operations component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2005, operations component rate allocations. Unless the legislature
provides otherwise in the biennial appropriations act, adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will continue to be used for July 1, 2005, and
later operations component rate allocations.
(b) Operations component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(8) For July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, a facility's
property and return on investment component rates shall be the
facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on investment component
rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999,
a facility's property and return on investment component rates shall be
rebased utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months of data.
(9) Total payment rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment
system shall not exceed facility rates charged to the general public
for comparable services.
(10) Medicaid contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum
wage of the greater of the state minimum wage or the federal minimum
wage.
(11) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions for determining component rate allocations for
facilities in circumstances not directly addressed by this chapter,
including but not limited to: The need to prorate inflation for
partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities, existing
facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded
new bed capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of
ownership of the nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or
converting beds back into service, facilities temporarily reducing the
number of set-up beds during a remodel, facilities having less than six
months of either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.
(12) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions, including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting
rates to reflect capital improvements or new requirements imposed by
the department or the federal government. Any such rate adjustments
are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
(13) Effective July 1, 2001, medicaid rates shall continue to be
revised downward in all components, in accordance with department
rules, for facilities converting banked beds to active service under
chapter 70.38 RCW, by using the facility's increased licensed bed
capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting. However,
for facilities other than essential community providers which bank beds
under chapter 70.38 RCW, after May 25, 2001, medicaid rates shall be
revised upward, in accordance with department rules, in direct care,
therapy care, support services, and variable return components only, by
using the facility's decreased licensed bed capacity to recalculate
minimum occupancy for rate setting, but no upward revision shall be
made to operations, property, or financing allowance component rates.
(14) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or a certificate of
need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30, 2001, must have
a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a) the
depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included in
calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation; and
(b) the net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition to
be included in calculation of the facility's financing allowance rate
allocation.

Sec. 940 RCW 79.64.040 and 2004 c 199 s 227 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board shall determine the amount deemed necessary in order to
achieve the purposes of this chapter and shall provide by rule for the
deduction of this amount from the moneys received from all leases,
sales, contracts, licenses, permits, easements, and rights of way
issued by the department and affecting state lands and aquatic lands,
provided that no deduction shall be made from the proceeds from
agricultural college lands. Moneys received as deposits from
successful bidders, advance payments, and security under RCW 79.15.100,
79.15.080, and 79.11.150 prior to December 1, 1981, which have not been
subjected to deduction under this section are not subject to deduction
under this section. The deductions authorized under this section shall
in no event exceed twenty-five percent of the moneys received by the
department in connection with any one transaction pertaining to state
lands and aquatic lands other than second class tide and shore lands
and the beds of navigable waters, and fifty percent of the moneys
received by the department pertaining to second class tide and shore
lands and the beds of navigable waters. During the fiscal biennium
beginning July 1, 2005, the twenty-five percent limitation on
deductions is temporarily increased to thirty percent. The department
shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
by December 1, 2005, that recommends changes in state laws and
department policies that will reduce the administrative costs of
managing state trust lands.
In the event that the department sells logs using the contract
harvesting process described in RCW 79.15.500 through 79.15.530, the
moneys received subject to this section are the net proceeds from the
contract harvesting sale.

Sec. 941 RCW 79.90.245 and 2004 c 276 s 914 are each amended to
read as follows:
After deduction for management costs as provided in RCW 79.64.040
and payments to towns under RCW 79.92.110(2), all moneys received by
the state from the sale or lease of state-owned aquatic lands and from
the sale of valuable material from state-owned aquatic lands shall be
deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement account which is hereby
created in the state treasury. After appropriation, these funds shall
be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for the
purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public
purposes; for providing and improving access to such lands; and for
volunteer cooperative fish and game projects.
In providing grants for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the
department shall require grant recipients to incorporate the
environmental benefits of the project into their grant applications,
and the department shall utilize the statement of environmental
benefits in its prioritization and selection process. The department
shall also develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to
be used both for management and performance assessment of the grants.
To the extent possible, the department should coordinate its
performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies
as defined in RCW 43.41.270. The department shall consult with
affected interest groups in implementing this section.
During the fiscal biennium ending June 30, ((2005)) 2007, the funds
may be appropriated for boating safety((, settlement costs for aquatic
lands cleanup, and shellfish management, enforcement, and enhancement))
and assistance to local governments for septic system surveys and data
bases.

Sec. 942 RCW 86.26.007 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 943 are each
amended to read as follows:
The flood control assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. At the beginning of the ((1997-99 fiscal biennium and
each)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the state treasurer shall transfer
three million dollars from the general fund to the flood control
assistance account. Each biennium thereafter the state treasurer shall
transfer four million dollars from the general fund to the flood
control assistance account. Moneys in the flood control assistance
account may be spent only after appropriation for purposes specified
under this chapter. ((During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the flood control assistance account to
the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
of the account.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 943 COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS. The
appropriations for state agencies, including institutions of higher
education are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $663.00 per eligible employee
for fiscal year 2006. For fiscal year 2007 the monthly employer
funding rate shall not exceed $744.00 per eligible represented employee
or $618.00 per eligible nonrepresented employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2006, through December 31, 2006, the
subsidy shall be $131.87. Starting January 1, 2007, the subsidy shall
be $149.67 per month.
(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service
districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW
41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $48.71 per month beginning
September 1, 2005, and $56.59 beginning September 1, 2006;
(b) For each part-time employee who, at the time of the remittance,
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $48.71 each month beginning September 1, 2005, and
$56.59 beginning September 1, 2006, prorated by the proportion of
employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the
part-time employee receives. The remittance requirements specified in
this subsection shall not apply to employees of a technical college,
school district, or educational service district who purchase insurance
benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 944 NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION.
The appropriations for nonrepresented employee compensation adjustments
are provided solely for:
(1) Salary Cost of Living Adjustments.
(a) Appropriations are provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005, for all classified employees, except those
represented by a collective bargaining unit under the personnel system
reform act of 2002, and except the certificated employees of the state
schools for the deaf and blind and employees of community and technical
colleges covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732. Also
included are employees in the Washington management service, and exempt
employees under the jurisdiction of the personnel resources board or
the director of personnel, as applicable. However, community and
technical colleges shall increase salaries of all classified and
instructional staff not covered by Initiative Measure No. 732 or by a
collective bargaining agreement under the personnel system reform act
of 2002 by 3.2% of pay. The appropriations are also sufficient to fund
for the four-year higher education institutions an average salary
increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2005, for faculty, exempt
administrative and professional staff, graduate assistants, and other
nonclassified staff. Funds provided in this section may not be used
for any other purpose by institutions of higher education, including
for other pay increases.
The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a 3.2% salary
increase effective July 1, 2005, for general government, legislative,
and judicial employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum
salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected
officials.
(b) Appropriations are provided for a 1.6% salary increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, for all classified
employees, except those represented by a collective bargaining unit
under the personnel system reform act of 2002, and except the
certificated employees of the state schools for the deaf and blind and
employees of community and technical colleges covered by the provisions
of Initiative Measure No. 732. Also included are employees in the
Washington management service, and exempt employees under the
jurisdiction of the personnel resources board or the director of
personnel, as applicable. However, community and technical colleges
shall increase salaries of all classified and instructional staff not
covered by Initiative Measure No. 732 or by a collective bargaining
agreement under the personnel system reform act of 2002 by 1.6% of pay
for the period specified. The appropriations are also sufficient to
fund for the four-year higher education institutions an average salary
increase of 1.6% effective July 1, 2006, for faculty, exempt
administrative and professional staff, graduate assistants, and other
nonclassified staff. Funds provided in this section may not be used
for any other purpose by institutions of higher education, including
for other pay increases. The appropriations are also sufficient to
fund a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2005, until June 30,
2007, for general government, legislative, and judicial employees
exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by
the commission on salaries for elected officials.
(2) Salary Survey.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under the personnel system reform act of 2002, funding is provided for
implementation of the department of personnel's 2002 salary survey, for
job classes more than 25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 945 CLASSIFICATION REVISIONS. Funding is
provided for partial implementation of classification consolidation and
revisions under the personnel system reform act of 2002. Groups 2 and
3 of the department of personnel's initial class consolidation plan are
affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 946 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS.
Provisions of collective bargaining agreements contained in sections
943 and 945 through 975 of this act are described in general terms.
Only major economic terms are included in the descriptions. These
descriptions do not contain the complete contents of the agreements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 947 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE.
Funding is provided for the collective bargaining agreement reached
between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees
under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered
under this agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of
the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than
25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 948 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WPEA.
Funding is provided for the collective bargaining agreement reached
between the governor and the Washington public employees association
under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered
under this agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of
the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than
25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 949 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UFCW.
Funding is provided for the collective bargaining agreement reached
between the governor and the united food and commercial workers under
the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered under
this agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006 until June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 950 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--TEAMSTERS. Funding is provided for the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the governor and the brotherhood of teamsters under the
personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this
agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase effective
July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for a 2.9% increase effective
July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of the
department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than 25%
below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 951 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING--COALITION.
Funding is provided for the collective bargaining agreement reached
between the governor and the coalition under the personnel system
reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement,
funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005.
Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006,
until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of the department of
personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than 25% below market
rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 952 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING--IFPTE. Funding
is provided for the collective bargaining agreement reached between the
governor and the international federation of professional and technical
engineers local 17 under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For
employees covered under this agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2%
salary increase effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for
a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for
implementation of the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for
classes more than 25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 953 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--SEIU
1199. Funding is provided for the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the governor and the service employees international
union, local 1199 NW under the personnel system reform act of 2002.
For employees covered under this agreement, funding is provided for a
3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided
for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, for
implementation of the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for
classes more than 25% below market rates, and for adjustments to the
salary grid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 954 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
HIGHER EDUCATION. Funding is provided for the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of
state employees in higher education under the personnel system reform
act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement, funding is
provided for a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005. Funding is
also provided for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June
30, 2007, and for implementation of the department of personnel 2002
salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 955 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WPEA
HIGHER EDUCATION. Funding is provided for the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the Washington public
employees association in higher education under the personnel system
reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement,
funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005.
Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006,
until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of the department of
personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than 25% below market
rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 956 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY, WFSE BU A. Budget amounts reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between the Western Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
unit A under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005, a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until
June 30, 2007, and implementation of the department of personnel 2002
salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 957 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY, WFSE BU B. Budget amounts reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between the Western Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
unit B under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005, a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until
June 30, 2007, and implementation of the department of personnel 2002
salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 958 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WPEA/PROFESSIONAL LOCAL 365 UNIT C--WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY.
Budget amounts reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached
between the Western Washington University and the Washington Public
Employees Association bargaining unit C under the personnel system
reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005.
Provisions also include a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until
June 30, 2007, and for implementation of the department of personnel
2002 salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 959 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY, WFSE BU E. Budget amounts reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between the Western Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
unit E under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005, and a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006,
until June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 960 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY, WSU POLICE GUILD. Budget amounts reflect
the collective bargaining agreement reached between Washington State
University and the Washington State University police guild bargaining
unit under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005, and a 2.9% lump sum payment effective July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 961 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY, WFSE BU 1 AND 11. Budget amounts reflect
the collective bargaining agreement reached between Washington State
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
unit 1--research and extension units west of the Cascades, bargaining
unit 5--library and bargaining unit 11--intercollegiate college of
nursing under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Provisions also include a 2% lump sum payment
effective July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 962 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON, SEIU 925. Budget amounts reflect the
collective bargaining agreements reached between the University of
Washington and the service employees international union university-wide nonsupervisory, university-wide supervisory, research
technologist, research technologist supervisor, and medical/laboratory
technologist bargaining units under the personnel system reform act of
2002. For employees covered under this agreement, provisions include
a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005, a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, implementation of a
University of Washington salary survey, and adjustment to the salary
grid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 963 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON, WFSE. Budget amounts reflect the collective
bargaining agreements reached between the University of Washington and
the Washington federation of state employees campus-wide, library,
custodial supervisor, Harborview medical center, and Harborview medical
center public safety officers bargaining units under the personnel
system reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005, a
1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and
implementation of a University of Washington salary survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 964 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON, WFSE, SKILLED TRADES. Budget amounts reflect
the collective bargaining agreements reached between the University of
Washington and the Washington federation of state employees, skilled
trades bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act of 2002.
For employees covered under this agreement, provisions include a $1.00
per hour increase effective July 1, 2005, an increase in shift
differential pay, and an adjustment to the grid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 965 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON SEIU LOCAL 1199 NW PROFESSIONAL AND TECHNICAL.
Budget amounts reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached
between the University of Washington and the service employee
international union Harborview medical center professional and
technical bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act of
2002. For employees covered under this agreement, provisions include
a 1.5% salary increase effective January 1, 2006, a 1.5% salary
increase effective January 1, 2007, an adjustment to the salary grid,
and changes in premium pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 966 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON SEIU LOCAL 1199 NW NURSES. Budget amounts
reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached between the
University of Washington and the service employee international union
Harborview medical center registered nurse bargaining unit under the
personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this
agreement, provisions include a 2.0% salary increase effective July 1,
2005, a 2.0% salary increase effective July 1, 2006, a 2.0% salary
increase effective January 1, 2007, an adjustment to the salary grid,
and changes in premium pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 967 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON SEIU LOCAL 1199 NW SOCIAL WORK. Budget
amounts reflect the collective bargaining agreements reached between
the University of Washington and the service employee international
union Harborview medical center social work and health care specialist
bargaining units under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For
employees covered under this agreement, provisions include a 2.0%
salary increase effective July 1, 2005, a 2.0% salary increase
effective July 1, 2006, a 1.0% salary increase effective January 1,
2007, an adjustment to the salary grid, and changes in premium pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 968 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON POLICE OFFICERS ASSOCIATION. Budget amounts
reflect the collective bargaining agreements reached between the
University of Washington and the University of Washington police
officers association bargaining unit under the personnel system reform
act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement, provisions
include a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005, a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006, and longevity pay increases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 969 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON WFSE UW POLICE MANAGEMENT. Budget amounts
reflect the collective bargaining agreements reached between the
University of Washington and the Washington federation of state
employees police management bargaining unit under the personnel system
reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005, and
a 15% supervisory differential effective July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 970 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON WASHINGTON STATE NURSES ASSOCIATION. Budget
amounts reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached between the
University of Washington and the Washington state nurses association
university medical center registered nurses bargaining unit under the
personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this
agreement, provisions include a 2.0% salary increase effective July 1,
2005, a 2.0% salary increase effective July 1, 2006, a 2.0% salary
increase effective January 1, 2007, an adjustment to the salary grid,
and changes in premium pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 971 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON INLAND BOATMEN'S UNION. Budget amounts
reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached between the
University of Washington and the inland boatmen's union of the Pacific
Thompson research vessel crew bargaining unit under the personnel
system return act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2006, and
a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 972 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
UNIT 2 EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY. Budget amounts reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between Eastern Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
unit 2 under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Provisions also include a 1.6% salary increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for a $500 lump-sum
payment to full-time employees, and pro-rated for part-time employees,
effective July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 973 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
UNIT 1 EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY. Budget amounts reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between Eastern Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
unit 1 under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Provisions also include a $500 lump-sum
payment to full-time employees, and pro-rated for part-time employees,
effective July 1, 2005, and a lump sum payment of 1.6% of annual salary
effective July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 974 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
UNIT 2 CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY. Budget amounts reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between Central Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
unit 2 under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Provisions also include a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of
the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than
25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 975 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
UNIT 1 CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY. Budget amounts reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between Central Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
unit 1 under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Provisions also include a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of
the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than
25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 976 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 977 Except for section 918 of this act, this
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 978 Section 918 (RCW 41.50.110) of this act
takes effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 979 Section 917 (RCW 41.50.110) of this act
expires July 1, 2006.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR MOTOR VEHICLES . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
BELATED CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 57
BOARD OF TAX APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
BOND EXPENSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 174
BUSINESS CONTINUITY AND DISASTER RECOVERY . . . . . . . . . . . . 172
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 137
CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
CLASSIFICATION REVISIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 157, 214
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT
COALITION . . . . . . . . . . . . 160
IFPTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 160
SEIU 1199 . . . . . . . . . . . . 216
SEIU-1199 . . . . . . . . . . . . 161
TEAMSTERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 159, 215
UFCW . . . . . . . . . . . . 159, 215
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON INLAND BOATMEN'S UNION . . . . . . . . . . . . 220
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON POLICE OFFICERS ASSOCIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 220
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON SEIU LOCAL 1199 NW NURSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 219
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON SEIU LOCAL 1199 NW PROF AND TECH . . . . . . . . . . . . 219
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON SEIU LOCAL 1199 NW SOCIAL WORK . . . . . . . . . . . . 219
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON WASHINGTON STATE NURSES ASSOC . . . . . . . . . . . . 220
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON WFSE UW POLICE MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 220
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON, SEIU 925 . . . . . . . . . . . . 218
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON, WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 218
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON, WFSE, SKILLED TRADES . . . . . . . . . . . . 219
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY, WFSE BU 1 AND 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . 218
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY, WSU POLICE GUILD . . . . . . . . . . . . 217
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY, WFSE BU A . . . . . . . . . . . . 216
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY, WFSE BU B . . . . . . . . . . . . 217
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY, WFSE BU E . . . . . . . . . . . . 217
WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 157, 214
WFSE HIGHER EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 216
WFSE UNIT 1 CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 222
WFSE UNIT 1 EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 221
WFSE UNIT 2 CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 221
WFSE UNIT 2 EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 221
WPEA . . . . . . . . . . . . 158, 214
WPEA HIGHER EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 216
WPEA/PROF LOCAL 365 UNIT C--WESTERN WA UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 217
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 157
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 214
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
COALITION . . . . . . . . . . . . 215
IFPTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 215
COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 68
COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
COMMISSION ON ASIAN-PACIFIC-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 211
CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 74
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 57
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 84
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY & HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 150
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 68
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 76
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 58
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 86
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 79
DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 66
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 55
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
DOUBLE-FILLED PERSONNEL POSITIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 154
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 146
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 136
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 173
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 66
ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . 74
EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 123
FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
GOVERNOR
LIFE SCIENCES DISCOVERY FUND AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
GROWTH PLANNING HEARINGS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 143
POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
HORSE RACING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 56
INCENTIVE SAVINGS
FY 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . 154
FY 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . 155
INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 163
INSURANCE COMMISSIONER . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 73
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 123
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 212
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE SALARY COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 155
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE SALARY SURVEY . . . . . . . . . . . . 156
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
CAPITOL BUILDING CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 150
COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS FOR NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES . . . . . . . . . . . . 162
COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS IN BARGAINED AGREEMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 162
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 161
EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
EMERGENCY FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 149
EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 154
FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL . . . . . . . . . . . . 149
PENSION CONTRIBUTION ADJUSTMENTS FOR THE PSE RETIREMENT SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 163
SEX OFFENDER SENTENCING IMPACT . . . . . . . . . . . . 150
SMALL AGENCY INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY POOL . . . . . . . . . . . . 150
OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
PERSONNEL APPEALS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
PROGRAM COST SHIFTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 173
PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
SENATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 66
SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 145
STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 128
STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
STATE EMPLOYEE INSURANCE BENEFIT RESERVE . . . . . . . . . . . . 163
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 55
STATE INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 72
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 87
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 147
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 147
STATE TREASURER . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 148, 149
COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 166
FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 167
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 166
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 165
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 167, 169
STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 174
STRATEGIC PURCHASING STRATEGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 89
BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 101
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 115
EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 113
ELEMENTARY/SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT AND NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 115
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 94
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 113
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 120
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 113
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 114
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 106
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 104
SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 108
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 108
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 122
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 119
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 139
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 132
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 172
VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT INCENTIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
VOLUNTARY SEPARATION INCENTIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 174
WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 84
WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 145
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 146
WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 134
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 141
WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 145
--- END ---