BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
2005-07 BIENNIUM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The transportation budget of the state
is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several
amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish
the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several
accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices
for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and
for other specified purposes, including the payment of any final
judgments arising out of such activities, for the period ending June
30, 2007.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2006" or "FY 2006" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2006.
(b) "Fiscal year 2007" or "FY 2007" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007.
(c) "FTE" means full-time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.
(f) "Reappropriation" means appropriation and, unless the context
clearly provides otherwise, is subject to the relevant conditions and
limitations applicable to appropriations.
(g) "LEAP" means the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES -- OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION
Grade Crossing Protective Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $501,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $383,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: To address its growing caseload, the
marine employees commission shall develop a plan for prioritizing cases
to schedule for hearings. The commission shall report back to the
transportation committees of the legislature on its case prioritization
plan by December 15, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $976,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire appropriation in this section is provided solely for
road maintenance purposes.
(2) The commission shall conduct a study of existing requirements
regarding all-terrain vehicle (ATV) operators and submit
recommendations to the legislature concerning whether revisions to
those requirements are warranted. The study and recommendations shall,
at a minimum, include (a) the feasibility of requiring a comprehensive
hands-on ATV safety education and training program for ATV operators;
(b) ATV operator equipment requirements; and (c) ATV operating
requirements, including the adoption of minimum age requirements
corresponding to different engine capacities of ATVs. The commission
shall consult with the department of licensing and other stakeholders
when conducting the study and developing recommendations and shall
submit a final report to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $371,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $323,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for costs associated with the motor fuel quality
program.
(2) The department of agriculture shall make an adhesive label
explaining that Washington state gas taxes are for highway purposes
only. The label must be in a large, easily readable font and must read
"Washington state gas taxes are used exclusively for highway purposes."
The label should be chemical and weather resistant and must be placed
in a conspicuous location at motor fuel retailers, as defined under RCW
19.120.010, by December 31, 2005. $48,000 of the motor vehicle
account--state appropriation is provided solely for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: If Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5056
is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the entire appropriation shall lapse.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES--CAPITAL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION--CAPITAL PROJECTS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,756,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,656,000 of the appropriation is provided for repair and
renovation of Mt. Spokane roadway.
(2) $100,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for road work
on state route 20 at Deception Pass state park.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES -- OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY
COMMISSION
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,111,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,760,000
School Zone Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000
Bicycle and Pedestrian Safety Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,211,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The Washington traffic safety commission
shall contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to
conduct a study of the impact of state programs concerning the
reduction of DUI recidivism. The study must include, on a prioritized
basis to the extent federal funds are made available for the study, the
following components: (1) The state's existing deferred prosecution
program; (2) the state's vehicle impound program; and (3) other states'
programs that restrict a person's access to the vehicle, or suspend the
vehicle license and registration, upon arrest or conviction.
The completed study must be submitted to the appropriate
legislative committees by December 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $775,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,905,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $728,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,408,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,520,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,521,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,041,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS
Pilotage Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $411,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The joint transportation committee shall conduct a review of
state level governance of transportation, with a focus on the
appropriate roles of the separate branches of government. The
committee shall review the statutory duties, roles, and functions of
the transportation commission and the department. In that review the
committee shall determine which responsibilities may be transferred to
the executive and which may be transferred to the legislature. By
December 15, 2005, the joint transportation committee shall make its
recommendations to the house of representatives and senate
transportation committees. The joint transportation committee shall
consult with affected agencies and other stakeholders in conducting its
analysis. The committee may consult with and retain private
professional and technical experts as necessary to ensure an
independent review and analysis.
(2) The joint transportation committee shall conduct a study
regarding the feasibility of a statewide uniform motor vehicle excise
tax (MVET) depreciation schedule. In addition to committee members,
the participants in the study must include at a minimum the following
individuals: (a) A representative of a regional transit authority
(Sound Transit); (b) a representative of a regional transportation
planning organization; (c) the secretary of transportation, or his or
her designee; (d) a representative of the attorney general's office;
(e) a representative of the department of licensing; and (f) a
representative of the financial community. The purpose of the study is
to develop an MVET depreciation schedule that more accurately reflects
vehicle value but does not hinder outstanding contractual obligations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,208,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,208,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the completion of a comprehensive statewide tolling
feasibility study. At a minimum, the study must include an analysis of
the only currently authorized toll facility, the Tacoma Narrows bridge
project. The study findings at a minimum should include (a) the
development of more uniform and equitable policies regarding the
distribution of the financial burdens imposed on those paying the tolls
on the Tacoma Narrows bridge, and (b) options of possible further buy-down of the outstanding indebtedness applicable to the bridge project,
in order to provide a more equitable distribution of the financial
burdens incurred by those paying tolls on the bridge.
(2) $1,600,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the transportation performance audit board. Within
this amount, the transportation performance audit board shall conduct
a study and make recommendations to the legislature regarding modifying
RCW 47.01.012, state transportation goals and benchmarks. In
conducting the study, the board shall consider at a minimum: Original
recommendations of the Blue Ribbon Commission on Transportation; the
current policy goals and benchmark categories; the goals outlined in
Substitute House Bill No. 1969; the recent work related to benchmarks
completed by the transportation commission and the Washington state
department of transportation; the measures review completed by TPAB;
and best practices.
The board shall submit study results, including any legislative
recommendations, to the transportation committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2006.
(3) $1,000,000 of the multimodal account--state appropriation is
provided solely for an extensive statewide rail capacity and needs
study to refine both rail freight and rail passenger infrastructure
needs. Within this amount, the commission, in conjunction with the
department, shall also conduct a study of state-owned rail asset
management, planning, and governance.
(4) The transportation commission, using its tolling authority
under existing law, shall impose tolls on the SR 520 bridge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC
INVESTMENT BOARD
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $655,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD
OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $193,716,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,398,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,272,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed
employment providing traffic control services to the department of
transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles
for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by
the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol
shall be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state
employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines
developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The patrol
shall report to the house of representatives and senate transportation
committees by December 31, 2005, on the use of agency vehicles by
officers engaging in the off-duty employment specified in this
subsection. The report shall include an analysis that compares cost
reimbursement and cost-impacts, including increased vehicle mileage,
maintenance costs, and indirect impacts, associated with the private
use of patrol vehicles.
(2) In addition to the user fees, the patrol shall transfer into
the state patrol nonappropriated airplane revolving account under RCW
43.79.470 no more than the amount of appropriated state patrol highway
account and general fund funding necessary to cover the costs for the
patrol's use of the aircraft. The state patrol highway account and
general fund--state funds shall be transferred proportionately in
accordance with a cost allocation that differentiates between highway
traffic enforcement services and general policing purposes.
(3) The patrol shall not account for or record locally provided DUI
cost reimbursement payments as expenditure credits to the state patrol
highway account. The patrol shall report the amount of expected
locally provided DUI cost reimbursements to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 31st
of each year.
(4) The state patrol highway account--state appropriation for DUI
reimbursements shall only be spent for pursuit vehicle video cameras,
datamaster DUI testing equipment, tire deflator equipment, and taser
guns. The Washington state patrol prior to the issuance of any taser
guns will train the troopers on using the equipment. The agency will
provide a report to the transportation committees of the senate and
house of representatives by December 31st of each year on the
occurrences where the taser guns were utilized along with any issues
that have been identified.
(5) $29,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill
No. 1469. If House Bill No. 1469 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $5,580,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for a
3.8% salary increase for commissioned officers effective July 1, 2005,
in addition to any other salary increases provided for in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL--TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,371,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,994,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,365,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $247,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1188. If Second Substitute House Bill No.
1188 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(2) The Washington state patrol is instructed to work with the risk
management division in the office of financial management in compiling
the state patrol data for establishing the agency's risk management
insurance premiums to the tort claims account. The office of financial
management and the Washington state patrol shall submit a report to the
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 31st of each year on the number of claims, estimated claims to
be paid, method of calculation, and the adjustment in the premium.
(3) $6,228,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
automobile fuel in the 2005-2007 biennium.
(4) $8,678,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
the purchase of pursuit vehicles.
(5) $5,254,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
vehicle repair and maintenance costs of vehicles used for highway
purposes.
(6) $384,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for the
purchase of mission vehicles used for highway purposes in the
commercial vehicle and traffic investigation sections of the patrol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING--MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,973,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,954,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,000
Biometric Security Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,242,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,134,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate
Bill No. 6103. If Senate Bill No. 6103 is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING--INFORMATION SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,276,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,009,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,809,000
Biometric Security Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $728,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,460,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall submit a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature, detailing the progress made in
transitioning off of the HP3000 system, by December 30, 2005, and each
December 1st thereafter until the project is fully completed.
(2) $357,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of all special license plate
bills introduced during the 2005 legislative session and approved by
the special license plate review board. The amount provided in this
subsection shall be reduced accordingly for any of those bills that are
not enacted by June 30, 2005.
(3) $58,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5423. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5423 is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $145,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6103. If
Senate Bill No. 6103 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- VEHICLE
SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $614,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,484,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $872,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,146,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,142,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $247,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of all special license plate
bills introduced during the 2005 legislative session and approved by
the special license plate review board. The amount provided in this
subsection shall be reduced accordingly for any of those bills that are
not enacted by June 30, 2005.
(2) $11,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No.
5423. If Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5423 is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $11,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5513. If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5513 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse
(4) $404,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6103. If
Senate Bill No. 6103 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- DRIVER
SERVICES
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,998,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,970,000
Biometric Security Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,523,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,491,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $970,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the commercial driver license program. The
department shall informally report to the transportation committees of
the legislature on the progress made in addressing federal audit
findings and in implementing the federal motor carrier safety
improvement act. Reports shall be made by the following dates:
November 1, 2005, and each November 1st thereafter.
(2) $412,000 of the motorcycle safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department's motorcycle safety
program. The department shall informally report to the transportation
committees of the legislature detailing the progress made in
implementing national highway traffic safety assessment guidelines.
Reports shall be made by the following dates: November 1, 2005, and
each November 1st thereafter.
(3) The department of licensing, in consultation with the
department of transportation and other stakeholders, shall draft
legislation to bring the state into compliance with any federal
legislation or rules enacted relative to identification necessary for
persons crossing international borders. The department shall report to
the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005,
on the recommended legislation for bringing the state into compliance
with federal requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM B
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,543,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM C
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,659,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,964,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,362,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,348,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $850,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided for the continued maintenance and support of the
transportation executive information system (TEIS). The TEIS shall be
enhanced during the 2005 legislative interim to shift towards a
monitoring and reporting system capable of tracking and reporting on
major project milestones and measurements. The department shall work
with the legislature to identify and define meaningful milestones and
measures to be used in monitoring the scope, schedule, and cost of
projects.
(2) $350,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for a financial and capital project system needs
assessment for future automation development and enhancements. The
completed assessment will identify options and shall be presented to
the transportation committees of the senate and the house of
representatives by December 31, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,743,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--AVIATION -- PROGRAM F
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,578,000
Aeronautics Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
Aircraft Search and Rescue Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,990,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) $433,000 of the aeronautics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for airport pavement projects. The department's
aviation division shall complete a priority airport pavement project
list by January 1, 2006, to be considered by the legislature in the
2006 supplemental budget. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5414 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(b) The entire aircraft search and rescue safety and education
account appropriation shall lapse if Substitute Senate Bill No. 5414 is
enacted by June 30, 2005.
(c) If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5414 is enacted by July 1, 2005,
then the remaining unexpended fund balance in the aircraft search and
rescue, safety, and education account shall be deposited into the state
aeronautics account.
(2) The entire multimodal transportation account--state and federal
appropriations are provided solely for implementing Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121. If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5121 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, or if federal funds are not
received by March 1, 2006, for the purpose of implementing Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,656,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,156,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department solely for the
purposes of providing contract services to the association of
Washington cities and Washington state association of counties for (a)
activities of the transportation permit efficiency and accountability
committee, including pilot mitigation banking activities, and (b) other
permit delivery efforts.
(2) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for supporting the Washington biodiversity council in
the development of a framework for biodiversity conservation for
Washington state.
(3) $1,475,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the staffing activities of the transportation
permit efficiency and accountability committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS -- PROGRAM K
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $290,893,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,426,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,253,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $296,572,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) If portions of the appropriations in this section are required
to fund maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by
federal emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides,
supplemental appropriations must be requested to restore state funding
for ongoing maintenance activities.
(2) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
federal moneys received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall
place an equal amount of the motor vehicle account -- state into
unallotted status. This exchange shall not affect the amount of
funding available for snow and ice removal.
(3) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
private or local funds received for reimbursements of third party
damages that are in excess of the motor vehicle account -- private/local
appropriation.
(4) Funding is provided for maintenance on the state system to
allow for a continuation of the level of service targets included in
the 2003-05 biennium. In delivering the program, the department should
concentrate on the following areas:
(a) Meeting or exceeding the target for structural bridge repair on
a statewide basis;
(b) Eliminating the number of activities delivered in the "f" level
of service at the region level;
(c) Reducing the number of activities delivered in the "d" level of
service by increasing the resources directed to those activities on a
statewide and region basis; and
(d) Evaluating, analyzing, and potentially redistributing resources
within and among regions to provide greater consistency in delivering
the program statewide and in achieving overall level of service
targets.
(5) The department shall develop and implement a plan to improve
work zone safety on a statewide basis. As part of the strategy
included in the plan, the department shall fund equipment purchases
using a portion of the money from the annual OTEF equipment purchasing
and replacement process. The department shall also identify and
evaluate statewide equipment needs (such as work zone safety equipment)
and prioritize any such needs on a statewide basis. Substitute
purchasing at the statewide level, when appropriate, shall be utilized
to meet those identified needs. The department must report to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005, on
the plan, and by December 1, 2006, on the status of implementing the
plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,234,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,409,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $4,400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The
department shall give priority to low-cost enhancement projects that
improve safety or provide congestion relief. The department shall
prioritize low-cost enhancement projects on a statewide rather than
regional basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,718,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,321,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,042,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,703,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,450,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,244,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Highway Safety Fund--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,472,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In order to qualify for state planning funds available to
regional transportation planning organizations under this section, a
regional transportation planning organization containing any county
with a population in excess of one million shall provide voting
membership on its executive board to any incorporated principal city of
a metropolitan statistical area within the region, as designated by the
United States census bureau, and to any incorporated city within the
region with a population in excess of eighty thousand as of July 1,
2005. Additionally, a regional transportation planning organization
described under this subsection shall conduct a review of its executive
board membership criteria to ensure that the criteria appropriately
reflects a true and comprehensive representation of the organization's
jurisdictions of significance within the region.
(2) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the costs of the regional transportation investment
district (RTID) election and department of transportation project
oversight. These funds are provided as a loan to the RTID and shall be
repaid to the state motor vehicle account within one year following the
certification of the election results related to the RTID.
(3) $175,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
shall be used by the department to support the processing and analysis
of the backlog of city and county collision reports by January, 2006.
The amount provided in this subsection shall lapse if federal funds
become available for this purpose.
(4) $150,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1565. If Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1565 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) The department of transportation shall evaluate the number of
spaces available for long-haul truck parking relative to current and
projected future needs. The department of transportation shall also
explore options for augmenting the number of spaces available,
including, but not limited to, expanding state-owned rest areas or
modifying regulations governing the use of these facilities, utilizing
weigh stations and park and ride lots, and encouraging the expansion of
the private sector's role. Finally, the department shall explore the
utility of coordinating with neighboring states on long-haul truck
parking and evaluate methodologies for alleviating any air quality
issues relative to the issue. The department must report to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005, on
the options, strategies, and recommendations for long-haul truck
parking.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,101,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,501,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $31,749,000 of the motor vehicle fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for the liabilities attributable to the department of
transportation. The office of financial management must provide a
detailed accounting of the revenues and expenditures of the self-insurance fund to the transportation committees of the legislature on
December 31st and June 30th of each year.
(2) Payments in this section represent charges from other state
agencies to the department of transportation.
(a) FOR PAYMENT OF OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
DIVISION OF RISK MANAGEMENT FEES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,667,000
(b) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,017,000
(c) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED
MAIL SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,049,000
(d) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,643,000
(e) FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY
PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,749,000
(f) FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS SURCHARGE . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,717,000
(g) FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . $545,000
(h) FOR OFFICE OF MINORITIES AND WOMEN BUSINESS
ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,114,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,060,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,574,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,789,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs
transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of
transportation.
(a) $5,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs
transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers shall be based on need,
including the availability of other providers of service in the area,
efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost
effectiveness of trips provided.
(b) $19,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons
with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit
agency must have a maintenance of effort for special needs
transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of
effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies
shall be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response
service and route deviated service in calendar year 2003 as reported in
the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2003" published by the
department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than
thirty percent of these distributions. The first $450,000 provided to
King county shall be used as follows:
(i) $320,000 shall be used to provide electric buses, instead of
diesel buses, for service on Capital Hill in Seattle, Washington
through June 30, 2007;
(ii) $130,000 shall be used to provide training for blind
individuals traveling through Rainier Valley and the greater Seattle
area. The training is to include destination training and retraining
due to the expected closure of the downtown bus tunnel and training on
how to use the Sound Transit light rail system.
(2) Funds are provided for the rural mobility grant program as
follows:
(a) $7,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for those transit systems
serving small cities and rural areas as identified in the Summary of
Public Transportation - 2003 published by the department of
transportation. Noncompetitive grants must be distributed to the
transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) $7,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to providers of rural mobility service
in areas not served or underserved by transit agencies through a
competitive grant process.
(3) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (a)
Public transit agencies to add vanpools; and (b) incentives for
employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for
public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; no operating
costs for public transit agencies are eligible for funding under this
grant program. No additional employees may be hired for the vanpool
grant program, and supplanting of transit funds currently funding
vanpools is not allowed. Additional criteria for selecting grants must
include leveraging funds other than state funds.
(4) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the city of Seattle for the
Seattle streetcar project on South Lake Union. Should the city receive
any state funds for this purpose during the 2003-05 biennium, the
amount provided in this subsection must be reduced accordingly.
(5) $1,200,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2124. If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2124 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6) Pursuant to the grant program established in Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2124, the department shall issue a call for
projects and/or service proposals. Applications must be received by
the department by November 1, 2005, and November 1, 2006. The
department must submit a prioritized list for funding to the
transportation committees of the legislature that reflects the
department's recommendation, as well as, a list of all project or
service proposals received.
(7) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for new tri-county connection service
for Island, Skagit, and Whatcom transit agencies.
(8) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a competitive grant program for
commute trip reduction performance grants related to utilizing telework
to reduce commute trips.
(9) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to King county as a state match to
obtain federal funding for a car sharing program for persons meeting
certain income or employment criteria.
(10) $2,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for competitive grants for a county or
other local governmental entity to provide commuter rail transit
services. The department may contract with the same grantee for a
period of no more than three years. The grants shall be made available
for local governmental entities to provide operational or capital
support for start-up costs associated with interjurisdictional commuter
rail service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $344,680,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,660,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $348,340,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $57,928,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
auto ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2005-2007 biennium.
(2) The total appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry
employees. The expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees
during the 2005-2007 biennium may not exceed $216,042,000, plus a
dollar amount, as prescribed by the office of financial management,
that is equal to any insurance benefit increase granted general
government employees in excess of $584.58 a month annualized per
eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine
employees for fiscal year 2006 and $584.58 a month annualized per
eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine
employees for fiscal year 2007, a dollar amount as prescribed by the
office of financial management for costs associated with pension
amortization charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of
financial management for salary increases during the 2005-2007 biennium
as provided under sections 501 through 505 of this act. For the
purposes of this section, the expenditures for compensation paid to
ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and wages and employee
benefits as defined in the office of financial management's policies,
regulations, and procedures named under objects of expenditure "A" and
"B" (7.2.6.2). The prescribed salary increase or decrease dollar
amount that shall be allocated from the governor's compensation
appropriations is in addition to the appropriation contained in this
section and may be used to increase or decrease compensation costs,
effective July 1, 2005, and thereafter, as established in sections 501
through 505 of this act.
(3) $1,116,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for ferry security operations
necessary to comply with the ferry security plan submitted by the
Washington state ferry system to the United States coast guard. The
department shall track security costs and expenditures. Ferry security
operations costs shall not be included as part of the operational costs
that are used to calculate farebox recovery.
(4) The Washington state ferries must work with the department's
information technology division to implement an electronic fare system,
including the integration of the regional fare coordination system
(smart card). Each December and June, semi-annual updates must be
provided to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning
the status of implementing and completing this project, with updates
concluding the first December after full project implementation.
(5) The Washington state ferries shall continue to provide service
to Sidney, British Columbia.
(6) The department shall collect passenger ferry fares each way on
the Bremerton/Seattle route.
(7) A maximum of the entire multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is provided solely for operating costs associated
with the Vashon to Seattle passenger-only ferry for service through
June 30, 2007. The amount provided in this subsection includes all
related fuel costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 227 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,059,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $29,091,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the Amtrak service contract and
Talgo maintenance contract associated with providing and maintaining
the state-supported passenger rail service.
(2) $5,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a new round trip rail service
between Seattle and Portland beginning July 1, 2005.
(3) No AMTRAK Cascade runs may be eliminated.
(4) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the produce railcar program. The
department is encouraged to implement the produce railcar program by
maximizing private investment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 228 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,232,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,539,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $211,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,982,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $211,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and $211,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is provided solely for the state's contribution to
county and city studies of flood hazards in association with interstate
highways. First priority shall be given to threats along the I-5
corridor.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--CAPITAL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,801,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,535,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
Shelton training academy domestic water and wastewater treatment
project.
(2) $1,266,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for minor
works projects.
(3) The Washington state patrol, through the director of fire
protection, shall study and make recommendations to the legislature
regarding the need for improvements and additions to the state fire
training academy located at North Bend. The patrol may include in its
recommendations information regarding capital improvements, additional
staffing and salary requirements, and technology improvements. The
study and recommendations shall be submitted to the legislature by
December 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,933,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,392,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,680,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $355,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided for county ferries as set forth in RCW
47.56.725(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,425,000
Small City Preservation and Sidewalk
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,601,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $205,026,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The transportation improvement account--state appropriation includes $14,143,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized in RCW 47.26.500. The transportation improvement
board may authorize the use of current revenues available to the agency
in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,676,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $601,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the statewide administration.
(2) $632,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for regional minor projects.
(3) $224,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for designing the replacement of the existing outdated
maintenance facility in Ephrata.
(4) $219,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the designing of the northwest regional maintenance
complex in Seattle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,175,922,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,603,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $229,010,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,897,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,370,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $272,329,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $542,597,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,323,728,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation is provided solely for the projects and activities as
listed by project, biennium, and amount in the 2005 Transportation
Partnership Project List, "Highway Improvement Program (I)" section
under the column heading "2003 (Nickel) Package" as transmitted to LEAP
on April 20, 2005. However, limited transfers of allocations between
projects may occur for those amounts listed for the 2005-07 biennium
subject to conditions and limitations in section 603 of this act.
Within the amount provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation is provided
for right-of-way acquisition for the SR 502 widening from Battleground
to I-5. The department must develop a right-of-way acquisition plan in
conjunction with the city of Battleground that conforms with the city's
comprehensive growth management plan. No funds may be expended on
this project until the city of Battleground and the department of
transportation have reached an agreement on the right-of-way
acquisition plan.
(2) The entire 2005 transportation partnership--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement the projects and activities as listed
by project and amount in the 2005 Transportation Partnership Project
List, "Highway Improvement Program (I)" section under the column
heading "2005 Transportation Partnership Package" as transmitted to
LEAP on April 20, 2005.
(a) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $2,500,000 of
the transportation partnership account--state appropriation is provided
solely for Island Transit park and ride development.
(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $4,000,000 of
the transportation partnership account--state appropriation is provided
solely for Skagit Transit for Chuckanut park and ride development.
(c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $5,000,000 of
the transportation partnership account--state appropriation is provided
solely for project 109040S: I-90/Seattle to Mercer Island – Two way
transit/HOV. Expenditure of these funds is contingent upon the
development of an access plan that provides equitable and dependable
access for I-90 Mercer Island exit and entry.
(d) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the
transportation partnership account--state appropriation is provided
solely for a west Olympia access study, to complete an access study for
state route 101/west Olympia.
(e) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $800,000 of the
transportation partnership account--state appropriation is provided
solely for an SR 534 access point decision report.
(f) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the
transportation partnership account--state appropriation is provided
solely for an eastern Washington freight corridor study, to evaluate
the development of a freight corridor from Osoyoos, Canada to Mesa,
Franklin county.
(g) Within the amounts provided within this subsection,
$435,000,000 of the transportation partnerships account--state
appropriation is provided solely for project 509009B: I-90 Snoqualmie
Pass East - Hyak to Keechelus dam. However, if the preferred
alternative selected for this project results in a lower total project
cost, the remaining funds may be used for concrete rehabilitation on
I-90 in the vicinity of this project.
(3) $416,529,000 from the federal, state, and local motor vehicle
account appropriations and $3,370,000 of the special category C
account--state appropriation are provided solely to implement the
projects included in the 2005 Transportation Partnership Project List,
"Highway Improvement Program (I)" section under the column heading "Pre
2003 Funds" as transmitted to LEAP on April 20, 2005. The department
shall manage all projects on the list within the overall expenditure
authority provided in this subsection.
(4) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$42,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(5) The transportation partnership account--state appropriation
includes $380,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
Substitute House Bill No. 2311 (or the version as enacted into law).
The transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues
available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.
(6) The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state appropriation
includes $257,016,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.843. The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state
appropriation includes $15,313,000 in unexpended proceeds from the
January 2003 bond sale authorized in RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project.
(7) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation includes $940,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by chapter 147, Laws of 2003. The transportation commission
may authorize the use of current revenues available to the department
of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.
(8) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to program I and replaced with state funds
in a dollar-for-dollar match. Fund transfers authorized under this
subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission and the
director of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1,
2006.
(9) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2005, provide to the legislature reports providing the status on each
project in the project lists submitted pursuant to this act and on any
additional projects for which the department has expended funds during
the 2005-07 fiscal biennium. The department shall work with the
transportation committees of the legislature to agree on report
formatting and elements. Elements shall include, but not be limited
to, project scope, schedule, and costs. The department shall also
provide the information required under this subsection via the
transportation executive information systems (TEIS).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,622,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,205,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $406,605,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,655,000
Puyallup Tribal Settlement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $146,940,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $652,027,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire 2003 transportation account (nickel account)
appropriation is provided solely for the projects and activities as
listed by project, biennium, and amount in the 2005 Transportation
Partnership Project List, "Highway Preservation Program (P)" section
under the column heading "2003 (Nickel) Package" as transmitted to LEAP
on April 20, 2005. However, limited transfers of allocations between
projects may occur for those amounts listed for the 2005-07 biennium
subject to conditions and limitations in section 603 of this act.
(2) The entire 2005 transportation partnership--state appropriation
is provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by project
in the 2005 Transportation Partnership Project List, "Highway
Preservation Program (P)" section under the column heading "2005
Transportation Partnership Package" as transmitted to LEAP on April 20,
2005.
(a) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $146,440,000 of
the transportation partnership account--state appropriation is provided
solely for implementation of structures preservation (P2) projects.
(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the
transportation partnership account--state appropriation is provided
solely for implementation of other facilities (P3) projects.
(3)(a) $118,993,000 from the federal, state, and local motor
vehicle account appropriations and $11,000,000 of the Puyallup tribe
settlement account--state appropriation are provided solely to
implement the projects included in the 2005 Transportation Partnership
Project List, "Highway Preservation Program (P)" section under the
column heading "Pre 2003 Funds" as transmitted to LEAP on April 20,
2005. The department shall manage all projects on the list within the
overall expenditure authority provided in this subsection.
(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $11,000,000 of
the Puyallup tribal settlement account--state appropriation is provided
solely for mitigation costs associated with the Murray Morgan/11st
Street Bridge demolition. The department may negotiate with the city
of Tacoma for the purpose of transferring ownership of the Murray
Morgan/11th Street Bridge to the city. The department may use the
Puyallup tribal settlement account appropriation, as well as any funds
appropriated in the current biennium and planned in future biennia for
the demolition and mitigation for the demolition of the bridge to
rehabilitate or replace the bridge, if agreed to by the city. In no
event shall the department's participation exceed $26,500,000 and no
funds may be expended unless the city of Tacoma agrees to take
ownership of the bridge in its entirety and provide that the payment of
these funds extinguishes any real or implied agreements regarding
future expenditures on the bridge.
(4) $11,590,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation,
$95,299,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation, and
$113,591,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the Hood Canal bridge project.
(5) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$530,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.761
and 47.10.762 for emergency purposes.
(6) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$45,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(7) The department of transportation shall continue to implement
the lowest life cycle cost planning approach to pavement management
throughout the state to encourage the most effective and efficient use
of pavement preservation funds. Emphasis should be placed on
increasing the number of roads addressed on time and reducing the
number of roads past due.
(8) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to program P and replaced with state funds
in a dollar-for-dollar match. Fund transfers authorized under this
subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission and the
director of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1,
2006.
(9) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2005, provide to the legislature reports providing the status on each
project in the project lists submitted pursuant to this act and on any
additional projects for which the department has expended funds during
the 2005-07 fiscal biennium. The department shall work with the
transportation committees of the legislature to agree on report
formatting and elements. Elements shall include, but not be limited
to, project scope, schedule, and costs. The department shall also
provide the information required under this subsection via the
transportation executive information systems (TEIS).
(10) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the following safety projects: US
2/South of Orondo-passing lane, $900,000; and, US 2/Colbert Road
intersection improvements, $2,100,000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,519,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,068,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,695,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The motor vehicle account--state
appropriation includes $11,255,000 for state matching funds for
federally selected competitive grant or congressional earmark projects
other than the commercial vehicle information systems and network.
These moneys shall be placed into reserve status until such time as
federal funds are secured that require a state match.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,934,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,967,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,249,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,987,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $254,163,000

The appropriations in this section are provided for improving the
Washington state ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel
construction, major and minor vessel preservation, and terminal
preservation, construction, and improvements. The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The Puget Sound capital construction account -- state
appropriation includes $38,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and terminal acquisition, major
and minor improvements, and long lead time materials acquisition for
the Washington state ferries. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the motor vehicle
account in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.
(2) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes $10,249,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.867. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds from any part of the state appropriation.
(3) $149,124,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account--state appropriation, $59,967,000 of the Puget Sound capital
construction account--federal appropriation, and $26,000 of the Puget
Sound capital construction account--local appropriation are provided to
implement the projects and activities included in the 2005
Transportation Partnership Project List, "Ferries Program (W)" section
under the column heading "Pre 2003 Funds" as transmitted to LEAP on
April 20, 2005.
(a) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, a maximum of
$44,238,000 are provided for terminal preservation projects.
(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, a maximum of
$118,540,000 are provided for vessel projects.
(c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, a maximum of
$16,080,000 is provided for terminal improvement projects.
(d) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, a maximum of
$10,543,000 is provided for ferry security projects.
(e) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $4,099,000 are
provided for emergency repair projects. Additionally, unused funds
under (a) through (d) of this subsection, may be transferred to
emergency repair projects.
(f) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $15,617,000 are
provided solely for the Eagle Harbor Terminal Preservation project.
(4) $10,249,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $34,991,000 of the transportation 2003 (nickel)
account--state appropriation are provided solely to implement the
projects and activities as listed by project, biennium, and amount in
the 2005 Transportation Partnership Project list, "Ferries Program (W)"
section under the column heading "2003 (Nickel) Package" as transmitted
to LEAP on April 20, 2005. However, limited transfers of allocations
between projects may occur subject to section 603 of this act.
(5) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2005, provide to the legislature reports providing the status on each
project in the project lists submitted pursuant to this act and on any
additional projects for which the department has expended funds during
the 2005-07 fiscal biennium. Elements shall include, but not be
limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs. The department shall
also provide the information required under this subsection via the
transportation executive information systems (TEIS).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL
Essential Rail Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,788,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,287,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,966,000
Washington Fruit Express Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,791,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The multimodal transportation account -- state appropriation
includes $34,415,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.867. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) If federal block grant funding for freight or passenger rail is
received, the department shall consult with the transportation
committees of the legislature prior to spending the funds on additional
projects.
(3) $59,745,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation, $10,966,000 of the multimodal transportation account--federal appropriation, $7,287,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--private/local appropriation, and $250,000 of the essential
rail assistance account appropriation are provided solely for the rail
program projects as listed on the 2005 Transportation Partnership
Project List, submitted to LEAP on April 20, 2005.
(a) Within the amount provided in this subsection, $2,030,000 is
provided for the projects as listed under the subheading Pre-2003 Funds
Emergent Freight Rail Projects.
(b) Within the amount provided in this subsection, $4,150,000 is
provided for the projects as listed under the subheading Pre-2003 Funds
Freight Rail Projects.
(c) Within the amount provided in this subsection, $17,253,000 is
provided for the projects as listed under the subheading Pre-2003 Funds
Passenger Rail Projects.
(d) Within the amount provided in this subsection, $4,320,000 is
provided for the projects as listed under the subheading 2003 Nickel
Project Freight Rail Projects.
(e) Within the amount provided in this subsection, $24,820,000 is
provided for the projects as listed under the subheading 2003 Nickel
Project Passenger Rail Projects.
(f) Within the amount provided in this subsection, $16,900,000 is
provided for the projects as listed under the subheading 2005
Transportation Partnership Package Freight Rail Projects.
(g) Within the amount provided in this subsection, $8,775,000 is
provided for the projects as listed under the subheading 2005
Transportation Partnership Package Passenger Rail Projects.
(4) If the department issues a call for projects, applications must
be received by the department by November 1, 2005, and November 1,
2006.
(5) $50,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a study of eastern Skagit county
freight rail. The study shall examine the feasibility of restoring
portions of freight rail line to the towns of Lyman, Hamilton, and
Concrete. The study must also identify existing and potential
industrial sites available for development and redevelopment, and the
freight rail service needs of the identified industrial sites.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL
Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,221,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,502,000
Freight Mobility Investment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,211,000
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,540,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,283,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to programs I and P and state funds shall be
transferred from programs I and P to program Z to replace those federal
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. Fund transfers authorized under
this subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department may not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission. The
department shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund
transfers to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2006.
(2) The multimodal transportation account -- state appropriation
includes $6,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.867. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(3) $3,545,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely to fund the
multiphase cooperative project with the state of Oregon to dredge the
Columbia River. The amount provided in this subsection shall lapse
unless the state of Oregon appropriates a dollar-for-dollar match to
fund its share of the project.
(4) $274,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
reappropriated and provided solely for additional traffic and
pedestrian safety improvements near schools. The highways and local
programs division within the department of transportation shall
administer this program. The department shall review all projects
receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to
determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any
project that has been awarded traffic and pedestrian safety improvement
grant funds, but does not report activity on the project within one
year of grant award should be reviewed by the department to determine
whether the grant should be terminated. The department must promptly
close out grants when projects have been completed, and identify where
unused grant funds remain because actual project costs were lower than
estimated in the grant award. The department shall expeditiously
extend new grant awards to qualified projects when funds become
available either because grant awards have been rescinded for lack of
sufficient project activity or because completed projects returned
excess grant funds upon project closeout.
(5) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$905,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.843.
(6) $2,867,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to support the safe routes to school
program.
(7) $18,221,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for the local freight capital projects in progress
identified in this subsection. The specific funding listed is provided
solely for the respective projects: SR 397 Ainsworth Ave. Grade
Crossing, $5,180,000; Colville Alternate Truck Route, $2,000,000; S.
228th Street Extension and Grade Separation, $6,500,000; Bigelow Gulch
Road-Urban Boundary to Argonne Rd., $2,000,000; Granite Falls Alternate
Route, $1,791,000; and Pacific Hwy. E./Port of Tacoma Road to
Alexander, $750,000.
(8) $3,040,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the local freight capital projects in progress
identified in this subsection. The specific funding listed is provided
solely for the respective projects: Duwamish Intelligent
Transportation Systems (ITS), $2,520,000; Port of Kennewick/Piert Road,
$520,000.
(9) $6,000,000 of the multimodal account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the local freight 'D' street grade separation
project.
(10) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the installation of a traffic signal at the
intersection of 1st and the West Valley highway in the city of Algona.
(11) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $2,000,000 of the transportation partnership
account--state appropriation are provided solely for a bicycle and
pedestrian path competitive grant program. The grant recipients may
only be governmental entities. The entity applying for funds must
supply matching funds, as determined by the department. Within the
amount provided in this subsection, the following projects must be
completed within the specific amount listed: Potato Hill Bridge
Bicycle and Pedestrian Path, $750,000; Des Moines Creek Trail,
$520,000; SR 20/Winthrop Area - Bike Path, $1,171,000.
(12) $1,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Sounder commuter rail station
at Mukilteo. The funds shall first be used for a temporary platform
for Sounder commuter rail. However, if the permanent platform project
is accelerated by Sound Transit, making the temporary platform
unnecessary, the funds may be used for pedestrian safety projects at
the Mukilteo ferry terminal.
(13) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a Sounder commuter rail platform
at Stanwood, for the purpose of preparing for mitigation of the
construction on I-5 at Everett.
(14) $19,420,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the "Transportation Partnership
FMSIB Projects" as listed on the 2005 Transportation Partnership
Project List, submitted to LEAP on April 20, 2005.
(15) $3,040,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the "Transportation Partnership
Local Roads Projects" as listed on the 2005 Transportation Partnership
Project List, submitted to LEAP on April 20, 2005.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND
TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,713,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,775,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,010,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,899,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,562,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $303,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,177,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $448,544,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $283,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,792,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Account--State Reappropriation:
For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $257,016,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$257,016,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be
deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.

(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound capital construction
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$38,000,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and
terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long lead-time
materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,757,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
Motor Vehicle Account--State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . $820,769,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRANSFERS
(1) RV Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,000,000
(3) Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(4) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry Operations
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,500,000
(5) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation Partnership
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,430,000
(6) Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Multimodal Transportation
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,170,000
(7) Transportation 2005 Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Small City Pavement and Sidewalk
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(8) Transportation 2005 Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation Improvement
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(9) Transportation 2005 Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Rural Arterial Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
(10) Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the State Patrol Highway Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

The transfers identified in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) The department of transportation shall only transfer funds in
subsection (2) of this section up to the level provided, on an as-needed basis.
(b) The amount identified in subsection (3) of this section may not
include any revenues collected as passenger fares.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS. In addition to
the amounts appropriated in sections 101 through 606 of this act for
revenue for distribution, state contributions to the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system, and bond retirement and
interest including ongoing bond registration and transfer charges,
transfers, interest on registered warrants, and certificates of
indebtedness, there is also appropriated such further amounts as may be
required or available for these purposes under any statutory formula or
under any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 The department of transportation is
authorized to undertake federal advance construction projects under the
provisions of 23 U.S.C. Sec. 115 in order to maintain progress in
meeting approved highway construction and preservation objectives. The
legislature recognizes that the use of state funds may be required to
temporarily fund expenditures of the federal appropriations for the
highway construction and preservation programs for federal advance
construction projects prior to conversion to federal funding.

COMPENSATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 EMPLOYEE SALARY COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENT
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,828,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the purposes set forth in subsection (2) through
(4) of this section, the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for a 3.2% increase effective July 1, 2005, for all state
employees represented by a collective bargaining unit under the
personnel system reform act of 2002.
(2) The appropriation in this section is provided for a 3.2%
increase effective September 1, 2005, for all classified employees,
except those represented by a collective bargaining unit under the
personnel system reform act of 2002, and except the certificated
employees covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732.
Also included are employees in the Washington management service, and
exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the personnel resources
board or the director of personnel, as applicable.
(3) The appropriation is also sufficient to fund a 3.2% salary
increase effective September 1, 2005, for ferry system employees and
for general government, legislative, and judicial employees exempt from
merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission
on salaries for elected officials.
(4) The appropriation in this section is provided for a 1.6% salary
increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, for all state
employees represented by a collective bargaining unit under the
personnel system reform act of 2002. In addition, appropriation is
provided for a 1.6% increase effective September 1, 2006, for all
classified employees, except those represented by a collective
bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act of 2002, and
except the certificated employees covered by the provisions of
Initiative Measure No. 732. Also included are employees in the
Washington management service, and exempt employees under the
jurisdiction of the personnel resources board or the director of
personnel, as applicable. The appropriation is also sufficient to fund
a 1.6% salary increase effective September 1, 2006, until June 30,
2007, for ferry system employees and for general government,
legislative, and judicial employees exempt from merit system rules
whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for
elected officials.
(5)(a) No salary increase may be paid under this section to any
person whose salary has been Y-rated pursuant to rules adopted by the
personnel resources board or the director of personnel, as applicable.
(b) The average salary increases paid under this section to agency
officials whose maximum salaries are established by the committee on
agency official salaries shall not exceed the average increases
provided under subsection (3) of this section.
(6) The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in LEAP document "2005-07
Transportation Budget-Salary Adjustment Allocation" dated April 20,
2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,515,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $663.00 per eligible employee
for fiscal year 2006. For fiscal year 2007, the monthly employer
funding rate shall not exceed $744.00 per eligible employee covered by
the health insurance collective bargaining agreement reached between
the governor and health insurance coalition under the personnel system
reform act of 2002 or $618.00 per eligible ferry system employee and
general government employee not covered under that agreement.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium co-payments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in LEAP document "2005-07
Transportation Budget-Health Benefit Adjustment Allocation" dated April
20, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($11,362,000)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding in this section is provided solely
for funding agency savings in the cost of other compensation items
provided at the pension rates as set forth in House Bill No. 1043 and
House Bill No. 1044. The office of financial management shall update
agency appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding
in this section, as identified by agency and account in LEAP document
"2005-07 Transportation Budget-Pension Adjustment Allocation" dated
April 20, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENT FOR SALARY SURVEY
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,340,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding in this section is provided solely
for funding the compensation adjustment related to the salary survey.
The office of financial management shall update agency appropriations
schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this section, as
identified by agency and account in LEAP document "2005-07
Transportation Budget-Salary Survey Adjustment Allocation" dated April
20, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENT FOR
CLASSIFICATION REVISIONS
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding in this section is provided solely
for funding the compensation adjustment related to the classification
revisions. The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in LEAP document "2005-07
Transportation Budget-Classification Revision Adjustment Allocation"
dated April 20, 2005.

IMPLEMENTING PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies
shall comply with the following requirements regarding information
systems projects when specifically directed to do so by sections 101
through 606 of this act.
(1) Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology
shall be made in the context of its information technology portfolio.
"Information technology portfolio" means a strategic management
approach in which the relationships between agency missions and
information technology investments can be seen and understood, such
that: Technology efforts are linked to agency objectives and business
plans; the impact of new investments on existing infrastructure and
business functions are assessed and understood before implementation;
and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative statewide infrastructure.
(2) Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in
making decisions on matters related to the following:
(a) System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;
(b) Setting goals and objectives for using information technology
in meeting legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;
(c) Assessment of overall information processing performance,
resources, and capabilities;
(d) Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for
the operation of any new systems developed using external resources;
and
(e) Progress toward enabling electronic access to public
information.
(3) Each project will be planned and designed to take optimal
advantage of Internet technologies and protocols. Agencies shall
ensure that the project is in compliance with the architecture,
infrastructure, principles, policies, and standards of digital
government as maintained by the information services board.
(4) The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information
technology projects at the direction of the information services board
and in accordance with published department of information services
policies and guidelines. At a minimum, such studies shall include a
statement of: (a) The purpose or impetus for change; (b) the business
value to the agency, including an examination and evaluation of
benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a comprehensive risk assessment
based on the proposed project's impact on both citizens and state
operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing nothing; (d)
the impact on agency and statewide information infrastructure; and (e)
the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.
(5) The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for
each project. The plan or plans shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of each project. The plan(s) shall include, but
is not limited to, the following elements: A description of the
problem or opportunity that the information technology project is
intended to address; a statement of project objectives and assumptions;
a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to be
accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for
the phased approach shall be such that the business case justification
for a project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or
adds measurable value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business
functions within each development cycle.
(6) The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for
information technology projects. Consistent with the direction of the
information services board and the published policies and guidelines of
the department of information services, the quality assurance plan
shall address all factors critical to successful completion of the
project and successful integration with the agency and state
information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality assurance
plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The
quality assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements
for each phase of a project.
(7) A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and
quality assurance plan shall be provided to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and
legislative fiscal committees. The plans and studies shall demonstrate
a sound business case that justifies the investment of taxpayer funds
on any new project, an assessment of the impact of the proposed system
on the existing information technology infrastructure, the disciplined
use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging of
private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval
of the relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan by the department of information services and the office
of financial management.
(8) Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the
department of information services, the office of financial management,
and legislative fiscal committees at intervals specified in the
project's quality assurance plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 The department of transportation may
transfer federal funds for state funds within the preservation and
improvement programs if funded projects are eligible to use additional
federal funds and the scope of the project is not increased. The
department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this subsection
without approval of the director of financial management. A report of
the transfers will be submitted on October 1st of each fiscal year to
the senate and house of representatives transportation committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 The transportation commission may
authorize a transfer of spending allocation within the appropriation
provided and between projects as listed in the 2005-07 Transportation
Project List - 2003 (Nickel) Package List to manage project spending
near biennial cutoffs under the following conditions and limitations:
(1) Transfers from a project may be made if the funds allocated to
the project are in excess of the amount needed to complete the project,
but transfers may only be made in the biennium in which the savings
occur;
(2) Transfers from a project may not be made as a result of the
reduction of the scope of a project, nor shall a transfer be made to
support increases in the scope of a project;
(3) Transfers may be made within the current biennium from projects
that are experiencing unavoidable expenditure delays, but the transfers
may only occur if the commission finds that any resulting change to the
nickel program financial plan provides that all projects on the list
may be completed as intended by the legislature;
(4) Transfers may not occur to projects not identified on the list;
and
(5) A report of the transfers shall be submitted on October 1st of
each fiscal year to the senate and house of representatives
transportation committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 The department shall provide up to
$3,000,000 in toll credits to local government agencies for passenger-only ferry service. The number of toll credits provided must be equal
to, but no more than, a number sufficient to meet federal match
requirements for grant funding for passenger-only ferry service, but
shall not exceed the amount authorized under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5414 is
enacted by July 1, 2005, then the remaining unexpended fund balance in
the aircraft search and rescue, safety, and education account shall be
deposited into the state aeronautics account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 If House Bill No. 1254 is enacted by July
1, 2005, then on June 30, 2007, the remaining unexpended fund balance
in the bicycle and pedestrian safety account shall be deposited into
the Share the Road account established in House Bill No. 1254.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 The department of transportation shall
eliminate 131 middle management positions by June 30, 2007. The middle
management reduction, however, shall not impact the work force required
to manage and support the delivery of the 2003 nickel package and 2005
transportation partnership package.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 Based on the anticipated outcomes of the
tolling study, to be conducted under section 206 of this act, the
legislature intends that tolls be charged to offset or partially offset
the costs for the Alaskan Way Viaduct, State Route 520 Bridge
replacement, and widening of Interstate 405 including a managed lanes
concept.

Sec. 609 RCW 81.84.020 and 2003 c 373 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon the filing of an application the commission shall give
reasonable notice to the department, affected cities, counties, and
public transportation benefit areas and any common carrier which might
be adversely affected, of the time and place for hearing on such
application. The commission shall have power after hearing, to issue
the certificate as prayed for, or to refuse to issue it, or to issue it
for the partial exercise only of the privilege sought, and may attach
to the exercise of the rights granted by said certificate such terms
and conditions as in its judgment the public convenience and necessity
may require; but the commission shall not have power to grant a
certificate to operate between districts and/or into any territory
prohibited by RCW 47.60.120 or already served by an existing
certificate holder, unless such existing certificate holder has failed
or refused to furnish reasonable and adequate service or has failed to
provide the service described in its certificate or tariffs after the
time period allowed to initiate service has elapsed: PROVIDED, A
certificate shall be granted when it shall appear to the satisfaction
of the commission that the commercial ferry was actually operating in
good faith over the route for which such certificate shall be sought,
on January 15, 1927: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That in case two or more
commercial ferries shall upon said date have been operating vessels
upon the same route, or between the same districts the commission shall
determine after public hearing whether one or more certificates shall
issue, and in determining to whom a certificate or certificates shall
be issued, the commission shall consider all material facts and
circumstances including the prior operation, schedules, and services
rendered by either of the ferries, and in case more than one
certificate shall issue, the commission shall fix and determine the
schedules and services of the ferries to which the certificates are
issued to the end that duplication of service be eliminated and public
convenience be furthered.
(2) Before issuing a certificate, the commission shall determine
that the applicant has the financial resources to operate the proposed
service for at least twelve months, based upon the submission by the
applicant of a pro forma financial statement of operations. Issuance
of a certificate shall be determined upon, but not limited to, the
following factors: Ridership and revenue forecasts; the cost of
service for the proposed operation; an estimate of the cost of the
assets to be used in providing the service; a statement of the total
assets on hand of the applicant that will be expended on the proposed
operation; and a statement of prior experience, if any, in such field
by the applicant. The documentation required of the applicant under
this section shall comply with the provisions of RCW 9A.72.085.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to an application
for a certificate that is pending as of July 25, 1993.
(4) In granting a certificate for passenger-only ferries and
determining what conditions to place on the certificate, the commission
shall consider and give substantial weight to the effect of its
decisions on public agencies operating, or eligible to operate,
passenger-only ferry service.
(5) Until ((March 1, 2005)) July 1, 2006, the commission shall not
accept or consider an application for passenger-only ferry service
serving any county in Puget Sound((, unless the public transportation
benefit area authority or ferry district serving that county, by
resolution, agrees to the application)) with a population of over one
million people. Applications for passenger-only ferry service serving
any county in the Puget Sound area with a population of over one
million pending before the commission as of the effective date of this
section shall be held in abeyance and not considered before July 1,
2006.

2003-05 BIENNIUM
GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES-OPERATING
Sec. 700 2004 c 229 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($365,000))
$375,000

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--OPERATING
Sec. 701 2003 c 360 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,017,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,744,000
School Zone Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,059,000
Bicycle and Pedestrian Safety Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,820,000))
$20,835,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The commission may oversee up to four pilot projects
implementing the use of traffic safety cameras to detect failure to
stop at railroad crossings, stoplights, and school zones.
(a) In order to ensure adequate time in the 2003-05 biennium to
evaluate the effectiveness of the pilot program, any projects
authorized by the commission must be authorized by December 31, 2003.
(b) If a county or city has established an authorized automated
traffic safety camera program under this section, the compensation paid
to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based only
upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in
support of the system, and may not be based upon a portion of the fine
or civil penalty imposed or the revenue generated by the equipment.
(c) The traffic safety commission shall use the following
guidelines to administer the program:
(i) Traffic safety cameras may take pictures of the vehicle and
vehicle license plate only, and only while an infraction is occurring;
(ii) The law enforcement agency of the city or county government
shall plainly mark the locations where the automated traffic
enforcement system is used by placing signs on street locations that
clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone where
traffic laws are enforced by an automated traffic enforcement system;
(iii) Cities and counties using traffic safety cameras must provide
periodic notice by mail to its citizens indicating the zones in which
the traffic safety cameras will be used;
(iv) Notices of infractions must be mailed to the registered owner
of a vehicle within fourteen days of the infraction occurring;
(v) The owner of the vehicle is not responsible for the violation
if the owner of the vehicle, within fourteen days of receiving
notification of the violation, mails to the issuing law enforcement
agency, a declaration under penalty of perjury, stating that the
vehicle involved was, at the time, stolen or in the care, custody, or
control of some person other than the registered owner, or any other
extenuating circumstances;
(vi) Infractions detected through the use of traffic safety cameras
are not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW
46.52.101 and 46.52.120;
(vii) If a notice of infraction is sent to the registered owner and
the registered owner is a rental car business, the infraction will be
dismissed against the business if it mails to the issuing agency,
within fourteen days of receiving the notice, a declaration under
penalty of perjury of the name and known mailing address of the
individual driving or renting the vehicle when the infraction occurred.
If the business is unable to determine who was driving or renting the
vehicle at the time the infraction occurred, the business must sign a
declaration under penalty of perjury to this effect. The declaration
must be mailed to the issuing agency within fourteen days of receiving
the notice of traffic infraction. Timely mailing of this declaration
to the issuing agency relieves a rental car business of any liability
under this section for the notice of infraction. A declaration form
suitable for this purpose must be included with each automated traffic
infraction notice issued, along with instructions for its completion
and use;
(viii) For purposes of the 2003-05 biennium pilot projects,
infractions generated by the use of traffic safety cameras are exempt
from the provisions of RCW 3.46.120, 3.50.100, and 35.20.220, and must
be processed in the same manner as parking violations; and
(ix) By June 30, 2005, the traffic safety commission shall provide
a report to the legislature regarding the use, public acceptance,
outcomes, and other relevant issues regarding traffic safety cameras
demonstrated by the pilot projects.
(2) $210,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for continuing the five existing DUI/traffic safety
task forces that receive federal project funding that expires during
the 2003-05 biennium. However, the appropriation in this subsection
may only be expended for a task force when the federal funding for that
task force has expired.
(3)(a) $1,555,000 of the school zone safety account--state
appropriation is provided solely as matching funds for the following
school safety enhancement projects, as proposed by local agencies,
schools, and tribal governments in response to the department of
transportation's highways and local programs request for information
for potential projects to be financed under Referendum No. 51:

Agency Project Title

Cheney School Crosswalk Improvement Project

Skokomish Indian Tribe Skokomish School Safety Sidewalk Program

Brier 37th Pl SW & 233rd Pl SW Sidewalk

Sunnyside Lincoln Ave Sidewalks

Lynnwood Olympic View Dr - 76th Ave SW to 169th St SW

Steilacoom Cherrydale Elementary School Safety Enhancement

Yakima W Valley School Zone Flashers

Camas SD SR 500 at 15th St Interchange

Seattle Meadowbrook Playfield - NE 105th St

Vancouver Franklin ES Sidewalk Improvements

(b) If one or more of the projects under this subsection cannot be
completed or no longer seeks state matching funds, the following
projects may be substituted in order of priority:

Agency Project Title

Davenport Davenport Sixth St School Sidewalk

Edmonds 96th Ave W Pedestrian Improvements

Mountlake Terrace 223rd St SW - 44th Ave W to Cedar Way Elementary

Yakima Englewood/Powerhouse Intersection Safety Project

(c) The highways and local programs division within the department
of transportation shall provide assistance to the commission in
administering this program.
(d) The legislature intends to tie funding to specific projects
only for the 2003-05 biennium.

Sec. 702 2004 c 229 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,799,000))
$70,951,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,290,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($71,089,000))
$72,241,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Under the direction of the legislative
auditor, the patrol shall update the pursuit vehicle life-cycle cost
model developed in the 1998 Washington state patrol performance audit
(JLARC Report 99-4). The patrol shall utilize the updated model as a
basis for determining maintenance and other cost impacts resulting from
the increase to pursuit vehicle mileage above 110 thousand miles in the
2003-05 biennium. The patrol shall submit a report, that includes
identified cost impacts, to the transportation committees of the senate
and house of representatives by December 31, 2003.

Sec. 703 2004 c 229 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($97,000))
$96,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,000))
$83,000
Highway Safety Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,316,000))
$8,221,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,403,000))
$4,355,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($144,000))
$143,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,053,000))
$12,907,000

Sec. 704 2004 c 229 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- INFORMATION SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($144,000))
$143,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,656,000))
$11,636,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Highway Safety Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,285,000))
$6,257,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,220,000))
$1,214,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,428,000))
$19,373,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall submit a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature detailing the progress made in
transitioning off of the Unisys system by December 1, 2003, and each
December 1 thereafter.
(2) $151,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Third Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5412. Within the amount provided, the department of licensing
shall prepare to implement a "one-to-one" biometric matching system
that compares the biometric identifier submitted to the individual
applicant's record. The authority to expend funds provided under this
subsection is subject to compliance with the provisions under section
504 of this act. If Third Substitute Senate Bill No. 5412 is not
enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec. 705 2004 c 229 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- VEHICLE SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
License Plate Technology Account--State Appropriation (($2,000,000))
$1,200,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $585,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,372,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,193,000))
$57,645,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,844,000))
$3,842,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,654,000))
$65,304,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $144,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5435 or Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1592.
(2) If Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6063 is not enacted by June 30,
2003, $1,100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
shall lapse.
(3) $81,000 of the DOL services account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1036.
(4) $58,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
6325. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 6325 is not enacted by June 30,
2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $192,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No.
6710. If Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6710 is not enacted by June 30,
2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $25,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
6688. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 6688 is not enacted by June 30,
2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $33,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
2910. If Substitute House Bill No. 2910 is not enacted by June 30,
2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $25,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
6148. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 6148 is not enacted by June 30,
2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) (($2,000,000)) $1,200,000 of the license plate technology
account--state appropriation ((and $400,000 of the motor vehicle
account--state appropriation are)) is provided solely for the
implementation of a digital license plate printing system. Within the
amounts provided, the department shall fund the implementation of a
digital license plate system including: The purchase or lease of
digital license plate printing equipment by correctional industries;
the remodeling of space to provide climate control, ventilation, and
power requirements, for the equipment that will be housed at
correctional industries; and the purchase of digital license plate
inventory. The department shall expend all of the license plate
technology account--state appropriation before expending any of the
motor vehicle account--state appropriation. By December 1, 2004, the
department and correctional industries shall submit a joint report to
the transportation committees of the legislature detailing a digital
license plate printing system implementation plan. By June 30, 2005,
the department and correctional industries shall submit a joint report
to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning the cost
of the consumables used in the digital license plate printing process.

Sec. 706 2004 c 229 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- DRIVER SERVICES
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,576,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($87,259,000))
$86,178,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $318,000
Highway Safety Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($90,220,000))
$89,139,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $178,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for two temporary collision processing FTEs to
eliminate the backlog of collision reports. The department shall
report, informally, to the house of representatives and senate
transportation committees quarterly, beginning October 1, 2003, on the
progress made in eliminating the backlog.
(2) (($369,000)) $322,000 of the highway safety account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5428 or House Bill No. 1681. Within the amount
provided in this subsection, the department is authorized to accept
applications for driver's license and identicard renewals via the mail
or internet. If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5428 or House
Bill No. 1681 is not enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $282,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Third Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5412. Within the amount provided, the department of licensing
shall prepare to implement a "one-to-one" biometric matching system
that compares the biometric identifier submitted to the individual
applicant's record. The authority to expend funds provided under this
subsection is subject to compliance with the provisions under section
504 of this act. If Third Substitute Senate Bill No. 5412 is not
enacted by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $354,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
2532. If Substitute House Bill No. 2532 is not enacted by June 30,
2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) (($538,000)) $288,000 of the highway safety account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 2660. If Substitute House Bill No. 2660 is not enacted
by June 30, 2004, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.707 2004 c 229 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM
C
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($56,236,000))
$53,522,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,163,000))
$6,654,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,038,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,800,000))
$67,577,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $850,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided for the continued maintenance and support of the
transportation executive information system (TEIS). The TEIS shall be
enhanced during the 2004 interim to shift towards a monitoring and
reporting system capable of tracking and reporting on major project
milestones and measurements. The department shall work with the
legislature to identify and define meaningful milestones and measures
to be used in monitoring the scope, schedule, and cost of projects.
(2)(a) $2,959,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
and $2,963,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of a new revenue collection system,
including the integration of the regional fare coordination system
(smart card), at the Washington state ferries. By December 1st of each
year, an annual update must be provided to the legislative
transportation committee concerning the status of implementing and
completing this project.
(b) $200,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the smart card
program.
(3) The department shall contract with the department of
information services to conduct a survey that identifies possible
opportunities and benefits associated with siting and use of technology
and wireless facilities located on state right of way authorized by RCW
47.60.140. The department shall submit a report regarding the survey
to the appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2004.

Sec. 708 2004 c 229 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS
AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,981,000))
$30,515,000

Sec. 709 2004 c 229 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,056,000))
$48,056,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,456,000))
$48,456,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($14,310,000)) $13,985,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the staffing, activities, and
overhead of the department's environmental affairs office. This
funding is provided in lieu of funding provided in sections 305 and 306
of this act.
(2) $3,100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the staffing and activities of the transportation
permit efficiency and accountability committee. The committee shall
develop a model national environmental policy act (NEPA) tribal
consultation process for federal transportation aid projects related to
the preservation of cultural, historic, and environmental resources.
The process shall ensure that Tribal participation in the NEPA
consultation process is conducted pursuant to treaty rights, federal
law, and state statutes, consistent with their expectations for
protection of such resources.
(3) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department solely for the
purposes of providing contract services to the association of
Washington cities and Washington state association of counties to
implement section 2(3)(c), (5), and (6), chapter 8 (ESB 5279), Laws of
2003 for activities of the transportation permit efficiency and
accountability committee.

Sec. 710 2003 c 360 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,011,000))
$996,000

Sec. 711 2004 c 229 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q--OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,924,000))
$38,338,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,049,000))
$38,463,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of $8,800,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation may be expended for the incident response program,
including the service patrols. The department and the Washington state
patrol shall continue to consult and coordinate with private sector
partners, such as towing companies, media, auto, insurance and trucking
associations, and the legislative transportation committees to ensure
that limited state resources are used most effectively. No funds shall
be used to purchase tow trucks.
(2) $4,400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give
priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or
provide congestion relief. The department shall prioritize low-cost
enhancement projects on a statewide rather than regional basis.
(3) At a frequency determined by the department, the interstate-5
variable message signs shall display a message advising slower traffic
to keep right.
(4) The appropriation authority under this section includes
spending authority to administer the motorist information sign panel
program. The department shall establish the annual fees charged for
these services so that all costs to administer this program are
recovered; in no event, however, shall the department charge more than:
(a) $1,000 per business per location on freeways and expressways
with average daily trips greater than 80,000;
(b) $750 per business per location on freeways and expressways with
average daily trips less than 80,000; and
(c) $400 per business per location on conventional highways.

Sec. 712 2004 c 229 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,579,000))
$24,079,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $636,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,093,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,281,000))
$26,781,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $627,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5248. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5248 is not enacted by June 30,
2003, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. The agency
may transfer between programs funds provided in this subsection.
(2) The department shall transfer at no cost to the Washington
state patrol the title to the Walla Walla colocation facility.

Sec. 713 2004 c 229 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA,
AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,494,000))
$24,194,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,814,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,521,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,829,000))
$42,529,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,800,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for a study of regional congestion relief solutions for
Puget Sound (including state route 169), Spokane, and Vancouver. The
study must include proposals to alleviate congestion consistent with
population and land use expectations under the growth management act,
and must include measurement of all modes of transportation.
(2) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for additional assistance to support regional
transportation planning organizations and long-range transportation
planning efforts. As a condition of receiving this support, a regional
transportation planning organization containing any county with a
population in excess of one million shall provide voting membership on
its executive board to any incorporated principal city of a
metropolitan statistical area within the region, as designated by the
United States census bureau.
(3) (($3,000,000)) $1,200,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the costs of the regional
transportation investment district (RTID) election and department of
transportation project oversight. These funds are provided as a loan
to the RTID and shall be repaid to the state motor vehicle account
within one year following the certification of the election results
related to the RTID.
(4) $650,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department to support the
processing and analysis of the backlog of city and county collision
reports.
(5) The department shall contribute to the report required in
section 208(1) of this act in the form of an analysis of the cost
impacts incurred by the department as the result of the policy
implemented in section 208(1) of this act. The analysis shall contrast
overtime costs charged by the patrol prior to July 1, 2003, with
contract costs for similar services after July 1, 2003.
(6) $60,000 of the distribution under RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) is provided solely to the department for the Washington
strategic freight transportation analysis.
(7) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for contracting with the department of
natural resources to develop data systems for state submerged lands
that can be shared with other governmental agencies and that can
support the state vision for ecoregional planning. The data to be
shared shall include, but not limited to, tabular and geospatial data
describing public land ownership, distributions of native plants,
marine and aquatic species and their habitats, physical attributes,
aquatic ecosystems, and specially designated conservation or
environmentally sensitive areas.

Sec. 714 2004 c 229 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,057,000))
$46,757,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,574,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,786,000))
$49,486,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $18,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs
transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of
transportation.
(a) $4,000,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs
transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers shall be based on need,
including the availability of other providers of service in the area,
efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost
effectiveness of trips provided.
(b) $14,000,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons
with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit
agency must have a maintenance of effort for special needs
transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of
effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies
shall be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response
service and route deviated service in calendar year 2001 as reported in
the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2001" published by the
department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than
thirty percent of these distributions.
(2) $1,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to implement section 9 of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2228.
(3) Funds are provided for the rural mobility grant program as
follows:
(a) $6,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for those transit systems
serving small cities and rural areas as identified in the Summary of
Public Transportation - 2001 published by the department of
transportation. Noncompetitive grants must be distributed to the
transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) $4,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to providers of rural mobility service
in areas not served or underserved by transit agencies through a
competitive grant process.
(4) $4,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (a)
Public transit agencies to add vanpools; and (b) incentives for
employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for
public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; no operating
costs for public transit agencies are eligible for funding under this
grant program. No additional employees may be hired for the vanpool
grant program, and supplanting of transit funds currently funding
vanpools is not allowed. Additional criteria for selecting grants will
include leveraging funds other than state funds. The commute trip
reduction task force shall determine the cost effectiveness of the
grants, including vanpool system coordination, regarding the use of the
funds.
(5) $100,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the commute trip reduction program
for Benton county.
(6) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided to the city of Seattle for the Seattle
streetcar project on South Lake Union.
(7) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to King county as a state match to
obtain federal funding for a car sharing program.

Sec. 715 2004 c 229 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($312,490,000))
$328,430,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,120,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($317,610,000))
$333,550,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of
(($35,348,000)) $51,048,000 for vessel operating fuel in the 2003-2005
biennium. If the actual cost of fuel is less than this budgeted
amount, the excess amount may not be expended. If the actual cost
exceeds this amount, the department shall request a supplemental
appropriation.
(2) The appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry
employees. The expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees
during the 2003-2005 biennium may not exceed $208,935,700, plus a
dollar amount, as prescribed by the office of financial management,
that is equal to any insurance benefit increase granted general
government employees in excess of $495.30 a month annualized per
eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine
employees for fiscal year 2004 and $567.67 a month annualized per
eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine
employees for fiscal year 2005, a dollar amount as prescribed by the
office of financial management for costs associated with pension
amortization charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of
financial management for salary increases during the 2003-2005
biennium. For the purposes of this section, the expenditures for
compensation paid to ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and
wages and employee benefits as defined in the office of financial
management's policies, regulations, and procedures named under objects
of expenditure "A" and "B" (7.2.6.2).
The prescribed salary increase or decrease dollar amount that shall
be allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in
addition to the appropriation contained in this section and may be used
to increase or decrease compensation costs, effective July 1, 2003, and
thereafter, as established in the 2003-2005 general fund operating
budget.
(3) $4,234,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $800,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations
account--state appropriation are provided solely for operating costs
associated with the Vashon to Seattle passenger-only ferry. The
Washington state ferries will develop a plan to increase passenger-only
farebox recovery to at least forty percent by July 1, 2003, with an
additional goal of eighty percent, through increased fares, lower
operation costs, and other cost-saving measures as appropriate. In
order to implement the plan, ferry system management is authorized to
negotiate changes in work hours (requirements for split shift work),
but only with respect to operating passenger-only ferry service, to be
included in a collective bargaining agreement in effect during the
2003-05 biennium that differs from provisions regarding work hours in
the prior collective bargaining agreement. The department must report
to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1,
2003.
(4) $984,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for ferry security operations
necessary to comply with the ferry security plan submitted by the
Washington state ferry system to the United States coast guard. The
department shall track security costs and expenditures. Ferry security
operations costs shall not be included as part of the operational costs
that are used to calculate farebox recovery.
(5) $866,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $200,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations
account--state appropriation are provided solely for operating costs
associated with the Bremerton to Seattle passenger-only ferry service
for thirteen weeks.
(6) The department shall study the potential for private or public
partners, including but not limited to King county, to provide
passenger-only ferry service from Vashon to Seattle. The department
shall report to the legislative transportation committees by December
31, 2003.
(7) The Washington state ferries shall continue to provide service
to Sidney, British Columbia.
(8) When augmenting the existing ferry fleet, the department of
transportation ferry capital program shall explore cost-effective
options to include the leasing of ferries from private-sector
organizations.
(9) The Washington state ferries shall work with the department of
general administration, office of state procurement to improve the
existing fuel procurement process and solicit, identify, and evaluate,
purchasing alternatives to reduce the overall cost of fuel and mitigate
the impact of market fluctuations and pressure on both short- and long-term fuel costs. Consideration shall include, but not be limited to,
long-term fuel contracts, partnering with other public entities, and
possibilities for fuel storage in evaluating strategies and options.
The department shall report back to the transportation committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2003, on the options, strategies, and
recommendations for managing fuel purchases and costs.
(10) The department must provide a separate accounting of
passenger-only ferry service costs and auto ferry service costs, and
must provide periodic reporting to the legislature on the financial
status of both passenger-only and auto ferry service in Washington
state.
(11) The Washington state ferries must work with the department's
information technology division to implement a new revenue collection
system, including the integration of the regional fare coordination
system (smart card). Each December, annual updates are to be provided
to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning the
status of implementing and completing this project, with updates
concluding the first December after full project implementation.
(12) The Washington state ferries shall evaluate the benefits and
costs of selling the depreciation rights to ferries purchased by the
state in the future through sale and lease-back agreements, as
permitted under RCW 47.60.010. The department is authorized to issue
a request for proposal to solicit proposals from potential buyers. The
department must report to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2004, on the options, strategies, and
recommendations for sale/lease-back agreements on existing ferry boats
as well as future ferry boat purchases.

Sec. 716 2004 c 229 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,118,000))
$33,538,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($29,961,000)) $29,331,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the Amtrak service
contract and Talgo maintenance contract associated with providing and
maintaining the state-supported passenger rail service.
(2) No Amtrak Cascade runs may be eliminated.
(3) The department is directed to explore scheduling changes that
will reduce the delay in Seattle when traveling from Portland to
Vancouver B.C.
(4) The department is directed to explore opportunities with
British Columbia (B.C.) concerning the possibility of leasing an
existing Talgo trainset to B.C. during the day for a commuter run when
the Talgo is not in use during the Bellingham layover.
(5) $50,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementing the produce rail car
program as provided in RCW 47.76.420.

Sec. 717 2004 c 229 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z--OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,067,000))
$6,957,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,569,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,636,000))
$9,526,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $75,000 of the total appropriation is provided in
accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) to fund the state's
share of the 2004 Washington marine cargo forecast study. Public port
districts, acting through their association, must provide funding to
cover the remaining cost of the forecast.
(2) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) solely to
fund a study of the threats posed by flooding to the state and other
infrastructure near the Interstate 5 crossing of the Skagit River.
This funding is contingent on the receipt of federal matching funds.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
Sec. 801 2004 c 229 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT
TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($250,000,000))
$240,833,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,131,000))
$1,440,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,340,000))
$42,084,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,721,000))
$33,209,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,254,000
Special Category C Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $338,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $358,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,117,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($342,499,000))
$325,873,000

Sec. 802 2004 c 229 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL
AGENT CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,293,000))
$793,000
Special Category C Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $119,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($700,000))
$400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,244,000))
$1,444,000

Sec. 803 2004 c 229 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to
cities and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($440,228,000))
$435,138,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For license permit and fee distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,119,000))
$0

Sec. 804 2004 c 229 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
(1) ((State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
(2))) Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . (($770,347,000))
$752,823,000
(((3))) (2) Highway Safety Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the motor
vehicle account -- state . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

The state treasurer shall perform the transfers from the ((state
patrol highway account and the)) highway safety account to the motor
vehicle account on a quarterly basis.

MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENT FOR CLASSIFICATION REVISIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENT FOR SALARY SURVEY . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 4, 25
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
DRIVER SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 11, 57
INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 10, 55
MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 9, 54
VEHICLE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 10, 56
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AVIATION -- PROGRAM F . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS -- PROGRAM K . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM D . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY--PROGRAM C . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM C . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 24, 70
MARINE -- PROGRAM X . . . . . . . . . . . . 22, 66
PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT--PROGRAM H . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V . . . . . . . . . . . . 19, 64
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 23, 69
TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM B . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 16, 61
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S . . . . . . . . . . . . 16, 62
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T . . . . . . . . . . . . 16, 63
WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
EMPLOYEE SALARY COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2, 50
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
STATE TREASURER
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 38, 39, 70, 71
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 40, 72
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 40, 72
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 5, 25
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
CAPITAL PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 4, 51
--- END ---