BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s. c
25 (uncodified) to read as follows:
(1) The sum of one million eight hundred thousand dollars is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, from the state
general fund for deposit in the state emergency water projects
revolving account.
(2) The sum of one million eight hundred thousand dollars is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, from the state
emergency water projects revolving account to the department of ecology
for the costs incurred by the department of ecology in taking action
pursuant to the declaration of a statewide drought emergency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s. c
25 (uncodified) to read as follows:
The sum of two hundred thousand dollars is appropriated for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, from the state general fund to the
department of natural resources for the costs incurred by the
department of natural resources to be able to activate fire fighters to
respond to the heightened risk of forest fires pursuant to the
declaration of a statewide drought emergency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s. c
26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
(1)(a) The sum of eight million two hundred thousand dollars is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, from the state
taxable building construction account for deposit in the state drought
preparedness account for project number 05-4-009.
(b) The sum of eight million two hundred thousand dollars is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, from the state
drought preparedness account to the department of ecology for costs
incurred in responding to the state drought emergency, for project
number 05-4-009.
(2)(a) The appropriation in subsection (1)(b) of this section is
provided solely for response to the statewide drought that was declared
pursuant to chapter 43.83B RCW. The department may provide funding or
compensation for purchase or lease of water rights and to public bodies
as defined in RCW 43.83B.050 in connection with projects and measures
designed to alleviate drought conditions which may affect: Public
health and safety, drinking water supplies, agricultural activities, or
fish and wildlife survival.
(b) Projects or measures for which funding or compensation will be
provided must be connected with a water system, water source, or water
body which is receiving, or has been projected to receive, less than
seventy-five percent of normal water supply, as the result of natural
drought conditions. This reduction in water supply must be such that
it is causing, or will cause, undue hardship for the entities or fish
or wildlife depending on the water supply. General criteria for
guidelines to be established by the department for distribution of
funds must include: A balanced and equitable distribution of the funds
among the different sectors affected by drought, a funding process that
ensures funds are available for drought impacts that arise both early
and later during the course of the drought, and preference for projects
that leverage other federal and local funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---