BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A capital budget is hereby adopted and,
subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar
amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be
sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2007, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
TVW - Digital Equipment (06-4-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (88-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $558,000
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,522,235
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,080,235

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,570,132
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,650,367

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (06-4-010)

Appropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,126,905

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,096,207
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,223,112

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Program (00-2-007)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,792,784

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,907,216
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Program (02-4-008)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,475,621

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,224,379
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Account (04-4-002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Expenditures of the reappropriation must comply with RCW
70.119A.170.
(2)(a) The state building construction account reappropriation is
provided solely to provide assistance to counties, cities, and special
purpose districts to identify, acquire, and rehabilitate public water
systems that have water quality problems or have been allowed to
deteriorate to a point where public health is an issue. Eligibility is
confined to applicants that already own at least one group A public
water system and that demonstrate a track record of sound drinking
water utility management. Funds may be used for: Planning, design,
and other preconstruction activities; system acquisition; and capital
construction costs.
(b) The state building construction account reappropriation must be
jointly administered by the department of health, the public works
board, and the department of community, trade, and economic development
using the drinking water state revolving fund loan program as an
administrative model. In order to expedite the use of these funds and
minimize administration costs, this reappropriation must be
administered by guidance, rather than rule. Projects must generally be
prioritized using the drinking water state revolving fund loan program
criteria. All financing provided through this program must be in the
form of grants that must partially cover project costs. The maximum
grant to any eligible entity may not exceed twenty-five percent of the
funds allocated to the appropriation in section 201, chapter 277, Laws
of 2004.

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,749,753
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,449,753

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,247
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water SRF - Authorization to Use Loan Repayments
(04-4-010)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Program (06-4-003)

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,100,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building for the Arts (04-4-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.750.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
104, chapter 277, Laws of 2004.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,718,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,468,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building for the Arts (06-4-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the
provisions of RCW 43.63A.750.
The following projects are eligible for funding:

Projects Location Recommendation

African-American museum Seattle $700,000

McIntyre hall Mount Vernon $350,000

Northwest film forum Seattle $100,000

Historic Cooper school Seattle $500,000

Merc playhouse Twisp $6,000

Masquers theatre Soap Lake $145,000

Cornish College of the Arts Seattle $700,000

Dahmen barn workshop Uniontown $79,000

Roxy theatre Morton $75,000

Duwamish longhouse Seattle $65,000

Everett symphony Everett $215,000

Admiral theatre Bremerton $180,000

Pratt fine arts center Seattle $300,000

Arlington performing arts Arlington $375,000

Seattle Academy of Fine Art Seattle $35,000

Academy of children's theatre Richland $150,000

Empire theatre Tekoa $25,000

Children's museum Spokane $75,000

World kite museum Long Beach $115,000

Total $4,190,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,190,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Cancer Research Facility Grant (01-S-005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided as a grant for equipment and
facilities improvements for a prostate cancer research project at the
University of Washington medical center and must be matched by an equal
amount from nonstate sources.
(2) The project must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $668,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,332,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Fox Theatre Project (01-S-006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The project must comply with RCW
43.63A.125(2)(c) and other requirements for community projects
administered by the department.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,093,031

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,406,969
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
West Central Community Center (01-S-016)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The project must comply with RCW
43.63A.125(2)(c) and other requirements for community projects
administered by the department.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $493,750

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,250
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (04-4-001)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $416,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (06-4-004)

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,688,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Highline School District Aircraft Noise Mitigation (03-H-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the Highline
school district, the port of Seattle, and the federal aviation
administration each matching the appropriation in section 150, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.
(2) This reappropriation does not commit the state to make future
appropriations for this program.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,517,598

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,482,402
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
City of Woodland Infrastructure Development (04-4-959)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The project must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) The reappropriation is provided for allocation by the
department to the city of Woodland for infrastructure development,
including drainage improvements and a dike access road.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,451

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,549
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Economic Revitalization Board (04-4-008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: A maximum of twenty-five percent of the
appropriation in section 105, chapter 277, Laws of 2004 may be used for
grants.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,437,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Economic Revitalization Board (CERB) (06-4-011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: A maximum of twenty-five percent of the
appropriation may be used for grants.

Appropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,448,657

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,990,055
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,438,712

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Services Facilities Program (04-4-006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.125.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
128, chapter 26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,131,280
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,931,280

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Services Facilities Program (06-4-006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the
provisions of RCW 43.63A.125.
The following projects are eligible for funding:

Projects Location Recommendation

Abused deaf women's advocacy services Seattle $400,000

YouthCare Seattle $350,000

Pike market senior center Seattle $310,000

Friends of gladish Pullman $25,000

FareStart Seattle $400,000

Denise Louie education center Seattle $400,000

Rural resources community action Newport $170,000

Jumping mouse children's center Port Townsend $45,000

Compass center Seattle $400,000

Neighborhood house Seattle $350,000

Behavioral health resources Olympia $400,000

Salvation Army Renton corp Renton $350,000

Metropolitan development council Tacoma $110,000

Lutheran community services SeaTac $400,000

Olympia childcare center Olympia $90,000

Kitsap Community Resources Bremerton $735,000

Northwest Youth Services Bellingham $210,000

Total $5,145,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,145,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,145,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Greenbank Farm (04-4-950)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The project must comply with RCW
43.63A.125(2)(c) and other requirements for community projects
administered by the department.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(04-4-003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,700,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely to promote
development of safe and affordable housing units for persons eligible
for services from the division of developmental disabilities within the
department of social and health services.
(2) $700,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for grants
to nonprofit organizations and public housing authorities for revolving
loan, self-help housing programs for low and moderate income families.
(3) $84,500 of the reappropriation is provided solely for shelters,
transitional housing, or other housing facilities for victims of
domestic violence.
(4) $600,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary
farmworkers. It is the intent of the legislature that operation of the
facilities built under this section be in compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec.
1342. The department shall work with the farmworker housing advisory
committee to prioritize funding of projects to the areas of highest
need. Funding may also be provided, to the extent qualified projects
are submitted, for health and safety projects.
(5) $1,400,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for the
development of emergency shelters and transitional housing
opportunities for homeless families with children.
(6) Up to $1,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely to
help capitalize a self-insurance risk pool for nonprofit corporations
in Washington that develop housing units for low-income persons and
families. The self-insurance risk pool shall be approved by the state
risk manager. The self-insurance risk pool shall repay to the state
the amount of the reappropriation provided to the risk pool under this
section whenever the capitalization exceeds the minimum requirements
established by the office of the risk manager. Any reappropriation
authority not expended by June 30, 2007, shall lapse.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,780,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,220,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(06-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) At least $9,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
weatherization administered through the energy matchmakers program.
(2) $5,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to promote
development of safe and affordable housing units for persons eligible
for services from the division of developmental disabilities within the
department of social and health services.
(3) $2,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants
to nonprofit organizations and public housing authorities for revolving
loan, self-help housing programs for low and moderate income families.
(4) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
shelters, transitional housing, or other housing facilities for victims
of domestic violence.
(5) $8,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary
farmworkers. It is the intent of the legislature that operation of the
facilities built under this section be in compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec.
1342. The department shall work with the farmworker housing advisory
committee to prioritize funding of projects to the areas of highest
need. Funding may also be provided, to the extent qualified projects
are submitted, for health and safety projects.
(6) $5,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
development of emergency shelters and transitional housing
opportunities for homeless families with children.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Farm Worker Housing Infrastructure (06-4-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The project must comply with RCW
43.63A.125(2)(c).

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Japanese-American Memorial (04-4-951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The project must comply with RCW
43.63A.125(2)(c) and other requirements for community projects
administered by the department.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,025,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Lewis and Clark Confluence Project (04-2-954)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The project must comply with RCW
43.63A.125(2)(c) and other requirements for community projects
administered by the department.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,337,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $662,500
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 128 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local/Community Projects (04-4-011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department,
except that the Highline historical society project is land
acquisition.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
204, chapter 277, Laws of 2004.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,228,345

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,086,155
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,314,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local/Community Projects (06-4-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) Funding for the Inland Northwest Science and Technology Center
shall be held in reserve until the balance of phase I funding has been
secured or committed from local government and community sources.
(3) The following projects are eligible for funding:

Projects Recommendation

7th street theatre $600,000

Alder creek pioneer association carousel museum $450,000

Asian counseling and referral service $2,000,000

Bi-state habitat conservation funding plan $150,000

Bridge for kids $850,000

Brookside school ADA playground equipment $25,000

Buena library $50,000

Cesar Chavez park $150,000

Childhaven $150,000

Clark Lake Park and Retreat Center $500,000

Colman school $500,000

Columbia breaks fire interpretive center $150,000

Covington aquatics center phase 1 $350,000

Cutter theater $71,000

Discovery park $1,000,000

Des Moines beach park historic buildings $300,000

East Whatcom regional resource center $2,000,000

Edmonds center for the arts $1,000,000

El Centrol de la Raza $900,000

Filipino community center $200,000

Filipino cultural center of Kitsap county $250,000

Foster creek $150,000

Fox theater $2,500,000

Greenbridge plaza in White Center $200,000

Habitat park south hill $400,000

Hidden river environmental education center $50,000

ICL education center $200,000

Japanese cultural and community center $200,000

Mt. Vernon Jasper Gates statue $12,000

Joel Pritchard park (Japanese-American memorial) $2,500,000

Joe's creek project $856,000

Juanita creek channel and riparian restoration $500,000

Julia Butler Hansen home restoration $10,000

LeRoi smelter smokestack monument $3,000

Lewis and Clark confluence project $1,500,000

McCaw hall $3,000,000

MOBIUS/Inland Northwest science and technology
center
$1,500,000

Mt. Baker theater $200,000

Nathaniel Orr home site museum interpretive center $29,000

New Lakewood clinic $350,000

Northshore performing arts center $1,000,000

Pacific Northwest salmon center $1,000,000

Pacific science center $900,000

Puget Sound freight building warehouse--Thea Foss
waterway
$2,000,000

Relocate Japanese garden (3rd runway) $250,000

River walk and Sammamish river restoration $200,000

Sandman historical tug restoration $10,000

Seward park environmental and audubon center $400,000

Snohomish senior center $150,000

Sno-Valley senior activity center kitchen $50,000

Sound way property preservation $500,000

Spokane river whitewater course $400,000

Synthetic sportsfield partnership at Robinswood park $400,000

Tall ships moorage $300,000

Tukwila kayak and canoe launching facility $20,000

Undeveloped woodlands linked to interurban nature
trail
$150,000

Vancouver national historical reserve west barracks $1,000,000

West Seattle community resource center $500,000

West central community center $400,000

Wilson playfield land acquisition $200,000

Wing Luke asian art museum $1,500,000

Total $37,136,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,136,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,136,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
PBS Digital Upgrade (04-4-958)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The project must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) $345,625 is provided to public television station KYVE for the
costs to convert to digital transmission capability and the upgrading
and replacement of equipment, studio facilities, and contents.
(3) The remaining reappropriation is available for public
television stations based outside central Puget Sound metropolitan
areas.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,548

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $336,452
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 131 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Washington State Games (04-4-850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $97,597

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,403
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 132 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Wing Luke Asian Art Museum (04-4-952)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The project must comply with RCW
43.63A.125(2)(c) and other requirements for community projects
administered by the department.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $316,202

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,183,798
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Yakima Ball Fields (04-2-952)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $119,990 of the reappropriation is
provided solely to Yakima Valley Community College for the purchase of
Noel field from the city of Yakima, and $230,000 is provided solely to
the city of Yakima to replace and relocate ballfields. It is intended
that no funds be distributed to the city of Yakima until the transfer
of the Noel field property is complete.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $346,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 134 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Youth Recreational Facilities Program (06-4-007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the
provisions of RCW 43.63A.135.
The following projects are eligible for funding:

Projects Location Recommendation

Boys and girls clubs/Southwest Washington Vancouver $300,000

Boys and girls clubs/Southwest King county Seattle $300,000

Boys and girls clubs/Olympic Peninsula Port Angeles $40,000

Mukilteo family YMCA Mukilteo $200,000

Girl scouts inland empire council Spokane $300,000

Boys and girls clubs/King county Federal Way $300,000

Boys and girls clubs/Snohomish county Granite Falls $120,000

Boys and girls clubs/Snohomish county Monroe $100,000

Kent youth and family services Kent $300,000

Lummi youth recreation Bellingham $40,000

Total $2,000,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 135 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Historic Courthouse Rehabilitation (06-4-009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
courthouse protection and preservation, including character defining
architectural features, general repairs, system upgrades, payments for
renovations completed since January 1, 2003, and improvements to access
and accommodations for persons with disabilities. All rehabilitation
work shall comply with the secretary of interior's standards for
rehabilitation. Counties receiving grants shall provide an equal
amount of matching funds from public or private sources. An historic
courthouse advisory committee is established to review grant
applications and make funding recommendations to the state historic
preservation officer.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 136 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Job/Economic Development Grants (06-4-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided for job and
community development projects under the provisions of chapter . . .
(Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1903), Laws of 2005. If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the appropriation shall lapse.

Projects Location Recommendation

Bellingham waterfront restoration/farmers market $2,300,000

Bremerton Harborside $5,500,000

Burien town square $3,000,000

Carnation sewer $2,000,000

Infrastructure for Renton Boeing property $5,000,000

Placeholder $7,500,000

Port of Walla Walla wine incubator $1,000,000

Ridgefield Employment Center Project $2,000,000

South Seattle Community College small business
incubator
$2,000,000

Redevelop Snohomish riverfront $1,500,000

Wine and culinary arts center in Prosser $1,500,000

Yakima town center restoration $5,000,000

Total $38,300,000

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 137 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Coastal Erosion Grants (01-S-019)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for coastal erosion grants in southeast Washington in
partnership with other state and federal funds. Grays Harbor county is
the lead agency in the administration of the grants.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,916,845
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,416,845

NEW SECTION. Sec. 138 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
East Plaza Repairs (96-1-002)

Reappropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,567,200
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,567,200

NEW SECTION. Sec. 139 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building: Rehabilitation and Capital Addition
(01-1-008)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,381,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,481,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 140 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Cherberg Building: Rehabilitation (02-1-005)

(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is for the purpose of
furthering the John A. Cherberg building rehabilitation project,
including but not limited to the following: Project final design and
initial phase of reconstruction; purchase and remodel of the two
modular buildings currently owned by the Legislative building
rehabilitation project; and remodel of a portion of the Joel M.
Pritchard building for use as swing space during reconstruction.
(2) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Funding is provided for design, construction, and other costs
related to the relocation efforts associated with this project.
(b) The construction contract award shall be made to the general
contractor offering written and oral materials demonstrating the
greatest value for attainment of the program objectives considering a
number of evaluation criteria, including cost.
(c) Project oversight is delegated to the senate. Of this
appropriation, $750,000 is provided to the senate for management costs.
Costs incurred by the department for this project shall be negotiated
with the senate as reimbursable project agreements and approved by the
senate. The department shall make available to the senate such
personnel, facilities, and other assistance as the senate may request
for this project.
(d) The department may negotiate agreements with the senate for
additional fees to manage the John A. Cherberg building rehabilitation
project.
(e) Upon completion of the project, the temporary modular buildings
shall be sold and removed, and the parking lot shall be restored and
landscaped.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,253,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,439,000
COP Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,776,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,468,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,068,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 141 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation: Capital Campus
(04-1-003)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 142 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Facility Preservation: Statewide (04-1-004)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,345,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,545,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Historic Buildings - Exterior Preservation (04-1-012)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,225,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Transportation Building Preservation (02-1-008)

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,190,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,939,116
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,818,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,947,116

NEW SECTION. Sec. 145 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building Security (04-2-950)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,119,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,179,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 146 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Emergency Repairs (06-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation shall only be used for
unanticipated building or infrastructure repairs necessary for the
protection of capital assets and protection of health or safety.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 147 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Infrastructure Projects - Savings (06-1-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 915 of this act may have their remaining funds transferred
to this appropriation for other preservation projects approved by the
office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 148 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Engineering and Architectural Services (06-2-012)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations shall be used to provide project management
services to state agencies as required by RCW 43.19.450 that are
essential and mandated activities defined as core services and are
included in the engineering and architectural services'
responsibilities and task list for general public works projects of
normal complexity. The general public works projects included are all
those financed by the state capital budget for the biennium ending June
30, 2007, with individual total project values up to $20,000,000.
(2) The community and technical capital projects account shall be
used to provide services to six community and technical colleges
projects that require separate reimbursable project management
agreements.
(3) The department may negotiate agreements with agencies for
additional fees to manage projects financed by financial contracts,
other alternative financing, projects with a total value greater than
$20,000,000, or for the nonstate funded portion of projects with mixed
funding sources.
(4) The department shall review each community and technical
college request and the requests of other client agencies for funding
any project over $2,500,000 for inclusion in the 2006 supplemental
capital budget and the 2007-09 capital budget to ensure that the amount
requested by the agency is appropriate for predesign, design, and
construction, depending on the phase of the project being requested.
The department shall pay particular attention: (a) That the budgeted
amount requested is at an appropriate level for the various components
that make up the cost of the project such as project management; and
(b) that standard measurements such as cost per square foot are
reasonable. The department shall also assist the office of financial
management with review of other agency projects as requested.

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,000
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $132,815
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,216,771
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,723,892
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $461,307
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,839
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,783,624

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,464,100
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,247,724

NEW SECTION. Sec. 149 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
General Administration Building Rehabilitation (06-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the predesign for
replacement or renovation of the general administration building
combined with the development of an office building on the block
adjoining Capital Way and 11th avenue. The combined development is
intended to provide: (1) Executive office space for statewide elected
officials; (2) public access space for portions of the state library
collection and historically significant documents from the state
archives and the state historical museum; and (3) high density general
office space that can adapt to changing state needs. The project will
maximize interagency sharing of support services such as information
technology, printing and mailing, management and storage of supplies,
reception areas, and other common functions. The project will also
include sufficient parking to provide a net increase in parking spaces
beyond what is required for the new office space. The project shall
also include leasable ground floor retail space on Capital Way. The
department shall consult with statewide elected officials and the city
of Olympia in developing the predesign.

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 150 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Highway-License Building Repair and Renewal (06-1-013)

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 151 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Natural Resources Building Repairs and Renewal (06-1-014)

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $502,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,950,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,452,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 152 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Statewide Infrastructure: Preservation Minor Works (06-1-004)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall contract with the
department of transportation for the repair of the hillside trail. The
department shall provide all documents, engineering reports, and any
other plans to the department of transportation so that their engineers
may determine the best approach for a long-term solution to the erosion
problem. The department shall reserve at least $600,000 for this
repair. If the hillside survives the 2005-06 rainy season without a
significant slide, the unspent balance of this reserved money may be
used for other purposes.

Appropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,463,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,033,600
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,530,600

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,585,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,115,600

NEW SECTION. Sec. 153 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Statewide Office Facilities: Preservation Minor Works (06-1-003)

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,965,000
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,815,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,239,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,054,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 154 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Statewide Parking Facilities: Preservation Minor Works (06-1-007)

Appropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,585,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,465,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 155 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Capitol Public/Historic Facilities: Preservation Minor Works
(06-1-006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,204,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,270,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,474,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 156 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Capitol Lake: Environmental Preservation and Planning (00-1-007)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 157 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Heritage Park Complete Development (01-H-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,638,199
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,838,199

NEW SECTION. Sec. 158 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building Omnibus (06-1-005)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department will assist in the
relocation of the statute law committee offices from the legislative
building to the Pritchard building. The vacated space is intended for
additional offices for the house of representatives.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,317,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $878,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,195,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,195,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 159 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
ADA Access Between Legislative, Cherberg, O'Brien, and Pritchard
Buildings (06-1-951)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,349,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,349,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 160 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
East Plaza Repairs - Phase 5 (06-3-001)

Appropriation:
COP Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 161 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Office Building 2 - Rehabilitation (06-3-002)

Appropriation:
COP Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 162 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Pritchard Building - Rehabilitation (02-1-006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funds are provided for a study of the current and future use of
the Joel M. Pritchard Building and for an examination of the potential
rehabilitation of the facility. The study shall be facilitated by the
department and include representatives from the governor's office, the
house of representatives, senate, the arts commission, and the
department's ADA facilities program.
(2) The department shall provide a report to the legislature by
June 30, 2006, reviewing prior rehabilitation efforts and outlining
alternative uses and preservation strategies for the Joel M. Pritchard
Building in concert with the existing use of the west campus buildings
public, elected officials, and tenant agencies.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 163 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Bremerton Readiness Center (02-2-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,023,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,823,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 164 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Construct Spokane Readiness Center (04-2-003)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,800,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,468,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,568,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 165 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Omnibus Support to Federal Preservation Projects (04-1-003)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,300,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,548,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,948,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 166 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Preservation Projects - Statewide (04-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is to correct
deficiencies to state-owned facilities and does not include parking lot
repairs or paving.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $513,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,113,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 167 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Alteration of Building No. 2, Camp Murray (05-1-001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,260,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 168 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Courseware Development Support Facility (05-2-002)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,237,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,375,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 169 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Design and Construct Olympia Area Readiness Center (06-2-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is for a predesign to
develop alternatives for the consolidation of the Olympia and Centralia
readiness centers.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,062,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,312,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 170 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Auditorium and Instructor Support Facility (06-2-003)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,390,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,390,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 171 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Infrastructure Projects-Savings (06-1-022)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 915 of this act may have their remaining funds transferred
to this appropriation for other preservation projects approved by the
office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 172 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Kent Readiness Center Preservation (06-1-001)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $386,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,136,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,136,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 173 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
National Guard Headquarter's Building Preservation (06-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $643,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $643,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 174 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Omnibus Preservation Projects - Statewide (06-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,723,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,723,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 175 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Omnibus Support for Federal Minor Works Projects - Statewide
(06-2-001)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,851,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,851,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,003,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,854,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 176 FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (06-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $40,000 of this appropriation shall be
used to contract for services to conserve or maintain existing pieces
of the state art collection located at the Washington state convention
and trade center.

Appropriation:
State Convention and Trade Center Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,770,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,770,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 177 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Consolidation of Salmon Monitoring and Watershed Data (06-2-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the design of a single, computerized data base of salmon monitoring and
watershed data. The omnibus operating budget requires involved
agencies to submit to the office of financial management (OFM) an
inventory of all salmon monitoring and watershed data collected. OFM
and the department of information systems will design an automated data
system that: (1) Standardizes all data definitions; (2) eliminates, to
the greatest extent possible, duplicative collection of data; (3)
provides a single, web-based access portal for use by all state and
local organizations involved in salmon monitoring and watershed
projects; and (4) adopts existing technology that allows for collection
of data and display of data through GPS/GIS capabilities. OFM shall
submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2006, outlining the system design, the estimated cost to
build the system, and the estimated operational savings that will be
achieved.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
School Mapping (06-1-100)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the initial mapping of schools and production of software and security
projects, and may not be used to supplant any local government's
existing school or other building mapping program that can transfer
data to a statewide first responder building mapping information
system.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Washington State Criminal Justice Training Commission Omnibus Minor
Works (06-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Echo Glen Children's Center - Site: Infrastructure Improvements
(96-2-229)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $925,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $830,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,755,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,654,300
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,409,300

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Western State Hospital: Legal Offender Unit (98-2-052)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,794,341
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,294,341

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Child Study and Treatment Center - Cottages: Modifications, Phase
3 (00-1-015)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Echo Glen Children's Center - Eleven Cottages: Renovation
(00-1-041)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,605,495
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,300,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,205,495

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Special Commitment Center - Secure Facility: Construction, Phase
3 (00-2-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: To the extent that the department projects
savings and efficiencies through design or scope changes, funds
reappropriated in this section may be transferred to minor
works-health, safety, and code requirements (project No. 06-1-111) for
expenditure for minor works projects.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,259,008
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,559,008

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health: Omnibus Programmatic Projects (04-2-365)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Omnibus Preservation: Facility Preservation (04-1-112)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Omnibus Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements
(04-1-111)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Omnibus Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation (04-1-113)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Rainier School - Wastewater Treatment Plant: Construction
(Buckley) (04-1-950)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $190,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Residential Habilitation Center Consolidation (04-1-958)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Special Commitment Center - Regional Secure Community Transition
Facility: New 12 Bed Facility (04-2-502)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide: Emergency and Unanticipated Repair Projects (04-1-116)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Developmental Disabilities: Omnibus Programmatic Projects
(06-2-465)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Capital Project Management (06-1-110)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,100,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital - Westlake Building: Fire Alarm Upgrade
(06-1-370)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Fircrest Interim Safety Measures (06-1-951)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Juvenile Rehabilitation: Omnibus Programmatic Projects (06-2-265)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Lakeland Village - Nine Cottages: Renovation, Phase 4, 5, and 6
(06-1-402)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,100,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health Division - Bridgeways: 3515 Hoyt Avenue Renovation
(06-4-309)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health Division - Bridgeways: Residential Rehabilitation
(06-4-308)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health Division - Clark County: Center for Community Health
(06-4-351)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health Division - CLIP Facilities: Preservation (06-4-353)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health Division - Highline Mental Health: Preservation
(06-4-313)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 227 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health Division - North Sound Evaluation and Treatment: Air
Conditioning (06-4-356)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 228 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health Division - Eastern Washington: Evaluation and
Treatment (06-4-352)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 229 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health: Omnibus Programmatic Projects (06-2-365)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 230 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Omnibus Preservation: Facility Preservation (06-1-112)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 231 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Omnibus Preservation: Health, Safety and Code Requirements
(06-1-111)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 232 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Omnibus Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-113)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 233 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Project Savings: Infrastructure and Preservation Projects
(06-1-114)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 915 of this act may have their remaining funds transferred
to this appropriation for other preservation projects approved by the
office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 234 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide: Emergency and Unanticipated Repair Projects (06-1-101)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation shall only be used for
unanticipated building or infrastructure repairs necessary for the
protection of capital assets or protection of health or safety.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 235 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide: Facilities Assessment and Preservation Planning, Phase
2 (06-1-120)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 236 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide: Hazards Abatement and Demolition (06-1-119)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 237 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Western State Hospital: Central Campus Redevelopment (06-2-375)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The agency will provide a predesign that
will assess the existing kitchen, the dining hall, and the pharmacy
building, and compare them to a new kitchen/commissary/pharmacy
building.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 238 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Western State Hospital - Laundry: New Construction (06-3-325)

Appropriation:
COP Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 239 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Pediatric Interim Care Newborn Nursery (06-4-951)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $617,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $617,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 240 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Cliff Bailey Center (06-4-952)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 241 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: Biosafety Level 3 Facility (02-2-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding for a predesign of a biosafety
level 3 facility shall be coordinated with the University of
Washington. It is not the intent of the legislature to build two such
facilities. One facility shall be designed to meet the research needs
of the University of Washington and the public health needs of the
department.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,485
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $301,485

NEW SECTION. Sec. 242 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: Chiller Plant Upgrade (02-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,040,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $315,142
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,855,142

NEW SECTION. Sec. 243 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (04-4-003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
an interagency agreement with the department of community, trade, and
economic development to make, in cooperation with the public works
board, loans to local governments and public water systems for projects
and activities to protect and improve the state's drinking water
facilities and resources.

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,820,094

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,401,906
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,222,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 244 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (06-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
an interagency agreement with the department of community, trade and
economic development to make, in cooperation with the public works
board, loans to local governments and public water systems for projects
and activities to protect and improve the state's drinking water
facilities and resources.

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,122,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,488,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,610,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 245 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: Minor Works Facility Preservation
(06-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: This appropriation is provided for roof
replacement at the public health laboratory.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,625,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,975,600
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,600

NEW SECTION. Sec. 246 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
240 Bed Nursing Facility (02-2-008)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,670,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,730,700
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,900,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 247 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Spokane Veterans Home Kitchen (04-2-004)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $753,830
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $953,830

NEW SECTION. Sec. 248 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Emergency Funds (06-1-006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation shall only be used for
unanticipated building or infrastructure repairs necessary for the
protection of capital assets or protection of health or safety.

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 249 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Infrastructure Projects - Savings (06-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 915 of this act may have their remaining funds transferred
to this appropriation for other preservation projects approved by the
office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 250 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works Health, Safety, Code Requirements (06-1-007)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 251 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-002)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $816,912
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $871,912

NEW SECTION. Sec. 252 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Coyote Ridge Corrections Center: Expansion (98-2-011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $179,000,000 is provided solely to design and construct a
1,280 bed medium-security prison at Coyote Ridge corrections center in
Connell.
(2) The facility shall be a publicly-owned and operated facility.
(3) The new facility shall include at least 512 hybrid-security
beds that have a lower cost to construct than conventional medium
security beds but still maintain a medium security perimeter.
(4) Design of the facility shall incorporate efficiencies in
administrative space and support services realized by sharing services
within the region. The department shall examine other states' and
private industry standard designs, and report on how efficiencies will
be incorporated into the design of the facility to the office of
financial management and to legislative fiscal staff not later than
September 1, 2005. Nothing in this subsection requires the department
to adopt design parameters that would endanger public safety or
generate increased operating costs.
(5) Once opened, a portion of the new facility shall be used to
alleviate the crowded conditions in reception at the Washington
corrections center in Shelton.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $921,140
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $179,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $986,347
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,907,487

NEW SECTION. Sec. 253 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Correctional Industries Space (98-2-005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,549,994

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,250,006
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 254 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Violent Offender/Truth in Sentencing Grant Administration
(99-2-004)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,667
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,333
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $505,993
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $580,993

NEW SECTION. Sec. 255 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: 100-Bed Management and Segregation Unit
(00-2-008)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $819,229
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,674,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,493,229

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,944,803
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,438,032

NEW SECTION. Sec. 256 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Replace Electrical Supply System
(02-1-024)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $425,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,878,715
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,303,715

NEW SECTION. Sec. 257 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Replace Sanitary/Domestic Water
Lines (02-1-026)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $925,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,962,235

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,457,167
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,344,402

NEW SECTION. Sec. 258 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
McNeil Island Corrections Center: Replace Submarine Electric Power
Cable (04-1-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,856,331

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,702,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,758,331

NEW SECTION. Sec. 259 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Omnibus Preservation: Facility Preservation (Minor Works)
(04-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,852,961
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,052,961

NEW SECTION. Sec. 260 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Omnibus Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code (04-1-021)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 261 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Omnibus Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation (Minor Works)
(04-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 262 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Regional Infrastructure (04-2-008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,593,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,196,001

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,846,001

NEW SECTION. Sec. 263 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Convert BAR Units from Medium to
Close Custody (04-2-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,209,202
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,809,202

NEW SECTION. Sec. 264 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: North Close Security Compound
(04-2-005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $124,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,818,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,940,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,758,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 265 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Replace Support Building Roof
(06-1-044)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,752,053

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,752,053

NEW SECTION. Sec. 266 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Replace Water Tanks (06-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 267 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe Corrections Center: Improve C and D Units Security Features
(06-1-046)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,898,269

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,898,269

NEW SECTION. Sec. 268 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: Predesign Healthcare Facility
(06-2-043)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,695,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,395,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 269 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
McNeil Island Corrections Center: Predesign/Design
Replace/Stabilize Housing Unit Siding (06-1-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall report to the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature
not later than September 1, 2006, on the feasibility and cost of
closing the McNeil Island corrections center (MICC). This report can
utilize information from the department's updated master plan, and
shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Current and projected future annual operating costs for the
MICC on a total and per capita basis, with comparisons to other
department facilities of similar security level and programming;
(2) Current and projected future annual level of subsidy provided
by MICC operations to the department of social and health services
facilities on McNeil Island that would have to be funded separately if
MICC were to close;
(3) Current and projected future annual level of subsidy provided
by MICC correctional industries and/or operations to other department
facilities that might have to be funded separately if MICC were to
close;
(4) Projected costs of mothballing the facility if it were closed;
(5) A project list and estimated cost of capital improvements that
would need to be funded over the next ten years if MICC were to remain
open;
(6) Information on the custody, housing, and programmatic needs of
the offenders housed at MICC; and
(7) Estimates of costs to construct additional facilities to house
the offenders removed from MICC and/or recommendations for placement at
suitable existing facilities.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $794,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,808,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,602,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 270 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Mission Creek: Add 120 Beds (06-2-017)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,425,184

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,425,184

NEW SECTION. Sec. 271 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Omnibus Preservation: Facility Preservation (Minor Works)
(06-1-035)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,833,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,033,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 272 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Omnibus Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code (Minor Works)
(06-1-027)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,054,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,154,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 273 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Omnibus Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation (Minor Works)
(06-1-025)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,826,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,626,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 274 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Omnibus Program: Programmatic Projects (Minor Works) (06-2-033)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,915,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,915,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 275 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Stafford Creek Corrections Center: Correct Security Deficiencies
(06-1-013)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,593,266

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,593,266

NEW SECTION. Sec. 276 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Emergency Projects (06-1-036)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation shall only be used for
unanticipated building or infrastructure repairs necessary for the
protection of capital assets or protection of health or safety.

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 277 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Infrastructure Projects - Savings (06-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 915 of this act may have their remaining funds transferred
to this appropriation for other preservation projects approved by the
office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 278 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide: Inflow and Infiltration Analysis (06-2-034)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 279 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide: Telecommunications Infrastructure Master Plan
(06-1-065)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 280 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Predesign/Design Health Care
Facility Remodel (06-2-072)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,834,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,034,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 281 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Replace G Building Roof (06-1-077)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,776,477

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,776,477

NEW SECTION. Sec. 282 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women: Predesign/Design
Healthcare Facility (06-2-066)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,877,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,077,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 283 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women: Predesign/Design Replace
Steamlines (06-1-018)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,016,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,756,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,772,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 284 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Design Kitchen Improvements
(06-1-007)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $629,552

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,221,531
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,851,083

NEW SECTION. Sec. 285 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Design South Close Security Complex
(06-2-021)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,917,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,917,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 286 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Replace Emergency Generators
(06-1-062)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 287 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Replace 6 Wing Roof (06-1-009)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,096,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,096,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 288 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Replace Correctional Industries
Roof (06-1-023)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,772,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,772,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 289 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
Employment Resource Center (05-2-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is to purchase and
install state of the art equipment for a 40,000 square foot facility
supporting work force development programs using funds available to the
state in section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed act).

Reappropriation:
Unemployment Compensation Administration
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 290 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
Walla Walla WorkSource Office: Training Room Expansion (06-2-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: This appropriation is to build a training
and meeting room at the Walla Walla WorkSource building using funds
available to the state in section 903(d) of the Social Security Act
(Reed act).

Appropriation:
Unemployment Compensation Administration
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (74-2-006)

Reappropriation:
State Drought Preparedness--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $205,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,869,674
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,074,674

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,255,326
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,330,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Fund (86-2-007)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $287,359
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,293,656
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,581,015

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,812,704
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,393,719

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (88-2-008)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,435,524
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $258,835,524

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (90-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,828,872

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,528,483
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,357,355

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (97-2-012)

Reappropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,131,732

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,087,335
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,219,067

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies (01-H-010)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriations are provided solely to provide grants to
conservation districts to assist the agricultural community to
implement water conservation measures and irrigation efficiencies in
the 16 critical basins. A conservation district receiving funds shall
manage each grant to ensure that a portion of the water saved by the
water conservation measure or irrigation efficiency will be placed as
a purchase or a lease in the trust water rights program to enhance
instream flows. The proportion of saved water placed in the trust
water rights program must be equal to the percentage of the public
investment in the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency. The
percentage of the public investment may not exceed 85 percent of the
total cost of the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency. In
awarding grants, a conservation district shall give first priority to
family farms.
(2) $344,000 of the water quality account reappropriation is
provided for water leases or projects in the Yakima river basin for
aquifer recharge necessary to allow the use of drought wells to meet
essential irrigation needs. Essential irrigation needs is defined as
eighty percent of the water a farmer would ordinarily receive from the
irrigation district, less the water that is actually delivered and
regardless of crops grown.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,963
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,983,926
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,663,103
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,142,992

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,979,657
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,122,649

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Measuring Devices (01-H-009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
water measuring devices and gauges. The department shall prioritize
the distribution of water measuring devices and gauges to locations
participating in the department of fish and wildlife's fish screens and
cooperative compliance programs.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,611,941

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,088,059
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Fund (02-4-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
conditions and limitations of section 315, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,828,687

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,874,259
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,702,946

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Padilla Bay Expansion (02-2-006)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,693,690
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $281,734
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,975,424

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,849,509
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,824,932

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (02-4-002)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,002,053
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $774,704
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,776,757

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,623,880
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $139,400,637

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (02-4-006)

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,243,909

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,201,906
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,445,815

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Fund (04-4-007)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $7,547,044 of the water quality account--state
reappropriation is provided for the extended grant payment to
metro/King county.
(2) Up to $10,000,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided for the extended grant payment to
Spokane for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.
(3) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account--state
reappropriation is provided solely for water quality facility grants
for communities with a population of less than 5,000. The department
shall give priority consideration to: (a) Communities subject to a
regulatory order from the department of ecology for noncompliance with
water quality rules; (b) projects for which design work has been
completed; and (c) projects with a local match from reasonable water
quality rates and charges.
(4) $760,000 of the state building construction account--state
reappropriation is provided solely for the Klickitat wastewater
treatment project.
(5) $800,000 of the state building construction account--state
reappropriation is provided solely for the comprehensive irrigation
district management program.
(6) $150,000 of the water quality account--state reappropriation is
to contract with a regional salmon enhancement organization for
planning activities related to improving water quality in the Hood
Canal, particularly research, preservation, and restoration of
molluscan ecosystem including bivalves and other important filtering
organisms in Hood Canal.
(7) The remaining reappropriation in this section is provided for
statewide water quality implementation and planning grants and loans.
The department shall give priority consideration to projects located in
basins with critical or depressed salmonid stocks.
(8) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,981,926
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,109,075
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,091,001

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,958,999
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 313 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia Basin Ground Water Management (04-2-952)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to
the department of ecology to make grants to implement the Columbia
basin ground water management area plan.

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 314 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (04-4-008)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,208,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $249,042,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $273,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 315 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Site Closure - Nuclear Waste Trench Site Investigation (04-4-010)

Reappropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,135,470

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,945
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,141,415

NEW SECTION. Sec. 316 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Twin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (04-2-951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely to
recover the department of ecology's cost in evaluating and issuing
decisions on water right applications and restoration of the Twin Lakes
in the Methow valley.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $715,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 317 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (04-4-002)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,935,416
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,730,455
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,665,871

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,128,587
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $153,794,458

NEW SECTION. Sec. 318 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Rights Purchase/Lease (04-1-005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided for the
purchase or lease of water rights. It is also provided for the purpose
of improving stream and river flows in fish critical basins under the
trust water rights program under chapters 90.42 and 90.38 RCW.

Reappropriation:
State Drought Preparedness--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,470,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 319 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (04-4-006)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) $541,951 of the state building construction account
reappropriation and $1,733,812 of the state and local improvements
revolving account reappropriation are provided solely for expenditure
under a contract between the department of ecology and the United
States bureau of reclamation for the development of plans, engineering,
and financing reports and other preconstruction activities associated
with the development of water storage projects in the Yakima river
basin, consistent with the Yakima river basin water enhancement
project, P.L. 103-434. The initial water storage feasibility study
shall be for the Black Rock reservoir project. The department shall
seek federal funds to augment the funding provided by this
appropriation.
(b) Up to $2,240,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided solely for phase 1 of restoration of
anadromous fish habitat in Manastash creek.
(c) The remainder of the state building construction account
reappropriation is provided solely for grants for the development of
plans, engineering and financing reports, acquiring land and
facilities, and other preconstruction activities associated with the
development of water storage and groundwater storage and recovery
projects. Proposed projects must be consistent with the
recommendations of the water storage task force and the governor's
water strategy. Priority for the use of these funds must be given to:
Projects that have been identified for early action through watershed
plans, comprehensive irrigation district management plans, or similar
plans; to projects that are part of an approved habitat conservation
plan or other intergovernmental agreement; or to joint projects with
federal entities such as the bureau of reclamation. The department
shall develop and administer this grants program in conjunction with
the departments of agriculture and fish and wildlife. Decisions
regarding which projects are funded must be by unanimous agreement of
all three departments. The department shall seek local and federal
funds to augment the funding provided by this reappropriation.
(2) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,759,519
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,779,173
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,538,692

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,111,308
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 320 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (05-2-852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,186,549

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,451
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 321 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (05-2-851)

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $424,085
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,878,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,915
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,676,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,079,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 322 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Conveyance Infrastructure Projects (05-2-850)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,500,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for water conveyance facilities to
implement the 1996 memorandum of agreement regarding utilization of
Skagit river basin water resources for in-stream and out-of-stream
purposes.
(2) $300,000 of the state and local improvements revolving
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the Bertrand
watershed improvement district to address unpermitted water use and
environmental compliance and fund early action planning, feasibility
studies, and construction of early action projects.
(3) $1,600,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Middle Fork Nooksack river
water diversion system.
(4) First priority from the remaining appropriation, $1,475,000
from the state and local improvements revolving account--state
appropriation, $350,000 from the state building construction account--state appropriation, and the water quality account--state
appropriation, shall be the following projects: Piping in the upper
Yakima river; piping for Bull canal; piping for the Lowden number 2
ditch; diversion reconstruction and piping in Beaver creek; conjunctive
use of surface and ground water in the Chewuch river; replacing surface
diversions with wells and consolidation of diversions in the Entiat
river; replacing a check dam with a siphon on Little Naneum creek;
consolidate diversions on Simcoe creek; and ground water recharge of
reclaimed water on Kitsap peninsula. The purpose of this funding is to
develop projects and take other water management actions that benefit
streamflows and enhance water supply to resolve conflicts among water
needs for municipal water supply, agricultural water supply, and fish
restoration. The streamflow or other public benefits secured from
these projects should be commensurate with the investment of state
funds.
(5) $50,000 of the state building construction account--state
reappropriation is provided solely for Ahtanum creek watershed
restoration and Pine Hollow reservoir, provided there is agreement
among the Yakama nation, Ahtanum irrigation district, and other
jurisdictional federal, state, and local agencies and entities to
proceed with the environmental impact statement.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,772,949
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,272,949

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,051
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,275,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 323 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (06-4-007)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $10,000,000 of the state building construction account--state appropriation is provided for the extended grant payment to
Spokane for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.
(2) $5,000,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for water quality grants for hardship
communities with a population of less than 5,000. The department shall
give priority consideration to: (a) Communities subject to a
regulatory order from the department of ecology for noncompliance with
water quality rules; (b) projects for which design work has been
completed; and (c) projects with a local match from reasonable water
quality rates and charges.
(3) $1,000,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided to design appropriate wastewater treatment
facilities to serve the Hoodsport to Skokomish reservation areas of
Hood Canal. The exact facilities will be based upon the
recommendations from an analysis of wastewater management options for
the Hoodsport to Skokomish river currently being undertaken by Mason
county.
(4) $320,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation is
provided to Mason county to develop a septic system data base and
identify failing septic systems in Hood Canal.
(5) $70,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation will
be provided to Kitsap county for surveys of septic systems in Hood
Canal.
(6) $70,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation will
be provided to Jefferson county for surveys of septic systems in Hood
Canal.
(7) The remaining appropriation in this section is provided for
statewide water quality implementation and planning grants and loans.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,950,000
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,050,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $211,808,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $254,808,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 324 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Initiative (06-2-010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for feasibility
studies related to off-mainstem storage projects and impacts of
changing operations at the Potholes reservoir, and grant funding for
the purchase and installation of water measuring devices.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,090,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,090,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 325 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Health and Safety (Minor Works) (06-1-006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $710,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $710,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 326 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
State Drought Preparedness (05-4-009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for
response to the statewide drought that was declared pursuant to chapter
43.83B RCW. The department of ecology may provide funding or
compensation for purchase or lease of water rights and to public bodies
as defined in RCW 43.83B.050 in connection with projects and measures
designed to alleviate drought conditions which may affect: Public
health and safety; drinking water supplies; agricultural activities; or
fish and wildlife survival.
(2) Projects or measures for which funding or compensation will be
provided must be connected with a water system, water source, or water
body which is receiving, or has been projected to receive, less than
seventy-five percent of normal water supply, as the result of natural
drought conditions. This reduction in water supply must be such that
it is causing, or will cause, undue hardship for the entities or fish
or wildlife depending on the water supply. General criteria for
guidelines to be established by the department of ecology for
distribution of funds must include: A balanced and equitable
distribution of the funds among the different sectors affected by
drought; a funding process that ensures funds are available for drought
impacts that arise both early and later during the course of the
drought; and preference for projects that leverage other federal and
local funds.

Reappropriation:
State Drought Preparedness Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 327 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (06-4-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $6,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants
to local governments for local projects that implement the state
"beyond waste" plan. Grant funds will emphasize additional organics
composting and conversion, green building, and moderate risk waste
projects described in the plan. Of this amount, up to $1,600,000 may
be used for one-time funding for auto switch recycling consistent with
the memorandum of agreement being finalized with the auto recyclers
association.
(2) $3,000,000 of the appropriation is provided for emission
reduction projects for local governments to retrofit public sector
diesel engines with exhaust emission control devices or to make other
modifications or operational changes, including cleaner fuels, to allow
public sector fleets to reduce their emissions.
(3) $5,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants
to local governments needing assistance in complying with the new phase
II storm water permit requirements.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $317,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 328 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Minor Works (06-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $615,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $615,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 329 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soil Remediation and Awareness Projects (06-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 330 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies (06-2-009)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 331 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (06-4-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall give priority loan
funding consideration to on-site septic system rehabilitation and
replacement programs in Mason, Kitsap, and Jefferson counties for at
least $1,000,000 from the water pollution control revolving account--state in the second year of the funding cycle.

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $162,839,146
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,777,140
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,616,286

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $912,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,151,616,286

NEW SECTION. Sec. 332 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (06-2-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $16,000,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for projects and water right acquisitions to support
watershed planning efforts and achieving instream flows subject to the
following project types, conditions, and limitations:
(1) Up to $1,353,172 of the appropriation is provided to improve
irrigation efficiency and to achieve associated flow improvements in
the Twisp and Methow rivers by providing for cleaning and piping of
30,943 linear feet of the irrigation canal within the lower
(downstream) seven miles of the Methow Valley irrigation district's
west canal. Of this amount, up to $100,000 is provided for a neutral
independent consultant to provide management assistance to the Methow
Valley irrigation district for purposes of identifying structural and
operational improvements to increase overall system water use
efficiency.
(2) Up to $200,000 of the appropriation is provided for a portion
of the costs of the project level environmental impact statement for
the Ahtanum creek watershed restoration program, including construction
of the Pine Hollow reservoir, provided there is agreement among the
Yakama nation, Ahtanum irrigation district, and other jurisdictional
federal, state, and local agencies and entities to proceed with the
environmental impact statement.
(3) Up to $75,000 of the appropriation is provided to formalize the
Ahtanum creek watershed restoration program, including identification
of site specific habitat improvement projects and determination of the
most appropriate restoration program alternative to implement.
(4) Water storage grants for the development of plans, engineering
and financing reports, acquiring lands and facilities, and other
preconstruction activities associated with the development of water
storage and groundwater storage and recovery projects. Proposed
projects should be consistent with the recommendations of the water
storage task force. The department of ecology would issue grants in
consultation with the departments of agriculture and fish and wildlife.
(5) Infrastructure improvement projects and other water management
actions that benefit stream flows and enhance water supply to resolve
conflicts among water needs for municipal water supply, agriculture
water supply, and fish restoration. The stream flow improvements and
other public benefits secured from these projects should be
commensurate with the investment of state funds.
(6) Projects for planning, acquisition, construction, and
improvement of agriculture water supply facilities and achieving water
conservation and water use efficiency improvements.
(7) Financial assistance to purchase and install water measuring
devices at points of diversion and withdrawal. Preference would be
given to fish-critical basins, to areas participating in the department
of fish and wildlife fish screening and cooperative compliance
programs, and to basins where watershed planning has determined
additional water diversion and withdrawal information is needed.
(8) Funding for acquisition of either water or water rights, or
both, for instream flow achievement and establishment of water
accounts. The appropriation is provided for either the purchase or
lease, or both, of water rights. It is also provided for the purpose
of improving stream and river flows in fish critical basins under the
trust water rights program under chapters 90.42 and 90.38 RCW.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 333 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Long Lake and Wapato Lake Restoration (06-4-951)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $600,000 of the appropriation is provided
for assistance in cleaning up Long Lake in Kitsap county and $50,000 is
provided for assistance in cleaning up Wapato Lake in Pierce county.
The assistance is contingent on the lake communities adopting a lake
management plan that meets the department's requirement.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 334 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Wetland Mitigation Bank Demonstration--Chehalis (06-4-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for a grant to the
port of Chehalis for a demonstration wetland mitigation bank.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 335 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cama Beach Donation for Commons and Restroom/Bathhouse (99-2-001)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided to construct
the commons and the bathhouse at Cama Beach state park.
(2) The funding is solely and directly from donations intended for
this facility.

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $249,951

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $249,951

NEW SECTION. Sec. 336 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Lewis and Clark Bicentennial (00-1-010)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely to renovate facilities and enhance exhibits at Lewis
and Clark trail interpretive centers located at Sacajawea state park
and Fort Canby state park.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,437,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,037,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 337 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Major Park Renovation - Cama Beach (02-1-022)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided to
complete electrical power, water, and sewer utilities, and for other
park development and renovation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 338 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Park Housing (02-2-008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 339 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Spokane Centennial Trail - Unanticipated receipt (03-2-001)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 340 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Deception Pass Renovation (04-1-019)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is for design and
permits for park and marine crew area relocation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 341 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Historic Stewardship (04-1-010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 342 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (04-1-001)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations in this section are
provided solely to continue minor works projects that reduce the
deferred maintenance backlog.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,269
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,747,269

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,990,231
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,737,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 343 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Parkland Acquisition (04-2-013)

Reappropriation:
Parkland Acquisition Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $412,690

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $412,690

NEW SECTION. Sec. 344 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Recreation Development (04-2-002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $100,000 of the reappropriation shall be used to retain
a consultant to conduct a predesign study for a headquarters building
located in Thurston county. The predesign shall compare a new leased
facility against options to build and evaluate appropriate funding
strategies.
(2) $900,000 of the reappropriation shall be used to install fee
collection stations at selected parks statewide.
(3) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the commission shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 345 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Statewide Boat Pumpout - Federal Clean Vessel Act (04-4-014)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 346 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Jefferson County Public Utility District Grant (05-1-006)

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $265,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $265,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 347 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cama Beach Donation for Commons and Restroom/Bathhouse (05-1-019)

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,916,036

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,916,036

NEW SECTION. Sec. 348 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Beacon Rock - Pierce Trust (06-1-030)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided to make
improvements to the group camp at Beacon Rock state park.
(2) The funding has been provided solely and directly for this
project.

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 349 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cama Beach - New Destinations (06-2-011)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,820,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,520,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 350 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cape Disappointment - Renewed Traditions (06-2-027)

Appropriation:
Parkland Acquisition Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 351 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Coastal Parks - Renewed Traditions (06-2-012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 352 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Deception Pass - Renewed Traditions (06-2-013)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 353 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Emergency and Unforeseen Needs (06-1-024)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation shall only be used for
unanticipated building or infrastructure repairs necessary for the
protection of capital assets or protection of health or safety. It is
not intended for this appropriation to be used for routine maintenance.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 354 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Facility Preservation - Facilities (06-1-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount provided in this section is
sufficient to repair or replace the washed-out bridge on the perimeter
trail at Dash Point state park.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 355 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Federal Authority (06-2-021)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 356 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fort Worden - Facilities (06-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,030,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,030,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 357 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Historic Stewardship - Stewardship (06-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,015,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,015,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 358 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Ice Age Floods - Cherished Resources (06-2-014)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 359 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Local Authority (06-2-022)

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 360 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Natural Resources - Stewardship (06-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $860,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $860,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 361 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Parkland Acquisition Account (06-2-020)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Spending authority will not be granted
until such time that a plan has been provided to and approved by the
office of financial management stipulating operating impacts,
additional capital costs, benefits, and uses of the acquisition or
acquisitions.

Appropriation:
Parkland Acquisition Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 362 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Rocky Reach - Chelan County Public Utility District (06-1-023)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided to construct and
surface the northern mile of Rocky Reach trail, and partially fund
installation of signs, interpretive panels, and bridges related to the
5.1 mile project.
(2) The funding is provided by Chelan county public utility
district solely and directly for the work referenced in subsection (1)
of this section.

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 363 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Statewide Boat Pumpout - Federal Clean Vessel Act (06-4-018)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 364 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Trails (06-2-017)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 365 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Park Development (06-1-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $250,000 is provided to construct a pedestrian/emergency
vehicle access bridge across Connor creek to allow for beach access.
(2) $500,000 is provided to determine long-term park zoning, design
park amenities and services, and provide site permit and initial
construction development at Nisqually-Mashel.
(3) $150,000 is provided for initial park development at Sequim Bay
- Miller Peninsula.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 366 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Revenue Creation - Financial Strategy (06-2-010)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 367 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Projects (BFP) (98-2-001)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,116,820

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,457,191
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,574,011

NEW SECTION. Sec. 368 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Program (FARP) (98-2-004)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,478

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $542,191
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $573,669

NEW SECTION. Sec. 369 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway Off-road Vehicle Program (NOVA) (98-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities
Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,243,986

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,851,937
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,095,923

NEW SECTION. Sec. 370 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (WWRP) (98-2-003)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The office of financial management shall not reappropriate
amounts not obligated by June 30, 2005.
(2) The list of obligated projects will be provided to the office
of financial management by September 30, 2005.
(3) It is intended that no reappropriations will be made in the
2007-2009 biennium.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,547,515
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,170,894
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,718,409

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,883,173
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,601,582

NEW SECTION. Sec. 371 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Reappropriation (00-2-014)

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $161,668

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,097,397
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,259,065

NEW SECTION. Sec. 372 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (SRFB) (00-2-001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,227,424
Salmon Recovery Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,366,010
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,593,434

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,031,707
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,625,141

NEW SECTION. Sec. 373 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Grants (02-4-018)

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $213,720

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,440,712
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,654,432

NEW SECTION. Sec. 374 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Program (BFP) (02-4-001)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,455,586

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,478,427
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,934,013

NEW SECTION. Sec. 375 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Infrastructure Grant (BIG) (02-4-010)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,322,153

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $677,847
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 376 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Program (02-0-001)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,677

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,323
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 377 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Hatchery Management Program (02-4-009)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,704,190

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,495,810
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 378 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Land and Water Conservation Fund (02-4-005)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,904,639

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,595,361
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 379 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
National Recreation Trails Program (NRTP) (02-4-006)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,120

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,954,816
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,132,936

NEW SECTION. Sec. 380 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle (NOVA) (02-4-002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation for the nonhighway and off road vehicle
program under RCW 46.09.170(2)(d)(i) is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: A portion of the reappropriation may be
used for grants to projects to research, develop, publish, and
distribute informational guides and maps of nonhighway and off road
vehicle trails and associated facilities meeting the requirements,
guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with
disabilities act.
(2) The reappropriation for the nonhighway and off road vehicle
program under RCW 46.09.170(2)(d)(ii) is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The portion of the reappropriation that
applies to grants for capital facilities may be used for grants to
projects that meet the requirements, guidelines, spirit, and intent of
the federal Americans with disabilities act and do not compromise or
impair sensitive natural resources. The portion of the reappropriation
that applies to grants for management, maintenance, and operation of
existing off road vehicle recreation facilities may be used to bring
the facilities into compliance with the requirements, guidelines,
spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with disabilities act.
(3) The reappropriation for the nonhighway and off road vehicle
program under RCW 46.09.170(2)(d)(iii) is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funds may be expended for nonhighway road
recreation facilities which may include recreational trails that are
accessed by nonhighway roads and are intended solely for nonmotorized
recreational uses.

Reappropriation:
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities
Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,262,736

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,264,815
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,527,551

NEW SECTION. Sec. 381 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (SRFB) (02-4-007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,785,129
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,283,674
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,068,803

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,924,197
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,993,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 382 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Wildlife and Recreation Program (WWRP) (02-4-003)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The office of financial management shall not reappropriate
amounts not obligated by June 30, 2005.
(2) The list of obligated projects will be provided to the office
of financial management by September 30, 2005.
(3) It is intended that no reappropriations will be made in the
2007-2009 biennium.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,041,864
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,928,926
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,970,790

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,029,210
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 383 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Aquatic Lands Enhancement (04-4-018)

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,329,280

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,027,120
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,356,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 384 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Infrastructure Grant (BIG) (04-4-009)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 385 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Program (BFP) (04-4-003)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,753,480

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,753,479
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,506,959

NEW SECTION. Sec. 386 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Program (04-4-006)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,997

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,003
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 387 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Family Forest Fish Blockages Program (04-4-011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $780,379

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,219,621
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 388 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Hatchery Management Program (04-4-010)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,505,749

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,494,251
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 389 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Land and Water Conservation Fund (04-4-007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,833,091

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,901,909
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,735,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 390 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
National Recreation Trails Program (NRTP) (04-4-008)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,130,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,260,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 391 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (NOVA)
(04-4-004)

Reappropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,492,729

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,433,581
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,926,310

NEW SECTION. Sec. 392 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (SRFB) (04-4-001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,832,305
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,332,305

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,332,305

NEW SECTION. Sec. 393 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (WWRP) (04-4-002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The office of financial management shall not reappropriate
amounts not obligated by June 30, 2007.
(2) The list of obligated projects will be provided to the office
of financial management by September 30, 2007.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,272,014
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,707,815
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,979,829

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,020,171
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 394 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (06-4-018)

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,900,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 395 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Program (BFP) (06-4-003)

Appropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,597,535
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,947,535

NEW SECTION. Sec. 396 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Infrastructure Grant (BIG) (06-4-009)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 397 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Program (06-4-006)

Appropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,300

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $777,470
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $999,770

NEW SECTION. Sec. 398 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Family Forest Fish Blockage Program (06-4-011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for the salmon recovery
funding board in consultation with the small forest landowner office of
the department of natural resources and the department of fish and
wildlife to provide grants to correct fish passage blockages on
nonindustrial forest lands. Selection of projects must be coordinated
with the other salmon recovery grant programs provided in section 403
of this act.
(2) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the committee shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 399 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Hatchery Management Program (06-4-010)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 400 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Land and Water Conservation Fund (06-4-007)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (NOVA)
(06-4-004)

Appropriation:
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities
Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,579,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,946,858
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,525,858

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
National Recreation Trails Program (NRTP) (06-4-008)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (SRFB) (06-4-001)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
grants for other salmon recovery efforts. These grants may include a
grant to any regional recovery board and/or may include grants for
additional restoration projects, monitoring activities, or other salmon
recovery actions.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $304,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $380,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (WWRP) (06-4-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided for the approved list of projects
in LEAP capital document No. 2005-99 as developed on March 31, 2005.
(2) Funds appropriated for distribution according to RCW 79A.15.050
shall fulfill the uses and restrictions of each category whether the
funds are distributed according to the statutory allotment, the
unallocated distribution, or a reassignment of reappropriations.
(3) Funds appropriated for distribution according to the provisions
of RCW 79A.15.040(c) shall be allocated forty percent to local
government projects and sixty percent to state agency projects. If the
cumulative total of local government projects is less than forty
percent of the total distribution to this category, the difference may
be allocated to state agency projects.

Appropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,500,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (04-4-004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The total cumulative dollar value of state
conservation reserve enhancement program grant obligations incurred by
the conservation commission and conservation districts shall not exceed
$20,000,000, as provided in the conservation reserve enhancement
program agreement between the United States department of agriculture,
commodity credit corporation, and the state of Washington executed on
October 19, 1998, and subsequent amendments.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (06-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The total cumulative dollar value of state
conservation reserve enhancement program grant obligations incurred by
the conservation commission and conservation districts shall not exceed
$20,000,000, as provided in the conservation reserve enhancement
program agreement between the United States department of agriculture,
commodity credit corporation, and the state of Washington executed on
October 19, 1998, and subsequent amendments.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program - Loans (06-4-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The conservation assistance revolving
account appropriation is provided solely for loans under the
conservation reserve enhancement program.

Appropriation:
Conservation Assistance Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Puget Sound District Grants (04-4-005)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $765,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $840,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Puget Sound District Grants (06-4-003)

Appropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $840,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,360,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 410 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Water Quality Grants Program (04-4-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 411 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Water Quality Grants Program (06-4-007)

Appropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 412 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Livestock Water Quality - Landowner Cost Share (06-4-006)

Appropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 413 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Skokomish Anaerobic Digester (06-4-009)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 414 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Bi-State Habitat Conservation Plan (06-1-951)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the Walla Walla bi-state habitat conservation planning effort to
address habitat enhancement and endangered species protection across
the Walla Walla watershed in concert with leaders and representatives
of local and tribal governments, the watershed planning unit,
conservation districts, environmentalists, and citizen landowners.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 415 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Deschutes Hatchery (04-2-011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $670,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 416 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Facility, Infrastructure, Lands, and Access Condition Improvement
(04-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,550,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,385,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 417 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish and Wildlife Opportunity Improvements (04-2-006)

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $652,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,450,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,102,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 418 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish and Wildlife Population and Habitat Protection (04-1-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 419 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Hatchery Reform, Retrofits, and Condition Improvement (04-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,300,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,480,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,420,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 420 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Internal and External Partnership Improvements (04-1-007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,612,138
Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,612,138

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,918,418
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,530,556

NEW SECTION. Sec. 421 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Region 1 Office - Spokane (04-2-009)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: These funds will be used solely for the
furniture and equipment required to complete the new Spokane region one
headquarters building.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,850,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 422 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Department of Fish and Wildlife Energy Savings (04-1-016)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 423 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Deschutes Watershed Center (06-2-008)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Certificate of Participation--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 424 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Facility, Infrastructure, Lands, and Access Condition Improvements
(06-1-002)

The state building construction account--state appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$275,000 is provided solely for the construction of the Chermack trail
project in the South Bend/Willapa river; and $120,000 is provided
solely for emergency bank stabilization on the east fork of the Lewis
river at milepost 9.1.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,577,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,277,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,827,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 425 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish and Wildlife Opportunity Improvements (06-2-004)

The wildlife account--state appropriation in this section is
subject to the following conditions and limitations: It is the intent
of the legislature that expenditures from this appropriation shall only
be made to the extent funds are available in the account and will not
result in a reduction to other programs or activities.

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,900,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 426 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish and Wildlife Population and Habitat Protection (06-1-003)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,830,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,430,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,920,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 427 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Hatchery Reform, Retrofits, and Condition Improvement (06-1-001)

Appropriation:
General Fund--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,650,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 428 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Internal and External Partnership Improvements (06-1-005)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 429 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Lower Skagit River Acclimation (06-2-011)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 430 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Pollution Abatement Study (06-2-013)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 431 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Region 1 Office Phase 2 - Spokane (06-2-006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,790,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,790,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 432 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Statewide Kokanee Production, Phase 3 Design and Permitting
(06-2-007)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $720,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,720,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 433 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish Screens (01-H-011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 434 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Dole Bee Be Property (06-1-950)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 435 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
East Fork of the Lewis River - Fish Habitat

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
bank stabilization and other measures to improve fish habitat at
milepost 9.1 on the east fork of the Lewis river. Funding is
contingent on equivalent local matching funds.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 436 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Legacy (04-2-015)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 437 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Community and Technical College Trust Land Acquisition (06-2-014)

Appropriation:
Comm/Tech College Forest Reserve Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $558,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,658,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 438 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Marine Station Public Access (02-2-019)

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,138

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,862
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 439 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Marine Station Public Access (04-2-019)

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,840

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,160
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 440 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Federal HCP Land Acquisition Grants (05-2-021)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,133,630

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,133,630

NEW SECTION. Sec. 441 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Land Bank (06-2-015)

Appropriation:
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,462,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,462,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 442 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Minor Works - Preservation (06-1-001)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $224,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $384,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,776,500
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,976,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 443 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Minor Works - Programmatic (06-2-002)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $447,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $775,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,010,200
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,968,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,753,200

NEW SECTION. Sec. 444 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Areas Facilities Preservation (06-1-010)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,003,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $658,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,298,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,959,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 445 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Resources Real Property Replacement (06-2-013)

Appropriation:
Natural Resources Real Property
Replacement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,961,300
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,961,300

NEW SECTION. Sec. 446 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Recreation Facilities Preservation (06-1-011)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,731,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $698,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,840,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,269,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 447 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Right of Way Acquisition (06-2-006)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $945,409
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,750,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,695,409

NEW SECTION. Sec. 448 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Riparian Open Space Program (06-2-018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.
(2) The department may not expend more than $100,000 of the
appropriation for administrative or staff costs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,998,600
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,498,600

NEW SECTION. Sec. 449 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan Compliance: Natural Areas
and Recreation (06-2-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 450 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Small Timber Landowner (FREP) (06-2-019)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.
(2) The department may not expend more than $200,000 of the
appropriation for administrative or staff costs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,750,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 451 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
State Lands Maintenance (06-1-004)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $375,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,360,814
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,900,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,860,814

NEW SECTION. Sec. 452 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Statewide Aquatic Restoration Projects (06-2-008)

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 453 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Trust Land Transfer (06-2-012)

The state building construction account--state appropriation in
this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The total appropriation is provided solely for the lease of
certain parcels of state trust lands so that these lands may be used
for multiple public purposes. The lease payments described in
subsection (2) of this section shall fully compensate trust
beneficiaries for a leasehold interest of ninety-nine years. It is the
intent of the legislature that these long-term leases will allow for
management of these trust lands for multiple public use and benefit as
specified in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) The department shall calculate full fair market compensation
for a leasehold interest of a term of ninety-nine years using
simplified appraisal processes that minimize the administrative costs
of calculating full fair market compensation while ensuring that the
beneficiaries are appropriately compensated. The leasehold interest
includes all rights to manage the lands consistent with the standards
under subsection (3) of this section including the sale of valuable
materials and allowance of uses that derive monetary returns from the
lands. It is the intent of the legislature that because the
beneficiaries are largely supported by state funds not derived from
these granted lands, the added costs of detailed, parcel-specific
appraisals, may not justify the added precision of such appraisals.
The lease agreements must include the right for automatic renewal, and
must specify that the calculation of full fair market compensation for
renewed leases must ensure that the value of the resources on the land
that were used to compensate beneficiaries in the initial lease shall
not become a part of the calculation for compensation for the renewed
lease.
(3)(a) The granted lands placed in the state granted lands lease
program must be managed by the department under existing management
statutes, policies, and agreements to the extent not inconsistent with
the management criteria of this section. The valuable materials on the
granted lands may be sold in the same manner and for the same purposes
as is authorized for state lands, and charges may be made for
recreational or other uses of the lands.
(b) The multiple use lands in the granted lands lease program must
be managed considering the economic and environmental aspects of
various systems of renewable resource management, including:
Silviculture and protection of forest resources; providing for outdoor
recreation, range, timber, watershed, wildlife, and fish; providing for
a diversity of plant and animal communities; and providing for
protection of streams, streambanks, shorelines, lakes, wetlands, and
other bodies of water from detrimental changes in chemical, biological,
or hydrological characteristics.
(4) All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement
this section are authorized to be paid out of this appropriation.
Authorized costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time,
environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar costs. These
administrative costs shall not exceed one and one-half percent of the
total appropriation. No deduction shall be made for the resource
management cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The department and
receiving agencies shall work in good faith to carry out the intent of
this section. However, the department or receiving agencies may remove
a property from the transfer list based on new, substantive
information, if it is determined that transfer of the lease of the
property is not compatible with the intent of this section or in the
interest of the receiving agency. On June 30, 2007, the state
treasurer shall transfer all remaining uncommitted funds from this
appropriation to the common school construction fund and the
appropriation in this section shall be reduced by an equivalent amount.
The appropriation in this section is provided for a list of projects in
LEAP capital document No. 2005-53, as developed on March 27, 2005.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,228,800
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $201,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $387,628,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 454 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Wetland Grants (06-2-017)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 455 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Fair Improvements (06-4-850)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

(End of part)

PART 4
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Minor Work Projects (06-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $945,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Port of Everett Satellite Barge (04-4-950)

Reappropriation:
Multimodal Transportation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,450,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Columbia River Dredging (03-H-001)

The reappropriation in this section is provided solely to fund the
second phase of a multiphase cooperative project with the state of
Oregon to dredge the Columbia river. The amount in this section lapses
unless the state of Oregon appropriates a dollar-for-dollar match to
fund its share of the project. Within the amount provided, $700,000
shall be provided for improvements at the Columbia Springs
environmental education center in Vancouver and shall be credited to
the mitigation effort for the dredging project.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,700,000

(End of part)

PART 5
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Common School Construction Account Deposits

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $15,000,000 in fiscal year 2006 and $15,000,000 in fiscal year
2007 of the education savings account appropriation shall be deposited
in the common school construction account.
(2) $95,437,000 of the education construction account appropriation
shall be deposited in the common school construction account.

Appropriation:
Education Savings Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,437,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,437,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,437,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Construction Assistance Grants (02-4-001)

Reappropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $136,811,979
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,811,979

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Port Angeles School District North Olympic Skills Center (04-4-852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
School Construction Assistance Program (04-4-001)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriations are subject to the conditions and
limitations of section 606, chapter 26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. and
is pro-rated based on prior expenditures.
(2) $2,500,000 of this reappropriation is provided solely for
design and construction of additional space at the new market
vocational skills center.

Reappropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $107,050,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $267,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,218,513
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $402,318,513

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
School Construction Assistance Program (06-4-100)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For state assistance grants for purposes of calculating square
foot eligibility, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced
by fifty percent.
(2) $17,855,000 from this appropriation is provided for projects at
skills centers that are included on the prioritized list of capital
items and major capital project list submitted by the state board of
education. Skills centers shall submit a budget plan to the state
board of education and the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature for proposed expenditures and the proposed expenditures
shall conform to state board of education rules and procedures for
reimbursement of capital items. The state board of education shall
develop a plan to include skills center capital requests within the
state construction assistance program.
(3) $64,882,000 of this appropriation is provided solely to
increase the area cost allowance by $12.14 per square foot for grades
K-12 for fiscal year 2006, an additional $12.27 per square foot for
grades K-12 for fiscal year 2007, and the student square footage
allocation in fiscal year 2007 in accordance with the first step in the
state board of education six-year plan. Within the amounts provided in
this section, there is sufficient funding to implement chapter . . .
(Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5509 (high-performance green
buildings)), Laws of 2005.
(4) The appropriation in this section includes the amounts
deposited in the common school construction account under section 601
of this act.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,814,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $456,333,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $517,147,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,532,456,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,049,603,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Environmental Learning Centers (06-2-951)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,000,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for
capital projects at the Chewelah peak learning center. The Chewelah
peak learning center shall submit a budget plan to the state board of
education and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature for
proposed expenditures.
(2) $400,000 of this appropriation is provided solely for capital
projects at Camp Waskowitz learning center. Camp Waskowitz shall
submit a budget plan to the state board of education and the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature for proposed
expenditures.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Small Repair Grant Program (06-2-952)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for providing funding for nonrecurring costs associated with
additional assistance in small repairs of school facilities and minimal
administrative costs associated with administering the program. The
state board of education and the office of superintendent of public
instruction, after consulting with maintenance and operations
administrators of school districts, shall develop criteria for
providing funding for specific projects that stay within the
appropriation level provided in this section. The criteria shall
include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting recipient
district applications to one hundred thousand dollars per three-year
period; (b) limiting districts eligible to receive the grant only once
in any three-year period; and (c) any district receiving funding
provided in this section demonstrating a consistent commitment to
addressing school facilities needs.
(2) A portion of this appropriation may be used to develop and
administer the program. It is the intent of the legislature that the
state board of education and the office of superintendent of public
instruction keep the administrative costs of the program to a minimum
by using criteria from the prior federal rengrant program and other
efficiency measures to avoid duplication.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION

State School Construction Assistance Program Administration
(06-2-001)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire education construction
account--state appropriation is provided solely for improving
technology infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district
technology development, promoting standards for school district
technology, promoting statewide coordination and planning for
technology development, and providing regional educational technology
support centers, including state support activities, under chapter
28A.650 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate
a process to facilitate the evaluation and provision of online
curriculum courses to school districts that includes the following:
Creation of a general listing of the types of available online
curriculum courses; a survey conducted by each regional educational
technology support center of school districts in its region regarding
the types of online curriculum courses desired by school districts; a
process to evaluate and recommend to school districts the best online
courses in terms of curriculum, student performance, and cost; and
assistance to school districts in procuring and providing the courses
to students.

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,279,004
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,918,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,197,004

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,969,379
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,554,882
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,720,383

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Kennedy, Dry, and Irwin Building Preservation (04-1-002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: All funds reappropriated to be used for
funding of new physical education center.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,379,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,279,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Campus Preservation (06-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
New Physical Education Center (06-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,901,120

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,901,120

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
Cafeteria and Maintenance Support Building (06-2-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,000,000 is to be used for design and
permitting, with any remaining funds used for possible site
preparation.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,994,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,994,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
Omnibus Minor Works - Preservation (06-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $775,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
Omnibus Minor Works - Safety (06-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,816

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,816

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Campus Phase 2A (00-2-017)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: No money from the reappropriation in this
section may be expended that would be inconsistent with the
recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the
project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial
management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,505,280

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,130,653
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,635,933

NEW SECTION. Sec. 616 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Land Acquisition/Soils Remediation (01-2-029)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $620,455

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,329,545
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Bothell/Cascadia Community College - SR 522 Off Ramp (02-2-014)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,742,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,800,505
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,550,505

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Campus Phase 2B (02-2-027)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,356,356

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,992,644
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,349,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 619 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Facility Preservation Backlog Reduction (04-1-951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the reappropriation is provided solely
to accomplish preservation work that improves existing state facilities
in the worst relative condition for housed programs and current
building occupants.
(2) With this reappropriation, the intention is to improve the
average condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline
conditions documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and
review committee. Preservation backlog reduction project funds shall
be prioritized at local discretion to achieve the above stated goal,
with particular attention given to buildings currently rated in
adequate to marginal condition.
(3) This section is subject to the same allotment procedures as a
minor works category.
(4) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,227,404

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,372,596
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 620 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Program (04-2-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,131,540
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,117,650
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,249,190

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,250,810
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 621 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Campus Communications Infrastructure (04-1-011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 622 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Emergency Power Expansion - Phase 1 (02-1-009)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,262,357

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,737,643
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 623 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Emergency Power Expansion - Phase 2 (04-1-024)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,803,379
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,148,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,951,379

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $696,621
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,648,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 624 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Johnson Hall Renovation (04-1-005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,470,762
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,552,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,187,630
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,210,392

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,844,608
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 625 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Classroom Improvements (05-1-850)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,856,812

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $143,188
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 626 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Guthrie Hall Psychology Facilities Renovation (05-2-851)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Allotment for this reappropriation is
contingent on the commitment of at least three million dollars in
matching federal funds for this facility.

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 627 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Infectious Disease Laboratory Facilities (05-2-850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Allotment for this reappropriation is
contingent on the commitment of at least four million dollars in
matching federal funds for this facility.

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 628 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Architecture Hall Renovation (06-1-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: No money from the appropriation in this
section may be expended on surge space.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,474,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,214,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 629 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Clark Hall Renovation (06-1-007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of renovation of Clark Hall. The office of
financial management shall not allot funding for the design until after
sine die adjournment of the 2006 regular legislative session and only
if the predesign has been submitted to the legislative fiscal
committees and to the office of financial management for review and
approval as per RCW 43.88.110(6) prior to the start of the 2006 regular
legislative session.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 630 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Guggenheim Hall Renovation (06-1-006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: No money from the appropriation in this
section may be expended on surge space.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,812,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,012,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 631 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Health Sciences - H Wing (06-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 632 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 633 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (06-1-003)

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 634 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-004)

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 635 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Infrastructure Savings (06-1-751)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 915 of this act may have their remaining funds transferred
to this appropriation for other preservation projects approved by the
office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 636 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(06-1-750)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds shall be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the above stated performance
goal, with particular attention given to buildings currently rated in
superior to adequate condition so as to maximize useful life given both
the passage of time and intensity with which the space is used.
(3) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2007.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 637 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Program (06-2-009)

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 638 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Savery Hall Renovation (06-1-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of renovation of Savery Hall. The office of
financial management shall not allot funding for the design until after
sine die adjournment of the 2006 regular legislative session and only
if the predesign has been submitted to the legislative fiscal
committees and to the office of financial management for review and
approval as per RCW 43.88.110(6) prior to the start of the 2006 regular
legislative session.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,300,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 639 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Playhouse Theater (05-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 640 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Education Addition Cleveland Hall (98-2-032)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 641 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU Pullman - Johnson Hall Addition-Plant Bioscience Building
(00-2-007)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Allotment for this reappropriation is
contingent on the commitment of at least $10,000,000 in federal funds
for a related facility or addition.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $606,500
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,606,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,393,500
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 642 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver - Student Services Center (00-2-905)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,600,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,155,000

Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,155,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 643 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Spokane Riverpoint - Academic Center Building: New Facility
(00-2-906)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is intended that the project funded in
this section shall constitute the university's highest capital project
priority through the 2005-07 biennium.

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 644 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Facility Preservation Backlog Reduction (04-1-951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the reappropriation is provided solely
to accomplish preservation work that improves existing state facilities
in the worst relative condition for housed programs and current
building occupants.
(2) With this reappropriation, the legislature intends to improve
the average condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline
conditions documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and
review committee. Preservation backlog reduction project funds shall
be prioritized at local discretion to achieve the above stated goal,
with particular attention given to buildings currently rated in
adequate to marginal condition.
(3) This section is subject to the same allotment procedures as a
minor works category.
(4) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 645 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Spokane - Nursing Building at Riverpoint (04-2-941)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Upon completion of construction of this
facility at the Riverpoint campus in Spokane, the existing land and
facilities housing the intercollegiate nursing center adjacent to
Spokane Falls Community College shall be transferred to the state board
for community and technical colleges for the use of community college
district 17, community colleges of Spokane.

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 646 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Tri-Cities - Bioproducts Facility (04-2-940)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Allotment for this appropriation is
contingent on the commitment of at least an additional $10,000,000
provided through a lease revenue structure secured by a twenty year
lease with Battelle and authorized in section 907(6) of this act.

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,100,000
Higher Education Non-Proprietary Local
Capital Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,650,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 647 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Biotechnology/Life Sciences 2 (04-2-085)

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 648 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver - Campus Utilities/Infrastructure: Infrastructure
(04-2-916)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 649 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Prosser - Multipurpose Building (04-2-942)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 650 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Agricultural Research Facility Renovation and Repair (05-2-952)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided solely for facility
construction, renovation, and repair at agricultural research
facilities other than in Pullman.
(2) Washington State University shall retain ownership of 22 acres
of the lower pasture area south of the WSU Puyallup research campus and
continue its existing use for agricultural research.

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 651 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Campus Infrastructure (06-1-073)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 652 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (06-1-751)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 915 of this act may have their remaining funds transferred
to this appropriation for other preservation projects approved by the
office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 653 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(06-1-750)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds shall be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the above stated performance
goal, with particular attention given to buildings currently rated in
superior to adequate condition so as to maximize useful life given both
the passage of time and intensity with which the space is used.
(3) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2007.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 654 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Equipment Omnibus (06-2-003)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 655 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Capital Improvements (MCI) (06-2-002)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 656 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 657 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (06-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 658 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver: Applied Technology and Classroom Building
(06-2-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of the applied technology and classroom building.
The office of financial management shall not allot funding for the
design until after sine die adjournment of the 2006 regular legislative
session and only if the predesign has been submitted to the legislative
fiscal committees and to the office of financial management for review
and approval as per RCW 43.88.110(6) prior to the start of the 2006
regular legislative session.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 659 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver: Undergraduate Classroom Building (06-2-951)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of undergraduate classroom building. The office
of financial management shall not allot funding for the design until
after sine die adjournment of the 2006 regular legislative session and
only if the predesign has been submitted to the legislative fiscal
committees and to the office of financial management for review and
approval as per RCW 43.88.110(6) prior to the start of the 2006 regular
legislative session.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,150,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 660 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Computing and Engineering Sciences Building (Cheney Hall)
(00-2-009)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,059,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,841,482
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,900,482

NEW SECTION. Sec. 661 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Senior Hall Renovation (00-1-003)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,938,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,493,012
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,431,012

NEW SECTION. Sec. 662 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Campus Network Upgrade (04-2-003)

Reappropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,215,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,160,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,375,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 663 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Minor Works - Preservation (02-1-003)

Reappropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $566,168

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,433,832
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 664 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Water System Preservation and Expansion (02-1-008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,072

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,039,928
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,236,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 665 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Infrastructure Preservation (04-1-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 666 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU University Visitor Center and Formal Entry (04-2-010)

Reappropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 667 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Facility Preservation Backlog Reduction (04-1-952)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., this reappropriation is provided solely
to accomplish preservation work that improves existing state facilities
in the worst relative condition for housed programs and current
building occupants.
(2) With this reappropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preservation backlog reduction project funds shall be
prioritized at local discretion to achieve the above stated goal, with
particular attention given to buildings currently rated in adequate to
marginal condition.
(3) This section is subject to the same allotment procedures as a
minor works category.
(4) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this reappropriation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,750,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 668 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-710)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 669 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health Safety and Code Compliance (06-1-711)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 670 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-712)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 671 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (06-1-751)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 915 of this act may have their remaining funds transferred
to this appropriation for other preservation projects approved by the
office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 672 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(06-1-750)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds shall be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the above stated performance
goal, with particular attention given to buildings currently rated in
superior to adequate condition so as to maximize useful life given both
the passage of time and intensity with which the space is used.
(3) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2007.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,217,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 673 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works Program (06-2-006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,600,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 674 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Music Education Facility (00-2-001)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 675 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
CWU/Des Moines Higher Education Center (02-2-101)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,575,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 676 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Combined Utility Upgrade (04-1-952)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 677 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
CWU/Moses Lake Higher Education Center (04-2-031)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 678 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (04-2-028)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 679 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
CWU/Wenatchee Higher Education Center (05-2-850)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 680 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (05-1-850)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 681 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure (05-1-851)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $113,500
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $713,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 682 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Combined Utilities (06-1-007)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 683 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Dean Hall Renovation (06-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 684 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-003)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,058,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,080,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,138,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 685 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (06-1-001)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 686 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-002)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 687 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (06-1-751)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 915 of this act may have their remaining funds transferred
to this appropriation for other preservation projects approved by the
office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 688 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(06-1-750)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds shall be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the above stated performance
goal, with particular attention given to buildings currently rated in
superior to adequate condition so as to maximize useful life given both
the passage of time and intensity with which the space is used.
(3) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2007.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 689 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works Program (06-2-005)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,390,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,272,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,662,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 690 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Nicholson Pavilion Indoor Air/Asbestos (06-1-008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 691 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Seminar Building Phase II - Construction (02-2-004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation shall not be used for
vehicles, laptop computers, small printers, disposable items, or other
items with a useful life of less than one year.

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,550,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 692 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Daniel J. Evans Building - Modernization (04-2-006)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,500,000
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 693 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Facility Preservation Backlog Reduction (04-1-951)

(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., this reappropriation is provided solely
to accomplish preservation work that improves existing state facilities
in the worst relative condition for housed programs and current
building occupants.
(2) With this reappropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preservation backlog reduction project funds shall be
prioritized at local discretion to achieve the above stated goal, with
particular attention given to buildings currently rated in adequate to
marginal condition.
(3) This section is subject to the same allotment procedures as a
minor works category.
(4) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this reappropriation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,950,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 694 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Infrastructure Preservation (04-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,950,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 695 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (04-1-004)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 696 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (06-1-002)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 697 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-004)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,450,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 698 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Infrastructure Savings (06-1-751)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 915 of this act may have their remaining funds transferred
to this appropriation for other preservation projects approved by the
office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 699 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(06-1-750)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds shall be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the above stated performance
goal, with particular attention given to buildings currently rated in
superior to adequate condition so as to maximize useful life given both
the passage of time and intensity with which the space is used.
(3) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2007.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 700 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Lab I First Floor - Class/Laboratory Renovation (06-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-003)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works Program (06-2-005)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,725,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Snohomish, Skagit, and Island County Higher Education Needs
Assessment (06-2-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The Washington state institute for public policy (institute) is
directed to assess the higher education needs in Snohomish, Skagit, and
Island counties and recommend to the legislature solutions to the
higher education needs. Solutions that the institute should consider,
include, but should not be limited to, establishment of new
institutions, expansion of existing institutions, and colocation of
institutions. In conducting its assessment, the institute shall take
into account but not be limited to the following: Population growth,
higher education participation rates, economic demand and work force
needs, and drive and commute times to existing higher education
institutions.
(2) The institute may contract for an assessment of sites to meet
higher education needs in the counties.
(3) In conducting the assessment and siting study, the institute
shall consult with the higher education coordinating board, the state
board for community and technical colleges, the work force training and
coordinating board, the North Snohomish, Island, and Skagit higher
education consortium, and the existing research and comprehensive
institutions.
(4) The advisory committee on higher education created pursuant to
chapter . . . (Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5441
(studying early learning, K-12 and higher education)), Laws of 2005
shall serve as a steering committee and direct the institute in the
conduct of the assessment and siting study.
(5) The institute shall assemble a local advisory committee to
assist in the conduct of the assessment and siting study. The
committee shall include: (a) The Snohomish county executive; (b) three
members of the house of representatives, including two from the
majority party and one from the minority party, appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives; (c) three members of the
senate, including two from the majority party and one from the minority
party, appointed by the president of the senate; and (d) six education
or business leaders, two each from Snohomish, Island, and Skagit
counties.
(6) The recommendations to the legislature shall include, but are
not limited to: (a) The type of institution or institutions to be
established; (b) a business and operations plan for the institution if
a new institution is recommended; (c) potential sites for establishment
of an institution; (d) identification of site acquisition costs; and
(e) identification of costs and a process for completing a master plan
for higher education expansion.
(7) The institute shall provide an interim report to the
legislature and the governor by January 15, 2006, and a final report by
December 1, 2006.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Campus Infrastructure Development (98-2-024)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,420,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,859,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,279,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Academic Instructional Center (02-2-026)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,438,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,733,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,171,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Communications Facility (98-2-053)

Reappropriation:
Western Washington University Capital
Projects Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,043,400
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,393,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Bond Hall Renovation/Asbestos Abatement (04-1-080)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Campus Roadway Development (04-2-073)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of the reappropriation is to complete a predesign
of potential south campus roadway options and general circulation
issues that avoids significant impacts on adjacent neighborhoods and
conforms to the city of Bellingham traffic plans.
(2) The predesign shall also investigate options to achieve higher
rates of alternative modes of transportation among faculty, staff, and
students, minimize surface parking, and make improvements for traffic
circulation, including public transit. Safe movement of pedestrians
and bicyclists shall be a priority.
(3) Allotment for predesign is contingent upon the completion of a
communication and public involvement plan for this project that is
consistent with the significant projects section of the Western
Washington University institutional master plan and adjacent
neighborhood plans adopted by the city of Bellingham, the city of
Bellingham Western Washington University neighborhood plan, and the
neighborhood meeting requirements contained in Bellingham municipal
code 20.40.060. The communication and public involvement plan shall
seek to maximize public input through coordination of the planning
effort with established neighborhood advisory groups and boards
recognized by the city of Bellingham.

Reappropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,826

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $290,174
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $329,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Facility Preservation Backlog Reduction (04-1-952)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the reappropriation is provided solely
to accomplish preservation work that improves existing state facilities
in the worst relative condition for housed programs and current
building occupants.
(2) With this reappropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preservation backlog reduction project funds shall be
prioritized at local discretion to achieve the above stated goal, with
particular attention given to buildings currently rated in adequate to
marginal condition.
(3) This section is subject to the same allotment procedures as a
minor works category.
(4) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this reappropriation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Miller Hall Renovation (04-1-953)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,418

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $187,582
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,750,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (04-1-074)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (04-1-075)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,420,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (06-1-751)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 915 of this act may have their remaining funds transferred
to this appropriation for other preservation projects approved by the
office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(06-1-750)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds shall be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the above stated performance
goal, with particular attention given to buildings currently rated in
superior to adequate condition so as to maximize useful life given both
the passage of time and intensity with which the space is used.
(3) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2007.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,614,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,614,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (04-2-077)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Shannon Point Marine - Undergraduate Center (04-2-059)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Any further appropriations for equipment
or furnishings shall be met with local funds.

Reappropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $998,329
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,998,329

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-083)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,290,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,290,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (06-1-082)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,580,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-084)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,630,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (06-2-085)

Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 721 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Lewis and Clark Interpretive Infrastructure Grant (02-4-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,806,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $194,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 722 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Pacific-Lewis and Clark Station Camp Park Project (02-S-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,047,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,505,226
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,552,226

NEW SECTION. Sec. 723 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Projects (02-4-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $399,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,101,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 724 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Stadium Way Research Center-Code Violation Correction (04-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $168,200
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $461,200

NEW SECTION. Sec. 725 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Projects (04-4-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,563,339

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $436,661
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 726 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Olympia - State Capital Museum: Building Preservation (06-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $330,694

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $330,694

NEW SECTION. Sec. 727 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Statewide - Washington Heritage Project Grants (06-4-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 728 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Tacoma - Research Center: Building Preservation (06-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $181,650

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $181,650

NEW SECTION. Sec. 729 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Tacoma-State History Museum Building Preservation (06-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $481,344

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $481,344

NEW SECTION. Sec. 730 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
History and American Indian Education Classrooms (06-2-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $156,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $156,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 731 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Museum Preservation (06-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $114,000 is to be used for exterior
preservation and sewer line repair of historic Campbell house and
Carriage house. The balance of the request is for unforeseen
emergencies that might endanger the museum structures or the valuable
collections they contain, or affect staff and visitor health and
safety.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,150,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,435,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 732 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Clark Center at WSU Vancouver (00-2-680)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,902
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,860,252
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,888,154

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,885,646
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,773,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 733 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Highline Community College: Higher Education Center/Childcare
(00-2-678)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $550,000 may be used to develop
additional parking needed to support this project.

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,035
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,406
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,720,441

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,726,559
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,447,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 734 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Puyallup: Phase III Expansion (00-2-676)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,101,510

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,233,464
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,334,974

NEW SECTION. Sec. 735 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM

South Puget Sound Community College: Humanities/General Education
Complex (00-2-679)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,875,459

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,379,789
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,255,248

NEW SECTION. Sec. 736 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Whatcom Community College: Classroom/Lab Building (00-2-677)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $219,893

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,684,407
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,904,300

NEW SECTION. Sec. 737 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Higher Education Center
(00-2-954)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $777,312

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,722,688
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 738 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Science Building (01-2-688)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $957,375
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,407,344

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,539,034
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,903,753

NEW SECTION. Sec. 739 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Science Building (01-2-687)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,324,163
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,517,238

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,154,837
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,996,238

NEW SECTION. Sec. 740 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bates Technical College: LRC/Vocational (02-2-684)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $953,271
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,169,058

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $937,281
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,059,610

NEW SECTION. Sec. 741 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College: Replacement (02-1-239)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $311,102

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,046,798
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,357,900

NEW SECTION. Sec. 742 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Cascadia Community College/University of Washington Bothell: Phase
2B Off Ramp (02-2-999)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,742,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,800,506
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,550,506

NEW SECTION. Sec. 743 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Instructional Lab Building -
Construction (02-2-685)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $573,448
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,490,832

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,423,612
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,487,892

NEW SECTION. Sec. 744 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Repairs "A" (02-1-050)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,425,677

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,234,651
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,660,328

NEW SECTION. Sec. 745 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Replacement (02-1-240)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,593,957

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,918,908
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,321,343
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,915,300

NEW SECTION. Sec. 746 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Buildings D and E Renovation (02-1-310)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $259,718

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,410,082
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,669,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 747 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Edison Hall Renovation
(02-1-315)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,317,752

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,491,448
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,809,200

NEW SECTION. Sec. 748 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Portables Replacement
(02-1-215)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,209,830

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $687,570
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,897,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 749 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Shoreline Community College: Building 800 Renovation (02-1-319)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $403,444

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,617,656
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,021,100

NEW SECTION. Sec. 750 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College: Office Space Replacement (02-1-213)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,690

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $406,999
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $762,689

NEW SECTION. Sec. 751 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Family Education Center/Child
Center (02-1-238)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $458,285

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,673,715
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,132,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 752 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Building "A" Replacement
(02-1-217)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,588

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,401,812
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,477,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 753 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Library Renovation (02-1-331)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $231,625

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,370,375
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,602,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 754 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Information Technology Vocational Center
(02-2-683)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,825,132

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,904,868
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,730,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 755 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Basic Skills/Computer Lab
(02-2-686)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $508,951
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,569,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,349
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,178,300

NEW SECTION. Sec. 756 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section shall support the projects
as listed in section 224, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2007.

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,310,520

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,289,655
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,600,175

NEW SECTION. Sec. 757 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bates-Clover Park Equipment Improvements (04-2-950)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $179,975

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,820,025
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 758 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: NWCET Expansion (04-2-402)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of the reappropriation is to build an additional
4,000 square feet of open lab space to accommodate new and expanding
information technology and media programs.
(2) State funds will be matched with nonstate resources of at least
$500,000.
(3) Allotment of funds shall be in accordance with RCW 43.88.150.

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $312,493

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $187,507
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 759 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: "D" Building Renovation (04-1-308)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,418,700
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,646
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,392,346

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,026,354
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,418,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 760 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: Science and Technology (04-2-690)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,647,600

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,791,460
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,529,060

NEW SECTION. Sec. 761 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College: Welding/Auto Collision Replacement
(04-1-213)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,704,053
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,357,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,061,053

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $776,947
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,838,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 762 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Cascadia Community College: Center for Arts, Technology,
Communications (04-2-693)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,031,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,900
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,636,100
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,827,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 763 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Centralia Community College: Science Building (04-2-850)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,247,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,676,490
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,073,490

NEW SECTION. Sec. 764 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: East County Satellite (04-1-689)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,507
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,392,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,493
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,777,125
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,469,125

NEW SECTION. Sec. 765 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Renovation - Applied Arts 5 (04-1-303)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $927,047

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,945,366
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,872,413

NEW SECTION. Sec. 766 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Stout Hall (04-1-203)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,810,514

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,375
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,049,889

NEW SECTION. Sec. 767 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Renovation T Building (04-1-307)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $531,710

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,526,790
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,058,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 768 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Renovation - Mountlake Terrace Hall
(04-1-311)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,399,092

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,427,938
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,827,030

NEW SECTION. Sec. 769 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Pilchuck/Glacier (04-1-205)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $907,033
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,633,300

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $404,667
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,945,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 770 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Replacement - Monte Cristo Hall
(04-1-305)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,926,247

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $425,753
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,352,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 771 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Undergraduate Education Center
(04-2-692)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,363,700

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $126,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,407,540
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,897,161

NEW SECTION. Sec. 772 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Preservation Backlog Reduction (04-1-951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the reappropriation is provided solely
to accomplish preservation work that improves existing state facilities
in the worst relative condition for housed programs and current
building occupants.
(2) With this reappropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preservation backlog reduction project funds shall be
prioritized at local discretion to achieve the above stated goal, with
particular attention given to buildings currently rated in adequate to
marginal condition.
(3) This section is subject to the same allotment procedures as a
minor works category.
(4) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this reappropriation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,824,753

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,475,247
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 773 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Replacement - Instructional Building
(04-1-204)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $229,284
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,471,749
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,701,033

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,034,016
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,735,049

NEW SECTION. Sec. 774 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM

Green River Community College: Computer Technology Center
(04-2-682)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,228,751

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,770,749
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,999,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 775 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Renovation - East/West
Buildings (04-1-312)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,463,880

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $956,920
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,420,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 776 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Redmond Land Acquisition
(04-2-403)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of the reappropriation is to purchase property for
expansion, storm water retention, and parking requirements.
(2) State funds must be matched with nonstate resources of at least
$500,000.
(3) Allotment of funds shall be in accordance with RCW 43.88.150.

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 777 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College: Instructional Fine Arts Building
(04-1-214)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,758,314
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,589,727
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,348,041

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,333,976

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $979,758
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,661,775

NEW SECTION. Sec. 778 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (Minor Improvements) (04-2-130)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,257,113
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,894,945
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,152,058

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,827,159
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,979,217

NEW SECTION. Sec. 779 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College: Arts and Science Renovation
(04-1-309)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $303,265

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,482,435
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,785,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 780 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: Science and Technology Building Replacement
(04-1-202)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $8,110,000 is provided as additional
support for this project by the reappropriation in section 772 of this
act.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,998,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,361,964
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,359,964

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $638,036
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,998,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 781 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Replacement Science and Technology Building
(04-1-208)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $468,734
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,423,200

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $748,066
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 782 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM

Pierce College - Fort Steilacoom: Science and Technology
(04-2-694)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,986,447

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $190,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,106,553
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,283,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 783 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Puyallup: Community Arts/Allied Health (04-2-691)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,946,716

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,303,284
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 784 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom: Childcare Center (04-2-401)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of the reappropriation is to construct a 10,000
square foot childcare center as identified in the college's master
plan.
(2) State funds must be matched with nonstate resources in the
amount of $2,250,000.
(3) Allotment of funds shall be in accordance with RCW 43.88.150.

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $497,338

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,662
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 785 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Renton Technical College: Portable Replacement (04-1-215)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $404,905
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,976,235

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,395
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,395,535

NEW SECTION. Sec. 786 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs "A" (04-1-010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,572,735

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,692,942
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,265,677

NEW SECTION. Sec. 787 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Replacement North Plaza
Building (04-1-275)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,976,200

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,976,200

NEW SECTION. Sec. 788 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (04-1-090)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,692,856

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,612,768
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,305,624

NEW SECTION. Sec. 789 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College: Science Building Replacement (04-1-209)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,664
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,693,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $285,336
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,268,049
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,261,049

NEW SECTION. Sec. 790 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Science Complex (04-2-695)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,160,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,200
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,867,300
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,121,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 791 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Instruction Technology Center
(04-2-681)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,280,107

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,580,893
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,861,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 792 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Renovation - Pastry Vocational
Program (04-1-314)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,545,470

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,630
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,613,100

NEW SECTION. Sec. 793 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College: Science Building Replacement (04-1-212)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,838,825

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $882,775
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,721,600

NEW SECTION. Sec. 794 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Renovation - Building 7 (04-1-313)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,759,822

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $228,178
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,988,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 795 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Replacement - Portable Buildings
(04-1-206)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,401,778

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,222
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,622,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 796 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Health Science Facility (04-1-211)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,763,672

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $497,728
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,261,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 797 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Glenn/Anthon Hall - Replacement
(04-1-207)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,645,152

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,645,152

NEW SECTION. Sec. 798 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Renovation - Sundquist (04-1-302)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $654,799

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,197,901
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,852,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 799 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Health Sciences Center (05-2-851)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,857,624

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $142,376
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 800 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Employability Colocation Study (05-4-850)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,167

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,833
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle: Training Facility (05-1-854)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is for the construction
of a training facility and a separate academic/administrative facility
to replace light wood frame structures.

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $710,002
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,272,283

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,998
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,994,283

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls: Business and Social Science Building (05-1-853)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,754,854
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,512,385

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,146
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,312,385

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Wenatchee Valley College: Anderson Hall and Portable Replacement
(05-1-852)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,285,924
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,042,145

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $332,076
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,660,145

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: Flood Damage (06-1-331)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Big Bend Community College: Performing Arts and Fine Arts
(06-1-309)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,698,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,698,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 806 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Gaiser Hall Renovation (06-1-302)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,374,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,374,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 807 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: O'Connell Sports Center Improvements (06-2-403)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 808 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clover Park Technical College: Allied Health Care Facility
(06-2-699)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,085,285
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,245,285

NEW SECTION. Sec. 809 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clover Park Technical College: Personal Care Services Facility
(06-1-310)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,499,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,499,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 810 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Business Education Renovation (06-1-301)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,037,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,037,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 811 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Diversity Initiatives Office (06-2-409)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 812 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Brier Hall Renovation (06-1-307)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,133,020

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,133,020

NEW SECTION. Sec. 813 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Paine Field Technical Center (06-2-408)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 814 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Repairs (06-1-050)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,327,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,327,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 815 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Ilwaco Education Center (06-2-401)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 816 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Vocational Education Renovation (06-1-303)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,371,199

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,371,199

NEW SECTION. Sec. 817 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: General Classroom Building
(06-1-205)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $137,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,629,327
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,766,327

NEW SECTION. Sec. 818 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Water System Replacement (06-1-501)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,951,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,951,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 819 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Physical Education Renovation
(06-1-313)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,437,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,914,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 820 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM

Green River Community College: Skills Support Center Addition
(06-2-405)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 821 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Highline Community College: Primary Power Branch Replacement
(06-1-503)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,717,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,717,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 822 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Highline Community College: Marine Science and Technology
(06-2-406)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 823 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Allied Health Building
(06-2-697)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,317,259
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,404,259

NEW SECTION. Sec. 824 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Science Lab Renovation
(06-1-308)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,758,237

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,758,237

NEW SECTION. Sec. 825 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works: Program (06-2-130)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,002,598

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,002,598

NEW SECTION. Sec. 826 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works Preservation (RMI) (06-1-001)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 827 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Infrastructure Savings (06-1-751)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 915 of this act may have their remaining funds transferred
to this appropriation for other preservation projects approved by the
office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 828 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(06-1-750)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds shall be
allocated at the state board's discretion to achieve the above stated
performance goal, with particular attention given to buildings
currently rated in superior to adequate condition so as to maximize
useful life given both the passage of time and intensity with which the
space is used.
(3) Section 915 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2007.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,802,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,802,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 829 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College: Wellness Center Repairs
(06-1-330)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 830 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: Bremer Student Center (06-2-411)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 831 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: Humanities and Student Services (06-1-204)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,499,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,615,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,114,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 832 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Library Renovation (06-1-305)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 833 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Phase II Cultural and Arts Center (06-2-412)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 834 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom: Cascade Building Renovation
(06-1-326)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,350,622

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,601,736
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,952,358

NEW SECTION. Sec. 835 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs (06-1-010)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,840,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,840,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 836 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Greenhouse/Educational Center
(06-2-410)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 837 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Maritime Academy Repairs
(06-1-502)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,856,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,856,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 838 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Information Technology and
Visual Communications (06-1-304)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,096,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,096,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 839 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Shoreline Community College: Annex Renovation (06-1-312)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,739,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,739,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 840 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs (06-1-090)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,837,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,837,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 841 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College: Campus Fire Loop Replacement (06-1-504)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,634,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,634,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 842 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Learning Resource Center
(06-2-698)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $197,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,650,300
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,847,300

NEW SECTION. Sec. 843 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Automotive Collision Technology
(06-1-306)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,972,300

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,972,300

NEW SECTION. Sec. 844 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Horticulture/SCGS Classrooms
(06-2-404)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $557,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $557,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 845 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Campus Classrooms (06-2-696)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,488,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,570,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 846 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Clarkston Health Science Facility
(06-2-402)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 847 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Wenatchee Valley College: Brown Library Renovation (06-1-311)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,404,300

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,404,300

NEW SECTION. Sec. 848 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Center for Workforce Education
(06-2-407)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 849 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Raymond Hall Renovation
(06-1-325)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,168,350

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,168,350

NEW SECTION. Sec. 850 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Big Bend Community College: Aviation Program Fleet Replacement
(06-2-953)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 851 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Center for Fine Arts and Performing
Arts (06-2-950)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 852 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Shoreline Community College: Automotive Building (Phase 1)
(06-2-951)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 853 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Satellite Campus Acquisition
(06-2-952)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,200,000

(End of part)

PART 6
MISCELLANEOUS AND SUPPLEMENTAL PROVISIONS

MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 The estimated debt service costs impacting
future general fund expenditures related solely to new capital
appropriations within this act are $19,503,912 during the 2005-2007
fiscal period; $128,151,322 during the 2007-2009 fiscal period;
$200,451,220 during the 2009-2011 fiscal period; $207,686,311 during
the 2011-2013 fiscal period; and $210,558,739 during the 2013-2015
period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 (1) Allotments for appropriations in this
act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review
requirements adopted by the office of financial management. The office
of financial management shall notify the house of representatives
capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee of
allotment releases based on review by the office of financial
management. No expenditure may be incurred or obligation entered into
for appropriations in this act until the office of financial management
has given final approval to the allotment of the funds to be expended
or encumbered. For allotments under this act, the allotment process
includes, in addition to the statement of proposed expenditures for the
current biennium, a category or categories for any reserve amounts and
amounts expected to be expended in future biennia. Projects that will
be employing alternative public works construction procedures under
chapter 39.10 RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in
this section and RCW 43.88.110. Contracts shall not be executed that
call for expenditures in excess of the approved allotment, and the
total amount shown in such contracts for the cost of future work that
has not been appropriated shall not exceed the amount identified for
such work in the level of funding approved by the office of financial
management at the completion of predesign.
(2) The legislature intends that each project be defined as
proposed to the legislature in the governor's budget document, unless
it clearly appears from the legislative history that the legislature
intended to define the scope of a project in a different way.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 To ensure that major construction projects
are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive intent,
appropriations in this act in excess of $5,000,000 shall not be
expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has
reviewed and approved the agency's predesign and other documents, and
approved an allotment for the project that includes specific
authorization to enter into a contract to expend or encumber funds.
The predesign document shall include but not be limited to program,
site, and cost analysis in accordance with the predesign manual adopted
by the office of financial management. To improve monitoring of major
construction projects, progress reports shall be submitted by the
agency administering the project to the office of financial management
and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and
senate. Reports will be submitted on July 1st and December 31st each
year in a format to be developed by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 Appropriations in this act for design and
construction of facilities on higher education campuses shall be
expended only after funds are allotted to institutions of higher
education on the basis of: (1) Comparable unit cost standards, as
determined by the office of financial management in consultation with
the higher education coordinating board; (2) costs consistent with
other higher education teaching facilities in the state; and (3)
student full-time equivalent enrollment levels as established by the
office of financial management in consultation with the higher
education coordinating board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 (1) To ensure that minor works
appropriations are carried out in accordance with legislative intent,
funds appropriated in this act shall not be allotted until project
lists are on file at the office of financial management and the office
of financial management has formally approved the lists. Proposed
revisions to the lists must be filed with and approved by the office of
financial management before funds may be expended on the revisions.
(2)(a) Minor works projects are single line appropriations that
include multiple projects valued between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each
that are of a similar nature and can generally be completed within two
years of the appropriation with the funding provided. Minor works
categories include (i) health, safety, and code requirements; (ii)
facility preservation; (iii) infrastructure preservation; and (iv)
program improvement or expansion. Improvements for accessibility in
compliance with the Americans with disabilities act may be included in
any of the above minor works categories.
(b) Minor works appropriations shall not be used for, among other
things: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or
designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor
works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works
list; moveable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment
not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office
of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a
specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; or
to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless
expressly authorized elsewhere in this act. The office of financial
management may make an exception to the limitations described in this
subsection (2)(b) for exigent circumstances after notifying the
legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the
legislature regarding the proposed exception.
(3) The office of financial management shall forward copies of
these project lists and revised lists to the house of representatives
capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee. No
expenditure may be incurred or obligation entered into for minor works
appropriations until the office of financial management has approved
the allotment of the funds to be expended. The office of financial
management shall encourage state agencies to incorporate accessibility
planning and improvements into the normal and customary capital
program.
(4) It is generally not intended to make future appropriations for
capital expenditures or for maintenance and operating expenses for an
acquisition project or a significant expansion project that is
initiated through the minor works process and therefore does not
receive a policy and fiscal analysis by the legislature. Minor works
projects are intended to be one-time expenditures that do not require
future state resources to complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 (1) It is expected that projects be ready
to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the
project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this
act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two
biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large
infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often
take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does
not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for
smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.
(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and
appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate
infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation
and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural
environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition
and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional
employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.
(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate
expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and
shall use contracted design and construction services wherever
necessary to meet the goals of this section.
(4) The office of financial management shall report the following
to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by January 30,
2007: (a) A listing of reappropriations in the governor's 2007-2009
capital budget recommendation that will be reappropriated more than
once and have ten percent or more of the original appropriation
unexpended; and (b) an explanation of why the appropriation remains
unexpended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES
THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter into
financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or
nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the
principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under
this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract
option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase
agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or
financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures
made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue
date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of
participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of
the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to
the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the
state finance committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
(1) Department of general administration:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $12,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct the fifth and final phase of the roof membrane replacement
at the east plaza parking structure as well as safety improvements to
the parking garage below the plaza.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $6,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the fourth phase of the office building-2 rehabilitation that will
renew failing building systems, correct code deficiencies, and improve
access.
(c) Enter into a financing contract for up to $13,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the rehabilitation of the Cherberg building.
(2) Liquor control board: Enter into a financing contract for up
to $17,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an extension to the liquor control
board's distribution center to meet liquor sales growth through 2018.
(3) Department of social and health services: Enter into a
financing contract for up to $9,600,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase and install
laundry equipment and make laundry building alterations at Western
State Hospital. The department, at its option, may increase laundry
utilization with work from other institutions to help pay for this
contract or may contract this service out in lieu of the financing
authorized in this section.
(4) Department of corrections:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $400,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct a waste transfer station and purchase a garbage truck at
the McNeil Island corrections center.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $4,588,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct a transportation services warehouse and offices for
correctional industries.
(c) Enter into a financing contract for up to $4,536,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct additions to the food factory and warehouses at the Airway
Heights corrections center for correctional industries.
(5) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bellevue Community
College for up to $20,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the North Center
building.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark College for
up to $9,100,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a parking structure.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clover Park
Technical College for up to $14,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student
center.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin
College for up to $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the Hawk Union
building.
(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community
College for up to $4,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a black box theater
as a part of the Instructional Lab building.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River
Community College for up to $7,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase Kent
Station higher education center.
(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Olympic College
for up to $3,600,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an addition to the student
center bookstore.
(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Shoreline
Community College for up to $15,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student
union building.
(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Skagit Valley
Community College for up to $3,200,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate existing
space into a new student center.
(j) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $2,175,100 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land and
construct a building for the enology program.
(k) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $640,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an
addition to the health sciences building at the Clarkston Center.
(6) Washington State University: Enter into a financing contract
for at least $11,650,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a bioproducts facility in
the Tri-Cities.
(7) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Seattle Central
Community College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a math and
science building.
(8) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Pierce
College/Puyallup for up to $8,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student
gym and fitness center.
(9) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Pierce College/Ft.
Steilacoom for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an addition to the
college health and wellness center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION--ART WORK
ALLOWANCE POOLING. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated
in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is
provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210. The Washington
state arts commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects
in order to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and
representatives of school district boards.
(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding
two hundred thousand dollars by colleges or universities is provided
solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027. The Washington state arts
commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order
to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with
the board of regents or trustees.
(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction of any public building by a state agency as
defined in RCW 43.17.020 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW
43.17.200. The Washington state arts commission may combine the
proceeds from individual projects in order to fund larger works of art
or mobile art displays in consultation with the state agency.
(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the
Washington state arts commission during the 2005-2007 biennium for the
purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended
solely for direct acquisition of works of art. If chapter . . . (House
Bill No. 2188 (funding the conservation of the state art collection)),
Laws of 2005 is enacted by June 30, 2005, the commission may use
$100,000 of this amount to contract for services to conserve or
maintain existing pieces in the state art collection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 The amounts shown under the headings
"Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for
informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval
of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate
prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia
in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an
estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the
2007-09 biennium and the following four biennia; an amount of zero does
not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide funding
for the project or program in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910 "Reappropriations" in this act are
appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are
subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to
appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended
balances remaining on June 30, 2005, from the 2003-2005 biennial
appropriations for each project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911 To carry out the provisions of this act,
the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design,
construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 912 If any federal moneys appropriated by this
act for capital projects are not received by the state, the department
or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace the federal
moneys with funds available from private or local sources. No
replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval of
the director of financial management in consultation with the senate
ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital
budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 913 (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all
appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or
in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW
43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so
that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended
state share of total project costs.
(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not
required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for
phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds
is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 914 Any capital improvements or capital
projects involving construction or major expansion of a state office
facility, including, but not limited to, district headquarters,
detachment offices, and off-campus faculty offices, must be reviewed by
the department of general administration for possible consolidation,
colocation, and compliance with state office standards before allotment
of funds. The intent of the requirement imposed by this section is to
eliminate duplication and reduce total office space requirements where
feasible, while ensuring proper service to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 915 (1) The governor, through the office of
financial management, may authorize a transfer of appropriation
authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the
amount required for the completion of such project to another capital
project for which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer
may be used to expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended
by the legislature in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be
effected only between capital appropriations to a specific department,
commission, agency, or institution of higher education and only between
capital projects that are funded from the same fund or account. No
transfers may occur between projects to local government agencies
except where the grants are provided within a single omnibus
appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by
the implementing statutes that govern the grants.
(2) For purposes of this section, the governor may find that an
amount is in excess of the amount required for the completion of a
project only if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget
document is substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or
(b) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial
certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget
document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount
appropriated in this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each
project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's
budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history
that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a
different way.
(4) Transfers of funds to an agency's infrastructure savings
appropriation are subject to review and approval by the office of
financial management. Expenditures from an infrastructure savings
appropriation are limited to projects that have a primary purpose to
correct infrastructure deficiencies or conditions that: (a) Adversely
affect the ability to utilize the infrastructure for its current
programmatic use; (b) reduce the life expectancy of the infrastructure;
or (c) increase the operating costs of the infrastructure for its
current programmatic use. Eligible infrastructure projects may include
structures and surface improvements, site amenities, utility systems
outside building footprints and natural environmental changes or
requirements as part of an environmental regulation, a declaration of
emergency for an infrastructure issue in conformance with RCW
43.88.250, or infrastructure planning as part of a facility master
plan.
(5) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except
emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with
the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty
days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial
management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within
thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 916 The military department shall file
quarterly progress reports in addition to the annual project progress
reporting requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3). These reports must contain
local, state, and federal funding reconciliation and balance sheets for
all appropriated readiness center projects and detail any federal
intentions on future readiness centers and other facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 917 NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS.
Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the
state building construction account may be transferred to the state
taxable building construction account as deemed necessary by the state
finance committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service
rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond
proceeds. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the
director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of
appropriation authority from the state building construction account to
the state taxable building construction account is necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 918 The office of financial management, in
consultation with the department of general administration, shall
identify capital projects that may benefit from an energy analysis to
determine whether there are alternate, more economical, and energy
efficient means of completing the work. The office of financial
management shall hold appropriations in allotment reserve on the
following types of capital projects until this analysis can be
completed: Heating, ventilation, and air conditioning modifications,
chiller plants, steam plants, boilers, chilled water or steam lines,
building control systems, lighting improvements, or other major energy
using systems that may warrant additional analysis. Agencies receiving
appropriations for such projects are encouraged to utilize energy
performance contracts or alternative financing for equipment in lieu of
state appropriated funds. The office of financial management may
transfer funds remaining in allotment reserve to infrastructure savings
projects within the agency that has realized savings from energy
efficiency alternatives.

Sec. 919 RCW 43.135.045 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 920 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The emergency reserve fund is established in the state
treasury. During each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall deposit
in the emergency reserve fund all general fund -- state revenues in
excess of the state expenditure limit for that fiscal year. Deposits
shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter based on projections of
state revenues and the state expenditure limit. The treasurer shall
make transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual
annual revenues and the expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and
thereafter.
(2) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency
reserve fund only with approval of at least two-thirds of the members
of each house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation
does not cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit
under this chapter.
(3) The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five
percent of annual general fund -- state revenues as projected by the
official state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent
shall be transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer as
follows: Seventy-five percent to the student achievement fund hereby
created in the state treasury and twenty-five percent to the general
fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers between these
accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for fiscal
year 2000 and thereafter. When per-student state funding for the
maintenance and operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less
than ninety percent of the national average of total funding from all
sources per student as determined by the most recent published data
from the national center for education statistics of the United States
department of education, as calculated by the office of financial
management, further deposits to the student achievement fund shall be
required only to the extent necessary to maintain the ninety-percent
level. Remaining funds are part of the general fund balance and these
funds are subject to the expenditure limits of this chapter.
(4) The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2005, and
ending June 30, 2007, funds may also be used for higher education
facilities preservation and maintenance, and improving technology
infrastructure in K-12 school districts.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(5) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be appropriated
to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for distribution
to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the student
achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per full-time
equivalent student basis to each school district.
(6) Earnings of the emergency reserve fund under RCW
43.84.092(4)(a) shall be transferred quarterly to the multimodal
transportation account, except for those earnings that are in excess of
thirty-five million dollars each fiscal year. Within thirty days
following any fiscal year in which earnings transferred to the
multimodal transportation account under this subsection did not total
thirty-five million dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer from
the emergency reserve fund an amount necessary to bring the total
deposited in the multimodal transportation account under this
subsection to thirty-five million dollars. The revenues to the
multimodal transportation account reflected in this subsection provide
ongoing support for the transportation programs of the state. However,
it is the intent of the legislature that any new long-term financial
support that may be subsequently provided for transportation programs
will be used to replace and supplant the revenues reflected in this
subsection, thereby allowing those revenues to be returned to the
purposes to which they were previously dedicated. No transfers from
the emergency reserve fund to the multimodal fund shall be made during
the 2003-05 fiscal biennium.

Sec. 920 RCW 43.88.032 and 1997 c 96 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Normal maintenance costs, except for funds appropriated for
facility preservation of state institutions of higher education, shall
be programmed in the operating budget rather than in the capital
budget.
(2) All debt-financed pass-through money to local governments shall
be programmed and separately identified in the budget document.

Sec. 921 RCW 28B.50.360 and 2004 c 277 s 910 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of start of each quarter all
collected building fees of each such community and technical college
shall be paid into the state treasury, and shall be credited as
follows:
(1) On or before June 30th of each year the college board if
issuing bonds payable out of building fees shall certify to the state
treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve-month period to
pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such
bonds. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so
certified in the community and technical college capital projects
account. Such amounts of the funds deposited in the community and
technical college capital projects account as are necessary to pay and
secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building
bonds issued by the college board as authorized by this chapter shall
be exclusively devoted to that purpose. If in any twelve-month period
it shall appear that the amount certified by the college board is
insufficient to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and
interest on the outstanding building bonds, the state treasurer shall
notify the college board and such board shall adjust its certificate so
that all requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the
principal and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be
fully met at all times.
(2) The community and technical college capital projects account is
hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the
capital projects account shall be appropriated and expended exclusively
to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds
payable out of the building fees and for the construction,
reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major
alteration of buildings and other capital assets owned by the state
board for community and technical colleges in the name of the state of
Washington, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements,
improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto, ((and, during the
2003-05 biennium,)) engineering and architectural services provided by
the department of general administration, and for the payment of
principal of and interest on any bonds issued for such purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 922 To provide additional financial assistance
and relief to irrigation districts and farmers during the current
drought, loan principal and interest payments due to the department of
ecology from previous biennia loans and loans in the 2005-07 biennium
for drought assistance or agricultural water supply projects may be
deferred for the 2005-07 biennium. Deferrals are intended only for
loan recipients that involve a significant number of farmers who are
temporarily leasing or not using their water rights for the benefit of
the drought response. The deferrals shall apply to loans from the
state drought preparedness account, the state emergency water projects
revolving account, and state and local improvement revolving account
(water supply facilities). Such loan repayments will resume consistent
with the original loan agreement at the beginning of the 2007-09
biennium.

SUPPLEMENTAL PROVISIONS
Sec. 923 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (04-4-001)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Expenditures of the appropriation shall
comply with chapter 43.155 RCW.

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($261,200,000))
$416,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,319,499,999
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,580,699,999))
$1,735,699,999

Sec. 924 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water SRF - Authorization to Use Loan Repayments
(04-4-010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Expenditures of the appropriation shall
comply with RCW 70.119A.170.

Appropriation:
((Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,200,000))
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,200,000))
$15,200,000

Sec. 925 2004 c 277 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Account (04-4-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Expenditures of the appropriation shall comply with RCW
70.119A.170.
(2)(a) The state building construction account appropriation is
provided solely to provide assistance to counties, cities, and special
purpose districts to identify, acquire, and rehabilitate public water
systems that have water quality problems or have been allowed to
deteriorate to a point where public health is an issue. Eligibility is
confined to applicants that already own at least one group A public
water system and that demonstrate a track record of sound drinking
water utility management. Funds may be used for: Planning, design,
and other preconstruction activities; system acquisition; and capital
construction costs.
(b) The state building construction account appropriation must be
jointly administered by the department of health, the public works
board, and the department of community, trade, and economic development
using the drinking water state revolving fund loan program as an
administrative model. In order to expedite the use of these funds and
minimize administration costs, this appropriation must be administered
by guidance, rather than rule. Projects must generally be prioritized
using the drinking water state revolving fund loan program criteria.
All financing provided through this program must be in the form of
grants that must partially cover project costs. The maximum grant to
any eligible entity may not exceed twenty-five percent of the funds
allocated to this appropriation.

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,700,000))
$8,500,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,100,000

Sec. 926 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 124 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Coastal Erosion Grants (01-S-019)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Funds are provided for coastal erosion grants in southwest
Washington in partnership with other state and federal funds. Grays
Harbor county is the lead agency in the administration of the grants.
(b) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.
(2) The appropriation in this section is provided for coastal
erosion grants in southeast Washington in partnership with other state
and federal funds. Grays Harbor county is the lead agency in the
administration of the grants.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $583,155
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($750,000))
$1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $666,845
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($0))
$1,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$3,416,845

NEW SECTION. Sec. 927 A new section is added to 2004 c 277
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Alteration of Building No. 2 - Camp Murray (05-1-001)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 928 A new section is added to 2004 c 277
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Courseware Development Support Facility (05-2-002)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 929 A new section is added to 2004 c 277
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Jefferson County Public Utility District Grant (05-1-006)

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $265,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $265,000

Sec. 930 2004 c 277 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Engineering and Architectural Services (04-2-014)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section shall be used to provide
project management services to state agencies as required by RCW
43.19.450 that are essential and mandated activities defined as core
services and are included in the engineering and architectural
services' responsibilities and task list for general public works
projects of normal complexity. The general public works projects
included are all those financed by the state capital budget for the
biennium ending June 30, 2005, with individual total project values up
to $20 million.
(2) The department may negotiate agreements with agencies for
additional fees to manage projects financed by financial contracts,
other alternative financing, projects with a total value greater than
$20 million, or for the nonstate funded portion of projects with mixed
funding sources.
(3) The department shall review each community and technical
college request and the requests of other client agencies for funding
any project over $2.5 million for inclusion in the 2004 supplemental
capital budget and the 2005-07 capital budget to ensure that the amount
requested by the agency is appropriate for predesign, design, and
construction, depending on the phase of the project being requested.
The department shall pay particular attention: (a) That the budgeted
amount requested is at an appropriate level for the various components
that make up the cost of the project such as project management; and
(b) that standard measurements such as cost per square foot are
reasonable. The department shall also assist the office of financial
management with review of other agency projects as requested.

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,996,000))
$7,723,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($937,000))
$210,000
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,513,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,586,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($0))
$41,308,400
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,586,000))
$50,894,400

Sec. 931 2004 c 277 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building: Rehabilitation and Capital Addition
(01-1-008)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
subject to the conditions and limitations of section 109, chapter 238,
Laws of 2002 and section 904, chapter 10, Laws of 2003.

Reappropriation:
Capital Historic District Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,450,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,450,000
Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,031,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,281,000))
$112,381,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 932 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' AFFAIRS
Retsil: 240 Bed Nursing Facility (02-2-008)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,730,700
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,420,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,400,700

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,900,700

Sec. 933 2004 c 277 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Program (04-4-002)

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($81,054,333))
$102,614,743
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,466,666
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($125,520,999))
$147,081,409

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $462,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($587,520,999))
$609,081,409

Sec. 934 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 330 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Fort Worden (02-1-003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
park preservation and for development of the multipurpose dining and
meeting facility.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,500,000))
$1,910,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,569,365))
$73,350
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,069,365))
$1,983,350

Sec. 935 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Region 1 Office - Spokane (04-2-009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the construction of the eastern region headquarters office complex to
be located at Mirabeau Point.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000
State Wildlife Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,900,000))
$4,400,000

Sec. 936 2004 c 277 s 262 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
South Seattle: Training Facility (05-1-854)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is solely for the design of a ((single shop
and classroom)) training facility and a separate
academic/administrative facility to replace ((eight)) light wood frame
structures.
(2) Prior to allotment for design, the state board for community
and technical colleges shall submit a predesign document to the office
of financial management and legislative fiscal committees identifying
and outlining the project or projects, scope, schedule, and preliminary
cost estimates for capital projects related to the replacement of the
portables.

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $722,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,342,480
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,064,480

Sec. 937 2004 c 277 s 236 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
School Construction Assistance Grants (04-4-001)

The appropriations in this section ((is)) are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(1) For state assistance grants for purposes of calculating square
foot eligibility, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced
by fifty percent.
(2) $2,000,000 from this appropriation is provided for skills
centers capital improvements. Skills centers shall submit a budget
plan to the state board of education and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature for proposed expenditures and the
proposed expenditures shall conform with state board of education rules
and procedures for reimbursement of capital items. Funds not expended
by June 30, 2005, shall lapse.
(3) $32,868,105 of this appropriation is provided solely to
increase the area cost allowance by $15.00 per square foot for grades
K-12 for fiscal year 2004 and an additional $4.49 per square foot for
grades K-12 for fiscal year 2005.
(4) The appropriation in this section includes the amounts
deposited in the common school construction account under section 603
of this act.
(5) $2,500,000 of this appropriation is provided solely for design
and construction of additional space at the new market vocational
skills center.
(6) Beginning in their 2005-07 capital budget submittal to the
governor, the state board of education, in consultation with the
Washington state skills centers, shall develop and submit a prioritized
list of capital preservation, equipment with long life-cycles, and
space expansion and improvement projects. The list shall be developed
based on, but not limited to, the following factors: Projected
enrollment growth; local school district participation and financial
support; changes in the business and industry needs in the state; and
efficiency in program delivery and operations.

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($402,268,513))
$295,218,513
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $107,050,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $402,268,513

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,858,456,614
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,260,725,127

Sec. 938 2004 c 277 s 911 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
((During the 2003-05 biennium,)) The state parks and recreation
commission shall ((study the various options regarding the future of
Old Man House state park. These alternatives include retention as a
state park, roles of volunteer community groups, transfer to the
Suquamish tribe, sale as surplus property, or other alternatives. The
commission may, if it deems it appropriate after studying the various
options, transfer the park to the Suquamish tribe. Any action shall
provide for continued public access and use of the site for public
recreation, and include a limited waiver of sovereignty by the tribe
restricted to the enforceability of the reversion clause pursuant to
RCW 79A.05.170)) transfer Old Man House state park to the Suquamish
tribe. Any transfer shall provide for continued public access and use
of the site for public recreation, and include a limited waiver of
sovereignty by the tribe to enforce the reversionary clause pursuant to
RCW 79A.05.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 939 Sections 919 and 920 of this act expire
June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 940 Part headings in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 941 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 603 (uncodified); and
(2) 2004 c 277 s 302 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 942 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 943 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for sections 919 and 920 of this act, which take
effect June 30, 2005.

(End of Part)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 151
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 224
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 120
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 65
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 107
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 114
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 122
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' AFFAIRS' . . . . . . . . . . . . 228
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 146
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 92
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 31, 226
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 124
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 104
STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 226
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 82
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 128
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 129
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 127
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 156
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 130
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 167
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 122
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 138
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 161
--- END ---