BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is
currently no requirement that educational interpreters for deaf and
hard of hearing students be certified or meet standardized
qualifications or competencies. The purpose of this act is to
establish standards for certification and to standardize
qualifications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 3 and 4
of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Educational interpreters" means school district employees
providing sign language translation and further explanation of concepts
introduced by the teacher for students who are deaf, deaf-blind, or
hard of hearing.
(2) "Educational interpreter written and performance assessment"
means a national performance assessment offered by a national
organization of professional sign language interpreters and
transliterators, that is designed to evaluate more than one sign system
or language.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By 2009, educational interpreters must have completed the
educational interpreter written and performance assessments, and must
achieve the standard on both, established by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. For those interpreters not
achieving the established standard, the interpreter must continue
training until he or she is able to pass the assessments.
(2) By 2012, all educational interpreters must pass the written
assessment, meet the standard on the educational interpreter
performance assessment, and become nationally certified by the national
association of the deaf registry of interpreters for the deaf.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The state board of education, with advice from the professional
educator standards board, shall develop educational staff associate
certification requirements for educational interpreters of deaf and
hard of hearing students. The certification shall focus on the
specific skills and knowledge necessary to serve the educational and
communication needs of deaf and hard of hearing students.
(2) In establishing rules of the educational staff associate
certification for educational interpreters who will be working almost
exclusively with students who are deaf or hard of hearing, the state
board of education shall consider applicants to have met state
endorsement requirements if they:
(a) Hold national certification and pass the educational
interpreter performance assessment and written test at the standard
established by the office of superintendent of public instruction; and
(b) Hold a bachelor's degree in education or educational
interpreting from a regionally accredited institution of higher
education; or a bachelor's degree in another field of study unrelated
to education, from a regionally accredited institution of higher
education and thirty hours of course work in education.
(3) The state board of education may adopt rules to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall establish a
bachelor's degree educational sign language interpreter training
program in Washington state. The training program should be available
through the use of various distance learning technologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 An advisory committee to advise the
legislature on issues related to educational interpreting is
established. The advisory committee shall include members representing
nationally certified educational interpreters, tactile interpreters,
interpreter educators, deaf leaders, public school administrators, and
parents of deaf and deaf-blind children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of superintendent of public instruction shall work
with school districts and educational service districts to develop
regional service areas for students who are deaf, deaf-blind, and hard
of hearing, for the purposes of more effectively providing services to
these students.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The sum of forty-nine thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2006, from the general fund to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to participate in the assessment
system for K-12 educational interpreters. Participation is for
purposes of administration of the educational interpreter written and
performance assessments.

--- END ---