BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the fees
associated with various actions of the department of ecology relating
to the processing and administration of water rights are outdated and
are insufficient even to recover the cost of handling the funds
submitted. Additionally, water right processing fees are currently
collected at three different stages of the water rights process,
whereas reducing the number of instances of fee collection to two
stages of the process would increase efficiency and reduce
administrative costs. Furthermore, several current statutory fees are
archaic or are otherwise covered by other general statutes, including
the public disclosure act. Therefore it is the intention of the
legislature to update and modernize the fee schedule associated with
water right-related actions of the department of ecology.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.470 and 1993 c 495 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Except as otherwise provided in subsection (15) of this
section,)) The following fees shall be collected by the department in
advance of the requested action:
(1)(a) For the examination of an application for a permit to
appropriate water ((or on application to change point of diversion,
withdrawal, purpose or place of use)), a minimum fee of ((ten)) fifty
dollars((, to be paid)) must be remitted with the application. For
((each second foot between one and five hundred second feet, two
dollars per second foot; for each second foot between five hundred and
two thousand second feet, fifty cents per second foot; and for each
second foot in excess thereof, twenty cents per second foot)) an amount
of water exceeding one-half cubic foot per second, the examination fee
shall be assessed at the rate of one hundred dollars per cubic foot per
second.
(b) For the examination of an application to store water, a fee of
two dollars for each acre foot of storage ((up to and including one
hundred thousand acre feet, one cent per acre foot, and for each acre
foot in excess thereof, one-fifth cent per acre foot)) proposed, but
not less than fifty dollars must be remitted with the application.
(c) For the examination of an application to change the point of
diversion, the point of withdrawal, the purpose of use or the place of
use of an existing water right certificate or claim, a minimum of fifty
dollars must be remitted with the application. For an application for
change involving an amount of water exceeding one cubic foot per
second, the total examination fee shall be assessed at the rate of
fifty dollars per cubic foot per second. This fee also applies to: A
change of the point of withdrawal or the manner of use or the place of
use of a ground water permit; to adding points of withdrawal for a
ground water permit, certificate, or claim; and to the consolidation of
one or more ground water rights exempt from permitting with a ground
water certificate or claim. No fee is required for applications to
process changes relating to donation of a trust water right to the
state, nor is a fee required for processing a change when the
department otherwise acquires a trust water right for purposes of
improving in stream flows or for other public purposes.
(d) The ((ten)) fifty-dollar minimum fee payable with the
application shall be a credit to ((that)) the total amount whenever the
fee ((for direct diversion or storage)) totals more than ((ten)) fifty
dollars under the ((above schedule)) fees due under this subsection (1)
and in such case the further fee due shall be the total computed
amount, less ((ten)) fifty dollars. Within five working days from
receipt of an application, the department shall notify the applicant by
registered mail of any additional fees due under ((the above schedule
and any additional fees shall be paid to and received by the department
within thirty days from the date of filing the application, or the
application shall be rejected)) this subsection.
(e) The fees provided for in this subsection (1) do not apply to
any filings for emergency withdrawal authorizations or temporary
drought-related water right changes authorized under RCW 43.83B.410
that are received by the department while a drought condition order
issued under RCW 43.83B.405 is in effect.
(2) ((For filing and recording a permit to appropriate water for
irrigation purposes, forty cents per acre for each acre to be irrigated
up to and including one hundred acres, and twenty cents per acre for
each acre in excess of one hundred acres up to and including one
thousand acres, and ten cents for each acre in excess of one thousand
acres; and also twenty cents for each theoretical horsepower up to and
including one thousand horsepower, and four cents for each theoretical
horsepower in excess of one thousand horsepower, but in no instance
shall the minimum fee for filing and recording a permit to appropriate
water be less than five dollars. For all other beneficial purposes the
fee shall be twice the amount of the examination fee except that for
individual household and domestic use, which may include water for
irrigation of a family garden, the fee shall be five dollars.
(3) For filing and recording any other water right instrument, four
dollars for the first hundred words and forty cents for each additional
hundred words or fraction thereof.
(4) For making a copy of any document recorded or filed in his
office, forty cents for each hundred words or fraction thereof, but
when the amount exceeds twenty dollars, only the actual cost in excess
of that amount shall be charged.
(5) For certifying to copies, documents, records or maps, two
dollars for each certification.
(6) For blueprint copies of a map or drawing, or, for such other
work of a similar nature as may be required of the department, at
actual cost of the work.
(7))) For ((granting)) applying for each extension of time for
beginning construction work under a permit to appropriate water, ((an
amount equal to one-half of the filing and recording fee, except that
the minimum fee shall be not less than five dollars for each year that
an extension is granted, and for granting an extension of time)) for
completion of construction work, or for completing application of water
to a beneficial use, ((five dollars for each year that an extension is
granted)) a fee of fifty dollars must accompany the application. These
fees also apply to similar extensions of time requested under a change
or transfer authorization.
(((8))) (3) For the inspection of any hydraulic works to insure
safety to life and property, the actual cost of the inspection,
including the expense incident thereto.
(((9))) (4) For the examination of plans and specifications as to
safety of controlling works for storage of ten acre feet or more of
water, a minimum fee of ten dollars, or the actual cost.
(((10))) (5) For recording an assignment either of a permit to
appropriate water or of an application for such a permit, a fee of
((five)) fifty dollars.
(((11))) (6) For preparing and issuing all water right
certificates, ((five)) a fee of fifty dollars.
(((12))) (7) For filing and recording a formal protest against
granting any application, ((two)) a fee of fifty dollars. No fee is
required to submit a comment, by mail or otherwise, regarding an
application.
(((13))) (8) For filing an application to amend a water right claim
filed under chapter 90.14 RCW, a fee of fifty dollars.
(9) An application or request for an action as provided for under
this section is incomplete unless accompanied by the fee or the minimum
fee. If no fee accompanies an application or other request for an
action as provided under this section, the department shall return the
application to the applicant with advice as to the fee that must be
remitted with the application or request for it to be accepted for
processing. If additional fees are due, the department shall provide
timely notification by certified mail with return receipt requested to
((applicants that fees are due)) the applicant. No action may be taken
by the department until the fee is paid in full. Failure to remit fees
within sixty days of the department's notification ((shall be)) is
grounds for rejecting the application or canceling the permit. Cash
shall not be accepted. Fees must be paid by check or money order and
are nonrefundable.
(((14))) (10) For purposes of calculating fees for ground water
filings, one cubic foot per second shall be regarded as equivalent to
four hundred fifty gallons per minute.
(((15) For the period beginning July 1, 1993, and ending June 30,
1994, there is imposed and the department shall collect a one hundred
dollar surcharge on all water rights applications or changes filed
under this section, and upon all water rights applications or changes
pending as of July 1, 1993. This charge shall be in addition to any
other fees imposed under this section.)) (11) Fees collected by the
department under this section shall be deposited to the state general
fund.

--- END ---