BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
EXTENDED WARRANTIES
Sec. 101 RCW 82.04.050 and 2004 c 174 s 3 and 2004 c 153 s 407
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible
personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:
(a) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(b) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(c) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(d) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; ((or))
(e) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of tangible personal
property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the
performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail
sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as provided in
(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use. The
term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons
engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and
(7), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908; or
(f) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or
for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of coin-operated laundry facilities
when such facilities are situated in an apartment house, rooming house,
or mobile home park for the exclusive use of the tenants thereof, and
also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and shall also include the sale of services or charges
made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The charge for labor and services rendered in respect to
constructing, repairing, or improving any structure upon, above, or
under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by
title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such
construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such
construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then
reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original
owner;
(d) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to the cleaning, fumigating, razing or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but shall not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging and
all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel,
trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real
property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real
property, and it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real property
for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same.
For the purposes of this subsection, it shall be presumed that the sale
of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous
period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real
property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The sale of or charge made for tangible personal property,
labor and services to persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e),
and (f) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property,
labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by
such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at
retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services
may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection shall be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4)(a) The term shall also include:
(i) The renting or leasing of tangible personal property to
consumers; and
(ii) Providing tangible personal property along with an operator
for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this
is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to
perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (4)(a)(ii), an
operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible
personal property.
(b) The term shall not include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of
sublease or subrent.
(5) The term shall also include the providing of telephone service,
as defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6) The term shall also include the sale of prewritten computer
software other than a sale to a person who presents a resale
certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the method of delivery
to the end user, but shall not include custom software or the
customization of prewritten computer software.
(7) The term shall also include the sale of or charge made for an
extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection,
"extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to
perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no
additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property,
labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or
repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of
specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an
agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in
this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and
the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the
tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of
this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.010.
(8) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(((8))) (9) The term shall also not include sales of chemical
sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of
fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it
include sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or the Washington state department of
fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that
the farmer owns or leases.
(((9))) (10) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made
for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing,
repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or
other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the
United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and
nuclear research and development.

Sec. 102 RCW 82.04.060 and 2002 c 367 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Sale at wholesale" or "wholesale sale" means: (1) Any sale of
tangible personal property, any sale of services defined as a retail
sale in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), any sale of amusement or recreation
services as defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), any sale of canned
software, any sale of an extended warranty as defined in RCW
82.04.050(7), or any sale of telephone service as defined in RCW
82.04.065, which is not a sale at retail; and (2) any charge made for
labor and services rendered for persons who are not consumers, in
respect to real or personal property, if such charge is expressly
defined as a retail sale by RCW 82.04.050 when rendered to or for
consumers: PROVIDED, That the term "real or personal property" as used
in this subsection shall not include any natural products named in RCW
82.04.100.

Sec. 103 RCW 82.04.190 and 2004 c 174 s 4 and 2004 c 2 s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
"Consumer" means the following:
(1) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any
article of tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the
person's business and including, among others, without limiting the
scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve,
construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers
other than for the purpose (a) of resale as tangible personal property
in the regular course of business or (b) of incorporating such property
as an ingredient or component of real or personal property when
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving,
constructing, or decorating such real or personal property of or for
consumers or (c) of consuming such property in producing for sale a new
article of tangible personal property or a new substance, of which such
property becomes an ingredient or component or as a chemical used in
processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a
chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new
article being produced for sale or (d) ((purchases for the purpose)) of
consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is
subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary
purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon or (e) of satisfying
the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in RCW
82.04.050(7), if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person;
(2)(a) Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.290 or 82.04.2908; (b) any person who purchases, acquires, or
uses any telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than for
resale in the regular course of business; (c) any person who purchases,
acquires, or uses any service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a) ((or any
amusement and recreation service defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a))),
other than for resale in the regular course of business or for the
purpose of satisfying the person's obligations under an extended
warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7); ((and)) (d) any person who
purchases, acquires, or uses any amusement and recreation service
defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), other than for resale in the regular
course of business; (e) any person who is an end user of software; and
(f) any person who purchases or acquires an extended warranty as
defined in RCW 82.04.050(7) other than for resale in the regular course
of business;
(3) Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the
building, repairing or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington or by
the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or
vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind as
defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of
such publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right of
way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle by installing, placing or spreading the property in
or upon the right of way of such street, place, road, highway,
easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in or upon the site of such
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility;
(4) Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of
possession to or an easement in real property which is being
constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or otherwise altered by a
person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal corporations
or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and services
rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road
purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and
county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82
RCW in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property.
Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this definition
shall be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";
(5) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession to personal property which is being constructed, repaired,
improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered by a person engaged
in business;
(6) Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created
pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing land
and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality
thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to
chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person shall be a consumer within the
meaning of this subsection in respect to tangible personal property
incorporated into, installed in, or attached to such building or other
structure by such person, except that consumer does not include any
person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating,
or improving new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon,
or above real property of or for the United States, or any
instrumentality thereof, if the investment project would qualify for
sales and use tax deferral under chapter 82.63 RCW if undertaken by a
private entity;
(7) Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the
rental of which is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under
RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or charge made for
tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the
machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful
life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other
subsection of this section shall be construed to modify any other
definition of "consumer"; ((and))
(8) Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other
byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and development;
and
(9) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession of tangible personal property that, under the terms of an
extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), has been repaired or
is replacement property, but only with respect to the sale of or charge
made for the repairing of the tangible personal property or the
replacement property.

Sec. 104 RCW 82.12.010 and 2003 c 168 s 102 and 2003 c 5 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Purchase price" means the same as sales price as defined in
RCW 82.08.010.
(2)(a) "Value of the article used" shall be the purchase price for
the article of tangible personal property, the use of which is taxable
under this chapter. The term also includes, in addition to the
purchase price, the amount of any tariff or duty paid with respect to
the importation of the article used. In case the article used is
acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted, produced, or manufactured
by the person using the same or is sold under conditions wherein the
purchase price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of
the article used shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.
(b) In case the articles used are acquired by bailment, the value
of the use of the articles so used shall be in an amount representing
a reasonable rental for the use of the articles so bailed, determined
as nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places
of use of similar products of like quality and character under such
rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such
articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the
construction, repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become
or are to become an ingredient or component of, new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or
for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city
housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing or attaching of any such articles therein or thereto,
whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by
virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such articles so
used shall be determined according to the retail selling price of such
articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of
similar products of like quality and character or, in the absence of
either of these selling price measures, such value may be determined
upon a cost basis, in any event under such rules as the department of
revenue may prescribe.
(c) In the case of articles owned by a user engaged in business
outside the state which are brought into the state for no more than one
hundred eighty days in any period of three hundred sixty-five
consecutive days and which are temporarily used for business purposes
by the person in this state, the value of the article used shall be an
amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the articles,
unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW
upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this
subsection.
(d) In the case of articles manufactured or produced by the user
and used in the manufacture or production of products sold or to be
sold to the department of defense of the United States, the value of
the articles used shall be determined according to the value of the
ingredients of such articles.
(e) In the case of an article manufactured or produced for purposes
of serving as a prototype for the development of a new or improved
product, the value of the article used shall be determined by: (i) The
retail selling price of such new or improved product when first offered
for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into the
prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered
for sale.
(f) In the case of an article purchased with a direct pay permit
under RCW 82.32.087, the value of the article used shall be determined
by the purchase price of such article if, but for the use of the direct
pay permit, the transaction would have been subject to sales tax;
(3) "Value of the service used" means the purchase price for the
service, the use of which is taxable under this chapter. If the
service is received by gift or under conditions wherein the purchase
price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of the
service used shall be determined as nearly as possible according to the
retail selling price at place of use of similar services of like
quality and character under rules the department may prescribe;
(4) "Value of the extended warranty used" means the purchase price
for the extended warranty, the use of which is taxable under this
chapter. If the extended warranty is received by gift or under
conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
of the extended warranty, the value of the extended warranty used shall
be determined as nearly as possible according to the retail selling
price at place of use of similar extended warranties of like quality
and character under rules the department may prescribe;
(5) "Use," "used," "using," or "put to use" shall have their
ordinary meaning, and shall mean:
(a) With respect to tangible personal property, the first act
within this state by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or
control over the article of tangible personal property (as a consumer),
and include installation, storage, withdrawal from storage,
distribution, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or
consumption within this state; ((and))
(b) With respect to a service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), the
first act within this state after the service has been performed by
which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the
article of tangible personal property upon which the service was
performed (as a consumer), and includes installation, storage,
withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to
subsequent actual use or consumption of the article within this state;
and
(c) With respect to an extended warranty, the first act within this
state after the extended warranty has been acquired by which the
taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of
tangible personal property to which the extended warranty applies, and
includes installation, storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution,
or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption of
the article within this state;
(((5))) (6) "Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included
within the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word "consumer" as
defined in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;
(((6))) (7) "Retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW
82.08.010 and every person engaged in the business of selling tangible
personal property at retail and every person required to collect from
purchasers the tax imposed under this chapter;
(((7))) (8) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.050(7);
(9) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and
82.08 RCW, insofar as applicable, shall have full force and effect with
respect to taxes imposed under the provisions of this chapter.
"Consumer," in addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04
and 82.08 RCW insofar as applicable, shall also mean any person who
distributes or displays, or causes to be distributed or displayed, any
article of tangible personal property, except newspapers, the primary
purpose of which is to promote the sale of products or services. With
respect to property distributed to persons within this state by a
consumer as defined in this subsection (((7))) (9), the use of the
property shall be deemed to be by such consumer.

Sec. 105 RCW 82.12.020 and 2003 c 361 s 302 and 2003 c 168 s 214
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and there shall be collected from every
person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of using within
this state as a consumer: (a) Any article of tangible personal
property purchased at retail, or acquired by lease, gift, repossession,
or bailment, or extracted or produced or manufactured by the person so
using the same, or otherwise furnished to a person engaged in any
business taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) or (7); ((or)) (b) any
prewritten computer software, regardless of the method of delivery, but
excluding prewritten computer software that is either provided free of
charge or is provided for temporary use in viewing information, or
both; or (c) any extended warranty.
(2) This tax shall apply to the use of every extended warranty,
service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a), and
the use of every article of tangible personal property, including
property acquired at a casual or isolated sale, and including
byproducts used by the manufacturer thereof, except as hereinafter
provided, irrespective of whether the article or similar articles are
manufactured or are available for purchase within this state.
(3) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty, or
service taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a), purchased at
retail or acquired by lease, gift, or bailment if the sale to, or the
use by, the present user or his bailor or donor has already been
subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the
tax has been paid by the present user or by his bailor or donor.
(4) Except as provided in this section, payment by one purchaser or
user of tangible personal property, extended warranty, or service of
the tax imposed by chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW shall not have the effect
of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property, extended
warranty, or service from the taxes imposed by such chapters. If the
sale to, or the use by, the present user or his or her bailor or donor
has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this
chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by his or her
bailor or donor; or in respect to the use of property acquired by
bailment and the tax has once been paid based on reasonable rental as
determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by the value of the article at
time of first use multiplied by the tax rate imposed by chapter 82.08
RCW or this chapter as of the time of first use; or in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property acquired by bailment,
if the property was acquired by a previous bailee from the same bailor
for use in the same general activity and the original bailment was
prior to June 9, 1961, the tax imposed by this chapter does not apply.
(5) The tax shall be levied and collected in an amount equal to the
value of the article used, value of the extended warranty used, or
value of the service used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rates in
effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020, except in the case
of a seller required to collect use tax from the purchaser, the tax
shall be collected in an amount equal to the purchase price multiplied
by the rate in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.

Sec. 106 RCW 82.12.0251 and 2003 c 5 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use:
(1) Of any article of tangible personal property, and services that
were rendered in respect to such property, brought into the state of
Washington by a nonresident thereof for his or her use or enjoyment
while temporarily within the state of Washington unless such property
is used in conducting a nontransitory business activity within the
state of Washington;
(2) By a nonresident of Washington of a motor vehicle or trailer
which is registered or licensed under the laws of the state of his or
her residence, and which is not required to be registered or licensed
under the laws of Washington, including motor vehicles or trailers
exempt pursuant to a declaration issued by the department of licensing
under RCW 46.85.060, and services rendered outside the state of
Washington in respect to such property;
(3) Of household goods, personal effects, and private motor
vehicles, and services rendered in respect to such property, by a bona
fide resident of Washington, or nonresident members of the armed forces
who are stationed in Washington pursuant to military orders, if such
articles and services were acquired and used by such person in another
state while a bona fide resident thereof and such acquisition and use
occurred more than ninety days prior to the time he or she entered
Washington. For purposes of this subsection, private motor vehicles
((does [do])) do not include motor homes((.));
(4) Of an extended warranty, to the extent that the property
covered by the extended warranty is exempt under this section from the
tax imposed under this chapter.
For purposes of this section, "state" means a state of the United
States, any political subdivision thereof, the District of Columbia,
and any foreign country or political subdivision thereof, and
"services" means services defined as retail sales in RCW
82.04.050(2)(a).

Sec. 107 RCW 82.12.0255 and 2003 c 5 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty, or
service which the state is prohibited from taxing under the
Constitution of the state or under the Constitution or laws of the
United States.

Sec. 108 RCW 82.12.035 and 2002 c 367 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
A credit shall be allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter
upon the use of tangible personal property, extended warranty, or
services taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a), in the state of
Washington in the amount that the present user thereof or his or her
bailor or donor has paid a retail sales or use tax with respect to such
property, extended warranty, or service to any other state of the
United States, any political subdivision thereof, the District of
Columbia, and any foreign country or political subdivision thereof,
prior to the use of such property, extended warranty, or service in
Washington.

Sec. 109 RCW 82.12.040 and 2003 c 168 s 215 and 2003 c 76 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person who maintains in this state a place of business or
a stock of goods, or engages in business activities within this state,
shall obtain from the department a certificate of registration, and
shall, at the time of making sales of tangible personal property,
extended warranties, or sales of any service defined as a retail sale
in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a), or making transfers of either
possession or title, or both, of tangible personal property for use in
this state, collect from the purchasers or transferees the tax imposed
under this chapter. The tax to be collected under this section shall
be in an amount equal to the purchase price multiplied by the rate in
effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020. For the purposes
of this chapter, the phrase "maintains in this state a place of
business" shall include the solicitation of sales and/or taking of
orders by sales agents or traveling representatives. For the purposes
of this chapter, "engages in business activity within this state"
includes every activity which is sufficient under the Constitution of
the United States for this state to require collection of tax under
this chapter. The department shall in rules specify activities which
constitute engaging in business activity within this state, and shall
keep the rules current with future court interpretations of the
Constitution of the United States.
(2) Every person who engages in this state in the business of
acting as an independent selling agent for persons who do not hold a
valid certificate of registration, and who receives compensation by
reason of sales of tangible personal property, extended warranties, or
sales of any service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a)
or (3)(a), of his or her principals for use in this state, shall, at
the time such sales are made, collect from the purchasers the tax
imposed on the purchase price under this chapter, and for that purpose
shall be deemed a retailer as defined in this chapter.
(3) The tax required to be collected by this chapter shall be
deemed to be held in trust by the retailer until paid to the department
and any retailer who appropriates or converts the tax collected to the
retailer's own use or to any use other than the payment of the tax
provided herein to the extent that the money required to be collected
is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor. In case any seller fails to collect the tax
herein imposed or having collected the tax, fails to pay the same to
the department in the manner prescribed, whether such failure is the
result of the seller's own acts or the result of acts or conditions
beyond the seller's control, the seller shall nevertheless, be
personally liable to the state for the amount of such tax, unless the
seller has taken from the buyer in good faith a copy of a direct pay
permit issued under RCW 82.32.087.
(4) Any retailer who refunds, remits, or rebates to a purchaser, or
transferee, either directly or indirectly, and by whatever means, all
or any part of the tax levied by this chapter shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section,
any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by
this chapter if:
(a) The person's activities in this state, whether conducted
directly or through another person, are limited to:
(i) The storage, dissemination, or display of advertising;
(ii) The taking of orders; or
(iii) The processing of payments; and
(b) The activities are conducted electronically via a web site on
a server or other computer equipment located in Washington that is not
owned or operated by the person making sales into this state nor owned
or operated by an affiliated person. "Affiliated persons" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.424.
(6) Subsection (5) of this section expires when: (a) The United
States congress grants individual states the authority to impose sales
and use tax collection duties on remote sellers; or (b) it is
determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a judgment not
subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use tax collection
duties on remote sellers.

Sec. 110 RCW 82.08.010 and 2004 c 153 s 406 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Selling price" includes "sales price." "Sales price" means
the total amount of consideration, except separately stated trade-in
property of like kind, including cash, credit, property, and services,
for which tangible personal property, extended warranties, or services
defined as a "retail sale" under RCW 82.04.050 are sold, leased, or
rented, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise. No
deduction from the total amount of consideration is allowed for the
following: (a) The seller's cost of the property sold; (b) the cost of
materials used, labor or service cost, interest, losses, all costs of
transportation to the seller, all taxes imposed on the seller, and any
other expense of the seller; (c) charges by the seller for any services
necessary to complete the sale, other than delivery and installation
charges; (d) delivery charges; (e) installation charges; and (f) the
value of exempt tangible personal property given to the purchaser where
taxable and exempt tangible personal property have been bundled
together and sold by the seller as a single product or piece of
merchandise.
When tangible personal property is rented or leased under
circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a
reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the
"selling price" shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.
"Selling price" or "sales price" does not include: Discounts,
including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third
party that are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale;
interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the
sale of tangible personal property, extended warranties, or services,
if the amount is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or
similar document given to the purchaser; and any taxes legally imposed
directly on the consumer that are separately stated on the invoice,
bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser;
(2) "Seller" means every person, including the state and its
departments and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to
a buyer, purchaser, or consumer, whether as agent, broker, or
principal, except "seller" does not mean the state and its departments
and institutions when making sales to the state and its departments and
institutions;
(3) "Buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" include, without limiting
the scope hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in
bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club,
company, joint stock company, business trust, corporation, association,
society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual,
cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise, municipal corporation,
quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its departments and
institutions and all political subdivisions thereof, irrespective of
the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed, and
also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;
(4) "Delivery charges" means charges by the seller of personal
property or services for preparation and delivery to a location
designated by the purchaser of personal property or services including,
but not limited to, transportation, shipping, postage, handling,
crating, and packing;
(5) The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax
year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "sale," "sale at retail,"
"retail sale," "sale at wholesale," "wholesale," "business," "engaging
in business," "cash discount," "successor," "consumer," "in this state"
and "within this state" shall apply equally to the provisions of this
chapter;
(6) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and
under chapter 82.12 RCW, "tangible personal property" means personal
property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched, or that
is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. Tangible personal
property includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten
computer software;
(7) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.050(7).

Sec. 111 RCW 82.14.020 and 2003 c 168 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) A retail sale consisting solely of the sale of tangible
personal property shall be deemed to have occurred at the retail outlet
at or from which delivery is made to the consumer;
(2) A retail sale consisting essentially of the performance of
personal, business, or professional services shall be deemed to have
occurred at the place at which such services were primarily performed,
except that for the performance of a tow truck service, as defined in
RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed to have occurred at the
place of business of the operator of the tow truck service;
(3) A retail sale consisting of the rental of tangible personal
property shall be deemed to have occurred (a) in the case of a rental
involving periodic rental payments, at the place of primary use by the
lessee during the period covered by each payment, or (b) in all other
cases, at the place of first use by the lessee;
(4) A retail sale within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a
retail sale of taxable personal property to be installed by the seller
shall be deemed to have occurred at the place where the labor and
services involved were primarily performed;
(5)(a) A retail sale consisting of the providing to a consumer of
telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than a sale of
tangible personal property under subsection (1) of this section or a
rental of tangible personal property under subsection (3) of this
section or a sale of mobile telecommunications services, shall be
deemed to have occurred at the situs of the telephone or other
instrument through which the telephone service is rendered;
(b) A retail sale consisting of the providing of telecommunications
services shall be sourced in accordance with RCW 82.32.520;
(6) A retail sale of linen and uniform supply services is deemed to
occur as provided in RCW 82.08.0202;
(7) A retail sale consisting of an extended warranty shall be
deemed to have occurred at the business location of the seller if the
extended warranty is received by the purchaser at that location. If an
extended warranty is not received by the purchaser at the business
location of the seller, a retail sale of an extended warranty shall be
deemed to have occurred at the location where receipt by the buyer
occurs;
(8) "City" means a city or town;
(((8))) (9) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters
82.04, 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, insofar as
applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under authority of this chapter;
(((9))) (10) "Taxable event" shall mean any retail sale, or any
use, upon which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08 or
82.12 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That the term shall not include a retail sale taxable pursuant
to RCW 82.08.150, as now or hereafter amended;
(((10))) (11) "Treasurer or other legal depository" shall mean the
treasurer or legal depository of a county or city.

Sec. 112 RCW 82.14.020 and 2003 c 168 s 503 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) A retail sale consisting solely of the sale of tangible
personal property shall be deemed to have occurred at the retail outlet
at or from which delivery is made to the consumer;
(2) A retail sale consisting essentially of the performance of
personal, business, or professional services shall be deemed to have
occurred at the place at which such services were primarily performed,
except that for the performance of a tow truck service, as defined in
RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed to have occurred at the
place of business of the operator of the tow truck service;
(3) A retail sale consisting of the rental of tangible personal
property shall be deemed to have occurred (a) in the case of a rental
involving periodic rental payments, at the primary place of use by the
lessee during the period covered by each payment, or (b) in all other
cases, at the place of first use by the lessee;
(4) A retail sale within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a
retail sale of taxable personal property to be installed by the seller
shall be deemed to have occurred at the place where the labor and
services involved were primarily performed;
(5) A retail sale consisting of the providing of telecommunications
services shall be sourced in accordance with RCW 82.32.520;
(6) A retail sale of linen and uniform supply services is deemed to
occur as provided in RCW 82.08.0202;
(7) A retail sale consisting of an extended warranty shall be
deemed to have occurred at the business location of the seller if the
extended warranty is received by the purchaser at that location. If an
extended warranty is not received by the purchaser at the business
location of the seller, a retail sale of an extended warranty shall be
deemed to have occurred at the location where receipt by the buyer
occurs;
(8) "City" means a city or town;
(((8))) (9) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters
82.04, 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, insofar as
applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under authority of this chapter;
(((9))) (10) "Taxable event" shall mean any retail sale, or any
use, upon which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08 or
82.12 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That the term shall not include a retail sale taxable pursuant
to RCW 82.08.150, as now or hereafter amended;
(((10))) (11) "Treasurer or other legal depository" shall mean the
treasurer or legal depository of a county or city.

Sec. 113 2004 c 153 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) If a court of competent jurisdiction enters a final judgment on
the merits that is based on federal or state law, is no longer subject
to appeal, and substantially limits or impairs the essential elements
of P.L. 106-252, 4 U.S.C. Secs. 116 through 126, or chapter 67, Laws of
2002, then chapter 67, Laws of 2002 is null and void in its entirety.
(2) If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
section 502, chapter 168, Laws of 2003 is null and void.
(3) If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
section 410, chapter 153, Laws of 2004 is null and void.
(4) If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
section 111, chapter ..., Laws of 2005 (section 111 of this act) is
null and void.

PART II
LIQUOR
Sec. 201 RCW 82.08.150 and 2003 c 167 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each retail
sale of spirits in the original package at the rate of fifteen percent
of the selling price. The tax imposed in this subsection shall apply
to all such sales including sales by the Washington state liquor stores
and agencies, but excluding sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
licensees.
(2) There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each sale of
spirits in the original package at the rate of ten percent of the
selling price on sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies
to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(3) There is levied and shall be collected an additional tax upon
each retail sale of spirits in the original package at the rate of one
dollar and seventy-two cents per liter. The additional tax imposed in
this subsection shall apply to all such sales including sales by
Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(4) An additional tax is imposed equal to fourteen percent
multiplied by the taxes payable under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of
this section.
(5) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of seven cents per liter. The
additional tax imposed in this subsection shall apply to all such sales
including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and
including sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(6)(a) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in
the original package at the rate of one and seven-tenths percent of the
selling price through June 30, 1995, two and six-tenths percent of the
selling price for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, and
three and four-tenths of the selling price thereafter. This additional
tax applies to all such sales including sales by Washington state
liquor stores and agencies, but excluding sales to spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant licensees.
(b) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in the
original package at the rate of one and one-tenth percent of the
selling price through June 30, 1995, one and seven-tenths percent of
the selling price for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
and two and three-tenths of the selling price thereafter. This
additional tax applies to all such sales to spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant licensees.
(c) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of twenty cents per liter through
June 30, 1995, thirty cents per liter for the period July 1, 1995,
through June 30, 1997, and forty-one cents per liter thereafter. This
additional tax applies to all such sales including sales by Washington
state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to spirits, beer,
and wine restaurant licensees.
(d) All revenues collected during any month from additional taxes
under this subsection shall be deposited in the health services account
created under RCW 43.72.900 by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month.
(7)(a) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of
spirits in the original package at the rate of one dollar and thirty-three cents per liter. This additional tax applies to all such sales
including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, but
excluding sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(b) All revenues collected during any month from additional taxes
under this section shall be deposited by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month as follows:
(i) 98.0 percent into the general fund;
(ii) 1.85 percent into the health services account created under
RCW 43.72.900; and
(iii) 0.15 percent into the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account created under RCW 69.50.520.
(8) The tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
spirits in the original package.
(((8))) (9) The taxes imposed in this section shall be paid by the
buyer to the seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the
full amount of the tax payable in respect to each taxable sale under
this section. The taxes required by this section to be collected by
the seller shall be stated separately from the selling price and for
purposes of determining the tax due from the buyer to the seller, it
shall be conclusively presumed that the selling price quoted in any
price list does not include the taxes imposed by this section.
(((9))) (10) As used in this section, the terms, "spirits" and
"package" shall have the meaning ascribed to them in chapter 66.04 RCW.

Sec. 202 RCW 69.50.520 and 2004 c 276 s 912 are each amended to
read as follows:
The violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in
the state treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8),
66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(9)(a), 82.08.150 (5) and
(7)(b)(iii), 82.24.020(2), 82.64.020, and section 420, chapter 271,
Laws of 1989 shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for funding services and programs under
chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess.,
including state incarceration costs. Funds from the account may also
be appropriated to reimburse local governments for costs associated
with implementing criminal justice legislation including chapter 338,
Laws of 1997. During the 2003-2005 biennium, funds from the account
may also be used for costs associated with providing grants to local
governments in accordance with chapter 338, Laws of 1997, funding drug
offender treatment services in accordance with RCW 70.96A.350,
maintenance and operating costs of the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs jail reporting system, maintenance and
operating costs of the juvenile rehabilitation administration's client
activity tracking system, civil indigent legal representation,
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces, and grants to community
networks under chapter 70.190 RCW by the family policy council.

PART III
MEAT PROCESSING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Perishable meat products, by slaughtering, breaking, or
processing, if the finished product is a perishable meat product; as to
such persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the value of the
perishable meat products so manufactured, or in the case of a processor
for hire the gross proceeds from such activities, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Meat products, by dehydration, curing, smoking, or any
combination of dehydration, curing, and smoking, if the finished meat
products are not canned; as to such persons the tax imposed shall be
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) Hides, tallow, meat meal, and other similar meat by-products,
if such products are derived in part from animals and manufactured in
a rendering plant licensed under chapter 16.68 RCW; as to such persons
the tax imposed shall be equal to the value of products manufactured
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
selling at wholesale:
(a) Perishable meat products; as to such persons the tax imposed
shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Meat products that have been manufactured by that person by
dehydration, curing, smoking, or any combination of dehydration,
curing, and smoking, if the finished meat products are not canned; as
to such persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds
derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) Hides, tallow, meat meal, and other similar meat by-products if
such products are derived in part from animals and manufactured by the
seller in a rendering plant; as to such persons the tax imposed shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section:
(a) "Animal" means all members of the animal kingdom except humans,
fish, and insects.
(b) "Carcass" means all or any parts, including viscera, of a
slaughtered animal.
(c) "Hide" means any unprocessed animal pelt or skin.
(d) "Fish" means any water-breathing animal, including shellfish.
(e) "Meat products" means products comprised exclusively of animal
carcass, except that meat products includes products such as sausage
and jerky that may contain water; salt; sugar; seasonings; nitrates;
nitrites; acids; binders and extenders; synthetic casings; flavorings
such as soy sauce, liquid smoke, and vinegar; and similar substances.
"Meat products" includes only products that are intended for human
consumption as food or animal consumption as feed. "Meat products"
does not include products containing breading, cheese, rice, beans,
fruits, vegetables, cream, mushrooms, tomato paste, and similar
ingredients.
(f) "Perishable" means having a high risk of spoilage within thirty
days of manufacture without any refrigeration or freezing.
(g) "Rendering plant" means any place of business or location where
dead animals or any part or portion thereof, or packing house refuse,
are processed for the purpose of obtaining the hide, skin, grease
residue, or any other by-product whatsoever.

Sec. 302 RCW 82.04.260 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 4 and 2003 2nd
sp.s. c 1 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Seafood products which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw
salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the value of the products manufactured, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) By canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits and vegetables, or selling at wholesale fresh fruits and
vegetables canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated by the
seller and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who
transports in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state,
the seller shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by
the department and retain the statement as a business record;
(d) Dairy products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in
21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including byproducts
from the manufacturing of the dairy products such as whey and casein;
or selling the same to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course
of business the goods out of state; as to such persons the tax imposed
shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports
in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the seller
shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by the
department and retain the statement as a business record;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business shall be equal
to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent((. This
subsection (1)(e) expires July 1, 2009)); and
(f) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are defined
in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) ((Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5))) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of nuclear fuel assemblies
manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the assemblies multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(((6))) (5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of manufacturing nuclear fuel assemblies, as to such persons
the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the
value of the products manufactured multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(((7))) (6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be
equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.275 percent.
(((8))) (7) Upon every person engaging within this state in
business as an international steamship agent, international customs
house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo
charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo
agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only
international activities shall be equal to the gross income derived
from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(((9))) (8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to
taxation under this subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes
imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject
to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated
activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in
waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities
of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be
loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or
under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a
warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further
movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight
station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or
otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode
of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities
included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading,
unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the
consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode;
documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery,
checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer
of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee;
terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not
limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(((10))) (9) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010;
as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business
shall be equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees
imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3
percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(((11))) (10) Upon every person engaging within this state as an
insurance agent, insurance broker, or insurance solicitor licensed
under chapter 48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with
respect to such licensed activities shall be equal to the gross income
of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(((12))) (11) Upon every person engaging within this state in
business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is
operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its
political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995,
and 1.5 percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection
shall be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.
(((13))) (12)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of
commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, manufactured by
that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the airplanes
or components multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (((13))) (12), "commercial
airplane," "component," and "final assembly of a superefficient
airplane" have the meanings given in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (((13))) (12)
must report as required under RCW 82.32.545.
(e) This subsection (((13))) (12) does not apply after the earlier
of: July 1, 2024; or December 31, 2007, if assembly of a
superefficient airplane does not begin by December 31, 2007, as
determined under RCW 82.32.550.

Sec. 303 RCW 82.04.250 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 2 s 1 and 2003 1st
sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260
(((5))) (4) or (((13))) (12), 82.04.272, or subsection (2) or (3) of
this section; engaging within this state in the business of making
sales at retail, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263 except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, except
persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (12) as to such persons,
the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the
gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of
0.484 percent.
(3) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, that is classified by the federal aviation administration
as a FAR part 145 certificated repair station with airframe and
instrument ratings and limited ratings for nondestructive testing,
radio, Class 3 Accessory, and specialized services, as to such persons,
the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the
gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of .275
percent.

Sec. 304 RCW 82.04.250 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260
(((5))) (4) or (((13))) (12), 82.04.272, or subsection (2) of this
section; engaging within this state in the business of making sales at
retail, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (12), as
to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by
the rate of 0.484 percent.

Sec. 305 RCW 82.32.545 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person who reports taxes under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (12)
or who claims an exemption or credit under RCW 82.04.4461, 82.08.980,
82.12.980, 82.29A.137, 84.36.655, and 82.04.4463 shall make an annual
report to the department detailing employment, wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits per job at the manufacturing
site. The report shall not include names of employees. The report
shall also detail employment by the total number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions. The first report filed under this
subsection shall include employment, wage, and benefit information for
the twelve-month period immediately before first use of a preferential
tax rate under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (12), or tax exemption or credit
under RCW 82.04.4461, 82.08.980, 82.12.980, 82.29A.137, 84.36.655, and
82.04.4463. The report is due by March 31st following any year in
which a preferential tax rate under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (12) is used,
or tax exemption or credit under RCW 82.04.4461, 82.08.980, 82.12.980,
82.29A.137, 84.36.655, and 82.04.4463 is taken. This information is
not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may
be disclosed to the public upon request.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection by the due date of the report, the department shall declare
the amount of taxes exempted or credited, or reduced in the case of the
preferential business and occupation tax rate, for that year to be
immediately due and payable. Excise taxes payable under this
subsection are subject to interest but not penalties, as provided under
this chapter. This information is not subject to the confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon
request.
(3) By November 1, 2010, and by November 1, 2023, the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate, in
consultation with the department, shall report to the legislature on
the effectiveness of chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. in regard to
keeping Washington competitive. The report shall measure the effect of
chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. on job retention, net jobs
created for Washington residents, company growth, diversification of
the state's economy, cluster dynamics, and other factors as the
committees select. The reports shall include a discussion of
principles to apply in evaluating whether the legislature should
reenact any or all of the tax preferences in chapter 1, Laws of 2003
2nd sp. sess.

Sec. 306 RCW 82.32.550 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 17 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. takes effect on the
first day of the month in which the governor and a manufacturer of
commercial airplanes sign a memorandum of agreement regarding an
affirmative final decision to site a significant commercial airplane
final assembly facility in Washington state. The department shall
provide notice of the effective date of chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp.
sess. to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed
appropriate by the department.
(b) Chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. is contingent upon the
siting of a significant commercial airplane final assembly facility in
the state of Washington. If a memorandum of agreement under subsection
(1) of this section is not signed by June 30, 2005, chapter 1, Laws of
2003 2nd sp. sess. is null and void.
(c)(i) The department shall make a determination regarding the date
final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington state.
The rates in RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (12) (a)(ii) and (b)(ii) take effect
the first day of the month such assembly begins, or July 1, 2007,
whichever is later. The department shall provide notice of the
effective date of such rates to affected taxpayers, the legislature,
and others as deemed appropriate by the department.
(ii) If on December 31, 2007, final assembly of a superefficient
airplane has not begun in Washington state, the department shall
provide notice of such to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and
others as deemed appropriate by the department.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Commercial airplane" has its ordinary meaning, which is an
airplane certified by the federal aviation administration for
transporting persons or property, and any military derivative of such
an airplane.
(b) "Component" means a part or system certified by the federal
aviation administration for installation or assembly into a commercial
airplane.
(c) "Final assembly of a superefficient airplane" means the
activity of assembling an airplane from components parts necessary for
its mechanical operation such that the finished commercial airplane is
ready to deliver to the ultimate consumer.
(d) "Significant commercial airplane final assembly facility" means
a location with the capacity to produce at least thirty-six
superefficient airplanes a year.
(e) "Siting" means a final decision by a manufacturer to locate a
significant commercial airplane final assembly facility in Washington
state.
(f) "Superefficient airplane" means a twin aisle airplane that
carries between two hundred and three hundred fifty passengers, with a
range of more than seven thousand two hundred nautical miles, a
cruising speed of approximately mach .85, and that uses fifteen to
twenty percent less fuel than other similar airplanes on the market.

Sec. 307 RCW 48.14.080 and 1998 c 312 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
As to insurers, other than title insurers and taxpayers under RCW
48.14.0201, the taxes imposed by this title shall be in lieu of all
other taxes, except taxes on real and tangible personal property,
excise taxes on the sale, purchase or use of such property, and the tax
imposed in RCW 82.04.260(((12))) (11).

Sec. 308 RCW 82.04.440 and 2004 c 174 s 5 and 2004 c 24 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in activities ((which are within the
purview of the provisions of two or more of sections)) that are
subject to tax under two or more provisions of RCW 82.04.230 to
82.04.298, inclusive, shall be taxable under each ((paragraph))
provision applicable to ((the)) those activities ((engaged in)).
(2) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.2909(2), 82.04.250, 82.04.270,
((or)) 82.04.260 (4) or (((13))) (12), or section 301(2) of this act,
with respect to selling products in this state shall be allowed a
credit against those taxes for any (a) manufacturing taxes paid with
respect to the manufacturing of products so sold in this state, and/or
(b) extracting taxes paid with respect to the extracting of products so
sold in this state or ingredients of products so sold in this state.
Extracting taxes taken as credit under subsection (3) of this section
may also be taken under this subsection, if otherwise allowable under
this subsection. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the sale of those
products.
(3) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.240 or 82.04.260(1)(b) shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with
respect to extracting the ingredients of the products so manufactured
in this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the manufacturing
of those products.
(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1),
((or)) 82.04.260 (1), (2), (((4), (6), or (13))) (5), or (12), or
section 301(1) of this act, with respect to extracting or manufacturing
products in this state shall be allowed a credit against those taxes
for any (i) gross receipts taxes paid to another state with respect to
the sales of the products so extracted or manufactured in this state,
(ii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the manufacturing of
products using ingredients so extracted in this state, or (iii)
manufacturing taxes paid with respect to manufacturing activities
completed in another state for products so manufactured in this state.
The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax liability arising
under this chapter with respect to the extraction or manufacturing of
those products.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of
business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the
tax an income tax or value added tax; and
(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately
stated from the sales price.
(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the
United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of
such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign
country or political subdivision thereof.
(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and
includes (i) the taxes imposed in RCW 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1), ((and))
82.04.260 (1), (2), (((4), and (13))) (5), and (12), and section 301(1)
of this act, and (ii) similar gross receipts taxes paid to other
states.
(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act
or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes the
tax imposed in RCW 82.04.230 and similar gross receipts taxes paid to
other states.
(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used
in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through
82.04.212, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of
describing taxes imposed by other states.

Sec. 309 RCW 82.04.298 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 9 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The amount of tax with respect to a qualified grocery
distribution cooperative's sales of groceries or related goods for
resale, excluding items subject to tax under ((RCW 82.04.260(4)))
section 301 of this act, to customer-owners of the grocery distribution
cooperative is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the grocery
distribution cooperative multiplied by the rate of one and one-half
percent.
(2) A qualified grocery distribution cooperative is allowed a
deduction from the gross proceeds of sales of groceries or related
goods for resale, excluding items subject to tax under ((RCW
82.04.260(4))) section 301 of this act, to customer-owners of the
grocery distribution cooperative that is equal to the portion of the
gross proceeds of sales for resale that represents the actual cost of
the merchandise sold by the grocery distribution cooperative to
customer-owners.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Grocery distribution cooperative" means an entity that sells
groceries and related items to customer-owners of the grocery
distribution cooperative and has customer-owners, in the aggregate, who
own a majority of the outstanding ownership interests of the grocery
distribution cooperative or of the entity controlling the grocery
distribution cooperative. "Grocery distribution cooperative" includes
an entity that controls a grocery distribution cooperative.
(b) "Qualified grocery distribution cooperative" means a grocery
distribution cooperative that has been determined by a court of record
of the state of Washington to be not engaged in wholesaling or making
sales at wholesale, within the meaning of RCW 82.04.270 or any similar
provision of a municipal ordinance that imposes a tax on gross
receipts, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income, with respect to
purchases made by customer-owners, and subsequently changes its form of
doing business to make sales at wholesale of groceries or related items
to its customer-owners.
(c) "Customer-owner" means a person who has an ownership interest
in a grocery distribution cooperative and purchases groceries and
related items at wholesale from that grocery distribution cooperative.
(d) "Controlling" means holding fifty percent or more of the voting
interests of an entity and having at least equal power to direct or
cause the direction of the management and policies of the entity,
whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or
otherwise.

Sec. 310 RCW 82.04.290 and 2004 c 174 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal
to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business
multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business
activity other than or in addition to those enumerated in RCW
82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250, 82.04.255, 82.04.260, 82.04.270,
82.04.298, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280, 82.04.2907, 82.04.272, 82.04.2906,
((and)) 82.04.2908, and section 301 of this act, and subsection (1) of
this section; as to such persons the amount of tax on account of such
activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section includes, among others, and
without limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to materials
used in the performance of such business passes to another by
accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged
in the business of rendering any type of service which does not
constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of
advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials
furnished to an agent by his principal or supplier to be used for
informational, educational and promotional purposes shall not be
considered a part of the agent's remuneration or commission and shall
not be subject to taxation under this section.

PART IV
NURSING HOME MAINTENANCE FEE
Sec. 401 RCW 82.71.020 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 16 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other tax, a quality maintenance fee is
imposed on every operator of a nonexempt nursing facility in this
state. The quality maintenance fee shall be:
(a) Six dollars and fifty cents per patient day through June 30,
2005;
(b) Four dollars and fifty cents per patient day for the period
July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;
(c) Three dollars per patient day for the period July 1, 2007,
through June 30, 2009; and
(d) One dollar and fifty cents per patient day for the period July
1, 2009, through June 30, 2011.
(2) Each operator of a nonexempt nursing facility shall file a
return with the department on a monthly basis. The return shall
include the following:
(a) The number of patient days for nonexempt nursing facilities
operated by that person in that month; and
(b) Remittance of the nonexempt nursing facility operator's quality
maintenance fee for that month.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2011.

Sec. 402 2003 1st sp.s. c 16 s 6 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Sections 1 through 5 of this act)) RCW 82.71.010, 82.71.020,
82.71.030, 74.46.091, and 74.46.535 shall expire on the effective date
that federal medicaid matching funds are substantially reduced or that
a federal sanction is imposed due to the quality maintenance fee under
((section 2 of this act)) RCW 82.71.020, as such date is certified by
the secretary of social and health services.
(2) The expiration of ((sections 1 through 5 of this act)) RCW
82.71.010, 82.71.020, 82.71.030, 74.46.091, and 74.46.535 shall not be
construed as affecting any existing right acquired or liability or
obligation incurred under those sections or under any rule or order
adopted under those sections, nor as affecting any proceeding
instituted under those sections.

PART V
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 Section 303 of this act expires July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 Section 304 of this act takes effect July
1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 Sections 101 through 111, 201, 202, 401,
and 402 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and
its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 Sections 301 through 303 and 305 through
310 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and
its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---