BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35A.14.380 and 1981 c 332 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a portion of a fire protection district including at least
((sixty)) forty-five percent of the assessed valuation of the real
property of the district is annexed to or incorporated into a code
city, ownership of all of the assets of the district shall be vested in
the code city, upon payment in cash, properties or contracts for fire
protection services to the district within one year, of a percentage of
the value of said assets equal to the percentage of the value of the
real property in the entire district remaining outside the incorporated
or annexed area.
The fire protection district may elect, by a vote of a majority of
the persons residing outside the annexed area who vote on the
proposition, to require the annexing code city to assume responsibility
for the provision of fire protection, and for the operation and
maintenance of the district's property, facilities, and equipment
throughout the district and to pay the code city a reasonable fee for
such fire protection, operation, and maintenance.

Sec. 2 RCW 35A.14.400 and 1989 c 267 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a portion of a fire protection district including less than
((sixty)) forty-five percent of the assessed value of the real property
of the district is annexed to or incorporated into a code city, the
ownership of all assets of the district shall remain in the district
and the district shall pay to the code city within one year or within
such period of time as the district continues to collect taxes in such
incorporated or annexed areas, in cash, properties or contracts for
fire protection services, a percentage of the value of said assets
equal to the percentage of the value of the real property in the entire
district lying within the area so incorporated or annexed: PROVIDED,
That if less than five percent of the area of the district is affected,
no payment shall be made to the code city except as provided in RCW
35.02.205. The fire protection district shall provide fire protection
to the incorporated or annexed area for such period as the district
continues to collect taxes levied in such annexed or incorporated area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---