BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I - VEHICLE FUEL TAXES
Sec. 101 RCW 82.36.025 and 2003 c 361 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A motor vehicle fuel tax rate of twenty-three cents per gallon
applies to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative motor
vehicle fuel tax rate of five cents per gallon applies to the sale,
distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel. This subsection (2)
expires when the bonds issued for transportation 2003 projects are
retired.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2005, an additional and cumulative motor
vehicle fuel tax rate of three cents per gallon applies to the sale,
distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2006, an additional and cumulative motor
vehicle fuel tax rate of three cents per gallon applies to the sale,
distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2007, an additional and cumulative motor
vehicle fuel tax rate of two cents per gallon applies to the sale,
distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.
(6) Beginning July 1, 2008, an additional and cumulative motor
vehicle fuel tax rate of one and one-half cents per gallon applies to
the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.

Sec. 102 RCW 82.38.030 and 2003 c 361 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and imposed upon special fuel users a
tax at the rate of twenty-three cents per gallon of special fuel, or
each one hundred cubic feet of compressed natural gas, measured at
standard pressure and temperature.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of five cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic
feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel users. This subsection
(2) expires when the bonds issued for transportation 2003 projects are
retired.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2005, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of three cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic
feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel users.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2006, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of three cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic
feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel users.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2007, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of two cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic feet
of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel users.
(6) Beginning July 1, 2008, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of one and one-half cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one
hundred cubic feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard
pressure and temperature shall be imposed on special fuel users.
(7) Taxes are imposed when:
(a) Special fuel is removed in this state from a terminal if the
special fuel is removed at the rack unless the removal is to a licensed
exporter for direct delivery to a destination outside of the state, or
the removal is to a special fuel distributor for direct delivery to an
international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320;
(b) Special fuel is removed in this state from a refinery if either
of the following applies:
(i) The removal is by bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of
the special fuel immediately before the removal is not a licensee; or
(ii) The removal is at the refinery rack unless the removal is to
a licensed exporter for direct delivery to a destination outside of the
state, or the removal is to a special fuel distributor for direct
delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW
82.38.320;
(c) Special fuel enters into this state for sale, consumption, use,
or storage if either of the following applies:
(i) The entry is by bulk transfer and the importer is not a
licensee; or
(ii) The entry is not by bulk transfer;
(d) Special fuel is sold or removed in this state to an unlicensed
entity unless there was a prior taxable removal, entry, or sale of the
special fuel;
(e) Blended special fuel is removed or sold in this state by the
blender of the fuel. The number of gallons of blended special fuel
subject to tax is the difference between the total number of gallons of
blended special fuel removed or sold and the number of gallons of
previously taxed special fuel used to produce the blended special fuel;
(f) Dyed special fuel is used on a highway, as authorized by the
internal revenue code, unless the use is exempt from the special fuel
tax;
(g) Dyed special fuel is held for sale, sold, used, or is intended
to be used in violation of this chapter;
(h) Special fuel purchased by an international fuel tax agreement
licensee under RCW 82.38.320 is used on a highway; and
(i) Special fuel is sold by a licensed special fuel supplier to a
special fuel distributor, special fuel importer, or special fuel
blender and the special fuel is not removed from the bulk transfer-terminal system.
(((4))) (8) The tax imposed by this chapter, if required to be
collected by the licensee, is held in trust by the licensee until paid
to the department, and a licensee who appropriates or converts the tax
collected to his or her own use or to any use other than the payment of
the tax to the extent that the money required to be collected is not
available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is
guilty of a felony, or gross misdemeanor in accordance with the theft
and anticipatory provisions of Title 9A RCW. A person, partnership,
corporation, or corporate officer who fails to collect the tax imposed
by this section, or who has collected the tax and fails to pay it to
the department in the manner prescribed by this chapter, is personally
liable to the state for the amount of the tax.

Sec. 103 RCW 46.68.090 and 2003 c 361 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle
fund from the motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax shall be
first expended for purposes enumerated in (a) and (b) of this
subsection. The remaining net tax amount shall be distributed monthly
by the state treasurer in accordance with subsections (2)((, (3), and
(4))) through (7) of this section.
(a) For payment of refunds of motor vehicle fuel tax and special
fuel tax that has been paid and is refundable as provided by law;
(b) For payment of amounts to be expended pursuant to
appropriations for the administrative expenses of the offices of state
treasurer, state auditor, and the department of licensing of the state
of Washington in the administration of the motor vehicle fuel tax and
the special fuel tax, which sums shall be distributed monthly.
(2) All of the remaining net tax amount collected under RCW
82.36.025(1) and 82.38.030(1) shall be distributed as set forth in (a)
through (j) of this section.
(a) For distribution to the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
44.387 percent to be expended for highway purposes of the state as
defined in RCW 46.68.130;
(b) For distribution to the special category C account, hereby
created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount equal to 3.2609 percent to
be expended for special category C projects. Special category C
projects are category C projects that, due to high cost only, will
require bond financing to complete construction.
The following criteria, listed in order of priority, shall be used
in determining which special category C projects have the highest
priority:
(i) Accident experience;
(ii) Fatal accident experience;
(iii) Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable
speeds without undue congestion; and
(iv) Continuity of development of the highway transportation
network.
Moneys deposited in the special category C account in the motor
vehicle fund may be used for payment of debt service on bonds the
proceeds of which are used to finance special category C projects under
this subsection (2)(b);
(c) For distribution to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3283 percent;
(d) For distribution to the Puget Sound capital construction
account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3726 percent;
(e) For distribution to the urban arterial trust account in the
motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 7.5597 percent;
(f) For distribution to the transportation improvement account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 5.6739 percent and expended
in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;
(g) For distribution to the cities and towns from the motor vehicle
fund an amount equal to 10.6961 percent in accordance with RCW
46.68.110;
(h) For distribution to the counties from the motor vehicle fund an
amount equal to 19.2287 percent: (i) Out of which there shall be
distributed from time to time, as directed by the department of
transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out the
provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to
the county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW
47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed
monthly as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW
46.68.120;
(i) For distribution to the county arterial preservation account,
hereby created in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 1.9565
percent. These funds shall be distributed by the county road
administration board to counties in proportions corresponding to the
number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each
county and shall be used for improvements to sustain the structural,
safety, and operational integrity of county arterials. The county road
administration board shall adopt reasonable rules and develop policies
to implement this program and to assure that a pavement management
system is used;
(j) For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in the
motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.5363 percent and expended in
accordance with RCW 36.79.020.
(3) ((One hundred percent of)) The remaining net tax amount
collected under RCW 82.36.025(2) and 82.38.030(2) shall be distributed
to the transportation 2003 account (nickel account).
(4) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(3)
and 82.38.030(3) shall be distributed as follows:
(a) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to the incorporated cities
and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;
(b) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to counties of the state in
accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and
(c) The remainder shall be distributed to the transportation
partnership account created in section 104 of this act.
(5) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(4)
and 82.38.030(4) shall be distributed as follows:
(a) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to the incorporated cities
and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;
(b) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to counties of the state in
accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and
(c) The remainder shall be distributed to the transportation
partnership account created in section 104 of this act.
(6) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025 (5)
and (6) and 82.38.030 (5) and (6) shall be distributed to the
transportation partnership account created in section 104 of this act.
(7) Nothing in this section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so
as to violate any terms or conditions contained in any highway
construction bond issues now or hereafter authorized by statute and
whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid from any excise
taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 A new section is added to chapter 46.68
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The transportation partnership account is hereby created in the
state treasury. All distributions to the account from RCW 46.68.090
must be deposited into the account. Money in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used
only for projects or improvements identified as 2005 transportation
partnership projects or improvements in the omnibus transportation
appropriations act, including any principal and interest on bonds
authorized for the projects or improvements.
(2) If a regional transportation plan has not been adopted by
January 2007, the legislature intends to reprioritize allocation of
funding for the projects identified on the 2005 transportation
partnership project list so that complete and functioning
transportation projects can be constructed in a reasonable time.
(3) By January 1, 2006, the transportation performance audit board
must develop performance measures and benchmarks for the evaluation of
the expenditures of the transportation partnership account. The board
must also develop an audit plan and schedule for audits of the
performance of the department of transportation's delivery of the plan
as defined by project list, schedule, and budget enacted by the
legislature.
(4) The legislature finds that:
(a) Citizens demand and deserve accountability of transportation-related programs and expenditures. Transportation-related programs
must continuously improve in quality, efficiency, and effectiveness in
order to increase public trust;
(b) Transportation-related agencies that receive tax dollars must
continuously improve the way they operate and deliver services so
citizens receive maximum value for their tax dollars; and
(c) Fair, independent, comprehensive performance audits of
transportation-related agencies overseen by the elected state auditor
are essential to improving the efficiency, economy, and effectiveness
of the state's transportation system.
(5) For purposes of this act:
(a) "Performance audit" means an objective and systematic
assessment of a state agency or agencies or any of their programs,
functions, or activities by the state auditor or designee in order to
help improve agency efficiency, effectiveness, and accountability.
Performance audits include economy and efficiency audits and program
audits.
(b) "Transportation-related agency" means any state agency, board,
or commission that receives funding primarily for transportation-related purposes. At a minimum, the department of transportation, the
transportation improvement board or its successor entity, the county
road administration board or its successor entity, and the traffic
safety commission are considered transportation-related agencies. The
Washington state patrol and the department of licensing shall not be
considered transportation-related agencies under this act.
(6) Within the authorities and duties under chapter 43.09 RCW, the
state auditor shall establish criteria and protocols for performance
audits. Transportation-related agencies shall be audited using
criteria that include generally accepted government auditing standards
as well as legislative mandates and performance objectives established
by state agencies. Mandates include, but are not limited to, agency
strategies, timelines, program objectives, and mission and goals as
required in RCW 43.88.090.
(7) Within the authorities and duties under chapter 43.09 RCW, the
state auditor may conduct performance audits for transportation-related
agencies. The state auditor shall contract with private firms to
conduct the performance audits.
(8) The audits may include:
(a) Identification of programs and services that can be eliminated,
reduced, consolidated, or enhanced;
(b) Identification of funding sources to the transportation-related
agency, to programs, and to services that can be eliminated, reduced,
consolidated, or enhanced;
(c) Analysis of gaps and overlaps in programs and services and
recommendations for improving, dropping, blending, or separating
functions to correct gaps or overlaps;
(d) Analysis and recommendations for pooling information technology
systems used within the transportation-related agency, and evaluation
of information processing and telecommunications policy, organization,
and management;
(e) Analysis of the roles and functions of the transportation-related agency, its programs, and its services and their compliance
with statutory authority and recommendations for eliminating or
changing those roles and functions and ensuring compliance with
statutory authority;
(f) Recommendations for eliminating or changing statutes, rules,
and policy directives as may be necessary to ensure that the
transportation-related agency carry out reasonably and properly those
functions vested in the agency by statute;
(g) Verification of the reliability and validity of transportation-related agency performance data, self-assessments, and performance
measurement systems as required under RCW 43.88.090;
(h) Identification of potential cost savings in the transportation-related agency, its programs, and its services;
(i) Identification and recognition of best practices;
(j) Evaluation of planning, budgeting, and program evaluation
policies and practices;
(k) Evaluation of personnel systems operation and management;
(l) Evaluation of purchasing operations and management policies and
practices;
(m) Evaluation of organizational structure and staffing levels,
particularly in terms of the ratio of managers and supervisors to
nonmanagement personnel; and
(n) Evaluation of transportation-related project costs, including
but not limited to environmental mitigation, competitive bidding
practices, permitting processes, and capital project management.
(9) Within the authorities and duties under chapter 43.09 RCW, the
state auditor must provide the preliminary performance audit reports to
the audited state agency for comment. The auditor also may seek input
on the preliminary report from other appropriate officials. Comments
must be received within thirty days after receipt of the preliminary
performance audit report unless a different time period is approved by
the state auditor. The final performance audit report shall include
the objectives, scope, and methodology; the audit results, including
findings and recommendations; the agency's response and conclusions;
and identification of best practices.
(10) The state auditor shall provide final performance audit
reports to the citizens of Washington, the governor, the joint
legislative audit and review committee, the transportation performance
audit board, the appropriate legislative committees, and other
appropriate officials. Final performance audit reports shall be posted
on the internet.
(11) The audited transportation-related agency is responsible for
follow-up and corrective action on all performance audit findings and
recommendations. The audited agency's plan for addressing each audit
finding and recommendation shall be included in the final audit report.
The plan shall provide the name of the contact person responsible for
each action, the action planned, and the anticipated completion date.
If the audited agency does not agree with the audit findings and
recommendations or believes action is not required, then the action
plan shall include an explanation and specific reasons.
The office of financial management shall require periodic progress
reports from the audited agency until all resolution has occurred. The
office of financial management is responsible for achieving audit
resolution. The office of financial management shall annually report
by December 31st the status of performance audit resolution to the
appropriate legislative committees and the state auditor. The
legislature shall consider the performance audit results in connection
with the state budget process.
The auditor may request status reports on specific audits or
findings.
(12) For the period from July 1, 2005, until June 30, 2007, the
amount of $4,000,000 is appropriated from the transportation
partnership account to the state auditors office for the purposes of
subsections (4) through (11) of this section.
(13) When appointing the citizen members with performance
measurement expertise to the transportation performance audit board,
the governor shall appoint the state auditor, or his or her designee.
(14) If the state auditor's financial audit of a transportation-related agency implies that a performance audit is warranted, the
transportation performance audit board shall include in its annual work
plan the performance audit recommended by the state auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 A new section is added to chapter 46.68
RCW to read as follows:
The freight mobility investment account is hereby created in the
state treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
freight mobility projects identified in the omnibus transportation
appropriations act, including any principal and interest on bonds
authorized for the projects or improvements.

Sec. 106 RCW 46.68.110 and 2003 c 361 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
Funds credited to the incorporated cities and towns of the state as
set forth in RCW 46.68.090(((2)(g))) shall be subject to deduction and
distribution as follows:
(1) One and one-half percent of such sums distributed under RCW
46.68.090(((2)(g))) shall be deducted monthly as such sums are credited
and set aside for the use of the department of transportation for the
supervision of work and expenditures of such incorporated cities and
towns on the city and town streets thereof, including the supervision
and administration of federal-aid programs for which the department of
transportation has responsibility: PROVIDED, That any moneys so
retained and not expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium
to the incorporated cities and towns in proportion to deductions herein
made;
(2) Thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent of such funds
distributed under RCW 46.68.090(((2)(g))) shall be deducted monthly, as
such funds accrue, and set aside for the use of the department of
transportation for the purpose of funding the cities' share of the
costs of highway jurisdiction studies and other studies. Any funds so
retained and not expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium
to the cities in proportion to the deductions made;
(3) One percent of such funds distributed under RCW
46.68.090(((2)(g))) shall be deducted monthly, as such funds accrue, to
be deposited in the urban arterial trust account, to implement the city
hardship assistance program, as provided in RCW 47.26.164. However,
any moneys so retained and not required to carry out the program as of
July 1st of each odd-numbered year thereafter, shall be provided within
sixty days to the treasurer and distributed in the manner prescribed in
subsection (5) of this section;
(4) After making the deductions under subsections (1) through (3)
of this section and RCW 35.76.050, 31.86 percent of the fuel tax
distributed to the cities and towns in RCW 46.68.090(((2)(g))) shall be
allocated to the incorporated cities and towns in the manner set forth
in subsection (5) of this section and subject to deductions in
subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, subject to RCW
35.76.050, to be used exclusively for: The construction, improvement,
chip sealing, seal-coating, and repair for arterial highways and city
streets as those terms are defined in RCW 46.04.030 and 46.04.120; the
maintenance of arterial highways and city streets for those cities with
a population of less than fifteen thousand; or the payment of any
municipal indebtedness which may be incurred in the construction,
improvement, chip sealing, seal-coating, and repair of arterial
highways and city streets; and
(5) The balance remaining to the credit of incorporated cities and
towns after such deduction shall be apportioned monthly as such funds
accrue among the several cities and towns within the state ratably on
the basis of the population last determined by the office of financial
management.

Sec. 107 RCW 82.38.035 and 2003 c 361 s 405 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A licensed supplier shall remit tax on special fuel to the
department as provided in RCW 82.38.030(((3)(a))) (7)(a). On a two-party exchange, or buy-sell agreement between two licensed suppliers,
the receiving exchange partner or buyer shall remit the tax.
(2) A refiner shall remit tax to the department on special fuel
removed from a refinery as provided in RCW 82.38.030(((3)(b))) (7)(b).
(3) An importer shall remit tax to the department on special fuel
imported into this state as provided in RCW 82.38.030(((3)(c))) (7)(c).
(4) A blender shall remit tax to the department on the removal or
sale of blended special fuel as provided in RCW 82.38.030(((3)(e)))
(7)(e).
(5) A dyed special fuel user shall remit tax to the department on
the use of dyed special fuel as provided in RCW 82.38.030(((3)(f)))
(7)(f).

Sec. 108 RCW 82.38.045 and 1998 c 176 s 54 are each amended to
read as follows:
A terminal operator is jointly and severally liable for remitting
the tax imposed under RCW 82.38.030(((1))) if, at the time of removal:
(1) The position holder with respect to the special fuel is a
person other than the terminal operator and is not a licensee;
(2) The terminal operator is not a licensee;
(3) The position holder has an expired internal revenue service
notification certificate issued under chapter 26, C.F.R. Part 48; or
(4) The terminal operator had reason to believe that information on
the notification certificate was false.

Sec. 109 RCW 43.84.092 and 2003 c 361 s 602, 2003 c 324 s 1, 2003
c 150 s 2, and 2003 c 48 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, the
emergency reserve fund, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the freight mobility
investment account, the health services account, the public health
services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the state higher education construction
account, the higher education construction account, the highway
infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
transportation partnership account, the tuition recovery trust fund,
the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 110 RCW 43.84.092 and 2004 c 242 s 60 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, the
emergency reserve fund, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the freight mobility
investment account, the health services account, the public health
services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the state higher education construction
account, the higher education construction account, the highway
infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
transportation partnership account, the tuition recovery trust fund,
the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 A new section is added to chapter 46.68
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2007, and each year thereafter, the state
treasurer shall transfer five million dollars from the multimodal
account to the transportation infrastructure account created under RCW
82.44.190. The funds must be distributed for rail capital improvements
only.

PART II - FEES ADMINISTERED ACCORDING TO VEHICLE WEIGHT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 (1) There shall be paid and collected
annually for motor vehicles subject to the fee under RCW 46.16.0621,
except motor homes, a vehicle weight fee. The amount of the fee shall
be based upon the vehicle scale weight, which is correlated with
vehicle size and roadway lane usage. Fees imposed under this section
must be used for transportation purposes, and shall not be used for the
general support of state government. The vehicle weight fee shall be
that portion of the fee as reflected on the scale weight set forth in
schedule B provided in RCW 46.16.070 that is in excess of the fee
imposed under RCW 46.16.0621. This fee is due at the time of initial
and renewal of vehicle registration.
(2) If the resultant weight according to this section is not listed
in schedule B provided in RCW 46.16.070, it shall be increased to the
next higher weight pursuant to chapter 46.44 RCW.
(3) For the purpose of administering this section, the department
shall rely on the vehicle empty scale weights as provided by vehicle
manufacturers, or other sources defined by the department, to determine
the weight of each vehicle. The department shall adopt rules for
determining weight for vehicles without manufacturer empty scale
weights.
(4) The vehicle weight fee under this section is imposed to provide
funds to mitigate the impact of vehicle loads on the state roads and
highways and is separate and distinct from other vehicle license fees.
Proceeds from the fee may be used for transportation purposes, or for
facilities and activities that reduce the number of vehicles or load
weights on the state roads and highways.
(5) The vehicle weight fee collected under this section shall be
deposited as follows:
(a) On July 1, 2006, six million dollars shall be deposited into
the freight mobility investment account created in section 105 of this
act, and the remainder collected from the effective date of this
section, through June 30, 2006, shall be deposited into the multimodal
transportation account;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2007, and every July 1st thereafter, three
million dollars shall be deposited into the freight mobility investment
account created in section 105 of this act, and the remainder shall be
deposited into the multimodal transportation account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 In addition to any other fees or charges,
there shall be paid and collected annually for motor homes a vehicle
weight fee of seventy-five dollars. This fee is due at the time of
initial and renewal of vehicle registration. The fee collected under
this section shall be deposited in the multimodal transportation
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 46.16
RCW to read as follows:
In lieu of the license tab fees provided in RCW 46.16.0621, private
use single-axle trailers of two thousand pounds scale weight or less
may be licensed upon the payment of a license fee in the sum of fifteen
dollars, but only if the trailer is operated upon public highways. The
license fee must be collected annually for each registration year or
fraction of a registration year. This reduced license fee applies only
to trailers operated for personal use of the owners, and not trailers
held for rental to the public or used in any commercial or business
endeavor. The proceeds from the fees collected under this section
shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 46.68.035.

Sec. 204 RCW 46.16.070 and 2003 c 361 s 201 and 2003 c 1 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In lieu of all other vehicle licensing fees, unless
specifically exempt, and in addition to the mileage fees prescribed for
buses and stages in RCW 46.16.125, there shall be paid and collected
annually for each truck, motor truck, truck tractor, road tractor,
tractor, bus, auto stage, or for hire vehicle with seating capacity of
more than six, based upon the declared combined gross weight or
declared gross weight under chapter 46.44 RCW, the following licensing
fees by ((such gross)) weight:

((DECLARED GROSS)) WEIGHT SCHEDULE A SCHEDULE B

4,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((30.00))
40.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((30.00))
40.00

6,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((30.00)) . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((30.00))

50.00 50.00

8,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((30.00)) . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((30.00))

60.00 60.00

10,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 62.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 62.00

12,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 79.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 79.00

14,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 90.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 90.00

16,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 102.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 102.00

18,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 154.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 154.00

20,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 171.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 171.00

22,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 185.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 185.00

24,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200.00

26,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 211.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 211.00

28,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 249.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 249.00

30,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 287.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 287.00

32,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 346.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 346.00

34,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 368.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 368.00

36,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 399.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 399.00

38,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 438.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 438.00

40,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 501.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 501.00

42,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 521.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 611.00

44,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 532.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 622.00

46,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 572.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 662.00

48,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 596.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 686.00

50,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 647.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 737.00

52,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 680.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 770.00

54,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 734.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 824.00

56,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 775.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 865.00

58,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 806.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 896.00

60,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 859.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 949.00

62,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 921.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,011.00

64,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 941.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,031.00

66,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,048.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,138.00

68,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,093.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,183.00

70,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,177.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,267.00

72,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,259.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,349.00

74,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,368.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,458.00

76,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,478.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,568.00

78,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,614.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,704.00

80,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,742.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,832.00

82,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,863.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,953.00

84,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,983.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,073.00

86,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,104.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,194.00

88,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,225.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,315.00

90,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,346.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,436.00

92,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,466.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,556.00

94,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,587.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,677.00

96,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,708.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,798.00

98,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,829.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,919.00

100,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,949.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,039.00

102,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,070.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,160.00

104,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,191.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,281.00

105,500 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,312.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,402.00

Schedule A applies to vehicles either used exclusively for hauling
logs or that do not tow trailers. Schedule B applies to vehicles that
tow trailers and are not covered under Schedule A.
Every truck, motor truck, truck tractor, and tractor exceeding
6,000 pounds empty scale weight registered under chapter 46.16, 46.87,
or 46.88 RCW shall be licensed for not less than one hundred fifty
percent of its empty weight unless the amount would be in excess of the
legal limits prescribed for such a vehicle in RCW 46.44.041 or
46.44.042, in which event the vehicle shall be licensed for the maximum
weight authorized for such a vehicle or unless the vehicle is used only
for the purpose of transporting any well drilling machine, air
compressor, rock crusher, conveyor, hoist, donkey engine, cook house,
tool house, bunk house, or similar machine or structure attached to or
made a part of such vehicle.
The following provisions apply when increasing gross or combined
gross weight for a vehicle licensed under this section:
(a) The new license fee will be one-twelfth of the fee listed above
for the new gross weight, multiplied by the number of months remaining
in the period for which licensing fees have been paid, including the
month in which the new gross weight is effective.
(b) Upon surrender of the current certificate of registration or
cab card, the new licensing fees due shall be reduced by the amount of
the licensing fees previously paid for the same period for which new
fees are being charged.
(2) The proceeds from the fees collected under subsection (1) of
this section shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 46.68.035.
(3) In lieu of the gross weight fee under subsection (1) of this
section, farm vehicles may be licensed upon payment of the fee in
effect under subsection (1) of this section on May 1, 2005. In order
to qualify for the reduced fee under this subsection, the farm vehicle
must be exempt from property taxes in accordance with RCW 84.36.630.
The applicant must submit copies of the forms required under RCW
84.36.630. The application for the reduced fee under this subsection
shall require the applicant to attest that the vehicle shall be used
primarily for farming purposes. The department shall provide licensing
agents and subagents with a schedule of the appropriate licensing fees
for farm vehicles.

Sec. 205 RCW 46.68.035 and 2003 c 361 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
All proceeds from combined vehicle licensing fees received by the
director for vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 and 46.16.085, the
license fee under section 203 of this act, and the farm vehicle trip
permit under section 206 of this act shall be forwarded to the state
treasurer to be distributed into accounts according to the following
method:
(1) The sum of two dollars for each vehicle shall be deposited into
the multimodal transportation account, except that for each vehicle
registered by a county auditor or agent to a county auditor pursuant to
RCW 46.01.140, the sum of two dollars shall be credited to the current
county expense fund.
(2) The remainder shall be distributed as follows:
(a) ((21.963)) 24.00 percent shall be deposited into the state
patrol highway account of the motor vehicle fund;
(b) ((1.411)) 1.8 percent shall be deposited into the Puget Sound
ferry operations account of the motor vehicle fund;
(c) ((7.240)) 6.38 percent shall be deposited into the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account); and
(d) On July 1, 2006, six million dollars shall be deposited into
the freight mobility investment account created in section 105 of this
act and beginning on July 1, 2007, and every July 1st thereafter, three
million dollars shall be deposited into the freight mobility investment
account created in section 105 of this act;
(e) The remaining proceeds shall be deposited into the motor
vehicle fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 A new section is added to chapter 46.16
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The owner of a farm vehicle licensed under RCW 46.16.090
purchasing a monthly license under RCW 46.16.135 may, as an alternative
to the first partial month of the license registration, secure and
operate the vehicle under authority of a farm vehicle trip permit
issued by this state. The licensed gross weight may not exceed eighty
thousand pounds for a combination of vehicles nor forty thousand pounds
for a single unit vehicle with three or more axles.
(2) If a monthly license previously issued has expired, the owner
of a farm vehicle may, as an alternative to purchasing a full monthly
license, secure and operate the vehicle under authority of a farm
vehicle trip permit issued by this state. The licensed gross weight
may not exceed eighty thousand pounds for a combination of vehicles nor
forty thousand pounds for a single unit vehicle with three or more
axles.
(3) Each farm vehicle trip permit shall authorize the operation of
a single vehicle at the maximum legal weight limit for the vehicle for
the period remaining in the first month of monthly license, commencing
with the day of first use. No more than four such permits may be used
for any one vehicle in any twelve-month period. Every permit shall
identify, as the department may require, the vehicle for which it is
issued and shall be completed in its entirety and signed by the
operator before operation of the vehicle on the public highways of this
state. Correction of data on the permit such as dates, license number,
or vehicle identification number invalidates the permit. The farm
vehicle trip permit shall be displayed on the vehicle to which it is
issued as prescribed by the department.
(4) Vehicles operating under authority of farm vehicle trip permits
are subject to all laws, rules, and regulations affecting the operation
of like vehicles in this state.
(5) Farm vehicle trip permits may be obtained from the department
of licensing or agents and subagents appointed by the department. The
fee for each farm vehicle trip permit is six dollars and twenty-five
cents. Farm vehicle trip permits sold by the department's agents or
subagents are subject to fees specified in RCW 46.01.140 (4)(a),
(5)(b), or (6).
(6) The proceeds from farm vehicle trip permits received by the
director shall be forwarded to the state treasurer to be distributed as
provided in RCW 46.68.035.
(7) No exchange, credits, or refunds may be given for farm vehicle
trip permits after they have been purchased.
(8) The department of licensing may adopt rules as it deems
necessary to administer this section.

PART III - MISCELLANEOUS FEES
Sec. 301 RCW 46.16.237 and 1987 c 52 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
All vehicle license number plates issued after January 1, 1968, or
such earlier date as the director may prescribe with respect to plates
issued in any county, shall be treated with fully reflectorized
materials designed to increase the visibility and legibility of such
plates at night. In addition to all other fees prescribed by law,
there shall be paid and collected for each vehicle license number plate
treated with such materials, the sum of ((fifty cents)) two dollars and
for each set of two plates, the sum of ((one dollar: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER,)) four dollars. However, one plate is available only to those
vehicles that by law require only one plate. Such fees shall be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 302 RCW 46.16.270 and 1997 c 291 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The total replacement plate fee shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund.
Upon the loss, defacement, or destruction of one or both of the
vehicle license number plates issued for any vehicle where more than
one plate was originally issued or where one or both have become so
illegible or in such a condition as to be difficult to distinguish, or
upon the owner's option, the owner of the vehicle shall make
application for new vehicle license number plates upon a form furnished
by the director. The application shall be filed with the director or
the director's authorized agent, accompanied by the certificate of
license registration of the vehicle and a fee in the amount of
((three)) ten dollars per plate, whereupon the director, or the
director's authorized agent, shall issue new vehicle license number
plates to the applicant. It shall be accompanied by a fee of two
dollars for a new motorcycle license number plate. In the event the
director has issued license period tabs or a windshield emblem instead
of vehicle license number plates, and upon the loss, defacement, or
destruction of the tabs or windshield emblem, application shall be made
on a form provided by the director and in the same manner as above
described, and shall be accompanied by a fee of one dollar for each
pair of tabs or for each windshield emblem, whereupon the director
shall issue to the applicant a duplicate pair of tabs, year tabs, and
when necessary month tabs or a windshield emblem to replace those lost,
defaced, or destroyed. For vehicles owned, rented, or leased by the
state of Washington or by any county, city, town, school district, or
other political subdivision of the state of Washington or United States
government, or owned or leased by the governing body of an Indian tribe
as defined in RCW 46.16.020, a fee shall be charged for replacement of
a vehicle license number plate only to the extent required by the
provisions of RCW 46.16.020, ((46.16.061,)) 46.16.237, and 46.01.140.
For vehicles owned, rented, or leased by foreign countries or
international bodies to which the United States government is a
signatory by treaty, the payment of any fee for the replacement of a
vehicle license number plate shall not be required.

Sec. 303 RCW 46.20.055 and 2004 c 249 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Driver's instruction permit. The department may issue a
driver's instruction permit with or without a photograph to an
applicant who has successfully passed all parts of the examination
other than the driving test, provided the information required by RCW
46.20.091, paid a fee of ((fifteen)) twenty dollars, and meets the
following requirements:
(a) Is at least fifteen and one-half years of age; or
(b) Is at least fifteen years of age and:
(i) Has submitted a proper application; and
(ii) Is enrolled in a traffic safety education program offered,
approved, and accredited by the superintendent of public instruction or
offered by a driver training school licensed and inspected by the
department of licensing under chapter 46.82 RCW, that includes practice
driving.
(2) Waiver of written examination for instruction permit. The
department may waive the written examination, if, at the time of
application, an applicant is enrolled in:
(a) A traffic safety education course as defined by RCW
28A.220.020(2); or
(b) A course of instruction offered by a licensed driver training
school as defined by RCW 46.82.280(1).
The department may require proof of registration in such a course
as it deems necessary.
(3) Effect of instruction permit. A person holding a driver's
instruction permit may drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle,
upon the public highways if:
(a) The person has immediate possession of the permit; and
(b) An approved instructor, or a licensed driver with at least five
years of driving experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.
(4) Term of instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is
valid for one year from the date of issue.
(a) The department may issue one additional one-year permit.
(b) The department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds
after an investigation that the permittee is diligently seeking to
improve driving proficiency.
(c) A person applying to renew an instruction permit must submit
the application to the department in person.

Sec. 304 RCW 46.20.070 and 2004 c 249 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Agricultural driving permit authorized. The director may issue
a juvenile agricultural driving permit to a person under the age of
eighteen years if:
(a) The application is signed by the applicant and the applicant's
father, mother, or legal guardian;
(b) The applicant has passed the driving examination required by
RCW 46.20.120;
(c) The department has investigated the applicant's need for the
permit and determined that the need justifies issuance;
(d) The department has determined the applicant is capable of
operating a motor vehicle without endangering himself or herself or
other persons and property; and
(e) The applicant has paid a fee of ((fifteen)) twenty dollars.
The permit must contain a photograph of the person.
(2) Effect of agricultural driving permit. (a) The permit
authorizes the holder to:
(i) Drive a motor vehicle on the public highways of this state in
connection with farm work. The holder may drive only within a
restricted farming locality described on the permit; and
(ii) Participate in the classroom portion of a traffic safety
education course authorized under RCW 28A.220.030 or the classroom
portion of a traffic safety education course offered by a driver
training school licensed and inspected by the department of licensing
under chapter 46.82 RCW offered in the community where the holder
resides.
(b) The director may transfer the permit from one farming locality
to another. A transfer is not a renewal of the permit.
(3) Term and renewal of agricultural driving permit. An
agricultural driving permit expires one year from the date of issue.
(a) A person under the age of eighteen who holds a permit may renew
the permit by paying a fee of fifteen dollars.
(b) A person applying to renew an agricultural driving permit must
submit the application to the department in person.
(c) An agricultural driving permit is invalidated when a permittee
attains age eighteen. In order to drive a motor vehicle on a highway
he or she must obtain a motor vehicle driver's license under this
chapter.
(4) Suspension, revocation, or cancellation. The director has sole
discretion to suspend, revoke, or cancel a juvenile agricultural
driving permit if:
(a) The permittee has been found to have committed an offense that
requires mandatory suspension or revocation of a driver's license; or
(b) The director is satisfied that the permittee has violated the
permit's restrictions.

Sec. 305 RCW 46.20.117 and 2004 c 249 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Issuance. The department shall issue an identicard, containing
a picture, if the applicant:
(a) Does not hold a valid Washington driver's license;
(b) Proves his or her identity as required by RCW 46.20.035; and
(c) Pays the required fee. The fee is ((fifteen)) twenty dollars
unless an applicant is a recipient of continuing public assistance
grants under Title 74 RCW, who is referred in writing by the secretary
of social and health services. For those persons the fee must be the
actual cost of production of the identicard.
(2) Design and term. The identicard must:
(a) Be distinctly designed so that it will not be confused with the
official driver's license; and
(b) Expire on the fifth anniversary of the applicant's birthdate
after issuance.
(3) Renewal. An application for identicard renewal may be
submitted by means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her identicard by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired. However, the
department may accept an application for renewal of an identicard
submitted by means of mail or electronic commerce only if specific
authority and funding is provided for this purpose by June 30, 2004, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act.
An identicard may not be renewed by mail or by electronic commerce
unless the renewal issued by the department includes a photograph of
the identicard holder.
(4) Cancellation. The department may cancel an identicard if the
holder of the identicard used the card or allowed others to use the
card in violation of RCW 46.20.0921.

Sec. 306 RCW 46.20.120 and 2004 c 249 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
An applicant for a new or renewed driver's license must
successfully pass a driver licensing examination to qualify for a
driver's license. The department shall give examinations at places and
times reasonably available to the people of this state.
(1) Waiver. The department may waive:
(a) All or any part of the examination of any person applying for
the renewal of a driver's license unless the department determines that
the applicant is not qualified to hold a driver's license under this
title; or
(b) The actual demonstration of the ability to operate a motor
vehicle if the applicant:
(i) Surrenders a valid driver's license issued by the person's
previous home state; and
(ii) Is otherwise qualified to be licensed.
(2) Fee. Each applicant for a new license must pay an examination
fee of ((ten)) twenty dollars.
(a) The examination fee is in addition to the fee charged for
issuance of the license.
(b) "New license" means a license issued to a driver:
(i) Who has not been previously licensed in this state; or
(ii) Whose last previous Washington license has been expired for
more than five years.
(3) An application for driver's license renewal may be submitted by
means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her license by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired. However, the
department may accept an application for renewal of a driver's license
submitted by means of mail or electronic commerce only if specific
authority and funding is provided for this purpose by June 30, 2004, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act.
(4) A person whose license expired or will expire while he or she
is living outside the state, may:
(a) Apply to the department to extend the validity of his or her
license for no more than twelve months. If the person establishes to
the department's satisfaction that he or she is unable to return to
Washington before the date his or her license expires, the department
shall extend the person's license. The department may grant
consecutive extensions, but in no event may the cumulative total of
extensions exceed twelve months. An extension granted under this
section does not change the expiration date of the license for purposes
of RCW 46.20.181. The department shall charge a fee of five dollars
for each license extension;
(b) Apply to the department to renew his or her license by mail or,
if permitted by rule of the department, by electronic commerce even if
subsection (3)(b) of this section would not otherwise allow renewal by
that means. If the person establishes to the department's satisfaction
that he or she is unable to return to Washington within twelve months
of the date that his or her license expires, the department shall renew
the person's license by mail or, if permitted by rule of the
department, by electronic commerce.
(5) If a qualified person submits an application for renewal under
subsection (3)(b) or (4)(b) of this section, he or she is not required
to pass an examination nor provide an updated photograph. A license
renewed by mail or by electronic commerce that does not include a
photograph of the licensee must be labeled "not valid for
identification purposes."

Sec. 307 RCW 46.20.308 and 2004 c 187 s 1 and 2004 c 95 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state is
deemed to have given consent, subject to the provisions of RCW
46.61.506, to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood for the
purpose of determining the alcohol concentration or presence of any
drug in his or her breath or blood if arrested for any offense where,
at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has reasonable grounds
to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or was in violation of RCW 46.61.503. Neither
consent nor this section precludes a police officer from obtaining a
search warrant for a person's breath or blood.
(2) The test or tests of breath shall be administered at the
direction of a law enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to
believe the person to have been driving or in actual physical control
of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or the person to have been driving or
in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having alcohol in
a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 in his or her system and
being under the age of twenty-one. However, in those instances where
the person is incapable due to physical injury, physical incapacity, or
other physical limitation, of providing a breath sample or where the
person is being treated in a hospital, clinic, doctor's office,
emergency medical vehicle, ambulance, or other similar facility or
where the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person is
under the influence of a drug, a blood test shall be administered by a
qualified person as provided in RCW 46.61.506(5). The officer shall
inform the person of his or her right to refuse the breath or blood
test, and of his or her right to have additional tests administered by
any qualified person of his or her choosing as provided in RCW
46.61.506. The officer shall warn the driver, in substantially the
following language, that:
(a) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's license,
permit, or privilege to drive will be revoked or denied for at least
one year; and
(b) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's refusal to
take the test may be used in a criminal trial; and
(c) If the driver submits to the test and the test is administered,
the driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive will be suspended,
revoked, or denied for at least ninety days if the driver is age
twenty-one or over and the test indicates the alcohol concentration of
the driver's breath or blood is 0.08 or more, or if the driver is under
age twenty-one and the test indicates the alcohol concentration of the
driver's breath or blood is 0.02 or more, or if the driver is under age
twenty-one and the driver is in violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504.
(3) Except as provided in this section, the test administered shall
be of the breath only. If an individual is unconscious or is under
arrest for the crime of vehicular homicide as provided in RCW 46.61.520
or vehicular assault as provided in RCW 46.61.522, or if an individual
is under arrest for the crime of driving while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs as provided in RCW 46.61.502, which arrest
results from an accident in which there has been serious bodily injury
to another person, a breath or blood test may be administered without
the consent of the individual so arrested.
(4) Any person who is dead, unconscious, or who is otherwise in a
condition rendering him or her incapable of refusal, shall be deemed
not to have withdrawn the consent provided by subsection (1) of this
section and the test or tests may be administered, subject to the
provisions of RCW 46.61.506, and the person shall be deemed to have
received the warnings required under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) If, following his or her arrest and receipt of warnings under
subsection (2) of this section, the person arrested refuses upon the
request of a law enforcement officer to submit to a test or tests of
his or her breath or blood, no test shall be given except as authorized
under subsection (3) or (4) of this section.
(6) If, after arrest and after the other applicable conditions and
requirements of this section have been satisfied, a test or tests of
the person's blood or breath is administered and the test results
indicate that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood
is 0.08 or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or 0.02 or
more if the person is under the age of twenty-one, or the person
refuses to submit to a test, the arresting officer or other law
enforcement officer at whose direction any test has been given, or the
department, where applicable, if the arrest results in a test of the
person's blood, shall:
(a) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of its intention to suspend, revoke, or deny the person's
license, permit, or privilege to drive as required by subsection (7) of
this section;
(b) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of his or her right to a hearing, specifying the steps he or
she must take to obtain a hearing as provided by subsection (8) of this
section;
(c) Mark the person's Washington state driver's license or permit
to drive, if any, in a manner authorized by the department;
(d) Serve notice in writing that the marked license or permit, if
any, is a temporary license that is valid for sixty days from the date
of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event notice is
given by the department following a blood test, or until the
suspension, revocation, or denial of the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive is sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8)
of this section, whichever occurs first. No temporary license is valid
to any greater degree than the license or permit that it replaces; and
(e) Immediately notify the department of the arrest and transmit to
the department within seventy-two hours, except as delayed as the
result of a blood test, a sworn report or report under a declaration
authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 that states:
(i) That the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested
person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or drugs, or both, or was under the age of twenty-one years and
had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
while having an alcohol concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503;
(ii) That after receipt of the warnings required by subsection (2)
of this section the person refused to submit to a test of his or her
blood or breath, or a test was administered and the results indicated
that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.08
or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or was 0.02 or more if
the person is under the age of twenty-one; and
(iii) Any other information that the director may require by rule.
(7) The department of licensing, upon the receipt of a sworn report
or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 under
subsection (6)(e) of this section, shall suspend, revoke, or deny the
person's license, permit, or privilege to drive or any nonresident
operating privilege, as provided in RCW 46.20.3101, such suspension,
revocation, or denial to be effective beginning sixty days from the
date of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event
notice is given by the department following a blood test, or when
sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8) of this section,
whichever occurs first.
(8) A person receiving notification under subsection (6)(b) of this
section may, within thirty days after the notice has been given,
request in writing a formal hearing before the department. The person
shall pay a fee of ((one)) two hundred dollars as part of the request.
If the request is mailed, it must be postmarked within thirty days
after receipt of the notification. Upon timely receipt of such a
request for a formal hearing, including receipt of the required ((one))
two hundred dollar fee, the department shall afford the person an
opportunity for a hearing. The department may waive the required
((one)) two hundred dollar fee if the person is an indigent as defined
in RCW 10.101.010. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
hearing is subject to and shall be scheduled and conducted in
accordance with RCW 46.20.329 and 46.20.332. The hearing shall be
conducted in the county of the arrest, except that all or part of the
hearing may, at the discretion of the department, be conducted by
telephone or other electronic means. The hearing shall be held within
sixty days following the arrest or following the date notice has been
given in the event notice is given by the department following a blood
test, unless otherwise agreed to by the department and the person, in
which case the action by the department shall be stayed, and any valid
temporary license marked under subsection (6)(c) of this section
extended, if the person is otherwise eligible for licensing. For the
purposes of this section, the scope of the hearing shall cover the
issues of whether a law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to
believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical control
of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or had been driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while having
alcohol in his or her system in a concentration of 0.02 or more if the
person was under the age of twenty-one, whether the person was placed
under arrest, and (a) whether the person refused to submit to the test
or tests upon request of the officer after having been informed that
such refusal would result in the revocation of the person's license,
permit, or privilege to drive, or (b) if a test or tests were
administered, whether the applicable requirements of this section were
satisfied before the administration of the test or tests, whether the
person submitted to the test or tests, or whether a test was
administered without express consent as permitted under this section,
and whether the test or tests indicated that the alcohol concentration
of the person's breath or blood was 0.08 or more if the person was age
twenty-one or over at the time of the arrest, or 0.02 or more if the
person was under the age of twenty-one at the time of the arrest. The
sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085
submitted by a law enforcement officer is prima facie evidence that the
officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving
or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or
the person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her
system in a concentration of 0.02 or more and was under the age of
twenty-one and that the officer complied with the requirements of this
section.
A hearing officer shall conduct the hearing, may issue subpoenas
for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, and
shall administer oaths to witnesses. The hearing officer shall not
issue a subpoena for the attendance of a witness at the request of the
person unless the request is accompanied by the fee required by RCW
5.56.010 for a witness in district court. The sworn report or report
under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 of the law enforcement
officer and any other evidence accompanying the report shall be
admissible without further evidentiary foundation and the
certifications authorized by the criminal rules for courts of limited
jurisdiction shall be admissible without further evidentiary
foundation. The person may be represented by counsel, may question
witnesses, may present evidence, and may testify. The department shall
order that the suspension, revocation, or denial either be rescinded or
sustained.
(9) If the suspension, revocation, or denial is sustained after
such a hearing, the person whose license, privilege, or permit is
suspended, revoked, or denied has the right to file a petition in the
superior court of the county of arrest to review the final order of
revocation by the department in the same manner as an appeal from a
decision of a court of limited jurisdiction. Notice of appeal must be
filed within thirty days after the date the final order is served or
the right to appeal is waived. Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.334, RALJ
1.1, or other statutes or rules referencing de novo review, the appeal
shall be limited to a review of the record of the administrative
hearing. The appellant must pay the costs associated with obtaining
the record of the hearing before the hearing officer. The filing of
the appeal does not stay the effective date of the suspension,
revocation, or denial. A petition filed under this subsection must
include the petitioner's grounds for requesting review. Upon granting
petitioner's request for review, the court shall review the
department's final order of suspension, revocation, or denial as
expeditiously as possible. The review must be limited to a
determination of whether the department has committed any errors of
law. The superior court shall accept those factual determinations
supported by substantial evidence in the record: (a) That were
expressly made by the department; or (b) that may reasonably be
inferred from the final order of the department. The superior court
may reverse, affirm, or modify the decision of the department or remand
the case back to the department for further proceedings. The decision
of the superior court must be in writing and filed in the clerk's
office with the other papers in the case. The court shall state the
reasons for the decision. If judicial relief is sought for a stay or
other temporary remedy from the department's action, the court shall
not grant such relief unless the court finds that the appellant is
likely to prevail in the appeal and that without a stay the appellant
will suffer irreparable injury. If the court stays the suspension,
revocation, or denial it may impose conditions on such stay.
(10)(a) If a person whose driver's license, permit, or privilege to
drive has been or will be suspended, revoked, or denied under
subsection (7) of this section, other than as a result of a breath or
blood test refusal, and who has not committed an offense for which he
or she was granted a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW,
petitions a court for a deferred prosecution on criminal charges
arising out of the arrest for which action has been or will be taken
under subsection (7) of this section, the court may direct the
department to stay any actual or proposed suspension, revocation, or
denial for at least forty-five days but not more than ninety days. If
the court stays the suspension, revocation, or denial, it may impose
conditions on such stay. If the person is otherwise eligible for
licensing, the department shall issue a temporary license, or extend
any valid temporary license marked under subsection (6) of this
section, for the period of the stay. If a deferred prosecution
treatment plan is not recommended in the report made under RCW
10.05.050, or if treatment is rejected by the court, or if the person
declines to accept an offered treatment plan, or if the person violates
any condition imposed by the court, then the court shall immediately
direct the department to cancel the stay and any temporary marked
license or extension of a temporary license issued under this
subsection.
(b) A suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this section,
other than as a result of a breath or blood test refusal, shall be
stayed if the person is accepted for deferred prosecution as provided
in chapter 10.05 RCW for the incident upon which the suspension,
revocation, or denial is based. If the deferred prosecution is
terminated, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or
denial reinstated. If the deferred prosecution is completed, the stay
shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial canceled.
(c) The provisions of (b) of this subsection relating to a stay of
a suspension, revocation, or denial and the cancellation of any
suspension, revocation, or denial do not apply to the suspension,
revocation, denial, or disqualification of a person's commercial
driver's license or privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle.
(11) When it has been finally determined under the procedures of
this section that a nonresident's privilege to operate a motor vehicle
in this state has been suspended, revoked, or denied, the department
shall give information in writing of the action taken to the motor
vehicle administrator of the state of the person's residence and of any
state in which he or she has a license.

Sec. 308 RCW 46.20.311 and 2004 c 95 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall not suspend a driver's license or
privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways for a fixed
period of more than one year, except as specifically permitted under
RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.342, or other provision of law.
(b) Except for a suspension under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.289,
46.20.291(5), 46.61.740, or 74.20A.320, whenever the license or driving
privilege of any person is suspended by reason of a conviction, a
finding that a traffic infraction has been committed, pursuant to
chapter 46.29 RCW, or pursuant to RCW 46.20.291 or 46.20.308, the
suspension shall remain in effect until the person gives and thereafter
maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided
in chapter 46.29 RCW.
(c) If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502
or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the person's eligibility
for licensing based upon the reports provided by the alcoholism agency
or probation department designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny
reinstatement until enrollment and participation in an approved program
has been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the
suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504,
and the person is required pursuant to RCW 46.20.720 to drive only a
motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock, the
department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based
upon written verification by a company doing business in the state that
it has installed the required device on a vehicle owned or operated by
the person seeking reinstatement. If, based upon notification from the
interlock provider or otherwise, the department determines that an
interlock required under RCW 46.20.720 is no longer installed or
functioning as required, the department shall suspend the person's
license or privilege to drive. Whenever the license or driving
privilege of any person is suspended or revoked as a result of
noncompliance with an ignition interlock requirement, the suspension
shall remain in effect until the person provides notice issued by a
company doing business in the state that a vehicle owned or operated by
the person is equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device.
(d) Whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is
suspended as a result of certification of noncompliance with a child
support order under chapter 74.20A RCW or a residential or visitation
order, the suspension shall remain in effect until the person provides
a release issued by the department of social and health services
stating that the person is in compliance with the order.
(e)(i) The department shall not issue to the person a new,
duplicate, or renewal license until the person pays a reissue fee of
((twenty)) seventy-five dollars.
(ii) If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is the result of administrative action under
RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars.
(2)(a) Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor
vehicle on the public highways has been revoked, unless the revocation
was for a cause which has been removed, is not entitled to have the
license or privilege renewed or restored until: (i) After the
expiration of one year from the date the license or privilege to drive
was revoked; (ii) after the expiration of the applicable revocation
period provided by RCW 46.20.3101 or 46.61.5055; (iii) after the
expiration of two years for persons convicted of vehicular homicide; or
(iv) after the expiration of the applicable revocation period provided
by RCW 46.20.265.
(b)(i) After the expiration of the appropriate period, the person
may make application for a new license as provided by law together with
a reissue fee in the amount of ((twenty)) seventy-five dollars.
(ii) If the revocation is the result of a violation of RCW
46.20.308, 46.61.502, or 46.61.504, the reissue fee shall be one
hundred fifty dollars. If the revocation is the result of a violation
of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the
person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by
the alcoholism agency or probation department designated under RCW
46.61.5056 and shall deny reissuance of a license, permit, or privilege
to drive until enrollment and participation in an approved program has
been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the
revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504,
and the person is required pursuant to RCW 46.20.720 to drive only a
motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or other
biological or technical device, the department shall determine the
person's eligibility for licensing based upon written verification by
a company doing business in the state that it has installed the
required device on a vehicle owned or operated by the person applying
for a new license. If, following issuance of a new license, the
department determines, based upon notification from the interlock
provider or otherwise, that an interlock required under RCW 46.20.720
is no longer functioning, the department shall suspend the person's
license or privilege to drive until the department has received written
verification from an interlock provider that a functioning interlock is
installed.
(c) Except for a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department
shall not then issue a new license unless it is satisfied after
investigation of the driving ability of the person that it will be safe
to grant the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public
highways, and until the person gives and thereafter maintains proof of
financial responsibility for the future as provided in chapter 46.29
RCW. For a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not
issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the
driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant that person
the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.
(3)(a) Whenever the driver's license of any person is suspended
pursuant to Article IV of the nonresident violators compact or RCW
46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or 46.20.291(5), the department shall not issue
to the person any new or renewal license until the person pays a
reissue fee of ((twenty)) seventy-five dollars.
(b) If the suspension is the result of a violation of the laws of
this or any other state, province, or other jurisdiction involving (i)
the operation or physical control of a motor vehicle upon the public
highways while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or
(ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical test of the driver's blood
alcohol content, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars.

Sec. 309 RCW 46.20.049 and 1999 c 308 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be an additional fee for issuing any class of
commercial driver's license in addition to the prescribed fee required
for the issuance of the original driver's license. The additional fee
for each class shall ((not exceed twenty)) be thirty dollars for the
original commercial driver's license or subsequent renewals((,
unless)). If the commercial driver's license is renewed or extended
for a period other than five years, ((in which case)) the fee for each
class shall ((not exceed four)) be six dollars for each year that the
commercial driver's license is renewed or extended. The fee shall be
deposited in the highway safety fund.

PART IV - MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
Sec. 401 RCW 43.135.045 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 920 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The emergency reserve fund is established in the state
treasury. During each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall deposit
in the emergency reserve fund all general fund -- state revenues in
excess of the state expenditure limit for that fiscal year. Deposits
shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter based on projections of
state revenues and the state expenditure limit. The treasurer shall
make transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual
annual revenues and the expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and
thereafter.
(2) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency
reserve fund only with approval of at least two-thirds of the members
of each house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation
does not cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit
under this chapter.
(3) The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five
percent of annual general fund -- state revenues as projected by the
official state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent
shall be transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer as
follows: Seventy-five percent to the student achievement fund hereby
created in the state treasury and twenty-five percent to the general
fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers between these
accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for fiscal
year 2000 and thereafter. When per-student state funding for the
maintenance and operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less
than ninety percent of the national average of total funding from all
sources per student as determined by the most recent published data
from the national center for education statistics of the United States
department of education, as calculated by the office of financial
management, further deposits to the student achievement fund shall be
required only to the extent necessary to maintain the ninety-percent
level. Remaining funds are part of the general fund balance and these
funds are subject to the expenditure limits of this chapter.
(4) The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(5) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be appropriated
to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for distribution
to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the student
achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per full-time
equivalent student basis to each school district.
(((6) Earnings of the emergency reserve fund under RCW
43.84.092(4)(a) shall be transferred quarterly to the multimodal
transportation account, except for those earnings that are in excess of
thirty-five million dollars each fiscal year. Within thirty days
following any fiscal year in which earnings transferred to the
multimodal transportation account under this subsection did not total
thirty-five million dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer from
the emergency reserve fund an amount necessary to bring the total
deposited in the multimodal transportation account under this
subsection to thirty-five million dollars. The revenues to the
multimodal transportation account reflected in this subsection provide
ongoing support for the transportation programs of the state. However,
it is the intent of the legislature that any new long-term financial
support that may be subsequently provided for transportation programs
will be used to replace and supplant the revenues reflected in this
subsection, thereby allowing those revenues to be returned to the
purposes to which they were previously dedicated. No transfers from
the emergency reserve fund to the multimodal fund shall be made during
the 2003-05 fiscal biennium.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 Sections 201 through 206, 301, and 302 of
this act apply to vehicle registrations that are due or become due on
or after January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 (1) Section 110 of this act takes effect
July 1, 2006.
(2) Sections 201 through 206 of this act take effect January 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 Sections 201 and 202 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 Sections 101 through 107, 109, 303 through
310, and 401 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state
government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July
1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 Section 109 of this act expires July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 Part headings used in this act are not
part of the law.

--- END ---