BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
If only a single prequalified proposer emerges from phase one of
the open competitive design-build procurement process, the secretary
shall make a finding to that effect. The transportation commission
must review the prequalification process and the finding of the
secretary. Following commission approval of the secretary's finding,
the department may negotiate an agreement under the requirements of
this section, in lieu of the process outlined in RCW 47.60.818 and
47.60.820.
(1) The department and the proposer may enter into negotiations to
jointly develop contract specifications and plans, which must adhere to
the requirements of RCW 47.60.818(1). The final jointly developed
contract specifications and plans must be approved by the department,
and must include design, drawings, and specifications at a sufficient
level of detail to fully depict the ferries' characteristics and
identify installed equipment and systems.
(2) The department may reimburse the proposer for the cost
associated with the preparation of the jointly developed contract
specifications and plans, and may establish a maximum amount of such
reimbursement.
(3) The department shall conduct ongoing joint reviews with the
proposer to consider and critique its designs, drawings, and
specifications. These reviews must be held to ensure that the jointly
developed construction specifications and plans meet the department's
requirements and are responsive to the critiques conducted by the
department during the preparation of the jointly developed construction
specifications and plans.
(4) If, as a result of the periodic technical reviews or otherwise,
the department determines that it is in the best interest of the
department to modify any element of the department's requirements,
including the outline specifications, it shall do so in writing to the
proposer.
(5) The department may negotiate a contract with the proposer
during the preparation of the jointly developed contract specifications
and plans. The contract price must be established between the
department and the contractor through negotiation based on detailed
cost and price information provided by the proposer. To achieve
efficiencies the department may negotiate incentives and economic cost
sharing between the state and the proposer. In addition to the cost
incentives, other incentives may be considered, as determined by the
department to be in the best interests of the state. Such incentives
may include, but are not limited to, key schedule milestones,
technological innovations, performance efficiencies, constructability,
and operational value or life-cycle cost.
(6) The department shall submit a copy of the contract, the final
negotiated price, and supporting information to the office of financial
management at least ten days prior to execution of the contract. If
the final negotiated price is greater than the legislature's adopted
expenditure plan for vessel construction, the department may not
execute the contract until the legislature reviews the final proposal
and adjusts the expenditure plan accordingly.
(7) If the department and the proposer are not able to reach an
agreement on the jointly developed contract specifications and plans,
the department may republish, revise, or cancel the request for
proposals process to serve the best interests of the state.

--- END ---