BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to aid law
enforcement in combating crime through the rapid identification of all
persons who require medical treatment as a result of a criminal act and
to assist in the rapid identification of human remains.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.02.010 and 2005 c 468 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Audit" means an assessment, evaluation, determination, or
investigation of a health care provider by a person not employed by or
affiliated with the provider to determine compliance with:
(a) Statutory, regulatory, fiscal, medical, or scientific
standards;
(b) A private or public program of payments to a health care
provider; or
(c) Requirements for licensing, accreditation, or certification.
(2) "Directory information" means information disclosing the
presence, and for the purpose of identification, the name, location
within a health care facility, and the general health condition of a
particular patient who is a patient in a health care facility or who is
currently receiving emergency health care in a health care facility.
(3) "Federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities" means an
officer of any agency or authority in the United States, a state, a
tribe, a territory, or a political subdivision of a state, a tribe, or
a territory who is empowered by law to: (a) Investigate or conduct an
official inquiry into a potential criminal violation of law; or (b)
prosecute or otherwise conduct a criminal proceeding arising from an
alleged violation of law.
(4) "General health condition" means the patient's health status
described in terms of "critical," "poor," "fair," "good," "excellent,"
or terms denoting similar conditions.
(((4))) (5) "Health care" means any care, service, or procedure
provided by a health care provider:
(a) To diagnose, treat, or maintain a patient's physical or mental
condition; or
(b) That affects the structure or any function of the human body.
(((5))) (6) "Health care facility" means a hospital, clinic,
nursing home, laboratory, office, or similar place where a health care
provider provides health care to patients.
(((6))) (7) "Health care information" means any information,
whether oral or recorded in any form or medium, that identifies or can
readily be associated with the identity of a patient and directly
relates to the patient's health care, including a patient's
deoxyribonucleic acid and identified sequence of chemical base pairs.
The term includes any required accounting of disclosures of health care
information.
(((7))) (8) "Health care operations" means any of the following
activities of a health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor to the extent that the activities are related to functions
that make an entity a health care provider, a health care facility, or
a third-party payor:
(a) Conducting: Quality assessment and improvement activities,
including outcomes evaluation and development of clinical guidelines,
if the obtaining of generalizable knowledge is not the primary purpose
of any studies resulting from such activities; population-based
activities relating to improving health or reducing health care costs,
protocol development, case management and care coordination, contacting
of health care providers and patients with information about treatment
alternatives; and related functions that do not include treatment;
(b) Reviewing the competence or qualifications of health care
professionals, evaluating practitioner and provider performance and
third-party payor performance, conducting training programs in which
students, trainees, or practitioners in areas of health care learn
under supervision to practice or improve their skills as health care
providers, training of nonhealth care professionals, accreditation,
certification, licensing, or credentialing activities;
(c) Underwriting, premium rating, and other activities relating to
the creation, renewal, or replacement of a contract of health insurance
or health benefits, and ceding, securing, or placing a contract for
reinsurance of risk relating to claims for health care, including stop-loss insurance and excess of loss insurance, if any applicable legal
requirements are met;
(d) Conducting or arranging for medical review, legal services, and
auditing functions, including fraud and abuse detection and compliance
programs;
(e) Business planning and development, such as conducting cost-management and planning-related analyses related to managing and
operating the health care facility or third-party payor, including
formulary development and administration, development, or improvement
of methods of payment or coverage policies; and
(f) Business management and general administrative activities of
the health care facility, health care provider, or third-party payor
including, but not limited to:
(i) Management activities relating to implementation of and
compliance with the requirements of this chapter;
(ii) Customer service, including the provision of data analyses for
policy holders, plan sponsors, or other customers, provided that health
care information is not disclosed to such policy holder, plan sponsor,
or customer;
(iii) Resolution of internal grievances;
(iv) The sale, transfer, merger, or consolidation of all or part of
a health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor with
another health care provider, health care facility, or third-party
payor or an entity that following such activity will become a health
care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor, and due
diligence related to such activity; and
(v) Consistent with applicable legal requirements, creating
deidentified health care information or a limited dataset and fund-raising for the benefit of the health care provider, health care
facility, or third-party payor.
(((8))) (9) "Health care provider" means a person who is licensed,
certified, registered, or otherwise authorized by the law of this state
to provide health care in the ordinary course of business or practice
of a profession.
(((9))) (10) "Institutional review board" means any board,
committee, or other group formally designated by an institution, or
authorized under federal or state law, to review, approve the
initiation of, or conduct periodic review of research programs to
assure the protection of the rights and welfare of human research
subjects.
(((10))) (11) "Maintain," as related to health care information,
means to hold, possess, preserve, retain, store, or control that
information.
(((11))) (12) "Patient" means an individual who receives or has
received health care. The term includes a deceased individual who has
received health care.
(((12))) (13) "Payment" means:
(a) The activities undertaken by:
(i) A third-party payor to obtain premiums or to determine or
fulfill its responsibility for coverage and provision of benefits by
the third-party payor; or
(ii) A health care provider, health care facility, or third-party
payor, to obtain or provide reimbursement for the provision of health
care; and
(b) The activities in (a) of this subsection that relate to the
patient to whom health care is provided and that include, but are not
limited to:
(i) Determinations of eligibility or coverage, including
coordination of benefits or the determination of cost-sharing amounts,
and adjudication or subrogation of health benefit claims;
(ii) Risk adjusting amounts due based on enrollee health status and
demographic characteristics;
(iii) Billing, claims management, collection activities, obtaining
payment under a contract for reinsurance, including stop-loss insurance
and excess of loss insurance, and related health care data processing;
(iv) Review of health care services with respect to medical
necessity, coverage under a health plan, appropriateness of care, or
justification of charges;
(v) Utilization review activities, including precertification and
preauthorization of services, and concurrent and retrospective review
of services; and
(vi) Disclosure to consumer reporting agencies of any of the
following health care information relating to collection of premiums or
reimbursement:
(A) Name and address;
(B) Date of birth;
(C) Social security number;
(D) Payment history;
(E) Account number; and
(F) Name and address of the health care provider, health care
facility, and/or third-party payor.
(((13))) (14) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business
trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture,
government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or
commercial entity.
(((14))) (15) "Reasonable fee" means the charges for duplicating or
searching the record, but shall not exceed sixty-five cents per page
for the first thirty pages and fifty cents per page for all other
pages. In addition, a clerical fee for searching and handling may be
charged not to exceed fifteen dollars. These amounts shall be adjusted
biennially in accordance with changes in the consumer price index, all
consumers, for Seattle-Tacoma metropolitan statistical area as
determined by the secretary of health. However, where editing of
records by a health care provider is required by statute and is done by
the provider personally, the fee may be the usual and customary charge
for a basic office visit.
(((15))) (16) "Third-party payor" means an insurer regulated under
Title 48 RCW authorized to transact business in this state or other
jurisdiction, including a health care service contractor, and health
maintenance organization; or an employee welfare benefit plan; or a
state or federal health benefit program.
(((16))) (17) "Treatment" means the provision, coordination, or
management of health care and related services by one or more health
care providers or health care facilities, including the coordination or
management of health care by a health care provider or health care
facility with a third party; consultation between health care providers
or health care facilities relating to a patient; or the referral of a
patient for health care from one health care provider or health care
facility to another.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.02.050 and 2005 c 468 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A health care provider or health care facility may disclose
health care information about a patient without the patient's
authorization to the extent a recipient needs to know the information,
if the disclosure is:
(a) To a person who the provider or facility reasonably believes is
providing health care to the patient;
(b) To any other person who requires health care information for
health care education, or to provide planning, quality assurance, peer
review, or administrative, legal, financial, actuarial services to, or
other health care operations for or on behalf of the health care
provider or health care facility; or for assisting the health care
provider or health care facility in the delivery of health care and the
health care provider or health care facility reasonably believes that
the person:
(i) Will not use or disclose the health care information for any
other purpose; and
(ii) Will take appropriate steps to protect the health care
information;
(c) To any other health care provider or health care facility
reasonably believed to have previously provided health care to the
patient, to the extent necessary to provide health care to the patient,
unless the patient has instructed the health care provider or health
care facility in writing not to make the disclosure;
(d) To any person if the health care provider or health care
facility reasonably believes that disclosure will avoid or minimize an
imminent danger to the health or safety of the patient or any other
individual, however there is no obligation under this chapter on the
part of the provider or facility to so disclose;
(e) To immediate family members of the patient, or any other
individual with whom the patient is known to have a close personal
relationship, if made in accordance with good medical or other
professional practice, unless the patient has instructed the health
care provider or health care facility in writing not to make the
disclosure;
(f) To a health care provider or health care facility who is the
successor in interest to the health care provider or health care
facility maintaining the health care information;
(g) For use in a research project that an institutional review
board has determined:
(i) Is of sufficient importance to outweigh the intrusion into the
privacy of the patient that would result from the disclosure;
(ii) Is impracticable without the use or disclosure of the health
care information in individually identifiable form;
(iii) Contains reasonable safeguards to protect the information
from redisclosure;
(iv) Contains reasonable safeguards to protect against identifying,
directly or indirectly, any patient in any report of the research
project; and
(v) Contains procedures to remove or destroy at the earliest
opportunity, consistent with the purposes of the project, information
that would enable the patient to be identified, unless an institutional
review board authorizes retention of identifying information for
purposes of another research project;
(h) To a person who obtains information for purposes of an audit,
if that person agrees in writing to:
(i) Remove or destroy, at the earliest opportunity consistent with
the purpose of the audit, information that would enable the patient to
be identified; and
(ii) Not to disclose the information further, except to accomplish
the audit or report unlawful or improper conduct involving fraud in
payment for health care by a health care provider or patient, or other
unlawful conduct by the health care provider;
(i) To an official of a penal or other custodial institution in
which the patient is detained;
(j) To provide directory information, unless the patient has
instructed the health care provider or health care facility not to make
the disclosure;
(k) To fire, police, sheriff, or another public authority, that
brought, or caused to be brought, the patient to the health care
facility or health care provider if the disclosure is limited to the
patient's name, residence, sex, age, occupation, condition, diagnosis,
estimated or actual discharge date, or extent and location of injuries
as determined by a physician, and whether the patient was conscious
when admitted;
(l) To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities and the
health care provider, health care facility, or third-party payor
believes in good faith that the health care information disclosed
constitutes evidence of criminal conduct that occurred on the premises
of the health care provider, health care facility, or third-party
payor;
(m) To another health care provider, health care facility, or
third-party payor for the health care operations of the health care
provider, health care facility, or third-party payor that receives the
information, if each entity has or had a relationship with the patient
who is the subject of the health care information being requested, the
health care information pertains to such relationship, and the
disclosure is for the purposes described in RCW 70.02.010(((7))) (8)
(a) and (b); or
(n) For payment.
(2) A health care provider shall disclose health care information
about a patient without the patient's authorization if the disclosure
is:
(a) To federal, state, or local public health authorities, to the
extent the health care provider is required by law to report health
care information; when needed to determine compliance with state or
federal licensure, certification or registration rules or laws; or when
needed to protect the public health;
(b) To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities to the
extent the health care provider is required by law;
(c) To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities, upon
receipt of a written or oral request, in any cases in which the patient
is being treated or has been treated for a bullet wound, gunshot wound,
powder burn, or other injury arising from or caused by the discharge of
a firearm, or an injury caused by a knife, an ice pick, or any other
sharp or pointed instrument which federal, state, or local law
enforcement authorities reasonably believe to have been intentionally
inflicted upon a person, or any other injury, including blunt force
injury, that federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities
reasonably believe resulted from a criminal act, the following
information, if known:
(i) The name of the patient;
(ii) The patient's residence;
(iii) The patient's sex;
(iv) The patient's age;
(v) The patient's condition;
(vi) The patient's diagnosis, or extent and location of injuries as
determined by a health care provider;
(vii) Whether the patient was conscious when admitted;
(viii) The name of the health care provider making the
determination in (c)(v), (vi), and (vii) of this subsection;
(ix) Whether the patient has been transferred to another facility;
and
(x) The patient's discharge time and date;
(d) To county coroners and medical examiners for the investigations
of deaths;
(((d))) (e) Pursuant to compulsory process in accordance with RCW
70.02.060.
(3) All state or local agencies obtaining patient health care
information pursuant to this section shall adopt rules establishing
their record acquisition, retention, and security policies that are
consistent with this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 68.50.320 and 2001 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When a person reported missing has not been found within thirty
days of the report, the sheriff, chief of police, county coroner or
county medical examiner, or other law enforcement authority initiating
and conducting the investigation for the missing person shall ask the
missing person's family or next of kin to give written consent to
contact the dentist or dentists of the missing person and request the
person's dental records.
The missing person's dentist or dentists shall provide diagnostic
quality copies of the missing person's dental records or original
dental records to the sheriff, chief of police, county coroner or
county medical examiner, or other law enforcement authority, when
presented with the written consent from the missing person's family or
next of kin or with a statement from the sheriff, chief of police,
county coroner or county medical examiner, or other law enforcement
authority that the missing person's family or next of kin could not be
located in the exercise of due diligence or that the missing person's
family or next of kin refuse to consent to the release of the missing
person's dental records and there is reason to believe that the missing
person's family or next of kin may have been involved in the missing
person's disappearance.
When a person reported missing has not been found within thirty
days, the sheriff, chief of police, or other law enforcement authority
initiating and conducting the investigation for the missing person
shall confer with the county coroner or medical examiner prior to the
preparation of a missing person's report. After conferring with the
coroner or medical examiner, the sheriff, chief of police, or other law
enforcement authority shall submit a missing person's report and the
dental records received under this section to the dental identification
system of the state patrol identification, child abuse, vulnerable
adult abuse, and criminal history section on forms supplied by the
state patrol for such purpose.
When a person reported missing has been found, the sheriff, chief
of police, coroner or medical examiner, or other law enforcement
authority shall report such information to the state patrol.
The dental identification system shall maintain a file of
information regarding persons reported to it as missing. The file
shall contain the information referred to in this section and such
other information as the state patrol finds relevant to assist in the
location of a missing person.
The files of the dental identification system shall, upon request,
be made available to law enforcement agencies attempting to locate
missing persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---