BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter ... (ESSB
6090), Laws of 2005 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to extend and expand the department of
agriculture's asparagus automation and mechanization program under
chapter 16-730 WAC in an effort to strengthen the asparagus post-harvest industry.
(2) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to research and develop new hop
harvesting technologies and for associated pilot projects.

--- END ---