BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 People are working until later ages now than
they did twenty-eight years ago when plan 1 of the public employees'
and teachers' retirement systems was closed to new membership. The
design of plan 2 of these systems, which contains no cap on the
percentage of a member's salary that the member may receive as a
retirement benefit, reflected this altered expectation, which remains
true today. The expanded availability of postretirement employment for
members of plan 1 was intended to help members who wanted to continue
to work and also to help the state meet a growing work force shortage.
Opportunities for postretirement employment have not been extended to
all members equally, however, and complex administrative procedures are
involved in implementing the program. Therefore, there is a need to
replace the expanded postretirement employment options with a more
effective and equitable approach. It is with these intentions that the
legislature is extending the cap on plan 1 members' pension allowances
to seventy percent of average final compensation.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.40.185 and 1991 c 343 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon retirement from service, as provided for in RCW 41.40.180 or
41.40.210, a member shall be eligible for a service retirement
allowance computed on the basis of the law in effect at the time of
retirement, together with such postretirement pension increases as may
from time to time be expressly authorized by the legislature. The
service retirement allowance payable to members retiring on and after
February 25, 1972 shall consist of:
(1) An annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his or
her additional contributions made pursuant to RCW 41.40.330(2).
(2) A membership service pension, subject to the provisions of
subsection (4) of this section, which shall be equal to two percent of
his or her average final compensation for each service credit year or
fraction of a service credit year of membership service.
(3) A prior service pension which shall be equal to one-seventieth
of his or her average final compensation for each year or fraction of
a year of prior service not to exceed thirty years credited to his or
her service accounts. In no event, except as provided in this 1972
amendatory act or as provided in subsection (5) of this section, shall
any member receive a retirement allowance pursuant to subsections (2)
and (3) of this section of more than sixty percent of his or her
average final compensation: PROVIDED, That no member shall receive a
pension under this section of less than nine hundred dollars per annum
if such member has twelve or more years of service credit, or less than
one thousand and two hundred dollars per annum if such member has
sixteen or more years of service credit, or less than one thousand five
hundred and sixty dollars per annum if such member has twenty or more
years of service credit.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) through (3)
of this section, the retirement allowance payable for service where a
member was elected or appointed pursuant to Articles II or III of the
Constitution of the state of Washington or RCW 48.02.010 and the
implementing statutes shall be a combined pension and annuity. Said
retirement allowance shall be equal to three percent of the average
final compensation for each year of such service. Any member covered
by this subsection who upon retirement has served ten or more years
shall receive a retirement allowance of at least one thousand two
hundred dollars per annum; such member who has served fifteen or more
years shall receive a retirement allowance of at least one thousand
eight hundred dollars per annum; and such member who has served twenty
or more years shall receive a retirement allowance of at least two
thousand four hundred dollars per annum: PROVIDED, That the initial
retirement allowance of a member retiring only under the provisions of
this subsection shall not exceed the average final compensation upon
which the retirement allowance is based. The minimum benefits provided
in this subsection shall apply to all retired members or to the
surviving spouse of deceased members who were elected to the office of
state senator or state representative.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, a member may
receive a retirement allowance pursuant to subsection (2) or (3) of
this section that is greater than sixty percent of his or her average
final compensation as provided in this subsection. The limit of sixty
percent of average final compensation shall be lifted by two percent of
average final compensation for each year of service credit year of
membership service earned after July 1, 2005, up to a maximum
retirement allowance of seventy percent of average final compensation.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.32.498 and 1994 c 197 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person who becomes a member subsequent to April 25, 1973 or who
has made the election, provided by RCW 41.32.497, to receive the
benefit provided by this section, shall receive a retirement allowance
consisting of:
(1) An annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his or
her additional contributions on full salary as provided by chapter 274,
Laws of 1955 and his or her lump sum payment in excess of the required
contribution rate made at date of retirement, pursuant to RCW
41.32.350, if any; and
(2) A combined pension and annuity service retirement allowance
which shall be equal to two percent of his or her average earnable
compensation for his or her two highest compensated consecutive years
of service times the total years of creditable service established with
the retirement system, to a maximum of sixty percent of such average
earnable compensation, except as provided in subsection (4) of this
section: PROVIDED, That any member may irrevocably elect, at time of
retirement, to withdraw all or a part of his or her accumulated
contributions, other than any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), and
to receive, in lieu of the full retirement allowance provided by this
subsection, a reduction in the standard two percent allowance, of the
actuarially determined amount of monthly annuity which would have been
purchased by said contributions: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no member may
withdraw an amount of accumulated contributions which would lower his
or her retirement allowance below the minimum allowance provided by RCW
41.32.497 as now or hereafter amended: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That said
reduced amount may be reduced even further pursuant to the options
provided in RCW 41.32.530;
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, the retirement allowance payable for service of a member
who was state superintendent of public instruction on January 1, 1973
shall be equal to three percent of the average earnable compensation of
his two highest consecutive years of service for each year of such
service;
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a member may
receive a retirement allowance pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section that is greater than sixty percent of his or her average final
compensation as provided in this subsection. The limit of sixty
percent of average final compensation shall be lifted by two percent of
average final compensation for each year of service credit year of
membership service earned after July 1, 2005, up to a maximum
retirement allowance of seventy percent of average final compensation.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.32.570 and 2003 c 295 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every seven hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred forty hours per month. Any monthly
benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the
benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) Any retired teacher or retired administrator who enters service
in any public educational institution in Washington state and who has
satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this
section shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in such
service, after the retiree has rendered service for more than ((one
thousand five hundred)) eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a school
year. ((When a retired teacher or administrator renders service beyond
eight hundred sixty-seven hours, the department shall collect from the
employer the applicable employer retirement contributions for the
entire duration of the member's employment during that fiscal year.))
(3) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the select
committee on pension policy.
(4) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to be employed for more than five hundred twenty-five hours per
year without a reduction of his or her pension.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.40.037 and 2003 c 412 s 5 and 2003 c 295 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2)(a) ((Except as provided in (b) of this subsection,)) A retiree
from plan 1 who enters employment with an employer at least one
calendar month after his or her accrual date may continue to receive
pension payments while engaged in such service for up to eight hundred
sixty-seven hours of service in a calendar year without a reduction of
pension.
(b) ((A retiree from plan 1 who enters employment with an employer
at least three calendar months after his or her accrual date and:
(i) Is hired into a position for which the employer has documented
a justifiable need to hire a retiree into the position;
(ii) Is hired through the established process for the position with
the approval of: A school board for a school district; the chief
executive officer of a state agency employer; the secretary of the
senate for the senate; the chief clerk of the house of representatives
for the house of representatives; the secretary of the senate and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives jointly for the joint
legislative audit and review committee, the legislative transportation
committee, the joint committee on pension policy, the legislative
evaluation and accountability program, the legislative systems
committee, and the statute law committee; or according to rules adopted
for the rehiring of retired plan 1 members for a local government
employer;
(iii) The employer retains records of the procedures followed and
decisions made in hiring the retiree, and provides those records in the
event of an audit; and
(iv) The employee has not already rendered a cumulative total of
more than one thousand nine hundred hours of service while in receipt
of pension payments beyond an annual threshold of eight hundred sixty-seven hours;
shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in that service
after the retiree has rendered service for more than one thousand five
hundred hours in a calendar year. The one thousand nine hundred hour
cumulative total under this subsection applies prospectively to those
retiring after July 27, 2003, and retroactively to those who retired
prior to July 27, 2003, and shall be calculated from the date of
retirement.
(c) When a plan 1 member renders service beyond eight hundred
sixty-seven hours, the department shall collect from the employer the
applicable employer retirement contributions for the entire duration of
the member's employment during that calendar year.
(d))) A retiree from plan 2 or plan 3 who has satisfied the break
in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section may work up
to eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a calendar year in an eligible
position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, or as
a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
without suspension of his or her benefit.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the
period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and
receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again
retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However, if the
right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous
retirement shall be reinstated.
(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the select
committee on pension policy.
(5) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to be employed for more than five months in a calendar year
without a reduction of his or her pension.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.40.037 and 2004 c 242 s 63 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2)(a) ((Except as provided in (b) of this subsection,)) A retiree
from plan 1 who enters employment with an employer at least one
calendar month after his or her accrual date may continue to receive
pension payments while engaged in such service for up to eight hundred
sixty-seven hours of service in a calendar year without a reduction of
pension.
(b) ((A retiree from plan 1 who enters employment with an employer
at least three calendar months after his or her accrual date and:
(i) Is hired into a position for which the employer has documented
a justifiable need to hire a retiree into the position;
(ii) Is hired through the established process for the position with
the approval of: A school board for a school district; the chief
executive officer of a state agency employer; the secretary of the
senate for the senate; the chief clerk of the house of representatives
for the house of representatives; the secretary of the senate and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives jointly for the joint
legislative audit and review committee, the legislative transportation
committee, the joint committee on pension policy, the legislative
evaluation and accountability program, the legislative systems
committee, and the statute law committee; or according to rules adopted
for the rehiring of retired plan 1 members for a local government
employer;
(iii) The employer retains records of the procedures followed and
decisions made in hiring the retiree, and provides those records in the
event of an audit; and
(iv) The employee has not already rendered a cumulative total of
more than one thousand nine hundred hours of service while in receipt
of pension payments beyond an annual threshold of eight hundred sixty-seven hours;
shall cease to receive pension payments while engaged in that service
after the retiree has rendered service for more than one thousand five
hundred hours in a calendar year. The one thousand nine hundred hour
cumulative total under this subsection applies prospectively to those
retiring after July 27, 2003, and retroactively to those who retired
prior to July 27, 2003, and shall be calculated from the date of
retirement.
(c) When a plan 1 member renders service beyond eight hundred
sixty-seven hours, the department shall collect from the employer the
applicable employer retirement contributions for the entire duration of
the member's employment during that calendar year.
(d))) A retiree from plan 2 or plan 3 who has satisfied the break
in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section may work up
to eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a calendar year in an eligible
position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or
41.40.010, or as a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her benefit.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the
period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and
receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again
retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However, if the
right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous
retirement shall be reinstated.
(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the select
committee on pension policy.
(5) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to be employed for more than five months in a calendar year
without a reduction of his or her pension.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Except for section 6 of this act, this act
is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 6 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 5 of this act expires July 1, 2006.

--- END ---