BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
State officers and state employees may fly with flight instructors
conducting training flights to airports not served by regular
commercial air service, as such activity by state officers and state
employees is presumed to be within the scope of their duties and not to
be in violation of the solicitation and receipt of gift provisions in
RCW 42.52.140 and 42.52.150.

--- END ---