BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any individual, business, or local governmental entity, not in
the light and power business or in the gas distribution business, may
apply to the light and power business serving the situs of the system,
each fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2005, for an investment cost
recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour from a customer-generated
electricity renewable energy system installed on its property. No
incentive may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated before July 1, 2005,
or after June 30, 2015.
(2)(a) Before submitting for the first time the application for the
incentive allowed under this section, the applicant shall submit to the
department of revenue and to the climate and rural energy development
center at the Washington State University, established under RCW
28B.30.642, a certification in a form and manner prescribed by the
department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) That the electricity produced by the applicant meets the
definition of "customer-generated electricity" and that the renewable
energy system produces electricity with:
(A) Any solar inverters and solar modules manufactured in
Washington state;
(B) A wind generator powered by blades manufactured in Washington
state;
(C) A solar inverter manufactured in Washington state;
(D) A solar module manufactured in Washington state; or
(E) Solar or wind equipment manufactured outside of Washington
state;
(iv) That the electricity can be transformed or transmitted for
entry into or operation in parallel with electricity transmission and
distribution systems;
(v) The date that the renewable energy system received its final
electrical permit from the applicable local jurisdiction.
(b) Within thirty days of receipt of the certification the
department of revenue shall advise the applicant in writing whether the
renewable energy system qualifies for an incentive under this section.
The department may consult with the climate and rural energy
development center to determine eligibility for the incentive. System
certifications and the information contained therein are subject to
disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(3)(a) By August 1st of each year application for the incentive
shall be made to the light and power business serving the situs of the
system by certification in a form and manner prescribed by the
department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) The date of the letter from the department of revenue stating
that the renewable energy system is eligible for the incentives under
this section;
(iv) A statement of the amount of kilowatt-hours generated by the
renewable energy system in the prior fiscal year.
(b) Within sixty days of receipt of the incentive certification the
light and power business serving the situs of the system shall notify
the applicant in writing whether the incentive payment will be
authorized or denied. The business may consult with the climate and
rural energy development center to determine eligibility for the
incentive payment. Incentive certifications and the information
contained therein are subject to disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(c)(i) Persons receiving incentive payments shall keep and
preserve, for a period of five years, suitable records as may be
necessary to determine the amount of incentive applied for and
received. Such records shall be open for examination at any time upon
notice by the light and power business that made the payment or by the
department. If upon examination of any records or from other
information obtained by the business or department it appears that an
incentive has been paid in an amount that exceeds the correct amount of
incentive payable, the business may assess against the person for the
amount found to have been paid in excess of the correct amount of
incentive payable and shall add thereto interest on the amount.
Interest shall be assessed in the manner that the department assesses
interest upon delinquent tax under RCW 82.32.050.
(ii) If it appears that the amount of incentive paid is less than
the correct amount of incentive payable the business may authorize
additional payment.
(4) The investment cost recovery incentive may be paid fifteen
cents per economic development kilowatt-hour unless requests exceed the
amount authorized for credit to the participating light and power
business. For the purposes of this section, the rate paid for the
investment cost recovery incentive may be multiplied by the following
factors:
(a) For customer-generated electricity produced using solar modules
manufactured in Washington state, two and four-tenths;
(b) For customer-generated electricity produced using a solar or a
wind generator equipped with an inverter manufactured in Washington
state, one and two-tenths;
(c) For customer-generated electricity produced using an anaerobic
digester, or by other solar equipment or using a wind generator
equipped with blades manufactured in Washington state, one; and
(d) For all other customer-generated electricity produced by wind,
eight-tenths.
(5) No individual, household, business, or local governmental
entity is eligible for incentives for more than two thousand dollars
per year.
(6) If requests for the investment cost recovery incentive exceed
the amount of funds available for credit to the participating light and
power business, the incentive payments shall be reduced
proportionately.
(7) The climate and rural energy development center at Washington
State University energy program may establish guidelines and standards
for technologies that are identified as Washington manufactured and
therefore most beneficial to the state's environment.
(8) The environmental attributes of the renewable energy system
belong to the applicant, and do not transfer to the state or the light
and power business upon receipt of the investment cost recovery
incentive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to charges made
for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing of
investment projects, and tangible personal property that will be
incorporated as an ingredient or component of investment projects
during the course of constructing, either of which is used for the
manufacture of solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules into a
solar energy system or for the manufacture of silicon components of
such systems, located in a rural county. The exemption is available
only when the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate
in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller shall
retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) To be eligible under this section the person must use the
investment project for the manufacturing of solar energy systems using
photovoltaic modules into a solar energy system or silicon components
of such systems for an eight-year period, such period beginning the day
the investment project commences commercial production, or a portion of
tax otherwise due shall be immediately due and payable pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section:
(a) Before commencing commercial production at the investment
project, the person must meet with the department to determine the date
on which commercial production commences. This date shall be used
throughout the eight-year period to determine whether any tax is to be
repaid. This information is not subject to the confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330.
(b) No application is necessary for the tax exemption. The person
is subject to all the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A person
taking the exemption under this section must report as required under
RCW 82.32.--- (section 4, Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5111).
(3) If the investment project is not used for manufacturing solar
energy systems using photovoltaic modules or silicon components of such
systems for any one calendar year, one-eighth of the exempt sales and
use taxes shall be due and payable by April 1st of the following year.
The department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes
for which the person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed
at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under this chapter,
retroactively to the date the exemption was claimed, and shall accrue
until the taxes for which the exemption was claimed are repaid.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Commencement of commercial production" is deemed to have
occurred when the equipment and process qualifications in the
investment project are completed and production for sale has begun.
(b) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the
project. An investment project does not include any portion of an
investment project undertaken by a light and power business as defined
in RCW 82.16.010(5), other than that portion of a cogeneration project
that is used to generate power for consumption within the manufacturing
site of which the cogeneration project is an integral part.
(c) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
(d) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures
including parking facilities, and expansion or renovation of existing
structures, for the purpose of increasing floor space or production
capacity used for manufacturing, including plant offices and warehouses
or other facilities for the storage of raw material or finished goods
if such facilities are an essential or an integral part of a factory,
mill, or plant, used for manufacturing. If a building is used partly
for manufacturing and partly for other purposes, the applicable tax
exemption shall be determined by apportionment of the costs of
construction under rules adopted by the department.
(e) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial
fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an integral and
necessary part of a manufacturing operation. "Qualified machinery and
equipment" includes manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys,
shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures;
and all equipment used to control or operate the machinery.
(f) "Rural county" means a county with a population density of
fewer than four persons per square mile.
(g) "Solar energy system" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.04.--- (section 2, Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5111).
(5) No exemption may be taken after June 30, 2014, however all of
the eligibility criteria and limitations are applicable to any
exemptions claimed before that date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an
ingredient or component of investment projects, either of which is used
for the manufacture of solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules
into a solar energy system or for the manufacture of silicon components
of such systems, located in a rural county, as defined in section 2 of
this act, during the course of constructing such investment projects or
to labor and services rendered in respect to installing, during the
course of constructing, building fixtures not otherwise eligible for
the exemption under RCW 82.08.02565(2)(b).
(2) The eligibility requirements, conditions, and definitions in
section 2 of this act apply to this section.
(3) No exemption may be taken after June 30, 2014, however all of
the eligibility criteria and limitations are applicable to any
exemptions claimed before that date.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under RCW 82.04.---(section 2, Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5111) for each
full-time employment position created by persons engaged in the
business of manufacturing solar energy systems using photovoltaic
modules into a solar energy system or the manufacturing of silicon
components of such systems. For the purposes of this section "solar
energy system" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.---(section 2, Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5111).
(2)(a) The credit under this section shall equal three thousand
dollars for each full-time employment position used in manufacturing
process that takes place in investment projects exempt from sales and
use tax under sections 2 and 3 of this act. A credit is earned for the
calendar year a person fills a position. Additionally a credit is
earned for each year the position is maintained over the subsequent
consecutive years, up to eight years. Those positions that are not
filled for the entire year are eligible for fifty percent of the credit
if filled less than six months, and the entire credit if filled six
months or more.
(b) To qualify for the credit, the manufacturing activity of the
person must be conducted at an investment project that qualifies for
the exemption from sales and use tax under sections 2 and 3 of this
act.
(3) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person is
subject to all of the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. In no case
may a credit earned during one calendar year be carried over to be
credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year. No
refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(4) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been claimed shall be immediately due. The
department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes for
which the person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
shall be retroactive to the date the tax credit was taken, and shall
accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.
(5) A person taking the credit under this section must report under
RCW 82.32.--- (section 4, Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5111).
(6) Credits may be taken after July 1, 2005, for those investment
projects at which commercial production began before June 30, 2014,
subject to all of the eligibility criteria and limitations of this
section.
(7) A person claiming credit under chapter 82.62 RCW or RCW
82.04.448 cannot claim a credit under this section.
(8) This section expires June 30, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Machinery and equipment exempt under RCW 82.08.02565 or
82.12.02565 used exclusively in the manufacture of solar energy systems
using photovoltaic modules into a solar energy system or the
manufacture of silicon components of such systems, at an investment
project exempt from sales and use tax under sections 2 and 3 of this
act are exempt from property taxation. "Solar energy system" has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.--- (section 2, Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5111).
(2) A person seeking this exemption must make application to the
county assessor, on forms prescribed by the department.
(3) This section is effective for taxes levied for collection one
year after the effective date of this section and thereafter.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2014, for taxes levied for
collection in the following year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---