BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The canvassing board may issue notice of a class 1 civil
infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW to any person challenging the
registration of another if the canvassing board determines that the
challenger: (a) Failed to exercise reasonable diligence in determining
the accuracy of the allegations on which the challenge is based; (b)
failed to base the challenge on his or her personal knowledge; (c) who
in issuing the challenge, primarily considered the voter's political
belief, political activity, or any characteristic protected by the law
against discrimination under chapter 49.60 RCW; or (d) issued a
challenge in bad faith or in an effort to intimidate, harass, or
otherwise deter a properly registered voter from voting.
(2) A voter whose registration has been challenged by another
registered voter is entitled to recover from the challenging voter
actual attorneys' fees incurred in opposing the challenge if the
challenge is rejected by the canvassing board or county auditor.

--- END ---