BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that schools are
increasingly required to play an expanding role in protecting our
children's health. Schools are responsible for monitoring the
immunization of children, evaluating children's hearing and vision, and
screening for scoliosis. Chronically ill children often require
medically ordered treatment to enable them to attend school.
Medication is often required to be given to children during the school
day. Schools are asked to coordinate with families and community
services to manage students with significant health problems and to
make referrals to appropriate community services. Schools are required
to abide by rules of confidentiality and to properly maintain health
care records.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The office of superintendent of public
instruction and the department of health shall collaborate and develop
a work group to assess school nursing services in class I school
districts. The work group shall consult with representatives from the
following groups: School nurses, schools, students, parents, teachers,
health officials, and administrators.
(2) The work group shall:
(a) Study the needs of students for school nursing services by
acuity levels, including the necessary skills to meet those demands.
The work group also shall recommend to the legislature best practices
in school nursing services, including the application of nurse
delegation models in the public school setting with particular
attention to the needs of small, rural schools, and geographically
isolated schools and school districts. The work group shall make
recommendations for school nursing services and may examine school
nursing services by grade level. The work group shall assess whether
funding for school nurses should continue as part of basic education;
(b) In collaboration with the school nurse corps and with public
health departments in rural geographic areas, evaluate the feasibility
of collaboration between school districts, educational services
districts, and local public health departments or districts to provide
school nursing services; and
(c) Explore the feasibility of blended funding options.
(3) As used in this section, "school nurse" means a person who:
(a) Holds a bachelor of science degree in nursing;
(b) Holds a valid license as a registered nurse (RN) in Washington
state; and
(c) Is certified as an educational staff associate under the
requirements established by the office of superintendent of public
instruction.
(4) The office of superintendent of public instruction shall report
its findings and plans for implementation to the legislature by March
1, 2007.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The school nurse account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from gifts, grants, or
endowments obtained under section 4 of this act must be deposited into
the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only to increase the
nursing services in class I school districts. School districts with
more than one thousand five hundred students for every school nurse
shall receive priority for these funds. As used in this section,
"school nurse" does not include nurses in the school nurse corps.
Only the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public or
private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or otherwise,
for the use and benefit of the purposes of section 3 of this act and
spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income from the public or private
sources to support the purpose in section 3 of this act, unless the
receipt of the gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17.710.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---