BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.08 RCW
to read as follows:
Every person holding an office, place, position, or employment
under the provisions of this chapter, who abandons his or her duties
during a state of emergency, as defined in RCW 43.06.210, shall be
immediately discharged.
For the purposes of this section, "abandons" means that the person
is absent without leave from an assigned shift or work station and the
person has expressed, either by statement or conduct, intent to abstain
from carrying out his or her duties, despite an ability to exercise
such duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Every person holding an office, place, position, or employment
under the provisions of this chapter, who abandons his or her duties
during a state of emergency, as defined in RCW 43.06.210, shall be
immediately discharged.
For the purposes of this section, "abandons" has the same meaning
as provided in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Every person holding an office, place, position, or employment
under the provisions of this chapter, who abandons his or her duties
during a state of emergency, as defined in RCW 43.06.210, shall be
immediately discharged.
For the purposes of this section, "abandons" has the same meaning
as provided in section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
Every Washington state patrol officer who abandons his or her
duties during a state of emergency, as defined in RCW 43.06.210, shall
be immediately discharged.
For the purposes of this section, "abandons" has the same meaning
as provided in section 1 of this act.

--- END ---