BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other special permits authorized by law, the
department of transportation shall issue special permits to an
applicant for the transport of overlength combination units if the
following conditions are met:
(a) The combination unit includes two full trailers, two
semitrailers, or one semitrailer and one full trailer, and the
combination unit does not exceed ninety feet in length;
(b) The trailers must be newly manufactured, newly repaired, or in
direct route to the repair shop, and the trailers will be transported
outside the state without a load and will not be used for commercial
purposes within the state; and
(c) The appropriate fees under RCW 46.44.0941 have been paid.
(2) Notwithstanding RCW 46.44.093, the department of transportation
must issue a special permit if the applicant satisfactorily
demonstrates that the conditions in subsection (1) of this section are
met.
(3) A special escort is not required for the transport of a
combination unit specially permitted under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.44.037 and 1991 c 143 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 46.44.036 and subject to such
rules and regulations governing their operation as may be adopted by
the state department of transportation, operation of the following
combinations is lawful:
(1) A combination consisting of a tractor or truck tractor, a
semitrailer, and another semitrailer or a full trailer. In this
combination a converter gear used to convert a semitrailer into a full
trailer shall be considered to be a part of the full trailer and not a
separate vehicle. A converter gear being pulled without load and not
used to convert a semitrailer into a full trailer may be substituted in
lieu of a full trailer or a semitrailer in any lawful combination;
(2) A combination not exceeding seventy-five feet in overall length
consisting of four trucks or truck tractors used in driveaway service
where three of the vehicles are towed by the fourth in triple
saddlemount position;
(3) A combination consisting of a truck tractor carrying a freight
compartment no longer than eight feet, a semitrailer, and another
semitrailer or full trailer that meets the legal length requirement for
a truck and trailer combination set forth in RCW 46.44.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect September 1, 2006.

--- END ---