BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.010 and 1997 c 3 s 202 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in this chapter, the levy for a taxing district
in any year shall be set so that the regular property taxes payable in
the following year shall not exceed the limit factor multiplied by the
amount of regular property taxes lawfully levied for such district in
the highest of the three most recent years in which such taxes were
levied for such district plus an additional dollar amount calculated by
multiplying the increase in assessed value in that district resulting
from new construction, increases in assessed value due to construction
of electric generation wind turbine facilities classified as personal
property, improvements to property, and any increase in the assessed
value of state-assessed property by the regular property tax levy rate
of that district for the preceding year.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.55.015 and 1999 c 96 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a taxing district has not levied since 1985 and elects to
restore a regular property tax levy subject to applicable statutory
limitations then such first restored levy shall be set so that the
regular property tax payable shall not exceed the amount which was last
levied, plus an additional dollar amount calculated by multiplying the
increase in assessed value in the district since the last levy
resulting from new construction ((and)), increases in assessed value
due to construction of electric generation wind turbine facilities
classified as personal property, improvements to property, and any
increase in the assessed value of state-assessed property by the
property tax rate which is proposed to be restored, or the maximum
amount which could be lawfully levied in the year such a restored levy
is proposed.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.55.020 and 1997 c 3 s 203 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding the limitation set forth in RCW 84.55.010, the
first levy for a taxing district created from consolidation of similar
taxing districts shall be set so that the regular property taxes
payable in the following year shall not exceed the limit factor
multiplied by the sum of the amount of regular property taxes lawfully
levied for each component taxing district in the highest of the three
most recent years in which such taxes were levied for such district
plus the additional dollar amount calculated by multiplying the
increase in assessed value in each component district resulting from
new construction ((and)), increases in assessed value due to
construction of electric generation wind turbine facilities classified
as personal property, improvements to property, and any increase in the
assessed value of state-assessed property by the regular property tax
rate of each component district for the preceding year.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.55.030 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 107 are each
amended to read as follows:
For the first levy for a taxing district following annexation of
additional property, the limitation set forth in RCW 84.55.010 shall be
increased by an amount equal to (1) the aggregate assessed valuation of
the newly annexed property as shown by the current completed and
balanced tax rolls of the county or counties within which such property
lies, multiplied by (2) the dollar rate that would have been used by
the annexing unit in the absence of such annexation, plus (3) the
additional dollar amount calculated by multiplying the increase in
assessed value in the annexing district resulting from new
constructions ((and)), increases in assessed value due to construction
of electric generation wind turbine facilities classified as personal
property, improvements to property, and any increase in the assessed
value of state-assessed property by the regular property tax levy rate
of that annexing taxing district for the preceding year.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.55.080 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
Pursuant to chapter 39.88 RCW, any increase in the assessed value
of real property within an apportionment district resulting from new
construction, increases in assessed value due to construction of
electric generation wind turbine facilities classified as personal
property, improvements to property, or any increase in the assessed
value of state-assessed property shall not be included in the increase
in assessed value resulting from new construction, increases in
assessed value due to construction of electric generation wind turbine
facilities classified as personal property, improvements, or any
increase in the assessed value of state-assessed property for purposes
of calculating any limitations upon regular property taxes under this
chapter until the termination of apportionment as set forth in RCW
39.88.070(4), as now or hereafter amended, except to the extent a
taxing district actually will receive the taxes levied upon this value.
Tax allocation revenues, as defined in RCW 39.88.020, as now or
hereafter amended, shall not be deemed to be "regular property taxes"
for purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.55.120 and 1997 c 3 s 209 are each amended to read
as follows:
A taxing district, other than the state, that collects regular
levies shall hold a public hearing on revenue sources for the
district's following year's current expense budget. The hearing must
include consideration of possible increases in property tax revenues
and shall be held prior to the time the taxing district levies the
taxes or makes the request to have the taxes levied. The county
legislative authority, or the taxing district's governing body if the
district is a city, town, or other type of district, shall hold the
hearing. For purposes of this section, "current expense budget" means
that budget which is primarily funded by taxes and charges and reflects
the provision of ongoing services. It does not mean the capital,
enterprise, or special assessment budgets of cities, towns, counties,
or special purpose districts.
If the taxing district is otherwise required to hold a public
hearing on its proposed regular tax levy, a single public hearing may
be held on this matter.
No increase in property tax revenue, other than that resulting from
the addition of new construction, increases in assessed value due to
construction of electric generation wind turbine facilities classified
as personal property, and improvements to property and any increase in
the value of state-assessed property, may be authorized by a taxing
district, other than the state, except by adoption of a separate
ordinance or resolution, pursuant to notice, specifically authorizing
the increase in terms of both dollars and percentage. The ordinance or
resolution may cover a period of up to two years, but the ordinance
shall specifically state for each year the dollar increase and
percentage change in the levy from the previous year.

--- END ---