BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
A person shall not operate a bicycle attached to an occupied baby
carrier on a street or other roadway, unless the bicycle is operated
within a city or town that prohibits the operation of bicycles on the
sidewalk adjacent to the street or other roadway.

--- END ---