BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.68.020 and 2004 c 200 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall forward all fees for certificates of ownership
or other moneys accruing under the provisions of chapter 46.12 RCW to
the state treasurer, together with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit such moneys as follows:
(1) The fees collected under RCW 46.12.040(1) and 46.12.101(6)
shall be credited to the multimodal transportation account in RCW
47.66.070.
(2)(a) Beginning July 27, 2003, and until July 1, 2008, the fees
collected under RCW 46.12.080, 46.12.101(3), 46.12.170, and 46.12.181
shall be credited as follows:
(i) 58.12 percent shall be credited to a segregated subaccount of
the air pollution control account in RCW 70.94.015;
(ii) 16.60 percent shall be credited to the vessel response account
created in RCW 90.56.335; and
(iii) The remainder shall be credited into the transportation 2003
account (nickel account).
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, and thereafter, the fees collected
under RCW 46.12.080, 46.12.101(3), 46.12.170, and 46.12.181 shall be
credited to the transportation 2003 account (nickel account).
(3) The fees collected under RCW ((46.12.040(3) and)) 46.12.060
shall be credited to the motor vehicle account.
(4) The fees collected under RCW 46.12.040(3) shall be credited to
the vehicle inspection account created in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The vehicle inspection account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from RCW 46.12.040(3) must be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
vehicle inspections conducted by the Washington state patrol. Only the
chief of the Washington state patrol or the chief's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

--- END ---