BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to amounts received for water services
supplied by a public utility district under Title 54 RCW, a water-sewer
district established under Title 57 RCW, or an irrigation district
established under Title 87 RCW, that has less than three hundred
connections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to amounts received for water services
supplied by a public utility district under Title 54 RCW, a water-sewer
district established under Title 57 RCW, or an irrigation district
established under Title 87 RCW, that has less than three hundred
connections.

--- END ---