BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) All school districts with a student enrollment of less than
three thousand students are exempt from all state statutes and rules
applicable to school districts and school district boards of directors
except as provided in this section.
(2) All such school districts may elect to comply with one or more
provisions of the statutes or rules that are applicable to school
districts and school district boards of directors.
(3) All such school directors shall:
(a) Comply with state and federal health, safety, and civil rights
laws applicable to school districts;
(b) Participate in the elementary, middle school, and high school
standards and assessment examinations as required in RCW 28A.655.061;
(c) Employ instructional staff certificated in accordance with
rules adopted under RCW 28A.410.010, but may hire noncertificated
instructional staff of unusual competence and in exceptional cases as
provided for in RCW 28A.150.260(3)(a);
(d) Comply with the employee record check requirements in RCW
28A.400.303;
(e) Be subject to the same financial and audit requirements as
other school districts;
(f) Comply with the annual school performance report under RCW
28A.655.110;
(g) Comply with the open public meetings act in chapter 42.30 RCW;
and
(h) Comply with chapters 41.56, 41.58, and 41.59 RCW.

--- END ---