BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the
following project loans recommended by the public works board are
authorized to be made with funds appropriated from the public works
assistance account:
(1) Alderwood water and wastewater district--sanitary sewer
project--upgrade the picnic point wastewater treatment facility and
increase the maximum month flow capacity from three million gallons per
day to six million gallons per day by improving the fine screening,
vortex grit removal, membrane bioreactor, and ultraviolet
disinfection . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(2) Arlington--sanitary sewer project--improve the solids handling
capacity of the wastewater treatment plant, expand the capacity of both
the solids processing and liquid treatment portions of the plant, and
alter the type of treatment process . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(3) Bainbridge Island--sanitary sewer project--construct an
enclosed building to house the headworks equipment, construct a new
building to house solid handling equipment, convert aeration for both
basins from surface aeration to diffused air, add solid storage basins,
upgrade two existing clarifiers and associated return activated sludge
pumps, construct vactor decanting station, and replace existing
electrical system . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,564,500
(4) Bellingham--domestic water project--remove an aging diversion
dam and replace its function with a withdrawal structure built into the
river that will not impede the natural flow of the river to restore
runs of two endangered species to the upper reaches of the middle fork
of the Nooksack river and connect it with the existing
system . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000
(5) Birch Bay water and sewer district--sanitary sewer
project--replace the sanitary sewer force main from pump station number
3 to the wastewater treatment plant and divert a portion of the
districts sewer flow around pump station number 4 directly to pump
station number 3 resulting in a twenty-six percent increase in sanitary
sewer conveyance capacity . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,305,625
(6) Buckley--sanitary sewer project--construction of a dewatering
building to house a belt filter press sludge dewatering machine,
rebuild and expand the wastewater treatment plant to provide nutrient
removal and accommodate the wastewater from Rainier school and
anticipated growth over the next twenty years, and construction of a
gravity interceptor. Improvements to the plant include enclosed
headworks with fine screens, grit removal, flow measurement and
sampling, biological nutrient removal activated sludge process with new
anaerobic basins, anoxic basins, and aeration basins, activated sludge
clarifiers, and return sludge pumping, followed by ultraviolet light
disinfection . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(7) Enumclaw--sanitary sewer project--upgrade and expand the
existing wastewater treatment plant including new headworks, new
extended aeration activated sludge basins, new anaerobic/anoxic basins
for phosphorus removal and denitrification, two additional secondary
clarifiers, chemical facilities for additional phosphorus removal in
the existing secondary clarifiers, sludge dewatering and stabilization
facilities, enlarged laboratory area, increasing capacity to
accommodate projected urban growth through 2022 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,700,000
(8) Everett--sanitary sewer project--limit biochemical oxygen
demand loads of the wastewater flowing into the aeration ponds to less
than 20,000 pounds per day by construction of a new treatment process
in the wastewater stream by constructing the primary clarifiers that
will feed up to 21,000,000 gallons per day to the trickling filters for
additional treatment, eliminate the use of chlorine gas and replace it
with a twelve percent sodium hypochlorite solution, construct a new 4.8
acre solids handling area to process biosolids, and modifications to
the laboratory and operations room . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(9) Holmes Harbor sewer district--sanitary sewer project--modify
the existing wastewater treatment plant and related systems to include
1,500,000 gallons of storage for incompletely treated effluent,
including appurtenant pumping, piping, and control
systems . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000
(10) King county water district number 54--domestic water project--replace and dispose of an eight-inch water distribution line and an
abandoned six-inch water line as part of a project to replace a fill
and box culvert with a bridge across Des Moines creek that will improve
fish migration and alleviate excess pooling and flooding, provide a
temporary line during construction, and install a permanent twelve-inch
line under the new bridge . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,300
(11) Kitsap county sewer district number 7--sanitary sewer
project--upgrade and add capacity to the wastewater treatment plant by
adding a second aeration basin, changing the existing aeration from a
floating aerator to fine bubble diffusers, add a third clarifier,
change influent screening from bars to a fine screen, add a second bank
of ultraviolet lights, add a third return activated sludge pump, add a
second sludge digester, and construct a utility building to house the
equipment . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,288,000
(12) Lake Stevens--sanitary sewer project--construction of a
membrane bioreactor tertiary wastewater treatment plant outside the
flood plain, construction of an interceptor line and pump station to
intercept and redirect existing flows to the new plant, and associated
easement acquisition, permit fees, construction management services,
and startup and operation and maintenance manuals . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(13) Lakehaven utility district--sanitary sewer
project--remove/replace and/or line approximately 1,030 feet of the
existing outfall pipe starting from 100 feet inland to the end of the
existing outfall, and extend the existing/new outfall from the previous
end point approximately 800 feet further into Puget Sound to ensure the
protection of shellfish beds in the area . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000
(14) Malaga water district--domestic water project--design and
construction of two pump stations, an approximately 60,000 gallon
reservoir, approximately 11,000 feet of transmission/distribution main,
a pressure reducing station, and other water system
appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,064,950
(15) Mercer Island--sanitary sewer project--install approximately
16,000 feet of eight to sixteen-inch sewer main and 7,000 feet of six-inch side sewer laterals in Lake Washington along the north and
northwest shoreline, replace and modify two pump stations, extend and
connect side sewer laterals to the new main, finalize easements with
approximately seventy-five property owners, install approximately ten
maintenance manholes and cleanouts, and environmental
mitigation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(16) Mill Creek--road project--replace existing culverts carrying
Penny creek under Mill Creek Road with a new bridge structure in a
different location by drilling piers along the outer edge of the
alignment, installing pipe caps and precast concrete bridge deck
panels, excavating under the panels, installing timber lagging as the
excavation progresses, and constructing concrete walls over the
lagging, reroute the streambed with some wetland mitigation work,
relocate existing water line, and plugging and abandoning the existing
culvert . . . . . . . . . . . . $921,500
(17) Mount Vernon--sanitary sewer project--construction of the
phase one improvements for the wastewater treatment facility including
a new pretreatment (grit and debris screening) facility, two additional
primary clarifiers, upgrade of the existing aeration basins, two
additional secondary clarifiers, an ultraviolet disinfection system for
the effluent (replacing chlorine gas system), and an extensive odor
control system . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(18) Moxee--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately 13,500
feet of wastewater conveyance piping and appurtenances along state
route number 24 from Moxee to Riverside Road, discharging to a new lift
station owned and operated by the Terrace Heights sewer
district . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(19) Mukilteo--storm sewer project--construct approximately 16,500
feet of new eighteen to forty-eight inch storm water conveyance
pipeline to transfer high storm water flows from Smugglers Gulch and
Big Gulch stream channels, restoring the stream channel, associated
fish and wildlife habitat, and adjacent infrastructure, as well as
provide mitigation for disturbed wetlands . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,587,200
(20) North Bend--domestic water project--drilling, testing, and
development of a new municipal supply well for the perfection of a new
water right application with the department of ecology to supply the
city and urban growth area with needed additional water, construction
of approximately 21,200 lineal foot twelve-inch diversion pipeline from
the south fork Tolt river reservoir to the north fork Snoqualmie
river . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,474,675
(21) North Bonneville--sanitary sewer project--install a new
headworks screen in the existing headworks structure, install a new
clarifier, including piping modifications, in the existing sewer
treatment plant, and painting existing metal surfaces in the existing
treatment plant unit . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
(22) Oak Harbor--domestic water project--design and construction of
approximately 5,700 feet of twenty-four inch diameter ductile iron
water transmission main along highway 20 between Pass Lake and Sharpe's
Corner as a replacement for existing water transmission main being
destroyed as a result of planned highway construction . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,694,500
(23) Okanogan county--sanitary sewer project--construction, right
of way acquisition and engineering for gravity and pressure pipe, lift
stations, telemetry, treatment plant improvements, and associated
facilities, water system improvements including supply main, fire
hydrants, air/vac facilities, storage, booster pumping, telemetry, and
applicable appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(24) Othello--road project--reconstruct 1,850 lineal feet of
arterial truck route (Broadway Avenue), to include surface, subsurface,
and impacted utilities, improved to heavy truck traffic standards,
retaining the existing sidewalks, curbs, and gutters . . . . . . . . . . . . $555,000
(25) Pullman--sanitary sewer project--construction of a new,
approximately 500,000 gallon, variable volume digester at the
wastewater treatment plant including site preparation, construction of
the digester, necessary piping modifications, upgrades to the existing
digesters as required to facilitate the new digester, and modifications
to the plant's existing electrical and supervisory control
system . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,870,000
(26) Sammamish Plateau water and sewer district--domestic water
project--design and construction of a new approximately 6.2 million
gallon per day water treatment facility to remove arsenic, hydrogen
sulfide, iron and manganese, and silica . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,843,250
(27) Sedro-Woolley--sanitary sewer project--construction of
approximately 29,700 linear feet of eight to thirty-inch pipes, and the
design of two sewer pump stations . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(28) Stanwood--domestic water project--prepare a feasibility study,
well desktop treatment study, and a preliminary engineering report to
determine the most cost-effective water system improvements, the most
effective well treatment methods, and outlining the principal design
criteria for all planned facilities, conduct a pilot plant study to
confirm effectiveness of treatment and provide/confirm design criteria,
obtain all necessary permits, prepare plans, specifications, and cost
estimates for all improvements, construct a new treatment plant for the
removal of arsenic, manganese, and hydrogen sulfide, construct
approximately 500 lineal feet of new transmission water main, and
approximately 1,500 linear feet of new distribution water mains to
connect to the existing system . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,194,733
(29) Stanwood--sanitary sewer project--parallel existing sewer
alignment with approximately 4,000 lineal feet of thirty-inch sewer
pipe in the same right of way corridor as the existing fourteen-inch
interceptor and have a flow capacity of 6.5 million gallons a day
sufficient to handle the projected 5.8 million gallons a day build
outflow, and the replacement of the existing eight and twelve-inch
water mains . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,031,500
(30) Tenino--sanitary sewer project--construction of a new
wastewater treatment plant and collection system with a membrane
bioreactor treatment plant with a capacity of 360,000 gallons per day
that will produce Class A reclaimed water, and approximately 68,516
lineal feet of one and one-half to six-inch diameter pipe and 784
individual grinder pumps . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(31) Terrace Heights sewer district--sanitary sewer project--construct a new lift station with a capacity of approximately 4,400
gallon per minute, approximately 11,700 feet of twelve-inch diameter
force mains from the new lift station to the Yakima regional wastewater
treatment facility, and approximately 4,200 feet of eight-inch diameter
gravity sewer main . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,655,000
(32) Union Gap--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately 3,800
feet of sewer line, institute hydrogen sulfide control measures at the
master lift station to reduce corrosion problems, complete eight sewer
pipeline point repairs, replace seven manholes, install manhole shields
on forty-five manholes located in areas of potential flooding,
investigate sixteen side sewer connections, conduct an inflow
evaluation during the next flooding event, and visually inspect
previously uninspected portions of the system . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,037,000
(33) Val Vue sewer district--sanitary sewer project--replace
approximately 11,000 linear feet of pipe and associated side sewers,
construction of approximately 1,900 linear feet of replacement main
line sewers, construction of approximately 1,600 linear feet of sewer
main replacement, replacement of approximately 300 linear feet of main,
replacement of approximately 120 side sewer stubs, and improvements to
a pump station by the addition of an emergency power
generator . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,554,700
(34) Whitworth water district number 2--domestic water
project--install approximately 11,900 feet of sixteen-inch water pipe,
22,440 feet of twelve-inch water pipe, 4,140 feet of eight-inch water
pipe together with valves, fire hydrants, and other appurtenances, and
construct an approximately two million gallon ground level steel water
reservoir, complete with access road, valving, level controls, and
other appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,496,600
(35) Zillah--sanitary sewer project--construct wastewater facility
improvements including a new screening system, construct a new aeration
basin of approximately 159,000 gallons, install baffles in both
clarifiers and replace the 28-year-old mechanical components of
clarifier number 1, install a positive displacement pump in the aerobic
digester building for automated daily sludge wasting, replace the
existing ultraviolet system with a new and larger system, construct an
effluent pump station to accommodate design peak hour flow, replace the
submerged turbine aerators with fine bubble diffusers, and provide 480
volt service to all process electrical equipment, and eliminate dual
voltage system now found at the plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,295,000
(36) Auburn--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately 13,100
linear feet of 10, 12, and 15 inch concrete pipes with 24, 27, and 36
inch sewer pipes to handle existing and future wastewater flows.
Removal of eight pressure reducing valves on a water transmission line
and storm system revisions . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
(37) Battle Ground--sanitary sewer project--upgrades at Salmon
Creek treatment plant to achieve added capacity and security.
Construction of the new Klineline sewer pump station and approximately
five miles of force main system to accommodate future pumping capacity
needs
. . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
(38) Bellevue--road project--improve a section of NE 24th Street
including widening the roadway to add five-foot bike lanes,
constructing curb, gutter, and sidewalk, and introduce calming
elements. The project is designed to improve safety by reducing areas
of conflict between vehicular and nonmotorized traffic by reducing
overall speeds . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
(39) Burien--storm sewer project--construct approximately 1,450
linear feet of 30 to 42 inch and approximately 300 linear feet of 24
inch storm water trunk lines to eliminate flooding in downtown Burien
during a 25-year storm event. Modify and expand the Ambaum regional
detention pond to accommodate peak flows and to control the release of
storm water in order to protect downstream habitat . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,547,000
(40) Clark public utilities--domestic water project--construct a
1,000 gallon per minute water supply well, construct and paint an
approximately 300,000 gallon reservoir, install a 500 gallon per minute
booster station, and replace approximately 90,000 feet of undersized
and deteriorated water line. These projects will increase fire flow
and generally improve the performance and reliability of the system
. . . . . . . . . . . . $5,087,250
(41) Edmonds--road project--provide the necessary slope stability
and improve the integrity of approximately 300 feet of roadway section
that has been slowly moving down the hill toward a house due to slope
failure . . . . . . . . . . . . $624,750
(42) Franklin County--road project--pave approximately 30 miles of
gravel roads throughout the county to save wear and tear on the
public's vehicles and savings in annual costs for maintenance
. . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
(43) Ilwaco--sanitary sewer project--replace a sewage pump station
and renovate another sewage pump station, both of which are 35 years
old to meet the department of ecology's requirements and save
approximately $13,000 every three years . . . . . . . . . . . . $237,960
(44) Lakewood--sanitary sewer project--construct three pump
stations, approximately 17,200 linear feet of force main, approximately
13,500 linear feet of gravity collector pipeline, and approximately 320
side sewer stubs to eliminate septic systems in the American Lake
gardens and Tillicum neighborhoods . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(45) Olympus terrace sewer district--sanitary sewer project--construction of approximately 8,000 linear feet of trunk pipeline and
approximately 16,500 linear feet of storm water conveyance pipeline to
prevent high storm water flows from further eroding stream channels
. . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(46) Seattle--storm sewer project--install approximately 2,860 feet
of storm drain and approximately 6,800 feet of pipe to alleviate
chronic flooding problems for at least 38 businesses and several
residences in South Park . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(47) Southwest suburban sewer district--sanitary sewer project--replace/rehabilitate approximately 16,700 linear feet of sewer mains to
reduce environmental and public health issues associated with sewer
backups . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,910,000
(48) Stevenson--domestic water project--replace a failing, unsafe,
and hazardous pump station to address fire flow requirements, convert
the vacated pump station into additional water reservoir storage, and
install approximately 6,250 feet of transmission main to eliminate
leaks . . . . . . . . . . . . $795,000
(49) Tacoma--domestic water project--construction of an ozonation
treatment plant capable of treating approximately 168 million gallons
per day that will provide disinfection and taste and odor compound
control . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(50) Vancouver--road project--widen approximately 5,000 linear feet
of NE 138th Street to four lanes with center left turn lane, bike
lanes, sidewalks, street lighting, and landscaping to increase capacity
and safety, and upgrade traffic control . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
(51) Washougal--sanitary sewer project--replace a pump station with
approximately 6,250 linear feet of force and gravity mains, extending
approximately 2,200 linear feet of gravity sewer, and extension of
approximately 2,000 linear feet of interceptor sewer. The improvements
protect the water quality of the Washougal River and serve the
projected 20-year growth of the area . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 For any project on the proposed public works
board recommended project list in section 1 of this act that replaces
a water line over a creek, and where the project need and timeline are
being determined by a state agency and the city within its boundaries,
the jurisdiction may be reimbursed for expenses incurred prior to the
execution of the loan agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---