BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to increase the authority of
the public disclosure commission to more effectively foster compliance
with our state's public disclosure and fair campaign practices act. It
is the intent of the legislature to make the agency's penalty authority
for violations of this chapter more consistent with other agencies that
enforce state ethics laws and more commensurate with the level of
political spending in the state of Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17.390 and 1993 c 2 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
One or more of the following civil remedies and sanctions may be
imposed by court order in addition to any other remedies provided by
law:
(1) If the court finds that the violation of any provision of this
chapter by any candidate or political committee probably affected the
outcome of any election, the result of said election may be held void
and a special election held within sixty days of such finding. Any
action to void an election shall be commenced within one year of the
date of the election in question. It is intended that this remedy be
imposed freely in all appropriate cases to protect the right of the
electorate to an informed and knowledgeable vote.
(2) If any lobbyist or sponsor of any grass roots lobbying campaign
violates any of the provisions of this chapter, his or her registration
may be revoked or suspended and he or she may be enjoined from
receiving compensation or making expenditures for lobbying: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That imposition of such sanction shall not excuse said
lobbyist from filing statements and reports required by this chapter.
(3) Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter
may be subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars
for each such violation. However, a person or entity who violates RCW
42.17.640 may be subject to a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars or
three times the amount of the contribution illegally made or accepted,
whichever is greater.
(4) Any person who fails to file a properly completed statement or
report within the time required by this chapter may be subject to a
civil penalty of ten dollars per day for each day each such delinquency
continues.
(5) Any person who fails to report a contribution or expenditure as
required by this chapter may be subject to a civil penalty equivalent
to the amount ((he failed to report)) not reported as required.
(6) The court may enjoin any person to prevent the doing of any act
herein prohibited, or to compel the performance of any act required
herein.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.17.395 and 1989 c 175 s 91 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may (a) determine whether an actual violation of
this chapter has occurred; and (b) issue and enforce an appropriate
order following such determination.
(2) The commission, in cases where it chooses to determine whether
an actual violation ((of this chapter)) has occurred, shall hold a
hearing pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05
RCW, to make such determination. Any order that the commission issues
under this section shall be pursuant to such hearing.
(3) In lieu of holding a hearing or issuing an order under this
section, the commission may refer the matter to the attorney general or
other enforcement agency as provided in RCW 42.17.360.
(4) The person against whom an order is directed under this section
shall be designated as the respondent. The order may require the
respondent to cease and desist from the activity that constitutes a
violation and in addition, or alternatively, may impose one or more of
the remedies provided in RCW 42.17.390(((1) (b), (c), (d), or (e):
PROVIDED, That)) (2) through (5). No individual penalty assessed by
the commission may exceed one thousand seven hundred dollars, and in
any case where multiple violations are involved in a single complaint
or hearing, the maximum aggregate penalty may not exceed ((two)) four
thousand ((five)) two hundred dollars.
(5) An order issued by the commission under this section shall be
subject to judicial review under the Administrative Procedure Act,
chapter 34.05 RCW. If the commission's order is not satisfied and no
petition for review is filed within thirty days as provided in RCW
34.05.542, the commission may petition a court of competent
jurisdiction of any county in which a petition for review could be
filed under that section, for an order of enforcement. Proceedings in
connection with the commission's petition shall be in accordance with
RCW 42.17.397.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---