BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that among the
laudable purposes and objectives for adopting a state building code is
the promotion of the health, safety, and welfare of homeowners who
remodel or add to their homes.
The legislature further finds that such purposes are not met unless
the state building code is effectively enforced through a comprehensive
inspection program, which emphasizes inspections of remodels and
additions to owner-occupied, single-family homes.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27.050 and 1985 c 360 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state building code required by this chapter shall be
enforced by the counties and cities. Any county or city not having a
building department shall contract with another county, city, or
inspection agency approved by the county or city for enforcement of the
state building code within its jurisdictional boundaries.
(2) A county or city violates this section when the jurisdiction
fails to provide: (a) An owner of record, who is remodeling or adding
to an owner-occupied, single-family residence, a copy of the inspection
schedule from the local permit issuing authority by regular mail; and
(b) a copy of the inspection schedule from the local permit issuing
authority to the owner of record at the site of the first inspection
required by the local permit issuing authority. The requirements of
this subsection only apply to remodels or additions to owner-occupied,
single-family residences.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2007.

--- END ---