BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.430 and 2005 c 274 s 423 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following information relating to fish and wildlife is exempt
from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Commercial fishing catch data from logbooks required to be
provided to the department of fish and wildlife under RCW 77.12.047,
when the data identifies specific catch location, timing, or
methodology and the release of which would result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the commercial fisher providing the catch data,
however, this information may be released to government agencies
concerned with the management of fish and wildlife resources;
(2) Sensitive fish and wildlife data ((obtained)). Sensitive fish
and wildlife data may be released to the following entities and their
agents for fish, wildlife, land management purposes, or scientific
research needs: Government agencies, public utilities, and accredited
colleges and universities. Sensitive wildlife data may also be
released to the owner, lessee, or right of way or easement holder of
the private land to which the data pertains. The release of sensitive
fish and wildlife data may be subject to a confidentiality agreement.
Sensitive fish and wildlife data must meet the following criteria of
this subsection as applied by the department of fish and wildlife((,
however, sensitive wildlife data may be released to government agencies
concerned with the management of fish and wildlife resources. As used
in this subsection, sensitive wildlife data includes)):
(a) The nesting sites or specific locations of endangered species
designated under RCW 77.12.020, or threatened or sensitive species
classified by rule of the department of fish and wildlife;
(b) Radio frequencies used in, or locational data generated by,
telemetry studies; or
(c) Other location data that could compromise the viability of a
specific fish or wildlife population, and where at least one of the
following criteria are met:
(i) The species has a known commercial or black market value;
(ii) There is a history of malicious take of that species; or
(iii) There is a known demand to visit, take, or disturb, ((and))
or the species behavior or ecology renders it especially vulnerable or
the species has an extremely limited distribution and concentration;
and
(3) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
recreational licenses under RCW 77.32.010 or commercial licenses under
chapter 77.65 or 77.70 RCW, except name, address of contact used by the
department, and type of license, endorsement, or tag; however, the
department of fish and wildlife may disclose personally identifying
information to:
(a) Government agencies concerned with the management of fish and
wildlife resources;
(b) The department of social and health services, child support
division, and to the department of licensing in order to implement RCW
77.32.014 and 46.20.291; and
(c) Law enforcement agencies for the purpose of firearm possession
enforcement under RCW 9.41.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

--- END ---