BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.010 and 2001 c 253 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a recreational
license issued by the director is required to hunt for or take wild
animals or wild birds, fish for, take, or harvest fish, shellfish, and
seaweed. A recreational fishing or shellfish license is not required
for carp, smelt, ((albacore,)) and crawfish, and a hunting license is
not required for bullfrogs.
(2) A permit issued by the department is required to park a motor
vehicle upon improved department access facilities.

--- END ---