BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.56.110 and 1994 c 264 s 95 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of fish and wildlife may adopt rules including, but
not limited to, the following:
(1) Procedures and methods of handling and caring for waterfowl or
other wildlife affected by spills of oil and other hazardous materials;
(2) The certification of persons trained in the removal of
pollutants from waterfowl or other wildlife;
(3) Development of procedures with respect to removal of oil and
other hazardous substances from waterfowl or other wildlife;
(4) The establishment of training exercises, courses, and other
training procedures as necessary((;
(5) Such other rules as may be reasonably necessary to carry out
the intent of RCW 90.56.100)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 90.56.100 (Washington wildlife rescue
coalition) and 2000 c 69 s 18, 1998 c 245 s 175, 1994 c 264 s 94, 1992
c 73 s 32, & 1990 c 116 s 12 are each repealed.

--- END ---