BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.550 and 2002 c 266 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A group fishing permit allows a group of individuals to fish,
and harvest shellfish, without individual licenses or the payment of
individual license fees.
(2) The director must issue a group fishing permit on a seasonal
basis to a state-operated facility or state-licensed nonprofit facility
or program for physically or mentally disabled persons, mentally ill
persons, hospital patients, handicapped persons, seriously or
terminally ill persons, persons who are dependent on the state because
of emotional or physical developmental disabilities, or senior citizens
who are in the care of the facility. The permit is valid only for use
during open season.
(3) The director may set conditions and issue a group fishing
permit to groups working in partnership with and participating in
department outdoor education programs. At the discretion of the
director, a processing fee may be applied.
(4) The commission ((must)) may adopt rules that provide the
conditions under which a group fishing permit ((must be)) is issued.

--- END ---