BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.26.020 and 2004 c 129 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the governing body of a regional fire protection
service authority.
(2) "Regional fire protection service authority" or "authority"
means a municipal corporation, an independent taxing authority within
the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a
taxing district within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution, whose boundaries are coextensive with two or more
adjacent fire protection jurisdictions and that has been created by a
vote of the people under this chapter to implement a regional fire
protection service authority plan.
(3) "Regional fire protection service authority planning committee"
or "planning committee" means the advisory committee created under RCW
52.26.030 to create and propose to fire protection jurisdictions a
regional fire protection service authority plan to design, finance, and
develop fire protection and emergency service projects.
(4) "Regional fire protection service authority plan" or "plan"
means a plan to develop and finance a fire protection service authority
project or projects, including, but not limited to, specific capital
projects, fire operations and emergency service operations pursuant to
RCW 52.26.040(3)(b), and preservation and maintenance of existing or
future facilities.
(5) "Fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire district, city,
town, port district, or Indian tribe.
(6) "Regular property taxes" has the same meaning as in RCW
84.04.140.

Sec. 2 RCW 52.26.040 and 2004 c 129 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A regional fire protection service authority planning committee
shall adopt a regional fire protection service authority plan providing
for the design, financing, and development of fire protection and
emergency services. The planning committee may consider the following
factors in formulating its plan:
(a) Land use planning criteria; and
(b) The input of cities and counties located within, or partially
within, a participating fire protection jurisdiction.
(2) The planning committee may coordinate its activities with
neighboring cities, towns, and other local governments that engage in
fire protection planning.
(3) The planning committee shall:
(a) Create opportunities for public input in the development of the
plan;
(b) Adopt a plan proposing the creation of a regional fire
protection service authority and recommending design, financing, and
development of fire protection and emergency service facilities and
operations, including maintenance and preservation of facilities or
systems((, except that no)). The plan may authorize the authority to
provide ambulance service ((may be recommended unless the regional fire
protection service)), directly or by contract after call for bids, only
after the board of the authority determines that the participating fire
protection jurisdictions ((that are members of the authority)) are not
adequately served by existing private ambulance service ((in which case
the authority may provide for the establishment of a system of
ambulance service to be operated by the authority or operated by
contract after a call for bids)); and
(c) In the plan, recommend sources of revenue authorized by RCW
52.26.050, identify the portions of the plan that may be amended by the
board of the authority without voter approval, consistent with RCW
52.26.050, and recommend a financing plan to fund selected fire
protection ((service)) and emergency services and projects.
(4) Once adopted, the plan must be forwarded to the participating
fire protection jurisdictions' governing bodies to initiate the
election process under RCW 52.26.060.
(5) If the ballot measure is not approved, the planning committee
may redefine the selected regional fire protection service authority
projects, financing plan, and the ballot measure. The fire protection
jurisdictions' governing bodies may approve the new plan and ballot
measure, and may then submit the revised proposition to the voters at
a subsequent election or a special election. If a ballot measure is
not approved by the voters by the third vote, the planning committee is
dissolved.

Sec. 3 RCW 52.26.050 and 2004 c 129 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A regional fire protection service authority planning committee
may, as part of a regional fire protection service authority plan,
recommend the imposition of some or all of the following revenue
sources, which a regional fire protection service authority may impose
upon approval of the voters as provided in this chapter:
(a) Benefit charges under RCW 52.26.180 through 52.26.270;
(b) Property taxes under RCW 52.26.140 through 52.26.170 and
84.52.044 and RCW 84.09.030, 84.52.010, 84.52.052, and 84.52.069; or
(c) Both (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(2) The authority may impose taxes and benefit charges ((may not be
imposed unless they are identified)) as set forth in the regional fire
protection service authority plan ((and the plan is)) upon creation of
the authority, or as provided for in this chapter after creation of the
authority. If the plan authorizes the authority to impose benefit
charges or sixty percent voter approved taxes, the plan and creation of
the authority must be approved by an affirmative vote of sixty percent
of the voters within the boundaries of the authority voting on a ballot
proposition as set forth in RCW 52.26.060. However, if the plan
provides for alternative sources of revenue that become effective if
the plan and creation of the authority is approved only by a majority
vote, then the plan with alternative sources of revenue and creation of
the authority may be approved by an affirmative vote of the majority of
those voters. If the plan does not authorize the authority to impose
benefit charges or sixty percent voter approved taxes, the plan and
creation of the authority must be approved by an affirmative vote of
the majority of the voters within the boundaries of the authority
voting on a ballot proposition as set forth in RCW 52.26.060. ((The
voter approval requirement)) Except as provided in this section ((is in
addition to any)), all other voter approval requirements under law for
the levying of property taxes or the imposition of benefit charges
apply. Revenues from these taxes and benefit charges may be used only
to implement the plan as set forth in this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 52.26.060 and 2004 c 129 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The governing bodies of two or more adjacent fire protection
jurisdictions, upon receipt of the regional fire protection service
authority plan under RCW 52.26.040, may certify the plan to the ballot,
including identification of the ((tax)) revenue options ((necessary))
specified to fund the plan. The governing bodies of the fire
protection jurisdictions may draft a ballot title, give notice as
required by law for ballot measures, and perform other duties as
required to put the plan before the voters of the proposed authority
for their approval or rejection as a single ballot measure that both
approves formation of the authority and approves the plan. Authorities
may negotiate interlocal agreements necessary to implement the plan.
The electorate is the voters voting within the boundaries of the
proposed regional fire protection service authority. A simple majority
of the total persons voting on the single ballot measure to approve the
plan((,)) and establish the authority((, and approve the taxes)) is
required for approval. However, if the plan authorizes the authority
to impose benefit charges or sixty percent voter approved taxes, then
the percentage of total persons voting on the single ballot measure to
approve the plan and establish the authority is the same as in RCW
52.26.050. The authority must act in accordance with the general
election laws of the state. The authority is liable for its
proportionate share of the costs when the elections are held under RCW
((29A.04.320)) 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330.

Sec. 5 RCW 52.26.070 and 2004 c 129 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the voters approve the plan, including creation of a regional
fire protection service authority and imposition of taxes and benefit
charges, if any, the authority is formed on the next January 1st or
July 1st, whichever occurs first. The appropriate county election
officials shall, within fifteen days of the final certification of the
election results, publish a notice in a newspaper or newspapers of
general circulation in the authority declaring the authority formed.
A party challenging the procedure or the formation of a voter-approved
authority must file the challenge in writing by serving the prosecuting
attorney of each county within, or partially within, the regional fire
protection service authority and the attorney general within thirty
days after the final certification of the election. Failure to
challenge within that time forever bars further challenge of the
authority's valid formation.

Sec. 6 RCW 52.26.090 and 2004 c 129 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governing board of the authority is responsible for the
execution of the voter-approved plan. Participating jurisdictions
shall review the plan every ten years. The board ((shall)) may:
(a) Levy ((and impose)) taxes and impose benefit charges as
authorized in the plan and approved by authority voters;
(b) Enter into agreements with federal, state, local, and regional
entities and departments as necessary to accomplish authority purposes
and protect the authority's investments;
(c) Accept gifts, grants, or other contributions of funds that will
support the purposes and programs of the authority;
(d) Monitor and audit the progress and execution of fire protection
and emergency service projects to protect the investment of the public
and annually make public its findings;
(e) Pay for services and enter into leases and contracts, including
professional service contracts;
(f) Hire, manage, and terminate employees; and
(g) Exercise ((other)) powers and perform duties as ((may be
reasonable)) the board determines necessary to carry out the purposes,
functions, and projects of the authority in accordance with Title 52
RCW if one of the fire protection jurisdictions is a fire district,
unless provided otherwise in the regional fire protection service
authority plan, or in accordance with the statutes identified in the
plan if none of the fire protection jurisdictions is a fire district.
(2) ((An authority may acquire, hold, or dispose of real property.
(3) An authority may exercise the powers of eminent domain.
(4))) An authority may enforce fire codes as provided under chapter
19.27 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 52.26.100 and 2004 c 129 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in the regional fire protection
service authority plan, all powers, duties, and functions of a
participating fire protection jurisdiction pertaining to ((providing))
fire protection and emergency services ((may)) shall be transferred((,
by resolution,)) to the regional fire protection service authority on
its creation date.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in the regional fire protection
service authority plan, and on the creation date of the regional fire
protection service authority, all reports, documents, surveys, books,
records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the
participating fire protection jurisdiction pertaining to ((the)) fire
protection and emergency services powers, functions, and duties
((transferred)) shall be delivered to the ((custody of the)) regional
fire protection service authority((.)); all real property and personal
property including cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the participating
fire protection jurisdiction in carrying out the fire protection and
emergency services powers, functions, and duties ((transferred)) shall
be ((made available)) transferred to the regional fire protection
service authority((.)); and all funds, credits, or other assets held by
the participating fire protection jurisdiction in connection with the
fire protection and emergency services powers, functions, and duties
((transferred)) shall be ((assigned)) transferred and credited to the
regional fire protection service authority.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in the regional fire protection
service authority plan, any appropriations made to the participating
fire protection jurisdiction for carrying out the fire protection and
emergency services powers, functions, and duties ((transferred))
shall((, on the effective date of the resolution,)) be transferred and
credited to the regional fire protection service authority.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in the regional fire protection
service authority plan, whenever any question arises as to the transfer
of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files,
equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of
the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred,
the governing body of the participating fire protection jurisdiction
shall make a determination as to the proper allocation.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in the regional fire protection
service authority plan, all rules and all pending business before the
participating fire protection jurisdiction pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by
the regional fire protection service authority((.)), and all existing
contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be
performed by the regional fire protection service authority.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the participating fire protection jurisdiction shall not affect the
validity of any act performed before ((the effective date of the
resolution)) creation of the regional fire protection service
authority.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers ((directed by the resolution)), the treasurer ((under RCW
52.26.170)) for the authority shall certify the apportionments.
(6) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified as provided by law. RCW
((35.13.215 through 35.13.235)) 52.06.110 through 52.06.130 apply to
the transfer of employees under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 52.26 RCW
to read as follows:
Territory that is annexed to a participating jurisdiction is
annexed to the authority as of the effective date of the annexation.
The statutes regarding transfer of assets and employees do not apply to
the participating jurisdictions in the annexation.

Sec. 9 RCW 52.26.130 and 2004 c 129 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless contrary to this section, chapter 39.42 RCW applies to
debt and bonding under this section. The authority may borrow money,
but may not issue any debt of its own for more than ten years'
duration.)) An authority may incur general indebtedness for authority
purposes, issue bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness ((with
a maturity of not more than twenty years. An authority may, when
authorized by the plan, enter into agreements with the state to pledge
taxes or other revenues of the authority for the purpose of paying in
part or whole principal and interest on bonds issued by the authority))
not to exceed an amount, together with any outstanding nonvoter
approved general obligation debt, equal to three-fourths of one percent
of the value of the taxable property within the authority. The maximum
term of the obligations may not exceed twenty years. The obligations
may pledge benefit charges and may pledge payments to an authority from
the state, the federal government, or any fire protection jurisdiction
under an interlocal contract. The interlocal contracts pledging
revenues and taxes are binding for ((the)) a term ((of the agreement,
but)) not to exceed twenty-five years, and ((no tax)) taxes or other
revenue pledged by an ((agreement)) interlocal contract may not be
eliminated or modified if it would impair the pledge of the
((agreement)) contract. An authority may also issue general obligation
bonds for capital purposes not to exceed an amount, together with any
outstanding general obligation debt, equal to one and one-half percent
of the value of the taxable property within the authority, and to
provide for the retirement thereof by excess property tax levies, when
the voters of the authority have approved a proposition authorizing
indebtedness and levies by an affirmative vote of three-fifths of those
voting on the proposition at an election, at which election the total
number of persons voting constitutes not less than forty percent of the
voters in the authority who voted at the last preceding general state
election. The maximum term of the bonds may not exceed twenty-five
years. Elections shall be held as provided in RCW 39.36.050.
Obligations of an authority shall be issued and sold in accordance with
chapters 39.46 and 39.50 RCW, as applicable.

Sec. 10 RCW 52.26.140 and 2004 c 129 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To carry out the purposes for which a regional fire protection
service authority is created, as authorized in the plan and approved by
the voters, the governing board of an authority may annually levy the
following taxes:
(a) An ad valorem tax on all taxable property located within the
authority not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value;
(b) An ad valorem tax on all property located within the authority
not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value and
which will not cause the combined levies to exceed the constitutional
or statutory limitations. This levy, or any portion of this levy, may
also be made when dollar rates of other taxing units are released by
agreement with the other taxing units from their authorized levies; and
(c) An ad valorem tax on all taxable property located within the
authority not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value if the authority has at least one full-time, paid employee, or
contracts with another municipal corporation for the services of at
least one full-time, paid employee. This levy may be made only if it
will not affect dollar rates which other taxing districts may lawfully
claim nor cause the combined levies to exceed the constitutional or
statutory limitations or both.
(2) Levies in excess of the amounts provided in subsection (1) of
this section or in excess of the aggregate dollar rate limitations or
both may be made for any authority purpose when so authorized at a
special election under RCW 84.52.052. Any such tax when levied must be
certified to the proper county officials for the collection of the tax
as for other general taxes. The taxes when collected shall be placed
in the appropriate authority fund or funds as provided by law, and must
be paid out on warrants of the auditor of the county in which all, or
the largest portion of, the authority is located, upon authorization of
the governing board of the authority.
(3) ((Authorities are additionally authorized to incur general
indebtedness and to issue general obligation bonds for capital purposes
as provided in RCW 52.26.130.)) Authorities may provide for the
retirement of general indebtedness by excess property tax levies((,
when the voters of the authority have approved a proposition
authorizing such indebtedness and levies by an affirmative vote of
three-fifths of those voting on the proposition at such an election, at
which election the total number of persons voting shall constitute not
less than forty percent of the voters in the authority who voted at the
last preceding state general election. Elections must be held as
provided in RCW 39.36.050. The maximum term of any bonds issued under
the authority of this section may not exceed ten years and must be
issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW)) as set forth in
RCW 52.26.130.
(4) For purposes of this ((section)) chapter, the term "value of
the taxable property" has the same meaning as in RCW 39.36.015.

Sec. 11 RCW 52.26.220 and 2004 c 129 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter to the
contrary, any benefit charge authorized by this chapter is not
effective unless a proposition to impose the benefit charge is approved
by a sixty percent majority of the voters of the regional fire
protection service authority voting at a general election or at a
special election called by the authority for that purpose, held within
the authority. A ballot measure that contains an authorization to
impose benefit charges and that is approved by the voters pursuant to
RCW 52.26.060 meets the proposition approval requirement of this
section. An election held under this section must be held not more
than twelve months prior to the date on which the first charge is to be
assessed. A benefit charge approved at an election expires in six
years or fewer as authorized by the voters, unless subsequently
reapproved by the voters.
(2) The ballot must be submitted so as to enable the voters
favoring the authorization of a regional fire protection service
authority benefit charge to vote "Yes" and those opposed to vote "No."
The ballot question is as follows:

"Shall . . . . . . the regional fire protection service
authority composed of (insert the participating fire protection
jurisdictions) . . . . . be authorized to impose benefit
charges each year for . . . . (insert number of years not to
exceed six) years, not to exceed an amount equal to sixty
percent of its operating budget, and be prohibited from
imposing an additional property tax under RCW 52.26.140(1)(c)?

YES NO
□ □"

(3) Authorities renewing the benefit charge may elect to use the
following alternative ballot:

"Shall . . . . . the regional fire protection service authority
composed of (insert the participating fire protection
jurisdictions) . . . . . . be authorized to continue voter-authorized benefit charges each year for . . . . (insert number
of years not to exceed six) years, not to exceed an amount
equal to sixty percent of its operating budget, and be
prohibited from imposing an additional property tax under RCW
52.26.140(1)(c)?

YES NO
□ □"

--- END ---