BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.146.005 and 1994 c 33 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds and declares that the brokering of
residential real estate loans substantially affects the public
interest. The practices of mortgage brokers and loan originators have
had significant impact on the citizens of the state and the banking and
real estate industries. It is the intent of the legislature to
establish a state system of licensure in addition to rules of practice
and conduct of mortgage brokers and loan originators to promote honesty
and fair dealing with citizens and to preserve public confidence in the
lending and real estate community.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.146.010 and 1997 c 106 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Affiliate" means any person who directly or indirectly through
one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under
common control with another person.
(2) "Application" means the same as in Regulation X, Real Estate
Settlement Procedures, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500.
(3) "Borrower" means any person who consults with or retains a
mortgage broker or loan originator in an effort to obtain or seek
advice or information on obtaining or applying to obtain a residential
mortgage loan for himself, herself, or persons including himself or
herself, regardless of whether the person actually obtains such a loan.
(((3))) (4) "Computer loan information systems" or "CLI system"
means ((the real estate mortgage financing information system defined
by rule of the director)) a real estate mortgage financing information
system that facilitates the provision of information to consumers by a
mortgage broker, loan originator, lender, real estate agent, or other
person regarding interest rates and other loan terms available from
different lenders.
(((4))) (5) "Department" means the department of financial
institutions.
(((5))) (6) "Designated broker" means a natural person designated
((by the applicant for a license or licensee)) as the person
responsible for activities of the licensed mortgage broker in
conducting the business of a mortgage broker under this chapter and who
meets the experience((, education,)) and examination requirements set
forth in RCW 19.146.210(1)(e).
(((6))) (7) "Director" means the director of financial
institutions.
(((7))) (8) "Employee" means an individual who has an employment
relationship ((acknowledged by both the employee and the licensee))
with a mortgage broker, and the individual is treated as an employee by
the ((licensee)) mortgage broker for purposes of compliance with
federal income tax laws.
(((8))) (9) "Independent contractor" or "person who independently
contracts" means any person that expressly or impliedly contracts to
perform mortgage brokering services for another and that with respect
to its manner or means of performing the services is not subject to the
other's right of control, and that is not treated as an employee by the
other for purposes of compliance with federal income tax laws.
(((9) "Investigation" means an examination undertaken for the
purpose of detection of violations of this chapter or securing
information lawfully required under this chapter.))
(10) "Loan originator" means a natural person ((employed, either
directly or indirectly, or retained as an independent contractor by a
person required to be licensed as a mortgage broker, or a natural
person who represents a person required to be licensed as a mortgage
broker, in the performance of any act specified in subsection (12) of
this section)) who (a) takes a residential mortgage loan application
for a mortgage broker, or (b) offers or negotiates terms of a mortgage
loan, for direct or indirect compensation or gain, or in the
expectation of direct or indirect compensation or gain. "Loan
originator" also includes a person who holds themselves out to the
public as able to perform any of these activities. "Loan originator"
does not mean persons performing purely administrative or clerical
tasks for a mortgage broker. For the purposes of this subsection,
"administrative or clerical tasks" means the receipt, collection, and
distribution of information common for the processing of a loan in the
mortgage industry and communication with a borrower to obtain
information necessary for the processing of a loan. A person who holds
himself or herself out to the public as able to obtain a loan is not
performing administrative or clerical tasks.
(11) "Lock-in agreement" means an agreement with a borrower made by
a mortgage broker or loan originator, in which the mortgage broker or
loan originator agrees that, for a period of time, a specific interest
rate or other financing terms will be the rate or terms at which it
will make a loan available to that borrower.
(12) "Mortgage broker" means any person who for compensation or
gain, or in the expectation of compensation or gain (a) makes a
residential mortgage loan or assists a person in obtaining or applying
to obtain a residential mortgage loan or (b) holds himself or herself
out as being able to make a residential mortgage loan or assist a
person in obtaining or applying to obtain a residential mortgage loan.
(13) "Person" means a natural person, corporation, company, limited
liability corporation, partnership, or association.
(14) "Principal" means any person who controls, directly or
indirectly through one or more intermediaries, or alone or in concert
with others, a ten percent or greater interest in a partnership,
company, association, or corporation, and the owner of a sole
proprietorship.
(15) "Residential mortgage loan" means any loan primarily for
personal, family, or household use secured by a mortgage or deed of
trust on residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended
to be constructed a single family dwelling or multiple family dwelling
of four or less units.
(((15))) (16) "Third-party provider" means any person other than a
mortgage broker or lender who provides goods or services to the
mortgage broker in connection with the preparation of the borrower's
loan and includes, but is not limited to, credit reporting agencies,
title companies, appraisers, structural and pest inspectors, or escrow
companies.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.146.020 and 1997 c 106 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsections (2) ((and (3))) through
(4) of this section, the following are exempt from all provisions of
this chapter:
(a)(i) Any person doing business under the laws of the state of
Washington or the United States, and any federally insured depository
institution doing business under the laws of any other state, relating
to commercial banks, bank holding companies, savings banks, trust
companies, savings and loan associations, credit unions, ((consumer
loan companies,)) insurance companies, or real estate investment trusts
as defined in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 856 and the affiliates, subsidiaries, and
service corporations thereof; and
(ii) Subject to the director's written approval, the exclusive
agents of an affiliate of a bank that is wholly owned by the bank
holding company that owns the bank;
(b) Any person doing business under the consumer loan act is exempt
from this chapter only for that business conducted under the authority
and coverage of the consumer loan act;
(c) An attorney licensed to practice law in this state who is not
principally engaged in the business of negotiating residential mortgage
loans when such attorney renders services in the course of his or her
practice as an attorney;
(((c))) (d) Any person doing any act under order of any court,
except for a person subject to an injunction to comply with any
provision of this chapter or any order of the director issued under
this chapter;
(((d))) (e) Any person making or acquiring a residential mortgage
loan solely with his or her own funds for his or her own investment
without intending to resell the residential mortgage loans;
(((e))) (f) A real estate broker or salesperson licensed by the
state who obtains financing for a real estate transaction involving a
bona fide sale of real estate in the performance of his or her duties
as a real estate broker and who receives only the customary real estate
broker's or salesperson's commission in connection with the
transaction;
(((f))) (g) Any mortgage broker approved and subject to auditing by
the federal national mortgage association or the federal home loan
mortgage corporation;
(((g))) (h) The United States of America, the state of Washington,
any other state, and any Washington city, county, or other political
subdivision, and any agency, division, or corporate instrumentality of
any of the entities in this subsection (1)(((g))) (h); and
(((h))) (i) A real estate broker who provides only information
regarding rates, terms, and lenders in connection with a CLI system,
who receives a fee for providing such information, who conforms to all
rules of the director with respect to the providing of such service,
and who discloses on a form approved by the director that to obtain a
loan the borrower must deal directly with a mortgage broker or lender.
However, a real estate broker shall not be exempt if he or she does any
of the following:
(i) Holds himself or herself out as able to obtain a loan from a
lender;
(ii) Accepts a loan application, or submits a loan application to
a lender;
(iii) Accepts any deposit for third-party services or any loan fees
from a borrower, whether such fees are paid before, upon, or after the
closing of the loan;
(iv) Negotiates rates or terms with a lender on behalf of a
borrower; or
(v) Provides the disclosure required by RCW 19.146.030(1).
(2) Those persons and their loan originators otherwise exempt under
subsection (1)(((d) or (f))) (e), (g), or (4) of this section must
comply with RCW 19.146.0201 ((and shall be subject to the director's
authority to issue a cease and desist order for any violation of RCW
19.146.0201 and shall be subject to the director's authority)) through
19.146.080. For violations of RCW 19.146.0201 through 19.146.080, the
director has authority to issue a cease and desist order as provided in
RCW 19.146.220 and 19.146.227, to impose penalties as provided in RCW
19.146.220, and to obtain and review books and records that are
relevant to any allegation of such a violation as provided in RCW
19.146.235.
(3) Any person otherwise exempted from the licensing provisions of
this chapter may voluntarily submit an application to the director for
a mortgage broker's license. The director shall review such
application and may grant or deny licenses to such applicants upon the
same grounds and with the same fees as may be applicable to persons
required to be licensed under this chapter.
(a) Upon receipt of a license under this subsection, ((such an
applicant)) the licensee is required to continue to maintain a valid
license, is subject to all provisions of this chapter, and has no
further right to claim exemption from the provisions of this chapter
except as provided in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Any licensee under this subsection who would otherwise be
exempted from the requirements of licensing by ((RCW 19.146.020)) this
section may apply to the director for exemption from licensing. The
director shall adopt rules for reviewing such applications and shall
grant exemptions from licensing to applications which are consistent
with those rules and consistent with the other provisions of this
chapter.
(4) The director may exempt an exclusive agent under subsection
(1)(a) of this section provided that the affiliate in subsection (1)(a)
of this section:
(a) Applies for and maintains a license as provided by subsection
(3) of this section;
(b) Has on file with the director a binding written agreement under
which the affiliate assumes responsibility for the exclusive agent's
violations of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter; and
(c) Maintains a bond or other security in an amount required by the
director that runs to the benefit of the state and any person who
suffers loss by reason of the exclusive agent's violation of this
chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.146.0201 and 1997 c 106 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is a violation of this chapter for a loan originator, mortgage
broker required to be licensed under this chapter, or mortgage broker
otherwise exempted from this chapter under RCW 19.146.020(1) (((d) or
(f) in connection with a residential mortgage loan)) (e), (g), or (4)
to:
(1) Directly or indirectly employ any scheme, device, or artifice
to defraud or mislead borrowers or lenders or to defraud any person;
(2) Engage in any unfair or deceptive practice toward any person;
(3) Obtain property by fraud or misrepresentation;
(4) Solicit or enter into a contract with a borrower that provides
in substance that the mortgage broker may earn a fee or commission
through the mortgage broker's "best efforts" to obtain a loan even
though no loan is actually obtained for the borrower;
(5) Solicit, advertise, or enter into a contract for specific
interest rates, points, or other financing terms unless the terms are
actually available at the time of soliciting, advertising, or
contracting from a person exempt from licensing under RCW 19.146.020(1)
(((f) or)) (g) or (h) or a lender with whom the mortgage broker
maintains a written correspondent or loan ((brokerage)) broker
agreement under RCW 19.146.040;
(6) Fail to make disclosures to loan applicants and
noninstitutional investors as required by RCW 19.146.030 and any other
applicable state or federal law;
(7) Make, in any manner, any false or deceptive statement or
representation with regard to the rates, points, or other financing
terms or conditions for a residential mortgage loan or engage in bait
and switch advertising;
(8) Negligently make any false statement or knowingly and willfully
make any omission of material fact in connection with any reports filed
by a mortgage broker or in connection with any investigation conducted
by the department;
(9) Make any payment, directly or indirectly, to any appraiser of
a property, for the purposes of influencing the independent judgment of
the appraiser with respect to the value of the property;
(10) Advertise any rate of interest without conspicuously
disclosing the annual percentage rate implied by such rate of interest
((or otherwise));
(11) Fail to comply with any requirement of the truth-in-lending
act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Sec. 226((,)); the
real estate settlement procedures act, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 and
Regulation X, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500((, or)); the equal credit opportunity
act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1691 and Regulation B, Sec. 202.9, 202.11, and
202.12((, as now or hereafter amended, in any advertising of
residential mortgage loans or any other mortgage brokerage activity));
Title V, Subtitle A of the financial modernization act of 1999 (known
as the "Gramm-Leach-Bliley act"), 12 U.S.C. Secs. 6801-6809; the
federal trade commission's privacy rules, 16 C.F.R. Parts 313-314,
mandated by the Gramm-Leach-Bliley act; the home mortgage disclosure
act, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 2801 et seq. and Regulation C, home mortgage
disclosure; the federal trade commission act, 12 C.F.R. Part 203, 15
U.S.C. Sec. 45(a); the telemarketing and consumer fraud and abuse act,
15 U.S.C. Secs. 6101 to 6108; and the federal trade commission
telephone sales rule, 16 C.F.R. Part 310, as these acts existed on the
effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be
provided by the department by rule, in any advertising of residential
mortgage loans, or any other applicable mortgage broker or loan
originator activities covered by the acts. The department may adopt by
rule requirements that mortgage brokers and loan originators comply
with other applicable federal statutes and regulations in any
advertising of residential mortgage loans, or any other mortgage broker
or loan originator activity;
(((11))) (12) Fail to pay third-party providers no later than
thirty days after the recording of the loan closing documents or ninety
days after completion of the third-party service, whichever comes
first, unless otherwise agreed or unless the third-party service
provider has been notified in writing that a bona fide dispute exists
regarding the performance or quality of the third-party service;
(((12))) (13) Collect, charge, attempt to collect or charge or use
or propose any agreement purporting to collect or charge any fee
prohibited by RCW 19.146.030 or 19.146.070;
(((13))) (14)(a) Except when complying with (b) and (c) of this
subsection, ((to)) act as a ((mortgage broker)) loan originator in any
transaction (i) in which the ((mortgage broker)) loan originator acts
or has acted as a real estate broker or salesperson or (ii) in which
another person doing business under the same licensed real estate
broker acts or has acted as a real estate broker or salesperson;
(b) Prior to providing mortgage ((broker)) services to the
borrower, ((the mortgage broker)) a loan originator, in addition to
other disclosures required by this chapter and other laws, shall
provide to the borrower the following written disclosure:

THIS IS TO GIVE YOU NOTICE THAT I OR ONE OF MY ASSOCIATES
HAVE/HAS ACTED AS A REAL ESTATE BROKER OR SALESPERSON
REPRESENTING THE BUYER/SELLER IN THE SALE OF THIS PROPERTY TO
YOU. I AM ALSO A ((LICENSED MORTGAGE BROKER)) LOAN ORIGINATOR,
AND WOULD LIKE TO PROVIDE MORTGAGE ((BROKERAGE)) SERVICES TO
YOU IN CONNECTION WITH YOUR LOAN TO PURCHASE THE PROPERTY.

YOU ARE NOT REQUIRED TO USE ME AS A ((MORTGAGE BROKER)) LOAN
ORIGINATOR IN CONNECTION WITH THIS TRANSACTION. YOU ARE FREE
TO COMPARISON SHOP WITH OTHER MORTGAGE BROKERS AND LENDERS, AND
TO SELECT ANY MORTGAGE BROKER OR LENDER OF YOUR CHOOSING; and

(c) A real estate broker or salesperson licensed under chapter
18.85 RCW who also acts as a mortgage broker shall carry on such
mortgage ((brokerage)) broker business activities and shall maintain
such person's mortgage ((brokerage)) broker business records separate
and apart from the real estate ((brokerage)) broker activities
conducted pursuant to chapter 18.85 RCW. Such activities shall be
deemed separate and apart even if they are conducted at an office
location with a common entrance and mailing address, so long as each
business is clearly identified by a sign visible to the public, each
business is physically separated within the office facility, and no
deception of the public as to the separate identities of the
((brokerage)) broker business firms results. This subsection (((13)))
(14)(c) shall not require a real estate broker or salesperson licensed
under chapter 18.85 RCW who also acts as a mortgage broker to maintain
a physical separation within the office facility for the conduct of its
real estate and mortgage ((brokerage)) broker activities where the
director determines that maintaining such physical separation would
constitute an undue financial hardship upon the mortgage broker and is
unnecessary for the protection of the public; or
(((14))) (15) Fail to comply with any provision of RCW 19.146.030
through 19.146.080 or any rule adopted under those sections.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.146.030 and 1997 c 106 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within three business days following receipt of a loan
application or any moneys from a borrower, a mortgage broker or loan
originator on behalf of the mortgage broker shall provide to each
borrower a full written disclosure containing an itemization and
explanation of all fees and costs that the borrower is required to pay
in connection with obtaining a residential mortgage loan, and
specifying the fee or fees which inure to the benefit of the mortgage
broker and other such disclosures as may be required by rule. A good
faith estimate of a fee or cost shall be provided if the exact amount
of the fee or cost is not determinable. This subsection shall not be
construed to require disclosure of the distribution or breakdown of
loan fees, discount, or points between the mortgage broker and any
lender or investor.
(2) The written disclosure shall contain the following information:
(a) The annual percentage rate, finance charge, amount financed,
total amount of all payments, number of payments, amount of each
payment, amount of points or prepaid interest and the conditions and
terms under which any loan terms may change between the time of
disclosure and closing of the loan; and if a variable rate, the
circumstances under which the rate may increase, any limitation on the
increase, the effect of an increase, and an example of the payment
terms resulting from an increase. Disclosure in compliance with the
requirements of the truth-in-lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and
Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Sec. 226, as now or hereafter amended, shall be
deemed to comply with the disclosure requirements of this subsection;
(b) The itemized costs of any credit report, appraisal, title
report, title insurance policy, mortgage insurance, escrow fee,
property tax, insurance, structural or pest inspection, and any other
third-party provider's costs associated with the residential mortgage
loan. Disclosure through good faith estimates of settlement services
and special information booklets in compliance with the requirements of
the real estate settlement procedures act, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 2601, and
Regulation X, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500, as now or hereafter amended, shall
be deemed to comply with the disclosure requirements of this
subsection;
(c) If applicable, the cost, terms, duration, and conditions of a
lock-in agreement and whether a lock-in agreement has been entered, and
whether the lock-in agreement is guaranteed by the mortgage broker or
lender, and if a lock-in agreement has not been entered, disclosure in
a form acceptable to the director that the disclosed interest rate and
terms are subject to change;
(d) A statement that if the borrower is unable to obtain a loan for
any reason, the mortgage broker must, within five days of a written
request by the borrower, give copies of any appraisal, title report, or
credit report paid for by the borrower to the borrower, and transmit
the appraisal, title report, or credit report to any other mortgage
broker or lender to whom the borrower directs the documents to be sent;
(e) Whether and under what conditions any lock-in fees are
refundable to the borrower; and
(f) A statement providing that moneys paid by the borrower to the
mortgage broker for third-party provider services are held in a trust
account and any moneys remaining after payment to third-party providers
will be refunded.
(3) If subsequent to the written disclosure being provided under
this section, a mortgage broker or loan originator enters into a lock-in agreement with a borrower or represents to the borrower that the
borrower has entered into a lock-in agreement, then no less than three
business days thereafter including Saturdays, the mortgage broker or
loan originator shall deliver or send by first-class mail to the
borrower a written confirmation of the terms of the lock-in agreement,
which shall include a copy of the disclosure made under subsection
(2)(c) of this section.
(4) A mortgage broker or loan originator on behalf of a mortgage
broker shall not charge any fee that inures to the benefit of the
mortgage broker if it exceeds the fee disclosed on the written
disclosure pursuant to this section, unless (a) the need to charge the
fee was not reasonably foreseeable at the time the written disclosure
was provided and (b) the mortgage broker or loan originator on behalf
of a mortgage broker has provided to the borrower, no less than three
business days prior to the signing of the loan closing documents, a
clear written explanation of the fee and the reason for charging a fee
exceeding that which was previously disclosed. However, if the
borrower's closing costs on the final settlement statement, excluding
prepaid escrowed costs of ownership as defined by rule, does not exceed
the total closing costs in the most recent good faith estimate,
excluding prepaid escrowed costs of ownership as defined by rule, no
other disclosures shall be required by this subsection.

Sec. 6 RCW 19.146.040 and 1994 c 33 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every contract between a mortgage broker, or a loan originator,
and a borrower shall be in writing and shall contain the entire
agreement of the parties.
(2) Any contract under this section entered by a loan originator
shall be binding on the mortgage broker.
(3) A mortgage broker shall have a written correspondent or loan
((brokerage)) broker agreement with a lender before any solicitation
of, or contracting with, the public.

Sec. 7 RCW 19.146.060 and 1997 c 106 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A mortgage broker shall use generally accepted accounting
principles.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
a mortgage broker shall maintain accurate and current books and records
which shall be readily available at ((the mortgage broker's usual
business)) a location available to the director until at least twenty-
five months have elapsed following the effective period to which the
books and records relate.
(3) Where a mortgage broker's usual business location is outside of
the state of Washington, the mortgage broker shall, as determined by
the director by rule, either maintain its books and records at a
location in this state, or reimburse the director for his or her
expenses, including but not limited to transportation, food, and
lodging expenses, relating to any examination or investigation
resulting under this chapter.
(4) "Books and records" includes but is not limited to:
(a) Copies of all advertisements placed by or at the request of the
mortgage broker which mention rates or fees. In the case of radio or
television advertisements, or advertisements placed on a telephonic
information line or other electronic source of information including
but not limited to a computer data base or electronic bulletin board,
a mortgage broker shall keep copies of the precise script for the
advertisement. All advertisement records shall include for each
advertisement the date or dates of publication and name of each
periodical, broadcast station, or telephone information line which
published the advertisement or, in the case of a flyer or other
material distributed by the mortgage broker, the dates, methods, and
areas of distribution; and
(b) Copies of all documents, notes, computer records if not stored
in printed form, correspondence or memoranda relating to a borrower
from whom the mortgage broker has accepted a deposit or other funds, or
accepted a residential mortgage loan application or with whom the
mortgage broker has entered into an agreement to assist in obtaining a
residential mortgage loan.

Sec. 8 RCW 19.146.070 and 1993 c 468 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise permitted by this section, a mortgage
broker shall not receive a fee, commission, or compensation of any kind
in connection with the preparation, negotiation, and brokering of a
residential mortgage loan unless a borrower actually obtains a loan
from a lender on the terms and conditions agreed upon by the borrower
and mortgage broker. A loan originator may not accept a fee,
commission, or compensation of any kind from borrowers in connection
with the preparation, negotiation, and brokering of a residential
mortgage loan.
(2) A mortgage broker may:
(a) If the mortgage broker has obtained for the borrower a written
commitment from a lender for a loan on the terms and conditions agreed
upon by the borrower and the mortgage broker, and the borrower fails to
close on the loan through no fault of the mortgage broker, charge a fee
not to exceed three hundred dollars for services rendered, preparation
of documents, or transfer of documents in the borrower's file which
were prepared or paid for by the borrower if the fee is not otherwise
prohibited by the Truth-in-Lending Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601, and
Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Sec. 226, as now or hereafter amended; or
(b) Solicit or receive fees for third party provider goods or
services in advance. Fees for any goods or services not provided must
be refunded to the borrower and the mortgage broker may not charge more
for the goods and services than the actual costs of the goods or
services charged by the third party provider.
(3) A loan originator may not solicit or receive fees for a third-party provider of goods or services except that a loan originator may
transfer funds from a borrower to a licensed mortgage broker, exempt
mortgage broker, or third-party provider, if the loan originator does
not deposit, hold, retain, or use the funds for any purpose other than
the payment of bona fide fees to third-party providers.

Sec. 9 RCW 19.146.200 and 1997 c 106 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person, unless specifically exempted from this chapter under
RCW 19.146.020, may not engage in the business of a mortgage broker((,
except as an employee of a person licensed or exempt from licensing,))
or loan originator without first obtaining and maintaining a license
under this chapter. ((However, a person who independently contracts
with a licensed mortgage broker need not be licensed if the licensed
mortgage broker and the independent contractor have on file with the
director a binding written agreement under which the licensed mortgage
broker assumes responsibility for the independent contractor's
violations of any provision of this chapter or rules adopted under this
chapter; and if the licensed mortgage broker's bond or other security
required under this chapter runs to the benefit of the state and any
person who suffers loss by reason of the independent contractor's
violation of any provision of this chapter or rules adopted under this
chapter.))
(2) A person may not bring a suit or action for the collection of
compensation ((as a mortgage broker)) in connection with a residential
mortgage loan unless the plaintiff alleges and proves that he or she
was a duly licensed mortgage broker, or exempt from the license
requirement of this chapter, at the time of offering to perform or
performing any such an act or service regulated by this chapter.
((This subsection does not apply to suits or actions for the collection
or compensation for services performed prior to October 31, 1993.))
(3) ((The)) A mortgage broker license must be prominently displayed
in the mortgage broker's place of business.
(4) Every licensed mortgage broker must at all times have a
designated broker responsible for all activities of the mortgage broker
in conducting the business of a mortgage broker. A designated broker,
principal, or owner who has supervisory authority over a mortgage
broker is responsible for a licensee's, employee's, or independent
contractor's violations of this chapter and its rules if:
(a) The designated broker, principal, or owner directs or instructs
the conduct or, with knowledge of the specific conduct, approves or
allows the conduct; or
(b) The designated broker, principal, or owner who has supervisory
authority over the licensed mortgage broker knows or by the exercise of
reasonable care and inquiry should have known of the conduct, at a time
when its consequences can be avoided or mitigated and fails to take
reasonable remedial action.

Sec. 10 RCW 19.146.205 and 2001 c 177 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Application for a mortgage broker license under this chapter
shall be in writing and in the form prescribed by the director. The
application shall contain at least the following information:
(a) The name, address, date of birth, and social security number of
the applicant, and any other names, dates of birth, or social security
numbers previously used by the applicant, unless waived by the
director;
(b) If the applicant is a partnership or association, the name,
address, date of birth, and social security number of each general
partner or principal of the association, and any other names, dates of
birth, or social security numbers previously used by the members,
unless waived by the director;
(c) If the applicant is a corporation, the name, address, date of
birth, and social security number of each officer, director, registered
agent, and each principal stockholder, and any other names, dates of
birth, or social security numbers previously used by the officers,
directors, registered agents, and principal stockholders unless waived
by the director;
(d) The street address, county, and municipality where the
principal business office is to be located;
(e) The name, address, date of birth, and social security number of
the applicant's designated broker, and any other names, dates of birth,
or social security numbers previously used by the designated broker and
a complete set of the designated broker's fingerprints taken by an
authorized law enforcement officer; and
(f) Such other information regarding the applicant's or designated
broker's background, financial responsibility, experience, character,
and general fitness as the director may require by rule.
(2) ((The director may exchange fingerprint data with the federal
bureau of investigation.)) As a part of or in connection with an
application for any license under this section, the applicant shall
furnish information concerning his or her identity, including
fingerprints for submission to the Washington state patrol, the federal
bureau of investigation, and any governmental agency or entity
authorized to receive this information for a state and national
criminal history background check; personal history; experience;
business record; purposes; and other pertinent facts, as the director
may reasonably require. As part of or in connection with an
application for a license under this chapter, the director is
authorized to receive criminal history record information that includes
nonconviction data as defined in RCW 10.97.030. The department may
only disseminate nonconviction data obtained under this section to
criminal justice agencies. This section does not apply to financial
institutions regulated under chapters 31.12 and 31.13 RCW and Titles
30, 32, and 33 RCW.
(3) At the time of filing an application for a license under this
chapter, each applicant shall pay to the director the appropriate
application fee in an amount determined by rule of the director in
accordance with RCW 43.24.086 to cover, but not exceed, the cost of
processing and reviewing the application. The director shall deposit
the moneys in the financial services regulation fund, unless the
consumer services account is created as a dedicated, nonappropriated
account, in which case the director shall deposit the moneys in the
consumer services account.
(4)(a) Each applicant for a mortgage broker's license shall file
and maintain a surety bond, in an amount of not greater than sixty
thousand dollars nor less than twenty thousand dollars which the
director deems adequate to protect the public interest, executed by the
applicant as obligor and by a surety company authorized to do a surety
business in this state as surety. The bonding requirement as
established by the director may take the form of a uniform bond amount
for all licensees or the director may establish by rule a schedule
establishing a range of bond amounts which shall vary according to the
annual average number of loan originators ((or independent
contractors)) of a licensee. The bond shall run to the state of
Washington as obligee, and shall run first to the benefit of the
borrower and then to the benefit of the state and any person or persons
who suffer loss by reason of the applicant's or its loan originator's
violation of any provision of this chapter or rules adopted under this
chapter. The bond shall be conditioned that the obligor as licensee
will faithfully conform to and abide by this chapter and all rules
adopted under this chapter, and shall reimburse all persons who suffer
loss by reason of a violation of this chapter or rules adopted under
this chapter. Borrowers shall be given priority over the state and
other persons. The state and other third parties shall be allowed to
receive distribution pursuant to a valid claim against the remainder of
the bond. In the case of claims made by any person or entity who is
not a borrower, no final judgment may be entered prior to one hundred
eighty days following the date the claim is filed. The bond shall be
continuous and may be canceled by the surety upon the surety giving
written notice to the director of its intent to cancel the bond. The
cancellation shall be effective thirty days after the notice is
received by the director. Whether or not the bond is renewed,
continued, reinstated, reissued, or otherwise extended, replaced, or
modified, including increases or decreases in the penal sum, it shall
be considered one continuous obligation, and the surety upon the bond
shall not be liable in an aggregate or cumulative amount exceeding the
penal sum set forth on the face of the bond. In no event shall the
penal sum, or any portion thereof, at two or more points in time be
added together in determining the surety's liability. The bond shall
not be liable for any penalties imposed on the licensee, including, but
not limited to, any increased damages or attorneys' fees, or both,
awarded under RCW 19.86.090. The applicant may obtain the bond
directly from the surety or through a group bonding arrangement
involving a professional organization comprised of mortgage brokers if
the arrangement provides at least as much coverage as is required under
this subsection.
(b) Subsection (4)(b) and (c) of this section applies only to
applications received on or before January 1, 2007. Before January 1,
2007, in lieu of a surety bond, the applicant may, upon approval by the
director, file with the director a certificate of deposit, an
irrevocable letter of credit, or such other instrument as approved by
the director by rule, drawn in favor of the director for an amount
equal to the required bond.
(c) Before January 1, 2007, in lieu of the surety bond or
compliance with (b) of this subsection, an applicant may obtain
insurance or coverage from an association comprised of mortgage brokers
that is organized as a mutual corporation for the sole purpose of
insuring or self-insuring claims that may arise from a violation of
this chapter. An applicant may only substitute coverage under this
subsection for the requirements of (a) or (b) of this subsection if the
director, with the consent of the insurance commissioner, has
authorized such association to organize a mutual corporation under such
terms and conditions as may be imposed by the director to ensure that
the corporation is operated in a financially responsible manner to pay
any claims within the financial responsibility limits specified in (a)
of this subsection.

Sec. 11 RCW 19.146.210 and 1997 c 106 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall issue and deliver a mortgage broker license
to an applicant if, after investigation, the director makes the
following findings:
(a) The applicant has paid the required license fees;
(b) The applicant has complied with RCW 19.146.205;
(c) Neither the applicant, any of its principals, or the designated
broker have had a license issued under this chapter or any similar
state statute suspended or revoked within five years of the filing of
the present application;
(d) Neither the applicant, any of its principals, or the designated
broker have been convicted of a gross misdemeanor involving dishonesty
or financial misconduct or a felony within seven years of the filing of
the present application;
(e) The designated broker, (i) has at least two years of experience
in the residential mortgage loan industry ((or has completed the
educational requirements established by rule of the director)) and (ii)
has passed a written examination whose content shall be established by
rule of the director; ((and))
(f) The applicant ((has)), its principals, and the designated
broker have demonstrated financial responsibility, character, and
general fitness such as to command the confidence of the community and
to warrant a belief that the business will be operated honestly,
fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of this chapter; and
(g) Neither the applicant, any of its principals, or the designated
broker have been found to be in violation of this chapter or rules.
(2) If the director does not find the conditions of subsection (1)
of this section have been met, the director shall not issue the
license. The director shall notify the applicant of the denial and
return to the applicant the bond or approved alternative and any
remaining portion of the license fee that exceeds the department's
actual cost to investigate the license.
(3) The director shall issue a mortgage broker license under this
chapter to any licensee issued a license under chapter 468, Laws of
1993, that has a valid license and is otherwise in compliance with the
provisions of this chapter.
(4) A license issued pursuant to this ((chapter is valid)) section
expires on the date one year from the date of issuance ((with no fixed
date of expiration)) which, for license renewal purposes, is also the
renewal date. The director shall adopt rules establishing the process
for renewal of licenses.
(5) A licensee may surrender a license by delivering to the
director written notice of surrender, but the surrender does not affect
the licensee's civil or criminal liability or any administrative
actions arising from acts or omissions occurring before such surrender.
(6) To prevent undue delay in the issuance of a license and to
facilitate the business of a mortgage broker, an interim license with
a fixed date of expiration may be issued when the director determines
that the mortgage broker has substantially fulfilled the requirements
for licensing as defined by rule.

Sec. 12 RCW 19.146.215 and 1997 c 106 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The designated broker of every licensee shall complete an annual
continuing education requirement((, which the director shall define by
rule)). The director shall establish standards in rule for approval of
professional organizations offering continuing education to designated
brokers. The director may approve continuing education taken by
designated brokers in other states if the director is satisfied that
such continuing education meets the requirements of the continuing
education required by this chapter.

Sec. 13 RCW 19.146.220 and 1997 c 106 s 12 and 1997 c 58 s 879
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The director ((shall)) may enforce all laws and rules relating
to the licensing of mortgage brokers and loan originators, grant or
deny licenses to mortgage brokers and loan originators, and hold
hearings.
(2) The director may impose ((the following sanctions:
(a) Deny applications for licenses for: (i))) fines or order
restitution against licensees or other persons subject to this chapter,
or deny, suspend, decline to renew, or revoke licenses for:
(a) Violations of orders, including cease and desist orders
((issued under this chapter; or (ii) any violation of RCW 19.146.050 or
19.146.0201 (1) through (9)));
(b) ((Suspend or revoke licenses for:
(i))) False statements or omission of material information on the
application that, if known, would have allowed the director to deny the
application for the original license;
(((ii))) (c) Failure to pay a fee required by the director or
maintain the required bond;
(((iii))) (d) Failure to comply with any directive ((or)), order,
or subpoena of the director; or
(((iv))) (e) Any violation of ((RCW 19.146.050, 19.146.060(3),
19.146.0201 (1) through (9) or (12), 19.146.205(4), or 19.146.265;
(c))) this chapter.
(3) The director may impose fines on ((the licensee,)) an employee
((or)), loan originator, independent contractor, or agent of the
licensee, or other person subject to this chapter for:
(((i))) (a) Any violations of RCW 19.146.0201 (1) through (9) or
(((12))) (13), 19.146.030 through 19.146.080, 19.146.200,
19.146.205(4), or 19.146.265; or
(((ii))) (b) Failure to comply with any directive or order of the
director((;)).
(((d))) (4) The director may issue orders directing a licensee, its
employee ((or)), loan originator, independent contractor, agent, or
other person subject to this chapter to((:
(i))) cease and desist from conducting business ((in a manner that
is injurious to the public or violates any provision of this chapter;
or
(ii) Pay restitution to an injured borrower; or
(e))).
(5) The director may issue orders removing from office or
prohibiting from participation in the conduct of the affairs of a
licensed mortgage broker, or both, any officer, principal, employee, or
loan originator of any licensed mortgage broker or any person subject
to licensing under this chapter for:
(((i))) (a) Any violation of 19.146.0201 (1) through (9) or
(((12))) (13), 19.146.030 through 19.146.080, 19.146.200,
19.146.205(4), or 19.146.265; ((or
(ii))) (b) False statements or omission of material information on
the application that, if known, would have allowed the director to deny
the application for the original license;
(((iii))) (c) Conviction of a gross misdemeanor involving
dishonesty or financial misconduct or a felony after obtaining a
license; or
(((iv))) (d) Failure to comply with any directive or order of the
director.
(((3))) (6) Each day's continuance of a violation or failure to
comply with any directive or order of the director is a separate and
distinct violation or failure.
(((4))) (7) The director shall establish by rule standards for
licensure of applicants licensed in other jurisdictions.
(((5))) (8) The director shall immediately suspend the license or
certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW
74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person
who is not in compliance with a support order ((or a residential or
visitation order)). If the person has continued to meet all other
requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the
license or certificate shall be automatic upon the director's receipt
of a release issued by the department of social and health services
stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

Sec. 14 RCW 19.146.225 and 1994 c 33 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
In accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW, the director may issue rules under this chapter only after seeking
the advice of the mortgage ((brokerage)) broker commission and ((to
govern)) only for the purpose of governing the activities of licensed
mortgage brokers, loan originators, and other persons subject to this
chapter.

Sec. 15 RCW 19.146.228 and 2001 c 177 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall establish fees by rule in accordance with the
policy established in RCW 43.24.086 and fees shall be sufficient to
cover, but not exceed, the costs of administering this chapter. These
fees may include:
(1) An annual assessment paid by each licensee on or before a date
specified by rule;
(2) An investigation fee to cover the costs of any investigation of
the books and records of a licensee or other person subject to this
chapter; and
(3) An application fee to cover the costs of processing
applications made to the director under this chapter.
Mortgage brokers and loan originators shall not be charged
investigation fees for the processing of complaints when the
investigation determines that no violation of this chapter occurred or
when the mortgage broker or loan originator provides a remedy
satisfactory to the complainant and the director and no order of the
director is issued. All moneys, fees, and penalties collected under
the authority of this chapter shall be deposited into the financial
services regulation fund, unless the consumer services account is
created as a dedicated, nonappropriated account, in which case all
moneys, fees, and penalties collected under this chapter shall be
deposited in the consumer services account.

Sec. 16 RCW 19.146.235 and 1997 c 106 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
((For the purposes of investigating complaints arising under this
chapter, the director may at any time, either personally or by a
designee, examine the business, including but not limited to the books,
accounts, records, and files used therein, of every licensee and of
every person engaged in the business of mortgage brokering, whether
such a person shall act or claim to act under or without the authority
of this chapter. For that purpose the director and designated
representatives shall have access during regular business hours to the
offices and places of business, books, accounts, papers, records,
files, safes, and vaults of all such persons. The director or
designated person may direct or order the attendance of and examine
under oath all persons whose testimony may be required about the loans
or the business or subject matter of any such examination or
investigation, and may direct or order such person to produce books,
accounts, records, files, and any other documents the director or
designated person deems relevant to the inquiry. If a person who
receives such a directive or order does not attend and testify, or does
not produce the requested books, records, files, or other documents
within the time period established in the directive or order, then the
director or designated person may issue a subpoena requiring attendance
or compelling production of books, records, files, or other documents.
No person subject to examination or investigation under this chapter
shall withhold, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, or secrete any
books, records, computer records, or other information.
Once during the first two years of licensing, the director may
visit, either personally or by designee, the licensee's place or places
of business to conduct a compliance examination. The director may
examine, either personally or by designee, a sample of the licensee's
loan files, interview the licensee or other designated employee or
independent contractor, and undertake such other activities as
necessary to ensure that the licensee is in compliance with the
provisions of this chapter. For those licensees issued licenses prior
to March 21, 1994, the cost of such an examination shall be considered
to have been prepaid in their license fee. After this one visit within
the two-year period subsequent to issuance of a license, the director
or a designee may visit the licensee's place or places of business only
to ensure that corrective action has been taken or to investigate a
complaint.))
The director or a designee has authority to conduct investigations
and examinations as provided in this section.
(1) For the purposes of investigating violations or complaints
arising under this chapter, the director or his or her designee may
make an investigation of the operations of any mortgage broker or loan
originator as often as necessary in order to carry out the purposes of
this chapter.
(2) Every mortgage broker shall make available to the director or
a designee its books and records relating to its operations.
(a) For the purpose of examinations, the director or his or her
designee may have access to such books and records during normal
business hours and interview the officers, principals, loan
originators, employees, independent contractors, and agents of the
licensee concerning their business.
(b) For the purposes of investigating violations or complaints
arising under this chapter, the director may at any time, either
personally or by a designee, investigate the business, including but
not limited to the books, accounts, records, and files used therein, of
every licensee and of every person engaged in the business of mortgage
brokering, whether such a person acts or claims to act under, or
without the authority of, this chapter.
(c) The director or designated person may direct, subpoena, or
order the attendance of and examine under oath all persons whose
testimony may be required about the loans or the business or subject
matter of any such examination or investigation, and may direct,
subpoena, or order such person to produce books, accounts, records,
files, and any other documents the director or designated person deems
relevant to the inquiry.
(3) Once during the first five years of licensing, including branch
licensing, the director may visit, either personally or by designee,
the licensee's place or places of business to conduct an examination.
The scope of the examination is limited to documents and information
necessary to determine compliance with this chapter and attendant
rules. In general, the examination scope may include:
(a) A review for trust accounting compliance;
(b) Loan file review to determine the mortgage broker's compliance
with this chapter and applicable federal regulations covering the
business of mortgage brokering and lending;
(c) Interviews for the purpose of understanding business and
solicitation practices, transactional events, disclosure compliance,
complaint resolution, or determining specific compliance with this
chapter and the attendant rules; and
(d) A review of general business books and records, including
employee records, for the purpose of determining specific compliance
with this chapter and the attendant rules.
(4) The purpose of an examination is to make certain that licensees
are conducting business in compliance with the law. Therefore,
protocols for examination findings and corrective action directed from
an examination must be established by rule of the director. To
accomplish this purpose, these protocols must include the following:
(a) A reporting mechanism from the director to the licensee;
(b) A process for clear notification of violations and an
opportunity for response by the licensee; and
(c) The criteria by which the frequency of examinations will be
determined.
(5) If the examination findings clearly identify the need to expand
the scope of the examination, the director or a designee, upon five
days' written notification to the licensee with an explanation of the
need, may:
(a) Expand the examination review to locations other than the
examined location regardless of the number of years a location has held
a license; or
(b) Expand the time period of the examination beyond the five-year
period of licensing, provided the expansion of time does not exceed a
date certain identified in the written notification in this subsection.
(6) The director or a designee may consider reports made by
independent certified professionals for the mortgage broker covering
the same general subject matter as the examination. The director or a
designee may incorporate all or part of the report in the report of the
examination.
(7) The director may retain attorneys, accountants, or other
professionals and specialists as examiners, auditors, or investigators
to conduct or assist in the conduct of examinations or investigations.
The cost of these services for investigations only must be billed in
accordance with RCW 19.146.228.
(8) The director may establish by rule travel costs for examination
of out-of-state entities.
(9)(a) No person subject to examination or investigation under this
chapter may knowingly withhold, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, or
secrete any books, records, computer records, or other information.
(b) A person who commits an act under (a) of this subsection is
guilty of a class B felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021(1)(b) or
punishable by a fine of not more than twenty thousand dollars, or both.

Sec. 17 RCW 19.146.280 and 2001 c 177 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is established the mortgage ((brokerage)) broker
commission consisting of ((five)) seven commission members who shall
act in an advisory capacity to the director on mortgage ((brokerage))
broker issues.
(2) The director shall appoint the members of the commission,
weighing the recommendations from professional organizations
representing mortgage brokers and loan originators. At least three of
the commission members shall be mortgage brokers licensed under this
chapter ((and)), at least one shall be exempt from licensure under RCW
19.146.020(1)(((f))) (g), and at least two of the commission members
shall be licensed loan originators under this chapter. No commission
member shall be appointed who has had less than five years' experience
in the business of residential mortgage lending. In addition, the
director or a designee shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member
of the commission. Voting members of the commission shall serve for
two-year terms ((with three of the initial commission members serving
one-year terms)). The department shall provide staff support to the
commission.
(3) The commission may establish a code of conduct for its members.
Any commissioner may bring a motion before the commission to remove a
commissioner for failing to conduct themselves in a manner consistent
with the code of conduct. The motion shall be in the form of a
recommendation to the director to dismiss a specific commissioner and
shall enumerate causes for doing so. The commissioner in question
shall recuse himself or herself from voting on any such motion. Any
such motion must be approved unanimously by the remaining ((four)) six
commissioners. Approved motions shall be immediately transmitted to
the director for review and action.
(4) Members of the commission shall be reimbursed for their travel
expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. All costs and expenses
associated with the commission shall be paid from the financial
services regulation fund, unless the consumer services account is
created as a dedicated, nonappropriated account, in which case all
costs and expenses shall be paid from the consumer services account.
(5) The commission shall advise the director on the characteristics
and needs of the mortgage ((brokerage)) broker profession.
(6) The department, in consultation with other applicable agencies
of state government, shall conduct a continuing review of the number
and type of consumer complaints arising from residential mortgage
lending in the state. The department shall report its findings to the
senate committee on financial institutions and house of representatives
committee on financial institutions and insurance along with
recommendations for any changes in the licensing requirements of this
chapter, biennially by December 1st of each even-numbered year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 19.146
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A licensee shall provide the director with an annual report of
mortgage broker activity. The director may by rule create a schedule
and format for the annual report. The annual report may only include
the following for mortgage broker activities in Washington state:
(a) The total number of closed loans originated by the mortgage
broker; and
(b) The total dollar volume of closed loans originated by the
mortgage broker.
(2) Any information provided by a mortgage broker in an annual
report that constitutes a trade secret as defined in RCW 19.108.010 is
exempt from the disclosure requirements in chapters 42.17 and 42.56
RCW, unless aggregated with information supplied by other mortgage
brokers in such a manner that the mortgage broker's individual
information is not identifiable. Any information provided by the
mortgage broker that allows identification of the mortgage broker may
only be used for purposes reasonably related to the regulation of
mortgage brokers to ensure compliance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 19.146
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Application for a loan originator license under this chapter
shall be in writing and in the form prescribed by the director. The
application shall contain at least the following information:
(a) The name, address, date of birth, and social security number of
the loan originator applicant, and any other names, dates of birth, or
social security numbers previously used by the loan originator
applicant, unless waived by the director; and
(b) Such other information regarding the loan originator
applicant's background, experience, character, and general fitness as
the director may require by rule.
(2) As part of or in connection with an application for any license
under this section, the loan originator applicant shall furnish
information concerning his or her identity, including fingerprints for
submission to the Washington state patrol, the federal bureau of
investigation, and any governmental agency or entity authorized to
receive this information for a state and national criminal history
background check; personal history; experience; business record;
purposes; and other pertinent facts, as the director may reasonably
require. As part of or in connection with an application for a license
under this chapter, the director is authorized to receive criminal
history record information that includes nonconviction data as defined
in RCW 10.97.030. The department may only disseminate nonconviction
data obtained under this section to criminal justice agencies. This
section does not apply to financial institutions regulated under
chapters 31.12 and 31.13 RCW and Titles 30, 32, and 33 RCW.
(3) At the time of filing an application for a license under this
chapter, each loan originator applicant shall pay to the director the
appropriate application fee in an amount determined by rule of the
director in accordance with RCW 19.146.228 to cover the cost of
processing and reviewing the application. The director shall deposit
the moneys in the financial services regulation fund.
(4) The director must establish by rule procedures for accepting
and processing incomplete applications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 19.146
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The director shall issue and deliver a loan originator license
if, after investigation, the director makes the following findings:
(a) The loan originator applicant has paid the required license
fees;
(b) The loan originator applicant has met the requirements of
section 19 of this act;
(c) The loan originator applicant has not had a license issued
under this chapter or any similar state statute suspended or revoked
within five years of the filing of the present application;
(d) The loan originator applicant has not been convicted of a gross
misdemeanor involving dishonesty or financial misconduct or a felony
within seven years of the filing of the present application;
(e) The loan originator applicant has passed a written examination
whose content shall be established by rule of the director;
(f) The loan originator applicant has not been found to be in
violation of this chapter or rules;
(g) The loan originator applicant has demonstrated character and
general fitness such as to command the confidence of the community and
to warrant a belief that the business will be operated honestly and
fairly within the purposes of this chapter; and
(h) The loan originator licensee has completed, during the calendar
year preceding a licensee's annual license renewal date, continuing
education as established by rule of the director. The director shall
establish standards in rule for approval of professional organizations
offering continuing education to loan originators. The director may
approve continuing education taken by loan originators in other states
if the director is satisfied that such continuing education meets the
requirements of the continuing education required by this chapter.
(2) If the director does not find the conditions of subsection (1)
of this section have been met, the director shall not issue the loan
originator license. The director shall notify the loan originator
applicant of the denial and return to the loan originator applicant any
remaining portion of the license fee that exceeds the department's
actual cost to investigate the license.
(3) The director shall issue a new loan originator license under
this chapter to any licensee that has a valid license and is otherwise
in compliance with this chapter.
(4) A loan originator license issued under this section expires on
the date one year from the date of issuance which, for license renewal
purposes, is also the renewal date. The director shall establish rules
regarding the loan originator license renewal process created under
this chapter.
(5) A loan originator licensee may surrender a license by
delivering to the director written notice of surrender, but the
surrender does not affect the loan originator licensee's civil or
criminal liability or any administrative actions arising from acts or
omissions occurring before such surrender.
(6) To prevent undue delay in the issuance of a loan originator
license and to facilitate the business of a loan originator, an interim
loan originator license with a fixed date of expiration may be issued
when the director determines that the loan originator has substantially
fulfilled the requirements for loan originator licensing as defined by
rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 19.146
RCW to read as follows:
A loan originator license, or the authority granted under such a
license, is not assignable and cannot be transferred, sold, or
franchised by contract or any other means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 19.146
RCW to read as follows:
A loan originator may only take an application on behalf of one
mortgage broker at a time, and that mortgage broker must be clearly
identified on the application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The director of the department of financial
institutions or the director's designee may take such steps as are
necessary to ensure that this act is implemented on the effective date
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 This act takes effect January 1, 2007.

--- END ---