BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a
considerable shortage of qualified, certificated teachers in the areas
of bilingual education and special education. The lack of these
teachers threatens the quality of education of a significant number of
students in our schools. The legislature further finds it will require
concerted efforts to counter these deficits and to meet the growing
demand for such teachers. The legislature intends to address this by
using the proven successful strategy of recruiting classified public
school employees who have the explicit interest, commitment, and life
experience to teach in these areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A demonstration project is created to
assist classified public K-12 school employees to earn a teaching
certificate with an endorsement for bilingual education or special
education. The project shall provide conditional scholarships through
either the future teachers conditional scholarship program and loan
repayment program in accordance with chapter 28B.102 RCW or one of the
alternative routes to teacher certification in accordance with chapter
28A.660 RCW.
(2) The higher education coordinating board shall provide the
legislature and governor with findings about the impact of this
demonstration project on persons entering the teaching profession in
the shortage areas of bilingual education and special education by no
later than January 2008.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.660.050 and 2004 c 23 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The alternative route conditional scholarship program is created
under the following guidelines:
(1) The program shall be administered by the higher education
coordinating board. In administering the program, the higher education
coordinating board has the following powers and duties:
(a) To adopt necessary rules and develop guidelines to administer
the program;
(b) To collect and manage repayments from participants who do not
meet their service obligations; and
(c) To accept grants and donations from public and private sources
for the program.
(2) Participation in the alternative route conditional scholarship
program is limited to interns of the partnership grant programs under
RCW 28A.660.040. The Washington professional educator standards board
shall select interns to receive conditional scholarships.
(3) In order to receive conditional scholarship awards, recipients
shall be accepted and maintain enrollment in alternative certification
routes through the partnership grant program, as provided in RCW
28A.660.040. Recipients must continue to make satisfactory progress
towards completion of the alternative route certification program and
receipt of a residency teaching certificate.
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, a conditional scholarship is
a loan that is forgiven in whole or in part in exchange for service as
a certificated teacher employed in a Washington state K-12 public
school. The state shall forgive one year of loan obligation for every
two years a recipient teaches in a public school. Recipients that fail
to continue a course of study leading to residency teacher
certification or cease to teach in a public school in the state of
Washington in their endorsement area are required to repay the
remaining loan principal with interest.
(5) Recipients who fail to fulfill the required teaching obligation
are required to repay the remaining loan principal with interest and
any other applicable fees. The higher education coordinating board
shall adopt rules to define the terms for repayment, including
applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.
(6) To the extent funds are appropriated for this specific purpose,
the annual amount of the scholarship is the annual cost of tuition;
fees; and educational expenses, including books, supplies, and
transportation for the alternative route certification program in which
the recipient is enrolled, not to exceed eight thousand dollars. The
board may adjust the annual award by the average rate of resident
undergraduate tuition and fee increases at the state universities as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(7) The higher education coordinating board may deposit all
appropriations, collections, and any other funds received for the
program in this chapter in the student loan account authorized in RCW
28B.102.060.
(8) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, the funds provided
for the demonstration project created in section 2 of this act may be
distributed in accordance with the rules of the alternative route
conditional scholarship program, as determined appropriate by the
higher education coordinating board in consultation with the
professional educators standards board.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.102.080 and 2004 c 58 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The future teachers conditional scholarship account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures of funds from the account. The account is
not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW except for
moneys used for program administration.
(2) The board shall deposit in the account all moneys received for
the program. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds
appropriated by the legislature for the future teachers conditional
scholarship and loan repayment program, private contributions to the
program, and receipts from participant repayments. Beginning July 1,
2004, the board shall also deposit into the account: (a) All funds
from the institution of higher education loan account that are
traceable to any conditional scholarship program for teachers or
prospective teachers established by the legislature before June 10,
2004; and (b) all amounts repaid by individuals under any such program.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for
conditional loans and loan repayments to participants in the program
established by this chapter and costs associated with program
administration by the board.
(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the
authorization of the board.
(5) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, the funds provided
for the demonstration project created in section 2 of this act may be
distributed in accordance with the rules of the future teachers'
conditional scholarship and loan repayment program, as determined
appropriate by the higher education coordinating board in consultation
with the professional educators standards board.

--- END ---