BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 78.44.085 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 5 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) An applicant for an expansion of the originally permitted area
or a new reclamation permit, or for combining a public or private
reclamation permit, shall pay a nonrefundable application fee to the
department before being granted ((a surface mining)) the requested
permit. The amount of the application fee shall be ((one)) two
thousand five hundred dollars.
(2) Permit holders submitting a revision to an application for an
existing reclamation plan that is not an expansion shall pay a
nonrefundable reclamation plan revision fee of one thousand dollars.
(3) After June 30, ((2001)) 2006, each public or private permit
holder shall pay an annual permit fee ((of one thousand dollars)). The
annual permit fee shall be payable to the department prior to the
reclamation permit being issued and on the ((first)) anniversary of the
permit date ((and)) each year thereafter. Annual fees paid by a county
for mines used exclusively for public works projects and having less
than seven acres of disturbed area per mine shall not exceed one
thousand dollars. Annual fees are waived for all mines used primarily
for public works projects if the mines are owned and primarily operated
by counties with 1993 populations of less than twenty thousand persons,
and if each mine has less than seven acres of disturbed area.
(((3))) (4) Each public or private permit holder must pay an annual
fee based on the categories of aggregate or mineral mined or extracted
during the previous twelve months, as follows:
(a) Zero to fifty thousand tons: A fee of one thousand two hundred
fifty dollars;
(b) Fifty-one thousand tons to three hundred fifty thousand tons:
A fee of two thousand five hundred dollars;
(c) More than three hundred fifty-one thousand tons: A fee of
three thousand five hundred dollars.
(5) At the end of each fiscal biennium, any residual moneys from
the fees charged under this section for the administration and
enforcement of the regulation of surface mining under this chapter must
be used by the department for the surveying and mapping of sand and
gravel sites in the state.
(6) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department are confidential.
(7) Appeals from any determination of the department shall not stay
the requirement to pay any annual permit fee. Failure to pay the
annual fees may constitute grounds for an order to suspend surface
mining, fines, or cancellation of the reclamation permit as provided in
this chapter.
(((4))) (8) All fees collected by the department shall be deposited
into the surface mining reclamation account.
(((5))) (9) If the department delegates enforcement
responsibilities to a county, city, or town, the department may
allocate funds collected under this section to the county, city, or
town.
(((6))) (10) Within sixty days after receipt of a new or expanded
permit application, the department shall advise applicants of any
information necessary to successfully complete the application.
(11) In addition to other enforcement authority, the department may
refer matters to a collection agency when permit fees or fines are past
due. The collection agency may impose its own fees for collecting
delinquent permit fees or fines.
(12) Annual permit fees for surface mines that are regulated by the
department under chapter 78.56 RCW, the metals mining and milling
operations, are subject to chapter 78.56 RCW and the estimates of the
annual fee by the department. The department of ecology shall transfer
the appropriate annual fees collected under RCW 78.56.080 to the
department for deposit directly to the surface mining reclamation
account.

Sec. 2 RCW 78.44.087 and 1997 c 186 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department should ensure that sufficient funds are
available to reclaim the surface mine. The department shall not issue
a reclamation permit until the applicant has deposited with the
department an acceptable performance security on forms prescribed ((and
furnished)) by the department, and that is adequate to cover
reclamation costs. A public or governmental agency shall not be
required to post performance security. No person may create a
disturbed area that meets or exceeds the minimum threshold for a
reclamation permit without first submitting an adequate and acceptable
performance security to the department and complying with all
requirements of this chapter.
(2) ((This performance security may be)) The department may refuse
to accept any performance security that the department for any reason
deems to be inadequate to cover reclamation costs or not in an
acceptable form.
(3) Acceptable forms of performance security are:
(a) Bank letters of credit acceptable to the department or
irrevocable bank letters of credit from a bank or financial institution
or organization authorized to transact business in the United States;
(b) A cash deposit;
(c) ((Negotiable)) Other forms of performance securities acceptable
to the department as determined by rule;
(d) An assignment of a savings account;
(e) A savings certificate in a Washington bank on an assignment
form prescribed by the department;
(f) ((Assignments of interests in real property within the state of
Washington)) Approved participants in a state security pool if one is
established; or
(g) A corporate surety bond executed in favor of the department by
a corporation authorized to do business in the state of Washington
under Title 48 RCW and authorized by the department.
(((3))) (4) The performance security shall be conditioned upon the
faithful performance of the requirements set forth in this chapter
((and of)), the rules adopted under it, and the reclamation permit.
(((4))) (5)(a) The department ((shall have the authority to
determine the amount of the performance security using a standardized
performance security formula developed by the department. The amount
of the security shall be determined by the department and based on the
estimated costs of completing reclamation according to the approved
reclamation plan or minimum standards and related administrative
overhead for the area to be surface mined during (a) the next
twelve-month period, (b) the following twenty-four months, and (c) any
previously disturbed areas on which the reclamation has not been
satisfactorily completed and approved)) must determine the amount of
the performance security as prescribed by this subsection.
(b) The department may determine the amount of the performance
security based on the estimated cost of: (i) Completing reclamation
according to the requirements of this chapter; or (ii) the reclamation
permit for the area to be surface mined during the upcoming thirty-six
months and any previously disturbed areas that have not been reclaimed.
(c) The department may determine the amount of the performance
security based on an engineering cost estimate for reclamation that is
provided by the permit holder. The engineering cost estimate must be
prepared using engineering principles and methods that are acceptable
to the department. If the department does not approve the engineering
cost estimate, the department shall determine the amount of the
performance security using a standardized performance security formula
developed by the department by rule.
(((5))) (6) The department may ((increase or decrease the amount of
the performance security at any time to compensate for a change in the
disturbed area, the depth of excavation, a modification of the
reclamation plan, or any other alteration in the conditions of the mine
that affects the cost of reclamation. The department may, for any
reason, refuse any performance security not deemed adequate))
recalculate a surface mine's performance security based on subsection
(5) of this section. When the department recalculates a performance
security, the new calculation will not be prejudiced by the existence
of any previous calculation. A new performance security must be
submitted to the department within thirty days of the department's
written request.
(((6))) (7) Liability under the performance security and the permit
holder's obligation to maintain the calculated performance security
amount shall be maintained until ((reclamation is completed according
to the approved reclamation plan to the satisfaction of the
department)) the surface mine is reclaimed, unless released as
hereinafter provided. Partial drawings will proportionately reduce the
value of a performance security but will not extinguish the remaining
value. Liability under the performance security may be released only
((upon written notification by the department. Notification shall be
given upon completion of compliance or acceptance by the department of
a substitute performance security)) when the surface mine is reclaimed
as evidenced by the department in writing or after the department
receives and approves a substitute performance security. The
department will notify the permit holder, and surety if applicable,
when reclamation is accepted by the department as complete or upon the
department's acceptance of an alternate security. The liability of the
surety shall not exceed the amount of security required by this section
and the department's reasonable legal fees to recover the security.
(((7))) (8) Any interest or appreciation on the performance
security shall be held by the department until ((reclamation is
completed to its satisfaction. At such time, the interest shall be
remitted to the permit holder; except that such interest or
appreciation may be used by the department to effect reclamation in the
event that the permit holder fails to comply with the provisions of
this chapter and the costs of reclamation exceed the face value of the
performance security)) the surface mine is reclaimed. The department
may collect and use appreciation or interest accrued on a performance
security to the same extent as for the underlying performance security.
If the permit holder meets its obligations under this chapter, rules
adopted under this chapter, and its approved reclamation permit and
plan by completing reclamation, the department will return any unused
performance security and accrued interest or appreciation.
(((8))) (9) No other state agency or local government other than
the department shall require performance security for the purposes of
surface mine reclamation. The department may enter into written
agreements with federal agencies in order to avoid redundant bonding of
any surface ((mines straddling boundaries between federally controlled
and other lands within)) mine that is located on both federal and
nonfederal lands in Washington state. Nothing in this section
prohibits a state agency or local government from requiring a
performance security when the state agency or local government is
acting in its capacity as a landowner and contracting for
extraction-related activities on state or local government property.
(((9) When acting in its capacity as a regulator, no other state
agency or local government may require a surface mining operation
regulated under this chapter to post performance security unless that
state agency or local government has express statutory authority to do
so. A state agency's or local government's general authority to
protect the public health, safety, and welfare does not constitute
express statutory authority to require a performance security.
However, nothing in this section prohibits a state agency or local
government from requiring a performance security when the state agency
or local government is acting in its capacity as a landowner and
contracting for extraction-related activities on state or local
government property.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 78.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A permit holder, in lieu of an individual performance security
for each mining site, may file a blanket performance security with the
department for their group of permits.
(2) The department may reduce the required performance security
calculated from its standard method, to an amount not to exceed the sum
of reclamation security calculated by the department for the two
surface mines with the largest performance security obligations, for
nonmetal and nonfuel surface mines that meet the following conditions:
(a) The permit holder has had a valid reclamation permit for more
than ten years and can demonstrate exemplary mining and reclamation
practices that have been accepted by the department;
(b) The land owner agrees to allow the permit holder to hold a
blanket security. The department must include, on forms to be signed
by the landowner, notice of the risk of a lien on the landowner's
lands; and
(c) The permit holder can demonstrate substantial financial ability
to perform the reclamation in the approved reclamation plan and permit.
(3) Permit holders are not eligible for blanket securities if they
are in violation of a final order of the department.
(4) The department must consider the compliance history and the
state of the existing surface mines of the permit holder before
approving any blanket performance security.
(5) Lands covered by a blanket performance security are subject to
a lien placed by the department in the event of abandonment.
(6) In lieu of the performance security required of the permit
holder, the department may accept a similar security from the
landowner, equal to the estimated cost of reclamation as determined by
the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 78.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent a performance security is insufficient to cover
the cost of reclamation performed by the department, a lien shall be
established in favor of the department upon all of the permit holder's
real and personal property.
(2) The lien attaches upon the filing of a notice of claim of lien
with the county clerk of the county in which the property is located.
The notice of lien claim must contain a true statement of the demand,
the insufficiency of the performance security to compensate the
department, and the failure of the permit holder to perform the
reclamation required.
(3) The lien becomes effective when filed.
(4) The lien created by this section may be foreclosed by a suit in
the superior court in the manner provided by law for the foreclosure of
other liens on real or personal property.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.56.270 and 2005 c 274 s 407 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and 43.168 RCW,
or during application for economic development loans or program
services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011; ((and))
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
community, trade, and economic development:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development pursuant to RCW 43.330.050(8) and 43.330.080(4); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the office of the governor in connection with the
siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that
person's business and until a siting decision is made, identifying
information of any person supplying information under this subsection
and the locations being considered for siting, relocation, or expansion
of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of community, trade, and
economic development based on information as described in (a)(i) of
this subsection, any work product is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of community, trade, and economic development from a
person connected with siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or
relocation of that person's business, information described in (a)(ii)
of this subsection will be available to the public under this chapter;
and
(13) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department of natural resources shall
establish a surface mining advisory committee that will recommend
effective methods of accomplishing reclamation and address other issues
deemed appropriate by the committee for the effective administration of
chapter 78.44 RCW. The committee is comprised of but not limited to
representatives of mining interests, state and local government,
environmental groups, and private landowners. The state geologist will
select the members of the committee. The department of natural
resources must submit a report to the legislature containing the
committee's findings by September 1, 2006.

--- END ---