BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the intent of the legislature that
sufficient funds be provided to cover the direct costs of a base staff
and their operating expenses to ensure functional continuity of the
survey as provided by this chapter. The survey shall appropriately
charge for preparation and reproduction of reports, maps, and
publications. However, the survey shall not directly compete with
consultants by entering into contracts with private citizens and
industries for providing geotechnical and related services.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that the survey place
primary emphasis on the statutory objectives of recognition and
mitigation of geologic hazards and risks affecting public health and
safety and the promotion of economic development of the mineral
resources, including, but not limited to, metals, oil, natural gas,
coal, coalbed methane, geothermal energy, and aggregate, of Washington.
Economic development projects proposed or undertaken must involve basic
and applied surface and subsurface geologic research and mapping
similar to that undertaken by geological surveys in other states and be
designed to encourage the mitigation of geologic hazards and resource
exploration and development by industry. The survey may not undertake
economic development projects that directly compete with the private
sector, but shall produce primary data, applied research reports, and
maps useful to government, consultants, and industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(2) "Geologic hazard" means a geologic condition or event that is
a potential danger to either life or property, or both, that includes
but is not limited to earthquake, tsunami, landslide, flooding,
erosion, expansive soil, fault displacement, volcanic eruption, and
subsidence.
(3) "Geology" means the study of the earth, and in particular the
study of the origin, history, and topographic form of rocks,
distribution of ores and minerals, either under the ground or upon the
surface, and their alteration by wind, water, and ice and the economics
of their use.
(4) "Mine" includes all mineral-producing properties of whatever
kind and character, whether underground, quarry, pit, well, spring, or
other source from which any mineral substance is obtained.
(5) "Mineral" includes any and all mineral and fossil fuel
products, metallic and nonmetallic, solid, liquid, or gaseous, and
mineral waters of all kinds.
(6) "Mineral industries" includes all enterprises engaged in
developing and exploiting the natural substances of the earth.
(7) "Survey" means the state geological survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The purpose of the state geological survey
is to map and study the geology of the state of Washington for the
benefit of the citizens of the state. The map and study must:
(1) Conduct basic mapping of the geologic units and structure by
delineating their geographic locations, ages, history, and
orientations;
(2) Identify geologic hazards and risks, including those from
landslides, volcanoes, earthquakes, tsunamis, and floods;
(3) Document, regulate, and maintain records on the state's
geological resources;
(4) Promote general knowledge and awareness of the state's geology
for educational and recreational purposes.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.92.010 and 1988 c 127 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a geological survey of the state ((which)) that
shall be under the direction of the commissioner of public lands, who
shall have general charge of the survey, and shall appoint as
supervisor of the survey a geologist of established reputation, to be
known as the ((supervisor of geology)) state geologist.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The position of state geologist within
the department is created and shall be appointed by the commissioner of
public lands.
(2) The state geologist shall be qualified to perform as well as to
direct the technical and executive work of the department as determined
by the commissioner of public lands and shall be a licensed geologist
in the state of Washington with a broad background of practical
experience related to programs of the survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The state geologist should employ
qualified persons to perform the duties of the survey.
(2) The state geologist shall make every effort to complete
promptly for publication all substantive notes, charts, and maps
covering formal mineral and geological investigations of the
department, so that public distribution may take place as closely as
possible after the completion of field investigations.
(3) The state geologist shall have charge of, organize, and
supervise the work of the survey and perform other duties as may be
necessary to carry out the work of the survey.
(4) The state geologist shall prepare a biennial report to the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The survey shall:
(1) Survey and study the geological, mineral, and energy resources
of the state and their value to the citizens of the state;
(2) Study minerals and ores, study additional uses for the state's
minerals, and explore the possibilities for using improved treatment,
processes, mining methods, and reclamation techniques for regulated
mines and abandoned mined lands;
(3) Establish, or in cooperation with universities and other
organizations, a repository for drill cores, cuttings, samples, and
other subsurface drill hole geological, geophysical, geochemical, and
geotechnical information of long-term value and construct a data base
to be made available to the public;
(4) Map and continually update the geology of Washington, both in
the surface and subsurface, either as a survey undertaking or jointly
with federal or other agencies;
(5) Assess geologic hazards and the vulnerability of the state to
the hazards. As a primary science agency on geologic hazards, the
survey shall advise and assist the emergency management division of the
Washington military department during geologic emergencies. These
studies and programs may include but need not be limited to:
(a) Statewide hazard assessment, including identification and
mapping of geologic hazards, estimation of their potential consequences
and likelihood of occurrence, and monitoring and assessment of
potentially hazardous geologic activity;
(b) Studies of paleoseismicity including but not limited to
providing evidence of whether prehistoric subduction zone and crustal
earthquakes have occurred in Washington;
(c) Cooperation with either universities or federal agencies, or
both, on a state seismic network through the strategic placement of
instrumentation to monitor earthquake activity as it occurs;
(d) Cooperation with the state geodetic network through the
monitoring and periodic survey of markers in order to detect modern
deformation of the earth's crust and the subsequent buildup of stress;
and
(e) Operation of a clearinghouse for posthazard event earth science
investigations;
(6) Collect and maintain a library of materials describing the
geology, geologic hazard, and geological resources of Washington;
(7) Serve as a bureau of information concerning Washington mineral
resources, mineral industries, and geology, conduct mineral surveys of
the state, and catalog mineral occurrences and deposits, metallic and
nonmetallic, and compile mineral statistics of the state;
(8) Provide information and advisory services concerning: Geology,
geologic resources, and geologic hazards; a public education program
and geologic data base; review of functions; and expert advice to
federal, state, and local government agencies;
(9) Provide technical assistance to local governments on geological
hazards, mineral resources, aggregate mining, and reclamation during
preparation and amendment of comprehensive plans and land use
regulations;
(10) Promote outdoor recreation and education through creation and
dissemination of interpretive materials, including but not limited to
field trip guides, road logs, interpretive displays, and field
excursions for teachers;
(11) Cooperate with federal or other agencies for the performance
of survey work in Washington deemed of value to the state and of
advantage to its people. The results of any joint undertakings must be
made available without restrictions;
(12) Consider and study kindred scientific and economic questions
in the field of geology and mining that are deemed of value to the
people of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The survey may:
(1) Contract with other parties to perform geological, geochemical,
and geophysical surveys and may make reasonable charges for these
services;
(2) Collect and exhibit specimens, samples, and photographs of the
geology of Washington;
(3) Make surveys and determinations at the request of other
agencies of the state, without any charge in excess of the actual cost
thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The survey must prepare printed and
published reports, pamphlets, charts, and maps embracing the matters
addressed in this chapter. All maps, charts, special bulletins, and
other publications are for public distribution, but the survey may make
a reasonable charge to cover publication and distribution costs.
Publications should be made available either in print or digital media.
(2) When a report embodies results of surveys or studies of
economic importance, no information of any kind concerning the contents
of such a report may be given out prior to publication if such prior
information could place the recipient in a preferential position as
regards its use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The state geological survey shall work with
federal officials and private mine owners to encourage the prompt
sealing of open holes and mine shafts that constitute a threat to
safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The owner of each mine shall make a map of
the surface of the property. The owner of each active mine shall make
a map of the underground workings. All maps shall be filed with the
state geological survey. The state geological survey shall establish
by rule the scale and contents required for the maps.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.30.600 (State geological survey) and 2003 c 334 s 107,
1988 c 127 s 3, & 1965 c 8 s 43.21.050;
(2) RCW 43.92.020 (Objects of survey) and 1965 c 8 s 43.92.020;
(3) RCW 43.92.040 (Printing and distribution of reports) and 1965
c 8 s 43.92.040;
(4) RCW 43.92.060 (Cooperation with federal geological survey) and
1965 c 8 s 43.92.060; and
(5) RCW 43.92.070 (Topographic map -- Stream measurements) and 1965
c 8 s 43.92.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 3 and 5 through 11 of
this act are each added to chapter 43.92 RCW.

--- END ---