BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.15.050 and 2003 c 334 s 353 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All sales of valuable materials exceeding ((twenty)) twenty-five thousand dollars in appraised value must be at public auction or
by sealed bid to the highest bidder, provided that on public lands
granted to the state for educational purposes sealed bids may be
accepted for sales of timber or stone only.
(2) A direct sale of valuable materials may be sold to the
applicant for cash at full appraised value without notice or
advertising. The board must, by resolution, establish the value amount
of a direct sale not to exceed ((twenty)) twenty-five thousand dollars
in appraised sale value, and establish procedures to ensure that
competitive market prices and accountability are guaranteed.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.15.080 and 2003 c 334 s 347 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Sales, other than direct sales, appraised at an amount not
exceeding ((one)) two hundred fifty thousand dollars, when authorized
by the board for sale, shall be advertised by publishing not less than
ten days prior to sale a notice of such sale in a newspaper of general
circulation located nearest to the property from which the valuable
material is to be sold.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 79.15.050, all other proposed sales
of valuable materials must be advertised through individual notice of
sale and publication of a statewide list of sales.
(((a))) The notice of sale:
(((i))) (a) Must specify the place, date, and time of sale, the
appraised value thereof, and describe with particularity each parcel of
land from which valuable materials are to be sold. The estimated
volume will be identified and the terms of sale will be available in
the region headquarters and the department's Olympia office;
(((ii))) (b) May prescribe that the bid deposit required in RCW
79.15.110 be considered an opening bid;
(((iii) Must be published not less than two times during a four-week period prior to the time of sale in at least one newspaper of
general circulation where the material is located; and
(iv))) (c) Must be posted in a conspicuous place in the
department's Olympia office and in the region headquarters
administering the sale, and in the office of the county auditor of the
county where the material is located; and
(d) May be advertised in a newspaper of general circulation where
the material is located.
(((b) The department shall print a list of all valuable material on
public lands that are to be sold. The list should be organized by
county and by alphabetical order.
(i) The list should be published in a pamphlet form, issued at
least four weeks prior to the date of any sale and provide sale
information to prospective buyers.
(ii) The department must retain for free distribution in the
Olympia office and the region offices sufficient copies of the
pamphlet, to be kept in a conspicuous place, and, when requested to do
so, must mail copies of the pamphlet as issued to any requesting
applicant.
(iii) The department may seek additional means of publishing the
information in the pamphlet, such as on the internet, to increase the
number of prospective buyers.))
(3) The department is authorized to expend any sum in additional
advertising of the sales as it deems necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) 2003 c 381 s 1;
(2) 2003 c 381 s 2; and
(3) 2003 c 381 s 3.

--- END ---