BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.17.270 and 1994 c 203 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A licensed agent may be licensed as a broker and be a broker as
to insurers for which the licensee is not then appointed as agent. A
licensed broker may be licensed as and be an agent as to insurers
appointing such agent. The sole relationship between a broker and an
insurer as to which the licensee is appointed as an agent shall, as to
transactions arising during the existence of such agency appointment,
be that of insurer and agent.
(2) Unless the agency-insurer agreement provides to the contrary,
an insurance agent licensed as a broker may((, with respect to property
and casualty insurance,)) receive the following compensation:
(a) A commission paid by the insurer;
(b) A fee paid by the insured; or
(c) A combination of commission paid by the insurer and a fee paid
by the insured from which a broker may offset or reimburse the insured
for all or part of the fee.
If the compensation received by an agent who is also licensed as a
broker and who is dealing directly with the insured includes a fee, the
full amount of compensation, including an explanation of any offset or
reimbursement, must be disclosed in writing, signed by the broker and
the insured, and the writing must be retained by the broker for not
less than five years.
(3) For purposes of this section, "insurer" includes an insurer
authorized under chapter 48.05 RCW, a health care service contractor
registered under chapter 48.44 RCW, and a health maintenance
organization under chapter 48.46 RCW. "Insured" means the
policyholder.

--- END ---