BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Hepatitis C is the most common blood-borne infection in the
United States, infecting an estimated 3.9 million people. It is the
leading cause for liver transplantation, and accounts for ten to twelve
thousand deaths per year.
(2) National data suggests that as many as one hundred thousand
people in Washington may be infected with hepatitis C.
(3) There is no vaccine for hepatitis C, and no known cure.
However, its transmission may be lessened, and those who carry the
virus can take steps to improve their well-being and reduce their risk
of liver and other associated chronic diseases. Education and outreach
are key to these prevention efforts.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to establish a
system to accurately monitor the incidence of hepatitis C in the state
of Washington for the purposes of understanding, controlling, and
reducing its occurrence, and directing appropriate resources to its
management. To accomplish this, the legislature has determined that
hepatitis C cases shall be reported to the department of health, and
that a statewide population-based hepatitis C data base shall be
established. In addition, it is the intent of the legislature to
establish a comprehensive hepatitis C awareness and education campaign.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, the
department of health shall establish, staff, and maintain an up-to-date
data base which shall include a record of all reported cases of
hepatitis C in Washington state, and deaths attributed to hepatitis C
as a primary or secondary cause.
(2) Data obtained under this section shall be used for statistical,
scientific, medical research, and public health purposes only. The
department of health shall ensure that access to data contained in the
registry is consistent with federal law for the protection of human
subjects and consistent with chapter 42.48 RCW.
(3) Providing information under this section shall not create any
liability on the part of the provider, nor shall it constitute a breach
of confidentiality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, the
department of health shall implement a comprehensive hepatitis C public
awareness and education campaign for the general public and health care
providers. The campaign shall include at a minimum:
(1) Information on risk factors;
(2) Primary prevention activities;
(3) The value of early detection;
(4) Methods to prevent chronic liver disease;
(5) The avoidance of further transmission; and
(6) Available treatment options.

--- END ---