BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any plan offered to public employees under this chapter must
offer each public employee the option of covering any unmarried
dependent of the employee: (a) Under the age of twenty-five; or (b)
under the age of thirty and a veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007,
regardless of whether the dependent is enrolled in an educational
institution.
(2) Any employee choosing under subsection (1) of this section to
cover a dependent who is: (a) Age twenty through twenty-three and not
a registered student at an accredited secondary school, college,
university, vocational school, or school of nursing; or (b) age
twenty-four through twenty-nine, shall be required to pay the full cost
of such coverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Any disability insurance contract that provides coverage for a
subscriber's dependent must offer the option of covering any unmarried
dependent: (1) Under the age of twenty-five; or (2) under the age of
thirty and a veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007, regardless of
whether the dependent is enrolled in an educational institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Any group disability insurance contract or blanket disability
insurance contract that provides coverage for a participating member's
dependent must offer each participating member the option of covering
any unmarried dependent: (1) Under the age of twenty-five; or (2)
under the age of thirty and a veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007,
regardless of whether the dependent is enrolled in an educational
institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any individual health care service plan contract that provides
coverage for a subscriber's dependent must offer the option of covering
any unmarried dependent: (a) Under the age of twenty-five; or (b)
under the age of thirty and a veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007,
regardless of whether the dependent is enrolled in an educational
institution.
(2) Any group health care service plan contract that provides
coverage for a participating member's dependent must offer each
participating member the option of covering any unmarried dependent:
(a) Under the age of twenty-five; or (b) under the age of thirty and a
veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007, regardless of whether the
dependent is enrolled in an educational institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any individual health maintenance agreement that provides
coverage for a subscriber's dependent must offer the option of covering
any unmarried dependent: (a) Under the age of twenty-five; or (b)
under the age of thirty and a veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007,
regardless of whether the dependent is enrolled in an educational
institution.
(2) Any group health maintenance agreement that provides coverage
for a participating member's dependent must offer each participating
member the option of covering any unmarried dependent: (a) Under the
age of twenty-five; or (b) under the age of thirty and a veteran, as
defined in RCW 41.04.007, regardless of whether the dependent is
enrolled in an educational institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect January 1, 2007.

--- END ---