BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each plan offered to public employees and their covered
dependents under this chapter that is not subject to the provisions of
Title 48 RCW and is issued or renewed after December 31, 2006, shall
provide coverage for prostate cancer screening, provided that the
screening is delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's
physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or physician
assistant.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application
of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of the health care authority to negotiate rates and contract
with specific providers for the delivery of prostate cancer screening
services. This section shall not apply to medicare supplemental
policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or
other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each disability insurance policy issued or renewed after
December 31, 2006, that provides coverage for hospital or medical
expenses shall provide coverage for prostate cancer screening, provided
that the screening is delivered upon the recommendation of the
patient's physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or
physician assistant.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application
of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of an insurer to negotiate rates and contract with specific
providers for the delivery of prostate cancer screening services. This
section shall not apply to medicare supplemental policies or
supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited
benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each group disability insurance policy issued or renewed after
December 31, 2006, that provides coverage for hospital or medical
expenses shall provide coverage for prostate cancer screening, provided
that the screening is delivered upon the recommendation of the
patient's physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or
physician assistant.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application
of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of an insurer to negotiate rates and contract with specific
providers for the delivery of prostate cancer screening services. This
section shall not apply to medicare supplemental policies or
supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited
benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each health care service contract issued or renewed after
December 31, 2006, that provides coverage for hospital or medical
expenses shall provide coverage for prostate cancer screening, provided
that the screening is delivered upon the recommendation of the
patient's physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or
physician assistant.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application
of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of a contractor to negotiate rates and contract with specific
providers for the delivery of prostate cancer screening services. This
section shall not apply to medicare supplemental policies or
supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited
benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each health maintenance agreement issued or renewed after
December 31, 2006, that provides coverage for hospital or medical
expenses shall provide coverage for prostate cancer screening, provided
that the screening is delivered upon the recommendation of the
patient's physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or
physician assistant.
(2) All services must be provided by the health maintenance
organization or rendered upon a referral by the health maintenance
organization.
(3) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application
of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of a health maintenance organization to negotiate rates and
contract with specific providers for the delivery of prostate cancer
screening services. This section shall not apply to medicare
supplemental policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified
disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.125 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement
established, operated, providing benefits, or maintained in this state
after December 31, 2006, that provides coverage for hospital or medical
expenses shall provide coverage for prostate cancer screening, provided
that the screening is delivered upon the recommendation of the
patient's physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or
physician assistant.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application
of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement to
negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery
of prostate cancer screening services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any schedule of benefits established or renewed by the
Washington basic health plan after December 31, 2006, shall provide
coverage for prostate cancer screening, provided that the screening is
delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician, advanced
registered nurse practitioner, or physician assistant.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application
of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of the health care authority to negotiate rates and contract
with specific providers for the delivery of prostate cancer screening
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall provide coverage for prostate cancer screening
under this chapter, provided that the screening is delivered upon the
recommendation of the patient's physician, advanced registered nurse
practitioner, or physician assistant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the department of health
for the implementation of a prostate cancer public awareness and
education campaign. The campaign shall place special emphasis on early
education for men over forty, African-American men, and men who are at
high risk for prostate cancer according to the guidelines of the
American cancer society.

--- END ---