BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the
implementation of health information technologies in hospitals,
including electronic medical records, has the potential to
significantly reduce cost, improve patient outcomes, and simplify the
administration of health care. Further, the legislature finds that the
number of and complexity of the bills that result from a hospital stay
can be confusing to patients. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature to encourage hospitals to design the implementation of
health information technologies so as to allow the hospital to provide
the patient, prior to or upon discharge, clearly understandable
information about the services provided during the hospital stay, and
the bills the patient is likely to receive related to each of those
services. Recognizing that complete implementation of the technologies
required to achieve this goal will take a number of years, the
legislature intends to require that hospitals immediately begin working
toward the goal by compiling and communicating information to assist
patients in understanding their bills.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to or upon discharge, a hospital must furnish each
patient receiving inpatient services a written statement providing a
list of physician groups and other professional partners that commonly
provide care for patients at the hospital and from whom the patient may
receive a bill, along with contact phone numbers for those groups. The
statement must prominently display a phone number that a patient can
call for assistance if the patient has any questions about any of the
bills they receive after discharge that relate to their hospital stay.
(2) This section does not apply to any hospital owned or operated
by a health maintenance organization under chapter 48.46 RCW when
providing prepaid health care services to enrollees of the health
maintenance organization or any of its wholly owned subsidiary
carriers.

--- END ---