BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A twelve month, one county, community
options program entry system pilot project is established. The purpose
of the pilot project is to assist individual providers with the
collection of community options program entry system client
participation money.
(2) The department of social and health services will administer
the pilot project by contracting with a third party to collect the
participation amount owed to the individual provider. The third party
must pay the individual provider for the wages earned associated with
the client's participation amount. The third party will collect the
participation amount owed directly from the client. The individual
providers will invoice the state's social services payment system as
they currently do for all hours worked.
(3) Individual providers wishing to participate in the pilot
project must meet participation criteria established by the department
and be authorized by area agency of aging case managers and home
community services social workers. The department shall limit
individual provider participation to prevent an overexpenditure of the
appropriation made under this act.
(4) A third party wishing to participate in the project must
demonstrate to the department of social and health services that it has
the capability to manage the pilot project and demonstrate that it has
successfully worked with frail seniors, collected participation
amounts, and managed issues of home care workers.
(5) The pilot project is to take place in a county chosen by the
department of social and health services based on need and the ability
to gather data for the reporting requirement in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of social and health services
must report on the results of the pilot project to the appropriate
committees of the legislature. The report must be in two phases. The
first report must be made by December 1, 2006, and the final report
must be made by June 1, 2007. The final report must include
recommendations for funding a future program including a revenue
neutral option, an analysis as to why participation is not being paid
and any available solutions, and a comparison of collected amounts
under the pilot project to collected amounts without the pilot project
to determine whether the pilot project is cost-effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of forty-nine thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the department of
social and health services for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires July 1, 2007.

--- END ---