BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.960 and 2003 c 339 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment, or to services rendered in respect to
constructing structures, installing, constructing, repairing, cleaning,
decorating, altering, or improving of structures or machinery and
equipment, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of structures or machinery and equipment, if
the machinery, equipment, or structure is used directly for the retail
sale of a wood biomass fuel blend. Structures and machinery and
equipment that are used for the retail sale of a wood biomass fuel
blend and for other purposes are exempt only on the portion used
directly for the retail sale of a wood biomass fuel blend.
(2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of fuel
delivery vehicles or to sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the vehicles including repair parts and replacement parts if
at least seventy-five percent of the fuel distributed by the vehicles
is a wood biomass fuel blend.
(3) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in ((RCW
82.69.010 [2003 c 339 § 1] and)) this subsection apply.
(a) "Wood biomass fuel" means a pyrolytic liquid fuel or synthesis
gas-derived liquid fuel, comprised primarily of carbon monoxide and
hydrogen, produced from wood, and used in internal combustion engines.
(b) "Wood biomass fuel blend" means fuel that contains at least
twenty percent wood biomass fuel by volume.
(((b))) (c) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures,
devices, and support facilities and tangible personal property that
becomes an ingredient or component thereof, including repair parts and
replacement parts that are integral and necessary for the delivery of
a wood biomass fuel blend into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2009.

--- END ---