BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that people of color
experience significant disparities from the general population in
education, employment, healthy living conditions, access to health
care, and other social determinants of health. The legislature finds
that it shall be a priority for the state to develop the knowledge,
attitudes, and practice skills of health professionals and those
working with diverse populations to achieve a greater understanding of
the relationship between culture and health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.122 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each education program with a curriculum to train health
professionals for employment in a profession credentialed by a
disciplining authority under chapter 18.130 RCW shall include
instruction and assessment in multicultural health as part of its basic
education preparation curriculum.
(2) Each health professional regulatory authority authorized to
establish continuing education requirements according to this title
shall adopt rules that provide continuing education training in
multicultural health. Each such health professional regulatory
authority shall consult with a knowledgeable entity within a state
institution of higher education specializing in health disparities and
multicultural care or with the department of health in the development
of these rules.

--- END ---