BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that people of color
experience significant disparities from the general population in
education, employment, healthy living conditions, access to health
care, and other social determinants of health. The legislature intends
that state government policy leaders, program managers, and staff
increase their awareness of actions they take or that they contemplate
taking that contribute to health disparities. It shall be the policy
of the state of Washington to address health disparities in communities
of color by creating an action plan and statewide policy to include
health impact assessments that measure and address other social
determinants of health that lead to disparities as well as the
contributing factors of health that can have broad impacts on improving
status, health literacy, physical activity, and nutrition.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.20.025 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 208 are each
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Commissions" means the Washington state commission on African-American affairs established in chapter 43.113 RCW, the Washington
state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs established in
chapter 43.117 RCW, the Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs
established in chapter 43.115 RCW, and the governor's office of Indian
affairs.
(2) "Consumer representative" means any person who is not an
elected official, who has no fiduciary obligation to a health facility
or other health agency, and who has no material financial interest in
the rendering of health services.
(((2))) (3) "Council" means the ((health care access and cost
control)) governor's interagency coordinating council on health
disparities.
(((3))) (4) "Department" means the department of health.
(((4))) (5) "Health disparities" means the difference in incidence,
prevalence, mortality, or burden of disease and other adverse health
conditions, including lack of access to proven health care services
that exists between specific population groups in Washington state.
(6) "Health impact assessment" means a systematic review of a
legislative or budgetary proposal or other public policy, program, or
practice completed according to the terms of this chapter that
determines the extent to which such proposal, policy, program, or
practice improves or exacerbates health disparities.
(7) "Secretary" means the secretary of health, or the secretary's
designee.
(((5))) (8) "Local health board" means a health board created
pursuant to chapter 70.05, 70.08, or 70.46 RCW.
(((6))) (9) "Local health officer" means the legally qualified
physician appointed as a health officer pursuant to chapter 70.05,
70.08, or 70.46 RCW.
(((7))) (10) "Social determinants of health" means those elements
of social structure most closely shown to affect health and illness,
including at a minimum, early learning, education, socioeconomic
standing, safe housing, sanitary environmental conditions, gender,
incidence of violence, convenient and affordable access to safe
opportunities for physical activity, healthy diet, clean water, clean
air, toxin-free environments, and appropriate health care services.
(11) "State board" means the state board of health created under
chapter 43.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The state board, in collaboration with the council, shall complete
health impact assessments, in collaboration with the council, and with
assistance that shall be provided by any state agency of which the
board makes a request. The state board may limit the number of health
impact assessments it produces to retain quality while operating within
its available resources.
(1) A health impact assessment may be initiated by any council
member or by any state legislator by written request submitted
according to forms and procedures proposed by the council and approved
by the state board.
(2) The subject of the assessment may be any state government
program, policy, practice, or proposal for state legislative or
budgetary change that the requesting party believes may have a
significant impact on health disparities.
(3) Upon receiving a request for a health impact assessment from a
member of the legislature during a legislative session, the state board
shall deliver the health impact assessment to the requesting party in
no more than ten days. Requests made in the normal course of business
shall receive an assessment from the state board no later than ninety
days after a request is made.
(4) Upon delivery of the assessment to the requesting party, it
shall be a public document, and shall be available on the state board's
web site.
(5) The assessment shall be based on the best available empirical
information and professional assumptions available to the state board
regarding the most likely health impact of the subject program,
practice, or proposal. Such impacts may include changes in health
disparities or in the social determinants of health experienced by
racial or ethnic minorities.
(6) In fulfilling their responsibilities under this subsection, the
state board and the council may create ad hoc committees or other such
committees of limited duration as necessary.
(7) The state board and the department shall collaborate to obtain
any federal or private funding that may become available to implement
the state board's duties under this chapter. If the department
receives such funding, the department shall allocate it to the state
board to implement its duties under this chapter, and any state general
funds that may have been appropriated but are no longer needed by the
state board shall lapse to the state general fund.

--- END ---