BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.20.030 and 1984 c 287 s 75 and 1984 c 243 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The state board of health shall be composed of ten members. These
shall be the secretary or the secretary's designee and nine other
persons to be appointed by the governor, including four persons
experienced in matters of health and sanitation, one of whom is a
health official from a federally recognized tribe; an elected city
official who is a member of a local health board((,)); an elected
county official who is a member of a local health board((,)); a local
health officer((,)); and two persons representing the consumers of
health care. Before appointing the city official, the governor shall
consider any recommendations submitted by the association of Washington
cities. Before appointing the county official, the governor shall
consider any recommendations submitted by the Washington state
association of counties. Before appointing the local health officer,
the governor shall consider any recommendations submitted by the
Washington state association of local public health officials. Before
appointing one of the two consumer representatives, the governor shall
consider any recommendations submitted by the state council on aging.
The chairman shall be selected by the governor from among the nine
appointed members. The department of social and health services shall
provide necessary technical staff support to the board. The board may
employ an executive director and a confidential secretary, each of whom
shall be exempt from the provisions of the state civil service law,
chapter 41.06 RCW.
Members of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act shall be known as the Sue Crystal
memorial act.

--- END ---