BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that people of color experience significant
disparities from the general population in education, employment,
healthful living conditions, access to health care, and other social
determinants of health. The legislature finds that these circumstances
coupled with lower, slower, and less culturally appropriate access to
needed medical care result in higher rates of morbidity and mortality
for persons of color than observed in the general population. Health
disparities is defined by the national institute of health as the
differences in incidence, prevalence, mortality, and burden of disease
and other adverse health conditions that exist among specific
population groups in the United States. It is the intent of the
Washington state legislature to create the healthiest state in the
nation by striving to eliminate health disparities in people of color.
In meeting the intent of this act, the legislature creates the
governor's interagency coordinating council on health disparities.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.20.025 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 208 are each
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Commissions" means the Washington state commission on African-American affairs established in chapter 43.113 RCW, the Washington
state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs established in
chapter 43.117 RCW, the Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs
established in chapter 43.115 RCW, and the governor's office of Indian
affairs.
(2) "Consumer representative" means any person who is not an
elected official, who has no fiduciary obligation to a health facility
or other health agency, and who has no material financial interest in
the rendering of health services.
(((2))) (3) "Council" means the ((health care access and cost
control)) governor's interagency coordinating council on health
disparities, convened according to this chapter.
(((3))) (4) "Department" means the department of health.
(((4))) (5) "Health disparities" means the difference in incidence,
prevalence, mortality, or burden of disease and other adverse health
conditions, including lack of access to proven health care services
that exists between specific population groups in Washington state.
(6) "Health impact assessment" means a systematic review of a
legislative or budgetary proposal or other public policy, program, or
practice completed according to the terms of this chapter that
determines the extent to which such proposal, policy, program, or
practice improves or exacerbates health disparities.
(7) "Secretary" means the secretary of health, or the secretary's
designee.
(((5))) (8) "Local health board" means a health board created
pursuant to chapter 70.05, 70.08, or 70.46 RCW.
(((6))) (9) "Local health officer" means the legally qualified
physician appointed as a health officer pursuant to chapter 70.05,
70.08, or 70.46 RCW.
(((7))) (10) "Social determinants of health" means those elements
of social structure most closely shown to affect health and illness,
including at a minimum, early learning, education, socioeconomic
standing, safe housing, sanitary environmental conditions, gender,
incidence of violence, convenient and affordable access to safe
opportunities for physical activity, healthy diet, clean water, clean
air, toxin-free environments, and appropriate health care services.
(11) "State board" means the state board of health created under
chapter 43.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In collaboration with staff whom the office of financial
management may assign, and within funds made expressly available to the
state board for these purposes, the state board shall assist the
governor by convening and providing assistance to the council. The
council shall include one representative from each of the following
groups: Each of the commissions, the state board, the department, the
department of social and health services, the employment security
department, the department of community, trade, and economic
development, the department of corrections, the health care authority,
the department of labor and industries, the department of agriculture,
the department of ecology, the higher education coordinating board, the
department of transportation, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the work force training and education coordinating
board, and two members of the public who will represent the interests
of health care consumers. The council is a class one group under RCW
43.03.220. The two public members shall be paid per diem and travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The council
shall reflect diversity in race, ethnicity, and gender. The governor
or the governor's designee shall chair the council.
(2) The council shall promote and facilitate communication,
coordination, and collaboration among relevant state agencies and
communities of color, and the private sector and public sector, to
address health disparities. The council shall conduct public hearings,
inquiries, studies, or other forms of information gathering to
understand how the actions of state government ameliorate or contribute
to health disparities. All state agencies must cooperate with the
council's efforts.
(3) The council with assistance from the state board, shall assess
through public hearings, review of existing data, and other means, and
recommend initiatives for improving the availability of culturally
appropriate health literature and interpretive services within public
and private health-related agencies.
(4) In order to assist with its work, the council shall establish
advisory committees to include members from local communities.
(5) The advisory committee shall reflect diversity in race,
ethnicity, and gender.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The council shall consider in its deliberations and by 2012, create
an action plan for eliminating health disparities. The action plan
must address, but is not limited to, the following diseases: Diabetes,
asthma, infant mortality, HIV/AIDS, heart disease, strokes, breast
cancer, cervical cancer, prostate cancer, sudden infant death syndrome
(SIDS), mental health, smoking cessation, and immunization rates of
children and senior citizens. The action plan shall be updated
biannually. The council shall meet as often as necessary but not less
than six times per calendar year. The council shall report its
progress with the action plan to the governor and the legislature no
later than January 15, 2008. A second report shall be presented no
later than January 15, 2010, and a third report from the council shall
be presented to the governor and the legislature no later than January
15, 2012. Thereafter, the governor and legislature shall require
progress updates from the council every four years in odd-numbered
years. The action plan shall recognize the need for flexibility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The state board and the department shall collaborate to obtain any
federal or private funding that may become available to implement the
state board's duties under this chapter. If the department receives
such funding, the department shall allocate it to the state board to
implement its duties under this chapter, and any state general funds
that may have been appropriated but are no longer needed by the state
board shall lapse to the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The joint committee shall conduct a review of the governor's
interagency coordinating council on health disparities and its
functions. The review shall be substantially the same as a sunset
review under chapter 43.131 RCW. The joint committee shall present its
findings to appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1,
2016.

--- END ---