BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.570 and 2003 c 345 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) There is a license for sports entertainment facilities to be
designated as a sports/entertainment facility license to sell beer,
wine, and spirits at retail, for consumption upon the premises only,
the license to be issued to the entity providing food and beverage
service at a sports entertainment facility as defined in this section.
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the cost of the license
is two thousand five hundred dollars per annum.
(b) The cost for a license under this section that is issued to the
entity providing food and beverage service for a small public or
private sports entertainment facility in which baseball is played and
which seats fewer than five thousand persons and is operational for no
more than three months per year is three hundred fifty dollars per
annum.
(2) For purposes of this section, a sports entertainment facility
includes a publicly or privately owned arena, coliseum, stadium, or
facility where sporting events are presented for a price of admission.
The facility does not have to be exclusively used for sporting events.
(3) The board may impose reasonable requirements upon a licensee
under this section, such as requirements for the availability of food
and victuals including but not limited to hamburgers, sandwiches,
salads, or other snack food. The board may also restrict the type of
events at a sports entertainment facility at which beer, wine, and
spirits may be served. When imposing conditions for a licensee, the
board must consider the seating accommodations, eating facilities, and
circulation patterns in such a facility, and other amenities available
at a sports entertainment facility.
(4)(a) The board may issue a caterer's endorsement to the license
under this section to allow the licensee to remove from the liquor
stocks at the licensed premises, for use as liquor for sale and service
at event locations at a specified date and place not currently licensed
by the board. If the event is open to the public, it must be sponsored
by a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If
attendance at the event is limited to members or invited guests of the
sponsoring individual, society, or organization, the requirement that
the sponsor must be a society or organization as defined by RCW
66.24.375 is waived. Cost of the endorsement is three hundred fifty
dollars.
(b) The holder of this license with catering endorsement shall, if
requested by the board, notify the board or its designee of the date,
time, place, and location of any catered event. Upon request, the
licensee shall provide to the board all necessary or requested
information concerning the society or organization that will be holding
the function at which the endorsed license will be utilized.
(5) The board may issue an endorsement to the beer, wine, and
spirits sports/entertainment facility license that allows the holder of
a beer, wine, and spirits sports/entertainment facility license to sell
for off-premises consumption wine vinted and bottled in the state of
Washington and carrying a label exclusive to the license holder selling
the wine. Spirits and beer may not be sold for off-premises
consumption under this section. The annual fee for the endorsement
under this section is one hundred twenty dollars.

--- END ---