BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Washington spends significant resources each
year on child support services. The legislature intends to acknowledge
parents who are fulfilling their noncustodial child support obligation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall:
(1) Issue to an obligor or noncustodial parent a formal accounting
or financial statement, documenting payments and credits for child
support, and if applicable, spousal maintenance, at the end of each
year, or upon request;
(2) Award a certificate to those who are in satisfactory or
excellent compliance with their noncustodial financial obligations, at
the end of each year, or upon request; and
(3) Keep a record of the certificate, which may be admitted at the
court's discretion, as evidence in civil proceedings involving the
noncustodial parent.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.23.050 and 2001 c 42 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the division of child support is providing support
enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, or if a party is applying for
support enforcement services by signing the application form on the
bottom of the support order, the superior court shall include in all
court orders that establish or modify a support obligation:
(a) A provision that orders and directs the responsible parent to
make all support payments to the Washington state support registry;
(b) A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages,
earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and
personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other
state, without further notice to the responsible parent at any time
after entry of the court order, unless:
(i) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that
there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding and
that withholding should be delayed until a payment is past due; or
(ii) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the
court that provides for an alternate arrangement;
(c) A statement that the receiving parent might be required to
submit an accounting of how the support is being spent to benefit the
child; and
(d) A statement that the responsible parent's privileges to obtain
and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be
renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a
support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320.
As used in this subsection and subsection (((3))) (4) of this
section, "good cause not to require immediate income withholding" means
a written determination of why implementing immediate wage withholding
would not be in the child's best interests and, in modification cases,
proof of timely payment of previously ordered support.
(2) In order to constitute an application for support enforcement
services, the application form on the bottom of the support order
referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall include:
(a) A statement explaining the differences in support services that
may be obtained through the division of child support and the option to
receive support payments directly from the responsible parent;
(b) A statement explaining how a party may discontinue receiving
support services from the division of child support, including a
statement that payments will be required to be made to the Washington
state support registry unless the order is changed; and
(c) The signed and notarized statement of the party stating that he
or she understands the level of support services being requested.
(3) In all other cases not under subsection (1) of this section,
the court may order the responsible parent to make payments directly to
the person entitled to receive the payments, to the Washington state
support registry, or may order that payments be made in accordance with
an alternate arrangement agreed upon by the parties.
(a) The superior court shall include in all orders under this
subsection that establish or modify a support obligation:
(i) A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages,
earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and
personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other
state, without further notice to the responsible parent at any time
after entry of the court order, unless:
(A) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that
there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding and
that withholding should be delayed until a payment is past due; or
(B) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the
court that provides for an alternate arrangement; and
(ii) A statement that the receiving parent may be required to
submit an accounting of how the support is being spent to benefit the
child.
As used in this subsection, "good cause not to require immediate
income withholding" is any reason that the court finds appropriate.
(b) The superior court may order immediate or delayed income
withholding as follows:
(i) Immediate income withholding may be ordered if the responsible
parent has earnings. If immediate income withholding is ordered under
this subsection, all support payments shall be paid to the Washington
state support registry. The superior court shall issue a mandatory
wage assignment order as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW when the
support order is signed by the court. The parent entitled to receive
the transfer payment is responsible for serving the employer with the
order and for its enforcement as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW.
(ii) If immediate income withholding is not ordered, the court
shall require that income withholding be delayed until a payment is
past due. The support order shall contain a statement that withholding
action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and
liens enforced against real and personal property under the child
support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to
the responsible parent, after a payment is past due.
(c) If a mandatory wage withholding order under chapter 26.18 RCW
is issued under this subsection and the division of child support
provides support enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, the existing
wage withholding assignment is prospectively superseded upon the
division of child support's subsequent service of an income withholding
notice.
(((3))) (4) The office of administrative hearings and the
department of social and health services shall require that all support
obligations established as administrative orders include a provision
which orders and directs that the responsible parent shall make all
support payments to the Washington state support registry. All
administrative orders shall also state that the responsible parent's
privileges to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW
74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is
not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320.
All administrative orders shall also state that withholding action may
be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens
enforced against real and personal property under the child support
statutes of this or any other state without further notice to the
responsible parent at any time after entry of the order, unless:
(a) One of the parties demonstrates, and the presiding officer
finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income
withholding; or
(b) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the
presiding officer that provides for an alternate agreement.
(((4))) (5) If the support order does not include the provision
ordering and directing that all payments be made to the Washington
state support registry and a statement that withholding action may be
taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits if a support payment
is past due or at any time after the entry of the order, or that a
parent's licensing privileges may not be renewed, or may be suspended,
the division of child support may serve a notice on the responsible
parent stating such requirements and authorizations. Service may be by
personal service or any form of mail requiring a return receipt.
(((5))) (6) Every support order shall state:
(a) The address where the support payment is to be sent;
(b) That withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings,
assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal
property under the child support statutes of this or any other state,
without further notice to the responsible parent at any time after
entry of a support order, unless:
(i) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that
there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding; or
(ii) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the
court that provides for an alternate arrangement;
(c) The income of the parties, if known, or that their income is
unknown and the income upon which the support award is based;
(d) The support award as a sum certain amount;
(e) The specific day or date on which the support payment is due;
(f) The names and ages of the dependent children;
(g) A provision requiring the responsible parent to keep the
Washington state support registry informed of whether he or she has
access to health insurance coverage at reasonable cost and, if so, the
health insurance policy information;
(h) That any parent owing a duty of child support shall be
obligated to provide health insurance coverage for his or her child if
coverage that can be extended to cover the child is or becomes
available to that parent through employment or is union-related as
provided under RCW 26.09.105;
(i) That if proof of health insurance coverage or proof that the
coverage is unavailable is not provided within twenty days, the obligee
or the department may seek direct enforcement of the coverage through
the obligor's employer or union without further notice to the obligor
as provided under chapter 26.18 RCW;
(j) The reasons for not ordering health insurance coverage if the
order fails to require such coverage;
(k) That the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and maintain
a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be
suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support order as
provided in RCW 74.20A.320;
(l) That each parent must:
(i) Promptly file with the court and update as necessary the
confidential information form required by subsection (((7))) (8) of
this section; and
(ii) Provide the state case registry and update as necessary the
information required by subsection (((7))) (8) of this section; and
(m) That parties to administrative support orders shall provide to
the state case registry and update as necessary their residential
addresses and the address of the responsible parent's employer. The
division of child support may adopt rules that govern the collection of
parties' current residence and mailing addresses, telephone numbers,
dates of birth, social security numbers, the names of the children,
social security numbers of the children, dates of birth of the
children, driver's license numbers, and the names, addresses, and
telephone numbers of the parties' employers to enforce an
administrative support order. The division of child support shall not
release this information if the division of child support determines
that there is reason to believe that release of the information may
result in physical or emotional harm to the party or to the child, or
a restraining order or protective order is in effect to protect one
party from the other party.
(((6))) (7) After the responsible parent has been ordered or
notified to make payments to the Washington state support registry
under this section, the responsible parent shall be fully responsible
for making all payments to the Washington state support registry and
shall be subject to payroll deduction or other income-withholding
action. The responsible parent shall not be entitled to credit against
a support obligation for any payments made to a person or agency other
than to the Washington state support registry except as provided under
RCW 74.20.101. A civil action may be brought by the payor to recover
payments made to persons or agencies who have received and retained
support moneys paid contrary to the provisions of this section.
(((7))) (8) All petitioners and parties to all court actions under
chapters 26.09, 26.10, 26.12, 26.18, 26.21, 26.23, 26.26, and 26.27 RCW
shall complete to the best of their knowledge a verified and signed
confidential information form or equivalent that provides the parties'
current residence and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, dates of
birth, social security numbers, driver's license numbers, and the
names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the parties' employers. The
clerk of the court shall not accept petitions, except in parentage
actions initiated by the state, orders of child support, decrees of
dissolution, or paternity orders for filing in such actions unless
accompanied by the confidential information form or equivalent, or
unless the confidential information form or equivalent is already on
file with the court clerk. In lieu of or in addition to requiring the
parties to complete a separate confidential information form, the clerk
may collect the information in electronic form. The clerk of the court
shall transmit the confidential information form or its data to the
division of child support with a copy of the order of child support or
paternity order, and may provide copies of the confidential information
form or its data and any related findings, decrees, parenting plans,
orders, or other documents to the state administrative agency that
administers Title IV-A, IV-D, or IV-E of the federal social security
act. In state initiated paternity actions, the parties adjudicated the
parents of the child or children shall complete the confidential
information form or equivalent or the state's attorney of record may
complete that form to the best of the attorney's knowledge.

--- END ---