BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
The owner, occupant, or tenant of the property within a homeowners'
association or the homeowners' association board shall use arbitration,
as provided in chapter 7.04 RCW, to resolve any civil action or
controversy arising under this chapter, the governing documents, or the
applicable titles that created the association: Titles 23, 23B, 24,
and 25 RCW.

--- END ---