BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.86 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person may sell, offer for sale, or advertise items of
merchandise for sale at a discount from the normal retail price without
offering a rain check for sale items that become out of stock during an
advertised sale period unless: (a) All advertisements for sale clearly
indicate the quantity of items available at the sale price and clearly
state that no rain checks are offered; or (b) a customer accepts a
comparable discount on a comparable item.
(2) No person may offer a retail promotional giveaway of items of
merchandise without offering a rain check for promotional items that
become out of stock during an advertised sale period unless: (a) All
advertisements for the promotional giveaway clearly indicate the
quantity of items available and clearly state that no rain checks are
offered; or (b) a customer accepts a comparable item.
(3) A rain check must be redeemable by the retailer for a period of
thirty days from the date of issue.

--- END ---