BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.100.060 and 2002 c 56 s 411 are each amended to
read as follows:
A county with a population of one million or more and a county with
a population of from two hundred ten thousand to less than one million
that is adjoining a county with a population of one million or more,
having within their boundaries existing or planned high-occupancy
vehicle lanes on the state highway system, or a regional transportation
investment district for capital improvements, but only to the extent
that the surcharge has not already been imposed by the county, may,
with voter approval, impose a local surcharge of not more than three-tenths of one percent of the value on vehicles registered to a person
residing within the county and not more than 13.64 percent on the state
sales and use taxes paid under the rate in RCW 82.08.020(2) on retail
car rentals within the county or investment district. A county may
impose the surcharge only to the extent that it has not been imposed by
the district. A regional transportation investment district shall not
impose a surcharge if a city transportation authority created under
chapter 35.95A RCW is imposing the special excise tax authorized in RCW
35.95A.080 to repay any remaining debt as part of a dissolution. After
a city transportation authority has stopped imposing the special excise
tax authorized in RCW 35.95A.080, a regional transportation investment
district may impose the surcharge. No surcharge may be imposed on
vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 except vehicles with an unladen
weight of six thousand pounds or less, RCW 46.16.079, 46.16.085, or
46.16.090.
Counties or investment districts imposing a tax under this section
shall contract, before the effective date of the resolution or
ordinance imposing a surcharge, administration and collection to the
state department of licensing, and department of revenue, as
appropriate, which shall deduct an amount, as provided by contract, for
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department. All
administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.32, and 82.44 RCW
shall, insofar as they are applicable to motor vehicle excise taxes, be
applicable to surcharges imposed under this section. All
administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32
RCW shall, insofar as they are applicable to state sales and use taxes,
be applicable to surcharges imposed under this section.
If the tax authorized in RCW 81.100.030 is also imposed, the total
proceeds from tax sources imposed under this section and RCW 81.100.030
each year shall not exceed the maximum amount which could be collected
under this section.

--- END ---