BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.175 and 1999 c 249 s 601 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the commission finds that any land under its control
cannot advantageously be used for park purposes, it is authorized to
dispose of such land by the method provided in this section or by the
method provided in RCW 79A.05.170. If such lands are school or other
grant lands, control thereof shall be relinquished by resolution of the
commission to the proper state officials. If such lands were acquired
under restrictive conveyances by which the state may hold them only so
long as they are used for park purposes, they may be returned to the
donor or grantors by the commission. All other such lands may be
either sold by the commission to the highest bidder or exchanged for
other lands of equal value by the commission, and all conveyance
documents shall be executed by the governor. All such exchanges shall
be accompanied by a transfer fee, to be set by the commission and paid
by the other party to the transfer; such fee shall be paid into the
parkland acquisition account established under RCW 79A.05.170.
((Sealed)) The commission may accept sealed bids, electronic bids, or
oral bids at auction. Bids on all sales shall be solicited at least
twenty days in advance of the sale date by an advertisement appearing
at least once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county in which the land to be sold is
located. If the commission feels that no bid received adequately
reflects the fair value of the land to be sold, it may reject all bids,
and may call for new bids. All proceeds derived from the sale of such
park property shall be paid into the park land acquisition account.
All land considered for exchange shall be evaluated by the commission
to determine its adaptability to park usage. The equal value of all
lands exchanged shall first be determined by the appraisals to the
satisfaction of the commission. No sale or exchange of state park
lands shall be made without the unanimous consent of the commission.

--- END ---