BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city or town providing residential gas, electric, or water
utility service under this chapter may require the following
information when an applicant applies for the service:
(a) The applicant's name, address, and telephone number, and an
alternative contact telephone number, if applicable, of the responsible
party at the service premises;
(b) The date the service is requested to be effective;
(c) The type of equipment to be served at the service premises;
(d) One source of identification. The applicant may choose from a
list, provided by the city or town, of at least five sources of
identification. The list must include a current driver's license or
other picture identification; and
(e) Any additional information the city or town may reasonably
require for billing or service.
(2) Where multiple individuals are liable for payment of a utility
charge, each responsible party shall provide acknowledgment of that
liability by signing a form provided by the utility. The utility may
allow up to thirty days for submittal of the signature, which may be
provided in person or by mail. If the acknowledgment is not provided
within thirty days, the utility may terminate services or be limited to
seeking payment from the individual who established the account.
(3) The city or town may not refuse to provide service to an
applicant or customer because there are outstanding amounts due from a
prior customer at the same premises, unless the city or town can
determine, based on objective evidence, that a fraudulent act is being
committed such that the applicant or customer is acting in cooperation
with the prior customer with the intent to avoid payment.
(4) The requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section
apply only to applicants seeking utility service after July 1, 2006.

--- END ---