BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the
following project loans recommended by the public works board are
authorized to be made with funds appropriated from the public works
assistance account:
(1) Auburn--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately 13,100
linear feet of 10, 12, and 15 inch concrete pipes with 24, 27, and 36
inch sewer pipes to handle existing and future wastewater flows.
Removal of eight pressure reducing valves on a water transmission line
and storm system revisions . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
(2) Battle Ground--sanitary sewer project--upgrades at Salmon Creek
treatment plant to achieve added capacity and security. Construction
of the new Klineline sewer pump station and approximately five miles of
force main system to accommodate future pumping capacity needs
. . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
(3) Bellevue--road project--improve a section of NE 24th Street
including widening the roadway to add five-foot bike lanes,
constructing curb, gutter, and sidewalk, and introduce calming
elements. The project is designed to improve safety by reducing areas
of conflict between vehicular and nonmotorized traffic by reducing
overall speeds . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
(4) Burien--storm sewer project--construct approximately 1,450
linear feet of 30 to 42 inch and approximately 300 linear feet of 24
inch storm water trunk lines to eliminate flooding in downtown Burien
during a 25-year storm event. Modify and expand the Ambaum regional
detention pond to accommodate peak flows and to control the release of
storm water in order to protect downstream habitat . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,547,000
(5) Clark public utilities--domestic water project--construct a
1,000 gallon per minute water supply well, construct and paint an
approximately 300,000 gallon reservoir, install a 500 gallon per minute
booster station, and replace approximately 90,000 feet of undersized
and deteriorated water line. These projects will increase fire flow
and generally improve the performance and reliability of the system
. . . . . . . . . . . . $5,087,250
(6) Edmonds--road project--provide the necessary slope stability
and improve the integrity of approximately 300 feet of roadway section
that has been slowly moving down the hill toward a house due to slope
failure . . . . . . . . . . . . $624,750
(7) Franklin County--road project--pave approximately 30 miles of
gravel roads throughout the county to save wear and tear on the
public's vehicles and savings in annual costs for maintenance
. . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
(8) Ilwaco--sanitary sewer project--replace a sewage pump station
and renovate another sewage pump station, both of which are 35 years
old to meet the department of ecology's requirements and save
approximately $13,000 every three years . . . . . . . . . . . . $237,960
(9) Lakewood--sanitary sewer project--construct three pump
stations, approximately 17,200 linear feet of force main, approximately
13,500 linear feet of gravity collector pipeline, and approximately 320
side sewer stubs to eliminate septic systems in the American Lake
gardens and Tillicum neighborhoods . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(10) Olympus terrace sewer district--sanitary sewer project--construction of approximately 8,000 linear feet of trunk pipeline and
approximately 16,500 linear feet of storm water conveyance pipeline to
prevent high storm water flows from further eroding stream channels
. . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(11) Seattle--storm sewer project--install approximately 2,860 feet
of storm drain and approximately 6,800 feet of pipe to alleviate
chronic flooding problems for at least 38 businesses and several
residences in South Park . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(12) Southwest suburban sewer district--sanitary sewer project--replace/rehabilitate approximately 16,700 linear feet of sewer mains to
reduce environmental and public health issues associated with sewer
backups . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,910,000
(13) Stevenson--domestic water project--replace a failing, unsafe,
and hazardous pump station to address fire flow requirements, convert
the vacated pump station into additional water reservoir storage, and
install approximately 6,250 feet of transmission main to eliminate
leaks . . . . . . . . . . . . $795,000
(14) Tacoma--domestic water project--construction of an ozonation
treatment plant capable of treating approximately 168 million gallons
per day that will provide disinfection and taste and odor compound
control . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(15) Vancouver--road project--widen approximately 5,000 linear feet
of NE 138th Street to four lanes with center left turn lane, bike
lanes, sidewalks, street lighting, and landscaping to increase capacity
and safety, and upgrade traffic control . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
(16) Washougal--sanitary sewer project--replace a pump station with
approximately 6,250 linear feet of force and gravity mains, extending
approximately 2,200 linear feet of gravity sewer, and extension of
approximately 2,000 linear feet of interceptor sewer. The improvements
protect the water quality of the Washougal River and serve the
projected 20-year growth of the area . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---