BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that more than half of
the state's forty-two and one-half million acres are forest lands and
that the majority of these lands are available for harvest. However,
many of the state's forest lands are threatened by conversion to
nonforest uses, including commercial and residential development. In
addition, worldwide fiber commodity prices, increased regulations, and
changing patterns in corporate and individual ownership of forest lands
are also contributing to the declines in working forest lands in the
state. Therefore, it is the intent of this chapter to provide greater
state financial assistance to revitalize and maintain forest lands in
the state, through creation of a funding board to make grants on a
competitive basis that support protection of the forest land base and
that assist in developing innovative strategies for supporting
economically and environmentally healthy forests and forest-dependent
communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the timber land revitalization board created in
section 3 of this act.
(2) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(3) "Priority needs areas" means the geographic areas identified by
the department for priority lands to be addressed under the forest
legacy program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The timber land revitalization board is
created. The board is composed of five members, of whom four members
must be appointed by the governor. The commissioner of public lands
shall serve ex officio as a voting member of the board. In making
appointments, the governor shall provide for representation of the
interests of industrial forest landowners, nonindustrial forest
landowners, local governments, and nonprofit citizen organizations
involved with the revitalization of timber lands and protection of the
state's forest land base. The governor shall solicit and give
substantial consideration to nominations provided by organizations
representing these interests. Appointments to the board by the
governor are subject to senate confirmation.
(2) The governor shall select a chair from among the members of the
board.
(3) Board members serve four-year terms, except that the governor
shall designate two of the initial appointments to serve for a term of
two years. The terms commence January 1, 2007.
(4) Staff support to the board shall be provided by the department.
For administrative purposes, the board shall be located within the
department.
(5) Members of the board shall be compensated as provided by RCW
43.03.250, and reimbursed for travel expenses as provided by RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The board is responsible for making
grants and loans for the revitalization of timber lands consistent with
the procedures and criteria of section 5 of this act, from the amounts
appropriated to the board for this purpose. To accomplish this
purpose, the board may:
(a) Provide assistance to grant applicants regarding the procedures
and criteria for grant and loan awards;
(b) Make and execute all manner of contracts and agreements with
public and private parties as the board deems necessary, consistent
with the purposes of this chapter;
(c) Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or
financial or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms
that are not in conflict with this chapter; and
(d) Do all acts necessary or convenient to carry out the powers
expressly granted or implied under this chapter.
(2) The department shall provide all necessary grant and loan
administration assistance to the board, and shall distribute and
account for funds appropriated or provided to the board for the
purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) During each fiscal biennium, the board's
total grants and loans are subject to the following limitations:
(a) Not less than thirty percent and not more than forty percent of
the total must be awarded for projects and activities that sustain the
forest land base and strengthen the connection between economic health
and conservation of forests in Washington. Such activities may include
but are not limited to:
(i) Programs or projects to support small timber landowners
including such strategies as group timber certification, group habitat
conservation plans, group cash flow pools, stewardship collaboration,
and technical support;
(ii) Programs or projects that test methods for recreation access
and cost-share programs;
(iii) Programs or projects that test methods to assist forest
landowners in providing carbon sequestration, water recharge, and other
natural resource services; and
(iv) Programs or projects that test methods to support forest
landowners' efforts at cost control, such as law enforcement, road
gates, and cleanup of illegal dumping.
(b) Not less than thirty percent and not more than forty percent of
the total must be awarded for projects and activities that preserve
forest lands over the long term for working forestry. Such activities
may include but are not limited to:
(i) The acquisition of interests in forest lands for the purpose of
protecting the lands for working forestry;
(ii) Developing and implementing cooperative agreements with forest
landowners for maintaining working forestry; and
(iii) Other activities using conservation techniques such as
clustering development rights, transfer of development rights, and land
exchanges.
(c) Not less than thirty percent and not more than forty percent of
the total must be awarded for planning, research, and policy
development related to revitalizing working forests in the state.
(2) The board shall adopt guidelines for the amount of nonstate
resources that must be committed for grants or loans from the
categories established by the board. The amount may not be less than
ten percent of the amount of the grant or loan from the board.
(3) The board shall also adopt guidelines that limit the amount of
a grant or loan that may be allocated to administrative or other
expenses of a grant or loan recipient that are not directly applied to
the working forestry revitalization activities of the grant or loan.
(4) The board shall accord additional weight to applications that
address forest lands within priority needs areas.
(5) During each fiscal year commencing July 1, 2007, and ending
June 30, 2016, the board shall establish a goal of disbursing a minimum
of twenty-five percent of the total funds awarded by the board in the
form of low-interest loans. However, if the board determines that
there are not sufficient applications for eligible projects to meet
this goal, the board may award a lesser amount as loans, or may hold
funds until the next funding cycle to encourage a greater number of
loan applications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 76 RCW.

--- END ---