BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.52.530 and 2002 c 341 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The enhanced 911 advisory committee is created to advise and assist
the state enhanced 911 coordinator in coordinating and facilitating the
implementation and operation of enhanced 911 throughout the state. The
director shall appoint members of the committee who represent diverse
geographical areas of the state and include state residents who are
members of the national emergency number association, the associated
public communications officers Washington chapter, the Washington state
fire chiefs association, the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs, the Washington state council of fire fighters, the
Washington state council of police officers, the Washington ambulance
association, the state fire protection policy board, the Washington
fire commissioners association, the Washington state patrol, the
association of Washington cities, the Washington state association of
counties, the utilities and transportation commission or commission
staff, and an equal number of representatives of large and small local
exchange telephone companies and large and small radio communications
service companies offering commercial mobile radio service in the
state. This section expires December 31, ((2006)) 2011.

--- END ---