BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the purpose
of the state's public education system is to help students acquire the
skills and knowledge they need to be informed, productive, and
responsible citizens. The legislature also recognizes that a lack of
financial literacy can pose a significant barrier for individuals
seeking to achieve financial prosperity and life-long stability. The
legislature finds that it is of the utmost importance to ensure that
Washington's students are educated in financial matters in order to
prepare them for financial independence and help them develop the
fiscal responsibility and financial management skills necessary to have
a secure future and succeed in the twenty-first century.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Each school district board of directors is encouraged to adopt
a financial literacy education program that is integrated within the
existing curriculum.
(2) "Financial literacy" means the achievement of skills and
knowledge necessary to make informed judgments and effective decisions
regarding earning, spending, and the management of money and credit.

--- END ---