BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A city or town shall not lay off, or conduct a reduction in force
affecting, permanent employees and fill the open positions created by
the lay off or reduction in force with inmates provided through a
correctional industries program under chapter 72.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.41 RCW
to read as follows:
A city or town shall not lay off, or conduct a reduction in force
affecting, permanent employees and fill the open positions created by
the lay off or reduction in force with inmates provided through a
correctional industries program under chapter 72.09 RCW.

--- END ---