BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.128 and 1993 c 2 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
Public funds, whether derived through taxes, fees, penalties, or
any other sources, shall not be used to finance political campaigns for
state or local office; except that the legislative authority of a city
or county may establish, through adoption of an ordinance or
resolution, a program allowing the use of public funds to finance
campaigns for local office. The ordinance or resolution must be
submitted to, and approved by, a vote of the people at the next general
election in the form of a referendum for those local jurisdictions with
referendum power, or in the form of an advisory ballot for those local
jurisdictions without referendum power.

--- END ---