BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79.100 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who causes a vessel to become abandoned or derelict upon
aquatic lands is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.100.010 and 2002 c 286 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Abandoned vessel" means the vessel's owner is not known or
cannot be located, or if the vessel's owner is known and located but is
unwilling to take control of the vessel, and the vessel has been left,
moored, or anchored in the same area without the express consent, or
contrary to the rules, of the owner, manager, or lessee of the aquatic
lands below or on which the vessel is located for either a period of
more than thirty consecutive days or for more than a total of ninety
days in any three hundred sixty-five day period. For the purposes of
this subsection (1) only, "in the same area" means within a radius of
five miles of any location where the vessel was previously moored or
anchored on aquatic lands.
(2) "Aquatic lands" means all tidelands, shorelands, harbor areas,
and the beds of navigable waters, including lands owned by the state
and lands owned by other public or private entities.
(3) "Authorized public entity" includes any of the following: The
department of natural resources; the department of fish and wildlife;
the parks and recreation commission; a metropolitan park district; a
port district; and any city, town, or county with ownership,
management, or jurisdiction over the aquatic lands where an abandoned
or derelict vessel is located.
(4) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(5) "Derelict vessel" means the vessel's owner is known and can be
located, and exerts control of a vessel that:
(a) Has been moored, anchored, or otherwise left in the waters of
the state or on public property contrary to RCW ((79.01.760)) 79.02.300
or rules adopted by an authorized public entity;
(b) Has been left on private property without authorization of the
owner; or
(c) Has been left for a period of seven consecutive days, and:
(i) Is sunk or in danger of sinking;
(ii) Is obstructing a waterway; or
(iii) Is endangering life or property.
(6) "Owner" means any natural person, firm, partnership,
corporation, association, government entity, or organization that has
a lawful right to possession of a vessel by purchase, exchange, gift,
lease, inheritance, or legal action whether or not the vessel is
subject to a security interest.
(7) "Vessel" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 53.08.310.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.100.040 and 2002 c 286 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to exercising the authority granted in RCW 79.100.030,
the authorized public entity must first obtain custody of the vessel.
To do so, the authorized public entity must:
(a) Mail notice of its intent to obtain custody, at least twenty
days prior to taking custody, to the last known address of the previous
owner to register the vessel in any state or with the federal
government and to any lien holders or secured interests on record. A
notice need not be sent to the purported owner or any other person
whose interest in the vessel is not recorded with a state or federal
agency;
(b) Post notice of its intent clearly on the vessel for thirty days
and publish its intent at least once, more than ten days but less than
twenty days prior to taking custody, in a newspaper of general
circulation for the county in which the vessel is located; and
(c) Post notice of its intent on the department's internet web site
on a page specifically designated for such notices. If the authorized
public entity is not the department, the department must facilitate the
internet posting.
(2) All notices sent, posted, or published in accordance with this
section must, at a minimum, explain the intent of the authorized public
entity to take custody of the vessel, the rights of the authorized
public entity after taking custody of the vessel as provided in RCW
79.100.030, the procedures the owner must follow in order to avoid
custody being taken by the authorized public entity, the procedures the
owner must follow in order to reclaim possession after custody is taken
by the authorized public entity, and the financial liabilities that the
owner may incur as provided for in RCW 79.100.060.
(3) If a vessel is in immediate danger of sinking, breaking up, or
blocking navigational channels, and the owner of the vessel cannot be
located or is unwilling or unable to assume immediate responsibility
for the vessel, ((an)) any authorized public entity may tow, beach, or
otherwise take temporary possession of the vessel. Before taking
temporary possession of the vessel, the authorized public entity must
make reasonable attempts to consult with the department ((and)) or the
United States coast guard to ensure that other remedies are not
available. The basis for taking temporary possession of the vessel
must be set out in writing by the authorized public entity within seven
days of taking action and be submitted to the owner, if known, as soon
thereafter as is reasonable. If the authorized public entity has not
already provided the required notice, immediately after taking
possession of the vessel, the authorized public entity must initiate
the notice provisions in subsection (1) of this section. The
authorized public entity must complete the notice requirements of
subsection (1) of this section before using or disposing of the vessel
as authorized in RCW 79.100.050.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.100.060 and 2002 c 286 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The owner of an abandoned or derelict vessel is responsible for
reimbursing an authorized public entity for all reasonable and
auditable costs associated with the removal or disposal of the owner's
vessel under this chapter. These costs include, but are not limited
to, costs incurred exercising the authority granted in RCW 79.100.030,
all administrative costs incurred by the authorized public entity
during the procedure set forth in RCW 79.100.040, removal and disposal
costs, and costs associated with environmental damages directly or
indirectly caused by the vessel. An authorized public entity that has
taken temporary possession of a vessel may require that all reasonable
and auditable costs associated with the removal of the vessel be paid
before the vessel is released to the owner.
(2) Reimbursement for costs may be sought from an owner who is
identified subsequent to the vessel's removal and disposal.
(3) If the full amount of all costs due to the authorized public
entity under this chapter is not paid to the authorized public entity
within thirty days after first notifying the responsible parties of the
amounts owed, the authorized public entity or the department may bring
an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to recover the costs,
plus reasonable attorneys' fees and costs incurred by the authorized
public entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 79.100 RCW
to read as follows:
The owner of a vessel may request a hearing to contest an
authorized public entity's decision to take temporary possession or
custody of the vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed to
an authorized public entity:
(1)(a) A written request for a hearing related to such a decision
or action by a state agency must be filed with the aquatic resources
division of the department within twenty days of the date the
authorized public entity acquires custody of the vessel under RCW
79.100.040, or if the vessel is redeemed before the authorized public
entity acquires custody, the date of redemption, or the right to a
hearing is deemed waived and the vessel's owner is liable for any costs
owed the authorized public entity. In the event of litigation, the
prevailing party is entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.
(b) Upon receipt of a timely hearing request, the department shall
proceed to hear and determine the validity of the decision to take the
vessel into temporary possession or custody and the reasonableness of
any towing, storage, or other charges permitted under this chapter.
Within five business days after the request for a hearing is filed, the
department shall notify the vessel owner requesting the hearing and the
authorized public entity of the date, time, and location for the
hearing. Unless the vessel is redeemed before the request for hearing
is filed, the department shall set the hearing on a date that is within
ten business days of the filing of the request for hearing. If the
vessel is redeemed before the request for a hearing is filed, the
department shall set the hearing on a date that is within sixty days of
the filing of the request for hearing.
(2) A request for a hearing related to such a decision or action by
a metropolitan park district, port district, city, town, or county must
be submitted using the procedures established in RCW 53.08.320(5).

Sec. 6 RCW 79.100.100 and 2002 c 286 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The derelict vessel removal account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from RCW 79.100.050 and 79.100.060 and those
moneys specified in RCW 88.02.030 and 88.02.050 must be deposited into
the account. The account is authorized to receive gifts, grants, and
endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to
time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of
this chapter and expend the same or any income according to the terms
of the gifts, grants, or endowments provided those terms do not
conflict with any provisions of this section or any guidelines
developed to prioritize reimbursement of removal projects associated
with this chapter. Moneys in the account may only be spent after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account shall be used by the
department to reimburse authorized public entities for ((seventy-five))
up to ninety percent of the total reasonable and auditable
administrative, removal, disposal, and environmental damage costs of
abandoned or derelict vessels when the previous owner is either unknown
after a reasonable search effort or insolvent. ((During the 2001-2003
biennium, up to forty percent of the expenditures from the account may
be used for administrative expenses of the department of licensing and
department of natural resources in implementing this chapter.)) Costs
associated with removal and disposal of an abandoned or derelict vessel
under the authority granted in RCW 53.08.320 also qualify for
reimbursement from the derelict vessel removal account. In each
((subsequent)) biennium, up to twenty percent of the expenditures from
the account may be used for administrative expenses of the department
of licensing and department of natural resources in implementing this
chapter.
(2) If the balance of the account reaches one million dollars as of
March 1st of any year, the department must notify the department of
licensing and the collection of any fees associated with this account
must be suspended for the following fiscal year.
(3) Priority for use of this account is for the removal of derelict
and abandoned vessels that are in danger of sinking, breaking up, or
blocking navigation channels, or that present environmental risks such
as leaking fuel or other hazardous substances. The department must
develop criteria, in the form of informal guidelines, to prioritize
removal projects associated with this chapter, but may not consider
whether the applicant is a state or local entity when prioritizing.
The guidelines must also include guidance to the authorized public
entities as to what removal activities and associated costs are
reasonable and eligible for reimbursement.
(4) The department must keep all authorized public entities
apprized of the balance of the derelict vessel removal account and the
funds available for reimbursement. The guidelines developed by the
department must also be made available to the other authorized public
entities. This subsection (4) must be satisfied by utilizing the least
costly method, including maintaining the information on the
department's internet web site, or any other cost-effective method.
(5) An authorized public entity may contribute its ((twenty-five))
ten percent of costs that are not eligible for reimbursement by using
in-kind services, including the use of existing staff, equipment, and
volunteers.
(6) This chapter does not guarantee reimbursement for an authorized
public entity. Authorized public entities seeking certainty in
reimbursement prior to taking action under this chapter may first
notify the department of their proposed action and the estimated total
costs. Upon notification by an authorized public entity, the
department must make the authorized public entity aware of the status
of the fund and the likelihood of reimbursement being available. The
department may offer technical assistance and assure reimbursement for
up to two years following the removal action if an assurance is
appropriate given the balance of the fund and the details of the
proposed action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 79.100.090 (Contest
custody/reimbursement -- Lawsuit) and 2002 c 286 s 10 are each repealed.

--- END ---