BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08A.250 and 2000 c 10 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this
chapter, "work activity" means:
(1) Unsubsidized paid employment in the private or public sector;
(2) Subsidized paid employment in the private or public sector,
including employment through the state or federal work-study program
for a period not to exceed twenty-four months;
(3) Work experience, including:
(a) An internship or practicum, that is paid or unpaid and is
required to complete a course of vocational training or to obtain a
license or certificate in a high demand field, as determined by the
employment security department. No internship or practicum shall
exceed twelve months; or
(b) Work associated with the refurbishing of publicly assisted
housing, if sufficient paid employment is not available;
(4) On-the-job training;
(5) Job search and job readiness assistance;
(6) Community service programs;
(7) Vocational educational training, not to exceed twelve months
with respect to any individual;
(8) Job skills training directly related to employment;
(9) Education directly related to employment, in the case of a
recipient who has not received a high school diploma or a GED;
(10) Satisfactory attendance at secondary school or in a course of
study leading to a GED, in the case of a recipient who has not
completed secondary school or received such a certificate;
(11) The provision of child care services to an individual who is
participating in a community service program;
(12) Internships, that shall be paid or unpaid work experience
performed by an intern in a business, industry, or government or
nongovernmental agency setting;
(13) Practicums, which include any educational program in which a
student is working under the close supervision of a professional in an
agency, clinic, or other professional practice setting for purposes of
advancing their skills and knowledge; ((and))
(14) Services required by the recipient under RCW 74.08.025(3) and
74.08A.010(3) to become employable; and
(15) Satisfactory participation in instruction or training which
has the purpose of improving parenting skills or child well-being.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.08A.270 and 2002 c 89 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Good cause reasons for failure to participate in WorkFirst
program components include: (a) Situations where the recipient is a
parent or other relative personally providing care for a child under
the age of six years, and formal or informal child care, or day care
for an incapacitated individual living in the same home as a dependent
child, is necessary for an individual to participate or continue
participation in the program or accept employment, and such care is not
available, and the department fails to provide such care; or (b) the
recipient is a parent with a child under the age of ((one year))
eighteen months, except that at the time a child reaches the age of
three months, the recipient is required to participate in one of the
following for up to twenty hours per week:
(i) Instruction or training which has the purpose of improving
parenting skills or child well-being;
(ii) Preemployment or job readiness training;
(iii) Course study leading to a high school diploma or GED; or
(iv) Volunteering in a child care facility licensed under chapter
74.15 RCW so long as the child care facility agrees to accept the
recipient as a volunteer and the child without compensation while the
parent is volunteering at the facility. The volunteer recipient and
his or her child shall not be counted for the purposes of determining
licensed capacity or the staff to child ratio of the facility.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prevent a recipient from
participating fully in the WorkFirst program on a voluntary basis. A
recipient who chooses to participate fully in the WorkFirst program
shall be considered to be fulfilling the requirements of this section.
(3) For any recipient who claims a good cause reason for failure to
participate in the WorkFirst program based on the fact that the
recipient has a child under the age of ((one year)) eighteen months,
the department shall, within existing resources, conduct an assessment
of the recipient within ninety days and before a job search component
is initiated in order to determine if the recipient has any specific
service needs or employment barriers. The assessment may include
identifying the need for substance abuse treatment, mental health
treatment, or domestic violence services, and shall be used in
developing the recipient's individual responsibility plan.
(4) A parent may only receive the exemption under subsection (1)(b)
of this section one time, for one child.

--- END ---