BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.106.010 and 2003 c 399 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context,
the following words and phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter
shall have the following meaning:)) The definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Advisory board" means the state advisory board of
plumbers((;)).
(2) "Contractor" means any person, corporate or otherwise, who
engages in, or offers or advertises to engage in, any work covered by
the provisions of this chapter by way of trade or business, or any
person, corporate or otherwise, who employs anyone, or offers or
advertises to employ anyone, to engage in any work covered by the
provisions of this chapter((;)).
(3) "Department" means the department of labor and industries((;)).
(4) "Director" means the director of department of labor and
industries((;)).
(5) "Journeyman plumber" means any person who has been issued a
certificate of competency by the department of labor and industries as
provided in this chapter((;)).
(6) "Like-in-kind" means having similar characteristics such as
plumbing size, type, and function, and being in the same location((;)).
(7) "Medical gas piping" means oxygen, nitrous oxide, high pressure
nitrogen, medical compressed air, and medical vacuum systems((;)).
(8) "Medical gas piping installer" means a journeyman plumber who
has been issued a medical gas piping installer endorsement((;)).
(9) "Plumbing" means that craft involved in installing, altering,
repairing and renovating potable water systems, liquid waste systems,
and medical gas piping systems within a building. Installation in a
water system of water softening or water treatment equipment is not
within the meaning of plumbing as used in this chapter((;)).
(10) "Specialty plumber" means anyone who has been issued a
specialty certificate of competency limited to:
(a) Installation, maintenance, and repair of the plumbing of
single-family dwellings, duplexes, and apartment buildings that do not
exceed three stories; ((or))
(b) Maintenance and repair of backflow prevention assemblies; or
(c) A domestic water pumping system consisting of the installation,
maintenance, and repair of the pressurization, treatment, and
filtration components of a domestic water system consisting of: One or
more pumps; pressure, storage, and other tanks; filtration and
treatment equipment; if appropriate, a pitless adapter; along with
valves, transducers, and other plumbing components that:
(i) Are used to acquire, treat, store, or move water suitable for
either drinking or other domestic purposes, including irrigation, to:
(A) A single-family dwelling, duplex, or other similar place of
residence; (B) a public water system, as defined in RCW 70.119.020 and
as limited under RCW 70.119.040; or (C) a farm owned and operated by a
person whose primary residence is located within thirty miles of any
part of the farm;
(ii) Are located within the interior space, including but not
limited to an attic, basement, crawl space, or garage, of a residential
structure, which space is separated from the living area of the
residence by a lockable entrance and fixed walls, ceiling, or floor;
(iii) If located within the interior space of a residential
structure, are connected to a plumbing distribution system supplied and
installed into the interior space by either: (A) A person who,
pursuant to RCW 18.106.070 or 18.106.090, possesses a valid temporary
permit or certificate of competency as a journeyman plumber, specialty
plumber, or trainee, as defined in this chapter; or (B) a person exempt
from the requirement to obtain a certified plumber to do such plumbing
work under RCW 18.106.150.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.106.040 and 2001 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of the application and evidence set forth in RCW
18.106.030, the director shall review the same and make a determination
as to whether the applicant is eligible to take an examination for the
certificate of competency. To be eligible to take the examination:
(a) Each applicant for a journeyman plumber's certificate of
competency shall furnish written evidence that he or she has completed
a course of study in the plumbing trade in the armed services of the
United States or at a school licensed by the work force training and
education coordinating board, or has had four or more years of
experience under the direct supervision of a licensed journeyman
plumber.
(b) Each applicant for a specialty plumber's certificate of
competency under RCW 18.106.010(((8))) (10)(a) shall furnish written
evidence that he or she has completed a course of study in the plumbing
trade in the armed services of the United States or at a school
licensed by the work force training and education coordinating board
under chapter 28C.10 RCW, or that he or she has had at least three
years practical experience in the specialty.
(c) Each applicant for a specialty plumber's certificate of
competency under RCW 18.106.010(((8)))(10) (b) or (c) shall furnish
written evidence that he or she is eligible to take the examination.
These eligibility requirements for the specialty plumbers defined by
RCW 18.106.010(10)(c) shall be one year of practical experience working
on pumping systems not exceeding one hundred gallons per minute, and
two years of practical experience working on pumping systems exceeding
one hundred gallons per minute, or equivalent as determined by rule by
the department in consultation with the advisory board, and that
experience may be obtained at the same time the individual is meeting
the experience required by RCW 19.28.191. The eligibility requirements
for other specialty plumbers shall be ((adopted)) established by rule
by the director pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(2)(a) The director shall establish reasonable rules for the
examinations to be given applicants for certificates of competency. In
establishing the rules, the director shall consult with the state
advisory board of plumbers as established in RCW 18.106.110.
(b) The director shall establish reasonable criteria by rule for
determining an applicant's eligibility to take an examination for the
certificate of competency for specialty plumbers under subsection
(1)(c) of this section. In establishing the criteria, the director
shall consult with the state advisory board of plumbers as established
in RCW 18.106.110. These rules must take effect by ((July 1, 2002))
December 31, 2006.
(3) Upon determination that the applicant is eligible to take the
examination, the director shall so notify the applicant, indicating the
time and place for taking the same.
(4) No other requirement for eligibility may be imposed.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.106.050 and 1997 c 326 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, with the advice of the advisory board, shall
prepare a written examination to be administered to applicants for
certificates of competency for journeyman plumber and specialty
plumber. The examination shall be constructed to determine:
(a) Whether the applicant possesses varied general knowledge of the
technical information and practical procedures that are identified with
the trade of journeyman plumber or specialty plumber; and
(b) Whether the applicant is familiar with the applicable plumbing
codes and the administrative rules of the department pertaining to
plumbing and plumbers.
((The department shall administer the examination to eligible
persons. All applicants shall, before taking the examination, pay to
the department a fee.))
(2) ((For purposes of the medical gas piping installer
endorsement,)) The department, with the consent of the advisory board,
may enter into a contract with a nationally recognized testing agency
to develop, administer, and score ((medical gas piping installer)) any
examinations required by this chapter. All applicants shall, before
taking an examination ((for a medical gas piping installer
endorsement)), pay the required examination fee. The department shall
set the examination fee by contract with a nationally recognized
testing agency. The fee shall cover but not exceed the costs of
preparing and administering the examination and the materials necessary
to conduct the practical elements of the examination. The department
shall approve training courses and set the fees for training courses
for ((the medical gas piping installer endorsement)) examinations
provided by this chapter.
(3) An examination to determine the competency of an applicant for
a domestic water pumping system specialty plumbing certificate as
defined by RCW 18.106.010(10)(c) must be established by the department
in consultation with the advisory board by December 31, 2006. The
department may include an examination for appropriate electrical safety
and technical requirements as required by RCW 19.28.191 with the
examination required by this section. The department, in consultation
with the advisory board, may accept the certification by a professional
or trade association or other acceptable entity as meeting the
examination requirement of this section. Individuals who can provide
evidence to the department prior to January 1, 2007, that they have
been employed in the pump and irrigation business as defined by RCW
18.106.010(10)(c) for not less than four thousand hours in the most
recent four calendar years shall be issued the appropriate certificate
by the department upon receiving such documentation and applicable
fees. The department shall establish a single document for those who
have received both the plumbing specialty certification defined by this
subsection and have also met the certification requirements for a pump
and irrigation or domestic pump specialty electrician, showing that the
individual has received both certifications.
(4) The department shall certify the results of the examinations
provided by this chapter, and shall notify the applicant in writing
whether he or she has passed or failed. Any applicant who has failed
the examination may retake the examination, upon the terms and after a
period of time that the director shall set by rule. The director may
not limit the number of times that a person may take the examination.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.106.110 and 1997 c 307 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created a state advisory board of plumbers, to be
composed of ((five)) seven members appointed by the governor. Two
members shall be journeyman plumbers, ((two)) one member shall be a
specialty plumber, three members shall be persons conducting a plumbing
business, at least one of which shall be primarily engaged in a
specialty plumbing business, and one member from the general public who
is familiar with the business and trade of plumbing.
(2) The term of one journeyman plumber expires July 1, 1995; the
term of the second journeyman plumber expires July 1, 2000; the term of
the specialty plumber expires July 1, 2008; the term of one person
conducting a plumbing business expires July 1, 1996; the term of the
second person conducting a plumbing business expires July 1, 2000; the
term of the third person conducting a plumbing business expires July 1,
2007; and the term of the public member expires July 1, 1997.
Thereafter, upon the expiration of said terms, the governor shall
appoint a new member to serve for a period of three years. However, to
ensure that the board can continue to act, a member whose term expires
shall continue to serve until his or her replacement is appointed. In
the case of any vacancy on the board for any reason, the governor shall
appoint a new member to serve out the term of the person whose position
has become vacant.
(3) The advisory board shall carry out all the functions and duties
enumerated in this chapter, as well as generally advise the department
on all matters relative to this chapter.
(4) Each member of the advisory board shall receive travel expenses
in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now
existing or hereafter amended for each day in which such member is
actually engaged in attendance upon the meetings of the advisory board.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.28.041 and 2002 c 249 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation,
or other entity to advertise, engage in, conduct, or carry on the
business of installing or maintaining wires or equipment to convey
electric current, or installing or maintaining equipment to be operated
by electric current as it pertains to the electrical industry, without
having an unrevoked, unsuspended, and unexpired electrical contractor
license, issued by the department in accordance with this chapter. All
electrical contractor licenses expire twenty-four calendar months
following the day of their issue. The department may issue an
electrical contractors license for a period of less than twenty-four
months only for the purpose of equalizing the number of electrical
contractor licenses that expire each month. Application for an
electrical contractor license shall be made in writing to the
department, accompanied by the required fee. The application shall
state:
(a) The name and address of the applicant; in case of firms or
partnerships, the names of the individuals composing the firm or
partnership; in case of corporations, the names of the managing
officials thereof;
(b) The location of the place of business of the applicant and the
name under which the business is conducted;
(c) Employer social security number;
(d) Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's
employees working in Washington, as follows:
(i) The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by
the department;
(ii) The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department;
or
(iii) For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada
subject to an agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as
permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of coverage issued by
the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the
applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant
has secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or
province's workers' compensation law;
(e) Employment security department number;
(f) State excise tax registration number;
(g) Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be
substituted for the information required by (d) of this subsection if
the applicant will not employ employees in Washington, and by (e) and
(f) of this subsection; and
(h) Whether a general or specialty electrical contractor license is
sought and, if the latter, the type of specialty. Electrical
contractor specialties include, but are not limited to: Residential,
pump and irrigation, limited energy system, signs, nonresidential
maintenance, restricted nonresidential maintenance, appliance repair,
and a combination specialty. A general electrical contractor license
shall grant to the holder the right to engage in, conduct, or carry on
the business of installing or maintaining wires or equipment to carry
electric current, and installing or maintaining equipment, or
installing or maintaining material to fasten or insulate such wires or
equipment to be operated by electric current, in the state of
Washington. A specialty electrical contractor license shall grant to
the holder a limited right to engage in, conduct, or carry on the
business of installing or maintaining wires or equipment to carry
electrical current, and installing or maintaining equipment; or
installing or maintaining material to fasten or insulate such wires or
equipment to be operated by electric current in the state of Washington
as expressly allowed by the license.
(2) The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage
information provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(d) of this
section, including but not limited to information regarding the
coverage of an individual employee of the applicant. If coverage is
provided under the laws of another state, the department may notify the
other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.
(3) The application for an electrical contractor license shall be
accompanied by a bond in the sum of four thousand dollars with the
state of Washington named as obligee in the bond, with good and
sufficient surety, to be approved by the department. The bond shall at
all times be kept in full force and effect, and any cancellation or
revocation thereof, or withdrawal of the surety therefrom, suspends the
license issued to the principal until a new bond has been filed and
approved as provided in this section. Upon approval of a bond, the
department shall on the next business day deposit the fee accompanying
the application in the electrical license fund and shall file the bond
in the office. The department shall upon request furnish to any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity a certified
copy of the bond upon the payment of a fee that the department shall
set by rule. The fee shall cover but not exceed the cost of furnishing
the certified copy. The bond shall be conditioned that in any
installation or maintenance of wires or equipment to convey electrical
current, and equipment to be operated by electrical current, the
principal will comply with the provisions of this chapter and with any
electrical ordinance, building code, or regulation of a city or town
adopted pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3) that is in effect at the time of
entering into a contract. The bond shall be conditioned further that
the principal will pay for all labor, including employee benefits, and
material furnished or used upon the work, taxes and contributions to
the state of Washington, and all damages that may be sustained by any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity due to a
failure of the principal to make the installation or maintenance in
accordance with this chapter or any applicable ordinance, building
code, or regulation of a city or town adopted pursuant to RCW
19.28.010(3). In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the
license applicant may file with the department a cash deposit or other
negotiable security acceptable to the department. If the license
applicant has filed a cash deposit, the department shall deposit the
funds in a special trust savings account in a commercial bank, mutual
savings bank, or savings and loan association and shall pay annually to
the depositor the interest derived from the account.
(4) The department shall issue general or specialty electrical
contractor licenses to applicants meeting all of the requirements of
this chapter. The provisions of this chapter relating to the licensing
of any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
including the requirement of a bond with the state of Washington named
as obligee therein and the collection of a fee therefor, are exclusive,
and no political subdivision of the state of Washington may require or
issue any licenses or bonds or charge any fee for the same or a similar
purpose. No person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
holding more than one specialty contractor license under this chapter
may be required to pay an annual fee for more than one such license or
to post more than one four thousand dollar bond, equivalent cash
deposit, or other negotiable security.
(5) To obtain a general or specialty electrical contractor license
the applicant must designate an individual who currently possesses a
valid master journeyman electrician's certificate of competency, master
specialty electrician's certificate of competency in the specialty for
which application has been made, or administrator's certificate as a
general electrical contractor administrator or as a specialty
electrical contractor administrator in the specialty for which
application has been made.
(6) Administrator certificate specialties include but are not
limited to: Residential, pump and irrigation or domestic pump, limited
energy system, signs, nonresidential maintenance, restricted
nonresidential maintenance, appliance repair, and combination
specialty. To obtain an administrator's certificate an individual must
pass an examination as set forth in RCW 19.28.051 unless the applicant
was a licensed electrical contractor at any time during 1974.
Applicants who were electrical contractors licensed by the state of
Washington at any time during 1974 are entitled to receive a general
electrical contractor administrator's certificate without examination
if the applicants apply prior to January 1, 1984. The board of
electrical examiners shall certify to the department the names of all
persons who are entitled to either a general or specialty electrical
contractor administrator's certificate.
(7) For a contractor doing domestic water pumping system work as
defined by RCW 18.106.010(10)(c), the department shall consider the
requirements of subsections (1)(a) through (h), (2), and (3) of this
section to have been met to be a pump and irrigation or domestic pump
licensed electrical contractor if the contractor has met the contractor
registration requirements of chapter 18.27 RCW. The department shall
establish a single registration/licensing document for those who
qualify for both general contractor registration as defined in chapter
18.27 RCW and a pump and irrigation or domestic pump electrical
contractor license as defined by this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 19.28.161 and 2002 c 249 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may engage in the electrical construction trade
without having a valid master journeyman electrician certificate of
competency, journeyman electrician certificate of competency, master
specialty electrician certificate of competency, or specialty
electrician certificate of competency issued by the department in
accordance with this chapter. Electrician certificate of competency
specialties include, but are not limited to: Residential, pump and
irrigation, limited energy system, signs, nonresidential maintenance,
restricted nonresidential maintenance, and appliance repair. Until
July 1, 2007, the department of labor and industries shall issue a
written warning to any specialty pump and irrigation or domestic pump
electrician not having a valid electrician certification. The warning
will state that the individual must apply for an electrical training
certificate or be qualified for and apply for electrician certification
under the requirements in RCW 19.28.191(1)(g) within thirty calendar
days of the warning. Only one warning will be issued to any
individual. If the individual fails to comply with this section, the
department shall issue a penalty as defined in RCW 19.28.271 to the
individual.
(2) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the electrical construction trade
or who is learning the electrical construction trade may work in the
electrical construction trade if supervised by a certified master
journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty
electrician in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
in that electrician's specialty. All apprentices and individuals
learning the electrical construction trade shall obtain an electrical
training certificate from the department. The certificate shall
authorize the holder to learn the electrical construction trade while
under the direct supervision of a master journeyman electrician,
journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty. The holder of the electrical training
certificate shall renew the certificate biennially. At the time of
renewal, the holder shall provide the department with an accurate list
of the holder's employers in the electrical construction industry for
the previous biennial period and the number of hours worked for each
employer. A biennial fee shall be charged for the issuance or renewal
of the certificate. The department shall set the fee by rule. The fee
shall cover but not exceed the cost of administering and enforcing the
trainee certification and supervision requirements of this chapter.
Apprentices and individuals learning the electrical construction trade
shall have their electrical training certificates in their possession
at all times that they are performing electrical work. They shall show
their certificates to an authorized representative of the department at
the representative's request.
(3) Any person who has been issued an electrical training
certificate under this chapter may work if that person is under
supervision. Supervision shall consist of a person being on the same
job site and under the control of either a certified master journeyman
electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty. Either a certified master
journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty shall be on the
same job site as the noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five percent of each working day unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(4) The ratio of noncertified individuals to certified master
journeymen electricians, journeymen electricians, master specialty
electricians, or specialty electricians on any one job site is as
follows:
(a) When working as a specialty electrician, not more than two
noncertified individuals for every certified master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, master journeyman
electrician, or journeyman electrician, except that the ratio
requirements are one certified master specialty electrician working in
that electrician's specialty, specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, master journeyman electrician, or journeyman
electrician working as a specialty electrician to no more than four
students enrolled in and working as part of an electrical construction
program at public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit
nationally accredited trade or technical schools licensed by the work
force training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10
RCW. In meeting the ratio requirements for students enrolled in an
electrical construction program at a trade school, a trade school may
receive input and advice from the electrical board; and
(b) When working as a journeyman electrician, not more than one
noncertified individual for every certified master journeyman
electrician or journeyman electrician, except that the ratio
requirements shall be one certified master journeyman electrician or
journeyman electrician to no more than four students enrolled in and
working as part of an electrical construction program at public
community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally
accredited trade or technical schools licensed by the work force
training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW. In
meeting the ratio requirements for students enrolled in an electrical
construction program at a trade school, a trade school may receive
input and advice from the electrical board.
An individual who has a current training certificate and who has
successfully completed or is currently enrolled in an approved
apprenticeship program or in an electrical construction program at
public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally
accredited technical or trade schools licensed by the work force
training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, may
work without direct on-site supervision during the last six months of
meeting the practical experience requirements of this chapter.
(5) For the residential (as specified in WAC ((296-46A-930)) 296-46B-920(2)(a)), pump and irrigation (as specified in WAC ((296-46A-930(2)(b)(i))) 296-46B-920(2)(b)), sign (as specified in WAC ((296-46A-930(2)(c))) 296-46B-920(2)(d)), limited energy (as specified in WAC
((296-46A-930(2)(e)(i))) 296-46B-920(2)(e)), nonresidential maintenance
(as specified in WAC ((296-46A-930(2)(f)(i))) 296-46B-920(2)(g)),
restricted nonresidential maintenance as determined by the department
in rule, or other new nonresidential specialties, not including
appliance repair, as determined by the department in rule, either a
master journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty must be on the same
job site as the noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five
percent of each working day. Other specialties must meet the
requirements specified in RCW 19.28.191(((1)(f)(ii))) (1)(g)(ii). When
the ratio of certified electricians to noncertified individuals on a
job site is one certified electrician to three or four noncertified
individuals, the certified electrician must:
(a) Directly supervise and instruct the noncertified individuals
and the certified electrician may not directly make or engage in an
electrical installation; and
(b) Be on the same job site as the noncertified individual for a
minimum of one hundred percent of each working day.
(6) The electrical contractor shall accurately verify and attest to
the electrical trainee hours worked by electrical trainees on behalf of
the electrical contractor.

Sec. 7 RCW 19.28.191 and 2003 c 399 s 601 and 2003 c 211 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of the application, the department shall review
the application and determine whether the applicant is eligible to take
an examination for the master journeyman electrician, journeyman
electrician, master specialty electrician, or specialty electrician
certificate of competency.
(a) Before July 1, 2005, an applicant who possesses a valid
journeyman electrician certificate of competency in effect for the
previous four years and a valid general administrator's certificate may
apply for a master journeyman electrician certificate of competency
without examination.
(b) Before July 1, 2005, an applicant who possesses a valid
specialty electrician certificate of competency, in the specialty
applied for, for the previous two years and a valid specialty
administrator's certificate, in the specialty applied for, may apply
for a master specialty electrician certificate of competency without
examination.
(c) Before December 1, 2003, the following persons may obtain an
equipment repair specialty electrician certificate of competency
without examination:
(i) A person who has successfully completed an apprenticeship
program approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the machinist trade; and
(ii) A person who provides evidence in a form prescribed by the
department affirming that: (A) He or she was employed as of April 1,
2003, by a factory-authorized equipment dealer or service company; and
(B) he or she has worked in equipment repair for a minimum of four
thousand hours.
(d) To be eligible to take the examination for a master journeyman
electrician certificate of competency the applicant must have possessed
a valid journeyman electrician certificate of competency for four
years.
(e) To be eligible to take the examination for a master specialty
electrician certificate of competency the applicant must have possessed
a valid specialty electrician certificate of competency, in the
specialty applied for, for two years.
(f) To be eligible to take the examination for a journeyman
certificate of competency the applicant must have:
(i) Worked in the electrical construction trade for a minimum of
eight thousand hours, of which four thousand hours shall be in
industrial or commercial electrical installation under the supervision
of a master journeyman electrician or journeyman electrician and not
more than a total of four thousand hours in all specialties under the
supervision of a master journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician,
master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty,
or specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty.
Speciality electricians with less than a four thousand hour work
experience requirement cannot credit the time required to obtain that
specialty towards qualifying to become a journeyman electrician; or
(ii) Successfully completed an apprenticeship program approved
under chapter 49.04 RCW for the electrical construction trade.
(g) To be eligible to take the examination for a specialty
electrician certificate of competency the applicant must have:
(i) Worked in the residential (as specified in WAC ((296-46A-930))
296-46B-920(2)(a)), pump and irrigation (as specified in WAC ((296-46A-930(2)(b)(i))) 296-46B-920(2)(b)), sign (as specified in WAC ((296-46A-930(2)(c))) 296-46B-920(2)(d)), limited energy (as specified in WAC
((296-46A-930(2)(e)(i))) 296-46B-920(2)(e)), nonresidential maintenance
(as specified in WAC ((296-46A-930(2)(f)(i))) 296-46B-920(2)(g)), or
other new nonresidential specialties as determined by the department in
rule under the supervision of a master journeyman electrician,
journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty for a minimum of four thousand hours; ((or))
(ii) Worked in the appliance repair specialty as determined by the
department in rule, restricted nonresidential maintenance as determined
by the department in rule, the equipment repair specialty as determined
by the department in rule, the pump and irrigation specialty other than
as defined by (g)(i) of this subsection or domestic pump specialty as
determined by the department in rule, or a specialty other than the
designated specialties in (g)(i) of this subsection for a minimum of
the initial ninety days, or longer if set by rule by the department.
The restricted nonresidential maintenance specialty is limited to a
maximum of 277 volts and 20 amperes for lighting branch circuits and/or
a maximum of 250 volts and 60 amperes for other circuits, but excludes
the replacement or repair of circuit breakers. The initial period must
be spent under one hundred percent supervision of a master journeyman
electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty. After this initial period, a
person may take the specialty examination. If the person passes the
examination, the person may work unsupervised for the balance of the
minimum hours required for certification. A person may not be
certified as a specialty electrician in the appliance repair specialty
or in a specialty other than the designated specialities in (g)(i) of
this subsection, however, until the person has worked a minimum of two
thousand hours in that specialty, or longer if set by rule by the
department; ((or))
(iii) Successfully completed an approved apprenticeship program
under chapter 49.04 RCW for the applicant's specialty in the electrical
construction trade; or
(iv) In meeting the training requirements for the pump and
irrigation or domestic pump specialties, the individual shall be
allowed to obtain the experience required by this section at the same
time the individual is meeting the experience required by RCW
18.106.040(1)(c). After meeting the training requirements provided in
this section, the individual may take the examination and upon passing
the examination, meeting additional training requirements as may still
be required for those seeking a pump and irrigation, or a domestic pump
specialty certificate as defined by rule, and paying the applicable
fees, the individual must be issued the appropriate certificate. The
department may include an examination for specialty plumbing
certificate defined in RCW 18.106.010(10)(c) with the examination
required by this section. The department, by rule and in consultation
with the electrical board, may establish additional equivalent ways to
gain the experience requirements required by this subsection.
Individuals who are able to provide evidence to the department, prior
to January 1, 2007, that they have been employed as a pump installer in
the pump and irrigation or domestic pump business by an appropriately
licensed electrical contractor, registered general contractor defined
by chapter 18.27 RCW, or appropriate general specialty contractor
defined by chapter 18.27 RCW for not less than eight thousand hours in
the most recent six calendar years shall be issued the appropriate
certificate by the department upon receiving such documentation and
applicable fees. The department shall establish a single document for
those who have received both an electrical specialty certification as
defined by this subsection and have also met the certification
requirements for the specialty plumber as defined by RCW
18.106.010(10)(c), showing that the individual has received both
certifications. No other experience or training requirements may be
imposed.
(h) Any applicant for a journeyman electrician certificate of
competency who has successfully completed a two-year program in the
electrical construction trade at public community or technical
colleges, or not-for-profit nationally accredited technical or trade
schools licensed by the work force training and education coordinating
board under chapter 28C.10 RCW may substitute up to two years of the
technical or trade school program for two years of work experience
under a master journeyman electrician or journeyman electrician. The
applicant shall obtain the additional two years of work experience
required in industrial or commercial electrical installation prior to
the beginning, or after the completion, of the technical school
program. Any applicant who has received training in the electrical
construction trade in the armed service of the United States may be
eligible to apply armed service work experience towards qualification
to take the examination for the journeyman electrician certificate of
competency.
(i) An applicant for a specialty electrician certificate of
competency who, after January 1, 2000, has successfully completed a
two-year program in the electrical construction trade at a public
community or technical college, or a not-for-profit nationally
accredited technical or trade school licensed by the work force
training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, may
substitute up to one year of the technical or trade school program for
one year of work experience under a master journeyman electrician,
journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty. Any applicant who has received training in
the electrical construction trade in the armed services of the United
States may be eligible to apply armed service work experience towards
qualification to take the examination for an appropriate specialty
electrician certificate of competency.
(j) The department must determine whether hours of training and
experience in the armed services or school program are in the
electrical construction trade and appropriate as a substitute for hours
of work experience. The department must use the following criteria for
evaluating the equivalence of classroom electrical training programs
and work in the electrical construction trade:
(i) A two-year electrical training program must consist of three
thousand or more hours.
(ii) In a two-year electrical training program, a minimum of two
thousand four hundred hours of student/instructor contact time must be
technical electrical instruction directly related to the scope of work
of the electrical specialty. Student/instructor contact time includes
lecture and in-school lab.
(iii) The department may not allow credit for a program that
accepts more than one thousand hours transferred from another school's
program.
(iv) Electrical specialty training school programs of less than two
years will have all of the above student/instructor contact time hours
proportionately reduced. Such programs may not apply to more than
fifty percent of the work experience required to attain certification.
(v) Electrical training programs of less than two years may not be
credited towards qualification for journeyman electrician unless the
training program is used to gain qualification for a four thousand hour
electrical specialty.
(k) No other requirement for eligibility may be imposed.
(2) The department shall establish reasonable rules for the
examinations to be given applicants for certificates of competency. In
establishing the rules, the department shall consult with the board.
Upon determination that the applicant is eligible to take the
examination, the department shall so notify the applicant, indicating
the time and place for taking the examination.
(3) No noncertified individual may work unsupervised more than one
year beyond the date when the trainee would be eligible to test for a
certificate of competency if working on a full-time basis after
original application for the trainee certificate. For the purposes of
this section, full-time basis means two thousand hours.

Sec. 8 RCW 19.28.051 and 2001 c 211 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the purpose and function of the board to establish, in
addition to a general electrical contractors' license, such
classifications of specialty electrical contractors' licenses as it
deems appropriate with regard to individual sections pertaining to
state adopted codes in this chapter. In addition, it shall be the
purpose and function of the board to establish and administer written
examinations for general electrical administrators' certificates and
the various specialty electrical administrators' certificates.
Examinations shall be designed to reasonably ((insure)) ensure that
general and specialty electrical administrators' certificate holders
are competent to engage in and supervise the work covered by this
statute and their respective licenses. The examinations shall include
questions from the following categories to ((assure)) ensure proper
safety and protection for the general public: (1) Safety, (2) state
electrical code, and (3) electrical theory. The department with the
consent of the board shall be permitted to enter into a contract with
a professional testing agency to develop, administer, and score these
examinations, or accept certifications or other appropriate
demonstrations established by independent entities that otherwise
fulfill the examination requirements of this section. Individuals who
can provide evidence to the department, prior to January 1, 2007, that
they have been employed as a pump installer in the pump and irrigation
or domestic pump business by an appropriately licensed electrical
contractor, registered general contractor defined by chapter 18.27 RCW,
or appropriate general specialty contractor defined by chapter 18.27
RCW for not less than eight thousand hours in the most recent six
calendar years shall be issued the appropriate administrator's
certificate by the department upon receiving such documentation and
applicable fees. The fee for the examination may be set by the
department in its contract with the professional testing agency. The
department may direct that the applicant pay the fee to the
professional testing agency. The fee shall cover but not exceed the
costs of preparing and administering the examination. It shall be the
further purpose and function of this board to advise the director as to
the need of additional electrical inspectors and compliance officers to
be utilized by the director on either a full-time or part-time
employment basis and to carry out the duties enumerated in RCW
19.28.161 through 19.28.271 as well as generally advise the department
on all matters relative to RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271.

Sec. 9 RCW 19.28.061 and 2002 c 249 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each applicant for an electrical contractor's license, other
than an individual, shall designate a supervisory employee or member of
the firm to take the required master electrician's or administrator's
examination. Effective July 1, 1987, a supervisory employee designated
as the electrical contractor's master electrician or administrator
shall be a full-time supervisory employee. This person shall be
designated as master electrician or administrator under the license.
No person may concurrently qualify as master electrician or
administrator for more than one contractor. If the relationship of the
master electrician or administrator with the electrical contractor is
terminated, the contractor's license is void within ninety days unless
another master electrician or administrator is qualified by the board.
However, if the master electrician or administrator dies or is
otherwise incapacitated, the contractor's license is void within one
hundred eighty days unless another master electrician or administrator
is qualified by the board. The contractor must notify the department
in writing within ten days if the master electrician's or
administrator's relationship with the contractor terminates due to the
master electrician's or administrator's death or incapacitation.
(2) The department must issue an administrator's certificate to all
applicants who have passed the examination as provided in RCW 19.28.051
and this section, and who have complied with the rules adopted under
this chapter. The administrator's certificate must bear the date of
issuance, expires on the holder's birthday, and is nontransferable.
The certificate must be renewed every three years, upon application, on
or before the holder's birthday.
(a) If the certificate holder demonstrates to the department that
he or she has satisfactorily completed an annual eight-hour continuing
education course, the certificate may be renewed by appropriate
application without examination unless the certificate has been
revoked, suspended, or not renewed within ninety days after the
expiration date. For holders of pump and irrigation or domestic pump
specialty administrator certificates, the continuing education may
comprise both electrical and plumbing education.
(b) The contents and requirements for satisfactory completion of
the continuing education course must be determined by the director and
approved by the board.
(c) The department must accept proof of a certificate holder's
satisfactory completion of a continuing education course offered in
another state as meeting the requirements for maintaining a current
Washington state certificate if the department is satisfied the course
is comparable in nature to that required in Washington state for
maintaining a current certificate.
(3) A fee must be assessed for each administrator's certificate and
for each renewal. An individual holding more than one administrator's
certificate under this chapter is not required to pay fees for more
than one certificate. The department must set the fees by rule for
issuance and renewal of a certificate. The fees must cover, but not
exceed, the costs of issuing the certificates and of administering and
enforcing the administrator certification requirements of this chapter.
(4) The department may deny an application for an administrator's
certificate for up to two years if the applicant's previous
administrator's certificate has been revoked for a serious violation
and all appeals concerning the revocation have been exhausted. For the
purposes of this section only, a serious violation is a violation that
presents imminent danger to the public. The certificate may be renewed
for a three-year period without examination by appropriate application
unless the certificate has been revoked, suspended, or not renewed
within ninety days after the expiration date. If the certificate is
not renewed before the expiration date, the individual shall pay twice
the usual fee. A person may take the administrator's examination as
many times as necessary to pass without limit.
(5) The designated master electrician or administrator shall:
(a) Be a member of the firm or a supervisory employee and shall be
available during working hours to carry out the duties of an
administrator under this section;
(b) Ensure that all electrical work complies with the electrical
installation laws and rules of the state;
(c) Ensure that the proper electrical safety procedures are used;
(d) Ensure that all electrical labels, permits, and licenses
required to perform electrical work are used;
(e) See that corrective notices issued by an inspecting authority
are complied with; and
(f) Notify the department in writing within ten days if the master
electrician or administrator terminates the relationship with the
electrical contractor.
(6) The department shall not by rule change the administrator's
duties under subsection (5) of this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.106.070 and 2003 c 399 s 801 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a certificate of competency to all
applicants who have passed the examination and have paid the fee for
the certificate. The certificate shall bear the date of issuance, and
shall expire on the birthdate of the holder immediately following the
date of issuance. The certificate shall be renewable every other year,
upon application, on or before the birthdate of the holder, except for
specialty plumbers defined by RCW 18.106.010(10)(c) who also have an
electrical certification issued jointly as provided by RCW
18.106.050(3) in which case their certificate shall be renewable every
three years on or before the birthdate of the holder. The department
shall renew a certificate of competency if the applicant: (a) Pays the
renewal fee assessed by the department; and (b) during the past two
years has completed sixteen hours of continuing education approved by
the department with the advice of the advisory board, including four
hours related to electrical safety. For holders of pump and irrigation
or domestic pump specialty certificates, the continuing education may
comprise both electrical and plumbing education with a minimum of
twelve of the required twenty-four hours of continuing education in
plumbing. If a person fails to renew the certificate by the renewal
date, he or she must pay a doubled fee. If the person does not renew
the certificate within ninety days of the renewal date, he or she must
retake the examination and pay the examination fee.
The journeyman plumber and specialty plumber certificates of
competency, the medical gas piping installer endorsement, and the
temporary permit provided for in this chapter grant the holder the
right to engage in the work of plumbing as a journeyman plumber,
specialty plumber, or medical gas piping installer, in accordance with
their provisions throughout the state and within any of its political
subdivisions on any job or any employment without additional proof of
competency or any other license or permit or fee to engage in the work.
This section does not preclude employees from adhering to a union
security clause in any employment where such a requirement exists.
(2) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the plumbing construction trade or
who is learning the plumbing construction trade may work in the
plumbing construction trade if supervised by a certified journeyman
plumber or a certified specialty plumber in that plumber's specialty.
All apprentices and individuals learning the plumbing construction
trade shall obtain a plumbing training certificate from the department.
The certificate shall authorize the holder to learn the plumbing
construction trade while under the direct supervision of a journeyman
plumber or a specialty plumber working in his or her specialty. The
holder of the plumbing training certificate shall renew the certificate
annually. At the time of renewal, the holder shall provide the
department with an accurate list of the holder's employers in the
plumbing construction industry for the previous year and the number of
hours worked for each employer. An annual fee shall be charged for the
issuance or renewal of the certificate. The department shall set the
fee by rule. The fee shall cover but not exceed the cost of
administering and enforcing the trainee certification and supervision
requirements of this chapter. Apprentices and individuals learning the
plumbing construction trade shall have their plumbing training
certificates in their possession at all times that they are performing
plumbing work. They shall show their certificates to an authorized
representative of the department at the representative's request.
(3) Any person who has been issued a plumbing training certificate
under this chapter may work if that person is under supervision.
Supervision shall consist of a person being on the same job site and
under the control of either a journeyman plumber or an appropriate
specialty plumber who has an applicable certificate of competency
issued under this chapter. Either a journeyman plumber or an
appropriate specialty plumber shall be on the same job site as the
noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five percent of each
working day unless otherwise provided in this chapter. The ratio of
noncertified individuals to certified journeymen or specialty plumbers
working on a job site shall be: (a) Not more than two noncertified
plumbers working on any one job site for every certified specialty
plumber or journeyman plumber working as a specialty plumber; and (b)
not more than one noncertified plumber working on any one job site for
every certified journeyman plumber working as a journeyman plumber.
An individual who has a current training certificate and who has
successfully completed or is currently enrolled in an approved
apprenticeship program or in a technical school program in the plumbing
construction trade in a school approved by the work force training and
education coordinating board, may work without direct on-site
supervision during the last six months of meeting the practical
experience requirements of this chapter.
(4) An individual who has a current training certificate and who
has successfully completed or is currently enrolled in a medical gas
piping installer training course approved by the department may work on
medical gas piping systems if the individual is under the direct
supervision of a certified medical gas piping installer who holds a
medical gas piping installer endorsement one hundred percent of a
working day on a one-to-one ratio.
(5) The training to become a certified plumber must include not
less than sixteen hours of classroom training established by the
director with the advice of the advisory board. The classroom training
must include, but not be limited to, electrical wiring safety,
grounding, bonding, and other related items plumbers need to know to
work under RCW 19.28.091.
(6) All persons who are certified plumbers before January 1, 2003,
are deemed to have received the classroom training required in
subsection (5) of this section.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.106.020 and 2002 c 82 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may engage in or offer to engage in the trade of
plumbing without having a journeyman certificate, specialty
certificate, temporary permit, or trainee certificate. A trainee must
be supervised by a person who has a journeyman certificate, specialty
certificate, or temporary permit, as specified in RCW 18.106.070. No
contractor may employ a person to engage in or offer to engage in the
trade of plumbing unless the person employed has a journeyman
certificate, specialty certificate, temporary permit, or trainee
certificate. This section does not apply to a contractor who is
contracting for work on his or her own residence. Until July 1, 2007,
the department shall issue a written warning to any specialty plumber
defined by RCW 18.106.010(10)(c) not having a valid plumber
certification. The warning will state that the individual must apply
for a plumber training certificate or be qualified for and apply for
plumber certification under the requirements in RCW 18.106.040 within
thirty calendar days of the warning. Only one warning will be issued
to any individual. If the individual fails to comply with this
section, the department shall issue a penalty or penalties as
authorized by this chapter.
(2) No person may engage in or offer to engage in medical gas
piping installation without having a certificate of competency as a
journeyman plumber and a medical gas piping installer endorsement. A
trainee may engage in medical gas piping installation if he or she has
a training certificate and is supervised by a person with a medical gas
piping installer endorsement. No contractor may employ a person to
engage in or offer to engage in medical gas piping installation unless
the person employed has a certificate of competency as a journeyman
plumber and a medical gas piping installer endorsement.
(3) No contractor may advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or
perform any work under this chapter without being registered as a
contractor under chapter 18.27 RCW.
(4) Violation of this section is an infraction. Each day in which
a person engages in the trade of plumbing in violation of this section
or employs a person in violation of this section is a separate
infraction. Each worksite at which a person engages in the trade of
plumbing in violation of this section or at which a person is employed
in violation of this section is a separate infraction.
(5) Notices of infractions for violations of this section may be
issued to:
(a) The person engaging in or offering to engage in the trade of
plumbing in violation of this section;
(b) The contractor in violation of this section; and
(c) The contractor's employee who authorized the work assignment of
the person employed in violation of this section.

Sec. 12 RCW 19.28.211 and 2002 c 249 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a certificate of competency to all
applicants who have passed the examination provided in RCW 19.28.201,
and who have complied with RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 and the
rules adopted under this chapter. The certificate shall bear the date
of issuance, and shall expire on the holder's birthday. The
certificate shall be renewed every three years, upon application, on or
before the holder's birthdate. A fee shall be assessed for each
certificate and for each annual renewal.
(2) If the certificate holder demonstrates to the department that
he or she has satisfactorily completed an annual eight-hour continuing
education course, the certificate may be renewed without examination by
appropriate application unless the certificate has been revoked,
suspended, or not renewed within ninety days after the expiration date.
For pump and irrigation or domestic pump specialty electricians, the
continuing education course may combine both electrical and plumbing
education provided that there is a minimum of four hours of electrical
training in the course.
(a) The contents and requirements for satisfactory completion of
the continuing education course shall be determined by the director and
approved by the board.
(b) The department shall accept proof of a certificate holder's
satisfactory completion of a continuing education course offered in
another state as meeting the requirements for maintaining a current
Washington state certificate of competency if the department is
satisfied the course is comparable in nature to that required in
Washington state for maintaining a current certificate of competency.
(3) If the certificate is not renewed before the expiration date,
the individual shall pay twice the usual fee. The department shall set
the fees by rule for issuance and renewal of a certificate of
competency. The fees shall cover but not exceed the costs of issuing
the certificates and of administering and enforcing the electrician
certification requirements of this chapter.
(4) The certificates of competency and temporary permits provided
for in this chapter grant the holder the right to work in the
electrical construction trade as a master electrician, journeyman
electrician, or specialty electrician in accordance with their
provisions throughout the state and within any of its political
subdivisions without additional proof of competency or any other
license, permit, or fee to engage in such work.

Sec. 13 RCW 19.28.131 and 2001 c 211 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Until July 1, 2007, the department shall issue a written warning to
any specialty contractor, performing the scope of work defined by rule
for the pump and irrigation or domestic pump specialties, not having a
valid electrical contractor license. The warning will state that the
contractor must be qualified for and apply for a specialty electrical
contractor license under the requirements in RCW 19.28.041 within
thirty calendar days of the warning. Only one warning will be issued
to any contractor. If the contractor fails to comply with this
section, the department shall issue a penalty or penalties as
authorized in this section to the contractor. Any person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the
provisions of RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through
19.28.361 shall be assessed a penalty of not less than fifty dollars or
more than ten thousand dollars. The department shall set by rule a
schedule of penalties for violating RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and
19.28.311 through 19.28.361. The department shall notify the person,
firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the
provisions of RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through
19.28.361 of the amount of the penalty and of the specific violation by
certified mail, return receipt requested, sent to the last known
address of the assessed party. Any penalty is subject to review by an
appeal to the board. The filing of an appeal stays the effect of the
penalty until the board makes its decision. The appeal shall be filed
within twenty days after notice of the penalty is given to the assessed
party by certified mail, return receipt requested, sent to the last
known address of the assessed party and shall be made by filing a
written notice of appeal with the department. The notice shall be
accompanied by a certified check for two hundred dollars, which shall
be returned to the assessed party if the decision of the department is
not sustained by the board. If the board sustains the decision of the
department, the two hundred dollars shall be applied by the department
to the payment of the per diem and expenses of the members of the board
incurred in the matter, and any balance remaining after payment of per
diem and expenses shall be paid into the electrical license fund. The
hearing and review procedures shall be conducted in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall assign its hearings to an
administrative law judge to conduct the hearing and issue a proposed
decision and order. The board shall be allowed a minimum of twenty
days to review a proposed decision and shall issue its decision no
later than the next regularly scheduled board meeting.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.27.060 and 2001 c 159 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A certificate of registration shall be valid for two years and
shall be renewed on or before the expiration date. The department
shall issue to the applicant a certificate of registration upon
compliance with the registration requirements of this chapter.
(2) If the department approves an application, it shall issue a
certificate of registration to the applicant.
(3) If a contractor's surety bond or other security has an
unsatisfied judgment against it or is canceled, or if the contractor's
insurance policy is canceled, the contractor's registration shall be
automatically suspended on the effective date of the impairment or
cancellation. The department shall mail notice of the suspension to
the contractor's address on the certificate of registration by
certified and by first class mail within two days after suspension.
(4) Renewal of registration is valid on the date the department
receives the required fee and proof of bond and liability insurance, if
sent by certified mail or other means requiring proof of delivery. The
receipt or proof of delivery shall serve as the contractor's proof of
renewed registration until he or she receives verification from the
department.
(5) The department shall immediately suspend the certificate of
registration of a contractor who has been certified by the department
of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with
a support order or a ((residential or)) visitation order as provided in
RCW 74.20A.320. The certificate of registration shall not be reissued
or renewed unless the person provides to the department a release from
the department of social and health services stating that he or she is
in compliance with the order and the person has continued to meet all
other requirements for certification during the suspension.
(6) For a contractor who employs plumbers, as described in RCW
18.106.010(10)(c), and is also required to be licensed as an electrical
contractor as required in RCW 19.28.041, while doing pump and
irrigation or domestic pump work described in rule as authorized by RCW
19.28.251, the department shall establish a single
registration/licensing document for those who qualify for both general
contractor registration as defined by this chapter and an electrical
contractor license as defined by chapter 19.28 RCW.

--- END ---