BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The contribution limits in this section apply to candidates for
judicial office.
(2) No person may make contributions to a candidate for a court of
limited jurisdiction or for superior court that in the aggregate exceed
six hundred seventy-five dollars or to a candidate for the state
supreme court or court of appeals that in the aggregate exceed one
thousand three hundred fifty dollars for each election in which the
candidate is on the ballot or appears as a write-in candidate.
Contributions made with respect to a primary may not be made after the
date of the primary. However, contributions to a candidate or a
candidate's authorized committee may be made with respect to a primary
until thirty days after the primary, subject to the following
limitations: (a) The candidate lost the primary; (b) the candidate's
authorized committee has insufficient funds to pay debts outstanding as
of the date of the primary; and (c) the contributions may only be
raised and spent to satisfy the outstanding debt. Contributions made
with respect to a general election may not be made after the final day
of the applicable election cycle.
(3) This section and RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790 apply to a
special election conducted to fill a vacancy in an office. However,
the contributions made to a candidate or received by a candidate for a
primary or special election conducted to fill the vacancy will not be
counted toward any of the limitations that apply to the candidate or to
contributions made to the candidate for any other primary or election.
(4) No person may accept contributions that exceed the contribution
limitations provided in this section.
(5) The dollar limits in this section must be adjusted according to
RCW 42.17.690.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall adopt rules to carry out this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.17.700 and 1993 c 2 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Contributions to candidates for state office made and received
before December 3, 1992, are considered to be contributions under RCW
42.17.640 through 42.17.790. Monetary contributions that exceed the
contribution limitations and that have not been spent by the recipient
of the contribution by December 3, 1992, must be disposed of in
accordance with RCW 42.17.095.
(2) Contributions to other candidates subject to the contribution
limits of this chapter made and received before the effective date of
this act are considered to be contributions under RCW 42.17.640 through
42.17.790. Contributions that exceed the contribution limitations and
that have not been spent by the recipient of the contribution by the
effective date of this act must be disposed of in accordance with RCW
42.17.095 (1) through (5) and (8).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---