BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.38.005 and 1995 c 283 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The intent of this chapter is to provide consistent laws
regarding the formation and legal administration of homeowners'
associations.
(2)(a) The legislature finds that there is a need to clarify both
how the laws governing homeowners' associations interact and which body
of law governs in the event of a conflict between statutes and the
governing documents.
(b) It is the intent of the legislature that the governing
documents control a homeowners' association, unless expressly provided
otherwise in this chapter. If the governing documents are silent, this
chapter controls. If this chapter is silent or a conflict exists, the
titles under which the association was formed control: Title 23, 23B,
24, or 25 RCW.

--- END ---