BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.18.110 and 2000 c 79 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall disapprove any such form of policy,
application, rider, or endorsement, or withdraw any previous approval
thereof, only:
(a) If it is in any respect in violation of or does not comply with
this code or any applicable order or regulation of the commissioner
issued pursuant to the code; or
(b) If it does not comply with any controlling filing theretofore
made and approved; or
(c) If it contains or incorporates by reference any inconsistent,
ambiguous or misleading clauses, or exceptions and conditions which
unreasonably or deceptively affect the risk purported to be assumed in
the general coverage of the contract; or
(d) If it has any title, heading, or other indication of its
provisions which is misleading; or
(e) If purchase of insurance thereunder is being solicited by
deceptive advertising.
(2) In addition to the grounds for disapproval of any such form as
provided in subsection (1) of this section, the commissioner may
disapprove any form of disability insurance policy, ((except an
individual health benefit plan,)) if the benefits provided therein are
unreasonable in relation to the premium charged. Rates, or any
modification of rates, for individual health benefit plans may not be
used until filed with and approved by the commissioner.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.44.020 and 2000 c 79 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any health care service contractor may enter into contracts
with or for the benefit of persons or groups of persons which require
prepayment for health care services by or for such persons in
consideration of such health care service contractor providing one or
more health care services to such persons and such activity shall not
be subject to the laws relating to insurance if the health care
services are rendered by the health care service contractor or by a
participating provider.
(2) The commissioner may on examination, subject to the right of
the health care service contractor to demand and receive a hearing
under chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW, disapprove any individual or group
contract form for any of the following grounds:
(a) If it contains or incorporates by reference any inconsistent,
ambiguous or misleading clauses, or exceptions and conditions which
unreasonably or deceptively affect the risk purported to be assumed in
the general coverage of the contract; or
(b) If it has any title, heading, or other indication of its
provisions which is misleading; or
(c) If purchase of health care services thereunder is being
solicited by deceptive advertising; or
(d) If it contains unreasonable restrictions on the treatment of
patients; or
(e) If it violates any provision of this chapter; or
(f) If it fails to conform to minimum provisions or standards
required by regulation made by the commissioner pursuant to chapter
34.05 RCW; or
(g) If any contract for health care services with any state agency,
division, subdivision, board, or commission or with any political
subdivision, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation
fails to comply with state law.
(3) In addition to the grounds listed in subsection (2) of this
section, the commissioner may disapprove any ((group)) contract if the
benefits provided therein are unreasonable in relation to the amount
charged for the contract. Rates, or any modification of rates, for
individual health benefit plans may not be used until filed with and
approved by the commissioner.
(4)(a) Every contract between a health care service contractor and
a participating provider of health care services shall be in writing
and shall state that in the event the health care service contractor
fails to pay for health care services as provided in the contract, the
enrolled participant shall not be liable to the provider for sums owed
by the health care service contractor. Every such contract shall
provide that this requirement shall survive termination of the
contract.
(b) No participating provider, agent, trustee, or assignee may
maintain any action against an enrolled participant to collect sums
owed by the health care service contractor.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.46.060 and 2000 c 79 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any health maintenance organization may enter into agreements
with or for the benefit of persons or groups of persons, which require
prepayment for health care services by or for such persons in
consideration of the health maintenance organization providing health
care services to such persons. Such activity is not subject to the
laws relating to insurance if the health care services are rendered
directly by the health maintenance organization or by any provider
which has a contract or other arrangement with the health maintenance
organization to render health services to enrolled participants.
(2) All forms of health maintenance agreements issued by the
organization to enrolled participants or other marketing documents
purporting to describe the organization's comprehensive health care
services shall comply with such minimum standards as the commissioner
deems reasonable and necessary in order to carry out the purposes and
provisions of this chapter, and which fully inform enrolled
participants of the health care services to which they are entitled,
including any limitations or exclusions thereof, and such other rights,
responsibilities and duties required of the contracting health
maintenance organization.
(3) Subject to the right of the health maintenance organization to
demand and receive a hearing under chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW, the
commissioner may disapprove an individual or group agreement form for
any of the following grounds:
(a) If it contains or incorporates by reference any inconsistent,
ambiguous, or misleading clauses, or exceptions or conditions which
unreasonably or deceptively affect the risk purported to be assumed in
the general coverage of the agreement;
(b) If it has any title, heading, or other indication which is
misleading;
(c) If purchase of health care services thereunder is being
solicited by deceptive advertising;
(d) If it contains unreasonable restrictions on the treatment of
patients;
(e) If it is in any respect in violation of this chapter or if it
fails to conform to minimum provisions or standards required by the
commissioner by rule under chapter 34.05 RCW; or
(f) If any agreement for health care services with any state
agency, division, subdivision, board, or commission or with any
political subdivision, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal
corporation fails to comply with state law.
(4) In addition to the grounds listed in subsection (2) of this
section, the commissioner may disapprove any ((group)) agreement if the
benefits provided therein are unreasonable in relation to the amount
charged for the agreement. Rates, or any modification of rates, for
individual health benefit plans may not be used until filed with and
approved by the commissioner.
(5) No health maintenance organization authorized under this
chapter shall cancel or fail to renew the enrollment on any basis of an
enrolled participant or refuse to transfer an enrolled participant from
a group to an individual basis for reasons relating solely to age, sex,
race, or health status. Nothing contained herein shall prevent
cancellation of an agreement with enrolled participants (a) who violate
any published policies of the organization which have been approved by
the commissioner, or (b) who are entitled to become eligible for
medicare benefits and fail to enroll for a medicare supplement plan
offered by the health maintenance organization and approved by the
commissioner, or (c) for failure of such enrolled participant to pay
the approved charge, including cost-sharing, required under such
contract, or (d) for a material breach of the health maintenance
agreement.
(6) No agreement form or amendment to an approved agreement form
shall be used unless it is first filed with the commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All filings made under this section are exempt from the
provisions of RCW 48.02.120. After the commissioner determines a
filing to be substantially complete, the entire filing, including all
supporting information and documentation, is available for public
inspection during business hours upon reasonable notice from the
requestor.
(2) After determining that the filing is substantially complete,
the commissioner shall notify the public of any proposed individual
health benefits plan rate adjustment when the overall requested rate
change is greater than seven percent plus the adjustment in the current
medical consumer price index, as defined in subsection (12) of this
section.
(3) The commissioner shall take into consideration the surplus of
the carrier when reviewing a rate increase under this section.
(4) A filing made under this section shall be approved forty-five
days after being made available for public inspection unless:
(a) In the case of a filing where the overall requested rate change
is greater than seven percent plus the adjustment in the current
medical consumer price index, a petition for a hearing is filed with
the commissioner within thirty days after the filing is made available
for public inspection, and the commissioner grants a hearing:
(b) The commissioner determines to hold a hearing; or
(c) The commissioner disapproves the filing.
(5) A person has standing to petition for a hearing under
subsection (4)(a) of this section if the commissioner determines that:
(a) The petitioner is directly affected by the proposed rate
increase; and
(b) The petitioner is able to make a substantial contribution to
the determination of whether to approve or disapprove the filing.
(6) The parties to a hearing held under this section are the
petitioner and the carrier.
(7) Only the commissioner or his or her designee shall preside over
hearings and other administrative proceedings arising under this
section. The commissioner or his or her designee may be assisted by
the staff of the office of the insurance commissioner during a hearing
and in making a determination to approve or disapprove a filing.
(8) If a hearing is held, the commissioner shall approve or
disapprove a filing made under this section within thirty days after
the conclusion of the hearing.
(9) A carrier may not use the proposed rates in a filing made under
this section until the filing is approved either as originally
submitted or as amended.
(10) If a filing made under this section is withdrawn by the
carrier, a hearing shall not be held on the withdrawn filing.
(11) The public notice required under subsection (2) of this
section shall be made via distribution to the news media, posting on
the web site maintained by the commissioner, and by electronic mail to
any person who requests placement on a mailing list maintained by the
commissioner for this purpose. Persons without electronic mail
addresses may request that notice be sent via first class mail.
(12) For the purpose of this section, "medical consumer price
index" means the medical care component of the consumer price index
(CPI), not seasonally adjusted, for all urban consumers in the Seattle-Tacoma-Bremerton area. The CPI adjustment component must be determined
by dividing the most recent CPI for the current year by the CPI for the
same month for the prior year. Details of the CPI data used to
determine the adjustment shall be included as a part of the rate filing
submitted to the commissioner.
(13) The commissioner shall adopt rules for implementing this
section. The rules shall include provisions for promptly scheduling
and commencing hearings, and procedures to prevent delays in commencing
or continuing hearings without good cause. The rules shall also
include standards for taking into consideration a carrier's surplus
when reviewing rate filings.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.02.120 and 1985 c 264 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall preserve in permanent form records of
his or her proceedings, hearings, investigations, and examinations, and
shall file such records in his or her office.
(2) The records of the commissioner and insurance filings in his or
her office shall be open to public inspection, except as otherwise
provided by this code.
(3) Actuarial formulas, statistics, and assumptions submitted in
support of a rate or form filing by an insurer, health care service
contractor, or health maintenance organization or submitted to the
commissioner upon his or her request shall be withheld from public
inspection in order to preserve trade secrets or prevent unfair
competition.
(4) This section does not apply to filings made under section 4 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 48.20.025 (Schedule of rates for individual health benefit
plans -- Loss ratio -- Remittance of premiums -- Definitions) and 2003 c 248
s 8, 2001 c 196 s 1, & 2000 c 79 s 3;
(2) RCW 48.44.017 (Schedule of rates for individual contracts -- Loss
ratio -- Remittance of premiums -- Definitions) and 2001 c 196 s 11 & 2000
c 79 s 29; and
(3) RCW 48.46.062 (Schedule of rates for individual agreements--
Loss ratio -- Remittance of premiums -- Definitions) and 2001 c 196 s 12 &
2000 c 79 s 32.

--- END ---