BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.530 and 2005 c 243 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall:
(1) Establish and operate, or provide by contract, training and
certification programs for state and county elections administration
officials and personnel, including training on the various types of
election law violations and discrimination, and training programs for
political party observers which conform to the rules for such programs
established under RCW 29A.04.630;
(2) ((Establish guidelines, in consultation with state and local
law enforcement or certified document examiners, for signature
verification processes. All election personnel assigned to verify
signatures must receive training on the guidelines;
(3))) Administer tests for state and county officials and personnel
who have received such training and issue certificates to those who
have successfully completed the training and passed such tests;
(((4))) (3) Maintain a record of those individuals who have
received such training and certificates; and
(((5))) (4) Provide the staffing and support services required by
the board created under RCW 29A.04.510.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.04.611 and 2004 c 271 s 151 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state as chief election officer shall make
reasonable rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW not inconsistent
with the federal and state election laws to effectuate any provision of
this title and to facilitate the execution of its provisions in an
orderly, timely, and uniform manner relating to any federal, state,
county, city, town, and district elections. To that end the secretary
shall assist local election officers by devising uniform forms and
procedures.
In addition to the rule-making authority granted otherwise by this
section, the secretary of state shall make rules governing the
following provisions:
(1) The maintenance of voter registration records;
(2) The preparation, maintenance, distribution, review, and filing
of precinct maps;
(3) Standards for the design, layout, and production of ballots;
(4) The examination and testing of voting systems for
certification;
(5) The source and scope of independent evaluations of voting
systems that may be relied upon in certifying voting systems for use in
this state;
(6) Standards and procedures for the acceptance testing of voting
systems by counties;
(7) Standards and procedures for testing the programming of vote
tallying software for specific primaries and elections;
(8) Standards and procedures for the preparation and use of each
type of certified voting system including procedures for the operation
of counting centers where vote tallying systems are used;
(9) Standards and procedures to ensure the accurate tabulation and
canvassing of ballots;
(10) Consistency among the counties of the state in the preparation
of ballots, the operation of vote tallying systems, and the canvassing
of primaries and elections;
(11) Procedures to ensure the secrecy of a voter's ballot when a
small number of ballots are counted at the polls or at a counting
center;
(12) The use of substitute devices or means of voting when a voting
device at the polling place is found to be defective, the counting of
votes cast on the defective device, the counting of votes cast on the
substitute device, and the documentation that must be submitted to the
county auditor regarding such circumstances;
(13) Procedures for the transportation of sealed containers of
voted ballots or sealed voting devices;
(14) The acceptance and filing of documents via electronic
facsimile;
(15) Voter registration applications and records;
(16) The use of voter registration information in the conduct of
elections;
(17) The coordination, delivery, and processing of voter
registration records accepted by driver licensing agents or the
department of licensing;
(18) The coordination, delivery, and processing of voter
registration records accepted by agencies designated by the governor to
provide voter registration services;
(19) Procedures to receive and distribute voter registration
applications by mail;
(20) Procedures for a voter to change his or her voter registration
address within a county by telephone;
(21) Procedures for a voter to change the name under which he or
she is registered to vote;
(22) Procedures for canceling dual voter registration records and
for maintaining records of persons whose voter registrations have been
canceled;
(23) Procedures for the electronic transfer of voter registration
records between county auditors and the office of the secretary of
state;
(24) Procedures and forms for declarations of candidacy;
(25) Procedures and requirements for the acceptance and filing of
declarations of candidacy by electronic means;
(26) Procedures for the circumstance in which two or more
candidates have a name similar in sound or spelling so as to cause
confusion for the voter;
(27) Filing for office;
(28) The order of positions and offices on a ballot;
(29) Sample ballots;
(30) Independent evaluations of voting systems;
(31) The testing, approval, and certification of voting systems;
(32) The testing of vote tallying software programming;
(33) Standards and procedures to prevent fraud and to facilitate
the accurate processing and canvassing of absentee ballots and mail
ballots;
(34) Standards and procedures to guarantee the secrecy of absentee
ballots and mail ballots;
(35) Uniformity among the counties of the state in the conduct of
absentee voting and mail ballot elections;
(36) Standards and procedures to accommodate out-of-state voters,
overseas voters, and service voters;
(37) The tabulation of paper ballots before the close of the polls;
(38) The accessibility of polling places and registration
facilities that are accessible to elderly and disabled persons;
(39) The aggregation of precinct results if reporting the results
of a single precinct could jeopardize the secrecy of a person's ballot;
(40) Procedures for conducting a statutory recount;
(41) Procedures for filling vacancies in congressional offices if
the general statutory time requirements for availability of absentee
ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures cannot be
met;
(42) Procedures for the statistical sampling of signatures for
purposes of verifying and canvassing signatures on initiative,
referendum, and recall election petitions;
(43) Standards and deadlines for submitting material to the office
of the secretary of state for the voters' pamphlet;
(44) Deadlines for the filing of ballot titles for referendum bills
and constitutional amendments if none have been provided by the
legislature;
(45) Procedures for the publication of a state voters' pamphlet;
(46) Procedures for conducting special elections regarding nuclear
waste sites if the general statutory time requirements for availability
of absentee ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures
cannot be met;
(47) Procedures for conducting partisan primary elections;
(48) Standards and procedures for the proper conduct of voting
during the early voting period to provide accessability for the blind
or visually impaired;
(49) Standards for voting technology and systems used by the state
or any political subdivision to be accessible for individuals with
disabilities, including nonvisual accessibility for the blind and
visually impaired, in a manner that provides the same opportunity for
access and participation, including privacy and independence, as other
voters;
(50) All data formats for transferring voter registration data on
electronic or machine-readable media for the purpose of administering
the statewide voter registration list required by the Help America Vote
Act (P.L. 107-252);
(51) Defining the interaction of electronic voter registration
election management systems employed by each county auditor to maintain
a local copy of each county's portion of the official state list of
registered voters;
(52) Provisions and procedures to implement the state-based
administrative complaint procedure as required by the Help America Vote
Act (P.L. 107-252); ((and))
(53) Facilitating the payment of local government grants to local
government election officers or vendors; and
(54) Standards for the verification of signatures on absentee,
mail, and provisional ballot envelopes.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.24.091 and 2005 c 221 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A filing fee of one dollar shall accompany each declaration of
candidacy for precinct committee officer; a filing fee of ten dollars
shall accompany the declaration of candidacy for any office with a
fixed annual salary of one thousand dollars or less; a filing fee equal
to one percent of the annual salary of the office at the time of filing
shall accompany the declaration of candidacy for any office with a
fixed annual salary of more than one thousand dollars per annum. No
filing fee need accompany a declaration of candidacy for any office for
which compensation is on a per diem or per meeting attended basis.
A candidate who lacks sufficient assets or income at the time of
filing to pay the filing fee required by this section shall submit with
his or her declaration of candidacy a ((nominating)) filing fee waiver
petition. The petition shall contain not less than a number of
signatures of registered voters equal to the number of dollars of the
filing fee. The signatures shall be of voters registered to vote
within the jurisdiction of the office for which the candidate is
filing.
When the candidacy is for:
(1) A legislative or judicial office that includes territory from
more than one county, the fee shall be paid to the secretary of state
for equal division between the treasuries of the counties comprising
the district.
(2) A legislative or judicial office that includes territory from
only one county:
(a) The fee shall be paid to the county auditor if the candidate
filed his or her declaration of candidacy with the county auditor;
(b) The fee shall be paid to the secretary of state if the
candidate filed his or her declaration of candidacy with the secretary
of state. The secretary of state shall then promptly transmit the fee
to the county auditor of the county in which the legislative or
judicial office is located.
(3) A city or town office, the fee shall be paid to the county
auditor who shall transmit it to the city or town clerk for deposit in
the city or town treasury.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.24.101 and 2004 c 271 s 114 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((nominating)) filing fee waiver petition authorized by RCW
29A.24.091 must be printed on sheets of uniform color and size, must
include a place for each individual to sign and print his or her name
and the address, city, and county at which he or she is registered to
vote, and must contain no more than twenty numbered lines.
(2) For candidates for nonpartisan office and candidates of a major
political party for partisan office, the ((nominating)) filing fee
waiver petition must be in substantially the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

We, the undersigned registered voters of (the state of
Washington or the political subdivision for which the nomination is
made) , hereby petition that the name of (candidate's name) be
printed on the official primary ballot for the office of (insert
name of office) .

(3) For independent candidates and candidates of a minor political
party for partisan office, the ((nominating)) filing fee waiver
petition must be in substantially the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

We, the undersigned registered voters of (the state of
Washington or the political subdivision for which the nomination is
made) , hereby petition that the name of (candidate's name) be
printed on the official general election ballot for the office of
(insert name of office) .

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.24.111 and 2004 c 271 s 161 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Nominating)) Filing fee waiver petitions may be rejected for the
following reasons:
(1) The petition is not in the proper form;
(2) The petition clearly bears insufficient signatures;
(3) The petition is not accompanied by a declaration of candidacy;
(4) The time within which the petition and the declaration of
candidacy could have been filed has expired.
If the petition is accepted, the officer with whom it is filed
shall canvass the signatures contained on it and shall reject the
signatures of those persons who are not registered voters and the
signatures of those persons who are not registered to vote within the
jurisdiction of the office for which the ((nominating)) filing fee
waiver petition is filed. He or she shall additionally reject any
signature that appears on the ((nominating)) filing fee waiver
petitions of two or more candidates for the same office and shall also
reject, each time it appears, the name of any person who signs the same
petition more than once.
If the officer with whom the petition is filed refuses to accept
the petition or refuses to certify the petition as bearing sufficient
valid signatures, the person filing the petition may appeal that action
to the superior court. The application for judicial review shall take
precedence over other cases and matters and shall be speedily heard and
determined.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.40.110 and 2005 c 243 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The opening and subsequent processing of return envelopes for
any primary or election may begin upon receipt. The tabulation of
absentee ballots must not commence until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of
the primary or election.
(2) All received absentee return envelopes must be placed in secure
locations from the time of delivery to the county auditor until their
subsequent opening. After opening the return envelopes, the county
canvassing board shall place all of the ballots in secure storage until
after 8:00 p.m. of the day of the primary or election. Absentee
ballots that are to be tabulated on an electronic vote tallying system
may be taken from the inner envelopes and all the normal procedural
steps may be performed to prepare these ballots for tabulation.
(3) Before opening a returned absentee ballot, the canvassing
board, or its designated representatives, shall examine the postmark,
statement, and signature on the return envelope that contains the
security envelope and absentee ballot. ((They)) All personnel assigned
to verify signatures must receive training on statewide standards for
signature verification. Personnel shall verify that the voter's
signature on the return envelope is the same as the signature of that
voter in the registration files of the county. For any absentee
ballot, a variation between the signature of the voter on the return
envelope and the signature of that voter in the registration files due
to the substitution of initials or the use of common nicknames is
permitted so long as the surname and handwriting are clearly the same.
(4) For registered voters casting absentee ballots, the date on the
return envelope to which the voter has attested determines the
validity, as to the time of voting for that absentee ballot if the
postmark is missing or is illegible. For out-of-state voters, overseas
voters, and service voters stationed in the United States, the date on
the return envelope to which the voter has attested determines the
validity as to the time of voting for that absentee ballot. ((For any
absentee ballot, a variation between the signature of the voter on the
return envelope and the signature of that voter in the registration
files due to the substitution of initials or the use of common
nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and handwriting are
clearly the same.))

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.40.150 and 2005 c 245 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall produce and furnish envelopes and
instructions for ((out-of-state voters,)) overseas voters((,)) and
service voters ((to the county auditors)). The information on the
envelopes or instructions must explain that:
(1) Return postage is free if the ballot is mailed through the
United States postal service, United States armed forces postal
service, or the postal service of a United States foreign embassy;
(2) The date of the signature is considered the date of mailing;
(3) The envelope must be signed by election day;
(4) The signed declaration on the envelope is the equivalent of
voter registration;
(5) A voter may fax a voted ballot and the accompanying envelope if
the voter agrees to waive secrecy. The ballot will be counted if the
original documents are received before certification of the election;
and
(6) A voter may obtain a ballot via electronic mail, which the
voter may print out, vote, and return by mail. In order to facilitate
the electronic acquisition of ballots by ((out-of-state,))
overseas((,)) and service voters, the ballot instructions shall include
the web site of the office of the secretary of state.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.48.050 and 2003 c 111 s 1205 are each amended to
read as follows:
The voter shall return the ballot to the county auditor in the
return identification envelope. If mailed, a ballot must be postmarked
not later than the date of the primary or election. Otherwise, the
ballot must be deposited at the office of the county auditor or the
designated place of deposit not later than 8:00 p.m. on the date of the
primary or election. All personnel assigned to verify signatures on
the return envelope must receive training on statewide standards for
signature verification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.04.157 (September primary) and 2003 c 111 s 128;
(2) RCW 29A.04.610 (Rules by secretary of state) and 2004 c 267 s
702, 2003 c 111 s 161, 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 2, & 1965 c 9 s 29.04.080;
(3) RCW 29A.20.110 (Definitions -- "Convention" and "election
jurisdiction") and 2003 c 111 s 505, 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 1, & 1965 c 9
s 29.24.010;
(4) RCW 29A.20.130 (Convention -- Notice) and 2003 c 111 s 507;
(5) RCW 29A.20.200 (Declarations of candidacy required,
exceptions -- Payment of fees) and 2003 c 111 s 514, 1990 c 59 s 103,
1989 c 215 s 8, 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 7, & 1965 c 9 s 29.24.070;
(6) RCW 29A.24.200 (Lapse of election when no filing for single
positions -- Effect) and 2003 c 111 s 620;
(7) RCW 29A.28.010 (Major party ticket) and 2003 c 111 s 701, 1990
c 59 s 102, 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 12, & 1965 c 9 s 29.18.150;
(8) RCW 29A.28.020 (Death or disqualification--Correcting ballots--Counting votes already cast) and 2003 c 111 s 702, 2001 c 46 s 4, &
1977 ex.s. c 329 s 13;
(9) RCW 29A.36.190 (Partisan candidates qualified for general
election) and 2003 c 111 s 919;
(10) RCW 29A.44.220 (Casting vote) and 2004 c 267 s 319, 2003 c 111
s 1121, 1990 c 59 s 43, 1988 c 181 s 4, 1965 ex.s. c 101 s 15, & 1965
c 9 s 29.51.100;
(11) RCW 29A.46.140 (Interference, assistance) and 2004 c 267 s
307;
(12) RCW 29A.46.150 (Prohibitions -- Penalty) and 2004 c 267 s 308;
(13) RCW 29A.46.210 (Procedures for voting) and 2004 c 267 s 310;
(14) RCW 29A.46.220 (Opening and closing locations) and 2004 c 267
s 311;
(15) RCW 29A.46.230 (Voters in location at closing time) and 2004
c 267 s 312;
(16) RCW 29A.46.240 (Procedures after closing) and 2004 c 267 s
313;
(17) RCW 29A.46.250 (Handling of ballots after closing) and 2004 c
267 s 314; and
(18) RCW 29A.72.220 (Petitions -- Signature checking -- Registration
information file) and 2003 c 111 s 1801.

--- END ---